Did you hear about the Native American man that drank 200 cups of tea?
What's the best anti diarrheal prescription?
What do you call a person who is outside a door and has no arms nor legs?
Which Star Trek character is a member of the magic circle?
What's the difference between a bullet and a human?
Why was the Ethiopian baby crying?
What's the difference between a corn husker with epilepsy and a hooker with dysentery?
Who is 2016's biggest sellout?
Why is little Annie's shoe floating in the sea?
What's the difference between a married man and a bachelor?
Why are there so many blood cells in female prisons?
What do you call a russian tree?
How do you call it when an egg is on point?
Where'd the dog who lost his tail go to get a new one?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster shucker and a hooker with diarrhea?
Did you hear about the oyster who went to the ball?
Why are frogs so happy?
How do you turn an Indian woman on?
Shall I tell you the joke about the kidnappers?
Do you like fish sticks?
What did the 2 rednecks say after breaking up?
What's the difference between a pizza and a Jew?
Why does Santa have three gardens?
Why did the hipster burn his tongue?
Why did Mozart kill his chickens?
What is a pirate's worst nightmare?
Why can't you e-mail a photo to a Jedi?
What will happen if you went inside a black hole?
Which came first, the Chicken or the Egg?
What's common between a good boyfriend and a lion?
Who put semen in the basement?
What do you do when your wife starts smoking?
Want to hear a joke about UDP?
[OC] Person 1: What do your parents do?
What species are the best rappers?
What does Santa say to the elves after they make the toys?
What is statistically three times worse than a war?
What do you call a row of three hares hopping backward?
I've got a dead budgie for sale, anyone interested?
What is the politically correct name for "African Americans with Down Syndrome" group?
Why did the scarecrow get a promotion?
How many blondes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is a NYC nanosecond?
Where do Tumblr users go to pray?
Q: What did the left leg say to the right leg?
What's below your sha-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na knees?
How do Humans Reproduce?
How does a Nun save herself from being poisoned?
Why does Michael J. Fox make the best milkshakes?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and an orange?
Why did the man apply for the job at the Model T factory?
How is life as a virgin?
Why can't Caitlyn Jenner lie to her kids?
What does a dog do when it loses it's tail?
Why don't Mexicans take drivers Ed and sex Ed on the same day?
Is this InkJet any good?
Why was the Router released early from prison?
Whats the name of a bodybuilder whose a fan of the X-Men?
What did the man say to his wife when he failed to get an erection?
Have you heard about the new corduroy pillows?
Guess how many girlfriends I have right now?
What's the opposite of Christopher Reeve?
What does a pencil have in common with marijuana?
Why is it hard to explain puns to kleptomaniacs?
What is the difference between cancer and a Brazilian?
What's the difference between OP and eggs?
What do you get when you mix an insurance company with an NFL quarterback?
Do you know why the Amish girl was excommunicated?
What's the difference between someone unemployed and a gender-expert?
What's better than Norwegian Beef Stew?
What do pirates say when they find buried treasure?
What do my dad and Carly Rae Jepsen have in common?
What did the American WWI vet say to the angry German veteran?
How many cops does it take to change a light bulb?
What does a near-sighted gynecologist and a puppy have in common?
What do you call two bananas?
why do nice girls always go for the assholes?
What did the farmer say when he lost his tractor?
What’s the difference between a joke and two dicks?
What's the worst part about eating vegetables?
What should you do when people talk behind your back?
What's Desiigner's favorite car?
What's cheaper, Beer Nuts or Deer Nuts?
If the bird of peace if the dove, what's the bird of love?
What's the difference between a Hippo and a Zippo?
What do they say in every infomercial in Kuwait?
What do you call a man with no shin ?
Why did Fonzie stop sleeping around?
How to you embarrasses an archaeologist?
Why'd the vulture check his bag?
Why don't drug addicts hang out at the beach?
Is anyone seeing Rouge 1 this week?
What's the difference between a high and drunk driver?
Wife:Isn't hot in here hun?
Knock knock. Who's there? Dave. Dave who?
What did Mohammad eat while in the Holy Land?
Boy to Girl- Hi Sweetheart, How is your day going?
What were the last things going through the minds of the 9/11 jumpers?
Why do black people like Korean food?
What do you call an overweight bounty hunter?
What did the beaver say when he fell in water?
Why was Mexico willing to pay to build the wall between the US and Mexico?
How do you make a dead baby float?
Why did the Muslim man have to build a house for his wives before he could eat KFC?
How did a bit travel from the CPU to the HDD?
Did you hear about the streaker in church?
What is it called when the police work overtime?
Why do Jewish men get circumcised ?
Why do riot police get to work early?
What does a whistle-blower do during a Russian blizzard?
Why buttock implants are popular in Australia?
What would be the first thing D. J. Trump would write in the Death Note (if it would exist)??
What did the horse say to the other horse?
What does a suicide bomber say when he's teaching class?
Why did the chicken give the cat his mashed potatoes?
What did one ass cheek say to the other?
How many clickbait articles does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the UK banning hummus?
What do you call a female android?
Police Officer: "Can you identify yourself, Sir"?
What's 11 & 2?
What car does a Mexican drive?
What do you call a brothel riddled with rabies?
How can you tell if you have a mature or an immature sense of humor?
What do you call it when Usain Bolt is standing next to your mom?
What happens when a pirate turns 60?
how many black live matters protester does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about that Native American who drank ten cups of tea one night?
What do you call a bear with no teeth?
What do A Tribe Called Quest and margarine have in common?
Why did the chicken cross the road?
What did the painter say after finishing a portrait of his brother Andrew?
What do you call a snowman who cons people?
What do you call a snail on a sail boat?
What did Tom hanks do in the woods?
What do you call a herpes pun?
How many eye doctors does it take to change a lightbulb?
Genie: what's your first wish?
What's yellow and black and makes you laugh?
What do you call a girl on the grill?
What do successful prostitutes have?
What music do they play in a mexican bathroom?
What's a computer's favorite beat?
What did the Special Needs Rowing Team decide to call themselves?
Want to hear a word I just made up?
WIFE: The car won’t start. Can you pick me up at the drive through McDonald's in town?
What's green and flies over Poland?
How many communists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the three year old African boy buy a red convertible?
Did you hear about the kidnapping at the local school?
What do you call an indian with pink hair?
what did the cell that got stepped on by it's sister say?
When is a car, not a car?
What side do turkeys have the most feathers on?
What do boobs and Christmas trees have in common?
What do you call a couple having sex in a moving car?
What did the atheist fisherman say when asked about his catch?
What's the difference between an art student and a philosophy student?
Where did Susie go when her town got bombed?
Why is the state of Israel like laundry?
Whats a ducks favourite drug?
How do you kill 27 people with one punch?
What do "fake news" and isis have in common?
Who won the international race?
What do you call a slut that can think?
Which is the smallest profession? A mini cab driver or a micro biologist?
Why won't Jonas Bjerre, Johan Wohlert nor Silas Utke Graae Jørgensen use guitars?
What's the difference between a trump supporter and a newly adopted Siberian husky?
What did Anakin say to Padme right before they had sex?
What do you call a rabbi who plays miniature golf?
What do you call a cow with a twitch?
What do you call an old Spanish car?
How did Luke Skywalker know what Darth Vader got him for Christmas?
What did the hippie say when he was asked to leave the couch he was sleeping/staying on?
What's the difference between a Nazi and a gay man?
What do you call a pine cone that creates exact replicas of itself?
What if George Lucas was the new Supreme Court justice?
What's the difference between a frog and a horny toad?
What's the difference between a chickpea and a lentil?
What is the difference between Reddit and children's television?
How many stockholders does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many programmers does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you do if you come across a tiger in the jungle?
What do you call a black man in space?
How do you get an art major off your front porch?
Why doesn't cancer let anyone in a music store?
What is ISIS's favorite mathematical operation?
Why are there no female serial killers ??
How do you blindfold an Asian?
How do you make an octopus laugh?
Why do dogs lick each other?
What do Leonardo, Donatello, Michelangelo and Raphael have in common?
What's brown and sticky?
What do you call a half gay person on a bike?
What does a new pilot do?
Why is it great to date a duck?
Who was the famous writer, that died in WWII?
What do you get if you cross a woman with a whale?
What's the biggest difference between Intel and AMD?
Why don't airplanes make good dads?
Why are all Jewish men circumcised ?
What do you call a hundred blondes stacked up on each other?
What's a neckbeard's favorite metal?
My 8 year old today: Who serves the toilet?
How do police informants begin their jokes?
How can you tell if a witch is racist?
Where do cowboys cook their meals?
Why do people call Pokemon Ruby, Sapphire and Emerald the "teenage years" of Pokemon?
Knock knock! Who's There?
Did you hear about the guy who got hit in the head with a can of soda?
Did you hear about the new rating scale for how colorblind someone is?
What's the difference between Jesus and a picture of Jesus?
Why does Tiger Woods make the best milkshakes?
How can you tell if a man has a high sperm count?
Why did Judge Reinhold get arrested in Dallas?
What's the difference between roast beef and pea soup?
What does the MacBook have in common with Donald Trump?
Where do you find a dog with no legs?
What do you call it when Batman skips church..?
What do blind fisherman use as bait?
What do you call an appetizer made with duck?
How much room is needed for fungi to grow?
Whats black and isn't working?
"Did you hear about the $3,000,000 Maryland State Lottery?
What is your name?
Why are all my black friends so tall?
Why the full we don't have any jokes about Islam?
What did the cannibal do after he dumped his girlfriend?
Do you know the difference between lunch and a blowjob?
What did the girlfriend say to her boyfriend that was bitten by a zombie?
What do you call a fat prostitute in space?
Doctor: Did you come to see me with and eye problem?
Why didn't Keanu Reeves eat his breakfast cereal?
Why did the board game factory close?
What is a south Koreans favorite fruit?
How do you drown a blonde?
What do you call Pope Benedict after his final day in the papal office?
Where does a two dimensional man live?
Who just can't get enough of one liners?
What do Spider-Man and Windows 98 have in common?
Why cant you watch TV in Afghanistan?
What did the elephant say?
What is red and bad for your teeth?
Wanna dance?
How are Santa Claus and a Catholic priest alike?
What is yellow and rolls down a hill?
Why is "My Own Worst Enemy" a great song?
What do you get when you throw a grenade into a french kitchen?
Did you know Helen Keller had an amusement park in her backyard?
What's a redditor's favorite pasta?
What's the difference between a duck?
Ever tried eating a clock?
Why is the ocean so salty?
Why transformer vibrates?
Is your refrigerator running?
Do you ever talk to yourself?
When do cows go to sleep?
How many Trump supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the 0 say to the 8?
What do short people call something that's too high up?
Why is Yoda the worst copilot?
What do you call a non-practicing Jew?
What do you call a runner who hates every event but his own?
What do you call someone who can't think on their feet?
Why isn't the holiday on December 25th pronounced "Chlistmas"?
Why did the Jewish man become a banker?
What do Prime Numbers and Basic Bitches have in common?
Why do girls take 45 minutes to get dressed?
Why do computer programmers confuse Christmas with Halloween?
What do you call a rifle that fires 3 bullets at once?
What's worse than finding a worm in your apple?
What did Jesus say to Melchior?
Afraid your kid might be a commie?
Which Way Do Transformers Put The Toilet Paper?
Why do Indians hate snow?
Why did princess Diana cross the road?
How did redditor heckle the stand up comic?
What do you call a hippie that is out at sea on a raft?
What disease does a married man have?
What is the number 1 rule at a computer bar?
Why are Alabama weddings so small?
What should you not gift a Syrian this year?
Why did Prince Charles leave Windsor Castle and move to an alley?
Know what's the perfect example of a queue?
Why wasn't Jesus Christ born in Alabama?
Why are there no Walmarts in Iraq?
How many suh dudes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a black guy surrounded by 1000 white people?
Why do I not laugh at your jokes anymore?
(Dark) What does a lightbulb and a pregnant woman have in common?
What do a Boston Marathon runner and Jesus have in common?
How many vegans does it take to eat a cheeseburger?
How many r/jokes redditors does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do a Boston Marathon runner and Hitler have in common?
Wanna hear a dirty joke?
What is a musician's favorite computer?
What do you call a crow who repairs time pieces?
Why did the teddy bear leave the restaurant?
Why do the rich enjoy tending to their gardens?
What does Reddit share in common with the real world?
What's the difference between a garbanzo pea and a chick pea?
Wanna hear a joke about a piece of paper?
What do you call an iron cat?
What do people drink at Club Obi-Wan?
What did the banana say to the vibrator?
What do you call a group of ravens?
What does Sherlock Holmes do in the toilet?
What do you call a dog with 2 legs?
Obama: (sighs) Joe, what happened to all of the pens that were in this container yesterday?
What did the sex offender say when he robbed the Pokémon Center?
Has anyone ever tasted novocaine?
Why does Rihanna hate racing against a shit covered Jesus?
What do Greeks use to listen to music?
What's a surfers least favourite household appliance?
Why are girlfriends like plungers?
Why didn't the terminator upgrade to windows 10?
Why can you never trust a car made in the Soviet Union?
How do you call a robber in a suit of armor?
How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
How much wood could a woodchuck chuck if a woodchuck could chuck wood?
Why couldnt the feminist screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a gay philosopher?
How do you cover 18 holes with one hole?
What's worse than getting rejected by an attractive stranger?
Why couldn't Barbie get pregnant?
Why did the little girl fall off the swing?
What do you call the 'n' in government?
Why did the mushroom go to the party?
Why did the console peasant cross the road?
What did the woman say to the stamp collector to reject his romantic advances?
What happens when you spin an Asian around?
What do you call a Jewish Pokémon trainer?
What did the obese man say about the belt he'd recently purchased?
What's your greatest weakness?
Damn girl are you an Indian reservation?
What's the difference between a Zippo and a hippo?
Who was the true winner of the 1940 Tour de France?
Why is Jesus always sad?
[Dark Humor] How many Jews died in the holocaust?
Why are people from Arkansas so good at Science?
Wanna hear a terrorist joke?
What do you call a drug factory that catches fire?
What do the twin towers and genders have in common?
Have you read the book about anti-gravity?
Who is this Rorschach guy?
What do you call a puppy with autism?
Why was Orlando Bloom sad when he realised he wasn't able to build small toy houses?
Why is it illegal to masturbate on an airplane?
Why are most politicians in the closet or gay?
Why can't Maester Aemon see?
what did the Kremlin say when Kruschev died?
What do you call people who are afraid of Santa Claus?
Why is a hen house like a lesbian?
What do they call deers in space?
Why did the detective go to the apartment complex?
Why did the duck cross the road?
How do you get a Canadian to quit smoking cigarets?
Why did Gandalf the Grey drop out of high school?
Have you ever heard a terrible joke?
Why did the tourist visiting Mexico bring Prolax and pepper spray?
Why doesn't Pac-Man use Twitter?
How does the balance sheet of a bank look like as of today?
Have you ever tried to eat a clock?
Anyone Heard About The New Barbie?
What do you call your wife's sisters husband?
Mother Teresa lived to 87. Do you know how much sex she had in all those years?
Is your dad a gardner?
What do you call the birth of a lie?
Why did the animal shelter relocate to Nebraska?
What did the baby corn say to the mama corn?
What did the leper say to the prostitute?
Why did the french geologist have to go to the hospital?
How does a Jew make his coffee?
What do you call a guy who can't poop?
What do you call a witch who only eats sand?
If Reddit were a 90s sitcom, what would it be called?
What is the difference between Jews and Santa Claus?
Why do gorillas have big nostrils?
Why do java programmers need glasses?
How many Gordon Ramseys does it take to change a lightbulb?
why was the Star Ship Enterprise circling Uranus?
What do you call a deceptive feline?
Did you hear about the Buddhist who refused a Novocain injection during root canal treatment?
What do you call a cheesy French man?
What font does a beef noodle stall use?
Should I get get worried when the moon goes dark?
Why can't Matthew McConaughey make a left turn?
What do you call a retired professional swimmer?
Why do fanfic writers like Amazon Prime?
A blonde asks the doctor: Can you catch aids in toilets?
How many police officers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why can't Kermit and Miss Piggy count to one hundred?
What would've happened if Jesus Christ didn't make Christmas?
What does an invisible watermelon look like?
What do you call a Catholic Missionary who is also a car enthusiast?
When does feminism end?
What did Edward Snowden say when he bumped into Barack Obama?
How many Mexicans does it take to change a lightbulb in Texas?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and a Xbox?
How do you clean a spear?
What do you call it when two terrorists are horsing around on the radio?
What do Muslim men do while foreplay?
What do you call a journalist in Russia?
What did the hungry computer eat?
What did the Ceasar of reddit say?
How do you know if a girl is ticklish?
When does a joke become a dad joke?
Q: Why did the one-handed man cross the road?
How do you back Donald Trump into a driveway?
Anton, do you think I'm a bad mother?
Why was Six afraid of Seven?
Why are negative parabolas so introverted?
What computer eat?
Wanna read a long joke?
What do you call a girl with no legs?
Just had sex even though I had a headache. Did you hear that, ladies?
How do you calculate a girl's impulse?
How do they pick kids for the Make-A-Wish Foundation?
What does the sign on an out-of-business brothel say?
What does the European say to the black couple?
Why did sumo wrestlers start shaving their legs?
What does a skeptic chemist say when he hears a baseless argument?
Why are ducks always sad?
Q: Does God exist?
Are you Russian?
What do you call a judge with no left hand and left leg?
What do you call a snake that works in the government?
why did the chicken cross the road?
What do you call a lesbian dinosaur?
What do you say to a black man in a suit?
How did George Michael speak when he couldn't eat fruit?
How many isolationists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the man who got sick at the airport?
Ever hear about the Baader Meinhof phenomena?
What is a pirate's least favorite letter?
What do you call an NSA whistle-blower spending the winter in Russia?
What's a stoner's favorite body of water?
How do you make a scientist laugh?
What do you throw at a scientists wedding?
What is a dad joke?
What do you call it when someone from Belarus lies to you?
What do you call an angry German?
Why did the blind women fall into a well?
Did you hear about the president that cheated on his wife with a piece of fruit?
Why does Willem Dafoe play a villain in a lot of movies?
How do you make copper wire?
What's the difference between a drug dealer and a prostitute?
How do you know if you are drowning in milk?
Why is Kevin Hart the opposite of Michael Schumacher?
What's the hardest part of cooking vegetables?
What do you call a black man flying an airplane?
What's green and yellow and can't fly?
What do you get when you cross an owl with a bungee cord?
Why did the blonde tip toe near the medicine cabinet?
Why do men carry condoms instead of women?
How is Christmas like your job?
What did Hillary say when she lost?
Hey boy,are you the Marauder's Map?
Why don't X and Z get along with Y?
Hey girl are you legs broken?
What did the knife say to the potato?
What was Jeremy Clarkson on during Top Gear?
What is the difference between a 3D modeller and a gamer?
[Controversial] Why wasn't Jesus born into the Trump family?
What did the chronic masturbator have for dinner?
What do you call a semi-professional proctologist?
Why was Peter Pan a bad boxer?
Did you hear that Willie Nelson died?
What am I not taking on Christmas this year?
Did you guys hear about the Trump winery?
What is something that is brown and sticky?
You know what the hardest part about rollerblading is?
What do you call a person who drinks way too much soda?
What's the difference between a jeweler and a jailer?
What goes stomp, stomp, stomp, squish?
What’s the difference between being hungry and being horny?
What's the difference between Beyonce and a shopping bag?
Why is it easier for married black men to cheat?
What do you call a cheap circumcision?
Why does Dr. Pepper come in a bottle?
What do you call a short priest reaching for his bible that's on the top shelf?
What do you say to Harry Potter when he has a mosquito bite he can't stop scratching?
What do you call the guy who manages my apartment building?
What do Trump and an Aluminum can have in common?
What dies a little, when explained about?
What do a horny guy and a bad driver have in common?
What do Waitresses and Chemists have in common?
What do you call a cheap, horrible circumcision?
How do you lower the crime rate?
What happened when Santa cut his beard?
Why do chickens go to church?
Man: Hi, do you want to dance?
What's awkward for a man but a normal part of the job for a lumberjack?
Have you ever smelled moth balls?
Which president was least guilty?
What do you call a private investigator who has a completely liquid diet?
Why don't you ever see elephants hiding in trees?
Why was six scared of seven?
After Kanye was released from the hospital for exhaustion what was his diagnosis?
How do you get over a fear of elevators?
What do you call miscellaneous members of Han Solo's best friend's family?
What does an old woman have between her breasts that a young woman doesn't?
Why is your nose in the middle of your face?
What did the vinaigrette say to the refrigerator?
Why are Boy Scouts safest when travelling with a senior?
What's a Pirate's favorite letter?
how do you get a gay guy to sit on a bar stool?
What do you get if you cross McCree with a cow?
What did the buffalo say before his son left for school?
What did one coffee bean say to the other coffee bean?
Why do Santas elves take forever to finish making toys?
What's joke #1?
You know what's more funnier than Cold Play?
What's the difference between a comedian and a Republican?
What's the most threatened career in Trudeau's Canada?
What do you call a 200ft Rabbi rampaging through Tokyo?
What do you call a soul singer with a bladder problem?
What do Englishmen like more than tea?
Where do fashionable kids with cancer like to shop for clothes?
Why didn't the chicken cross the road?
Where do lumberjacks go for casual sex?
What does a ghost drink?
What do you call a musical wreath made from $100 bills?
What's the difference between the G-Spot and Jack Daniels?
What did the bartender say after Charles Dickens ordered a drink?
How are women like casinos?
Why did the Mexicans ignore the "No Trespassing" sign?
Did you hear about the General's Army?
What's a thief's favorite type of armour?
Who wears a toga and a face mask?
What do spinach and anal sex have in common?
What's the worst thing to say to a person with depression?
Why do Stasi officers make such good taxi drivers?
What do you call a theme park where people go to have selfies with chickens?
What did the salesman say when you asked for a 10% discount on a pair of Crocs?
What do you call a cranky grandfather?
What's a down-side of being a paedophile?
What's the hardest thing about anal?
What did Nokia's executives say when the iPhone launched?
What do you call one of Santa's helpers who bosses around the reindeer?
Whats blue and slippery?
How did the two perverts break up?
Why didn't the piece of paper move out of the way when a car came speeding towards it?
What did the insect say when he saw a gnat get hit?
What do you call a bird that's afraid of heights?
Ever heard of the first time Stevie Wonder tried reading braille?
Why is the beach wet?
Why do big trucks have nuts on the trailer hitch, but no shaft?
What did one hotdog stand say to the other hotdog stand?
Did you hear about the new color attracting broom?
What's it called when a fedora wearing neckbeard gets sick?
Why does a white person turn black after eating a whole cantaloupe?
What do you call a Jewish woman's boobs?
What do a sneeze, a french-dip, and Woody Allen have in common?
What did Batman say to Robin before he got in the car?
Why do dogs lick their balls ?
What do you call a gay Jew?
Did you hear the one about the agnostic insomniac dyslexic?
What do you call a gay couple before June 2015?
How do you call a cow with no legs?
Did you hear about the builder who could clap very loudly?
What came before the Big Bang?
What do you call a man with no knees?
Did you hear about the new camouflage turban?
Why doesn't Santa have any kids?
What does a Jedi use to open files?
Which came first the chicken or the egg?
What do you call a motorcycle gang made up of ancient bisexual Norse monarchs?
What's the hardest part of making a vegan pizza?
What is everyone using to scrape ice off their windscreen?
What reassurance did the proud Jewish father offer his struggling son?
What do you call a bell which doesn't do it's work?
What do pumpkin spice and Drake have in common?
What did the vegetable say to the dj?
What do the cristae of the mitochondria and the Mexican border have in common?
What was the other reindeer's name?
What's the difference between Hitler and Trump?
What did one lesbian vampire say to the other lesbian vampire?
Why Don't Black People like Country Music?
How are new marriages just like LOST?
What is brown and sticky?
Did you hear the one about the gay whale?
What do you call a white supremacist that doesn't eat meat?
What has two wings and a halo?
What is your guys' opinion on shoes that are a little bit too small?
You know what the worst part about being tall and funny is?
How can you tell an ant is a boy or girl?
What do you call an american late night channel block dedicated to tsundere anime shows?
how do japanese petite dogs says hello?
What do you get when you cross a penis and a potato?
Why doesn't the stone vendor value money?
Why do Native Americans hate snow?
(OC)What did dumbledores ghost say?
How many feet are in a yard?
why do women not need to wear watches?
What's it called when a dog burns down a building?
What's the definition of a will?
What is Stephen Hawking's favourite song?
Why did nobody in the Soviet Union drive manual cars?
Why are Jews so good at basketball?
Did you get a swirly?
What are Super Mario & Luigi's overalls made of?
What was the desert's piece of advice?
Did you hear about the Brazilian football team?
Have you meet my briefcase?
What do capitalists and conspiracy theorists have in common?
What do you call a flying bagel?
Why are there no nightclubs on Venus?
Did you hear about the chameleon who couldn’t change colour?
Whats the difference between a USB and the USA?
How do farmers count their cattle?
Hey baby, do you wanna sleep with a statistic?
Why aren't Tumblr users good farm contractors?
Did you hear about the magic tractor?
Where are the best sounding farts listed?
Was Santa Claus Your Birth Doctor?
Why was the woman with no children so good at konami games?
How did the scarecrow get a promotion?
What do you say when you find superheroes in a Lego store?
Why is it easy to defeat an army of suicide bombers?
What word is always spelled incorrectly?
Did you hear about the guy who won too many awards?
Who is the most communist cat in the world?
What do you call a business man that blocks snow?
What does a noise musician order at a Chinese restaurant?
Asked a hen how many eggs it lays daily?
How does a man with no nose smell?
At a gig, how can you tell if the stage is level?
Why did some chemists go broke?
How do frogs make a condom more interesting?
How does a Jewish man make coffee?
What do you call a dog with steel legs and brass balls?
What do you call a Nazi doctor that served in WWII and only took animal patients?
What does a fern have in its house?
Hey girl, are you from Tennessee?
What did the egg say when it got turned up?
Have you heard about those corduroy pillows?
Why do white people rely on asians so much?
Why didn't Hitler take a taxi?
Where did L Ron Hubbard store his dishes?
What was Stalin's favorite chemical equation?
What do you call a cow with no legs?
If I have 10 pieces of bacon and you take half, what do you have?
Have you folks read the book, Twenty Yards to the Outhouse?
Why is Gandalf so good in bed?
What do you call a low hanging bull?
What's the hardest part of a vegetable to eat?
Why did the guitarist get life in prison?
How do you call the biggest beer bottle?
Why couldn't I use the Palestinian toilet?
Hey baby you like hardware stores?
Why was the teacher cross-eyed?
How do seals keep their coats so smooth?
What is Tom's favorite kind of joyride?
On a perfect date, what question do you ask a girl twice?
What Do You Call IDubbbz When He is Angry?
What do you call a pack of 8 Timbits?
How do deaf mathematicians communicate?
Ever wonder how we evolved from cavemen to civilized people?
What sound does a Greek gun make?
What's worse than a cardboard box?
What do 6.9 and 69 have in common?
Why did Frosty drop his pants?
What's worse than having a girlfriend without tits?
What do you call cheap circumcision?
Can somebody explain to me the uproar over the CEO editing posts?
Why did hitler accidentally drown that jew?
What do you call a blonde who dyes her hair brown?
How is making cheese like invading Syria?
How do canibals eat victims with Parkinson's disease?
How do you draw a scatter plot?
How do you read the Gospel According to Shrek?
What do vegetarian cannibals eat?
What's the difference between bullets and everyone ?
Why did they never make a pregnant Barbie?
What do you call a cow who just gave birth?
What did the Mexican Physicist have for Thanksgiving Dinner?
If the Pilgrims were alive today, what would they be most famous for?
What's imaginary that my girlfriend and I afraid to forget?
Where does Napoleon live/Ou Napoléon habite-t-il?
What do you call a number on drugs?
What is the difference between a good joke and a bad joke?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a WWI soldier?
What's the difference between a circus and a whore house?
What do you call a potato that had too much pot?
What do toothpaste and Donald Trump have in common?
When does a pear become a pair?
What does a barcode say if he bumps into another barcode?
Did you hear Monica Lewinsky became a republican?
What do voyeuristic Redditors look at?
What's the difference between Jesus and the chicken that crossed the road?
Why do Men find it hard to make eye contact?
Why was the broom late to the meeting?
Why is Sammy Hagar such a bad golfer?
What do you call it when Darth Vader moves one foot?
What was a doctors diagnosis of the victims involved in a pet van crash?
Why is there no "Lets settle this like women"?
What is the internal temperature of a Tauntaun?
What do you call a person that raises the dead and also had a thing for napes?
What was the name of the heaviest man in china?
What's the difference between a priest and his dog?
You know who is the worst person ever?
What happens when you play the drums incorrectly?
How did Henry VIIIs wife enter the room?
Does Indiana Jones like foreplay?
How do Zombies get rid of Bad Breath?
What did one dick say to the other dick?
What French city always surrenders first?
Why does the baker have so many loaves?
Are you sure you're the dandy highwayman?
Which lawyers are U2 fans?
What does a horny gay rooster say in the morning?
Where do weightlifters get their sandwiches?
What do you call a kid who tells bad jokes?
Why did the hipster burn himself?
What do you call an honest lawyer?
Did you here about the earthquake that broke the world in half?
What's the difference between a chickpea and a garbanzo bean?
What do you say about someone who has a grim future?
What is Sean Connery's favorite sport, and around what age did he start playing?
What do you call people that you hate?
How come legacy programmers get Halloween and Christ...?
Why was Hitler late to his meeting?
Who's the world's most powerful woman?
Hey, did you hear about that hilarious joke on /r/Jokes?
Why did the Tinman not go to the ball?
Why did Genghis invade China?
What did Wonder Woman tell The Flash when he saw that he was greying?
[Late, I know] What do rednecks do on Halloween?
What did the alien say to Franz Schubert?
How many fish did it take to consume my wife?
What did the police car say to the muscle car?
What's the difference between Hitler and a marathon runner?
What did the rich bald man want before he died?
What does a Victoria's Secret Black Friday sale have in common with a girl about to get a spanking?
What's the best thing about living in Switzerland?
Why do Trumpler supporters think he's honest?
What did one lonely penis say to the other?
What do Trump supporters and Flat Earthers have in common?
What makes the Palestinians tick?
What do you call a redneck with a functioning car?
What fictional city can ISIS not invade by land?
What happens when you seduce a cow?
What do you call a Scotsman who works in a cloakroom?
Wanna know what's really corny?
Why do cows have hooves instead of feet?
What did the lesbian vampire say to another lesbian vampire?
What's the most forbidden word in retail?
Why are there no fertility clinics in Arkansas?
Did you hear about that broom on the news??
How many feminists does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a gushing keyboard?
What do you call an Alabama woman who can run faster than her brother?
What do you call a Rick and Morty fan with a bronze medal?
Hey, what's a good sign that you're going insane?
What's the difference between Joe Paterno and Harambe?
Why did the coach go to Aldi?
Where do socialist birds lay their eggs?
Why should I drink Mr. Pibb?
What's black, white, and red all over?
Scientist1: You got any Sodium Hypobromite?
What do you call someone who worships Doritos?
What's E.T. short for?
Have you ever been to a store that only sells lamps?
What is the average lifespan of an owl?
What's the difference between a Chinese man and a lobster under a bus?
What's the difference between a pickpocket and a peeping tom?
What does a clock do when it's hungry?
What's the difference between your wife and your job?
Who are the fastest readers?
What do you call a psychic midget that escapes prison?
What's the difference between a Native American and a white baby?
Why did Hitler kill himself?
What song do the zombies of Westeros sing?
Did you hear about the guy who mistook the oxygen bar for a cigar bar?
When's the baby due?
What did one bridge say to another?
How does Tolkien make his bread?
Where is the first baseball game in the Bible?
Why is time wary of mathematicians?
What is yellow and can't swim?
Why did Hitler break up with his girlfriend?
How did the chicken cross the freeway?
What do you call a Magician with a Parrot?
What do prime numbers and stoners have in common?
Which part of a vegetable isn't edible?
Why does Lou Gramm wear glasses?
What's the best blood type?
What do you call an agreement with a dog on not eating sweets?
Who races the most?
Why do bald men cut holes in there pockets?
Why did the king have his landscaper hanged?
What did Woody say to Buzz?
Why is ketchup married to mustard?
What do you call an asthmatic statue?
What do you call a Sith Lord who lives in the woods?
Whats the difference between Jack Daniels and John Wayne?
What's better than getting second place at the special Olympics?
What's similiar between Pokèmon and Jews?
What do you call Italian marijuana?
How do you find a dirty cop?
Why is the oval office oval shaped?
Why was 6 afraid of 7?
What's the difference between you(anyone reading this) and a refrigerator?
What bleeds once a month and has absolutely no sense of humor?
Do you know why the Little Mermaid wore seashells?
What does a pirate call three feet?
How do you feel when there's no coffee?
What’s the last thing you want to see when you’re shagging the wife?
After the extinction of every Ant on earth, what do we call Anteaters?
What's faster than a black man running with a tv?
Knock knock. Who's there? Daisy. Daisy who?
What does trump call the loose skin around a vagina?
What do you get when you mix a rhino with an elephant?
Why is Reddit such a great place for freedom of speech?
What do comedians do when they get tired of doing standup comedy?
What do you call an Asian beheading?
How many tickles does it take to make an octopus laugh?
What did Melania Trump have on her Black Friday shopping list?
What do you say to an ugly person?
What did Nala tell Simba after seeing a herd of women on Black Friday?
What part of America can't sell full sized soft drinks?
Why can't the Transistor drink any more coffee?
How does water stay warm during the winter?
What did the Hulk say when he got trapped in a burning building?
What do you say to comfort the grammar nazi?
You know what the best part of having dyslexia is?
Dark: What's the difference between a jew and a black man?
How many different kinds of crabs can you get in Baltimore?
Who is the greatest loser ever?
(overheard by old man during dinner). What do you call an American who does not like apple pie?
What did the blonde's right leg say to her left leg?
What do you call a dinosaur with explosive diarrhea?
What did Matthew McConaughey say about Steve Bannon's followers?
What is green and smells like red paint?
Why are school shooters more likely to be white people?
What does the Incredible Hulk bring to the Avenger's Thanksgiving meal?
What do you call a female peacock?
What's the difference between a semicolon and a cat?
What're tupacs favorite vegetables?
What has arms but can't move them?
You really think jobs don't racially discriminate?
Is Aretha Franklin finished singing the national anthem?
What do you call a Russian on a golf course?
What is the difference between a poor marksman and a constipated owl?
How can you tell the difference between a thermometer and a rectal thermometer?
Who has the fastest brain in the world?
What do you call a place where Mexicans go to the bathroom?
What do you call a group of rabbits walking backward?
What do you call a mix between holiday poultry and a ghoul?
What kind of bagel can fly?
Why is Theresa May so against Porn?
What's The Donald's favourite keyboard shortcut?
What sound does a space turkey make?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster and a prostitute with diarrhoea?
Why was the Chinese Journey cover band a failure?
What did the green grape say to the purple grape?
What is reddit?
What would Israel be called if it was make believe?
Why don't the Greeks, Slavs, and Armenians celebrate Thanksgiving?
Ever wondered why toilet paper is so cheap in Mexico?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a Porsche?
What kind of car does a rich baker drive?
How do you get your girlfriend to go to the gym with you?
What did the witch say when her position was terminated?
Why can't dyslexics tell jokes?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with boobs?
Hey girl, are you a sudden change in slope on an acceleration-time graph?
How does Kurt Cobain collect his thoughts?
How do you make a rave party in Africa?
Did you know that a person gets in a car accident every 10 seconds?
What would you call oranges if they were purple?
What song do turkeys sing on Thanksgiving Day?
What's the difference between a stubbed toe and an Asgard hero?
What is the difference between a golfer and a sky-diver?
What do you rate Megan Fox out of 10?
What is the hardest part of telling a good gay joke?
Why is six afraid of nine?
Why did the tree go to jail?
What do you call the queue to Alcatraz?
What's worse than having 10 babies nailed to a tree?
What's the difference between a prostitute and a drug dealer?
What do transsexuals run on?
What do bostonians call dogs that protect heaven's gates?
What do you call a gay Jamaican?
What do you call collegiate perspiration?
What do standup comedian prostitutes and whalers have in common?
Who do you see winning the presidency in 4 years?
What's the only part of a vegetable you can't eat?
What do Twitter users and lollipops have in common?
Orange you glad Hillary didn't get elected?
What do the World Trade Center and genders have in common?
Which November holiday is a weed smoker's favorite?
What do you get when you cross a fancy car and a sweet potato?
What kind of bee's make milk?
France and Italy are in a battle against each other. Who wins?
What does a thesaurus have for breakfast?
What is the name of Mark Zuckerbergs mother?
What did the Easter egg say to the boiling water?
What a pirate’s favorite letter of the alphabet?
[Pickup Line] Are you a washing machine?
What do call a prehistoric hooker?
Ever seen a movie titled 'Constipation'?
Why did Obama serve two terms?
Why is the Kremlin so much warmer this winter?
Did you hear?
What did Obama say to the Vice President before leaving the White House?
What did one Pop star say to the other?
What's the longest, hardest thing in a Republican's life?
What's a black mailman called?
What did the Japanese soda say to Papa John after he crashed his car?
If Apple made a car, what would it be lacking?
What Is Bluetooth ?
How do Japanese Chihuahuas say 'Hello'?
How do you keep an idiot in suspense?
Why are redditors bad stand-up comedians?
What do you call a neckbeard's disease?
Why have we not seen any Vibrator comb combinations?
How do we know Princess Diana had dandruff?
What's it called if you re-evaluate your butt?
You know what's a big ripoff?
Has anyone heard of the new band called 512MB?
What does the janitor keep in the closet?
How many Jews does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do Germans tie their shoelaces?
What does donkey taste like?
What do Disney and Kellogg's have in common?
Do you keep your phone in your back pocket?
You hear the one about the kid in Las Vegas?
What do Japanese people say after a Thanksgiving prayer?
What is 6.9?
Why do people at work always laugh at my jokes?
what do you call chess players bragging in a hotel lobby?
Is it wrong to hate a certain race?
What is sticky and quacks?
What's the difference between a doctor and God?
Why are Mafia members so good at sex?
What breaks when you give it to a toddler?
What do you call a cow with five legs?
What do you call a cow with three legs?
How do you know your girlfriend is getting fat?
What does a thesaurus eat for breakfast?
Why does Snoop Dog carry an umbrella?
What do you feed a feminist at a cookout?
What do you get when you cross a blue eye and a brown eye?
Advices?
What do you call a snobbish criminal walking downstairs?
What colour did Matthew McConaughey want his house to be painted?
What do you call someone who's been banned from the Playboy mansion?
What's the cheapest type of meat?
What was Hitler so grumpy?
Why don't Muslims support Harambe?
What is the most effective way to remember your wife’s birthday?
Where did the hamburger meet the cheeseburger?
What happens to the short sighted guy who did circumcisions?
What did the SI7 Agent say to a piece of bread in a costume?
What do you get if you cross a soldier and a scientist?
Q: Should you have your whole family for Thanksgiving dinner?
What kind of music did the Pilgrims like?
Why are topologists on a world of their own?
Why can't pirates play any card games?
Excuse me, can you tell me if my indicators are working?
What did the turkey say to the motorist?
What do you get when you mix human DNA with goat DNA?
Why can't you hear a Pterodactyl use a bathroom?
What did Mario say about Toad?
What does milk and brothels have in common?
Teacher - What is the difference between 1 Gb and 2 Gb?
What is Forrest Gump's email password?
Why does no one like the number 4?
What is 18 inches long, pink, squishy, and makes women cry?
Why did Neil Armstrong get to set foot on the moon before Buzz Aldrin?
Why does Peter Pan fly?
What do you call a cross between a donkey and an onion?
Why do black computers not work?
What do you call ants in your syrup?
Have you heard about the new German Microwave?
Hey baby are you bread?
What did the kid with no hands get for Christmas?
How do you make a tissue dance?
What's the good word?
What do me an Kanye West have in common?
Why are they called hemorrhoids?
What do Alicia Keys, Katniss Everdeen, and Joan of Arc all have in common?
Psst, hey Patrick, what's funnier than 24?
How did the Irishman get arthritis?
What's the difference between the holocaust and a jolly-good fellow?
What did the candle say to the flame?
A couple was traveling across Europe but had to stop abruptly at Finland's borders. Why?
Why do we drink apple juice?
What do you get when you give your kids participation trophies?
What's a rabbi's favorite type of bar?
Why is the physicist not worried about his weight?
What was the border patrol agent's greatest regret?
Why was Obama nervous when eating a T-bone aboard Air Force One?
How does a black women know if she's pregnant?
How do you make holy water?
Why did italy cross the road?
What did the fish say when it hit the wall?
Why do you never play hide & seek with mountains?
Do you know on which side the jews fought in WWII?
How do you find a blind guy at a nude beach?
What do you call the man with a lisp who drowned?
Why are Leprechauns always laughing?
What time is it when planes start dropping engines?
Why did the hipster chemist get burnt?
What Did One Eye Say To Another Eye?
What do you call it when you spin a candy cane?
What do a call a blonde that dyes her hair brown?
What do you call a sort-of cool vegetable?
Where do lemons go to jail?
How does John Marston take a shower?
How do you fit 4 gays on a barstool?
How many Freudian psychologists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How should a feudal lord deal with it when the serfs rise up?
What's red, and bad for your teeth?
How many "suh dudes" does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the toilet paper stop crossing the road?
What is the worst type of doctor you can be?
Did you hear about that action movie about camping?
Why do nerds go to Jewish weddings?
Q: How did the redneck find his sister in the woods?
Why Trump is the most religious president in United States history?
How come Peter Pan keeps on flying?
What rock group have four men that don't sing?
Why did the acid perform poorly?
What's the most popular soup in China?
Why did the baker have brown hands?
What do you call a T-Bone steak without the T?
Why does everyone claim that Steve Bannon is such a crazy guy?
Ever look in the fridge and be disappointed that all there is for supper is leftover pizza and beer?
What did the Cannibal get when he was late to dinner?
How are the Twin Towers and Gender Similar?
How to keep a reader in suspense?
What is the difference between Usain Bolt and Hitler?
What did the plant say to the vegan?
Do you think you will have to wear diapers when you get older?
What kind of vegetable always helps you feel better?
Ever had Ethiopian food?
Why does Trump pay for stuff in exact change?
Did you hear the one about the terrorist at the comedy club?
What does 1+1=?
What's a Mexican's favorite sport?
Why is a river really rich?
What is the difference between your wife and your job?
Why don't Victorian men ever talk about sex with their women?
What is the hottest time of day?
What does a mathematicion find in a forest?
what did the drummer say to the Chinese man that called him gay?
What did the the Knight say to the Comedian after the comedian made him laugh?
What did the person say when someone tried to cut off their toes?
What does a Thesaurus eat for breakfast?
What did the terrorist Redditor say on the plane?
How many ears does Spock have?
What does it mean when a man makes eye contact with a woman while she speaks?
How do you make Holy Water?
hi Why didnt Spock make a record of their voyage?
Why is it hard to watch two elephants boxing?
What do you call a frog in the no parking zone?
How does Voldemort seal his mail?
How does a sea horse run?
What do you call a gay Dinosaur?
How do you get 50 little old ladies to scream FUCK at the same time?
Why did Kanye say he would have voted for Donald Trump?
Did you hear about the clever nun who got tricked?
What do you call a flying Jew?
How's havin' a dick?
How is she pregnant?
Why do Canadians say aboot?
What is the difference between a duck?
What's Hitler's favorite board game?
What is the best place to hide a dead body?
What does an helicopter and pants have in common?
What do you call a Mexican with a rubber toe?
What did the egg say to the boiling water?
What's the fastest bird in the world?
Which of the twelve knights built King Arthur's round table?
Have you ever been caught masterbating in a closet?
Is Google male or female?
What did the gardener say to the rose?
Why does iron man have a vagina?
What makes the Jewish Monopoly game so much harder than the original?
Why do Democrats push for more gun control?
What did one boob say to the other?
Which room in Donalds Trump's house has the thickest walls?
What do you call a vegetarian with bad gas?
What kind of cologne applies itself?
What do maimed people drink at 5PM?
Did you hear that Sean Connery tried out speed-dating but he ended up making all his dates sick?
What is the best food to order from Amazon?
Who here likes Olympic Frisbees?
Did you hear about the crazy train that went on a killing spree?
What Do You Call Bluetooth ?
Why doesn't Ganondorf like going on the internet?
What's the difference between a Marxist-Leninist-Maoist-Third Worldist and a Cthulhu worshipper?
Hey, do you like tapes and CDs?
What's the best part about having sex with a 6 year-old?
What's the hardest part about eating a vegetable?
How do you confuse a blind person?
Who does Matthew McConaughey say is the most dangerous group in America?
What’s the biggest difference between men and women?
What did the skeleton order at the restaurant?
What does Pink Floyd and Princess Diana have in common?
What did one washed up Power Ranger say to the other?
What do Trump supporters do with their leaves every fall?
What's another term for cancer?
What did the Computer Engineer say?
What came first? The chicken or the egg?
How do you drown a hipster?
What do you call it when a pickle masturbates?
Why did the semen cross the road?
What do you call Bambi's friend dead on the road?
What do transgender cannibals call the blood of Christ?
What did Matthew McConaughey say after he got done voting for Trump?
What did the cow say to the other cow?
What is a Mexican's favorite sport?
Why didn't the sun go to college?
why did both ass-cheeks get fired from work?
What's worse than your doctor telling you that you have gonorrhea?
How many cops does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do sharks circle their prey?
Why can't americans play LoL?
What's Justin Timberlake's favourite Microsoft Word alignment?
Why are white prisoners scarier than black prisoners?
What is it called when two Vegans get into an argument?
What's the worst thing to say to a friend you see on a plane?
Why won't you find any gondolas in the Eternal City?
Did You Know Lenin Had a Motorcycle?
You know what sucks?
How well do people with mesothelioma breathe?
What's the difference between a final exam and an orgy?
What do you call four Mexicans working in a restroom?
Did you hear about the linguist who worked shifts as a waiter?
What do you call a slav tree?
Why is the Vagina like the weather?
Why did the chicken run out into traffic?
Flight Attendant: Would you like some headphones?
Why did the emo kid leave the bar?
What even is Atheism?
Why couldn't anyone trust the snowman to do anything?
What kind of shoes does a pedophile wear?
What kind of shoes do thieves wear?
How do you know if a blonde has been using your computer?
Why can't you breathe near a destroyed vehicle?
What is the favourite food of a pedophile?
Why do neurologists think they're God?
Did you hear about the new "Morning After Pill" for men?
What's the best part of living in Alabama?
How many buddhists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a deer with no eyes?
What do you call a grandma that know martial arts?
Why couldn't the physicist get his paper published?
Whats long and hard and has cum in it?
What do you call baby Shih Tzus?
Have you tried Yoda Soda?
What is a cat's favorite car?
Why did the thesaurus have a creeping feeling?
Why does the hobo only drink coffee?
Whats the hardest part about eating a vegetable?
What did Monica say to Hillary before Election Day?
How do you get a baby in and out of a small bowl?
How are girls and jokes alike?
Why couldn't Sean Connery help fight for civil rights?
Did you hear about the new documentary on George Washington Carver?
Want to hear a quality joke about knives?
What's the difference between a horny girl and a hungry girl?
What does an air conditioner have in common with a computer?
What do Hillary and Monica have in common?
How do you pick up my ex girlfriend?
What do mummies like to listen to on Halloween?
Why can't ants get sick?
Why is picture of Jesus better than Jesus himself?
Is it solipsistic in here?
What did the Hanzo main say to his salty team?
What do you call two mexicans playing basketball against eachother?
What did Darth Vader do when his iTunes stopped responding?
Do you like Chemistry Jokes?
What's Hitler's favorite drink?
How does Trumpler explain taking power despite being rejected by over a million votes?
Why is it better for a black man to be Jewish rather than Christian?
What do cannibals call shin meat?
Did you hear about the woman who got those wooden breast implants?
What runs on walls and kills Jews?
How do you tell when the Chinese move to town?
Hey man, are you not enjoying your trip to Europe? Are you have trouble with the people there?
You know what really grinds my gears?
What's the best part about having sex with a transvestite?
Why don't cannibals eat Irish men?
What's the most difficult percussion instrument to learn?
Where do mattresses and showers go when they die?
Why does Donald Trump want classical music at his inauguration?
What happened when the Samsung Note 7 was launched?
What did the Psychiatrist say to the man who walked in wearing nothing but plastic wrap?
Why didn't Wilma let Fred in when he was banging at the door?
What does an inexperienced public speaker and a pizza place with high workers have in common?
What's Donald Trump's favorite instrument?
What did Obama say in Trump's ear when he handed over the Oval Office?
What did Caesar say when he went to the whorehouse?
Why did ISIS leader bring a car-door to the desert?
Why did Donald Duck break up with Daisy Duck?
What's the difference between a Swedish jam band and slam dunking a baby?
Why don't people like gay porn actors?
How does the optimistic doctor greet his patients?
If Hilary and Trump were stuck on a desert island, who would survive?
Why does Michelle Obama wear heels?
What did the broke zombie amusement park say to the wealthy vampire golf course?
Why weren't there any famous gun slingers in the Canadian West?
What do call a gigolo from Idaho?
How many optometrists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a deep thinking pastry chef?
Why does Hillary Clinton have two Ls in her first name?
What "locker-room" comment did Donald Trump's Communist twin make?
How can you tell you have a really bad case of acne?
Why was #6 afraid of #7?
What kind of beer was Dr. Stephen Strange serving?
What's the difference between a woman and a fridge?
What do you call a group of chickens walking down the road?
What's black and sits at the top of the stairs?
How do you get Jizz off of a Scrabble board?
What's worse than being a 4 foot 1 inch man?
What do you call seagulls during mating season?
What did the cannibal do to the people he didn't like?
What's a terrorist's favorite type of game?
Every time a bell rings, an angel gets its wings. But what happens when a Foghorn blows?
How do you know when you have a good redneck girlfriend?
What do you call the pope after a drive by?
What do you call Liberals rioting and destroying shit?
Survey gone wrong.. or right??
How do you circumcise a hillbilly?
Hey, you know how geese migrate in a V shape?
What do you call it when a Physics Teacher throws a bar of chocolate at you?
How do you make fireman cry?
What do you call a farmer in the army?
What is musician's favourite furniture?
What nationality is not quite one?
What shape is produced when you knock over a 60s actress?
How long does it take for a white women to take a shit?
What do you call a joke that gets posted over and over again on reddit?
Why do birds fly to the tropics in winter?
Religion vs science?
What's a weaboos favorite state?
How many children does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call all the money billionaire Donald spent on the election?
Did you hear about the nun who fell over every day when putting her clothes on?
What was Osama Bin Laden's favorite drink?
What's the difference between John Wayne and Jack Daniels?
What meme do Uber drivers hate?
What's the difference between my job and my boss's daughter?
What do you call a president who interrupts people?
Did you hear about the two gay truckers?
Why can't clocks keep secrets?
What did Lloyd Banks say to 50 Cent after he got him a sweater for Christmas?
Why didn't the table want to be sat on?
Where does every craps player want to go when they die?
How do you know when a hippy chick is on the rag?
Why did the man go to the doctor after taking his friend to work?
What do maids in Manhattan use to clean their kitchens?
Why is the sea salty?
What do you get when you cross a canyon with a horse?
Have you ever heard the one about the brown nosed duck?
What are the Muppet's views on the paranormal?
Why was Hillary Clinton running for President?
Why can't orphans play baseball?
What's a Social Justice Warrior's favorite math course?
Who wins in a fight?
Why did the dinosaur cross the road?
Why do baby boomers like fracking so much?
Why was the leper hockey game cancelled?
What was tina turners pet name for Ike?
Why did the Mexican throw his wife over the cliff?
What's a rebel's favorite key on a keyboard?
What's the difference between a tv remote and a newborn?
Dad : Did you hear about the kidnapping at school ?
Did you hear the latest pickup line at the gay bar?
Why did Princess Diana cross the road?
Why does Trump like Pink Floyd?
How was Rome split in half?
How can you tell that the hippie kid got laid?
Have you heard the rope joke?
When is a door not a door?
What does a stripper eat for thanksgiving dinner?
What does a paint brush eat for dinner?
Why didn't the Terminator upgrade to Windows 10?
Why did the salmon cross the road?
Why did the worker on the egg farm get fired from his job?
What did the monitor say when it got punched?
What is the biggest similarity between the average Redditor and a lumberjack?
Canadians think their safe?
Why would feminists make great cops?
What's the cheapest concert you can go to?
What did the plate say to the fork?
Why do cats and dogs lick their own genitals?
Why was Donald Trump friendly to the chinese people?
Did you hear about the gay Russian knight?
What's the Spanish equivalent of the devil's lettuce ?
Know what Trump and Nemo have in common?
What will be served at Trump's inagural dinner?
Wanna hear a joke?
What do you get when a dyslexic tries to make a gif?
Why did Trump choose Pence?
What's the difference between snowman and snow woman?
Why aren't there any homosexual scholars?
How do you educate a prostitute?
What do you call an average Mexican?
Why did Obama take all the pencils and pens when he left?
What did the Miss Teen USA contestant say to Donald Trump?
How do you know your girlfriend is too young?
Have you heard about the new restaurant on the moon?
Why was Doughman the only hero to rise up and help?
How many bites out of the new iPhone did Tim Cook take?
What kind of a person wins US president election?
What do you call all of Trump's failed businesses arranged in a circle?
What's the worse thing to hear during a prostate exam?
Did you hear about the guy who went to jail for stealing hot air?
What did one wall say to the other?
How many flies does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why is the vice president always so self-obsessed?
How do you make a hormone?
How are martinis like breasts?
A girl goes to a monster mash, and starts dancing with a werewolf. What does he say?
Why did Obama leave after 8 years?
What's the phone number of Clucking Bell?
What did Hillary say when she bumped into Barack Obama at the White House?
What's Hitler's favorite Pokemon?
Why did the dentist vote for Trump?
What does Pittsburgh have in common with Peter Pan?
What do you call a dad joke in Jamaica?
How does Harry Potter like his sandwiches to be cut ?
Why do Canadians not pay attention to their local wildlife?
What is the difference between a fat comedian and a thin one?
What did the elephant say to the naked man?
Did you hear Vladimir Putin made a travel sized Russia?
Did you hear about that non-cringy Minecraft lets play?
Why do women live longer than men?
What do you call someone who promises change but ends up burning millions of undesirables?
What's the only difference between a prostitute and a bowling ball?
What did Mohammed Atta say to Larry Silverstein after the long flight?
Why Newton laws were not from Asian countries?
What's Brian David Mitchell's favorite movie?
Why is Donald Trump so excited about winning the election?
Why do pro gamers get up at 1:37pm?
What's the difference between an orphanage and a beach ball?
What borders stupidity?
What did the threatened abortion say to the doctor?
What movie does Hillary watch when she's in a bad mood?
How do you get over Trump's wall?
What do Hillary and Bill have in common?
can a women make you a millionaire?
What two things look exactly the opposite but mean exactly the same?
How do you organize a space party?
Why did the bus driver drop his coffee?
What's the difference between Barbie and Street Fighter?
Why did the sperm cross the road?
What is it called when a gamer fights someone?
How can you tell when a Canadian is successful?
Why are cows lazy and fat?
Mom: Why don't you talk to John anymore, you used to be best friends?
what do you call a funny Muslim?
What do you get when you cross a chili pepper, a shovel, and a dachshund?
Darth Vader: What is the temperature of my son's lightsaber?
Why did Obama take all the pens when he left the White House?
What do you call a female roach with a weiner?
What do Star Wars and the United Kingdom have in common?
Why was the sick eagle in prison?
How will Donald Trump create 25 millions jobs?
How did the Trump supporter find his sister in the woods?
Did you hear who just took on the biggest gentrification project in America?
How do you stop all the protests and riots?
What kind of couch do gay people buy?
What do you call a promise you can't keep?
What do you call a doctor for websites?
What is Harry potters favorite way to get down a hill?
How do you give a time-out to a Mexican child?
What's worse than finding out that your wife has cancer?
How many blood hungry vampires does it take to dress a wound?
Whats the difference between God and Donald Trump?
If Hillary and Donald Trump are on a boat together and it crashes, who survives?
You think your game lag is bad?
What is the difference between sex and the American elections?
If the US elections were a series, what would be the title of it's latest season finale?
What's the difference between a snowman on the toilet and O'Shea Jackson on the toilet?
Why do warriors make bad business men ?
what tools to math teachers use?
What did Donald Trump say to Obama at the White House?
How many back to the future jokes do you make?
What do you get when you combine an Oompa-Loompa and hair bleach?
What's Trumps favorite fish?
What is a nazi's favourite food?
Why do all anti-Trump protesters wear glasses?
Which DJ rules the country?
Is it a bird? Is it a plane?
What do you call an empty harbour?
Guys, can we please stop making jokes about Donald Trump?
Why don't skeletons go to the Veterans Day parade?
How was the election rigged?
What do you call a Hindu god playing basketball?
What's white on the outside, black on the inside and soon to be orange all over?
What's the difference between a hooker and a drug dealer?
Where all my mustang drivers at?????
What does the octopus order at the local Mexican restaurant?
What did the redneck say to his ex?
What's your opinion on birds?
The first thing that comes to mind when someone mentions Melania Trump?
Did you hear about the failed mission to Antarctica?
What's a Northern lass say after having an orgasm?
What's a cat's favorite vegetable?
You know why paedophiles don't play Skyrim?
What do you call when a joke becomes serious?
What did the headlines read after the midget fortune-teller escaped from jail?
What do you call a joke that is based on a misunderstanding?
Politics What did Trump do when he heard that he was elected President?
What does Melania Trump say to her speech writer?
What walks on two legs, but can't move forward?
What would Mario's name be if he was born in Canada?
What are a pirate's least favorite letters?
What to you call someone with no torso who can't smell?
Q: How do you cure a headache?
What joke never gets old?
Q: Why couldn't the pirate play cards?
Why does Trump support Asians?
Why does Michael Phelps make a good boyfriend?
Baby, are you today's date?
Where was the first chicken fried?
Forget Trump, want to hear a rapist joke?
So you southerners got ya a new president eh?
What are sardines?
Why can't Brock Turner go to jail?
What did the guy who was in to beasteality say as he walked in to the ASPCA?
What did the gamer wife told his gamer husband after they got divorced?
What's the difference between a Pakistani wedding party and an Al-Qaeda training camp?
What is bordering stupidity?
What's the opposite of Christopher Walken?
How are America and McDonald's similar?
what did the trash can say to the paper recycling bin?
How did Portland, Oregon protest Trump's wall?
How does a train eat?
What did the girlfriend, say to her boyfriend, when he showed up for sushi?
If a red panda is caught stealing, what do you call it?
What is the name of the event in which Hillary supporters move out of the US?
Why was Wycleff Jean on L&O this week?
What would Hitler call an educational program for young Germans?
Why did the dyslexic fisherman go on a Paleo diet?
How did the U. S. elect an Orange as president?
Did you hear about the teacher who was always cross eyed?
How do conspiracy theorists like their lovers?
Why don't Black people hijack airplanes?
What's the difference between Hillary's staff and Bill's staff?
Why do fish have such bad manners?
How do you stop your water from running?
Why did Trump have to legally change his first name to Donad?
What does Boehner say to his wife when he has a huge boner?
You know that movie 2012?
Why did President Obama get two terms?
What does the result of this election and Netflix have in common?
Where is Wall Street?
What kind of dog doesnt bark?
Why were Democrats in the lead early on?
What do you call somebody who voted for Hillary Clinton?
What's the best way to make friends?
Why are everyone so surprised with the US election?
What do you call a lineup at a Vietnamese restaurant?
Who was the first resident of Massachusetts?
What instrument did the Republican Party play after the US Election?
Why is it worse this time around?
Where do English prime-ministers take their kids on vacation?
Why will Trump never be assassinated?
What's the difference between Trudeau and Trump?
HEY REPUBLICANS!!!! I KNOW WHAT YOU ARE, BUT WHAT AM I?!?!?
Want to hear a joke about the election?
Have you tried Ethiopian food?
what did the sperm bank owner say to the tired worker overfilling the truck with samples?
Did you hear about the unluckiest man in the world?
What's an Allepo?
Why do you never see elephants hiding in trees?
Why can't Pepe vote?
Is your refridgerator running?
You know who I'm voting for?
Hey girl are you the news?
What’s the difference between a pregnant woman and a lightbulb?
Why do black people have darker skin than other people?
What did the cremated Buddha who was placed in a cardboard box say?
What's the difference between an enzyme and a hormone?
Where do gay skeletons party?
What do a tornado and a divorce in the South have in common?
Why was the programmer unhappy at his job?
What's the difference between Terri Schiavo and donald trump?
What do women and the stock market have in common?
What do you call it when the girl you like likes you back?
Why did seven kill six?
What did the cannibal say when he was full?
What's blue and not very heavy?
What's the difference between a whore and a truck?
Can't you just feel the excitement in the air?!!?
Women who are short are called "petite." What are short men called?
Why did the old man get kicked off the nudist colony's golf course?
What's the difference between a procrastinator and a prognosticator?
What's a feminist's favorite school subject?
Why do women talk so much?
Who is going to win tonight's presidential election?
If Trump was in the music industry; what profession would he be?
How do most vegans die?
Why is Stephen Hawking successful?
Did you hear about the Polish Admiral who wanted to be buried at sea when he died?
What is a southern aristocratic families favourite dance move?
What's the best machine at the gym?
Why did 10 go missing?
What's the use of happiness?
Why was the mole afraid of his own shadow?
What's Mario's favorite song?
Everyone ready for the election?
How do Rabbis make money?
How did Donald Trump lose $916 million?
What do nutrition labels and tumblr have in common?
You think you can escape Stalin's prison camps?
What did the Astronomy major say to his girlfriend?
Why don't they have any casinos in South Africa?
Where do Cannibals like to hang out?
How do neurons communicate?
What should you do when freedom calls?
How many Mexicans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Do you know why Stevie Wonder can't see his friends?
What shouldn't you make for dinner after your husband comes home from the Trump rally?
What do Romeo and Juliet have in common with melons?
Hey girl, are you a compressed file?
How many bronze players do you need to change a lightbulb?
What's the hardest part of eating a vegetable?
What's Donald Trumps favorite color?
What is Donald Trump's favorite nation?
Why do you think that God hates fags rather than figs?
What divides the humans from the monkeys?
Why was the blond staring at a carton of orange juice?
What is a cat's favorite breakfast?
Why don't Mexicans play cards?
What did one saggy boob say to the other?
What is the difference between a BMW and a cow?
Did you hear the one about the gaping butthole?
Why does KFC only sell christian chicken?
What's Lil Wayne's Favorite Movie?
What is the difference between Michael Jackson and a paper bag?
What do you call a funny Pikachu?
What were 2pac's last words?
Why shouldn't the chicken cross the road?
Why did the chicken walk into the bar?
What would you get if you crossed a vampire with a dwarf?
What is Trump's favourite movie?
How do Buddhist monks send emails?
What do you call a self-absorbed trumpet player?
What did one cell say to his sister cell that stepped on his toe?
Why did the Amish woman divorce her husband?
What do you call a smart chromosome?
What do you call a pony with a sore throat?
How do you find Will Smith in the snow?
Why was six afraid of seven?
In the case of emergencies, why are women and children evacuated first?
What do you call it when worms take over the world?
What's the only thing pedophiles are good at?
How do you know when a bass player and drummer are at your front door?
Why can't a blonde dial 911?
Why did Jesus drink wine at the last supper?
Wanna know the difference between a man and a matgarita?
What do you call really good crying?
How do we know Paul Walker had dandruff?
What kind of car does a cat drive?
Why was the chicken Russian?
Why did the man marry a monkey?
Hear about the lazy baker who wanted a pay increase?
What's the difference between how black men treat their beer and their children?
How do you spot the blind man at a nudist beach?
With winter coming up...What's the difference between a snowman and a snowlady?
Why are friendzone'd guys always sick?
Why did the blind girl fall in the well?
What lies on the bottom of the ocean and sweats?
Why do you never see any gay Egyptian Sailors?
What's a dogs favourite day?
How does a ninja say hi?
What do you call a bunch of devilishly handsome gay guys?
Why won't anti vaxers ever win an election?
How does a feminist ask for Halloween candies?
What's the hardest part about making a manicure joke?
Why didn't the approaching black hole concern the astronaut?
What did the constipated mathematician do?
Why did the mathematician call his dog Cauchy?
What is Harry Potters favorite way to get down a hill?
Whats Harry Potters favourite way of getting down a hill?
What's the difference between this joke and your mum?
Did you hear about the peanut in the street?
What do you call 6.63*10^-34 mutinied pirates?
Which 3 words will make a mexican tremble in fear ?
What do you call a sleepwalking nun?
What's a weeb's favorite state?
What does an iPhone 7 and The Titanic have in common?
Ignoring time, what does a weekend have in common with a year?
Why can't we have a female President?
Why don't violists get stressed?
What's the difference between testicles and a penis?
What's Harry Potter's favourite way of getting down a hill?
Why do people never see an Apple store getting robbed?
What's the difference between a bench and a black guy?
How many tickles does an octopus like?
how does a bakery know when to make more bread?
What's the instinctual response to a bad gym selfie?
What Is a Chinese persons favorite holiday?
What did the band director say to the misbehaving kid?
What do you call a black woman that gets an abortion?
How do men in New Zealand address their women?
What type of battery does The Fonz use?
What do you call a hillbilly giraffe that lives in a trailer and drinks beer all day?
Whats the difference between a truck full of bowling balls and a truck full of dead babies?
What's the difference between origami and a grandpa passing wind?
Ever heard the joke about the airplane?
What does a self-conscious vampire say?
How did Burger King get Dairy Queen pregnant?
What's an Atheist's favorite joke book?
Why is proctology called proctology?
What kind of tree is a must?
What did pirate say when he turned 80?
How long does it typically take for a woman to orgasm?
What happens when a cow jumps over barbed wire?
What do you call a nun in a wheelchair?
What do you call two pears?
What’s the best part about sex with 28-year-olds?
Want to hear the funniest joke in the world?
How many cops does it take to push a black man down the stairs?
What did the poor composer say to his friend?
What do you call a black man on the moon?
How Do Jewish Baleen Wales Eat?
What do you call a Finn, who gets something done?
What did one monochromator say to another?
Why is Friday the best day of the week?
Did to hear about the guy who pretended to wash his hair with excrement?
What is a statistician's favorite social media site?
Q: What's the only animal with an asshole in the middle of its back?
What does a mosquito and a woman have in common?
Did you hear about the mathematician who got his calculator stuck up his bum?
What's big, yellow, and can't swim?
What do you call a joke with no punchline?
What do Hillary Clinton supporters and Eminem have in common?
What’s the difference between a Catholic priest and a zit?
What the difference between a nun in a bathtub & a nurse in the bathtub?
Why is Helen Keller's leg yellow?
What do you call a lesbian Eskimo?
What is the chupacabra's breakfast of choice?
Why was the tomato blushing?
What do you call the baby if the parents were Hillary and Trump?
How can you tell a woman is having a bad day?
Cash or credit?
What did the square of cloth identify as on tumblr?
Whats the difference between a Jew and Harry Potter?
What's red and bad for your teeth?
What do you call a kinky australian romance novel?
Why are Asian women in the US so excited about next Tuesday?
Why did Donald Trump cross the road?
Hey girl are you the great American West?
What does a depressed girl do when she needs to get a lot of work done?
What is the difference between me and being artistic?
Did you know that milk is the fastest liquid on earth?
How does Hillary's email server feel?
Why did the Mexican jump the border?
How many babies does it take to paint a house?
What's the difference between Adolf Hitler and Kurt Cobain?
What's it called when two retarded lesbians have sex?
What do you call a basement full of SJW's?
Why haven't I ever met a full blooded Jew?
What does the Saudi executioner say every time he takes a head?
What do you call a person who you had a one night stand with on Mars?
Which Star Wars character was arrested for drunk driving?
How many Trump supporters does t take to change a light bulb?
Why don't mathematicians have degrees?
What's the worst part about being a black Jew?
What gets beaten ten times a day?
Why do we feel the need to order beers in round?
If you throw a red stone into the blue sea what will it become?
Why don't black people go on cruise ships?
Does anyone see this?
Why do doctors hate Wolves?
Why are you walking like that?
What's the best part about sex with a pregnant woman?
What do you call a blind german?
Did you hear the creator of spaghetti died?
What's a social media for married people?
Hey girl are you a school?
What do you call an oil stain that lasted for 1000 years?
What did the house turn into on the night of the full moon?
How do people with a PHD get a free day off of work?
Why does Donald Trump take Xanax?
What's Hitlers favorite number?
What is the worst thing about being an egg?
What do Australians say when they go to bed?
How many Anti-Vaxxers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How do you write poop in Australia?
Why were the early days of history called the Dark Ages?
Why is Apple donating money to cancer research?
It's my cake day. You wanna hear a funny joke?
What's the difference between in-laws and outlaws?
What do you call a brilliant musician who also happens to have Down Syndrome?
How does a road reply when you ask it how work is going?
What do you call an ape that's both extremely frugal and fearful?
What do Luke Bryant and a Nordic breast plate have on common?
What is the difference between St. Patrick and Christopher Columbus?
What's the difference between the Cleveland Indians and Shae from Game of Thrones?
What do you call an astronaut with only one hand?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a jellyfish?
What did the road say to the chicken?
What's the difference between a woman and a gun?
Why doesn't a chicken wear pants?
What did the jewish man say to the doctor after having his son circumsised?
What branch of the military are horses in?
How to you piss off a writer?
What did the salad say during sex?
Why is peanut butter lighter than peanut?
Did you miss me?
What did they call Jesus after He died on the cross?
Whats the age of consent in Thailand?
Why don’t Calculus majors throw house parties?
Why are Reddit jokes so overused?
What words does Donald Trump find irresistibly sexy?
What do you call a Vicar on a motorbike?
What city has the biggest amount of mistakes per capita?
How do you call a criminal who never gets arrested?
Did ya hear about the cannibal lion with a huge ego?
What did Kermit the Frog say at Jim Henson's funeral?
What do you say to your sister when she's crying?
What do you call a phone with no parents?
Know who have the longest running championship drought in baseball?
Wahoo blew a 3-1 lead?
What Happens when the Cubs win the World Series?
Did you hear the man who got his left arm and left leg cutoff?
What sound does a bouncing plane make?
With your current salary what Apple product can you buy?
What does Hillary Clinton's inbox look like?
Why can't a bike stand on its own?
How do you call a prison inmate?
Why do SJW's hate Programmers?
What did the mittens say on their wedding day?
If went camping with a friend and woke up with a condom stuck in your ass would you tell anyone?
What is a Catholic's favorite weapon?
I wonder where all the old Bernie Sanders merch is going?
How many dead babies does it take to fill a basement?
Why Couldn't the Ancient Egyptians Build a Plane?
Why did the socialist drop out of high school math?
Bad weather?
What do you say when your ex has broken up with you?
What do army ants have in common with masturbating dolphins?
What's winning attitude?
How does one French arsonist flirt with another one?
Why do Welshmen like to embarrass their wives?
Why do they call them the minute men?
What does a know-it-all always have in their kitchen?
What is the difference between an animal doctor and a retired Nazi?
What gets easier to pick up the heavier it gets?
What's a dull joke?
Man: Your place or mine?
What do you do when you see a floating T.V. in the middle of the night?
If you were a dinosaur what would you be?
Did you hear about the mod that got pissed off?
Whats the first word a swede says after its born?
Who's great at math, but always tells lies?
What did the shoemaker say about actor Christopher's custom-made footwear?
What's the difference between feminists and hockey players?
How do you get a nun pregnant?
What's the funniest fish in the world?
Why did the girl cry on the swing?
What do you call a police officer that doesn't get out of bed?
What do you call a chicken looking at lettuce?
Why was the broom late?
If the quiz made you a little quizzical, what is the test going to make you?
What’s the difference between Greggs and your girlfriend?
What is the difference between racism and asians?
Why do so many Jews enjoy smoking?
Did you hear about the Jew and the Scotsman who spent the night together?
What's the difference between my broken watch and a lesbian?
How are black people and a CPU similar?
What's the difference between Amy Winehouse and Captain Morgan?
Why does Donald Trump love 6:43PM?
What do you say when somebody else has ruined your joke?
What's the difference between erotic and kinky ?
What's the cheapest meat available?
Are you a hydroelectric source of power?
How many people does it take to change a lightbulb in a monastery?
How do you know when an introvert is interested in you?
What are a terrestrial planet's favorite genres of music?
What do you get when you cross a computer with a lifeguard?
What does wearing Crocs and getting your dick sucked by a dude I have in common?
What is the one thing you don't want to hear during sex?
What did Mars say to Saturn?
What is a werewolf's favorite salad leaf?
Did you notice Redditors saying "Ayy lmao" all the Time?
What does Jesus say when someone cuts his call?
What's Donald Trump's least favorite Star Wars movie?
How does Negan hit a home run?
What happened to the adhesive suicide bomber?
How fast can the lesbian get here?
Which Marvel superhero is transgender?
What does Bill Clinton's presidency and Hillary Clinton's future presidency have in common?
Where do Muslim people go when they die?
Why are the ladies thirsty so thirsty for my love?
How do we know that the toothbrush was invented in Mississippi?
What's a Mad Cow's favorite rap song?
If your Uncle was an animal, what one would he be?
What do cows do on Sundays?
Clean: How do you catch a polar bear?
How are a grenade and a girlfriend similar?
How do you check the intonation of a guitar underwater?
What do you call a frozen raindrop in Nazi Germany?
Why is the ocean salty?
Why are there no cats on Mars?
Have you guys heard of the joke about the electric chair?
Last rites?
Interviewer: What's your strength?
Why did the ghost go into rehab?
What do you call two stoners sharing a joint over dessert?
What do you say after stubbing your toe?
Q: How would you describe a transistor to a caveman?
Son: Mom, how was I born?
How many nymphomaniacs does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
What do you call a kid with two gay black dads?
What's a hutu's least favorite candy?
What do you call a 2D fairy?
What do you call a girl who friend zones you?
What do you call a piece of fruit that can fly?
What does Pong and WW1 have in common?
What's the difference between a baby and an unwanted baby?
Who are the fastest readers in the world?
Why was the note denied alcohol?
What was the first joke ever written?
What kind of street to ghosts, goblins and ghouls live on?
Why does nobody in Japan use Siri?
Why did the ghost stink?
What did the ghost give his girlfriend on Halloween?
Did you hear about the kidnapping at school?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a bag of cheetos?
What did the masterbating Australian mortician do?
Why is 2 dimensional soda not popular?
What's Stephen Hawking's favorite pet?
Why did the German girl count to three, then cry?
[Dark] What is a Muslims favourite phone?
Where does the king keep his armies?
Do you know about the kids who went as hipsters for halloween?
Husband : Why are there broken condoms on our couch???
What is Anthony Weiner's favorite type of mail?
How many introverts does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did the surfer say when he visited Syria?
Why did the blind lady fall into the well?
Why did the Baker have brown hands?
what do you call a student's life who is bad at math and has a stutter?
What's the difference between a chickpea and a potato?
Why don't black people ever go on cruises?
How many guns do the US need to combat an enemy?
Did you hear about the lawyer who tried to sue a shark for biting all his limbs off?
What sex position creates the ugliest children?
What type of government would a nation ran by Alvin and the Chipmunks be called?
Do I have a joke about periodic table of elements?
Why is a panda a lot like Charles Barkley at basketball practice?
What's a neckbeard's favourite disease?
What do a penis and a Rubik’s Cubes have in common?
What did the time traveler say at the birthday party?
Hillary and Trump are in a plane crash. Who survives?
What would Donald Trump say if he was Mexican?
Why was the guitar teacher arrested?
What is the similarity between a black man and a bike?
What do you get when mix the last of the solute with the last of the solvent?
What do you call an erection during a funeral?
What do feminists do in Halloween?
What do you call four Mexicans in quick sand?
What do you call a Mexican wrestler that only fights during his 12:00 break?
What did the detective particle say to the suspect particle?
How do you know if an introvert likes you?
What do you call a falling llama?
What's the different between a knife and a feminist?
What do you call it when two people make a baby in fog?
What do fat girls and bricks have in common?
Why were Huma Abedin's darkest fears about seduction by Bill Clinton unfounded?
What did the Buddhist Monk say to the Hot Dog Vendor?
What do you call a guy who wants to join the mile high club by himself?
Is it someone's actual job to collect cow poop for fertilization?
Why do people even listen to female comedians?
How can you tell if someone is a chemistry major?
How do you call a dog that likes to be on the Internet?
How do you buy a Jewish Person?
What did one Snowman say to the other Snowman?
Which element is most likely to surrender an electron?
Why do French tanks have rearview mirrors?
What does a South Korean call their lover?
What's the difference between Frenchmen and some toast?
What did the pirate say when he turned 80?
How do you stop the government from making a pipeline across your land?
What did the gold say when it saw the puppy?
What is the difference between a snowman and a snowwoman?
What sort of people are good at Auto Fellatio?
What did the jalapeno dress up as for Halloween?
Why was the Bhut Jolokia picked to be the captain of the cheer squad?
What did the pumpkin say after waking up his family?
What's big, green, fuzzy, and will kill you if it falls on you?
Why did the vegan avoid the confrontation?
What's is the outcome of a soccer game between Ethiopia and Jamaica?
What do you call a country that Hillary Clinton has been in charge of?
Where does the Persian air force keep its aircraft?
How many babysitters does it take to change a light bulb?
What did Hillary Clinton say when she got to the restaurant?
What did Mozart yell when he became a crusader?
Why do so many Trumpies end up playing Minecraft?
What do Maroon 5 and Jack Reacher have in common?
What does a Trumpie call a woman with a PhD and a Nobel Prize?
What do Japanese people do when they have erections?
How are Trumpies like Walmart?
How Long is a Chinese man?
What do you call a hot guy , who instantly becomes super hot?
Whats the difference between american women and middle eastern women?
Why'd the Mexican guy have to take xanax?
Why do people hate cliffhangers?
What do you get when you foot falls asleep?
What do you need to drink out of a fruit?
Girl are you Cytosine?
What's the best part of publicly masturbating at the old folks home?
What do you call a gynecologist who really loves his job?
What is John Lennon's favourite donut?
Why did George cross the road?
What do you call an injured martial artist?
How did Rihanna find out Chris Brown was cheating on her?
Why was the chef afraid of cooking steaks on a plane?
Why do Italian men grow moustaches?
Who should have played Bilbo?
What did the perverted ghost say?
What would you call Mike Mauser if he was a cat?
What's the worst thing about being a black Jew?
Did you hear about the assassin who was given forty years to complete his assignment?
Why do computer programmers confuse Halloween with Christmas?
How does a Trumpie become a smooth talker?
Why was the Trump voter arrested for shoplifting?
When's the best time to procrastinate?
How many bones are there in a graveyard?
What do you call a pizza chef on an airplane?
Why did the cannibal go to KFC?
Why does Helen Keller masturbate with one hand?
What is an engineer's favorite Halloween candy?
What would a cross-dressing psychologist wear?
My father was a seal, my mother was a yak. What does that make me?
How much did the cannibal pay for his new sports car?
How many kidnapped children does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many ants can you fit inside an apartment ?
What does a mediating blond girl sound like?
Why do babies make bad mechanics?
What do you call four Mexicans drowning?
What does "IDK" mean?
What does a college kid do when confronted by an evil spirit?
What is Apple users favorite movie?
What does Lenin say when he his angry?
Did you hear about the kid who got his legs blown off?
Did you know Hitler was blinded in WW1?
What's Trump's favorite place to shop?
A Greek, a Spaniard and a Portuguese all walk into a bar. Who pays?
What's a baby seals favourite drink?
What do builders and Reddit both hate?
Why is the Kentucky Derby run in a circle?
You know why Santa Claus doesn't have any children?
What do you call a hippie's wife?
Why did the plastic surgeon create a surgery to move your ears forward?
How do you titillate an ocelot?
What do you call a disorganized florist?
What's the difference between a republican and a democrat?
What does a time traveler do when he's hungry?
What do you call a group of rabbits walking backwards?
What would you call a rock digger's mistake?
So everyone knows why 6 is afraid of 7. But by was 5 Afraid if 7?
Who's the top selling author in Russia?
Is this the Reddit where I submit my jokes?
What's a gynecologist's favorite bird?
Why did the blind woman fall into the well?
Which way did the programmer go?
What do you call a fake noodle?
Why didn't Spock do a mind meld with Frodo?
What do you call your Mexican friend living in Oklahoma?
Why do humans mainly use the decimal number system?
Did you hear about the french man who got raped by a group of mimes?
Did you hear about the emo who appealed for admission into Harvard?
How can you tell an ant's gender?
Did you hear about the kid who used to google things about the past?
What is the most essential part of any joke?
Did you hear about the racist Mexican?
What does Dave Grohl say when he thinks there's a stalker in his house?
What do you call a guy with no head?
How do you spell badly?
Ever tried Ethiopian food?
If Abraham Lincoln were alive today, what would he be famous for?
Where did the coffee bean find his soul mate?
Why didn't the melons get married?
Where did the Irish poo come in the race?
Is your ass okay?
How does Moses makes his coffee?
Why did 10 die?
What's common between Canadians and Belgians?
What kind of jokes does a zombie make?
Why the tourists feel so happy driving by Taj Mahal?
Why do cool guys never look at explosions?
What did Shakespeare spread on his toast?
Why couldn't Ron Weasley make a Horcrux?
Why did the people's phones stop working on the plane's that crashed into the twin towers?
Wanna find out how I made my dick 12 inches?
Did you hear about the mummy that reached the top 10 with his new album?
What's the smartest cookie?
What do you get when 42 goes into 45?
what do you call a hooker with a runny nose?
What do you get when you have the ghost of a French Viking?
What's the real reason why SJWs hate guns?
What do you call a group of spoiled children?
What do you call a misplaced table?
What do you call a bad riddle?
Why did my local sandwich shop lose all of its workers??
What does a mushroom on a Harley sound like?
Why do chemists go to the gym so much?
What do you call an Israeli that's into Japanese culture?
You know what Nixon did wrong?
Where do shemales live?
I've got a golden shower head I'm trying to get rid of. Any takers?
What do you call a man with no religion?
How many ameobas does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What happens when you run away from tomatos?
What does a pirate have in common with the alphabet?
Why do Mimes have no benefits?
What are seals made out of?
What do Japanese Kids, Chinese Democracy and German Humor have in common?
Where do fishes keep their money?
Why are Aspirins and Paracetamol white?
What's The Difference Between Donald Trump and a Bucket of Shit?
What do you call a cat on fire?
Why do intersecting lines hate each other?
How do Japanese chihuahuas say hello?
Why doesn't Ed have a girlfriend?
What do you call it when you shoot 49 hot loads in people at a gay bar?
What do you call the study of Japanese sound?
What country are the majority of dress pants made?
How do people with injured hands commute to work?
How did alien defeat predator?
How do computers measure pain?
Why does a chicken coop only have two doors?
What's the difference between a magic show and a brothel?
What's the difference between a peeping tom and a pickpocket?
Why can’t Kim Kardashian find her asshole?
So a Korean man, a Syrian man, and a Mexican man are all in a truck. Who's driving?
What’s baked every day and sells itself?
What kind of yogurt does a skeleton eat?
What's the difference between a Canadian and an American?
What is faster hot or cold?
What the difference between Trump and a pickpocket?
What is the difference between a baby and a feminist?
Did you hear about the houses that fell in love?
How many redditors does it take to write a punchline for a Holocaust joke?
What's brown and sounds like a bell?
What did the leper give to the whore?
Why are libraries so strict?
Why is it okay for an ice company to commit fraud?
What is a snowman's favorite kind of carpet?
What's the difference between Isaac Newton and the dead baby in my microwave?
Wife: Where the hell have you been? It's 3 o'clock in the morning?
Why can't the ghost get his girlfriend pregnant?
How many donuts could fit on the erect male penis?
What does a vegetarian zombie eat?
I challenge you to a battle of wits at high noon! Do you accept?
Whats's Glenn's favourite restaurant?
Have you heard the one about the three holes in the ground?
What does a networking robot say when returning from the bathroom?
Dracula & Frankenstein are in the heavyweight championship. Who wins?
What did the doctor say to the parents of an ugly baby?
What do Donald Trump and Bill Cosby have in common?
What do feet and fairytales have in common?
Why did Donald Trump watch the olympics?
What did the child rapist have for breakfast?
Why do they call it PMS?
What did the hurricane say to the coconut tree?
Why wasn't Hillary Clinton prosecuted?
What's the difference between a white guy and a pizza?
How do you starve a black man?
How do chinese people laugh over the internet?
What do you call a cross between an elephant and a rhinoceros?
What do you call a hot pepper with nothing inside it?
Why is it so hard to break up with a Japanese Woman?
Why did the bodybuilder stop in the middle of the road?
Which Donald Trump quote is both racist and misogynistic at the same time?
Why nuns don't wear bras?
How do you keep a redditor in suspense?
How many SJW's does it take to change a 90w lightbulb?
What are the odds I could find the sum of numbers from 1-100?
What does Hillary and a rape victim have in common?
Why is 6 afraid of 7?
What do we want? Time travel! When do we want it?
What did the old fly say to the young fly?
What did Glenn say to Maggie at the baseball game?
What does someone from Alabama say after a one night stand?
What did the Israelite say to the american when offering him a drink?
Why did the man driving the broken car end up in his mothers basement?
What's the difference between pink and purple?
What does a blonde and a shotgun have in common?
Can a kangaroo jump higher than a house?
How do you feel when your phone suddenly starts blaring your least favorite tune?
Where was the toothbrush invented?
What do you get when you drop a piano on a toddler?
What's the difference between a stoner and a Muslim?
How do mathematicians count x-men?
How many divorced men does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does Pontiac stand for?
Did you know Rick Grimes is an environmental activist?
When is a pentagon not a pentagon?
Why was Kim Kardashian arrested at the airport?
What do you call a pregnant stewardess?
Guess how I spell distraction?
How do you stop a hippie from drowning?
what does one rock use to propose to another rock?
What did the ghost say to the bumblebee?
How do you make a Holocaust joke funny?
What is Harry Potters favourite way to get down a hill?
How do bovines do math?
What do you call a 6 year old with no friends?
What letter never satisfies it's wife?
What is the opposite of irony?
Why did I carve a heart with me and my boyfriends initials into a tree?
How are baby androids born?
Did you hear about the infant drag races?
Did you hear about the fire at the circus?
What do you call a monk that likes vaporwave?
Why does Dr Pepper come in bottles?
How can you tell a clock is hungry?
Why don't winemakers support feminism?
What's the difference between an Ethiopian elevator sign and an British elevator sign?
What's he difference between a hormone and an enzyme?
How does a Ethiopian show that they are rich?
What's a lawyer's favourite pastry?
what do you call kayne west at a mexican barbecue?
How does Moses make his coffee?
What's the road construction worker's equivalent of a plumbers crack?
Did you know that diarrhea is hereditary?
What basic skill do herb farmers always struggle with?
Why is Donald Trump opposed to bags of shredded cheese?
Will I have an open casket at my funeral?
Why Did Superman Save a Burning Chemistry Lab?
How does Chuck Norris go fishing?
How do you estimate your kids lifespan?
What's the worst part about breaking up with a Japanese girl?
Where do weeaboos holiday?
What kind of yoga do you do in a casket?
What do you call an Aboriginal in a lamp?
Why is it so difficult to call Chinese people?
Why can't you fool an aborted baby?
What's the best thing about being a meth head?
Why doesn't Melania Trump want her husband to become President?
What's the difference between a well dressed bicyclist and a poorly dressed unicyclist?
In hell, Why is Hitler buried up to his eyeballs in shit, but Stalin is only buried to his nose?
Why did Greenpeace throw Wolf Blitzer in the ocean?
What is a firewalker's favorite snack?
Why are locksmiths in Japan cooler than the rest of the world's locksmiths?
What do you call a Cow on the moon?
Why doesn't the KKK like Halloween?
What's the difference between a spitter and a swallower?
What do Grammar Nazis support?
Why do elephants wear green shoes?
What do you call half a kitten?
What spell does harry Potter use on halloween?
What do Donald Trump and the milk in my fridge have in common?
Why are Skeleton's so calm?
Why did the snowman get fired from his job?
What did the wicked chicken lay?
What family history website do rednecks use?
What do you call weed grown in a ceramic container?
What did the police man say when he arrested the remote control that beat up his wife?
Why is there no such thing as a great golfer?
What does a Jewish pedophile says?
What happened when Cinderella got to the ball ?
Why did the medieval Indian go to the doctor?
Why can't fashion designers play uno?
Why did the relationship between two parallel lines never worked out?
Why is the Prime Minister not seen in the morning?
What does your breath smell like after a funeral?
What do you get a mathematician for his stag night?
Did you hear the one about the pizza?
What do you call a feminist from LA?
How does a mathematician get rid of constipation?
Why do chemists enjoy working with ammonia?
What happens when Donald gets a boner?
Why can’t you trust an atom?
Did you hear about the shipment of Viagra that was stolen?
One day I got this huge erection. I started running and hit a wall. You know what broke?
What do you call it when Bill Clinton gets an erection?
Why is there cotton in pill bottles?
What's the difference between Rush Limbaugh and the Hindenburg?
What do you call a midget psychic running from the cops?
What do you call a gorilla that's a member of a terrorist organization?
How does a Japanese person distinguish between a German and an extraterrestrial?
Why are blacksmiths seen as very nosy?
Why was the cancer doctor so tired?
Did you know the government puts ground beef in the chem trails?
When an Amish buggy breaks down on the side of the road, who do they call?
What's the main thing a woman needs to think about when considering a potential boyfriend?
What did the stamp say to the envelope?
What's every driver's favorite super hero?
What is a vampires favourite food?
What did the homeless man get for christmas?
You know what really hurts me inside?
Why do american bears have forelimbs?
Why did the Scarecrow get a raise?
What do you call a scholarly cop?
Isn't it so wierd when you're thinking about someone and then they suddenly appear?
Who is the best underwater Transformer?
Why couldn't the skeleton go to the prom?
What do Elton John and the Berlin wall have in common?
What is the difference between Jam and Jelly?
What do humans and sharks have in common?
Why was the daybreak sad?
What's green and red and goes 100 mph?
Did you hear Snow White got thrown out of Disney Land?
What should you do if you come across a tiger in the jungle?
What is the difference between an onion and a hooker?
How did the cow feel when it couldn't produce milk?
Where do detectives go to have a drink?
Did you hear about the man who lost his left arm and his left leg?
Why was C afraid ?
What's the name of that German Video game with the polite gorilla?
What kind of gum do bees chew?
What's the difference between a pothead and a gay Muslim?
How many Hillary Clinton supporters does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
What's the leading cause of death among wizards?
Why did the scarecrow get an award?
Did you hear about the bulimic bachelor party?
How do you blind a Chinese man?
Why can it be so annoying to drive a Skoda?
Why does my wife like to fuck when she's on the rag?
What weapon does a thin pirate use?
Why do girls go to the bathroom in groups?
What do you call the mafia of aggressive pepper salesmen?
Did you hear about those campers who were rattled by some storms?
Why are men smarter than women?
Why don’t Trump supporters call 911 in an emergency?
Why did the Fonz give up on Love?
What does Trump's hair and a thong have in common?
What do a tuna, a piano, and a sheet of adhesive paper have in common?
Have you seen that new documentary about constipation?
What goes clop clop clop - BANG! BANG! BANG! - clop clop clop?
Did you know diarrhea is hereditary?
Did you hear about the Italian chef who died?
What did the Computer Processor say when it was overclocked?
What's Jesus' favorite car?
What do I know about dwarves?
How does the alchemist please his wife?
Boy or Girl?
What do you say to an Italian who is urinating on the sidewalk?
What do you call it when a chicken sees a salad?
How can you tell when a blonde is having a bad day?
What does it feel like getting fucked up the ass at one million thrusts per second?
If there is earth on planet Earth, why aren't there Jews on Jupiter?
Why did Sally fall off the swing?
Why was Hillary Clinton so happy on the Battlefield1 release day?
What do inbreds do on Halloween?
What did the unimpressed wind turbine say?
Why don't black people dream?
Have you guys tried Wookie meat?
Which horse runs the city?
What do you call an Irish R n B singer who's always happy to do something for you?
What do Japanese guys do when they have erections?
What kind of plants grow in bathrooms?
Why couldn't the Buddha hoover under the sofa?
What's it called when the queen farts?
What' is a pirate's least favourite letter?
Hey, remember that time Trump was almost president?
Why didn't the homophobe decorate his house for Halloween?
Who's the most flexible man in the Bible?
You guys wanna hear a black joke?
What does a person with no arms and a guy dating a vegetarian have in common?
Do you know what happened to my tooth in the dentist's office?
Why do vegans don't like to kiss??
What does a pimp and a redneck have on common?
How do crabs leave the hospital?
What do you call Trump supporters?
How do the Muslims like their eggs cooked?
What did the erotic novel author get from his editor?
How do tacos fair in a war?
What do you call a really fast lamb?
Rabinowitz: Whatcha reading?
How do you call a dog with no legs?
Why were mexicans celebrating at a stop sign?
Who was the greatest female author in German history?
Why are smaller breasts better for breastfeeding?
Why did the flower fall over?
How did the pepper end up getting killed?
What's the worst part about being a prostitute?
What do you do when you see a spaceman?
What's the difference between a mosquito and a nympho?
What do you call it when you have sex at the beach?
What do you call it when you play tug-of-war with a pig?
What's the difference between a cat and a comma?
What is the difference between a normal and an irradiated cat?
What type of equipment do you operate for abortions?
What's the temperature inside a TaunTaun?
What flavor gum does a scientist prefer?
Have you ever had sex while camping?
Why isn't Hitler allowed on the grill?
What color were Kurt Cobaine's eyes?
Why did the Yogis declare that Donald Trump had become an Ascended Master?
What would you call Hispanics if everyone in the world were completely equal?
What makes no sense?
How are Lindsay Lohan and the Note 7 alike?
What did the black kid get for Christmas?
How does Stephen Hawking refresh after a long day?
What’s the difference between a G-spot and a golf ball?
Why can't you ever build a great relationship with an archer?
What do you call a sleep walking nun?
What do you call a bouncer at a gay bar?
How did German men pick up Jewish women in the 1940s?
Why did the chicken get a Ouija Board?
What do you call a radio host with a broken leg?
What happened to the minter who went crazy?
Did you see the news story about the psychic midget that escaped from jail?
Why did Russia lose the race?
If rabbits could farm what would they grow?
What's the difference between a feminist and a gun?
How do you make a dog drink?
what's black, white, orange and terrifying?
What does Bo Jackson smell with?
What's the difference between garbage and a girl from New Jersey?
What makes an ISIS joke funny?
What happens to people who don't pay their income taxes?
What does a lawyer wear to work?
What is the best thing about having sex with twenty nine years olds?
What do you call a physicist who makes lets play videos?
How much water does a frog need to breed?
who said that girls don't have a good sense of direction?
What's red, 6 inches long and makes my gf cry when i feed it to her?
What did one hash brownie say to the other?
Has anyone ever been to Egypt?
Do you know about the Chinese author who wrote a million page book?
Why did the moron throw the clock out the window?
I have thirty foxes and twenty eight chickens. How many didn't?
How do you call a Mexican who lost his car?
What is cooler than steam punk?
What is the definition of a polar bear?
What's a good place for legal hooker auctions?
What do you call a group of birds that stick together?
what martial arts did Jesus practice?
What does a reposted joke and your mama's tits have in common?
Were you on Baywatch?
Want to hear a construction joke?
What room is it?
What is faster than a black person with your TV ?
What's the difference between snowmen and snow women?
What did the Moth say to the other Moth?
Did you hear about the Italian chef that died?
What do you call a reptile biting its own tail?
Why doesn't the ant ever get sick?
Whats a Feminist's favorite math subject?
Whenever I'm in trouble, I think: what would Jesus do?
You know what ruins a rape?
Did you hear about the the horse that got shot?
Why can't Donald Trump be a Lannister?
Why do elephants paint their toe nails red?
How does Winnie the Pooh open his honey pot?
Whats the difference between 8 and negative four?
Why is Monica Lewinsky voting Trump?
What's the difference between refrigerator and a child?
Why were the Soviets able to beat the Western Allies to Berlin?
Knock Knock, Who's There?
What is Beethoven's favorite fruit?
What is a drummer's favorite variable when making a Least Squares Regression Line (LSRL)?
What are the two problems Donald Trump is currently being treated for ?
What does heroin make you feel like?
What has nine arms and sucks?
What did the man say to his bossy penis?
Who lives in orange synagogue?
Where do Zombies have their meatings?
When does a guy turn into a gay?
What are the 3 stages of sex after marriage?
What's a slutty witch's favorite holiday?
What do you call an Ox with a gluten allergy?
What is the biggest advantage of living in Switzerland?
Where do you hide after killing a black person?
Did you hear about the gay midget?
What do you call a dog that can drive a stick?
What did the large furry mammal say when the salamander who kept asking for favors went too far?
What's the difference between a hippo and a zippo?
How do you disappoint a redditor?
What do you call a repair shop that specializes in hearses?
Whats the best thing to do at halloween?
What do I put in mecoffee?
What do the Mafia and pussies have in common?
Why was Pavlov's hair so soft?
What would Paul McCartney say after losing both his legs?
How can you tell if a clock is hungry?
What happened at the funeral of the man who invented the USB?
Who in the organisation likes cats the most?
What would a woodchuck do if a woodchuck could chuck wood?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl band in the concert?
Why can't astronauts eat popsicles?
Why didn't Ken ever get Barbie pregnant?
What did the dolphin say to the overly amorous orca?
What does Bill say to Hillary after sex?
What is Bill and Ted's favorite book of the bible?
What is up with these reposts?
How does a backwards poet write?
What do you call a homosexual autistic?
Which cop writes poems about ravens?
How does Donald Trump plan on deporting 13 million illegal aliens?
What's the difference between the Pro Bowl and a typical church?
Why did the condom fly across the room?
What is Hillary's newest election slogan?
What has four wheels and flies?
Why is Anderson Cooper's show called 360 degrees?
What's worse than losing one arm?
What is the best time to go to the dentist?
where does bin Laden keep his cd's?
What's the difference between tired and exhausted?
Why did Hitler need glasses?
What do you call a terrorist on vacation?
Why do squirrels swim on their back?
Two guys are on a boat with three cigarettes but nothing to light it with. What do they do?
What did the funeral director do with Alan Turing's dead body?
What's the definition of eternity?
What did Ralph yell at the swine who enjoyed autonomous sensory meridian response?
Why was the Police Officer still in bed?
Why do french people eat snails ?
How can a line be both short and long?
What did Kermit the Frog say after Jim Hensen died?
what does Dr Watson says to his flatmate when he's constipated?
What do you call a horse that makes bad jokes?
Are you all alright?
What do you call a lycanthrope you've snuck up on?
Why should you never trust someone straight after coitus?
What do you call an ungulate with low self-esteem?
Why is Jesus Christ gay?
Did you hear about the tragic crash of the small plane into the cemetery?
Question: How do you know when you're poor?
What did the Call of Duty Player with Shit Internet and Jesus have in common?
What's the difference between Phil Collins and Germany?
Why did the turtle cross the road?
When is a product with 70% less salt a bad thing?
Remember that time I made that funny joke?
What do you call a Chatbook that consists solely of pictures of your poop?
What do you call a mail order bride holding a penis?
How do rednecks celebrate Halloween?
What kind of TB do potatoes get?
Why was Simba unable to save his dad in the Lion King?
How did the Jews feel during WW2?
Whats Rick Grimes' favorite position?
OC from my 10 yr old son: Why do women like roses?
How does Kylo Ren talk on the phone?
What do you call the Indianapolis football fans?
Why did the blonde avoid eating cereal?
What was 2016?
What does Ivanka call her lower back tattoo?
From my 7 year old daughter: What do you call a girl shell?
how many American cops does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you throw a party in space?
What is Harry Potter's favorite way to get down a hill?
What did the time traveler do when he was still hungry?
Why did the feminist get triggered?
What do you call five African-Americans born together?
What's the difference between Pizza and your opinion?
you know what would be cool ?
Why do riot police like to get to work early?
What is Micheal Bay's favorite phone?
What do you call a funny snake?
Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump are stranded on an island, who wins?
Did you hear about the depressed lactose-intolerant woman?
How do you get a Samsung owner to throw their phone out the window?
What's the similarity between an Asian and Spongebob?
What do you call a group of sorority girls?
What kind of math can you do with light?
[Insensitive] Why can't Ray Charles read?
How many cops does it take to push a Black person down the stairs?
Why was Avogadro executed?
Why did the teacher cross the room?
Why do cows have bells?
Why do drug dealers love muslim people?
Why did Adolf Hitler commit suicide?
What do you call a WWE referee who is also a Jedi Master?
Why did the police officer hate wearing condoms?
What does an Islamic magician say?
What do you Call a Bunch of Horny Teenagers Argueing?
What's the difference between Canadian baseball and an old testament drug dealer?
What do you do when you see an Indian limping?
Why is the galley the safest place to be on a capsizing ship?
What's green and has wheels?
Hey girl, are you an orphanage?
What is Donald Trump's Favorite Disney Character?
Why do gas prices end with 9/10 of a penny?
How did Harry Potter get down the hill?
What's worse than ants in your pants?
Why shouldn't you go barefoot in Nigeria?
Why do Americans hate knock knock jokes?
What did the Australian Grandmaster say at the conclusion of a sex session?
What do the Montreal Canadians drive?
What do you call a dwarf with a birth defect, is broke and can't drink milk?
I fucked a bitch at work today and guess what happened?
Where did the terrorist go after the explosion?
What's the difference between a hockey player and a redneck girl?
What does a weed addict day when something miraculous happens?
How does a cannibal get a vegan off its high horse?
What's next to Moscow?
Did you see that Walmart will be closing about 500 stores by the end of the year...?
Why did the fisherman head out during a storm?
What's Gordon Ramsay's favorite movie?
How do they count the Mexican immigrants?
What are Mario's pants made out of?
At first I wondered.. How on earth does Hillary Clinton sleep at night?
What's a pedophile's favorite type of shoe?
Why do asian women like white men so much?
What do gay horses eat?
What does Waka flocka order at a Chinese restaurant?
What doesn't belong in this list: Meat, Eggs, Wife, Blowjob?
What's Donald Trump's favorite dish?
What does Donald Trump do when he sees a mathematical problem?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
What is the title of Martha Stewart's culinary anthology?
What's the difference between a pregnant woman and a light bulb?
Do you want to hear a bad joke?
What is Donald Trump's favourite nation?
How did Caesar describe his sex life?
What's a communist's favorite computer brand?
Did you hear the breaking news in Zootopia?
Why do you really not want to get pulled over in Ireland?
What do you call a dog with no legs?
How many Jews can you fit into a car?
What do you call a movie about a taco eating contest at Taco Bell that gets hit by a tornado?
How does Princess Leia masturbate?
What did Bill Cosby call Donald Trump?
What do you call a group of girls from a sorority?
You know why Trump is still the GOP candidate?
How did the butcher introduce his wife?
Why did the elephant sit on the marshmallow?
What did the oven tell the slice of bread?
A blonde, a brunette and a redhead are sitting in the first grade, who has the biggest boobs?
Have you seen the movie about a lone piece of graph paper?
What's Richard Nixon's favorite game?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a bucket filled with manure?
What's a hipsters favorite season?
Why does Donald Trump take women out on his yacht?
Have you heard about the new broom they invented?
Why was there never an Aladdin 4?
[Cringe] Why did the farmer bandage the goat?
Why are black people tall?
Do you want to hear a bad cat joke?
Why wasn't Jesus born in Mexico?
Why couldn't Mozart find his mentor?
What did Chad Kroeger say after leaving a concert of Justin Bieber?
Which race is the most racist?
Did you hear of that new app where people meat ?
What do you call a black man flying a plane?
How bad is Hillary Clinton?
Did you hear about the antennas that got married?
What do you call a terrorist on the moon?
What's the difference between a feminist and a spear?
Why did the slut go to the dentist?
What do you call a meme war?
What's the worst thing to hear after blowing Willie Nelson?
What do you call a potato from Colorado?
What is the most painful Russian dance?
How many psychologists does it take to change a tire?
Why is it so hard to pronounce words in Welsh?
Did you hear about the one-armed man that robbed the bank?
Why was the physics teacher and the biology teacher always fighting?
What do you call it when Batman leaves church early?
How do you exorcise a demon?
Did you hear the one about the statistician?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and /r/Jokes?
What's the definition of trust?
Why is the washing machine so grumpy?
What's the number ten's favorite Spanish phrase?
Have you seen Finding Dory?
What President of the United States smells the worst?
Why was the Jack-o-Lantern afraid to cross the road?
Why are orphans bad at baseball?
Statistics show almost 54,000 women are abused every year. Do you know what they have in common?
What's the difference between the US election and sex?
What do you call a company that delivers delicious fruit baskets and also has sex with your mom?
Why did the Console peasant cross the Road?
If a dog ran away every three nights and had an orange tail, what would that make it?
What do the Toronto Maple Leafs and the Titanic have in common?
What do French people say after they've gone to the bathroom?
Why did Bob Dylan win the Nobel Prize in Literature?
What do you get when you have Windows and Mac OS X dual booting from the same computer?
What looks like half an apple?
whats the best part of having sex with a transvestite?
What do you get when you cross an elephant and a rhino?
What’s the difference between a poodle humping your leg and a pit bull humping your leg?
Why did the jalapeño put on a sweater?
What do you call a male cow that eats hamburgers?
How could a leper afford a nice house?
What's a Canadian's favorite footwear?
Why could Jesus walk on water?
Whats would happens if you added Hillary Clinton and the USA and subtracted an A?
Why can't the man take his job seriously?
What do you call a sprouted sweet potato that has somehow gained sentience?
From how high can you drop an egg onto a concrete floor without breaking it?
Did you hear about the guy who snorted curry powder?
Why does mohamed goes out with an explosive device?
What is an Italian Pirate's favourite food?
Why do Autonomous cars have steering wheels?
Why do flamingos stand on one leg?
What does a flame smell like?
What do spiders eat in France?
What do a glass of water and an Atheist have in common?
Why didn't Mark Hamill go crazy while voice acting as the Joker?
Why is a 77 better than a 69?
Did you hear about the trial of the jurisprudence fetishist?
What's Kevin Durant's go-to garment?
Why is the long term liability sad?
What did the atom say to the other atom?
What's the most environmentally friendly subreddit?
Why does everyone love Plato?
What’s the best way to stop a runaway horse?
What do racists say during sex?
What's difference between Jesse Owens and Adolf Hilter?
What's the difference between a snowman and a snowwoman?
Did you know putting your water damaged phone in a cup of rice can fix it?
What did Cinderella say when she got to the ball?
Why are condoms and bungee-jumping similar?
What do you call a bear who is athletically flexible?
Jacklyn's mom has four kids, two have been kidnapped by Isis, how many does she have left?
Who wouldn't let the gorilla in the ballet?
What does a Muslim man tell his wife when she eats bacon?
what did Freud say about an algebraic equation?
What's the difference between a baby and a kilo of Coke?
What does Hitler do to his one-night stands?
What do men and Subway have in common?
As a Jew, am I allowed to eat McDonalds today?
What do Grill Cosby and Grill Clinton have in common?
What do you call it, when Trump and Hillary argue who has the better smile?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a shit-flinging monkey?
DOCTOR: why did you take your antibiotics at 6 am instead of 9:00 AM as prescribed?
Why don't we see more midget actors?
What's between a cunt and an asshole?
How many Gentlesirs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Do you remember the "Hold a coke with your boobs" challenge ?
What is the difference between a dirty bus stop, and a lobster with breast implants?
What do you call a deer with no eyes ?
How many 'Suh Dudes' does it take to change a lightbulb?
Who did Hitler rule Nazi Germany with?
What's the worst kind of incompetent?
What's the problem when your wife walks out of the kitchen?
What do you call a math class full of SJW's?
What do you call a #robot stranded in the ocean?
What Pokémon does the best with the ladies?
What do you call a pothead that breaks up with his girlfriend?
If Trump and Clinton were stranded on a desert island, who would survive?
What's a scary costume for Halloween?
I'm two months pregnant now. When will my baby move?
What did the baby otter say when it walked into the club?
What do Canadians drink when the beer is all gone?
Why were the Ten Commandments so powerful?
How did the psychologist die?
Why does Donald Trump hate Chris Jericho?
What happened to r/showerthoughts?
What's an abusive parents favorite vegetable?
Why didn't the lifeguard save the hippy?
What do engineers use for birth control?
Which is the most communist vegetable?
How do you turn a duck into a popular soul singer?
Interviewer: What would you say is your greatest weakness?
Whay does the sign on an out-of-business brothel say?
Why did the Mexican take Xanax?
How can you tell if it is a Salvador Dali painting?
What do you call an Arab who has a ripped body??
What do you call a chicken coup with more than two doors?
What do a pizza delivery driver and a gynecologist have in common?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton?
How do you kill a blonde?
Why was Amazon angry after their conference with Samsung?
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump?
Can vegetarians eat pudding?
Why did the crip cross the road?
Why is Hillary Clinton running for President?
Whad did the scales show on the screen when the person steeped on them?
What's the difference between you and a mallard with a cold?
How do you discipline your pet rock?
Why can't the T-rex clap its hands?
What dinosaur was in the most pain?
Want to hear my favorite joke?
Why can't you hear Michelle Pfeiffer use the restroom?
What does Pokemon Go and a policeman have in common?
What do you call a nose without a body?
Why didn't the monk sell his temple?
What is Donald Trump's favorite flavor of Tic Tac?
what's the best part about fucking twenty five year olds?
How many chicken eggs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Have you tried Gatorade's newest sports drink, F5?
What do you call a gnome who dresses nice?
What sport can Batman best Superman in?
How many babies does it take to shingle a roof?
What do you call the god of cheese?
What did the executioner say to his wife when he left?
Hey baby are you today's date?
What do you call a lawyer from krypton?
Why'd the Mexican push his wife off a cliff?
What's black and dosent work?
Which is faster to unload, a truckload of bricks or a truckload of dead kittens?
Hey girl, are you tired of these 10/10 jokes?
why netflix and chill?
Are you today's date?
Are you my date today?
What Do You Call A Syrian Mother, Father, And Child That Live Together?
What do you call a lion with a fancy hat?
How many "friend zoned" guys does it take to change a lightbulb?
What would be a good name for my daughter who is a synth?
What do you call a schizophrenic in a white dress?
What my iPhone and Steve Jobs have in common?
Which state has the worst carbonated drinks?
What did the ghost say when he got to the halloween party?
How many apples grow on a tree?
What do you call a cross between a penguin and a cow?
Who would survive if Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton were in an airplane crash?
What was the last thing Beethoven accomplished?
How do Soviet prison mates greet each other?
What's the difference between a New Yorker and a Canadian?
Why did the suicide bomber die a virgin?
How many Friend Zoned guys does it take to change a light bulb?
Why is my Tetris highscore like my wife?
Why don't Arab women need Insurance?
Why did Moses see a burning bush as God?
What does ABC stand for?
How did the farmer deal with the stubborn sheep's wool?
What do you call it if an illegal immigrant fights a sex offender?
What do you call a walking talking rat?
What is the difference between a dog and a cat?
What did the ghost say to the other ghost at the Halloween party?
How many dead babies does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How does a blonde count a thousand sheep?
How do you tell a bad joke from a good joke?
What happened when two hydrogen atoms collided?
What kind of insect gets triggered on tumblr?
What do you call an Asian lobster?
What do you call a cow with no sense of humor ?
How can you tell you live in an Asian part of town?
What's the most sensitive part of a man's body when he's masturbating?
How great would it be to make my hobby my profession?
What is worse, balancing on a 100meter high rope or getting a BJ from a man?
What's the difference between a pick-pocket and a peeping tom?
What does the drug dealer make sure to do?
What do you get when you cross and owl with a bungee cord?
What’s the definition of “trust”?
What was the first thing Hitler bought from the beauty shop?
Girl: If I climbed all the way to the top of Mt. Everest, what'd you give me?
Damn girl are you a smoke detector?
He's dumb, doesn't speak, eats and sleeps but saved the world many times. Who is he?
Do you want to know why black people commit so much crime?
Why did psychotherapist cross the road?
What do a Florida hurricane, a Kansas tornado, and an Arkansas divorce have in common?
What's the difference between Superman and Supergirl?
What do you call an ex-military white supremacist?
What's the difference between a captain and a lt.col ?
Who makes more money, a hooker, or a drug dealer?
What did the depressed philosopher say?
You ever hear about the Polish terrorist that tried to blow up a bus?
Q: Does an elephant ever forget?
What do you call a pile of cats?
Why are we seeing the creepy clowns all over the country?
Remember Doodle-Bob from Spongebob?
What is an umbrella doing in the shower?
Wanna hear a good one?
Did you know that humans eat more bananas than monkeys?
What is the biggest joke in the world as of now?
Is Google a he or a she?
If all the 7 days were to get in a fight, who would win?
Why did Amy Schumer go to a psychic?
What's the biggest joke of 2016?
Why do lesbians only shop at REI?
Why are cats so afraid of cucumbers?
What's the difference between men and women when it comes to drinking?
What's the difference between purple and pink?
Who do you vote for if Trump drops out of the race?
Why did the man sleep under the tractor?
Whats the best way to get over a girl?
[META] Are we getting DV Brigaded?
Why do Norwegians drive Chevys?
What do you call someone who doesn't know how to party?
Why does no one buy food for a platypus?
What's the difference between Turkey and Duck?
What Does Stephen Hawking have in common with Rosie O'Donnell?
What happens when you tell a sexist joke to a feminist mod?
What do you call a computer that sings?
Why did the rock go to the therapist?
Why didn't the Mexican go now hunting?
Did you hear about the auntie who plugged her electric blanket into the toaster?
Whats the difference between Electricians and Technicians?
What happens when a dick meets a hardass?
How did the Allies have time to prepare D-Day?
Why did the guy spend the entire day throwing out his surplus of herbs?
Have you heard about the new male birth control pill?
Why can't you fool an aborted fetus?
What was the slutty princess full of?
So how's the sex life?
Why is North America so salty?
In what state were the women bill cosby raped ?
What do you call a 1,000 pound woman sitting on a bar stool?
Which clown has killed the most people?
Why shouldn't you go to Africa if your scared of robots?
How do you think the unthinkable?
What's the difference between anal and oral?
what do you call a chinese millionaire?
What do you get when you cross a Hell's Angel with a Jehovah's Witness?
Have you heard about the new TV show NBC is working on with Donald Trump?
Why does Trump watch the Olympics?
What do you call an italian pro-gun activist?
How do tennis players decide who serves first?
What did the Buddhist say to the hotdog vendor?
What do you call a Norse god after a workout?
What do you call a man with no body and a nose ?
What do emos say at good parties?
Why don't people eat clocks?
What do jews and people of GTA have in common?
Did you hear about the magical tractor?
What is Al Qaeda's favourite team?
What do you get when you cross the Atlantic with the Titanic?
How do you count cows?
Why did the fishing boat captain hire an all Mexican crew?
What's the coldest type of reptile?
What do the trees say when it rains?
What do you call a heavy punch from Beyonce?
What's something you can drive, but also throw?
What university department did the Fonz go do when he needed help paying his tuition?
What do you call Bigfoot when he has an attitude?
What is it called when a chemist has a really great winter break?
Why did the dog go to the hospital?
What's the difference between oral sex and anal sex?
Why did the aquarium have an existential crisis when the dolphins were released to the wild?
How did NASCAR get that name?
Why are black people so fast?
Did you hear about that new jewish barista?
What Did Ezio's Girlfriend Say to Him After Sex?
Why did the corn maze go back to school?
Whats the difference between a hippie and a trampoline?
Why didn't the Middle Eastern man go to jail?
Why are basketball players so tall?
Did you hear about the rash of manhole cover thefts?
Why did the storm trooper return his iPhone?
Wanna hear my campfire jokes?
What does a blanket say to the other after a game of chess?
Why were the Medieval centuries known as the Dark Ages?
What do you call a fly without wings?
Have you heard my construction joke?
What do you call a cat in love?
What Did The Muslim Terminator Say?
What does an aging Mafia boss do for his birthday?
What type of cancer is an anarchist immune to?
Do you have any naked pictures of your wife?
Did you know that my grandpa died in Auschwitz?
Why do accountants make good lovers?
Why did the blonde tip-toe near the medicine cabinet?
Why are there no black magicians?
What's the difference between a camera and a foot?
What's with everyone being scared of clowns recently?
What are Jehovah witnesses called in Chinese?
How do you know you've been burgled by asians?
What's great about having sex with twenty-two-year-olds?
What did the hill that was counting its pocket change say to the other hill?
What's it called when Batman walks out of church?
What makes you really cool?
Why don't Jehovah Witnesses like Halloween?
What programs do cultists watch shows on?
What do me and Subway have in common?
Hey, are you cold?
Why was the baby late to his 5'clock appointment?
Want to hear a dirty joke?
In a farmers market, Farmer A sells pumpkins, Farmer B sells strawberries, what does Farmer C sell?
Why is black comedy important?
What does a microcontroller say when it can't answer a question?
Have you heard of global warming?
What's the difference between a cat and a complex sentence?
What do you call a stabilizing greek?
What's does an extractor fan sound like?
Why are schoolhouse red?
If dad's get dad jokes, what do mom's do?
Why does Santa Clause have no children?
Why do Jews have big noses?
Why do jews have such big noses?
What’s the last thing that goes thru a bug’s mind as he hits the windshield?
What did the man say when he ran out of clothes?
Why did the policeman smell bad?
What console did Nintendo make for special ed kids?
What do Alexander the Great and Winnie the Pooh have in common?
What's pink and smells of ginger?
What do you call an average ogre?
Why do women wear makeup and perfume?
What does a nosey pepper do?
What is an orthodox Jew's biggest dilemma?
How do you circumsise a redneck?
What is 13 inches long, has a purple head and makes a woman scream all night long?
What is the life motto of a Frenchman?
What do you call a Latino eating canned lunch meat?
Why did Eddie Albert have to go to the dentist?
What do you call a chicken with lettuce in its eye?
What do you call a charred exotic psychic?
Why do programmers get Halloween and Christmas mixed up?
Why did Thor decide to sleep in?
Why did the fly fly?
What do grapes and a bicycle both have in common?
Did you hear the one about improv?
Why didn't the Mexican guy at work take out the trash at work when I asked him?
Whats better then getting a gold medal in the Paralympics?
Did you hear the one about the constipated mathematician?
Did you hear about those new corduroy pillows?
What does a gay bear and The World Series have in common?
What's the difference between a feminist and a suicide vest?
What do classical pianists take with them to the grocery store?
What happens when a feminist shoots a gun?
Why is one side of the flying-V longer than the other?
Why wasn't the droid hungry?
How do you have sex with a vegetable?
What does Bill Cosby have in common with Ninjas?
How many feminist does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the quickest way to a man's heart?
What do r/jokes and my dads jokes have in common?
Whats the difference between dynamite and a banana?
What is the difference between Elon musk and Tony Stark?
What is it when a man talks nasty to a woman?
How do you catch a unique bunny?
Why are camels bad at sex?
How Do Rednecks Celebrate Halloween?
Why does Oedipus hate profanity?
What's the difference between a good joke and a bad joke?
Why did Jesus have a six pack?
Have you got a Masturbation addiction?
What's Michelle's favourite vegetable?
How does a French soldier greet his comrades?
What’s the difference between a terrorist and a woman with PMS?
What did the lipstick and the eye-shadow do after they got into a fight?
How do four whores sit on one chair?
What did the Shetland Pony say when asked if his cough had cleared up?
Why are black people so tall?
What happens when you wear radioactive Russian underpants?
What is good about being Swiss?
What is big and brown and plays the accordion?
What's the difference between babies and boomerangs?
What do you call an underwater owl?
Why are asians bad at football?
Why are the cops shooting so many black men?
What do you tell a person with two swollen eyes ?
What has four legs and goes 'Boo'?
How long is a china-man?
What do Boobs and Lego have in common?
How did I escape Iraq?
How did Feminism start?
what do you call a mexican on the moon ?
Anton, do you think I’m a bad mother?
How can you tell if a pedophile is Jewish?
A joke for you Europeans: What do you call the border between humanity and animals?
What's the most common view of porn?
Why couldn't the police arrest the robber on the second floor?
How many potatoes does it take to kill an Irishman?
What did Chris Brown's dad say to him after the Rihanna incident?
How do you catch digital fish?
What types of jokes grow on you?
What did the Jamaican say was his favourite country?
What do you call a can after it completes college?
Why was the Mexican bad at archery?
What did the pirate say on his 80th birthday?
Why did Horse Santa put his dentist on the naughty list?
What's the difference between Sugar and Sweet'N Low?
Why did the can crusher quit his job?
If a fire fighter has two eyes, then what does a ballerina have?
Why didn't the parrot want the black guy to buy him?
What do fat people in Syria need?
What did the penis say to the condom???
What's the difference between novocaine and an index finger?
What do you call a Santa Claus who kidnaps people?
Why didn't the Mexican go bow hunting?
What do snitches and cuts have in common?
Why do some find the postal service offensive?
Why do elephants have 4 feet?
How do they package bread at the bakery?
Have you heard what they're now calling Pokemon Go?
Whats the difference between a cat and a comma?
Why did the blonde bring a ladder to the party?
What do you call a dinosaur who just got out of a relationship?
How do you kill a group of clowns?
You know what's really dumb?
What do you call a Mexican with small muscles?
What's that one room zombies can never enter?
What would a child call a Nazi porta-potty?
Whar would Samuel Langhorne Clemens' alias be if he wrote country music?
What happened to the German man's luggage?
What's the worst part about eating out a grandma?
Have you heard the rumor going around about butter?
So two Douches decide to park next to each other, how many spaces do they take up?
What do you call an alligator in a vest?
Why's it so hard for blind people to commit crimes?
What's grey and can't swim?
What does the pirates 5 trailer and the iPhone 7 have in common?
What do you tell your wife with two black eyes?
Why does the ejaculating turtle appear to be getting larger?
What does an Aboriginal couple practice once a month?
Why did the scarecrow win an award?
What do you call your favorite 80's pop star floating dead in the harbor?
What's the only thing you can say when the Chinese Restaurant over booked your reservation?
What do you call a cross between a skunk, a wolverine, and a porcupine?
Did you hear about the guy who fell in a vat at the eyeglass factory?
hi What did the stork say to the couple?
What do you call a Med School student who graduates with all C's?
What does a chef with a chronic masturbation issue cook?
What type of acid is best to use from time to time?
How did Barack propose to Michelle?
What's the difference between justice and relevant ethnic groups in America?
Did you hear about that hole in the wall of the strip club?
At what time in the day do rockets eat and why?
What did the cannibal do after dumping his girlfriend?
what time is it?
What did Tammy say after she refused to vaccinate her child?
Who is Santa Claus?
Does anyone know any good gags?
What do a Prius and a penis have in common?
How do you sell chocolate to a deaf/foreign person?
What do you call the male equivalent of a Feminist?
What happened to Sponge Bob Square Pants when he broke up with his girlfriend?
Did you hear Kim Kardashian got robbed by two armed men?
Why did the cow tip over?
Why do we call sad people blue?
How recognize a blonde's computer ?
What did the pirates say who stole Kim Kardashians jewelry?
What are a musician's favourite letters?
You know that tingly little feeling you get when you like someone?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and Moby Dick?
What's the best part about a selfie stick?
What do you call a jewish man?
How does a flower get pollinated?
You hear the one about the cow that told too many jokes?
Did you hear the one about the falling eggs?
Why shouldn't you give Muslim Women drugs?
What Does A Ghost Cow Say?
Why didn't the bride and groom exchange their wedding vows?
How can you tell a sumo wrestler from a feminist?
Why is the magnet on medication?
How many baby's does it take to paint a house?
What do you call a gay couch?
What did the one tree say to the other tree?
Why does Dr Pepper come in a can?
What kind of Ant lives in rented accommodation?
Want to hear a joke?
Why can't Helen Keller drive?
What do you call a spider that likes 80s music?
Why did the can-crusher quit his job?
When is a door, not a door?
What do you call a slightly incomplete Yahtzee set?
Did you hear about Syrian sex dolls?
How are crayons like people?
What's a racists favorite song by the Rolling Stones?
How do feminists like their eggs cooked?
Did you hear about the physics student that committed suicide by jumping off a skyscraper?
Why was the 6 afraid of 7?
what's worse than having a cold right before a job interview ?
What do you call a couple of moles drunk and high off sugar?
What type of fruit can you not eat just one of?
How do you pick up a Jewish girl?
Did you hear about the 2 men who stole a calendar?
What do you call a prostitute that does both men and women?
what's the difference between an irish wedding and an irish funeral?
How do you get 100 Ethiopians in a phone box?
Why did Sarah fall off the swing?
How is marijuana stock sold on the stock market?
Wats d height of hope?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are on a sinking ship in the middle of the ocean. Who survives?
What do we want?
What do you call a dizzy Asian?
Why do crowd control police go earlier to work?
Question: What's the difference between Joan of Arc and a canoe?
What do Dick Cheney and Jim Kelly have in common?
Why are all the plants at the retirement home made of silk and plastic?
What did the fish say when it swam into a wall?
What do Tempurpedic mattresses and raptors have in common?
Hey There's 20 Letters in The Alphabet Right?
Do know what a honeymoon salad is?
Why did the stand up comic quit comedy to become a obstetrician?
Did you here what the waiter did at the restaurant?
Why did the bodybuilder go to the vet?
hi What did the painter say to the paint can?
Why was the sterile Grizzly upset?
hi What did the mime say to the wall?
How does the Asian chef get to work?
what does the Jewish baker say when ba customer leaves his store?
What did the raped dog said to the PETA activist?
How do you turn a duck into a blues singer?
What is a Canadian's favorite nirvana song?
What salad is bad for your health?
When is the Speech Therapy Class?
What do GTA and the third Reich have in common?
What do you call chips that aren't yours?
What's the difference between Eric Clapton and a snooker player?
Do you know where multipliers are made?
What's a gay man's favorite planet?
How do you defeat a kappa?
What do you call a stoner with Down's Syndrome?
What type of martial arts do they practice in Israel?
why did hitler commit suicide?
Why is Rose sad?
What do the wage gap and the story of Hercules have in common?
why are fish good astronauts?
Why was Miss Piggy sick for her show?
What's the difference between Neil Armstrong and Michael Jackson?
What does Trumps Hair and a Thong have in common..?
What do you call a group of geeks eating cupcakes?
What's the loudest noise in the world?
Two black guys are in a car, who's driving?
What did JFK Jr miss most about Martha's Vineyard?
What makes for a good first date?
What's the difference between a black guy and snow tires?
How Can You Tell It's Fall In Florida?
Do you know how many planets are in the solar system?
What did Elon Musk get after his talk on colonizing Mars?
What did the DNA say to the other DNA?
What was Beethoven’s favorite fruit?
Why did Beethoven get rid of his chickens?
What's going be America's largest export once Trump gets elected?
Why don't call centers hire alligators?
Where do rednecks eat in the city?
Do you know what makes pink lemonade pink?
what do you call 10 rabbits marching backwards?
What do you call a political conservative woman who is required to always be there?
What is a pedophile's favorite musical note?
Did you hear about the orchestra that got electrocuted?
Why do Asians like to have military time on?
Did you guys see the score of the Egypt vs Ethiopia soccer match?
What did the one cat say to the other cat?
Why is the California golden gate bridge a great compass?
What's John Lee Hooker's favourite recording device?
How do you make a Venetian blind?
Why did the witch get a car with manual transmission?
Why was the radioactive food going to taste bad?
Why did the console player cross the road?
What is the type of humor do you hate the most?
Did you hear the one about Muhammed?
Where do calculus students go when they are sick?
What sounds funny?
What costs you a fortune and leaves you in tears a year and a half later?
What do you call ill-mannered burst of strong wind in the desert?
How can a dog afford to go to college?
What do you get if you drop a piano down a mine shaft?
What do you call German Uber drivers?
Whats the hardest part of a vegetable to eat?
What's the difference between jam and jelly?
What do you call a guy who hangs around a bunch of musicians?
So what if I don't know what Armageddon means?
Isn't it great to live in the 21st century?
What is bread's most deadly sin?
What do you get if you tie two camels together by the tails?
How many Reddit mods does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the best part about having sex with 25 yr olds?
What did Eric Clapton do after he wrote Tears in Heaven?
What do 9 out of 10 people enjoy?
What's the difference between a milion dollars and a boner?
Why don't Baptists approve of premarital sex?
[groaner] Have you guys seen Viking Wars?
What do you call Muslims at the end of their religious service?
What song did Russia send Ukraine for its birthday?
What don't BMWs have that all other manufacturers do?
What do you call a guy with no musical talent that hangs out with the band?
Why did the bandit from Burma vote for Trump and Hillary to be the primary candidates?
What did Zack say after discovering his coward genes?
What do you call 2 people singing in Hebrew?
Did you hear about corduroy pillows?
What's the difference between a guitarist and a pizza?
What do you call a singer who sells meat?
what do you call your girlfriend when she's shot by an Islamic terrorist?
What rabbit wears on his back while flying?
Where would you see two people helping each other while you feel happy seeing them help each other?
What drink is better than average?
Which is the most religious vegetable?
What did the fish say when it swam into a concrete wall?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a Styrofoam cup?
Why are TV's attracted to people?
What did the Trump Train do when it approached the station?
How many McDonalds workers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why can't T-Rex's Hi-Five each other?
What do you think of men who likes to eat fish?
If ball is life, where is the afterlife?
What do you call a black man with a MD?
What does George Weasley see in the Mirror of Erised?
What is a caffeine addict's excuse for drinking coffee in the evening?
What do you get when you cross an elephant with a rhino?
Why are white people so bad at horror movies?
How can you tell when time is reversing?
What's a Mexican's favorite breakfast cereal?
Why did the aliens choose to not invade and enslave the human race?
What did one sausage say to the other?
Why did Sally fall of the swing?
Q: What does the Bermuda Triangle and blondes have in common?
What is the room temperature on Tatooine?
Why do people admire pirates so much?
Why did Aquaman join the DC universe instead of Marvel?
What's the difference between a pontiff's chin and the kitchen sink?
Who did the Dyslexic Devil Worshipper sell his soul to?
Why does Donald Trump like free haircuts?
How to get a Jewish girl's number?
Do you want to know why I called your girlfriend a tractor?
What do you call a camel with three humps?
What is the the Chicken's favorite composer?
Have you ever tried eating a clock?
What did the angry feminist say on Halloween?
Why did the wheelchair-bound girlfriend break up with her boyfriend?
In The Lion King, why did Mufasa die?
How did Genghis Khan conquer Mongolia?
If Chef Boyardee was a dictator what would he name his secret police?
What does the captain of the USS Enterprise do for exercise?
What do ghosts drink?
Why did Simba buy a motorcycle?
How does Moses make his tea?
What's black and white and red all over?
Is your refrigerator running??
Can I Have SEX with my Pregnant Wife?
What did the doctor say to the midget waiting in the lobby?
Why does everyone hate 7?
What city are you in when you drop your waffle on the beach?
What would happen if James Bond took Viagra?
Why haven’t you ever seen any elephants hiding up trees?
We all know what the loneliest number is, but what's the least lonely number?
What goes up and down but never moves?
What’s the difference between a baby and a feminist?
How did the road break its ankles?
OC why do doctors check their patients reflexes?
What do women that have miscarried suffer from?
Why is the sea so salty?
Why shoudn't you play poker in Africa ?
What did the piece of shit stuck on my toilet say to my pee this morning?
Why do Welshmen like to fuck sheep at the edge of a cliff?
Did you hear about the guy with a fetish for public transportation?
Why are stormtroopers so bad at aiming?
Why is the LSU football team like my car?
What is the hardest part about firing a black man?
What's below the Pyrenees?
What's the difference between a taliban outpost and an Afghani Elementary school?
Why do americans get manuals when buying a new car?
What do you call an evil wizard who gives good hickeys?
How do you say Vaseline in German?
What do you call a gay guy who is really good at differential equations?
What do you call a muslim woman cheating on her husband?
What kind of girls date firefighters?
Russia: Why did the chicken cross the road?
Husband: What would you do if i won the lottery?
Whats a pirates favourite letter???
What's the slowest boat?
Why did the baby drop its rattle?
What do you say when you see two fetuses making out?
Why did Miss Piggy call in sick to work?
What do you call a hobosexual?
What did Thin Lizzie do with his iPhone?
How many Harvard students does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between beer nuts and deer nuts?
Did you know that national middle child day was last week?
WHY DID HITLER COMMIT SUICIDE?
What is a small loan of money?
Did you hear about the Amish woman?
Who lose in the presidential debate?
What's the difference between Elton John's chin and Tiger Woods?
What is "YEAH" in Japanese?
Who lost the presidential debate?
How many Donald Trumps does it take to change a lightbulb?
Want to hear a corny joke?
What city does Affirmative Action Aslan live?
Whats a mans favorite word that starts with 'm' and ends in 'arriage'?
Hear about the dyslexic chefs?
Clinton and Trump get in a plane crash, who is saved?
Why can't Donald Trump be circumcised?
Wanna know how easy it is to sleep with a fat chick?
What is Chip Kelly's favorite dance?
What do you call a dog who does magic tricks?
What did the farmer say when he couldn't find his tractor?
Have you heard about the curator of the Slavic History exhibit?
Who lost the American Presidential Debate?
What did the paraplegic retard get for Christmas?
What do you think about the Cyber Warfare ?
Your refrigerator is running?
What do my brother and Julius Caesar have in common?
You know what really surprised me about the debate tonight?
How do you feel when you're playing Mortal Kombat and the air conditioning goes out?
What the difference between a feminist and a knife?
How many people could Donald Trump shoot before his poll numbers fell below 40%?
Teacher to a 4 Year old kid: What's your Mom's name?
What fuels electronics but drains a relationship?
What are some good dad jokes?
How many cannibals does it take to make a sandwich?
Who's bigger, Mr. Bigger or Mr. Bigger's baby?
Why was the dolphin sad?
Aye dost ya know the difference betwixt a Scott and Scotch?
What's the difference between a dry, moldy cranberry and an angry blue bird?
How many Hillary supporters does it take to change a light bulb?
How do you start a rave in Ethiopia?
What are you watching tonight?
What do you call a bicycle with no seat?
What happened to the rabbit, the lion ate?
Did you hear about the vertically challenged psychic that robbed a bank?
What's Whitney Houston's favorite type of coordination?
Why are people so creeped out by the guy in the unicorn mask?
What do The Sixth Sense and Titanic have in common?
Why did the gynecologist get in trouble for oral sex with his patient?
What's worse than finding a stack of dads playboys in the basement?
Why do women have smaller feet than men?
why did the tiger running?
Did you hear about Arnold Palmers last round of golf?
What is Checkmate?
Whats the easiest way to pick up a jewish girl?
Did you hear they lifted the restrictions on magazine size?
Why did the Irish man only eat two hundred and thirty nine beans?
Dim light bulbs or bright light bulbs?
How did the haunted house escape foreclosure?
You want to know the problem with cocaine?
Why did the free-range chicken cross the road?
Why did the black man try to break into jail?
Why did I leave my grades at the orphanage?
Where are the Atlantis and the lost treasures of many renowned pirates?
what is Mozart doing now?
What do you call a Mexican that lost his car?
Why did Adele cross the road?
What do you call a white black person?
What did one blind cop say to the other blind cop?
Why couldnt you trust Castros wife?
What did the Spannish Amoeba said to the other Amoebas?
What's the difference between a king hit (sucker punch) and a 69'er?
What's another word for a nostalgic boner?
What do you call a kangaroo who chases rock stars to have sex with them?
Wanna know the best joke ever?
What do you call a stolen Tesla?
What's a Mexican's favourite video game?
What did the pavement smoother say after he lost his hands?
What's the difference between a long bearded redneck and a long bearded ISIS man?
Why aren't any atheists buying a PS4 Pro?
Why can't trigonometry teachers give good speeches?
What do you do to backwards scented muffins?
Why did Hitler take Xanax?
What's the difference between a church and a mosque?
Did you hear the Marlins are no longer serving beer at the stadium?
What do you call it when old people are forced into slavery?
What is Forrest Gump's password?
What's the most popular form of martial arts in Israel?
What do Trump and Hilary have in common?
What do my girlfriend and Jesus have in common?
What did the clone troopers say after they killed Aayla Secura?
What did Godzilla say after eating a Honda?
What's a pirate's favorite letter?
Why did the computer crash?
How was school today?
Why was Kaiser Wilhelm II such a weak ruler?
What's a pirates favorite letter?
Who was the most Unfunniest and Unoriginal Comedian of all Time?
What do you call someone pretending to nice to people just to get upvotes?
What does a pterodactyl have in common with a urinal?
Why does Donald Trump watch the Olympics?
Why did the mexican fire department fail?
What happened when Mr. Loin got knighted?
Where did Hitler keep his armies?
In a debate between Hillary and Trump, who loses?
What drug can Donald Trump not live without?
What do you call a dead bee?
What do you call it when a turtle beats a rabbit in a race?
What type of perfume do kidnappers use?
why can't conservatives work at a checkout counter?
How do redditors get their water?
What does natalia portman have on the ends of her feet?
Why are there so many women archaeologists?
When jokes go to parties, where do they wait for drinks?
Have you tried rocky mountain oysters?
What do you call large number of cannibals stranded on an island?
How do you trigger a feminist?
What's the difference between traffic and strawberries?
What do you call two crows on a branch?
What's the difference between you and eggs?
What did one casket say to the other?
What's the best way for a prostitute to advertise?
What do you call a nymphomaniac with erectile dysfunction?
Why did the little girl eat her money for lunch?
whats the best part about sleeping with twenty-seven year olds?
How do you get a Criminal to stop running?
Who's the fastest tailor in the world?
What book does the Queen of England read to get herself into a raunchy mood?
Why did the cows cross the road?
What does an Anime Mathlete say?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Prius?
Where do graphic designers go for a drink?
What do you call a Mexican hooker who doesn't charge any money?
What does Gordon program in?
How do you make a Plummer cry?
Why does Jesus eat at Benihana?
What happened to the guy who farted in church?
Which country will be the first to change to all electric vehicles?
What do female scientists look at once a month?
Where do you see yourself in 10 years?
What is the difference between the USA and North Korea?
Q. How can you tell if a car is German?
Where do lightbulbs die?
What did the carpet enthusiast say to his mistress?
What is the hardest part of cutting a baby in half with a straight razor?
What do my iPhone and my girlfriend have in common?
What do vaginas and schools have in common?
What's the laziest piece of clothing?
Is milk the best workout supplement?
Why did Black Lives Matter arrange a protest on Coruscant?
Did you hear that the coprophiliac Scotsman is engaged to be married?
Where do you drown a hipster?
Why didn't Sug Knight talk to the police?
What's a caveman's favorite lunchtime meal?
What do you call a clever repost?
Tired of hearing the same song over and over again?
You guys hear about the pepper shaker that was attacked by the salt shaker?
What is an AI's favorite food?
How do you stop the protests in Charlotte?
Why did Timmy cross the street?
Why do ducks make the best detectives?
Why are pedophiles so full of themselves?
Is it any wonder men have been obsessed with sex since biblical times?
Why did the doctor make an old woman cry?
Why did Steve Jobs die too soon?
What would you do if you won the lottery?
What kind of fish can you find in a hospital?
What do you call a gangster with no limbs?
Why are Muslim Pokémon so easy to defeat?
What do you call a dead person?
What did the black guy get on his SAT?
What did the West African nation say as it sank into the sea?
What Did Big Nacho Say To Little Nacho?
Did you hear what happened to the lady who backed into the fan?
Why doesn't Lilly from AT&T commercials show any cleavage?
Wanna hear a story about a ghost?
what do you call a fake spaghetti?
How do memes go to the proms?
What makes camping so thrilling?
How many Amish guys does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you say when you get cornered by a gang of Italian prostitutes?
What's the definition of tender love?
what happened when the frog double parked?
What did one mushroom say to the other?
Whats the difference between a Jew and Santa?
From my 8yo daughter: What do you call a boat made out of corn?
Do they have 4Rivers in California?
What is hard, long, and full of seamen?
Everyone knows how you know a criminal is lying?
You lost your phone when its' on silent?
What does it sound like when Java laughs?
What do you call an attractive primate corpse in Saudi Arabia?
What's Donald Trump's Favorite Nut?
Why do they say cleanliness is next to godliness?
Why do elephants paint their testicles red?
What is the difference between a paycheck and your penis?
What's black on the bottom and white on the top?
What do you get when a woman has a yeast infection and some air trapped in her vagina?
Why did the baker have smelly hands?
What is the dumbest animal in the jungle?
What do you call a crowned man in gridlock?
A group of cattle are taking a road trip; who drives?
When does an average north Indian loses his virginity?
What do you call a group of north Indians?
What do you call it when someone gets covered by a landslide?
What did the dance instructor say to her student when the student wanted to use her bathroom?
What happened when five fat French men got in the lifeboat?
Why doesn't anybody like feminist picnics?
How do Chinese people laugh?
Had ur lunch?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a BMW?
Why is a mute girl the best girlfriend?
How many Mexicans does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you get a vegan to eat meat?
Why was the photographer arested?
What do you call an Asian boy with downs?
What do you call a very flexible grizzly bear?
What do you call a woman who can't draw?
Did you hear the one about the iphone 7 headphone jack?
Why don't Germans like humour?
What do you call a Japanese Cougar with exceptional taste?
What's the difference between a guy with carry on luggage and a photon?
Why can't african kids watch Dragon Ball Z?
What does a retired Olympic sprinter have in common with Bernie Sanders?
Why do they call it the Xbox360?
How do you know when your gf is too young?
What do you mean he's your half son?
What do boys and algebra have in common?
Did you guys hear about the constipated mathematician?
What's the problem with Java jokes?
What do you call a German with a bad attitude?
What do you call the cool, terroristy Muslims?
What did the boy with no arms and no legs get for Christmas?
What do the Starship Enterprise and toilet paper have in common?
[OC] Why does the NSA hate winter?
What does the shy little pebble wish for?
What do you get when you cross the Atlantic with the titanic?
Why is Santa in such a bad mood?
What's someone who hates underwear's favorite song?
What milk does a coward make?
There are so many obnoxious people in the world, but do you know who really drives me to drink?
What do you call a fat black person?
what do you get when you cross a mountain climber and an elephant?
Why did a lightbulb in the candy store go out?
What's a difference between a oral and a rectal thermometer?
What did the cheese say to its reflection?
Do you know how to spot a clickbait?
How many graduate students does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
[religion]What's the difference between Jezus and a picture of Jezus?
What do you call a 5 year old without any friend?
What's the difference between Colin Kaepernick and a martyr?
Excuse me, are you interested in courses on ancient Egypt?
How can you tell when a singer is trying to get into their house?
What's Hitler's favorite letter?
How was school today ??
How can you make gay people curious?
What happens when you have 3 cigarettes on a boat and you throw one off?
Why can't children watch pirate movies?
Did you hear about that guy who was in an accident and lost his left-side?
How many tropical Birds Does it take to Screw in a Lightbulb?
What kind of music do wind turbines listen to?
What do you call a bunch of liberals protesting the second amendment?
Have you heard about the Trump supporter who went to college?
Who's bigger, Mr. Bigger or Mr. Bigger's baby daughter?
Would you pass the tea?
If piss comes from my bladder and semen comes from my balls, what comes from my finger?
Hey dude, what do you cut down a tree with?
What's a gay man's favorite part of Cape Cod?
What is the difference between Bill Clinton and Bill Cosby?
If an ant smells bad, what is it called?
Why do police in the US carry a tazer and pepper spray?
What's the difference between a teacher and a train?
Why do you not play Uno with Mexicans?
How do lesbians cut their clothes?
What do you do when an epileptic is having a seizure in the bathtub?
Did you hear about the millennial pharmacist that got fired?
What do you say to a soldier who doesn't turn up for Camouflage training?
What do you call a homosexual Muslim man in space?
What's another word for double-dating?
Why is leather armour the best for sneaking?
Did you hear about the guy with a premature ejaculation problem?
Did you know that Princess Diana was on her cell phone when she died?
How do you know your wife is dead?
Why do some people cough alot?
Why aren't you studying, Billy?
How do you confuse an idiot?
What crime do trans gender people commit?
little son knows How to scare parents?
Wife: Do you want to tap us?
Why are elephants big, grey, and wrinkley?
[religion] Why did Jesus die on the cross?
Did you know cows and moose are related?
How can you tell if someone is schizophrenic?
What happens when i find a good joke?
If George Washington Carver became a teacher, what would his nickname be?
What is strong enough for a man but made for a woman?
What's the difference between a school and an ISIS training camp?
What do you call a bikini clad conspiracy theorist?
What did Batman say to Robin before getting into the car?
What do you call a cat that has boils on its skin and can't feel it's toes?
What's the best thing about Sweden?
What's a pedophile's favorite weather phenomenon?
What's your favourite animal?
What's the difference between a Zippo and a Bic lighter?
What did the natives say when they discovered a Yeti living amongst them in their village?
What did the watermelon say to the honeydew?
Why was the priest also an imam?
What brand of underwear did Jesus wear?
What's your mom's favorite seafood resturant?
Whats the difference between a murder and Hamlet performed by geese?
Why didn't Ann Frank finish her diary?
Why does Jew population suffer more from ADHD ?
How does a grizzly catch fish?
what's the difference between Donald trump and road kill?
What do you call a 58 year old man that has sex with a 9 year old girl?
How many Vietnam vets does it take to change a light bulb?
How much do pirates charge for corn?
hi What did the failed Swedish chef say?
Which rock band always wash their hands before a concert?
What do you call it when Batman skips Church?
What's the difference between jelly and jam?
What's something a white person says a lot, but a black person never says?
Do you have a brother named Humphrey?
What do you call a stupid kid in pre-school?
What kind of music venues do gun lovers like the most?
What's the best way to carve wood?
Why did the mexican girl get pregnant?
Why can't Jesus eat M&Ms?
Which profession has the worst sense of humour?
How high can you kick a baby?
Why did the faucet turn on?
What's the difference between Chris Christie and Ivanka Trump submissively bent over Donald's bed?
Why did Barty Crouch Jr. quit drinking?
how many /r/jokes user does it take to repost a joke?
What do you call a gorilla in water?
What do you get if you microwave welsh horse crap?
What's you experience with "Friends with benefits"?
What is Jose Cuervo's favorite book?
What's Harambe's favourite retail store?
What do you call four black guys hanging in a barn?
What's blue and hangs from a tree in my yard?
What do you call an obese suicide bomber?
what does Geico and your girlfriend have in common?
Why don't ghosts have legs?
Why didn't Jesus have any children?
Want to be moved for free?
What did the cholo say when two houses fell on top of him?
Why don't blind people skydive?
What do you call a hookers fart?
Did you guys hear that Republicans are trying to end racism?
What's the difference between a chick pea and a potato?
How do you know you're on the phone with a meth head?
What's black, cheap, and not worth a damn?
What is a guy with multi-tasking called?
What do you call a meeting exclusively attended by pine, juniper and fir trees?
What did the pirate say on his eightieth birthday?
How are children like cellphones?
Why cant train drivers be sentenced to the electric chair?
What did you do in Iran?
How many /r/Jokes users does it take to make a Joke?
Why is an aborted baby so hard to fool?
Why did everyone turn away when the race car drove past?
What do you call someone who is attracted to Middle Easterns?
What did the American biscuit say to the British biscuit?
What's the difference between a man falling from 100ft and a man falling from 10ft ?
What do you call a Samsung 7 user taking a selfie?
What's the difference between a 4chan user and a Cuck?
Why did the blonde tie magnets to her fishing pole?
What do you call a vegetarian with diarrhea?
What do you call a place where a black person sleeps?
How often to wizard journalists get paid?
Did you know light travels faster than sound?
How do you communicate with a fish?
Why can't a Samsung be disguised as an iPhone?
How to piss off the whole r/Jokes community?
What's a paedophile's favourite musical scale?
What's grey and comes in pints?
Why did Tim Cook fire an unpaid intern lately?
What does Miley Cyrus eat on Thanksgiving?
What do the Japanese do during erections?
What triggers feminists?
How much does it cost to kill Tony Stark's parents?
What is the difference between Trump and Hillary?
What do you call Nicky Minaj's ass?
What do you call 2 horses side by side in a stable?
What's the best thing about banging 28 year olds?
What's the difference between a drummer and a toilet?
What do you call a brain surgeon that had a C- average?
What do Reddit Users and Olive Oil have in common?
Why didn't George like driving through tunnels with people in his car?
Why is Mortal Kombat X popular among SJWs?
What do you call a former member of ISIS?
What's big but small?
Ever notice how there's not many jokes about steaks?
How does a coat steal something?
Did you hear that Hillary dropped out of the presidential race?
What did drunk say to the blonde?
Why is the Flying Spaghetti Monster made out of pasta?
What did the tool box say to the hammer?
How does a feminist change a light-bulb?
Why is Papyrus taller then Sans?
Whats an inmates favorite vegetable?
Why don't robots have brothers?
How many cops does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
Why are there no black CIA agents?
Why wasn't Jesus born in the USA?
What's a redditors worst fear?
What do you call three potassiums?
What do you call 'looking for a Korean'?
Dad: Son, where were you at school hours?
How does Moses get his tea ready?
Why is Steam called Steam?
How come I didn't get upset when the Indian restaurant got my order wrong?
How do you save a pirate's life?
What's the best way to kill your Mother-in-law?
Did you know?
When’s the worst time to eat candy?
Interviewer: How would you handle a complaint from a customer?
What do T-Rex's do for a living?
What was Hitler's favorite animal?
Who was the first striker?
Why can Kylie Jenner see right through Caitlin?
What happens to a necrophiliac after death?
How does a Marxist jack off?
Did you know you can't watch porn on the IPhone 7?
What's the most frustrating part about being a sheep farmer?
What do you call it when Harrison Ford gets heatburn?
What was Michael Jackson's favourite musical key?
What does a girl want more than anything in the world?
What's the best way to get gum out of your hair?
Did you hear that Trump said he'd eliminate food safety regulations?
What's the difference between a mixologist and a bartender?
What does Pikachu say when he puts too much salsa on his food?
You guys hear about the new corduroy pillows?
What does the chicken do to get through college?
What sound does a street sweeper make?
If a physicist named Lebowski discovered a particle, what would it be called?
Who sell the products cheaper – a manufacturer or a distributor?
Why did the iPhone 7 cross the road?
What do women and computers have in common?
What does the Rose iphone 7 and the Titanic have in common?
Why are hurricanes named with female names?
What do seal hunters and teens have in common?
Why do telescopes like the Moon so much?
What do you call the belief that one kind of shoe is better than another?
What did one cell say to his sister cell who stepped on his toe?
What do you call a folder of child pornography?
Why do Muslim women not say amen?
What do you call a very small villain?
Which rock band has 4 people but doesn't make music?
What mathematical cube can you cook with?
What's the difference between a prostitute and a drug addict?
What is a businessman's favorite game?
What is ez to cook?
What do you call a dog who can do magic?
Why did the fox cross the road?
How many Donald Trumps does it take to screw in a light bulb?
You know how some dogs turn around several times before lying down and going to sleep?
Where's the loneliest place on earth at?
What happens when you mix human DNA with goat DNA?
What does R. Kelly tell little girls on Halloween?
What do you call the moisture build-up between two cousins having sex?
Have you tried the new Mountain Dew flavor?
What is the difference between Hillary Clinton and the hookers in downtown Little Rock?
Where does Dracula keep his tools?
Why don't DJs make good pirates?
What's the difference between a northern fairytale and a southern fairytale?
What is a fitting name for an arrogant mohel?
What do you call a blind deer?
What options does an abortionist have to get ashore?
Which wrestler's weakness is the rain?
Why did the JavaScript programmer need glasses?
Want to hear a bad knock knock joke?
What is it called when you buy drapes over the phone?
What do a gynecologist and a pizza delivery boy have in common?
If pro is the opposite of con.. Then what is the opposite of progress?
Why did the old lady fall into the well?
The worst mix of diseases?
What did the Spanish Gorilla say at lunch time?
Why did Donald Trump love the new iPhone 7?
What do you call a Blonde in the dirt?
How I get my dick to be 12 inches?
What do you call a submissive who likes to bark like a dog?
Why couldn't the pirate learn the alphabet?
Wanna hear why I love Dorian Gray jokes?
Why didnt the toilet paper cross the road?
Whats the worst thing to hear when you have explosive diarrhea?
What did the tv say to the other tv?
Why do Americans order their dates Month/Day/Year?
Groaner I came up with, my apologies. Why did the dog go to the funeral?
How do you fit 4 gay people on a barstool?
What's the difference between a chick pea and a lentil?
What did Abe Lincoln say after a night of drinking?
Why didn't the triangle go outside to get a tan?
What is Hitler's favourite hobby??
Why aren't anal sex jokes funny?
Do cannibals prefer red or white wine with dinner?
What is a Jewish pedophiles pickup line?
What's a whale's favourite brand of hair gel?
What do you call a fly with no wings?
Why did the riot police get to work early?
What do call a cup when drank from by a married woman?
Did you hear the joke about the pencil?
What did the lighter color shade tell to its dark lover?
What do Indian Flowers grow?
What do you call promoting a broom to the highest rank in the military?
What do you call an idiot?
What did the Pimp say to the stoned prostitute at the end of the night?
How are vegans okay with drinking water?
Why is camping considered an intense sport?
Who's the healthiest member of the Army?
What's Mario's favorite fruit?
What do a bungee jump and a hooker have in common?
Did you hear about Dr. Dank?
Why was the communist arrested?
What do you call Harper Lee's Mexican flying animal?
What do you get when toss a hand grenade into a French kitchen?
Did you hear about the guy who wanted to be reincarnated as a stud?
Which internet search engine does Chandler from Friends use?
What does an English pimp do, after having tea and crumpets?
What's the difference between Sammy and Scooby-Doo?
How did the sperm cross the road?
What is bigfoots favorite thing to eat?
have you seen the clown that hides from arseholes in asda?
What's the definition of divorce?
What is Bruce Lee's favorite food?
What did Hillary Clinton's running mate say when reporters asked him his name?
What machine do you need to make a girl fall in love with you ?
Why was the Taiwanese business man so stressed out?
Why are there walls around a cemetery?
What's Hillary Clinton's favorite pizza place?
What's the difference between a tuna, a piano, and some glue?
What did one eyeball say to the other?
Does your mom work at McDonald's?
Have you been to the two shop oddities market?
Why do they want to relocate the Sistine chapel in Boston?
How does a black mother tell her children apart?
how do you know a Ethiopian beens drinking?
What's a bigamist?
What do you call a Muslim flying a plane?
How do you tell two witches apart?
What's the number one comeback on r/Jokes?
Do you know why single women cant fart?
What does Mike Tyson do after 10pm?
Did anyone else hear about that horror style remake Scotland did of "Sleepless in Seattle"?
Why do midgets giggle when running through a field?
What's the difference between a baloon and a condom?
Why doesn't Smokey the Bear have sex with his wife?
How many dead hookers does it take to replace a light bulb?
What's the most insensitive nickname you can give a person with diabetes?
What happens if Hillary Clinton gets so sick she dies before the general election?
What's the best part about dating a black girl?
How was copper wire invented?
Why are Jedi kids so fat?
Why are some of the richest people also the fattest?
How come Chinese people dont have phone books?
Why did Jesus stop playing hockey?
When do you REALLY know you need to break up with you GF?
Whats a Joke with no Punchline?
What did Hillary have for lunch the other day?
What did the mermaid forget to bring to the maths lesson?
Did you hear about the sequel to Schindler's List set after his death?
Why couldn't Oscar save the Greek Jewish Popodopolous brothers suring the war?
Baby are you on the waiver wire?
Why did the farmer win an award?
What do Starbucks customers that can't go through the drive thru get on their pumpkin spice latte?
What do you call a pig on the Beach?
Did you know that dogs can't get MRI's?
Why did the old lady fall in the well?
What did the super-strong chlorella ask the moderately-weak chlorella?
Did you hear about the 120-pound guy with the 60-pound ballsack?
What does Tim Cook have for breakfast in the morning?
What's the difference between a Warlock and a Sorcerer?
What's the name of the elite hacking group from Canada?
Why was Jack scared?
How does a paralympian call home, after winning a medal?
How do you organize a party in space?
Who else have gone through this Sarcasm?
Why is a miscarriage like a shitty pizza?
How do Mexicans cut their pizza?
What is the best pickup line for Rwandans?
What kind of gardening is done in the hood?
What do you call a boy with no arms and legs in the middle of the ocean?
What's the best pokemon in pokemon go?
What is the design philosophy of the iPhone 7?
You know what's the common thing between iPhone 7 and the board on Titanic?
What's the difference between a redneck, and a SJW?
How do you get a fire started?
What do you call a steak that is a girl?
What do you call a Jamaican proctologist?
What's your view on lesbians?
What's red and invisible?
What's Trump's least favourite vegetable?
Notice anything?
Do you know the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
What advice would you give to a fish?
How do you say constipated in german?
What do you call a lazy kangaroo?
What is the skin on you forearm called?
Why are NASCAR drivers good at cunnilingus?
Why did the video of the eighth note get taken off of youtube?
A kid asks his dad, "what's the difference between 'realistically' and 'potentially'"?
Why did Joey fall of the swing?
Did you hear about the priest that got knighted?
What do you call a gay drive-by?
What does it take to start a rave in Ethiopia?
You know that problem people have where they eat whatever is in front of them?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl urinate?
If a kiss is first base, and making love is a home run, what do you call a threesome?
Why does ACDC prefer Android to Apple?
Is sex work?
Why would I donate £2 to save a kid's life?
What do you call two gay Irishmen?
Why couldn't Hillary Clinton keep up her US presidential campaign?
What's al Qaeda's favorite football team?
What did the math teacher tree say to the music teacher tree?
What did the grape say when the elephant stepped on it?
Why don't snakes have legs?
What's the difference between being hungry and horny?
Is the world manichean or relativist ?
What's the weather like in Iraq ?
What do you call a Jewish Ginger?
Why was William killed when he entered the army?
Why did the farmer's bucket keep singing songs?
What do you call a prude's bra?
What did the grocery clerk say when he bumped his head when he was in the freezer?
Why do Americans suck at Dota 2?
Why was Heisenberg's wife unhappy?
What do you call someone who hangs out with musicians?
Did you hear Kim Jong Un banned sarcasm?
How do I invest in the Umbrella Corporation?
What do you call the boyfriend of a beheaded prositute?
How many Vietnam veterans does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Patrick's girlfriend have to go to the doctor?
What was the last pizza order at the Twin Towers?
Why was the fish swimming alone?
What do you call LeVar Burton that survived months of being lost in the wilderness?
Why don't atheists use exponents?
Did you guys hear the joke about the stunt man's flame?
How do Muslims laugh?
Why is the US terrible at league of legends?
Is it okay to post Islam jokes?
What Saudi funded event ended in a massive collapse on 9/11?
What's funnier than a dead baby?
What do Hillary Clinton and the World Trade Center have in common?
Why did the baby cross the road?
Why are the twin towers and genders so similar?
What do you call a 53 year old who has sex with a 9 year old?
What was the first thing Adam said to Eve?
How does the leper give directions?
What's incredibly fast and smells like curry?
What does toilet paper and office paper have in common?
What has 4 legs but cant move?
What do you call two Chinese government massacres?
What was Osama Bin Laden's name before he was killed?
What do you call a guy with no shins?
What was the last thing going through the minds of the 9/11 jumpers before they died?
Why should men not engage in esports while horny?
What's the difference between a cow and 9/11?
Why are 9/11 victims the best readers?
What do you call fans of the new iPhone 7?
Why did God create man?
What's the difference between a everyone and a bullet?
Why did the Stormtrooper buy an iPhone?
You know when you get that urge to eat something just because it's there?
What did the troll say to the new user who accidentally made a repost?
What's a the number one cause of death for birds?
Why do I watch the Cosby show?
What do Japanese people do during an erection?
What’s the difference between ignorance and apathy?
Whale you be my Valentine?
Why would 12:00 make the best cop?
What is Apple's favorite song?
How many ants does it take to fill an apartment?
Is it possible for God to be a Cheeto Puffed?
What do you call a smart guy in US?
Why isn’t suntanning an Olympic sport?
What does a stegosaurus eat off of?
How did the nervous female organ that was going to Hollywood feel?
Interviewer: What hobbies do you have outside of school?
Did you see planet of the apes?
What's the most popular sports channel in Mexico?
How do you make five pounds of fat fun?
How does Greenland win a war?
Which weighs more, a 100 pounds of gold or a 100 pounds of feathers?
Did you hear about the Irishman that was attacked by a carpenter?
What did the door say to the other door?
Why can't you tell jokes to kleptomaniacs?
Why is a baker's dozen 13 instead of 12?
What's the difference between 9/11 and a cow?
What food makes women stop having sex?
what's the difference between an alcoholic and a junkie?
What's the difference between Bill Clinton and a Bonobo Monkey?
Why did the kids not receive presents for Christmas?
What do Indian girls have at sleepovers?
Did you know that our number system is from the Arabians?
Why do all black men have nightmares?
What do you call a band of unlucky politicians?
9/11 Who?
How does my vegetarian girlfriend get her source of protein?
What's the deal with black people?
What's the difference between a Mercedes and Princess Diana?
Why did the geologist get divorced?
Did you hear about the rabbit with OCD?
Why was the photo acquitted in his trial at court?
What do you call a radio that walks?
What's the hardest part when watching a toddler burn to death?
What does snowman say to the other snowman?
Who do you call during a Zika virus emergency?
WHAT DO WE WANT!?
What does Iphone7 and spermbank have in common?
How did you sleep?
What do KKK and intensive training have in common?
What is a heroin addict's favorite website?
Did you hear about that poor gymnast's bank account?
Did you hear about the man that had his entire left side cut off?
What did the muslim say to the other muslim when they were surfing?
What's it called when you make sure you don't spill the wine?
Where do bloods never want to get buried?
Have you heard about the humble farmer?
Why did Apple employee get away jacking off in the office?
What do you call a bad Russian pool player?
What do you call a fat psychic?
What did the Apple Phone designer do when he got home?
How many Android users does it take to buy an iPhone?
That's the difference between tech support and a mass shooter?
Why was Napoleon's last name Bonaparte?
What kind of shrimp does Chris Brown like?
What's the difference between a black man and Batman?
What did the ISIS leader gift to all his followers?
What did the PEE CLUB SOCIETY said to me on the taster session?
What do Twitter users and regular humans have in common?
Why do Apples new headphones look like tampons?
What happens when you offend a professor of various human aspects?
Why did the chicken lock itself in the freezer?
Why cant Schizophrenics be alcoholics?
Why is it so hard for men to get on Christian Mingle?
Why are Americans bad at chess?
What does a boat have in common with a ballsack?
What did the optimistic cancer patient say about his tumor?
What happens to Germans when they eat too many lemons?
What's got two legs, spots and bleeds?
How Many Friendzoned Guys Does It Take To Change A Lightbulb?
What do Apple and Titanic have in common?
Why are leprechauns always laughing?
How did the serpent tempt Eve to eat the apple ?
What do a d20 and my penis have in common?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the difference between a Snowman and a Snowwoman?
What does it mean when a man is in your bed gasping for breath and calling your name?
How does a bimbo commit suicide?
Why are there so many female archaeologists?
What has eight arms and an IQ of 60?
Why doesn't Texas float away into the Gulf of Mexico?
What's the difference between an epileptic corn farmer and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What do you call a potato in space?
What did Samsung say to Apple?
What do you call a Microbiologist who travels the world?
What does a gay orgy sound like?
Can a human outrun a Cheetah?
What's the difference between the people and bullets?
What do you call an essay in a flash drive???
Why aren't there any feminists in Japan?
Hillary and Trump crash in a plane, who survives?
What's the most surprising advancement in tech?
What are facts about canines we must believe?
How does Donald Trump screw in a light bulb?
Why did the gay man take two aspirin with his Viagra?
What's the difference between E.T and illegal immigrants?
How does a feminist kill a spider?
How many optometrists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why are the new iPhones so skinny?
Why do ghosts get invited to parties?
How many monkeys does it take to write a Shakespeare novel by accident?
What do you say to give an electrician encouragement?
Did you hear about the paperboy who used to masturbate on the job?
Have you ever had hemorrhoids?
How many Hillary Clinton fans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Hilary Clinton and Donald Trump are on a deserted island. Who survives?
What do you get when you're sick in Italy?
How do you fit 20 Jews in a car?
How do you make Hitler cry?
what's the difference between an epileptic corn husker, and a hooked with diarrhea?
How do you find a blind guy on a nude beach?
How do you keep idiots waiting?
What do you call a bond...?
What do Greek teenagers say?
Why did Boba Fett work alone?
What did the lactose intolerant guy say after having a glass of milk?
What do you call a can made in Mexico?
How does a muslim man close a door?
What does a feminist and a landmine have in common?
What superhero consists of only 16 atoms?
Why are there no headache pills in Troy?
How do you know that you're a peaceful country?
What do you call a small black person?
What's the difference between humans and bullets?
What do you call two bobs that are sexually related?
Have you ever heard the joke about the three wells?
What do you call a Messiah that enjoys pain?
How can you tell a dark chocolate bar is male?
How did the english teacher know his student was pregnant?
What's the worst thing about being a black jew?
If anger from hunger is called "hanger", what is sadness called?
what do you call an alligator in a vest?
Why do donuts have holes in the center?
What does Ukraine have in common with the iPhone 7?
Where's is Shaq's appearance most terrifying?
3 men in a boat with 4 cigarettes but no way to light them. What do they do?
Why do midgets always fight?
How many stream cleaners does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the donut go to the dentist?
What do you call a Chinese billionaire?
Is There a War?
How do you break a blondes nose?
What does 7-11 have in common with women?
How many IT professionals does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you do when you see a Flock of Seagulls?
What's the difference between Paul Walker and my computer?
What do you call a garbage man who kidnaps women?
What did the uncle give his 9 year old, blind and deaf niece for her birthday?
What's the difference between a golf ball and a G spot?
What's worse than having ants in your pants?
Do you suffer under post traumatic stress disorder and panic attacks?
What did Cinderella do when she got to the ball?
Why are there so many female archeologists?
You realize that Islam is a religion of peace right??
How do you take a Mexican family portrait?
What are golfers afraid of?
How do you cook a deer?
When Chris brought over his musl*m girlfriend to meet the family, what did they say?
What did the failed suicide bomber say when he was being hauled away by the police?
What do you do if a bird shits on your windscreen?
Why was the man arrested for having his skin flute played?
What's the difference between fighting on the internet and participating in the paralympics?
Hey guys do you believe in the Zodiac?
Did you hear about the drug dealer with arthritis?
How do you get a Jewish girl's number?
What's the difference between a ginger girl and a vampire?
What do you call a Jewish Pokemon trainer?
Did you hear about the kidnapping?
Interviewer: Where were you born?
What do you call a black woman who has had 8 abortions?
Did you hear about the new LSU Visa card coming out?
On which side of the road do you drive?
Who is a Chinese feminist's least favorite Winnie the Pooh character?
Do you know who cries the most during the end of Titanic?
What's the difference between a feminist and Brexit?
What did the letter O say to the letter Q?
What is Sean Murray's favorite song ?
British Bake-Off?
How many guys in the Friendzone does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do pizzas and parents have in common?
How does an angry Muslim close the door?
Student: Could I be trouble for something I didn't do?
Who is Superman's brother?
Why did man invent curling?
whats the score when 10 mexicans shoot 10 black men?
Why isn't Hitler invited to any barbecues?
What do you call a confused Asian?
Does anyone else have a really hard time having a conversation on a carousel?
Charlie has 3 chocolates in the morning and 8 chocolates at night, what does he have?
If you could have a Dodge Viper or the girl of your dreams, what colour would it be?
What does a redditor say when they see a YouTube link they can't click on?
Why are french rifles always in great condition?
How many PETA members does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did Beyoncé sing "to the left, to the left"?
What does an Internet frog say?
What's Cain's favorite genre of music?
What do you call an Asian man with one leg?
What's the difference between a gay guy and a freezer?
What do you call two homeless people hitting each other with garbage bags?
Do you have eggs for breakfast?
Why is Donald Trump investing in cloning, choirs, aviaries, and bakeries?
How many feminists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How does Stephen Hawking commit suicide?
How do you kill a weightlifting ostrich?
What do you call a slutty horse?
What do you call a fart from Donald Trump?
What do you call a city full of neckbeards?
Did you hear ab the cat who climbed the tree outside the bank?
What's the difference between an Indian chef and a politician?
Whats the difference between a Windows computer and My penis?
Why does the nudist always go to bed early?
What did Peyton say to his younger brother when he didn't understand him?
Why does Missouri share borders with the most amount of States?
What is a redditor's best character in Super Smash Brothers?
Who wants to hear a joke about potassium?
Do clickbaits really work?
How much did the pirate pay for corn?
How did Zarathustra introduce his peanut-based health drink?
What do computers and reincarnation have in common?
What does the physicist have to eat when he goes to the pub?
What's the difference between bullets and people?
What do you call a black rapper with no future?
What does AIDS stand for?
What do you call a large group of tan and black dogs passing through Deutschland?
My opinion on mediums where ideas and views on a particular issue can be exchanged?
What do you call a black abortion clinic?
What do you call a person who's happy on a Monday?
What's white on top and black on the bottom?
How do you spot a blind guy in a nudist colony?
What’s the difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
Why is Dick short for Richard?
What do all men at single's bars have in common?
What is a blonde's favorite vegetable?
Planning on using a last generation CPU for your PC build?
What's the quickest way to kill 100 Mexicans?
What does the earth say to the moon during a solar eclipse?
What do kazoos and my father have in common?
How did Henry V reload his rifle?
Did Trump make the right choice when choosing his VP?
Girl, are you an HM move?
What's the difference between a baby and a sandwich?
What does the internet need to take when its constipated?
What do you call a Jewish pokemon trainer?
How do you get to a position of power in a science lab?
What do you call a war between two cannibal tribes?
How do you see if the Ken doll is ticklish?
What does an egg say when it's drunk?
What do you call someone who blows himself up by accident?
Did you know there is a species of antelope capable of jumping higher than the average house?
Want to hear a joke about pizza?
What's the motto for Child Protective Services?
What do you get an undertaker for a wedding gift?
Why is Max always late?
What's the difference between Iron Man And Iron Woman?
Why are gay men so well dressed?
What happens when a rock gets high?
Want to hear a joke about construction?
Who makes the music for the Marvel movies?
Why did Helen Keller only masturbate with one hand?
Why can't you email a photo to a Jedi?
Did you hear about the dyslexic, agnostic, insomniac?
What's life like with alchohol?
What's a tents favorite kind of meat?
What's the difference between racism and asians?
What's a horses favourite condiment?
why does the official Reddit app aways crash?
What do you call violence in the kitchen?
Did you hear about the contortionist who filed for bankruptcy?
What's the difference between a Goodyear tire and 365 condoms?
What was the philosopher's last thought before he descended into quicksand?
Don't you hate it when you already know the flow of the joke?
Why are Samsung phones so popular?
How do Medieval sheep protest prisons?
What's the difference between an arts graduate and a pizza?
What's the best part about dating a homeless women?
What kind of mic did Kurt Cobain use?
What do you call a magic owl?
What personal question is not obvious yet nobody has ever needed to ask anyone?
What do you call it when you paid all your bills?
Did you guys hear about the kidnapping?
Do you know where russians get their milk?
What is the difference between ignorance and apathy?
Why did nobody want to be around Hitler?
Why did the feminist fail in programming?
What's the best version of Microsoft Office?
What do you call it when someone leaves at the first sign of a hurricane?
What is condemned and overused yet as inescapable as a black hole?
France and Italy Go to War. Who Wins?
What do you call an unsweetened, kosher lemonade?
What's Obama's favorite word?
What do you call a huge pair of tits you want to see but never get a chance to?
Why are there so many Redditor archeologists?
What do you get if you cross a river with a bridge?
What does Tammy Wynette do to beat the heat?
What's better than winning a gold medal at the Special Olympics?
What do you do in a master bathroom?
What do you call the security at a Samsung store?
How can you tell if a Canadian is an existentialist?
[Game of Thrones] How do you ask a Northerner if they are of noble descent?
Where is Engagement, Ohio?
Who do you call if Everlast is having a heart attack?
How did the grandpa get rid of his sweet tooth?
Where does a redditor's slutty girlfriend hide her other boyfriend?
What did the pirate say when he was accepted into flight school?
How many Jews fit in a car?
What's a mailman's favorite country?
Who won the first Tour de France?
What did Hitler say to his annoying friend?
What's a Monk's favorite breakfast food?
What do you call a gay Eskimo ?
Why is a beer like a woman?
Why were there so many Hawaiian lei's at the funeral?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton and were in a fatal car crash, who survives?
What is the longest word in the English language?
What goes in God's Toilet?
What PC does Adele use?
What do the twin towers and gender have in common?
Whats the difference between a guy who has a new Mercedes and a guy who has an old Mercedes?
Did you hear about the drunken idiot who flew into a black hole?
Why did the French police arrested the Muslim teenager?
Does a Priest have a wife?
What is Samsung's next Note series phone after Note 7?
How do you make a baker cry?
What is Michael Bay's favorite phone?
Would you have sex with an alien?
What's the difference between ignorance and apathy?
What's the difference between a blonde and a mosquito?
Why is Donald Trump like a college football team in Tijuana?
Why should we make Gabe Newell president?
Why doesn't Mexico have an Olympic team?
What do you get when you put a number 1 and a number 2 on your calculator?
What did the animal control officer ask the Hawaiian dancer?
What does a guy with a big dick have for breakfast?
How do you piss of female archaeologists?
Do you know what my name is?
Have you ever had Ethiopian food?
How many Pollyanna's does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do Betty Rubble and Fort Knox have in common?
What happens when a fork and a spoon get into a fight?
Why didn't the lifeguard save the hippie?
What's does a photon and Donald Trump have in common?
What did the asteroid say when his trajectory missed earth?
What do houses eat when their breath stinks?
What did the pastor say when informing two fruits that they couldn't marry?
How do you catch a terminator?
[OC] What do you call a rodent that sells illegal guns?
Why is Donald Trump's wig so expensive?
When ghosts attend a sex party, what is their favourite group activity?
How did Bourne send data to the CIA?
What's the difference between a hippo and a Zippo?
what do you call an unqualified baffoon with an incoherent agenda?
How do you know someone is good at gaming?
Where did all hookers come from?
When do you know a kid has grown up?
Why did the blonde have bruises around her belly button?
What do you get when you cross Henry VIII and Vlad the Impaler?
What's the difference between a truck full of marbles and a truck full of babies?
What's the difference between a stoat and a weasel?
What does a gay horse eat?
What do you call a whore that actually moans?
Why did Sally drop her ice cream?
What's the difference between Trump and a pile of shit?
Why are cemeteries surrounded with walls?
What did the zombie farmer say he wanted?
Why is Pokemon quite realistic?
What is a pirates nightmare date?
What hangs at a man's thigh and wants to poke holes that it's often poked before?
Why do pirates love football so much?
What can a man do that is physically impossible for women to accomplish?
What's the last thing that goes through a bugs mind when it hits your windshield?
Why can't Hellen Keller drive?
What do you call a trucker that doesn't drive anymore?
How do you piss off a Hun?
What did the undergrad title his paper about the philosophy of pornography?
Why are volcanoes mischievous?
Do you remember that episode of The Lone Ranger where Tonto got Alzheimer's?
What do you call a dwarf that was on fire?
Why is Texas the "Lone Star" state?
Why did the one-armed man cross the road?
What did the girl with no hands get for her birthday?
What animal has five legs?
Why was Freud a bad poker player?
What's green and red?
What is the meaning of life?
What did the little black kid say when he had diarrhea?
What do tampons and renaissance art have in common?
What's 10 inches long and white?
What's black, jobless, homeless, fatherless, and has no life?
What did one saggy boob say to the other saggy boob?
Why did they kill Harambe?
How Were People Born?
What did the the dad say to the feminist?
What's the only mammal that can breathe under ice?
Why are sloths so green?
Have you ever been to New York?
What does a flower in a race car yell?
Why did Helen Keller's dog kill itself?
What did the Windows user say to his Linux terminal?
How do you offend a bald guy?
What do you call a mexican who is thankful to be sitting out in a field?
What's the water polo team's favorite song?
Why did the dolphin apologize?
What's Chris Brown's favourite drink?
What is the best part of an ISIS joke?
How many nice guys does it take to screw a lightbulb?
What's the integral of 1/(cabin)?
What crime did the man get charged with when he killed a black man?
What's the difference between a weatherman and a well-hung dick doctor?
Are you a pacifist?
what do you call a Muslim with no legs?
What's cooler than being cool?
How do you annoy a computer person with a problem?
How many non-binary gender-fluent people does it take to change an LED lightbulb?
What is the internal temperature of a tauntaun?
Guess What?
How do chickens have sex?
What do dark jokes and food have in common?
Whats the difference between Genders and The Twin Towers?
What do you call a coupon at Taco Bell?
Did you hear what happened to Lithium?
What did the O say to the Q?
The difference between BLM and the KKK?
Why would Donald Trump want to lose the election?
Why does the town pound keep animals in separate cages?
Why would Diana have made a good Queen?
What did Jessie say to Buzz after the condom broke?
Mixologists, bartenders, how to make a smoky manhattan?
Why did the chicken cross the playground?
What is black and when it falls, your heater is broken?
Did you hear about the guy who got hit on the head with a can of soda?
What do you call a British guy who throws a spear through the knee?
What did the Ottoman Sultan do when he got home from campaigning?
What is better than 10 dead babies in a trashcan?
How do you troll an archaeologist?
What's the difference between a penalty shot in basketball, and a tiny curly wig designed for a bug?
Did you hear about the mathematician who became a monk?
What do you call a pessimistic horse?
What do you call a server at a funeral?
What is the difference between a chickpea and a garbanzo bean?
What is Michelle Obama's favorite vegetable?
What is Al Shabaab's theme song?
What do you call a fish that makes you an offer you can’t refuse?
What happened after 14-Year-Old Richie inherited his father's footwear empire?
What did Bill Clinton say to Monica Lewinsky after getting caught?
Why did the feminist's bakery go out of business?
Why shouldn't you tell a pirate your secrets?
Why doesn't a sociologist look out the window in the morning?
What do you call a blonde who dyes her hair?
How is /r/jokes like the green movement?
Why does Juan walk around the school like he owns the place?
What do you call a trio of Muslims?
What do you call a Nigerian gorilla?
What's the difference between a vitamin and a hormone?
What do Pink Floyd, Dale Earnhardt, and Donald Trump have in common?
What do you do if a blonde person throws a grenade at you?
How do you know Sia is Scottish?
What's the best thing about dating twenty nine year olds?
How many sexual orientations does a physicist have?
What is Blackbeard and Captain Hooks favorite workout routine?
Why did Star Wars episodes 4, 5 and 6 come before 1, 2 and 3?
What do you call a fraud from North Carolina?
What do you call two Pakistanis in a sleeping bag?
Man Bun? or Douche Knot?
Where does one drown a hipster?
Have a Question about search engines?
What type of alcohol do they put in bomb shots?
Why will America be happier with Trump over Hillary?
What is 19 inches long and makes a woman scream and moan?
How does the motorcycle of a Ku Klux Klan member sounds like?
Why can't Saudi woman drive?
What did Kim Kardashian's right leg say to her left leg?
What’s the difference between a tire and 365 used condoms?
How did the thermal imaging camera warn the mountain-climber?
What's the difference between a terrorist and a feminist?
Why did the Welshman buy so many tampons at the store?
What do you do when you see a space man?
Does Obama have the authority to give away the Internet?
Why does a potato make a great detective?
What's black, white and red all over?
Why don't they play CS:GO in the jungle?
What's fat.. Ugly.. And looks like your girlfriend?
What is the similarity between Steve Job and Robb Stark?
What did Spock find in the toilet of the USS Enterprise?
What would Martin Luther King Jr. be if he was white?
What does a waffle call his complete existential paradigm shift?
What did the flower say when she was begged not to tell a secret?
Why don't you buy drugs from an Emo?
What's a Drummer's favorite food?
Did you hear the winner of the Mime world championships?
What's another word for rape ?
What do you call a body with no nose?
What's the best drug to have sex on?
What's the difference between pedophiles amd acne?
What do fish call a submarine?
Why did the baby system programmer like their new colourful blankie?
What was the psychologist's favorite band?
Where will the 400 pound gorilla sleep?
What should you never do in front of an alcoholic?
What are Gene Wilder and David Bowie getting for Christmas this year?
Why are there so many good jokes about feminists?
How do you say car troubles in German?
What's the difference between the Earth and my sock?
What game should you play to get your mother's attention?
Doctor: Do you smoke?
Whats the difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
How are Harambe memes keeping up?
What did Plaxico Burress say when he read Colin Kaepernick's Tweets?
Why couldn't the NSA whistleblower leave Moscow?
Why did Mozart kill all his chickens?
What happened to the Irishman who tried to blow up a school bus?
how to get jew out of his hole?
If three Florida State football players are in the same car, who is driving?
Where does the pirate shop for his kid for Christmas?
What type of movie does a blind person watch?
Who is Nasir Kahns favorite comedian?
What do you call 2 black people on a bunk bed?
Interviewer: What's your greatest weakness?
Why do black people have nightmares?
What's a Jew's favorite brand of hotdog?
What's the best trade a palindrome has ever made?
Where do butt-pirates have sex?
What happens when a sane person posts on a far right sub and a far left sub?
What's the difference between kinky and perverted ?
What did the gay man say to the straight man who made fun of him for confessing he was gay?
What was the Jew's excuse for hitting her wife?
Joe, why haven't you tossed your hat in the ring for the presidential election?
What's black and brown on the inside and blue and white on the outside?
Why cant asians drive?
Why does Waldo wear stripes?
Why did Vivaldi die poor?
When do you kick a midget in the balls?
Did you hear about the guy in masturbation contest?
Knock Knock Knock!! Who's there?
Why'd the little girls ice-cream melt?
What's the deal with /r/worldnews?
What do you call a Mexican skeleton's favorite drug?
What does a tickle me Elmo get before it leaves the factory?
We all know the rooster calls 'cock-a-doodle-doo', but have you heard the gay rooster call?
What's hit more balls than David Beckham's right foot?
Why did the plumber kill himself?
Why couldn't the motorcycle make it home?
What's green?
What's the difference between astronomy and gastronomy?
There is a new virus which only affects Muslims.Where do they put the infected?
Why do feminist hate the bible?
Why was the feminist happy when the newspaper got it wrong?
Why wasn't the astronaut paying attention?
How do you clear a traffic jam at a banker convention?
What do Jesus and germs have in common?
What did the sniper say to his wife when he came back from work?
What's the difference between Michael Phelps and Hitler?
What did the violin say when it finally played the music correctly?
What's the difference between a virgin and a lightbulb?
What is a gay jew's favourite bank?
Did the depressed rope maker succeed?
What's at the centre of No Man's Sky universe?
How do you stop a dog from screwing your leg?
Why didnt Jesus become a boxer?
Why is women’s soccer so rare?
What do you call it when a white man dancing has a seizure?
Why did the prostitute join the Mormon church?
Why did the Ethiopian child have a frown?
What does a redneck Buddhist believe in?
Why did the cow sign up for TSA precheck?
(Corny)-What do you call a mermaid on a roof?
What does a rock put on when it stinks?
What do you call a nun in a car?
What do you call a hen staring at lettuce?
How are cats like empty wine bottles?
What's Whitney Houston's favourite type of coordination?
What did Kim Jong Un say when his father died?
(Corny)-Why did the grave keeper build a fence around the grave yard?
Did you hear about that new liberal episcopal church?
How can you tell the difference between a catholic, a baptist, and a Methodist?
Did you know that Beethoven had a brother?
Wana hear a joke?
How do you pick up Jewish girls?
What do you call someone who takes things literally?
Jewish joke from the 1970s: What's the fastest thing on earth?
Why do clowns make bad entrepreneurs?
Why did the chicken fall in the well?
Why do Italian men wear gold chains?
What is the difference between everyone and bullets?
How does an Apple Watch owner know that it's midday?
Why did the cow return to the marijuana field?
What's the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scotsman?
What's red and sits in the corner?
What is the volume of a disk with radius z and height a?
Why didn't the circle want to become 3 dimensional?
What do you do if a blonde throws a grenade at you?
What is 2Chainz's favorite TV channel?
To where going Batman running fast?
What's a feminists favorite music festival?
Why Do Kids In High school Take Art?
What do you call a blonde with two brain cells?
What do you call a Russian barber?
How Do Priests Get High?
Did you hear about the Italian husband who was talking during his sleep?
What's Forest Gump's password?
How are Harambe and Hitler similar?
What's the difference between some people and a bucket of shit?
Where's the best place to find a dog with no legs?
What do you call a pair of attractive succubi?
How does an Alabama girl know she’s in for a crazy night?
How do Russian sprinters train?
How do you know that an Asian has robbed your house?
What is Donald Trump's favourite ice cream?
What happened to all the funny chemistry puns?
Why was Joe disappointed when he read the newspaper in Washington?
What's Trump's favorite Olympic sport?
What do you call a Mexican baptism?
When does a hunger strike stop?
What should we call this giant advertising board?
What's the difference between everybody and bullets?
What did Pinocchio say to Rudolph when he asked him what he asked for Christmas?
How many billionaires does it take to make a superhero?
What's the difference between a political speech and a stand-up comic show?
What did the Japanese WWII veteran say to the American WWII veteran when he got passed the salt?
Why do Jewish fathers have their sons circumcised?
What do you call a dinosaur that's in a hurry?
Hey Did you hear about the guy who got fired from the sperm bank?
Why couldn't the black, blind, uneducated toddler read?
What do you call a scam artist who uses his vocabulary to commit crimes?
It's National Dog Day and Women's Equality Day?
How long does it take to reach the ground from 110 stories up?
How many Bros does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a 'shitpost' on twitter?
Why does a bride wear white on her wedding day?
What do you call Batman who skips church?
What do you call a Chinese guy with one leg?
What's matter in reverse?
Did you hear about the man who couldn't stop blowing his "duck call" whistle?
What do cows sit on?
How many hipsters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a farting Russian?
Why was the kettle angry at the pot?
What do /r/jokes and a struggling glue business have in common?
How did the detective solve the case of the missing nun?
What is worse than a dude shooting cum on your floor?
How many software engineers does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the drunk Mexican shoot his wife?
What's the difference between Hitler and Usain Bolt?
Which fruit can't get married?
How many dead schoolgirls does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's worse than a Redditor walking into a bar?
What did the scarecrow say when asked about his job?
What do you call a Fly without any wings?
How do you ruin a joke?
What does a thong and Donald Trump's toupee have in common?
What do you call an angry Reddit mod?
What has 5 legs and a big grin?
What do black men do after sex?
Why can't chinese people have phone directories?
whats Michael Jackson favorite movie genre?
What has 2 legs and bleeds?
Why do women prefer to bang UPS drivers over FedEx drivers?
How does a woman scare a gynecologist?
Why is the sand at the beach Wet?
What do Lumber jacks do in China?
In the Garden of Eden, Eve wore a fig leaf. Do you know what Adam wore?
Son : Dad.... This movie is so scary... Is that woman going to die??
What is the favorite number of french potheads?
Why do Mexican cars have such small steering wheels?
What do you call an overpriced and overhyped game?
Why does Germany have so many different kinds of bread?
Why does the bride wear white?
Where did Saddam Hussein keep all of his CDs?
Why women live longer than men?
Have you heard of the Onono?
Why are there no female Canadians?
What's the difference between my kiwi accent and a white South African accent?
What's the best way to ensure that Asia's senior citizens' pension programs are financially sound?
How did the bad Canadian fisherman describe his only catch of the day?
why did the teenage girl have to be home before dinner?
What do you call a prosthetic arm for a dog?
If Captain America's Shield Is Made Out Out Adamantium, What's Hawkeye's Shield Made Out Of?
What is Donald Trump's favorite style of footwear?
What is the worst thing anyone can do to a blind man?
How many psychiatrists does it take to change a light bulb?
Where do you always find Trans-Fats no matter where you look?
How many Libertarians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Dumb joke I came up with yesterday. What do you call it when two robots miscommunicate?
Why was the guy from 127 Hours arrested for espionage?
What did the cocaine addict say to his drug of choice?
What do you call a trumpet on a leash?
Why was 10 hospitalized?
What do you call a midget psychic on the run from the law?
What's the gayest town in America?
What did the dealer say to Ted when he caught him stealing heroin?
How many Germans does it take to tile a bathroom?
[Racial][Racial] What's the worst thing about being a black jew?
Why did Freud hurt his shoulder?
What did the woman say to the guy in Naval intelligence?
What does a cat in the desert and Christmas have in common?
What happened when Hitler lost his glasses?
Why are bees so rich?
What do you call a cow in a 6 second video?
ISLAM is religion of peace??
What do you call a gay dentist?
What goes above the water and below the water but doesn't touch the water?
Why does Harambe confuse bartenders?
Why couldn't the choir director figure out whether Alison Brie was alto soprano?
What do you call a pig with three eyes ?
Why wasn't the bike starting?
What's brown and rhymes with Snoop?
What did the banana say to the human?
What's the difference between Texas and Russia?
What to Russian Zombie Athletes want?
What did a Mexican take Xanax for?
How much does it cost to buy multiple prosthetic limbs?
What the difference between Australia and a glass of milk?
What concert costs 45 cents?
How does a woman differ from a computer?
What do you call a boxer with allergies?
Did you hear about the happy Roman?
What's Superman's greatest weakness?
What do you call a water fowl looking in a window?
What kind of ideas do blind people get?
What color should I choose?
What do you call a fat lady who bathes in strawberry jam?
What do you call a dog who got re-elected for mayor?
Does anyone want to buy a used Theremin?
What do you call a horny chemist?
How many data wranglers does it take to change a lightbulb?
What kind of knots only exist in space?
Whats the difference between a washing machine and a woman?
Why did Edward miss his flight out of Russia?
What's white at the top and black at the bottom?
Why don't cows drink milk?
What would you call a Street Fighter player who can bust out the Spinning Pile Driver really fast?
What's a jew doing on a swing?
What's black?
What kind of wine causes the most accidents?
What do Dothraki use to count their horses?
Did you see the video of the guy making out with the lady with the Zika Virus?
Did you hear about the Mexican train killer?
How do you tell if Lady Gaga is dead or not?
What do you do when you get into a fight with a group of clowns?
What's the first rule of contradiction club?
What does one call an undertaker that's been drafted into the Military?
How do cats speak to people?
What kind of animal can record video?
Have any of you heard about the magician who was driving home?
What did the fisherman say to the sewage management person?
What's Clifford's favorite gum?
Why was Fam's favorite subject English?
whats the difference in fast n furious and walking dead?
What do you call a pepper in late autumn?
Are you cold?
Have you met Canadian lepers?
Have you ever tried North Korean food?
What's the difference between a pizza and a black man?
How do Singaporean swimmers get educated?
Why did the condom fly out of the room?
What is the difference between a doorknob and a Zika baby's head?
What has an R at the beginning, a T at the end, and EPOS in the middle?
If this post was a Sons of Anarchy episode what character would you be?
What happens to a frogs car when it is parked illegally?
What do you call a web developer who enjoys finding bugs in the system?
What do you call a guy who cries when he masturbates?
Why can't Asians make white babies?
What's the difference between a black guy and a canoe?
What do boobs and toys have in common?
what do you call a guy who cries when he masturbates?
Why did the knight stop using the internet?
What do /r/jokes and the human centipede have in common?
Why is six afraid of seven?
What did the prostitute say to the leper?
How does Bob Marley like his donuts?
What would you call it when an Italian has one arm shorter than the other?
How do you make a honeymoon salad?
Why have no melons ever gotten married in Vegas?
Has anyone ever tried Ethiopian food?
Why does everyone agree when you judge someone's voice?
Why I don't joke about politicians?
Have you guys heard the one about the child with aids?
Have you ever smelled mothballs?
What did MLK say to the fishmonger?
What do you call a school bus full of black people?
What does a North Korean ricochet sound like?
What's better than winning the Paralympic gold medal?
What do you ask a pregnant Rabbi?
Why shouldn't you let the scientists have an antelope?
What Do You Call A Group Of Terrorists That Love to Smoke Weed?
What do you call a dolphin that cheats on his girlfriend?
Why is Bill Gates scared of the number 7?
What do you call a bunch of tractors parked in front of a McDonald's on Friday night in Iowa?
What's the difference between a gay guy and a refrigerator?
What do you call an detective's glasses?
Why can't Jimmy ride his bike?
What does the customer say to the worker as he leaves the store after buying a discounted item?
What's the difference between a catfish and a lawyer?
Why was the redditor banned?
What do you call a 350 pound stripper?
What do Ryan Lochte and the water in Rio have in common?
What do you call a nation of angry women?
What's the difference between a brown noser and a shit head?
What is short, white, and running for president?
Why do pedophiles love pokemon go?
Why was the baby in Africa crying?
What do a mosquito and my ex have in common?
How many computer programmers does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's it called when you apologize using dots and dashes?
How do you circumcise a redneck?
What's a monk's favorite kind of cheese?
Why is Starbuck's coffee so high on the pH scale?
Who's the roundest knight at King Arthur's court?
What was the last thing that went through Paul Walker's mind before he died?
What do you call an unused piano?
Can someone explain why people keep saying this before we about to eat?
What do Jesus and Muhammad have in common?
What's grey and comes in quarts?
What did the mayor say after the townsfolk told him that they used the watering hole to take dumps?
What kind of file do you need to turn a 15mm hole into a 40mm hole?
Hey dad, how do you feel about abortion?
Why should you never trust someone giving away batteries?
What do rhinos and fish have in common?
Why is Ronald McDonalds immortal?
Why did the mathematician get an F on his English quiz?
Why do we never run out of math teachers?
Why did the pedophile buy a guitar?
What do mathematicians call retirement?
Who do you call when your spacebar doesn't work?
Why cant the bike stand on its own?
Q: What did the waitress say to the customer after she forgot his Miso soup?
How long can 7 ride 8?
Why do scuba divers fall backwards off the boat?
How do you keep children from playing in your yard?
What would people call Ryan Lochte if he went to jail?
What does a conspiracy theorist say when he breaks up with someone?
Have you ever played the game where you conceal yourself and change religions?
Did you hear about the American Indian who was in a tea drinking contest?
Did you hear Trump wants to ban shredded cheese?
What's the worst thing to say during a group depression therapy session?
What do you call a sister who works for you?
Hey son, what did you get in math last year?
Why do ants rarely, if ever, get sick?
Did you hear about the ex-porn star who got fired from the gas station?
Q: What's a Michigander?
What happened to the joke that insulted the mods?
What's the difference between a lonely person getting trolled and a wanted sexual offender?
Hey girl, are you a 10?
What's the difference between your mom and my computer?
What does your computer and your mom have in common?
Is your fridge running?
Why did the very religious man not say a word while he was fasting?
You know what I find odd?
What's something that's true, real and lives in the dirty south?
Why'd the window get the job?
What do you call someone from Olomouc who's living on the dole?
What's a porn star's favorite song?
What do you call a religious cow in the Middle East?
What do you call an alligator wearing a vest?
Why didn't the skeleton go to the party?
What did Borg say to Georg Ohm?
What is heavier? A 200 pounds of bricks or 200 pounds of feathers?
What is yellow, fluffy, and hides your slippers?
What is a fat kids' favourite sounding instrument at school?
Why was the plant embarrassed?
Why do mexicans keep getting stuck in the doorway?
What do you call a scientist's obituary?
Is this where you put your jokes?
If a tree falls on your wife, and no one is around to hear it, does it make a sound?
What are green and smell like pork?
How can you tell when your girlfriend is getting fat?
Did you hear about the paperwork fetishist?
Why did the cow explode?
Why is the ulna the second funniest bone in our skeleton?
What is the worst place to have the "you break it, you buy it" rule?
What is it called when an unborn baby dies in a horse-drawn sleigh?
Why should rednecks NOT vote for Trump?
Did you hear about the French Olympic race walker who pooped his pants mid race?
What was the Feminist's least favorite subject?
Why is leather so good for sneaking around in?
what did the emo say to the dull razor?
How do you take the letter "F" out of the word "WAY" ?
What's the best way to get a Jewish girls number?
What do you call a small group of Jews around the holidays?
So you got a subaru?
What do you get if you cross a sheep and a kangaroo?
Why did the party planner say that everything was alright?
What do you call a cow during an earthquake?
What do you call three crows?
What's a pedophile's favorite activity?
Why are Hispanics so antisemitic?
What do feminist magicians say?
How do you turn a fox into an elephant?
I made up a joke. What did the pasta noodles say to the sauce when it was scared?
What does it mean if a dude looks down and sees four balls instead of two?
What do bad writers use to pick up hot pans?
What's an eastern European cannibal's favorite snack?
What do you call a graph crowded with data points about fat people?
What do you need to poop in the forest?
What did Lochte say after his teammates told the police what really happened?
If there are 6 apples and you take away 4, how many do you have?
What do you call a man holding two apples in one hand and three oranges in another?
What do you call dinosaur sluts?
What do you call a dolphin with agoraphobia?
How do you know if the camera you just bought was made in Asia?
What's wrong with being number 2?
Why don't witches wear underwear?
Why does Hannibal Lecter skin his colleagues?
Why did 0.81 recurring die?
Why is 7 afraid of 8?
What do you call two crows?
Why do you never see prostitutes on airplanes?
What gets harder the more you play with it?
Where does the wealthy mycologist go shopping?
Why did SJWs call out Medusa?
How do you tell the difference between Al Gore and the secret service when they're in the same room?
Why was Mark Fuch a terrible mailman?
Why do lesbians shop at sports authority?
What does a cannibal do after dumping his girlfriend?
Fastest Bolt at the Olympics?
What do you get when you cross an Elephant with a Rhino?
What would life be without plumbing?
How many Software Engineers does it take to change a light-bulb?
What kind of room doesn't have any doors/windows inside?
How many men from the US swim team does it take to open a door?
Why do people keep a picture of their wife and kids in their wallet?
What do you call a pig with three eyes?
What's the difference between an oyster having a seizure and a hooker with diarrhea?
What do you call a potato-loving despot?
Why are people in wheelchairs always getting taken advantage of?
How do you speak to a deaf Ted Cruz?
Why didn't Bono sell any wheat bread at his bakery?
Why was the blonde's belly button sore?
What do you call a flight commandeered by pirates?
What do you call a thousand lawyers, chained to the bottom of the ocean?
Which is the most eco-friendly subreddit?
Two cats are sitting on a roof. Which one slides off first?
Why are C programmers never invited to parties?
Did you guys hear about the new death camps in North Korea?
If someone who speaks 2 languages is Bilingual, whats someone who speaks 1 called?
Why do Java programmers wear glasses?
What's worse than one dead baby nailed to ten trees?
Why am I black and you're white?
Why is Sven afraid of sex?
What did the hat say to the tie?
Why did Sherlock Holmes get a colonoscopy?
What do you call a man who can't stand?
What's the difference between a terrorist cell and a children's hospital?
What did the gay Jamaican say to his S.O.?
Why did the hipster otter leave his hometown river?
[Ask Reddit] Blind Redditors what is your favourite post you have seen to date?
If you are having sex with two women and a third woman walks in, what do you have?
How difficult is it to live with erectile dysfunction?
How did the steak knife find himself after drunk driving?
Did you hear about the orgy at the campsite?
You know what really kills me?
What's Father Time's nickname when he's drunk?
Why couldn't the 3 speed mixer get auto insurance?
What is brown and sounds like a bell?
You guys hear about that new Amish rapper?
I'm a great insult comic. Want a quickie?
Anybody have bad credit?
Why was dyslexic Eminem put in a cage?
Where does Google and Apple get their weather information?
What do you call a spitting alarm?
How amazing is Michael Phelps?
Why'd the chicken cross The Road?
Why is housing cheaper as an orphan?
What is the speed of sex?
What's worse than finding your dad's fleshlight?
Two cows in a field. One asks “should I be worried about mad cow’s disease”?
What did the friendly terrorist say when he walked into the gay club?
Why did the chicken go to the principal's office?
What has 42 teeth and holds back the incredible hulk?
What does PONTIAC stand for?
What did one window say to the other window?
What is the Popes favorite trick to do on a bike?
What does HONDA stand for?
How can you tell when you have prostate cancer?
How many men does it take to open a can of beer?
How many Californians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a botched circumcision?
Honey bee: Why there are different types of blood groups?
Why did the fish's car break down?
Did you hear about the Italian Chef that died?
How many Black Lives Matters protesters does it take to change a light bulb?
If Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton ended up in a car crash who would be saved?
What's the worst part about locking your keys in your car in front of an abortion clinic?
How many dead hookers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Writing a joke for my speech class can anybody help me?
Did you see the Chinese pole vaulter whose junk pushed the bar over the edge?
What's the difference between a pregnant woman and a lightbulb?
Why did I stop reading M.C Escher books on the bus?
Where do you buy sexy corsets?
Why did x and y break up?
Why is AIDS cooler than Forrest Gump?
Why didn't the criminal train operator die when he got the electric chair?
Do you know how NASCAR got its name?
What do Bill Cosby and Santa Claus have in common?
What's a crack addict's biggest fear?
Want to hear a good physics pun?
Why does Cinderella never win the Olympics?
Why should you never dogfight mermaids?
Why is learning English confusing when you're camping?
Why do mycologists have such a good time?
What do you cal a campsite trampled by thousands of tiny insects?
What do you call a lump of cats?
What do you call it when your Arab parents disaprove of your girlfriend?
Why did the fruit salad go to jail?
What is a Social Justice Warrior's favorite math subject?
How many Feminists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What kind of shoes do ninjas use?
How do you call an American that hasn't gone to the toilet in 7 days?
Why are the developers of NoMansSky called Hellogames?
What is the difference between a pine cone and a cheeto?
What do you call a demon at the gym?
Why did the banana bruise?
What do you call a Chinese speaking person who complains a lot?
What happens when you play a country song backwards?
What's a foot long and slippery?
what's a banana's favorite gymnastic event?
How many lightbulbs does it take to change a lightbulb ?
What type of computer sings?
What do you get when you cross a weasel with a whale?
How many people does it take to change a lighthouse bulb?
Good news and bad news Which do you want to hear first?
Why are people who work in IT amazing at relationships and sex?
What's my favorite machine at the gym?
What's faster than Usain Bolt ?
What does an insomniac, ­agnostic, dyslexic spend most of his time doing?
Why does no work ever get done on the Sun?
Feeling down?
How do you know the fastest runners are all doping?
Why Does Waldo Wear Stripes?
What did the poacher get when he saw the Northern White Rhino?
What's the fastest way to make your trousers fall down?
What does the GO in Pokémon GO stand for?
What do you call bacteria that can swim fast?
What kind of pants does Mario wear?
What do Donald Trump and his chromosomes have in common?
What do you call someone who smokes two doobies at once?
What happens when a guy from Finland dies?
You wanna hear a yoke?
What does IS call the evolutionary theory that humans are descended from the ape family?
What do you say to a beggar who's wearing a Star of David?
Why won't the pimp date any of his girls?
What do you call a gay tick?
Did you know the ninjas have gotten together and formed a union?
What do female ghosts have?
What is a Brit's favorite letter?
What do you call a Muslim trainer's Pokémon?
Welcome to the Salty Spittoon, how tough are ya?
What happens to stressed out Sailors?
We aren't allowed to drink during the job?
Did you here about the Blonde who made a large donation to the community swimming pool?
What beverage is often very helpful?
Why can no one win at the Bangkok Olympics ?
What's better than winning a silver in the paralympics?
Why did the surgeon refuse to dress for work?
What do you call a French dog that sells medicine?
What did the NFL Commissioner say when Adele turned down the Superbowl Halftime Show?
Why aren't there any feminist sex dolls?
What is the main difference between existentialism and nihilism?
What's the difference between Jews and Harry Potter?
What's a Penguins favorite type of pasta?
Did you ever hear the one about the two gay Irish guys?
Why are Pokemon terrible to play hide and seek with?
How do you get out of a Russian prison?
What's a classic Russian sci-fi film?
What's the difference between a tribal tattoo and /r/jokes?
What do you get when you cross Donny Osmond and Marie Osmond?
What do you tell someone when you give them a high five?
Hey girl, is your name Jacqueline Kennedy?
If pirates say "Arr", What do software pirates say?
Did you hear the one about the hipster tree?
Why do football players never fly first class?
How do you know if someone is not a vegan?
What animal sleep everywhere, shit anywhere, and have no respect to others?
What's the similarity between a smart employee and a perfect volleyball hit?
What is the name of one of the Chinese gymnasts competing at the Rio Olympics?
Hey Reddit, wanna hear a joke?
What do you call a midget king?
What did the sarcastic taximan say when he lost his job?
what's the hardest thing about be a pedophile?
What do you call a mushroom that goes into a bar and buys everyone a drink?
What is the difference between r/jokes and a comedian?
What do 'Game of Thrones' and 'The Sixth Sense' have in common?
Who robbed Lochte at the Olympics?
What does a condom and a wife have in common?
What's the best thing about being named Richard?
Did you hear about the lonely cow that joined a dating website?
What's the difference between bird flu and swine flu?
Waiter: would you like some cans, sir?
Why did the Jews wander in the desert for 40 years?
What did the doctor say to the domestic abuse victim?
Why are women like DOS?
What did one tampon say to the other tampon?
First thing you do in the school of rock?
Why was the bicycle lying on the side of the road?
How many dirty buggers does it take to change a light bulb?
what do you call a deer with no eyes?
What do you call a gorilla with a banana in each ear ?
How do you make an anti-socal guacamole?
What’s the difference between a goat and a kid?
What’s the difference between skinny and squat?
What is William Shakespeare's favorite kind of meat?
Why did the Muslim cross the road?
what is the most imaginative nation?
What is Snoop Dogg's favorite restaurant?
What is Adolf Hitlers favorite letter of the alphabet?
How many dogs does it take to count 14 plates?
What do you call a depressed gang member?
What do you call a joke with the wrong punchline?
What do you call a British nanny with an MDMA addiction?
Why does Mexico do so poorly in the Olympics?
What's Donald Trump's favorite kind of soup?
How do you turn two colors that work into a rainbow that doesn't?
How many Germans does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Chandler play the blues as loud as he could?
What happens when you hit a Jewish guy?
How many senior medical consultants does it take to change a lightbulb?
How did Hitler tie his shoes?
What happens if you game so much you forget to brush your teeth?
What's the difference between a Confederate flag and a black person?
Why can't Admiral Ackbar fly to Hawaii?
Why are oatmeal cookies better?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a catfish?
Hey Dad, can you call me a cab?
Do you know how you can tell your roommate is gay?
What's the opposite of a basic Jew?
Did you hear about the guy who lived in a Tyre?
What do The Sixth Sense and The Titanic have in common?
What rhymes with computer?
Where do fish deposit their money?
What was the REAL reason Harambe was executed?
Why do Pokemons like to eat sunflower seeds?
What do you call a dog with no hind legs and steel balls?
Did you hear the one about the banker slug who couldn't find a home?
What was Alex Rodriguez's last hit?
What is an Olympic pre race pep talk for a French competitor?
Beirut?
What do you call a promised meal?
How heavy is a hipster?
Have you heard of the new running shoes that Apple's producing for the soldiers in middle East?
Why does Santa have such a big sack?
Have you heard the joke about the baby with AIDS?
Why did the felon have so much energy?
What's the most common time to see the dentist?
Why does China have such a large population???
What did Mr. Spock find in the toilet?
Why did the old man hate using the new chip cards?
How do you catch a Pokemon?
Why do black people always say "I know right"?
Who is better? The 3rd wave feminist or the pencil?
What does a fencing Redditor always do with their jokes?
Why did the boy eat his homework?
What did the stoic dolphin say to the whiny whale?
Whats the different between falling from the 10th floor and falling from the 1st floor ?
How are Oscar the Grouch and the Olympic Diving Pools in Rio de Janeiro similar?
What aspect of the game do women soccer players like most?
Did you hear about the soldier who survived pepper spray and mustard gas?
What is the most certain way to prevent milk from souring?
What's great when you're at work, and terrible when you're in bed?
What did the out of shape owl say?
Why did the Latino Eminem fail in the music business?
What did one snowman say to the other snowman?
In Jamaica, how do you know if a mango is ripe?
Why do Jewish people watch porn backwards?
What programming languages would we use if C didn't exist?
How did the cheerleader get magic AIDS?
Why did the feminist refuse to work at the post office?
Do you know how much cocaine Charlie Sheen uses ?
What do you call a team of Slavic supervillains?
What does Sean Connery say when he has to go number 2?
Broken heart?
Hey, do you want to see something funny?
Why was the road in so much pain?
What did the vet say about the maimed donkey?
What is Bart Simpsons' favorite kind of fish?
Why are Japanese people so good at judo?
Did you hear about the king who killed all of his peasants?
What swims slightly faster than a shark?
What's an emo's favorite game?
What do valley girls drink?
What's a Mexican's favorite assignment?
What does BMW stand for?
Who placed 3rd for basketball in the 2016 Olympics?
What do you call a 3 legged cow named Summer in the winter?
What's the difference between the Mafia and the Government?
You hear about the NBA player who married a midget?
Why do dogs hate outer space?
Why do prison guards use Proactive all the time?
About what time does Sean Connery go to Wimbledon?
What did the pregnant orange see after 9 months?
Why is a giraffe's neck so long?
Did you hear about the electrical store that got robbed?
What do French people put on really funny sandwiches?
What did the depressed light switch say?
What is a Brit's favorite steak?
What does Rick Ross say after opening a pack with only Hershey's in it?
What does Gandhi not like on the Internet?
What do straight woman and gay men have in common?
Why does Jimmy Carter swim on his back?
What's the difference between Bernie quitting and Trump quitting?
What's the difference between a reindeer and a caribou?
How do you turn a little boy into a little girl?
What do a cell phone and anal bleach have in common?
What is black, sings and lives next to a vagina?
What's a word that no matter how much you spelled it, it always wrong?
How to embarrass an archaeologist?
Did you know 9 out of 10 dentists recommend chewing gum?
How many jews can you fit in a car?
what's the difference between you and an egg?
What's faster than a black man dodging cops with a TV?
What’s better than winning a gold medal at the Special Olympics?
What do you call a married cougar?
What's the difference between a Nun and a lady taking a bath?
How do you get Pikachu on a bus?
What do you call 2 lesbians in a canoe?
What is similar about a twitch mod and an a reddit mod?
Why did the football coach return to the bank?
Who invented rhetorical questions?
What does a German use to polish his trumpet?
How did 3 know 4 was a Ballerina?
What's brown and rhymes with Snoop Dogg?
What do you do if an Islamist throws a pin at you?
What do you call someone who cleans vacuums?
What do you call a homosexual on rollerblades?
What do you call an attraction to your own mummy?
What is a black Transformer's name?
Did you hear that Fergie and R. Kelly are collaborating on a new album?
An old man with Parkinson's who recently lost his wife looks down at his hands and asks what?
Why did the interrupting cow cross the road?
Did you hear about the man who invented the knock knock joke?
Why was the floppy disk self-conscious?
What do you call a Jewish Pokemon Go player?
How does a german get to the airport?
How do you climb Trump Tower?
What's the best part about dating a twin?
How many creationists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Anyone heard of that game called "No Man's Sky" ?
Which college course does a feminist take?
How does a duck swim from one side of the pond to the other?
How many teachers does it take to change a lightbulb?
did you hear about the gay, cannibal pirate?
Who's the fastest runner in the chinese olympic team?
What do you call a snarky criminal going down the stairs?
What do you call an STD that is contracted in your ear?
Why is the cinematography of pornos so impressive?
Whats the difference between America and Yogurt?
[GoT] What is Little Finger's favorite thing about poetry?
How did the doctor determine that the baby was affected by the Zika virus?
How do the Greeks seperate the men from the boys?
What's four inches long and drives women crazy?
What did the hurricane say to the coconut palm tree?
How many IT guys does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a chicken coop with five doors?
What's a blind mans worst fear ?
What do you call a girl from Alabama who's faster than her brothers?
Why doesn't Mexico have a good Olympic team?
What did the doctor say when a Chinese baby with down syndrome was born?
How much does a Cockney spend on shampoo?
What is black and starts with "nig"?
Did Donald Trump make the right choice when picking his running mate?
What do you call a barstool turned upside down at a gay bar?
What do you call a beetle in the bed sheets?
What kind of beans do mummies eat?
Why the USA get silver in synchronized diving?
Did you hear about child molester who plays the piano?
What did Nicolas Cage say when his daughters grades came through?
What's the difference between donald trump and a bucket of shit?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, an unwilling agnostic, and a dyslexic?
What do male prostitutes and Inspector Closeau have in common?
What does a necrozoophiliac do?
Cop: "Did you kill this man?
How many mexicans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is Rio's least liked, most common Pokemon?
How do you get a witch pregnant?
What's the difference between a musician and a dead body?
what happens when a nunga bucha walks into a bar?
What's the difference between an old bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
Why are Americans so good at shooting?
Q: Do you like sex and travel?
What's the best part about showering with an eight year old girl?
Why don't Indians play soccer?
What did Michael Phelps say after the Mens 200m?
Does anyone else love going into psychosis?
What do you tell a kid with two black eyes?
Guy: Hey baby, do you wanna 68?
Why did team USA get a silver in Men's Diving?
What do you get when an alternative metal band runs out of toilet paper?
What did the amputee say to his mom when he learned to ride a bike?
What did the egg say to the other egg?
What is the difference between your suicide and the state of syria?
What's the difference between some tuna , a piano and some glue ?
What do you call an original idea on Reddit?
What does a baby look like after a minute in the microwave?
can i ask you two questions?
What do you call a epileptic roman emperor?
What is something that you can never eat for breakfast?
Who was the widest knight at King Arthur's round table?
Why do French tanks have a rear-view mirror?
Why do geologists love sandwiches in the field?
Why did Trump cross the road?
What's the difference between a Catholic priest and a zit?
Why does Michael Phelps refuse to aid his teammates in preparing for the Olympics?
What happened when Isaac Newton met the apple?
What's the difference between a Russian Potato and a U.S. Potato?
The dad asks his son: "What has four legs and isn't alive?
Did you hear about the old man selling boats in the attic?
How do they launch a champagne factory?
How many babies does it take to paint a room?
What's the difference between amnesia and alzheimers?
Why doesn't anyone go to Coney Island anymore?
What is Hillary Clinton's favorite sport?
Why are the "sans" family of fonts so serious?
What is an Asian pedophile's favorite soup?
What does a rapper call a Russian Olympians blood?
What do you get when you mix a Japanese and Welsh person?
Hey girl is there wifi here?
Santa Fe?
What did the Networking manager tell his assistant about working late?
Why are there many black people hanging around my family tree?
What gets greater with age?
What is the official cereal for the Rio olympics?
What do you call an emo vegetable?
How do you guys think the Germans will do in the Olympics this year?
Why is it called "the circle of life"?
Why was the programmer sexist?
What do you call the offspring of a sheep and a gorilla?
What time of day was Adam born?
What do you call an old barometer?
What's the difference?
What's the difference between a piano and a fish?
Why does no one trust victoria ?
What's a single Scottish man's favourite kind of cookie?
Ever seen an elephant hiding in a cherry tree?
What's the best place to hide a boy?
What's better than winning a gold medal at the Paralympics?
Why does the Olympic torch always start in Olympia?
What's long and hard every time you wake up?
What's the difference between a woman and a PC from 1995?
Why are white girls so odd?
Knock knock knock knock knock. Who's there?
What was the burglar doing in Wayne Manor?
What's the difference between a Pilot and a jet engine?
Why do Muslims love shopping at Ross?
What did the optimist say to his doctor when he found out he had lung cancer?
How many millennials does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why are Muslim countries are banning PokemonGo?
How many pornstars does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why couldn't a kid watch a pirate movie?
Whats the difference between a priest and acne?
How do you tell a transgender from a real woman?
What do terrorists eat?
Whats the best thing Orlando Bloom's ever been in?
What does Uncle Vernon not do today?
What would Game of Thrones be called if it was about ice cream?
Have you guys seen Stevie Wonder's new concert?
How did NBC respond to someone who criticized their broadcasting?
Why is Hitler's Favorite Animal the Cheetah?
What do you call the underground slave trade?
Why are asteroids so strong when they hit the planet?
What do you call an Arab who owns a goat and a camel?
What do you call a big polish wiener?
How do you get a Canadian to pay you back?
What's the difference between a gay man and a freezer?
drity What food diminishes a woman's sex drive by 90%?
My coffee tastes like dirt! What gives?
Who is the commander of cheese?
What did a binary number say to another?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and a plastic grocery bag?
Why don't the French need air conditioner?
What did the ocean say to the shore?
What's the hardest part to eat about a vegetable?
What do Windows and a submarine have in common?
what did the cemetery dude say when he buried the wrong guy?
You know about Pizza Hut?
What does the founder of Playboy say when he gets wrongfully imprisoned?
What do you call a party thrown by a Terrorist at a bar on a hot day in Hawaii?
Where do fat people live?
What kind of sick bird is against the law?
How do you know that a joke is a repost?
What did the lead singer of The Prodigy say to the guy parking his Mini Cooper?
Why can you trust saggy boobs?
How many rainbows does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the swarm of mosquitoes kill a loner mosquito & robbed it of it's bloodbank?
What did Delaware?
What's big, white and f**ks New Zealanders?
What do you call a man who loves a woman for her brains?
What do you call pasta that someone chokes on?
Who built the round table?
Why are oceans so salty?
Who was the most well known Jewish cook?
What's cold and comes in April?
What is the same about Subway sandwiches and Jared Fogle's porn collection?
What do you call a man with a vagina?
How do you make a 'feature wall' in Alaska?
What do you call it when everyone is behaving on a cruise ship?
What do you do if an Elephant breaks his big toe?
What did God say to the deviled egg?
You know who really did 9/11?
What did God say to the alcoholic spelling bee judge?
How will a black chef start with his recipe?
Did you hear about the author who wrote a book during her time of the month?
What is the most racist (and ignorant) musical instrument?
What's the stupidest animal you can find in a jungle?
What happens when you heavily water farmland?
What is white and inside a baby's diaper?
Why can't your jokes ever make NRA members laugh?
What do you call someone stealing musical instruments?
When did Hitler let his dog eat his homework?
What's the definition of a Wookiee?
What did the policeman say to his stomach?
Why are there no Jewish people in jail?
What do you call a vet that can only work on one animal?
What do you call a sophisticated American?
What do you call a dead magician?
Why do college frat boys drink before bathing?
What's worse than having a screaming child on your hands?
What's worse than your mother-in-law?
What do jehovah's witnesses believe in?
What do you call a world leader who white people are opposed to?
How does a mustache support his family in the event of his untimely death?
[Corny] What does a highlighter say when it answers the phone?
Why would John Wilkes Booth kill Abraham Lincoln?
What's the difference between an extroverted mathematician and an introverted mathematician?
How would you describe the average bully?
What do you call a word with two W's and one K?
What do politicians and diapers have in common?
Have you ever been to a party where you didn't know anyone?
I have to poop, what should i do?
How is Drake similar to someone with dysuria?
What do you get when you cross a busy road with a broken leg and a blindfold?
What is a relationship?
What is pink and fluffy?
How are E.T. and a Mexican immigrant the same?
What do a rubix cube and a penis have in common?
What can't you spell without the letters p-e-n-i-s?
Who goes to female prostitutes? Men. Who goes to male prostitutes?
What do you call it when stoners split a check?
What's a horrible icebreaker?
What do you call a pizza with just peppers on it?
What is the Beatles' favourite social media site?
What do you call the child of a magician and a potato?
Imagine if your roommate made you watch a movie and left 10 mins into it. Dick move, right?
How did Jesus get to the other side of the street?
What do you call a shorn sheep in a New Zealand bar?
What's Hillary Clinton's key to success?
How many Southern Baptists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What does an IT guy use for birth control?
How do you starve a Jewish man?
What's black and never works?
Why are the old trees always yelling?
What is a common question at lizards' fast food joints?
Why are foodfights forbidden in japanese schools?
What do you call a masturbating cow?
What do you call a Female PeaCOCK ?
What do you call it when Batman skips church?
What did God say to all the Jews, Christians and Muslims of the world?
If you got into an accident with Hillary and Trump, who would you rescue?
Why do you call a person with 3 legs?
Are you made of Copper and Tellurium?
What happened to Kim Jong?
What do you say to the midget prostitute?
What do you call a cat that's guilty of infidelity?
What do you call sixty female pigs and forty male deer?
How do you blindfold a chinese person?
How can you attract a group of like minded friends?
Where did little John go after the explosion?
What do you call a painter with a brown finger?
What is Bill Clinton's favorite song from Hamilton?
Whats the Difference between a Third-Wave Feminist and a Pencil?
What do you call an earthquake in NYC?
How do African mermaids cover their breasts?
What do you call a Pikachu caught in Brazil?
[OC] What is Hillary Clinton's favorite video game?
How do you get 30 drunk Americans out of the pool?
What's the difference between a refugee and E.T?
What do you call fake shit?
What do you call a body builder?
How do you offend a comedian?
What did the saggy boob say to the other saggy boob?
What is Donald Trump's favorite song?
How do you hear a hormone?
What is the favorite scientific unit of the French?
What will kill you on leg day?
How do you get 30 drunk Russians out of the pool?
How much will a pirate charge you for a piercing?
What did the Mexican do when he arrived in America?
How many "a man walks into a bar" jokes does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's an SJW's favourite animal?
What's the difference between Valve and uranium?
Why couldn't the hippie be saved from drowning?
What's Donald's true political party?
How many hippies does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
At church, what three words are foremost in a bride's mind on her wedding day?
How do you get 30 drunk Canadians out of the pool?
What would Burger Kings slogan be if Jesus founded it?
What do you call a dumb cop?
Why did Batman go to the corner store?
What do you call a gay dinosaur?
What do hipsters call breast milk?
What's the difference between a weatherman and an overweight doctor that handles the urinary tract?
What does an injured gyro say?
What's the difference between Adolf Hitler and Usain Bolt?
Why is the alphabet of a pirate incomplete ?
Where are you most likely to drown?
What's the hardest part about stir-frying vegetables?
What can an Elephant make that no other animal can make?
You know what would be a hilarious prank?
What do you call a fish with no eyes?
What's the difference between a bonus and a penis?
What are cranes made of?
What do you call a fight between a human and a gorilla?
Did you hear that one about Alzheimers?
What's a shitpost dad?
How would America win gold medals in shooting for the Olympics?
Has anyone listened to the hottest boy band from Mexico?
Why was the man always pissy when he got home from work?
What do you call a clown and a crook rolling in feces?
Did Anne Frank have a good time at camp?
'One two three' cat and 'Un deux trois' cat decided to have a boat race. Who won?
What’s funky and fits in a cardboard box?
What is a pirate's favorite pastime?
What do you call a movie about dancing robots?
What do you get when you multiply 1,654,835,583 to 5,687,423,908?
What is Russia's favorite imported product?
What's slimy, long and smells like pork?
Why did the celiac patient have to skip leg-day?
What's the difference between Trump and Hitler?
What do you call an epileptic in a lettuce patch?
Whats the difference between a Christian and a Muslim?
What did Ned Stark say when his daughter told him that she was pregnant?
Mum why am i getting my Christmas present in August?
Why can't you hear pterodactyls go to the bathroom?
What's the difference between Batman and a Black man?
Did you hear that the Expendables cast is making a movie about classical composers?
What's the difference between a vegetable and a fruit?
Why did the chicken cross the rogue?
Where do cat astronauts go?
What's the difference between a priest and a pimple?
What do you call a buyer that likes to curse?
What do you call a group of emos?
What the hell is Minecraft?
What do you call a naked potato?
Who has two thumbs and a concealed identity?
Why can't you fool the aborted baby?
Do all black people have a problem with slavery?
What do people with mommy issues wear?
What do you call a Chinese kid playing college football?
How do you make an ugly baby?
What did the cell say to his sister when she stepped on his foot?
What's a pirate's favourite Roman numeral?
how did the bananas get away from the cops?
What do you get when you cross a turd and a mailbox?
What did the clock say to the other clock after she gave him a handjob?
How do you tell when a woman has an orgasm?
How does a racist joke start?
Why do dog lick their balls?
What's colorless and smells sweet?
What do girls and noodles have in common?
What do you call 5 blacks having sex?
What would cause the primary model to fail?
What does an egg say when he's getting turnt?
What do you call a dog that is also a magician?
How do you get from Iran to Iraq without moving?
What do you call a Black, Jewish man on the moon?
What did Jesus say to Peter?
What's a homotron?
What do you get when you cross my mom with my dad?
What is the difference between Donald and a peace of sh..?
What's the difference between sod and a fat chick?
What's the difference between Bernie Sanders and a coconut?
How much did it cost the pirate to get his ears pierced?
What is a Squirrels favorite joke?
What's the best thing about Switzerland?
What does Uncle Vernon from Harry Potter not do on Reddit?
What begins at the end and ends at the beginning?
How do you know a white person is about to tell a joke?
Where does Kanye West like to go with his son?
What do you call a black guy in a museum?
What's the difference between Donald and a piece of fruit?
What do you call a discount sauna?
What does a perverted frog say?
What do you get when you cross my mom and my dad?
What do you call someone who discriminates against paintings?
What's the definition of 'vagina'?
Did you know that people from Dubai don't like "the Flintstones"?
You know the 'Done' button you press to exit a video?
What do you call a group of gay cavemen?
What do you call a dead gorilla in a shopping centre?
Why was Sevilla FC closed down?
What did one pile of wood chips say to the other?
How many Californians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is the bogeyman's greatest fear?
Corny Joke: What do you get when you drop a few ears of corn into a pie?
What does a house wear?
What did the Iraqi boy say when his dad forgot his rucksack?
Why don't witches wear panties?
What did the blind man say when he walked past the fish market?
How do you open a door underwater?
It's April 1st!?
Why are so many computer scientists atheists?
What do you call a lawmaker in a society ruled by horses that says one thing but does the opposite?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Lamborghini?
What does the word 'gay' mean?
What's the hardest part breaking up with a Japanese girlfriend?
Why was Mel Gibson in a bar at 9am?
What do blondes and tornado's have in common?
Have you heard about the guy whose whole left side got shaved by a train?
where is your husband?
What did the Los Angeles Lakers finish on tuesday?
When can women make you a millionaire?
What's black, blue and doesn't look too well?
What do North Korean weapons and T-Rex's have in common?
What did the thief say when someone was about to go get his attention?
Why is depressed clothing so convenient?
How do you get a Jew to shower?
Where is Sith Lord's favorite place to shop?
What is a teenage girl's best friend?
What's orange and has four wheels?
Why do white girls always walk around in groups of 3?
What's the difference between the G-Spot and a Golf Ball?
What do you call a female Native American hip hop artist?
Did you hear about the Transformers creepy uncle?
Why did the Catholic Priest cross the road?
What is the saddest that can happen to Putin's team for the olympic games ?
What time is it in India?
What's long, hard and bendable and contains the letters p, e, n, i, s?
what colour were Kurt Cobain's eyes?
What state has the smallest soft drinks?
You know why you can't play Uno with Mexicans?
Why do they evacuate women and children first?
Did you hear about the guy in Egypt that didn't think he was drowning?
Why did Bill Gates get sick?
What did the ceiling fan say?
How do you fit an elephant into a Safeway bag?
What kind of shoes do pedophiles wear?
What did the buffalo say to his son when he came out to be bisexual?
How does a Reaver clean his spear?
What has 2 legs but can not walk?
How does it feel to have your head separated from your body?
Why do lobsters make bad lovers?
What would you call a social media marketing genius?
What's worse then finding a worm in your apple?
What do you call an Indian guy who's looking for a date?
Do you know the difference between a suppository and a pineapple?
How do you get in the 'Public Urination Club'?
What's the difference between people from Dubai and people from Abu Dhabi?
Why do objects disappear when you move them twice?
Want to hear a funny presidential joke?
What do you call a stay at home dad?
What did the snail say while riding on the turtle's back?
Want to hear a gay joke?
whats a muslims favorite kind of pepper?
Why can't Miss Piggy count to 70?
What did the dead magician say?
Who is the opposite of Christopher Reeves?
Why wasn't the vampire killed?
What do you call a gay fly?
What does Jeremy Clarkson and Amy Winehouse have in common?
What's the last thing that goes through a bug's mind when it hits a windshield?
Why God impregnated Mary?
What do you call a blowjob from a vampire?
What did Ash tell his Pokemon?
What do you call a company run entirely by ghosts?
What were the political views of the librarian?
What did the father Buffalo say to his son as he left for school?
What's the difference between a man-whore and Santa Claus?
Why do mathematicians dislike cloth rugs?
What makes fish smell?
What does a waiter ask a group of Jewish ladies?
Did you hear the one about the Jewish terrorist?
How do you confuse a straight person?
What do French athletes wear?
What's the difference between three dicks and a joke?
Hey baby, You know how I know I'm getting laid tonight?
How do you know your letter is gay?
What game show do pickles play?
What's it like paying a dude for sex?
Why does Pinnochio always get an erection when he's in a forest?
Why doesn't Donald Trump toot his own Horn?
How do you confuse a 7 year old?
What's the difference between a vegetarian and a virgin?
Why did King Kong go to the airport?
Where did I take my pet Cow on Valentines Day?
What's the difference between a terrorist camp and a school?
Why don't programmers go on panty raids?
Why are fire trucks red?
What do a pedophile and a Pokemon master have in common?
I just left my job, see why ?
What do you call a self-referential question posing as a joke setup?
What phrase do both pedophiles and middle aged women say?
What's the difference between a book and a Mexican?
What's 12 inches long and hangs in front of an asshole?
Why should you work for a vegetable factory?
What do you call it when a Jugaloo sleeps with his girlfriend after a fight?
Are you all allright?
What do a nearsighted gynecologist and a healthy dog have in common?
How do you fuck with a Redditor?
What did one ocean say to the other ocean?
Why don't the polls like Donald Trump?
How many men does it take to open a beer?
#who ya gonna call?
What do you call a couple of asses in an asparagus patch?
Whats does a fisherman and a teen have in common?
How do you disappoint a Redditor?
What do you call 2000 mockingbirds?
How do you call the social media that your grandmother uses?
Which color is the coldest?
What do ants drink?
What's the difference between a dog and a fox?
Why doesn't the governments care about their citizens?
What do you call it when your water breaks and you can't get ahold of the midwife?
What did Edgar Allen Poe name his cat?
Why do tailors hate statisticians?
What do cancer and Donald Trump have in common?
Do you know why Polish girls don't like vibrates?
Did you hear about the Polish Wolfhound?
What's a Russian leader's favorite food?
Why does Trump actually want to lose the election?
What do you call a day when all jokes on this sub are re-posts?
Why did the pig go into the kitchen?
Question: what's Erdogan's favorite puzzle game?
How do you fit 5,000 Jews into a Volkswagen?
What is the worst part of being black and jewish?
What do anime ghosts say to scare people?
What's green and not heavy?
A crab, a tuna, a lobster, and a Chinese man being run over by a steam roller. What doesn't belong?
What do Catholic priests and the Zika Virus have in common?
Why did the woman throw the stick of butter out the window?
How do you stop a lawyer from drowning?
What do you get when you mix a rhinoceros with an elephant?
How would Donald Trump declare war on other countries?
What do you give to an elephant who suffering from diarrhea?
Why does the Pope keep his underwear on while bathing?
What's the difference between racism and the chinese people?
What kind of cheese is made backwards?
What is the best way to stop a politician?
What is the worst thing you could hear after giving Willie Nelson a blow job?
Why do blacks believe in Jesus?
Did you hear the guy who wrote the Friends theme song committed suicide?
What did the Bulbasaur say to the Charmander?
Did you hear about the new Miley Cyrus/Donald Trump collaboration project?
What's purple and sequels?
What does Miss Frizzle say when she's orgasming?
What do you call a spinning potato?
What would be Jesus' favorite gun?
How does NASA organize a party?
What did the man say after Michael Jackson stole his coat?
Which playing card can turn its hand to everything?
What's pansexual, ungendered, and a shapeshifter?
What do you call a paraplegic with an incurable STD?
Why did Ramsay Bolton clone the Nazi Angel of Death 19 times after reincarnating him?
What do necrophiliacs and alcoholics have in common?
Have you ever tried sky diving without a parachute?
Did you Know this fact about Einstein?
Which country has a drug-addicted king?
What do you call a man holding a machine gun?
What's the difference between a Greyhound Station and a crab with big boobs?
What kind of tree has the best bark?
Did you hear the one about the subatomic particle that refused to pay the bus fare?
Why did the man commit suicide?
Where do dancers put their empty sodas?
If Hilary Clinton and Donald Trump both get in a plane accident, who survives?
You're scared of pedophiles?
If you are an American in the living room, what are you in the bathroom?
What's the difference between USB and USA?
What's the similarity between Chris Brown being released and Pokemon Go being released?
How can you tell if an envelope is gay?
Why didn't the mobsters car parts fit?
what do you call a female chihuahua in a salt flat?
How did the handyman feel after going to the bar?
What do you call a bar in Star Wars?
How many Republicans does it take to change a light bulb?
What did Jesus say to the man with leprocy?
Why Is Six Afraid Of Seven?
What is Jesus's favorite gun?
If men call short women "petite", what do women call short men?
How did Napoleon eat his chicken?
Why are E.T.'s eyes so big?
What do they call brassieres in Germany?
First transgender woman--Danielle Boone?
Have you heard that joke about pussy?
Why do I feel so empty?
How many Suh Dudes does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did the male telescope say to the hot female telescope?
What is Po's (Kung Fu Panda) dominant colour?
How are Clinton scandals like Pokémon?
Why are millennials so odd?
Why are Saudi Arabians so clueless?
Why are hearing impaired people so orgasmic?
Why do dogs lick their dick?
What did one tampon say to the other?
Why couldn't the Italian man start his car?
What N word do you not want to call a black man?
How are Jimmy Carter and the Long Island Railroad the same?
What do you call a shart?
What do you call a mean dust storm?
What's the difference between me and a Jew?
Why cant Gingers make shoes?
What does a guy with 2 right feet wear to the beach?
When does money fall from the sky?
Why was the cannibal sad at dinner?
Why do Cows have Hooves instead of Feet?
Did you know Albert Einstein had a kid? And that kids name was...?
How many potatoes does it take to kill an Irish man?
What's big, black, and red all over?
What's a Southeastern Asian business professional's favorite food?
How do you tell a male chromosome from a female chromosome?
Why did the trigonometric function go to the tanning salon?
What's a Jew's most hated pokemon?
Whats the difference between a Snowman and a SnowWoman?
Why are tennis equipment factories so loud?
what do you call an Irish man sitting in his garden?
Why does Hillary Clinton wear so much makeup?
Teacher: why do I hear talking?
What is the difference between a golfer and a skydiver?
What do you call a drunk muslim woman?
What's the worst part about eating out an 80 year old?
Why is Jesus black?
Did you here about the circus fire?
Ever hear about the Roman general who had a fit every time there was cold weather?
What does a vegetarian hunter say before dinner?
How are strippers and Subway workers similar?
What type of weather has the worst attitude?
What's the definition of endless love?
What do you call a Chinese millionaire?
Why does Bernie always hold the podium while giving a speech?
Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump get into a car crash, who survives?
What do you call the soft tissue between a shark's teeth?
What do somolian pirates use as weapons?
What do you call a blonde, balding teenager?
How do you know the Japanese mass murderer was a chef?
Why don't rabbits like beer?
How many South Americans does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do White Supremists call this month "The Holocaust"?
What's a pedophile's favorite shoe?
What do I need a girlfriend for?
What are mixed feelings?
What do you call a person with a Simpsons fetish?
What's the heaviest soup?
I don't know Why people called me racist?
What's one thing a girl can tell a guy that can make him happy and sad at the same time?
Why doesn't Hitler run a marathon?
Why did the toy company stop donating toys to kids in Africa?
What is a Mexican's favorite FPS?
Why cant orphans play baseball?
Why is Alabama the smartest state?
What did the feminist say when she saw a guy laughing at her picture on the Internet?
Why does Hillary Clinton want to have sex with Bill first thing in the morning?
How many chains does it take to enslave a black person in the twenty-first century?
Why did the hipster burn his mouth?
Why did the mafia boss get banned from the aquarium?
Why do people from Istanbul always swim?
What do you call Bruce Lee's mom when she's making obvious statements?
What did the icecream truck say to the hipster?
What does a bodybuilder do while waiting in a long line?
Why should you always accept free cocaine?
Why did the hunter scold his blonde wife after she shot a moose over quota?
What's the difference between an engineer and a prostitute?
What is the big hairy thing between Napoleon's legs?
what do you call a fish with no eye?
Every Woman has a V, What am I?
Q: Why are Republicans always so strung up about 9/11?
Why is there only a stairway to heaven but a highway to hell?
What is Donald Trump's favourite Olympics event?
What does a man call a gorilla he loves?
What drug does the lord use to get work done?
What do you call someone who has a long experience in treating animals, but has no umbrella?
What do you call a car that you only drive in the fall?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to change a light bulb?
Why can't Jesus eat pizza?
What sits in the kitchen and gets smaller and smaller?
Why don't Americans like their dollar coin?
What happened to the performer who read poetry to terminally ill patients?
Why did Uhuru get mad?
What's the difference between a slab of meat and someone who hates high school students?
Why did Muhammad cross the road?
Why are most cemeteries fenced in?
Why couldn't the Sailor steal other peoples work?
What do you call a group of bankers?
How did Pavlov keep his dogs so fluffy?
What do you call a nun in space?
What are the three rings of marriage?
Why is a horny walrus the same as a Tupperware enthusiast?
How do you know whether somebody is a vegan?
Why was the distracted man fired from his job at the distillery?
What's a Norwegian's favourite car?
Why couldn't the watermelon get married in Vegas?
What does a redneck say after sex?
What N-word do you never want to call a black man?
What's the difference between an epileptic cornhusker and a hooker with diarrhea?
How many surrealists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a man with no shins?
What is the best time to watch Predator?
What'd the muslim say when he walked into the gay bar?
How do you want it die?
How many indie kids does it take to change a lightbulb?
I didn't who created the app...Pokemon GO?
Why did the customer choose T-Mobile?
Where do bourgeois monarchists get their coffee?
What's the fastest drink in the world ?
Who are the biggest nay-sayers on Earth?
What type of cow produces both milk and potatos?
Why did Ben seem so down?
Donald trump, Hillary and Black hole, what do they all have in common?
Genderfluid?
What's the phrase for when a bird spills a drink?
Which pirate makes the best food?
What's the difference between an archeologists convention and a basketball team?
Did you hear about the Spanish Perfume?
How do you make Donald Trump lose weight?
What's better than a hot 29 year old?
Why are American police officers so bad at snooker?
Why do people point at their wrist when asking for the time?
Why do SJW Women close their eyes during sex?
What do you call someone that steals shoes?
What do you call a Japanese woman who enjoys sex?
How do you get four gay men to fit on a barstool?
Where does Phil Collins record all of his music?
How do you know when Vladimir Putin has a cold?
what do you call it when a mathematician does a magic trick?
joe. joe who?
What do you say when a corrupt Soviet takes a bathroom break right before war?
What do women in the Middle East and Millennials have in common?
What do you award to someone who comments in a thread from a month ago?
What do you call a mushroom that likes to party?
What's the name of the strongest duck out there?
Why didn't Noah let the Tasmanian devil in?
What do they teach in ISIS business school?
What do you call a shipping crate full of snails?
What do Pokemon Go and Tinder have in common?
Where do you find dragon milk?
What is Hitler's favourite animal?
What has 90 balls and screws old women?
Why did the redneck cross the road?
Have you ever wondered why Aspirin is white?
Did you hear about the guy with no penis?
Did you know Japanese goddess Izanami was a Nazi?
How do you make someone shit easier?
How do you kill a troll?
How many super saiyans does it take to change a light bulb?
What would a Scotsman call a mountain which is on the moon?
What's the best way to turn a pussy into a dick?
What happens when you leave 50 lesbians and 50 lawyers in a room?
What did the Mexican gang member say when two large houses fell on him during an earthquake?
This morning I ran into Hitler. I was very surprised to see him and asked him what he was up to?
What do you call two old black men standing in a shed?
What is the difference between a toad and a horny toad?
What has TWO wings, and ONE arrow?
Why don't women like drinking beer at the beach?
Yo girl, are you a zero APR loan?
What did one sheep say to the other?
What do you call a horny dog???
What's the best part about Dragon Ball Z?
Why did the pig stop sunbathing?
What's the most commonly heard phrase in a gay bar?
What's yellow and sleeps alone?
What is Serena Williams' favorite time to practice?
An art thief gets caught after a heist, how so?
Why are Mexicans so nosy?
Why did the woman fall into the well?
What did one DNA say to the other DNA?
A bard walks up to a bored leprechaun. How many tunes should the bard play?
What kind of database does a Pokédex use?
what would happen if all the rattatas died?
What makes for a great relationship but a shit gaming partner?
What do you do if a gang of clowns attack you?
What's the difference between pokemon go and my girlfriend?
What is the difference between a driveway and rape?
What is a politician's favorite kind of tea?
What's Harambe's favourite operating system?
What do you call a gay person from Wisconsin?
Why do Norse gods never ice skate?
How does Stephen Hawking have sex?
What's the difference between your dad and this joke?
What are the Greeks forced to eat in their hyper-inflated economy?
Boy: Why is the food so cold and bland?
What do you call a horny Catholic?
Why is turkey happy?
Are you grateful that your pop died?
What's ET Short for?
What excuse did the unemployed cellist give for going dutch with his date?
What is less Kosher than a bacon wrapped shrimp?
What do you call a Thug-Magician?
Why shouldn't you get asylum in Russia?
How did the dickhead react to his first blowjob?
Why do we drink Tea?
Mary and Abbey who?
Did you know about the 6'7" Proctologist who had fight with his patient?
What do you call a psychic midget that escaped from prison?
Why did the University of Kentucky have to put AstroTurf down on the stadium?
why dont jewish people like getting made fun of?
How do you know when you're at a gay picnic?
What will Melania Trump say to mexicans if her husband becomes president?
Why did the boat dock with the all of the other boats?
Why does Snoop Dogg use an umbrella?
Why don't they play poker in the jungle?
What do you call a nun in a wheel chair?
What's the funniest thing you have heard about US Politics?
Do you know why Friday are always hot?
Why did the agnostic chicken cross the road?
What do a dog and a nearsighted gynecologist have in common?
Why did the Jonestown jokes never catch on?
Who's the fastest cyclist in the world?
Knock, knock. Who's there? Alan Rickman and David Bowie. Alan Rickman and David Bowie who?
What is a Mexicans closing sales pitch?
Did you hear Cyan delayed the release of Obduction again?
What is the longest movie of all time?
What's worse than having 10 dead babies stapled to one tree?
Can you name all the dissimilarities between men and women?
What makes a USPS joke funny?
How many Kardashians does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the Afghani immigrant say when he got a new truck?
Why was the 45 year old businessman losing his hair?
What does a muslim say when he makes a mistake?
Why can't a terrorist tell a joke?
What makes a fencing post extra funny?
What do you call a guy in a wheelchair?
What makes a fencing joke extra funny?
Did you hear about the stand-up comedian that joined ISIS?
What did Jon Snow drink with the wildlings to celebrate a battle victory?
What do you think of Theresa May?
Did you hear about the greedy red bird?
What's the one thing Spider-Man can't eat?
What does a teenage southern girl say while having sex?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and the Jews?
What's the simplest way to make edibles?
Why does it take artists so long to charge their phones?
Where do suicide bombers go after an explosion?
Have you guys heard of the unsolved Riemann Hypothesis?
Why did the console peasant cross the road ?
What's a priest's favorite type of rock?
Why don't the police protest against BLM?
What did a bad teacher tell their wisecracking student?
What do you call a pig sitting on a hog?
Who's the greatest baller of all time?
What gets wetter and wetter the more it dries?
How do you know a neighborhood is too ghetto to film in?
Whats more bruised than an old apple?
Who is fattest person alive?
Has this one ever been used? Why didn't the chicken cross the road?
What type of cheese is not yours?
Two Pokémon players run right into each other, what does the one say to the other?
Did you hear about the woman who beat Usain Bolt?
Why do people take such an instant dislike to Ted Cruz ?
What do martial artist love to drink?
Where is the best vision in Oklahoma?
How do Vaginas Like Their Eggs?
What does a pornstar use to build a wall?
What did the zero say to the eight?
Whats the difference between a dog and a fox?
Why did Tupac go to the gym?
Why is Pokemon Go Banned in Saudi Arabia?
What do you call mustard that's not very hot?
What do you call a magic dog?
How does a Redditor greet a woman from Kuala Lumpur?
How do ducks pay off loans?
What do you call the surveillance system that watches us all whilst we are in the bathroom?
Q: Why have all these complete strangers started to poke around outside my window?
Why did Hitler cover his eyes?
what do you call 5 Asians, a Mexican, and an expletive?
What planet would have the highest Indian population?
Why couldn't Jesus eat M&M's?
Why does salt melt snow?
What's the difference between me and your mom?
What do you call a budget that's cut short from the middle?
What do you call an equation with no solution?
What's the difference between a snow man and a snow woman?
What's Anne Frank's martial art style?
What do you call a sad elk?
What did Melania Trump say to her speech writer?
Cop: Sir, have you been drinking?
How many babies does it take to paint a wall?
What do you call a Jewish Pokemon Trainer?
What does Brian Johnson say on the beach?
Which part of a vegetable is the hardest to chew?
Did you hear about the brake pedal who had to leave his job?
How do you tell the difference between a perv and a misogynist?
What did the doctor say when he delivered a blonde-haired baby to an expecting Chinese couple?
What do you call a golf club in the rear of your car?
Why can't the cop stop beating his meat when the lights are off?
What's strong enough for a man but made for a women?
What's your best two line joke?
What's the difference between a Mexican and a beaner?
Why are fire engines red?
What's the last thing you want to hear when you're giving a blow job to Willie Nelson?
What's the difference between a black man and a nigger?
What happens when the White House runs out of eggs?
What is the only word in an English dictionary spelled incorrectly?
Who's an all male rock group that doesn't sing?
How are ghosts and smart trump supporters similar?
How do you circumcise Donald Trump?
What do nine out of ten people enjoy?
What do you do if your GF is having siezures in the bathtub?
Mommy, why were you bouncing on Daddy's belly last night?
What do you get when you mix triangles with Tumblr?
How many Freudians does it take to change a light bulb?
Why do Democrats like to play Pokemon?
What do astronauts put on their toast?
Why do white people shop from black people's yard sales?
What's the difference between a bad golfer and a bad skydiver?
What is a thing that Alan Rickman and David Bowie both have in common?
What do earth scientists look at on their lunch breaks?
What do you do with an epileptic in a bathtub?
What do Germans and acetone have in common?
How many dead babies does it take to paint a wall?
What’s the opposite of irony?
How do you make a tutu?
What happened?
What does Melania disagree with Donald on?
How many Mexicans will make it across the border when Trump becomes president?
What does Ray Charles' fictious girlfriend and this joke have in common?
What happens when an illiterate insect becomes enlightened?
How many Greek Catholic monks does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why does Melanina disagree with Donald over Obamacare?
How do we know that Jesus wasn't born in Mexico?
What happens if now discovered the truth: Female are XY, Male is XX?
Skips or Quavers?
What did the black intellectual name her twins?
Why do americans like to visit Rome so much?
What do you call a dog in a submarine?
Why do terrorists hate wine?
Why does Donald Trump keep putting on weight?
Who is the most mobile painter?
Why does Trump take Viagra?
What did Iron Man call his cat?
How many graphic designers does it take to change a light bulb?
What language do birds speak?
What's the best way to stop a German train?
What do you call an army of corn?
Ever heard of the comedian who died gasping for air after his routine?
What type of wine does a gay connoisseur love?
How long does it take to sail from Dorne to Mereen?
Why do nerds masturbate with one hand?
How many dead babies does it take to paint a room?
What do you call cows that are best friends?
What do you call a artist with a rash?
What's the difference between former House Speakers Hastert and Pelosi?
What do you call a scary horse?
Why can't trump comb his own hair?
What's the most popular occupation in Italy?
What do you call a group of Chlamydia bacteria?
What do you call a confusing sharp pain in the ass immediately after a break up?
How do you pay a bartender?
Why is a laundromat a bad place to pick up women?
Why did the Indian girl suffer so much when she broke her leg?
What does Pingu say when he feels suicidal?
What's a Muslim's favorite TV show?
How many "friend-zoned" guys does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do people in other countries tell if kids are using drugs?
What do you call a hatred for large plants?
What is the advantage that Mexican workers have over everyone else?
What do you call a good looking girl in Wisconsin?
How many offensive jokes are needed to make people butthurt?
What kind of bug bites only at your feet?
How are women and airplanes alike?
What do nuns use for skincare?
How many dead prostitutes does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a pack of pygmies and a female cross-country team?
what would you call superman if he was deaf and mexican?
Why did Sally fall off her swing?
Why would you wear two pairs of pants while golfing?
Why don't many customers go to the tea house?
Where did the cantaloupe go for summer vacation?
Why did no gay people go on the mission to colonize Mars' moons?
Why couldn't Hitler fly a plane?
Why was the naturists wedding delayed?
How many Deadheads does it take to change a lightbulb?
(very dark) what's the difference between jews and boy scouts?
How many redditors does it take to change a light bulb.?
Did you hear that new joke about /r/news?
How many virgins does take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the man kidnap 100 children and kill 10 of them?
What happens if you try to sit on Death's couch?
What's the difference between onions and your mother-in-law?
Which country has many spaces to put your car in?
What U.S. state was founded by Muslims?
Why do priests like little boys?
Q1: what is a Jehovah's witness's favorite spice?
Ever heard a good joke about sodium?
What's the best airline to fly around the Seven Kingdoms ?
Why did the chicken knock knock?
What's the newest fitness craze sweeping American police forces?
If Valentine's Day is for couples, what day is for single men?
What does Donald Trump call the space between his balls and his butthole?
How many French words has the Turkish language recently adopted?
Why would Keemstar make a good NFL cornerback?
Why can't redditors sew?
What did Helen Keller say after she finished her bowl of cereal for breakfast?
What's the difference between a Pokemon Go player and a Facebook user??
How did worchestershire sauce get it's name?
Is 1+1 hard to calculate?
Why can't any of John Cena's opponents see him?
Why Did The Alcoholic Comedian Quit Performing?
You know whats sweeter than the sound of children playing and laughing?
Whats so great about banging 26 year olds?
What's the difference between a kid and a joke?
What's the difference between Muslim children and black children?
A capitalist is a man with capital. What is a racing car owner called?
Have you met the one-breasted Queen of the Jungle Retailers?
Did you know that 1/3 of the KKK is retarded?
Do you charge for circumcisions?
What has 16 balls and 3 pubic hairs?
What did the sheep use to shave before his wedding?
Did you hear about the sarcastic washing machine?
What's the hardest part about winning crossfit?
How do you know Tiger Woods is one of the richest people in the world?
Wanna hear a Nirvana joke?
Why does Mexico never win the Olympics?
What's the soft stuff between sharks' teeth?
What's the difference between a Blues musician and a Jazz musician?
How does Dracula eat his food?
What was the condiment stand charged with?
How many redditors does it take to change a light bulb?
How many fish did it take to kill my ex wife?
What do you call a constipated Benedict Cumberbatch?
What do you call a greedy Christian?
Did you hear about that Mexican train thief?
Whats the difference between a man and a government bond?
Why do so many dyslexic vegans move to Dallas?
What do you call a big Eastern European sausage?
What's better than two roses on your paino?
Why men shop at Costco?
Why do fish live in salt water?
Where do emos get their gaming gear?
What do you call a humpless camel covered in plastic?
What has one eye but can't see?
Misty wants to break up, but Ash asked why?
What's Red?
What's the first sign of AIDS?
What's the difference between broccoli and boogers?
What do you call a gay rubber band?
Dad Joke: What did the horse get on his oral exam?
What do you call Turkey's revolting soldiers?
What's the difference between STD's and Pokemon?
How does traffic form?
Where does general keep his armies?
You know who never looses their work when their computer shuts off abruptly?
Who was the roundest knight at King Arthur's round table?
What do you call four drowning Mexicans?
How do you know all Bernie Sanders' supporters are Harry Potter fans?
What do you call a really bad driver in France?
What did the corn chip say to the battery?
How do you get down off of an elephant?
Why are campers so predictable?
What do you get when you cross an agnostic, insomniac and a dyslexic?
What do you call a midget psychic that escapes from prison?
What do you get when you cross an octopus and a Mexican?
[Dirty joke] What's red and has 7 bruises?
Why did the wee duck hide in the cupboard and give the other wee fuck a fright?
What does Santa teach his elves?
What's the difference between a bag of cocaine and a 4 year-old child?
Where does a Turkey live?
[OC] Why did Pavlov ring a bell every time a breeze entered his room?
How do you get a Charmander and a Metapod on a train?
How do IT technicians prefer to be paid?
What's the difference between a lorry with good brakes, and a lorry with nice brakes?
How do you call a Pokémon GO player in a rye field?
What is not a truck crashing into people?
What's the difference between jam and marmalade?
Why wasn't the coup in Turkey on Wednesday?
Why aren't "Blonde jokes" funny?
What's red and smells like blue paint?
I escaped the terrorists of Iraq, wanna know how I did it?
Why did the kitchen cross the road?
Are your teeth cold?
Heard of that new product for removing gum that's stuck in your hair?
What has 9 arms and sucks?
What's the difference between a Dove and a Turkey?
What did the string say when the rope proposed marriage?
What do you call a homeless caveman?
What is orange and sounds like a parrot?
What happened when Turkey was accused of being Chicken?
What's the best thing about having sex with 25 year olds?
Why cant Mexicans smoke joints?
Why do dyslexics make bad joke tellers?
During lunch, what did one Soldier say to the other Soldier?
Why don't nice people ride the train?
Why does it suck to be black and Jewish?
Price of the GOP ticket?
How did Noah get the animals on the ark?
2 gay guys and 2 lesbians are Going to the beach. Who gets there first?
What is one of Austin Growlers's (the bear version of Austin Powers) most-famous catchphrases?
What do you call a midget hanging around a crime scene?
Why are Biblical scholars nervous about Donald Trump's pick for VP?
Who says building a border wall won’t work?
Is it really 2016?
How does a blonde like her eggs in the morning?
Did you hear the joke about butter?
What tastes good on pizza but not on pussy?
Why aren't pornstars of noble birth?
What do Popeye's fingers smell like?
What do mathematicians and dancers have in common?
How many Frenchmen does it take to stop a Semi Truck?
What did the sluttiest state say?
Did you hear the one about the latest terrorist attack in France?
What does a french truck driver shout during Bastille Day?
What do you call a grunge gardener?
The saying goes, "Behind every great man is a great woman. " How is this even possible?
Why did Ross eat all the Kit-Kats?
How well did the Mexican do for his class test?
Where does Sean Connery keep his guns?
What do you call a none in a wheelchair?
Did you hear about the tragedy in France?
What happens when a cow jumps over a barb-wire fence?
Knock knock, who's there?
Why are terrorists so mean?
What do you call a lactose-intolerant camel?
After the Heimlich maneuver what's the best way to stop someone from choking?
Why did the blind guy have a burnt face?
What did the muslim telemarketer say when he picked up the phone?
Time to ban High Capacity Assault Vehicles?
What kind of movies do scurvy circles enjoy?
What is the best way to cut a mango?
What do you call a group of people arguing about methods of self-pleasure?
What did the dolphin say to the frog?
Did you hear about the latest truck rampage?
What did the roman soldier say after crucifying Jesus?
What's the favorite chord of a pedophile?
Have you seen the clown that hides from gay people?
What do you call Drake and Josh obsessively watching anime?
What can you find between the toes of the African elephant?
What do elephants use for tampons?
Why couldn't Caligula get anything passed in the Roman Senate?
Which hurts worse: a kick in the nuts, or having a baby?
Why do black people play basketball?
What do you call a person who delivers horribly?
What do you call an Asian that has an extra neutron?
What's the highest form of flattery?
What will they call Mr. T after he dies?
What do you call a county that lacks a modern telecommunications system?
Why do kids with down syndrome wear shorts?
Did you hear that Auschwitz had to ask visitors to stop playing Pokemon Go?
What's soft, black, and red all over?
Have you heard the joke you are never supposed to tell a gay person?
Why do women wear panties with flowers on them?
How does a cougar obtain the perfect tan?
What is the best thing about Dwane "the rock" Johnson's physique?
What is the least favorite food place of the Chinese?
What is a penguin?
Why the story tells that Cindarella was at the ball?
How Long is a China-man?
What Pokémon can you find at Auschwitz?
Did you hear about the two nuclear scientists who are no longer speaking to each other?
Who may become a Prime Minister?
What lies on the bottom of the ocean and shakes?
What's black & white and can't turn around in an elevator?
You hear about Hideo Kojima's remake of Pretty Woman?
Why did the Seven Dwarves fire Snow White as their Foreman at the mine?
Why did the scarecrow win the award?
What do you call a drunk who happens upon the scene of a crime?
Why don't Pokemon cards ever have any typos?
What do you call a psychic midget who escaped from prison to go to Death Valley to shoot up?
What did the doctor say to the man who walked off the roof of his house?
Why is DJ Khaled's favorite number 11?
What's the difference between my basement and a Ferrari?
What's the dumbest animal in the jungle?
Why does Jerry Sienfeld clean up on tinder?
Pickup Line: How do you like your eggs?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a crab with breast implants?
What do you call a black man camping?
Why do bald men cut holes in their pockets?
How does a Welshman find a sheep in tall grass?
Why couldn't the two melons get married?
How fast can a bear run?
What did the bacon say to the sandwich?
What do you call a witch that only eats sand?
What kind of dog suffers most from being inbred?
What's the worst thing about a lung transplant?
What did T say to reassure V?
what's th difference between a gay man and a refrigerator?
How do you know if a joke is a dad joke?
What do you call an Irish phone technician who's always calling in sick?
What you get if you cross an r/jokes redditor with an author of books about the past?
What was the last thing the snowboarder ever said?
A T-100 is sent back to 2016 to terminate Trump and Clinton. Who survives?
Civil War Jokes?
How do you make a musician's car more aerodynamic?
How do you keep an amish girl happy?
Why shouldn't you change around a Pokemon?
What's the worst part about admitting to your friends and family you play PokemanGo?
What's small and green and smells like pork?
Did you hear about the holocaust museum banning Pokemon?
What's the temperate inside of a ton-ton?
What do you call a group of dogs?
What bill is the Congress's favorite?
What's the difference between a singularity full of booty and Jesse Jackson?
Why did the black med student wait all day at the rear entrance of the student cafeteria?
What's the difference between a drug dealer and a homosexual?
why did the latina girl get pregnant?
What do you call a girlfriend who does kegel exercises?
What do you call a sexually active spaghetti?
What do you call cum after dinner?
What do you call a cow having a seizure?
What do Winnie the Pooh and Ivan the Terrible have in common?
What do you call a barn full of black people?
Whats the difference between Usain Bolt and Hitler?
Why can't the armless girl comb?
How german are you on a scale on 1-10?
How do Jamaicans pronounce bacon?
What do you call a dwarf psychic who has escaped jail?
What did the waitress say to the man who wouldn't stop staring at her while she refilled his glass?
What's the difference between a joke and 3 cocks?
Why did the tractor trailer mechanic always have half an erection?
what do you call a sad tree?
What are the man with no shoes say when he was forced to walk on broken glass?
Did you hear about the cow that tried to hurdle a barbed wire fence?
What do a lesbian bar and a vegan's freezer have in common?
What do you call your friend from Prague who beat you at chess?
What do you call a deaf pokemon go player walking into traffic?
What's the difference between life and wife's rant?
Who's the most popular guy in the hospital?
Which news outlet has the most interesting Black Lives Matter coverage?
What is the similarity between a projector and an ugly prostitute?
What's a baby hen called?
How do astronauts make a party?
Which part of your body shuts down last when you die?
Where did Noah keep the Bees?
Why is the horse is Hitler's favourite animal?
What do bisexuals use for transportation?
What kind of superhero would Caitlyn Jenner be?
Did you hear about the guy who overdosed on Viagra?
What do you call a Mexican that lives in Maine?
Did you hear about the salad who went missing?
Who earns a living driving their customers away?
Did you hear about the fire at the cheese factory?
What do you call an Indian woman who sits in front of the fire with her legs open?
how many jews can you fit in a car?
What do people and trees have in common?
What is the pH of a public pool?
Did you hear about the constipated mathematician?
[Dark Humor]Why is suicide illegal?
Did you hear about the new corduroy pillows?
How is credit like cocaine?
What do you call sheep in the Middle East?
Where did Sally go during the bombing?
What's the best part about being an orphan?
Did you know a load of hairy gay Theodore Roosevelt impersonators had a meal in the park today?
Why do walruses just love a Tupperware party?
Why did the cat cross the road?
Did you hear about the topologist who got in shape through surfing?
Why did Sally cross the road?
What did the Officer say after arresting the crooked cook?
What kind of newspaper do cows read?
What's the difference between dreams and memes?
What do programmers hate more than fat women?
Where do you put dead typists?
What did Victoria say to Vancouver?
What's an argument in the Middle East but a compliment in the U.S.A?
What Does A Chinese Man Need When Taking his Dog Out?
How many surrealists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you defeat your enemies?
What do you call a tenor with erectile problems?
What do u get when u give a rodent date rape drugs?
What does a cannibal do after he dumps his girlfriend?
What do you call a nazi gardeners foot pain?
What is a prisoner's favorite punctuation mark?
What do you get when you have sex with an STD infested mentally challenged person?
What's the difference between training wheels and training bras?
What was the true purpose of the Ice Bucket Challenge?
What is the difference between Pokémon Go and Tinder?
What is called when an insurance company assesses a totaled car?
What is the difference between Donald Trump and Hilary Clinton?
What's the difference between love and lust?
What movie contains the most micro aggressions?
What job do you never stop training for?
what's the difference between light and hard?
How do you stop being an 18 year old Virgin?
What is skeleton?
What's the most popular pub in the Middle East?
What do you call ten Frenchmen who stand in front of their goalie for 90 minutes?
How many Germans does it take to make a negative?
What is an Hommish woman's fantasy?
Does French wine really taste like urine?
What is the difference between a feminist and a hockey player?
What's long, hard, brown and sticky?
Q: Why is sex like math?
What Overwatch character sucks at making original art?
What's Blue, Orange and Lying at the Bottom of a Swimming Pool?
How do you get a stranger to hop onto a bandwagon?
What's the downside to bigamy?
How did Jesus get so ripped?
How do you get a Twinkie pregnant?
How many reposters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a Catholic Priest and acne?
What do you call the unjust murder of someone?
What is a pirate's favorite restaurant?
What company makes the best fireworks?
Why did the kid eat his homework?
What's the difference between a chickpea and a lima bean?
What is Walter White's favourite brand of ketchup?
What did the other nose say to the other nose when it was crying?
What did the squirrel say when it saw the acorn tree cut down and taken away?
What is the name of your friend's advisor?
What do you call a white guy with a gun?
Why can't Intel-based phones enjoy Pokémon Go?
Hey girl, is your name Hoover?
Where do angry mailmen work?
Why did the undercover cop throw a wasp nest at the drug dealer?
How do Jews shower?
What's the difference between a pregnant woman and a light-bulb?
Who's the first Jewish guy to get a Heisman Trophy?
What's the worst part of going to a southern family reunion?
Why do lesbians shop at sport authority?
What's the difference between 50 Cent and the Ozone Layer?
How do you pick out the Christian Terrorist out of a crowd?
What do you call war fought with bees?
Who was the worst U.S. President of all time?
What does a cow who's a jerk grow up to be?
What are filipinos horror stories?
Ohio?
How many cops does it take the screw in a lightbulb?
What is Ramsay Bolton's favorite band?
What do you call a Time Machine that can only travel to one location in time?
Why are black people good at basketball?
KNOCK KNOCK.....WHOSE THERE?
Why did the Donkey Vacuum sell so poorly?
What do you call Nazis from San Francisco?
Did you hear about the lawyer selling moonshine from a van outside the courthouse?
What did Watson and Crick study to find DNA?
What's the creepiest body of water?
Why can't you trust an atom?
How much money do gay bars make?
When Johnny was late for class, his teacher asked why?
Pokemon?
What is the playing surface of the New Orleans Superdome called?
What are the spookiest sounds?
What do you call a black cop?
Why doesn't Coffee get along with milk in Germany?
What do people in Arkansas do for Halloween?
How many cops does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why do fat acceptance supporters make no sense?
What do you call a seagull flying over the bay?
What do you get if you cut an avocado into 6.02 * 10^23 pieces?
What's fast and breathes fast underwater?
What do Venezuelans like to eat with their cheese?
Child: do women have period on weekends ?
What do you call a guy who puts his right hand into the mouth of a great white shark?
What's it called when an Ethiopian does gymnastics?
What did the tectonic plate say when it bumped into another?
What did the DNA say to the mRNA?
What does a black policeman says when he looks in the mirror?
Why was 10 traumatized?
What did the sea say to the sand?
What's a tick's favorite food?
Have you tried the new, ultra-realistic vibrator?
So what do you do for a living? Im in organ trafficking. Fu** ! Dont you have a heart?
How many Pokémon does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the console games cross the road?
What do you call a short clairvoyant person who just broke out of prison?
-What's your zodiac sign?
In Pakistan, what's the difference between an elementary school and a terrorist training camp?
Foreigner? Why not fist her?
Why can't Hillary Clinton be called a female?
Why couldn't the scientist understand what the photon was saying?
Hilary and Trump are on a sinking boat. Who is saved?
How does a person with less than 50 dollars become a millionaire?
What do you call it when you hire your relatives to play with your nipples?
Why are you all sweaty?
Why does ISIS like sheep?
What do biology students do when they do poorly on a test?
What did the jewish barman do when they ran out of beer?
What's a thimble?
What was Anne Frank's middle name?
How do four gay men sit comfortably if there is only one bar stool?
What wind is best for footballs?
What's the best way to get to the front page?
What's cold, hot and chilly all at once?
What do you call a woman with one leg?
What do you call a mooner on the last overnight flight?
What do you call a chicken takeover of the government?
What is it called when someone gives birth to a 40 year old man?
Why did the DJ consider himself to be a part of the LGBTQ community?
What do mathematicians call people with glasses?
What's the generic name for Viagra?
What did the pirate photographer say?
What comes once in a second, twice in a minute, but never in a million years?
What does IDK mean?
Why did my sister go down to the fish market?
What is the best part of Pokemon Go?
How do you call Canadian people?
Which street does the police officer live in?
Why is it so hard to get to know Guantanamo Bay detainees?
Why are so many physicists non-religious?
What is it called if someone wears your bra?
What do you call an Irish bodyguard?
What do you call an Irish thief?
What does an Elephant use as a tampon?
Why did France really surrender to Germany?
What do niggers and twinkies have in common?
Why do people never eat clocks?
Why was Mac OS X hired as the prison guard?
What do you call the first Afghan off the boat?
What do you call a bulletproof Irishman?
Why can't Roman Reigns light a campfire?
What do you call a scary prostitute?
Why did the blonde feminist want to be cremated when she died?
What kind of bee can make milk?
What did the man say about the Jewish Bartender?
What does an elephant keep in his trunk?
Who always wins the insect election?
Why do white girls walk in odd numbers?
What can't I find on the internet?
What do you call an egyptian sun god with a colombian accent?
What's the difference between dead babies and salads?
what do you call a man with a rubber toe?
Why was Jesus crucified instead of stoned?
Why are miners always narcissistic?
What's the German super hero called?
What do you call a Bronie in the military?
What's a pirate's least favorite letter?
What rhymes with Pistorius?
What's Mr. Ts chain made out of?
Did you hear about the midget fortune-teller who was ripping people off with fake fortune-tellings?
What is the definition of disappointment?
What are the ten letters of the pirate alphabet?
What is the only result for Ear-rape?
[OC] What did Remus Lupin say to Nymphadora Tonks?
What do you call an anorexic with a yeast infection?
How Did I Make It To The Middle East?
How many "suh dudes" does it take to turn on a light bulb?
How are a hobo and a balloon alike?
What did one kid at the playground say to the other kid?
How does a Native American count numbers?
How do you kill a German?
What happens when you give a cow a joint?
Why do conservatives want everyone to own a gun?
What's a Pirate's least favorite letter?
Why did the restless Scottish man have a wet dream?
What does Apu say when people leave him to browse reddit?
Why did barbie never get pregnant?
Why does Britain love tea so much?
What does the bees do with their honey?
What do you get when you mix a dyslexic, an insomniac, and an agnostic?
How do you say hi to a Muslim in Hawaii?
Hi! This is my first time in a Fitness Center. How do I start?
Why did the Agnostic cross the road?
What do you call Bees that make milk?
Why were there 5 Mexicans in a Ford?
What do Jewish pedophiles say?
How do we know Mayberry's Andy Taylor was a Redditor?
What did the candy say as they saw a group of intimidating crackers approach?
Why did Eric Clapton switch from PC to Mac?
Who do you call about stray cats walking around your yard?
Why did the staff party go to jail?
Why was 7 afraid of 8?
What is the best way to receive downvotes on reddit?
What is it called when a Sailor in the Navy gets a care package from home?
What is it called when you get a bathroom hand job while listening to blues?
Why do cemeteries have fences?
A black man and an apple fall from a tree at the same time. What hits the ground first?
What is the difference between a Boy Scout and a Jew?
Whats a Mexican's Favorite Sport?
Hey baby, are you a gorilla exhibit?
Whats the most sexually frustrated food?
What is the most expensive type of fish?
What's the difference between a baby and a bowling ball?
What's the Terminator's favourite band?
Why did Tommen jump out the window?
Why is six afraid of 7?
What do you call a black guy who flies airplanes?
Why is it funny when there is ejaculate in the middle of a highway?
What month does Hitler hate the most?
How do you know you are dating a women, not a girl?
What do you call a bad joker?
What's the difference between a Baptist and a Catholic?
What's the difference between Hillary's e-mails and the UK leaving the EU?
What's the difference between jokes and dicks?
What's the most dangerous possession a gun nut will ever own?
Did you hear they had to shutdown Japan's first virtual reality porn exhibition?
How does Seth Macfarlane wishes you Eid Mubarrak?
What is a Jewish delima?
Why can't astronauts listen to music?
How does Donald Trump smoke weed?
Why don't prostitutes vote?
What do you call a Snake game that doesn't work?
What do you call a rocket-powered car?
What do you call a woman who is paralyzed from the waist down?
How to make a dog meow or your cat bark?
Hear about the guy who broke into a drug store and stole all the Viagra?
Why did the fish jump out of the water?
What do a trickster and a multiplicative inverse function have in common?
Did you hear about the midget fortune teller that escaped from prison?
Whats the difference?
What did one flag say to another?
What is the difference between a wife's argument and a knife?
Hillary and Donald are out in a rowboat. The boat capsizes. Who get saved?
What do you call bread so burnt it can never be ate?
What do you call a terrorist with cancer?
How is Donald Trump related to this post?
What did Jesus say to all the black people before he died on the cross?
What's the best way to receive down votes on reddit?
How do black people grow?
What is a Viking's favorite music?
What do mexicans cut their pizza with?
Why did the pillow cross the road?
Where was the Declaration of Independence signed?
June is over?
What can I eat in the evening in front of the TV that wouldn’t make me fat?
What do the NBA and the presidential election have in common?
How much do used batteries cost?
What's the difference between a midget chess team and a ladies track team?
What do North Korea and my girlfriend have in common?
What do you call a potato that's also a sports fan?
What is the most inappropriate thing to say to someone who just lost their job?
Does Bryan has a Cranston ?
Why aren't there any knock-knock jokes about America?
Know what the opposite of a dad joke is?
What do you call a Reddit cockblock?
do they have the fourth of July in the UK?
Why fart and waste it?
What do you get if you combine a sheep and a kangaroo?
Did you hear Uber and Lyft are merging?
What do you call a black woman with a draft between her legs?
hy haven’t you ever seen any elephants hiding up trees?
Where do clowns live?
Why did Monica Lewinsky vote Republican?
What do you say when a Polish magician performs a magic trick?
What's the difference between Britain and Australia?
Why did the suicidal man cross the road?
How many Freudian psychologists does it take to change a light bulb?
What does Donald Trump's hair get at the end of each day?
Why are there no knock-knock jokes about America?
What's the difference between Wright and Rong?
What do you call a Mexican on a riding lawnmower?
Why does Dr. Pepper come in a can?
What was the radioactive senior citizen's super power?
Where did Noah park his fish?
Have you heard of the new crime drama involving a rich dinner party?
Why did the blind man swing his seeing eye dog around by the tail?
What has four legs and one arm?
What do you call 4 Mexicans in quick sand?
Why did the cup fall over?
What do you get if you cross a duck with an avocado?
What do you call a tree that smokes weed?
What's a jawa's favorite type of pasta?
What's the difference between an asshole and a douchebag?
How do you fit four sailors onto a barstool?
What do you call it when Professor X does a wheelie?
What's the difference between a jew and a bullet?
Why couldn't the whistleblower pick up his dry-cleaning?
Why is it impossible to say no to french fries with cheese and bacon?
How many teenagers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why is a bad government like a bikini?
What does Justin Timberlake say when he goes to the bathroom?
Why did the old man sneak past the cupboard?
What happens when it hails in Overwatch?
What's the difference between a repost and a bullet?
How many suh dudes does it take to change a lot bulb?
What did King George think of the American colonists?
What did the guy without hands get for christmas?
What does a blonde think Ecuador is?
Why do women live on average two years longer?
What do you call a person of Irish and Asian descent?
What's the difference between a Jew and a bullet?
How do you say goodbye to your pasta?
What did one loaf of bread say to the other?
Why did the oak tree get his girlfriend pregnant?
Why does Noddy wear a giant red hat with a yellow tinkling bell on the end of it?
Why was the ocean always sad?
What do dads and grammar Nazis have in common?
What does a chemist say when he needs someone to pass the salt?
You ever hear of the Nazi strip club?
What did Terry-Thomas say before giving oral?
Mom, am I ugly?
What does a polite pirate say?
What do you call an atheist who no longer worships the Flying Spaghetti Monster?
How many clergymen does it take to screw a lightbulb?
What did the puffer fish say to the sea anemone?
What is the integral of to the x?
A mathematician, a physicist, and an engineer are asked "What is 1 + 1"?
What do you tell a girl with two black eyes?
What washes up on small beaches?
What do you say when you don't want anymore Heineken?
What do black spies call one another?
What do FBI agents grill for the 4th of July?
When lesbians get married, which one makes the sandwiches?
What did the ocean say to the lighthouse?
What does have eyes but can't see, has legs but can't walk, and has wings but can't fly?
why is it so hard to solve a murder in Kentucky?
Why wasn't the geologist hungry?
How does someone become a sex expert?
Why are criticisms of Donald Trump unfair?
What do you call a Jewish Tailor?
You know that friend that keeps borrowing money?
How Many Tickles Does it Take to Make a Octopus Laugh?
What do teens and cheap motels have in common?
What do you call a rapper who's feeling bitter?
What happens when you eat fireworks?
Why did the phosphorus atom go to the fortune teller?
What does a horny man living in Northern Russia need?
How does a woman hold her licker??
What is the process for a terrorist kidnapping?
Why are artificial eyes made from glass?
What is the hardest part about eating a vegetable?
Which animal is the faggiest?
When does CPR become Necrophlia?
What's the difference in roast beef and pea soup?
What does Obama say when he is given Kraft Mac n' Cheese instead of homemade Mac n' Cheese?
What does it take to make Mother Russia pregnant?
How does a muslim close a door?
What's the difference between an oral thermometer and a rectal thermometer?
Why did the hipster's Hot Pocket burn his mouth?
Can someone come by and make my door frame bigger?
What did the halal lettuce say to the halal cucumber ?
Why are black guys getting fatter?
what do you call a cat in a blender?
Why Republicans cannot swim as freely as they want?
Which athletes will not get Zika at Rio 2016?
What do you call a pig that's a lumber jack?
What side of a cake is the right side?
Why aren't Jews easily distracted?
What did the surgeon say to his constipated patient?
Whats an American cops favourite shot?
Why do white girls hang out in odd numbers?
What do computers snack on?
What is the difference between a politician and a mortician?
What's an SJW's favorite insurance?
What do you call a happy ending at a Jewish massage parlor?
What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea?
What sexual position does Canada prefer with the USA?
What do you call a Hispanic guy's quest to get gender reassignment surgery?
What do you call a chav in a suit?
Ya know what the Mesopotamians said to those who try to beat em?
How does a feminist know she's overweight?
Why didn't the lifeguard save the hippy from drowning?
What do blondes and the Bermuda Triangle have in common?
How do you turn a duck into a soul singer?
What happens when a cannibal decides to go vegan?
What do Jedis wear to Oktoberfest?
What's the difference between Jesus and Bono?
What if UK's politician changes the lightbulb?
What do you call DJ Khaled crossdressing as Hulk Hogan?
Did you hear about the two fat men who ran a marathon?
How do you turn a seal into a sea lion?
What is the difference between a baby and a onion?
What do you call two Mexicans playing basketball?
How many frat boys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a CIA agent that nobody cares about?
What do you call men who are addicted to sex?
Did you hear about the two bodies that got cremated at the same time?
If you're turning left with your car, which wheel steers less?
How are women and tornadoes alike?
How do you kill a hipster?
whats got two legs and bleeds..?
What stops rape every time?
What's a Saudis favourite drink?
What did C: drive say to D: drive?
How many fams does it take to get the sky lit?
Why Did The Hedgehog Cross The Road?
what did the soldier say to the other soldier when wanting him to get in the tank?
What does a nazi say to another nazi?
Why did Newton's wife got pregnant?
What's black, white, asian, and mexican?
What does a feminist get when she can't afford a punching bag?
Why didn't they tell Chris Christie they took his pony away?
What do you call a custard when it goes bad?
What's the difference between being tired and exhausted?
What's the difference between a white girl and a mosquito?
What do you call a smart person in America?
How do Chinese people say "hello" in Spanish?
What's the similarity to Group A streptococci and feminists?
A black guy and a white guy fall from a tree. Who hits the ground first?
Want to see a word that I made up?
When does a lamb become a sheep?
How many communists died during ww2?
What do you say to Jennifer Anniston after she has been stabbed?
How many tickles does it take to pleasure an anime character?
What do Monica Lewinsky and an Asian political correspondent have in common?
Why did the two tampons not talk to each other?
How do fat women defy physics?
What are the most common 3 words used all around the world?
What did the poles do during world war two?
What do narcoleptic people drink in bars?
Why did Kim Jong Un have so many books?
Q: Which polarising comic relief characters actions lead to the rise of a despicable leader?
Did you know the Dalai Lama has a gambling problem?
Can I talk to my son?
What flavour toothpaste do indifferent people like?
Where do farm animals get their groceries?
What's something that's red and bad for your teeth?
What is Rikon Stark's favourite brand?
How Dumb is Earl, Who Supports Trump?
What does aerosmith say when someone asks them for directions?
What was the Mexican owl's name?
Why shouldn’t you tell jokes about premature ejaculation?
what do you get when you put a roofie in lemonade?
What do you call a gunman who exercises?
What do you get when you cross an octopus with a black person?
Why was the welder such a gossip?
What does a Dingo call a pregnant woman?
Why couldn't the set designers plane take off?
How do Canadians say Milky Way?
What does donald trump use when he plays FPS games?
Why did the cocaine addict come off as really up tight?
Why does the ocean taste so salty terrible?
Whats black and hurts when you get it thrown in your face?
What's a Russian's favorite Italian meal?
How many posters who type 'r/antijokes' on this sub only do it for karma?
What do you call a cross between two KKK members?
Did you hear about the parrot who lives in a bilingual household?
Want to hear a word I made up?
What would be funny about Hillary as president?
How many new states will America get when Trump is elected?
What's the difference between illegal and unlawful?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Porsche?
How do I turn my new girlfriend on?
what does a black guy and midget have in common?
Did you hear about the new Harry Potter Movie?
What does supervillain Black Man need to do to escape the crime scene?
What did the duck do after he lost his wife, his job, and his house?
Why do moths fly with their legs spread?
What do you call a kangaroo stowed away on the curiosity rover?
what travels around the world but stays in one corner?
What do horses hope for on election day?
What do you get when you cross a motorcycle and a truck?
What did the grasshopper say to the sloth?
What do you get when you mix a Dog and a Rhino?
What do you call a Hispanic person holding a silenced weapon?
What's smaller than a teenie weenie ant?
Did you hear about the fight between two deaf people?
What do you call a masochist looking for a hookup?
Have you ever smelled Moth balls?
What's a Rock Doves favorite music?
If Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton get in a plane crash who survives?
what happens when a Dobbs or Firestone worker reach a certain age?
What's the different between England and a tea bag?
What is Hodor's favorite cereal?
Why was the archeologist depressed?
What clothing designer do vampires prefer to wear?
If Steve Rogers was a drink, what drink would he be?
How are STEM majors and inflatable slides the same?
What's Cersei's favourite band?
What does Sonic say during Ramadan?
Did you hear about the guy who fell into a waterhole?
How many boring guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Who is a penguin's favorite relative?
What's the difference between a pizza and a drummer?
Why was the pirate fired from the babyGap?
Spider on your bed?
What do you call a cheap wig?
What do you call a failing brand?
What do Spanish Muslims call their God?
Why doesn't Ellen have a cooking segment?
How much free space does Europe have ?
What do you call an antelope with 3 legs?
What did the Mexican Plumber call his second son?
How many illegals will it take to build Trump's wall?
What do japanese men do when they have erections?
What has two legs and bleeds?
What do you get when you cross an onion and a donkey?
Did you hear the theme song for new Lego Blade Runner?
Why can a man never starve in the Mohave Desert?
What do British girls do to hearts?
What's ISIS favourite meal?
What is big and hard and red and has hot sweaty dudes hanging all over it?
What did one butt cheek say to the other?
Where's the best place to buy jive cheese?
Did you hear about the girl who went fishing with four captains?
What happend to Tommen Baratheon?
Why do Jewish women love circumcisions?
What do you call the spot on the ground just bellow the red keep?
What Does Potato Do?
How does a Welshman find sheep in long grass?
What do you call a make-believe country for wizards?
Why was the four year old boy from Sierra Leone crying?
You know why Italians hate javohas witnesses?
What do you call a dead fly?
Do you know the difference between a man and a Government Bond?
What do Ted Cruz and an impotent Japanese man have in common?
Why was the 4 year old African kid crying?
What did the experienced guitarist say to the new guitarist that was nervous about playing?
How do you count a herd of cattle?
What do British people call concrete?
What do you say to a molecular biologist who's about to step foot into the ring?
Why did the vulture have to check some luggage at the gate?
What comes after Brexit ?
Have you heard of the famous cow?
What's the difference between a football match and a referendum?
What do you call a dude with a nipple on his head?
What happens when you put dick into vagina?
What is UK's favorite song line?
What does George Bush Jr and Michael Jackson have in common?
How can you find out the gender of an ant?
Why don't you need birth control when having sex with shit disturbers?
Have you ever had North Korean food?
What type of luggage only speaks in short sentences ?
Have you ever answered your own question?
What can you add to any food to make it taste better?
Why are so many doctors Jewish?
You heard about /r/politics?
What does a Jew with an erection get when he walks into a wall?
What does a perverted birdwatcher's list look like?
Are the Brits right?
How much money does the Government pay people with autistic disorder?
What do thanksgiving dinner and the refugee crisis in Europe have in common?
What do you call a file that is a petabyte in size?
Why can't student loan get a girlfriend?
Why does Black Widow love sitting on Captain America's shield?
What's Hodor's favorite cereal?
What do you get when you cross a pirate with a pedophile?
Why is Peter Pan's voice so high?
What do you say when somebody cuts in front of you in line for Vietnamese noodles?
How do you fix a car in India?
What do you call a hen staring at a lettuce?
What's the difference between au jus and a jew?
What does Hitler call a stomach ache?
How does Davey Crocket like his pie?
Why did all of Britain stop smoking pot?
Why did the clown started his soccer career?
What does a vampire on a diet drink?
What's the favourite beer of a jew?
What's a astronauts favorite food?
Do strangers shit in the woods?
Why aren't digital images of Bob Marley scalable?
Why did the EU start downloading random stuff to it's computer?
Why was Cinderella kicked out of the football team?
Whats the difference between English Breakfast and Irish Breakfast tea?
Why hadn't the law graduate and the bartender ever met?
Wanna here a joke?
What did the geologist say to his girlfriend before shagging her?
What do you call a closet full of lesbians?
How many mods does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a blind dinosaur?
What is the difference between a whale, a shark and someone from New York?
What do you get when you combine Reddit with dry humor?
What do you call a nice Canadian meal on a colorful roof?
Why did the firemen go to the classroom?
What do teenage terrorists drink?
How does a Welshman find sheep in tall grass?
Why are gametes best suited to advertising careers?
What drugs do cows take?
Why can't America play chess?
How do you say "virgin" in Dutch?
Hey dad, did you get a haircut?
Why did Lucy fall off the swing?
What's the difference between the mailman and the priest?
What did the sperm say to the egg?
Why does Superman have to wait until tomorrow to fight gang violence in LA?
How do you make a goldfish old?
What did the spring peeper (frog) say to the cow?
What do Lebron James and James Brown have in common?
How can tell if there's an Italian at the cockfight?
What's worse than ten children in one bucket?
Why don't they have showers on airplanes?
What do you call 4 Mexicans in quicksand?
what's the difference between a pilsner and a lager?
Why do people who drink milk struggle to walk?
How long does it take a group of Mexicans to build a building?
What do you call a faucet that won't give water to gay people?
Why did everyone disregard the midget's stand up routine?
What's a mostly red rainbow called?
What do you call a prostitute with a runny nose?
Why did Dwayne "The Rock" Johnson have to change his diet?
Why does Britain like tea so much?
What do you call a Black Priest?
Why have all Remain voters suddenly gotten so salty?
What is Rickon Stark's favourite band ?
What's black and sits at the top of stairs?
What do you call a dog in a sub?
Why father cheats mom?
What's the difference between awkward and awful?
Why jews have a big nose?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and a jew?
How do Asians execute white people?
What did the feminist say when someone talked shit about their favorite SNES game?
What is Rickon Stark's favourite band?
Where is Macau located?
What do you call a group of senior Japanese comedians?
Did you hear about the fish that went deaf?
Why was the tree in prison?
What is a terrorist favorite Pokemon move?
What has four wheels, and flies?
What do you call a Penis inside a Potato?
You know how I know we are gonna have sex?
Batman : Do you bleed??
why didn't the toilet paper cross the road?
Did you hear about the two men who were arrested for stealing a calendar?
What do you call an army of toddlers?
What was Bruce Lee's favorite drink?
What's at the end of every movie?
Have you seen the German Comedian that tells nothing but jokes about Sausage?
Why did the Weather channel go out of business?
What Do You See When Pillsbury Doughboy Bends Over?
What do you call a hip Arab?
wHy did the Chicken cross the road????
What happens when Keemstar and Ricegum have a baby?
What's the difference between Usain Bolt and Adolf Hitler?
How many twists does a feminist need to screw in a light bulb?
What did God say to Mary after impregnating her?
What tunnel did Jews go through the most?
What do you call a dog subbing for a music teacher?
What's an Arab's favorite car?
Why did Judy Hopps find it difficult to rise in her career at the police department?
What's the difference between a black man and a bench?
what's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
What did the other traffic light say to the other traffic light?
What's the opposite of a gay bar?
What did Gandhi fight for?
Why was hitler's suicide such a suprise?
Why did the pimp's garden dry up and die?
Why is India surprised by the Brexit vote?
Why is moving to Canada always plan B?
Is the EU working out?
What's the worst thing you can do when posting a joke?
How can you spot a blind guy at a nudist colony?
What does the doctor say after colonoscopy?
Did you know that all milk has to be sterilized before use?
Where do most pirates come from?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl using the restroom?
What did the sheep say to the farmers crop?
When do Jewish people believe the fetus achieves viability?
What do you get when you piss off the Avengers?
Did you hear about the new Brexit diet?
How does a gay guy remove a condom?
How much space is left in EU?
What's a word that starts with "u" and ends with "w"?
When is a booger not a booger?
How do you destroy an empire?
What is the capital of Greece?
What do they say when batman catches a cold?
What do you call a Mexican that had his car stolen?
What did UK say while leaving?
Want to hear a racist joke?
What do you get when you kiss a sick bird?
Whats the difference between jews and boy scouts?
What happens when a Jew runs in to a wall with a boner?
Why is Santa's sack so full?
[Gaming-Overwatch] Why couldn't the rocketeer hit her target?
How I broke my cat's knees?
What's the best time to go to the dentist?
What is the main reason people are voting for Brexit?
What do you call a pop-up book about circus clown suicides written by Animaniacs?
What do you call a man who's always in high spirits?
What kind of concert only costs 45 cents?
Why is there a flap on the back of the Navy uniform?
what do you call a poker player taking a shit in a forest?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and a Jew?
Where do orphans go when they're sick?
What did the executioner say to the prisoner?
What do you call it if a white person robs you?
What's the ugliest tree in the world?
What do you call a person with no arms and no legs?
What long and hard thing does a Norwegian wife get on her wedding night?
What do you get when your Grey Poupon dries out?
What's the difference between my penis and my jokes?
Where do Satanic cults get their candles from?
What's Mexico's national sport?
What does the Captain Kirk and toilet paper have in common?
Can you Nazi?
How Do You Create Artificial Intelligence?
Where do you go during a zombie apocalypse?
Why did the console gamer cross the road?
What did the T-Rex say when he stubbed his toe?
Why did Paul Walker die?
What is a pirates favorite letter?
What did the Flower say to the Bees?
What did the Jew say when he got beaten?
A&P Question: What are the two primary motions in Catholic feet?
Why did Simba's dad die?
Why are setups to jokes so important?
why did the blonde make her boyfriend jizz in her water every morning?
What do you call a cereal that boasts?
What's similar between communists and communism?
What did the deadhead say when he got out of rehab?
What do girls fear that's big, scary, and pink?
Why did the gamer and mathematician cross the road?
How do you get a baby out of a blender?
What do you call a sexually repressed bandit?
What's 9+10?
How many liberals does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call the urge to crack open a cold one?
What was the chicken eating pirate's favorite Elvis Presley song?
Why did the gamer cross the road?
What does it mean when a blind girl says you have a big penis?
Do you know why Michael J. Fox makes the best milkshakes?
What does a arsonist and a bartender have in common?
Why are chickens never invited to the party?
What type of bagel can fly?
Why should you be afraid of a white guy in prison?
What's the difference between a homeless man's testicle and a shot of lidocaine in the ass?
If rivers could speak, which river would always say no?
What's the difference between a sandwich and a baby?
What does a robot do after a one night stand?
What did the policeman do to his fear of the dark?
What is worse than biting through an apple, and finding a worm inside?
What's the most commonly misspelt blood group?
A: Do you miss your ex?
How do you ruin a good joke?
What do you call an unconvincing stick insect?
​Why do Catholic priests like Indian restaurants so much?
What is a Nazi's favorite breakfast?
What's the difference between Superman and Roman Reigns?
What is expected from ISIS women?
What do Germans look at on the internet?
What is the difference between a man falling from a 2nd floor and a man falling from an 8th floor?
Where do ISIS fighters go to purchase soda and candy?
Why did the guy stick guano up his butt?
How many children does an average Belgian have?
Where did the homosexual Indian get his car fixed?
How do you make a dumb person curious?
Did y'all hear the one about the tortilla song?
what is obamas last name?
What's more inbred than English monarchs?
What's the difference between a Northern fairy tale and a Southern fairy tale?
What do you call a bagel shortage?
what do you call a dog who sits on a bench and reads his newspaper?
How do you persuade the US Senate to regulate the laws on guns?
What do you call a crazy Mexican dog?
Hey Iggy Azalea, do you consider yourself an optimist or a pessimist?
Why do the melons have to have a traditional marriage ceremony?
What's worse than getting a penis drawn on your face?
What is a long room with many doors called?
What do you call a castrated Chinese?
Who is the best guitarist in the entire Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles universe?
What's the stupidest animal in the jungle?
What color eyes did Kurt Cobain have?
What do you call something that makes fun of people and can fly?
What do you call a large vehicle that travels the world serving breakfast?
How do you interrupt a vegans dinner?
How does a Jew do the gardening?
Who was the roundest knight at the King Arthur's round table?
Whats the difference between a jew and pinochio?
How do skeletons make a baby?
What are the hardest industries for men?
What's a Jew's least favorite thing about summer?
Why do hipsters burn their lips when they drink tea?
What do asparagus and anal sex have in common?
What kind of tea do koalas drink?
What's a Judge's favorite drink?
What do you call a singing computer?
What's the difference between a sorority and a circus?
What is Donald Trump's most effective form of contraception?
Whats long and black?
Q: What has 18 legs and catches flies?
What 3 things that tell the truth?
Where did Budd put his clothes when they got bloody?
What's the similarity between Donald Trump and mashed potatos?
What's Osama Bin Laden's favorite football team?
What is Fetty Wap's favorite time?
What's better than roses on a piano?
I'masinglesexuallyfrustratedastronaut.YouknowwhatIcouldreallygofor?
What do you call a kinky spy?
Wanna hear a funny joke?
What did Magic Johnson give his teammates after winning an NBA title?
Hi Operator, Can you connect me to Steph Curry?
What is the etymology of the word "politics"?
What do you call the butt end of a banana?
What did the Middle Eastern dishwasher say when his boss asked him what he did all day at work?
Why is the USA so bad at chess?
How do chickens get strong?
What is another name for a knife?
How do you turn a fruit into a vegetable?
how many people do you need for it to be a surprise party?
Why was the cab driver contemplating his life?
Q: How's your visit in North Korea?
What did the cat say when it got hurt?
Who cares that Bush did 9/11?
what type of cancer do mimes get?
What's the difference between a pre-pickled pickle and an ice tray full of semen?
What did one orphan say to the other?
Q: What word begins with M and ends in arriage and is a mans favourite thing?
Who sang the song "my own worst enemy"?
How do you call an extremely energetic terrorist?
What spice do you find in hell?
What's long, hard, and makes my ass hurt?
Wanna hear a racist joke?
Why did the coffee taste like mud?
How do you stop a Lion from charging?
So I went fishing with this Jesus guy. Boat started sinking. I said What do we do now?
What do pencils, poop and Golden State Warriors have in common?
Did anybody hear about Golden State?
What's a woman ideal husband?
how do you make something small warm when it only responds to gestures?
Why did Tigger look down the toilet?
What do you call a lad that put on his glasses?
How do Chinese people know what to name their children?
What does a parrot named Larry talk about?
[Dirty] How does Leia spend Father's Day?
Where do shoes receive their military training?
How does a pregnant black woman fight crime?
How did the quadriplegic cross the road?
Why can't owls breed in the rain?
How do french thank who save their files?
How does Kylo Ren celebrate Father's Day?
What did one bird say to the other bird when he played five aces in a poker game?
What do you call an asthmatic vampire?
How do you know when the Star Wars characters are safe?
Why don't orphans play baseball?
Why was Hitler so mean?
what's the definition of confusion?
Who makes the most money from Father's Day?
What's the most confusing day in Harlem?
What do you call conjoined twins with the same name?
What cheese do you use to coax a bear out of its cage?
What is a Mexican's favorite Olympic event?
Wanna know what 80 year old pussy tastes like?
What did the reporter say to the Jew when a Mexican yelled: "Heil Hitler"?
How many Hillary Clintons does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did Joe Hill say when someone asked if he was Joe King?
Tits man or arse man?
What is Nemo's favorite drink?
What did cinderella do when she reached the ball?
What is a terrorists favourite dessert?
Why did the alligator go to Disney World?
Is it ok to hate a certain race?
What is the difference between period blood and sand?
Did you hear about the guy who opened a cheese store in Israel?
Why do you have to separate red shirts when you put them into the laundry?
Can you people please stop being so condescending and passive-aggressive?
What do you say when you're comforting a grammar nazi?
How do you guys feel about that new drug-resistant superbug?
What do you call two doctors with the same career?
What did the lawyers say when they finished their basketball game?
Which is the quickest way to make someone lose?
Why does the Egyptian god Ra own every Periodic Table?
How can you tell, with 100% certainty, that no intelligent alien life exists that we know of?
What's the hardest part of roller blading?
How did the muslim get cancer?
Why does a stork stand on one leg?
What starts with "P" and ends with "ORN"?
What’s yellow and lives off dead beetles?
Do you know what is the straw that broke the camel's back?
Did you hear about the new sex app to help men get laid?
What did the tailor say to his customer after shortening the length of his pants?
Why does John Cena set his alarm at 1:59?
What do you call two Mormons caught in the rain?
What does a plankton name its dog?
Hans, are you a nazi?
What's a doll in Hell called?
Why aren't there any mexicans in star trek?
Why does a 6 oz hamburger have less energy than a 6 oz steak?
Do you know how to access gay porn?
Why are there so many gay people in Sweden?
What do you call a conservative Matthew McConaughey?
Why did the golfer wear two pants?
What do you do to a scientist after he dies?
Spanish? Feel tired in the afternoons?
Why do men like breasts so much?
What do retards wear on their heads?
Why do health magazines targeting hypochondriacs have so much trouble maintaining subscriber levels?
What is the most important object in a bodybuilders' karaoke?
What does an electrician say when he's confused?
Do you want to make a small fortune?
What's the difference between Java and JavaScript?
Why did jimmy eat his Homework?
What do you call a Mexican rolling in sand?
What do Dale Earnhardt and Adolf Hitler have in common?
Did you hear about the Chinese brother's that tried to start a German Empire?
What did the tin man say after he was ran over by a steamroller?
Why Trump will not build the wall after all?
What did the acorn say when it grew up?
How do you pick up a gay man in Orlando?
WHAT'S BETTER THAN A ROADMAN!!!!!!???
Did you hear the one about the deaf guy?
How can you tell if a gay guy is dead?
What do you call a female God?
How does one find out the sensitivity of a gentleman's balls?
What did Neo say when Morpheus said: "You've been living in a dreamworld Neo"?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a watermelon?
Why is Amumu always sad?
Why do SJWs hate Pong?
How many Hitlers does it take to change a light bulb?
What does a crappy Carpenter make?
What did the English teacher write when she needed to borrow money?
How do you stop a 200 pound hamster from charging?
What is the unit of power?
How did the Sex Ed teacher explain buttsex to her students?
What do you call a sarcastic Canadian cow?
What do you call it when a lizard can't get it up?
What do you call an Italian with two broken hands?
How do cows do math?
What’s the difference between men and women when watching video?
Why did it take a strong thief to steal a manhole cover?
What is atheism?
How many surrealists does it take to change a light bulb?
What would Martin Luther King Jr. be if he were white?
Ever hear about the optimist that was getting eaten by a lion?
What smells funny?
What does amnesia mean?
Why did Fetty Wap chose that as his stage name?
What do 6.28 people eat?
[racist] What form of humor is nonexistent in black culture?
How tall is a penguin?
did you hear about the Pervy shepherd??
Which country do doctors hate?
You hear the one about the default subreddits...?
What's the opposite of progress?
Why are stick people extinct?
What do you call a tortoise in a shell suit?
What do you call a cantaloupe who can't elope?
Why does Piglet stink so bad?
Did you hear about the cow who couldn't give milk?
Do you have oxygen and potassium?
What did the drunk penis say to the vagina?
How do you view gays? How do you View lesbians?
Did you hear that joke about mosquitoes?
Which program do Jedi use to open PDF-files?
Why am I against Donald Trump's wall idea?
What's the difference between your job and your wife?
What do you call a male cow with no legs?
What's Donald's new reality show going to be called?
What's the hard part about breaking up with a Japanese person?
What did the duck say to the cashier after buying some red lipstick?
What's the difference between Ronald McDonald and The Joker?
What's the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
What did the Mexican say when his house collapsed on him?
Why should you never buy golf equiptment made in New Jersey?
What's a Korean's favourite take on a traditional British meal?
What is Lil Wayne's favorite food?
What do you call a sketchy neighbourhood in Italy??
Why are all the archaeologists single?
Whats another meaning for a women?
What brand of shoes does a paranoid person wear?
Why do mermaids wear bras?
How did the hipster burn his tongue?
How did the hipster drown?
How did El Chapo explain his income to the IRS?
Why couldn't Miss Miller find the bug in her class?
What were the redditor's last thoughts at suicide-bomber camp?
What Do You Call A Struggling Artist?
Did you hear about the couple's resort that burned down?
Why would John F. Kennedy make a horrible boxer?
Can I major in Life Hacks?
Want to be hot?
Did you know Jesus was gay?
Why did the chemist join the Pentecostal church?
How do you find a drug dealer donkey?
Did you hear about the camper who refused to wake up?
Why do white people's feet get so dirty?
What do lawyers wear to court?
What do you do when your girlfriend starts smoking?
What's the difference between an "Ooh" and an "Aah"?
What does Iron Butterfly put in their margaritas?
Where do lions go if they lose their tails ?
Whats The Difference Between A Pick-Pocketer And A Peeping Tom?
What do you call it when a glum man gets crushed to death?
What's the difference between drunk people and black people?
What do you call an Ape that's afraid of heights?
Is it just me or am I the only one who enjoys solitary confinement?
Why did the cosmonaut forget to pack extra underwear?
What is a crow's favorite band?
What do you call Mexican Almonds?
What does 100% humidity mean?
What does the Muslim ghost say?
I make you wet and naked people turn me on. What am I?
How do you measure how sad someone is?
What did the Muslim say when he entered the Gay Bar?
Where do crows go to buy groceries?
Why can't an Indian dress well?
How does a neckbeard greet a tree?
what does the Jewish pedophile say to an elementary school kid?
Do you want to have patience?
What is the worst part about the Orlando massacre?
What's the difference between a white blood cell and a gay-bar massacre?
Hey did you hear about the Orlando shooting?
What do you call imitation Vietnamese noodle soup?
Did you hear the joke about the gorilla?
Did you hear about the wanking robot?
What do me and my fridge have in common?
Why does little Timmy keep throwing up gang signs?
How do you endanger the fly species?
What is the difference between Donald Duck and Donald Trump?
Did you hear about the dyslexic girl that developed bulimia?
What'd ya call 50 n*ggers at the bottom of the ocean?
Did you see the movie about oil and water?
Three beans travelled around Australia together, where was their final destination?
Whats the hardest part about rollerblading?
How do you make a napkin dance?
What do a yoga instructor and a Mexican restaurant that only serves water have in common?
Have you ever smelled mothballs before?
Why can't the hydraulic press guy bring himself to crush a can of sprite?
How do you kill a retard?
What do you call a mass that birds attend?
Did you hear the one about Hellen Keller?
What begins with P ends with E and has thousands of letters?
What do you call a gay drive by?
How do you turn a duck into a R&B Soul artist?
Did you hear about the shooting at the Dyslexic makeup factory?
Which traffic sign allows you to make a U-turn on a highway in the US?
How do you know the high heel was invented by men?
Why does Obama keep referring to the islamic state as ISIL?
Want to hear a good joke?
Where do Jews buy their clothes?
How do Australian bees please the queen bee?
what did the melon say to the cookie?
What degree did the butt get?
What does the L in Samuel L Jackson stand for?
How many pollsters does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the retarded kid finger his butthole with McDonalds tomato sauce?
What do gay people call each other on?
What did the blind, one-legged retarded kid get for Christmas?
How do you know when you're lonely?
How are a gay man and a microwave different?
What is the river of negation called?
What time does Sean Connery go to Wimbledon?
What do you call 5 gay people walking one way?
What do you get when you inject a goat with human DNA?
What do sharks eat for lunch?
What did one French Guy say to another French Guy?
How many Police Officers does it take to push a black man down the stairs?
How do you get certified as an interior decorator?
How many Bernie supporters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Boy scout: Sir, I found a snake, is it poisonous?
how many kids with A.D.D does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why can't Chinese people tie their shoes?
What did the Kiwi say to the Statue?
What happens when a dragon vapes?
How much does it cost a pirate to get his ear pierced?
What do you do when a blonde throws a pin at you?
What do you get when you cross /r/news with /r/getmotivated?
What do toys and boobs have in common?
How many feminists does it take to change a light-bulb?
What has 125 teeth and prevents a savage beast from escaping?
What did the motivational speaker say to the duct?
Did you hear about the man whose entire left side got cut off?
What do you call a bus that identifies with no gender?
What's a cherry's favorite sex position?
How does Davy Crockett like his pie?
Howcome you can't see elephants hiding in trees?
Why was there no food left at the Halloween party?
A man walks into a bar and kills 50 people. Who do you think cares?
What do you call a person who teaches you how to fart?
What do you call a Jewish baby in the womb?
How many servers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What does Kanye West call Kim Kardashian when she has a yeast infection?
What did they call the sugar that went to space?
Do you want to hear a pizza joke?
Why did nobody in the Orlando nightclub fight back?
What's Texas foreplay?
Ever wondered why written jokes about mailmen are generally unfunny?
How do you fuck someone up and get away with it?
Do you know why Abraham Lincoln never committed a crime?
What do you call a skeleton who just had anesthesia?
Why were the dinosaurs so big?
Bread lovers of Reddit, how do you tell your "Sandwich Artist" that they got your order wrong?
What do you call two Wii Us?
How many Fat Acceptance Movement activists does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a dog magician?
what is the largest dillema for jews?
What do you do when a blonde throws a grenade at you?
What's Keemstar's pornstar name?
What happens when a lamppost breaks?
Why does it always seem like models' hair is blowing in the wind?
What's the difference between prostitutes and onions?
What do people from the 1930's and /r/news jokes have in common?
What do you call an action of copyright law against a ghost?
What's the opposite of a pharmacist?
What do you call a white guy in an abusive relationship?
Why do Italians throw pizza onto the field after they win a match?
What do women and fly wire have in common?
How many /r/news mods does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a stoned reptile?
What's the definition of "de javu"?
What goes down but never comes up?
What's the longest time in which you haven't consumed alcohol?
How can you tell if a gay person is dead?
What's the difference between inlaws and outlaws?
What's the best part about getting a puppy?
How do you find Will Smith in a snow storm?
Why was the mechanic sad he had to replace a wheel bearing?
How do Hawaiians subtly enjoy a bad joke?
How do you know your S&M partner works in IT?
What does a woman and Kentucky Fried Chicken have in common?
ELI5: What is it like to mod r/news?
What do you call a cow with only three legs?
Have you ever tried Ethiopian food?
Why were Popeye's forearms so big?
Did you hear the new Whitney Houston album?
What's the difference between Kim Kardashian and the Titanic?
What genre is fish-created music?
What do you call a rich Arab man?
Did you here that Donald Trump wants to ban canned parmesan cheese?
Why can't Mexico field a good Olympic team?
Whats the difference between a pickpocket and a peeping tom?
Did you hear about Linda Lovelace's grandmother?
Why do they put half of the instructions in Spanish?
What does Obama call illegal immigrants?
What do you call it when your having sex with a smart girl?
What did the tree say while it was being transplanted?
What does a Jamaican do when he sees a spaceman?
Hey, wanna take part in a non-consensual sex scene?
What's the difference between telling a good joke and sex?
Why do Scottish men wear kilts?
What's an Asian pirate's favorite exercise class?
Did you hear about the cannibal who was late to dinner?
Do you have aspergers?
What do you call it when some Israelis find a genie in the desert?
[Meta] the hell is farcraft?
why don't black people go on cruises?
How does a ninja shop for groceries?
When do you use duct tape on a duck?
What did the blonde's mom say before the blonde's date?
How did the sailor deal with the death of his friend?
Girls from England?
What's the difference between Texas and stupid?
what do you call sick gun safety?
How do you know if an Italian person is mute?
What do you call a guy who falls into a Yellowstone hot spring?
What does a pedophile and a tortoise have in common?
What's the difference between Paul walker and my PC?
What are cats' natural predators?
What do you call six gay people at an amusement park?
Why should you be scared of a white man in prison?
You know what's the biggest turn off for me?
How did the farmer find his wife?
What's the difference between Jesus and picture of Jesus ?
Why is Klezmer music so addictive?
How do snipers communicate online?
What did the dominatrix say after she spanked the wrong slave?
What's a Pirates worst nightmare?
What kind of church music do they sing in Finland?
Where are Goblins from?
Why are sergeants so successful in physical contests?
What do you throw a drowning aboriginal?
Do you know why police dogs are called the K-9?
Did you guys hear that Donald Trump met with the Bilderberg group?
Why do they call wood carving "whittling"?
What's the difference between an awl and a saw?
How do fish get high?
What do you call a fear of chainsaws?
What is the gender of Iron Man?
Why do pirates like birthday parties?
What is a Jewish dilemma ?
What do you call a show about The Donald winning the presidency?
How do weathermen get up a mountain?
Did you hear Kimbo Slice died?
What is the 1# killer of men and women over 80?
What does Sonic say on the first day of Ramadan?
What is a name for a female lawyer?
What's the difference between a a women's track team and a tribe of pygmy's?
What seperates black people and white people?
What do you call a dog with an amputated leg?
What do Microsoft updates and Brock Turner have in common?
Why was the Boy having trouble finding power in the Cul-de-sac?
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton, and your ex wife?
What does a stoner order at a mexican restaurant?
Why are boats being driven into the side of the lake?
What has four letters, but a long sentence?
Why did all the Black people move to Detroit?
What country makes the most milk?
If a nuclear bomb was to Attack near you in 2 minutes, what would you do?
Are You a Gorilla Exhibit?
What do you call a mentally challenged Jew?
Who circles a dying gost in the desert?
How can you tell if a black man has been using your computer?
Q.How do we know there are so many environmentalists on reddit?
TOO MUCH PROTEIN?
Why did the gay man vote for Trump?
What happens to grapes when you step on them?
What do you call a Muslim father who works at a supermarket?
How can you tell if a black women is pregnant?
Why do Asians prefer Sony?
Do twins have the same size penis?
Why did the Trump campaign order its followers to destroy all fax machines?
What's the best part about fingering a gypsy on her period?
Why did the brothel run out of money?
You know what's weird?
What has three feet but no legs?
Quick question to the Game of Thrones fans, who knows the origins of "fual"?
What's the best way to pick up a Jewish girl?
What do you call a sleeping prisoner?
What do you call an elephant on drugs?
Found a dead box turtle on the trail. You know how I knew it was dead?
What did the deer say when he left the gay bar?
What do you call sandman when he robs you?
Knock Knock Who's there? Dishes. Dishes who?
What's white, black, and can smell fear?
Do you know the difference between curtain and toilet paper?
Why are members of the American Transplant Foundation similar to rapists?
What do you call a masseuse that only massages men?
Why do Ninjas always wear black?
What do you call one referee who tattles on another referee?
What do you call a menagerie of dogs with overactive bowels?
[science] Where do mushrooms go to university?
Why do a lot of tech recruiters have herpes?
As a North Korean, you know what really grinds my gears?
How does Jesus make his coffee?
What's the difference between a Jew and a dollar?
Hey girl, is your dad in jail?
Which Game of Thrones character doesn't stink ?
What do you call a trapped fly in a frying pan of stir fry?
Whats the difference between My computer and Paul Walker?
How many blondes does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did one ovary say to the other one?
Do you want to play the PNG government drinking game?
What do you get if you cross a Boxer and a Painter?
Why did the toilet paper roll down the hill?
What do nature and dogs have in common?
Why was the cemetery plot salesman upset?
What's worse than a dead muskrat under your piano?
How does Sean Connery shave?
Why'd the monkey fall out of the tree?
What do you get when you add root beer to a square cup?
What do Muslims and the BBC have in common?
How easy is it to get a song stuck in your head?
Where do psychopaths shop?
What do you tell a man with two black eyes?
What is the difference between a cat and a comma?
What kind of cars do jedis drive?
Who makes the best fried chicken?
What's the difference between a Priest and a Wristwatch?
What do you call cheese that's not yours?
Did you hear about the butcher who backed into the meat grinder?
What do you call a ford on top of a hill?
What is Beethoven's favorite food?
What do you call a beauty pageant for cartographers and magicians?
What did Muslim sonic say on June 5?
What's the difference between a PC gamer and a console player?
You want to hear a joke?
Where do Wildlings get their clothes?
What did the borg say to the medieval peasant?
What religion believes in the Big Bang?
Wanna join a group sex?
Why is the quadratic formula so cool?
Why can't bicycles stand up on their own?
Isn't it annoying when the first line of a post is the same as the title?
Have you ever seen those documentaries of people who clean themselves like cats?
Why do you want to be buried at sea?
What is Alzheimer's?
How a husband describe his wife?
Why do they call it Black Friday?
What did I have to tell the homeopathic drug addict?
What do you call an honest Iranian businessman?
What do you call a man with a shovel on his head?
What do cannibals put in their soup?
What did the black guy say when he got pulled over?
Why are hurricanes sometimes named after girls?
How do parents in Africa celebrate their kid's first birthday?
Did you read the news about corduroy pillows?
What's the hardest part of a vegetable?
What do you call a frozen Communist?
What does a gangbanger have in common with a soda machine?
Why was the neighbor's cat afraid of me?
What did Blizzard do on Warcraft's opening night?
How did the frog die?
What do you call a lesbian who drives a 7 seater?
What do you call a woman who raps about men being pigs, rapists, or murderers?
Whats the Difference Between AWD & 4x4?
Who's the shittiest pro basketball player?
What's the difference between Jesus and the painting of the Last Supper?
How many Hilary Clinton aides does it take to setup a private server?
what do you call a mexican working on the side of the road?
Why do the Scottish wear kilts?
Who's the nicest guy at the hospital?
what do vegan zombies eat?
What do you call a man who wears crisp packets as trousers?
Judge: You stand before me accused of being a duvet. How do you plead?
Why'd God make women pretty but dumb?
What is the worst piece in undersea chess?
What do you call a drug dealing church?
Can someone explain why the caveman SpongeBob memes are funny?
What do you call a pig plumber?
How Does a Woman Make a Man a Millionaire?
What do you call it when you spill meth into your cake mix?
What do you call a peanut in a spacesuit?
Did you hear about the campers with explosive diarrhea?
What do you get from a pampered cow?
What does the horny toad say?
What do you call a fat physic?
How do you tell the difference between a plumber and a chemist?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are on an airplane. The airplane crashes. Who survives?
What do you call an illegal immigrant and a pedophile fighting?
Why do priests wear underwear in the shower?
How to make a hormone?
Here's an offensive joke, what's black and white and eats like a horse?
How is Microsoft like a rapist?
How many Jews died in the holocaust?
What's the difference between a gun and a feminist?
Have you seen 'Wears My Penis?
Why isn't diving an event in the Special Olympics?
How did James Bond react to the news that he had impregnated a barely legal Bosnian gal?
What's the difference between a samoosa and a bikini bottom (Afrikaans pun with translations)?
What's a Christians worst enemy?
Did you hear the one about the fish stew?
Why do young girls go to the restroom in odd numbered groups?
How do you know when your roommate is gay?
Did you hear about the racist dolphin waiter?
How can you tell if a dictionary has been working out?
Why do stoners love English?
How do you kill a gorilla?
Why does Santa Claus have such a big sack?
Why did the bicycle stop moving?
What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea???
What's the name of St Thomas More's daughter?
What do you do if you break your arm in two places?
BOY: Dad , is a mermaid girl or a fish ?
What's the saddest thing about being a chicken?
What did Mario say when he found out he got drunk and had sex with a green mushroom?
What's worse than a poke in the eye with a hot stick?
How many potatoes does it take to kill the irish?
What is a physicist's favorite type of pants?
What's the most nihilistic vegetable?
Whats the difference between a catholic priest and acne?
How do Asian women test for pregnancy?
What do you call a crazy guy in a room full of mosquitoes?
What is a cancer patients favorite bingo number?
What do you call a punch that can knock out 40 first graders?
When did Sean Connery get to Wimbledon?
Why did Anthony Kiedis cross the road?
How many cats does it take to make a fur coat?
What's the difference between a pick pocket and a peeping Tom?
What's the square root of 69?
How many Apple employees does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between Jews and a bullet?
Why did the bee go to the doctor?
Why did the boy peek down the toilet bowl?
What do you call people who use the pull out method?
How do you catch a unique rabbit ?
What's the difference between Trump supporters and dildos?
What do recent college graduates and felons have in common?
How did we know Princess Diana had dandruff?
How do you take care of a baby?
What's balck on the bottom and white on the top?
What's the difference between a black joke and Mexican joke?
Q: Why can't Ray Charles see his friends?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a bucket full of shit?
What did Noah name the carpentry supply store he set up in Little Rock?
Why was the ketchup in the refrigerator embarrassed?
Q: Why does Michael J. Fox make such good milkshakes?
What do you call an octopus that loves jokes?
How do you know if a girl is on her period?
How do you get a guitar player to shut up?
What can you do with shitty pasta?
What happens when you microwave a DVD?
If you have a white friend who's being bullied, what does that make you?
What did the boy say when he had trouble using glue?
Who do you call a stupid whore?
How come men don't watch women's ice hockey?
What do you call a Mexican spell caster?
What do the people of Skyrim use to exercise?
How do you make something go viral?
What do you call "nigga milk"?
(Dirty) What's good on a pizza but bad on a pussy?
What's the title of the Blade Runner sequel?
How do you stop someone from having sex?
Did you hear that the LAPD is training the Australian Police Force?
How do you kill a vampire from New Jersey?
Why did linkin park wrap themselves up in plastic wrap before they jumped off a cliff?
What do you call a lemon staring at an elderly lady?
Why are vietnamese hookers the best?
Why don't Jehovah's Witnesses celebrate Halloween?
What race is Donald Trump?
How come Robert Di Nero doesn't work in Mexico?
Why did the chicken commit suicide?
Whats the last thing to go through the heads of the 9/11 jumpers?
How do you have sex with a fat girl?
What do Trump voters use as bookmarks?
What does death use to harvest souls during the summer?
Why are bakeries always so depressing?
How much did the obese man know about fitness?
Why do meth addicts prefer to do it doggy style?
How do you get a dog to stop humping your leg?
What does the narcissistic cow say?
What do you call a camel without humps?
What would be the most useless superpower?
Why don't chickens wear underwear?
What do the Golden State Warriors do when they're not playing basketball?
What did Bernie Madoff say to Bernie Sanders?
Who's the last one off the dancefloor?
What does sex have in common with a savings account?
Why can't you trust 8?
What are peas attracted to?
What do you call a bundle of hay in a church?
What do you call a frozen hamburger?
What do you call a midget with epilepsy that makes pizza?
Why were birth rates low in 1970?
Mum!! Please can you take me to the toilet?
How did you come up with your reddit username?
What do you call an alligator that wears a vest?
How many DonaId Trumps does it take to screw in a light globe?
What do you call an 18yr old with braces?
What breed will Donald Trumps dog be if he wins the election?
What do you call a person who is a bit of a jew?
What do you call a black Canadian?
What does a snowman eat for lunch?
How did the doctor know Muhammad Ali was dead?
What are the similarities between Cocaine and Gain detergent?
What do you call a girl who does from butt injections?
Who has better beer: Rabbits or Kangaroos?
What do you call an STI in your nose?
What's Shaking?
Hey girl are you an excavator?
What do you call a gorilla that got shot even though it didn't want to do anything wrong?
Why do SJWs hate cannibals?
What do you get when you step into the ring with Mohammad Ali?
What do you get when you cross an elephant with a rhinoceros?
How will Donald Trump decide which ones to deport?
A toddler is running at 5 miles per hour, and a train is going at 5mph. Which is easier to stop?
Did you know it was women who coined the term, "Bromance"?
Why did the hillbilly cross the road?
Why does Reddit have so many reposts?
How much cocaine can Charlie Sheen do?
Bro have you tried this new kush?
What stretches further, skin or rubber?
What's the difference between a pill and my penis?
Did you hear about the chickpea freedom fighters?
Why is Batman so jealous of Superman?
Why can't the T-Rex play the piano?
Why should you never trust an atom?
What did the roadman say when he saw the Mona Lisa?
Why does it take 1 million sperm to fertilize one egg?
What do you call a one eyed horse?
How does ISIS cool down in the summer time?
Whats brown and rhymes with snoop?
What did the bad soccer announcer get in his stocking?
what's it called when you're secretly a norse god?
What's Gordon Ramsay's least favourite movie?
What's long, hard and has cum in it?
Would you slap your cousin for $1,000,000?
How high are you?
D'you want to hear a spoiler for the Jumanji remake?
How can you spot the blind guy on a nude beach?
What are prostitutes paid?
Whats the difference between a Physicist and an engineer?
What Chinese name means 'wolf'?
Why did the hipsters die of dehydration?
What do you call a monkey terrorist?
Why do snakes have no balls?
Why don't babies work?
Can a kangaroo jump....?
What's the difference between Trump and Bush?
How do two black boards settle their dispute?
How do you offend a vegan?
What do you do when your dishwasher breaks down?
What's the difference between a hooker, your girlfriend, and your wife?
Why was a happy couple weary to kiss at the gas station?
What's the difference between Bluetooth and The Titanic?
What do porn stars have and comedians are?
Why don't black people get presents for Christmas?
How many sound technicians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you say when someone hands you a nice, ripe blunt in Germany?
What is the most Spanish body part?
What do you say when you see your TV floating at night?
Why are you late?
what is an idiot?
What has 72 legs & 26 teeth?
What's the difference between racism and chinese ?
Did you hear about the man with five penises?
Did You Hear about the Gender Identity Problems among Robots?
What do you say to a black guy with a job?
why are people so disgusted when someone farts around them?
What's black, grey, and red all over?
Q: If a man's signature is called a John Hancock, what do you call a woman's?
How do you become a snack lawyer?
Why did the goat stop trying to break out of jail?
How do Reavers clean their spears?
A black man and a Mexican are in a car , who's driving it ?
What do you call a car full of nuns?
What did our parents do to kill boredom before the Internet ?
What do you call a suicidal Shinto?
What do you call dark French people?
What do you say when your GIF doesn't work?
Does your girlfriend have 67 protons?
What do you call robots that have had their genitals cut off?
Why didn't the physicist like his cheesecake?
What do you call a Jewish piano?
Is the French city Nice pronounced Nice or Nice?
Where does the Lego man get his drugs?
Whats Asuma sensei's favorite jutsu?
What's the difference between a man and a woman?
What's the difference between negligence and falling off of the empire state building?
Whats the Difference between an Atheist, a Christian and a Dog?
What do you call an Australian who discriminates against different types of rice?
Why dont you ever see elephants hiding in trees?
I have a question of the most importance!?
How does Spongebob cut a rug?
How do you fix a broken gorilla?
What did Scooby Doo ask Shaggy for to order online porn?
What do you call ISIS after it has been completely destroyed?
What's Jewish and runs?
Can someone help me decide which Nirvana album to buy?
What does a guy from Philly dunk his pretzel in?
Donald Trump and Hilary Clinton are on a sinking boat. Who survives?
What would make Batman really salty?
What's is the difference between ignorance and negligence?
Why won't Monica Lewinsky vote for Hillary as president?
What do you call two hookers fighting?
What animal has bad memory and climbs mountains?
What do you Call a Six Fingered Jew?
What did Miss Piggy say to Kermit at the end of their first date?
What do you call a Transformer that's also an optometrist?
What is the most popular baked good in the porn industry?
Why don't Canadians have many orgies?
Why don't they let gansters play Quidditch?
What do you call a Grandfather Jew?
What sound does a chocolate bird make?
What's the difference between light and hard?
At Little Cesars, what do the prostitutes do?
What do you call a Mexican fighting a Catholic priest?
Why are Toblerone's triangular shaped?
Dad joke: What time do monkeys poop?
Where does an 800 pound gorilla sleep?
How do cows go from one town to another?
My SO thinks this is a very funny joke... is it?
Where did Sally go when the bombs fell?
What do you call people who make pedophile jokes?
What's the difference between a women's doctor and a kick returner?
Why is the part of a woman between her hips and her breasts called a waist?
What has two eyes but can't see, two wings but can't fly, and two legs but can't walk?
what did the Magic The Gathering player say to the big booty hoe?
What's the worst thing you can hear while taking the bus?
Why do Scottish men wear kilts instead of jeans?
April Showers Bring May Flowers. What do May Flowers Bring?
What's worse than nine eleven?
Did you hear about the fly that sat on the toilet seat?
Where live the knights of the round bed?
What is the easiest way for a stressed astronaut to unwind and decompress?
What does Donald Trump order at Panda Express?
WTF is a palindrome?
What did the comedy club proprietor say to the FedEx guy?
Why does America use the imperial system?
I hear something. Do you hear that?
How do you make hard cider?
Whats Jesus's favorite gun?
Why do the Lanisters have such big beds?
What do you call a queue of boxers?
How do you fit an elephant in to a subway?
(time tarvellers only please) Who remembers the 2016 presidential race?
Why do dentists only want to be awarded with paper certificates?
What is Kanye West's favorite type of audio file?
What to you call an Eskimo peeping Tom?
Want to know why I look terrible?
What's a homophobe's favorite drink?
Want to know a Harry Potter riddle?
What do you call an attractive ghost butt that is at max poop capacity?
What's the difference between the Welland bus terminal and a Lobster with breast implants?
Did you hear about the librarian who was in a traffic accident?
What is the difference between a Peeping Tom and a burglar?
What kind of drug is /r/theRedPill?
Why did the cat die under a truck?
What do you call it when one guy demands that another guy go to the movies and give him a hand job?
What did the kitty say when it ran for mayor??
What do you get when you keep two Lannisters in the same room for a bit?
Why are informaticians always confusing the dates of christmas and halloween?
What's the difference between your wife and your work?
An emo and a leaf fall from a tree at the same time. Who hits the ground first?
Did you hear about the dairy farmer who got kicked off his farm for not having any livestock?
Why do they call it P.M.S.?
Why is it such a mess when grapes reproduce?
What's a rock group with four guys that don't sing?
What's the difference between a hooker and a lawyer?
Why did the bee get married?
Anzac Jokes?
What do Ethiopians have in common with Yoko Ono?
What's the difference between American and European kids?
What is the ultimate Jewish conflict?
How many suh dudes does it take to change a light bulb?
What's something Comcast is giving you, besides crappy service?
Why isn't Bernie Sanders campaigning in OKC?
Why didn't Anne Frank finish her diary?
Have you heard about the new super-sensitive condoms?
How did the dictator make it easier for power companies to do business with neighboring countries?
What is Cersei Lannister's favorite American city?
What type of luggage talks in short sentences?
you know how Hitler used to tie his shoes?
What is a German's favorite number?
Why do console gamers use their in game names in real life?
Why Marxists are not good at object-oriented programming?
What's the most problematic time of day?
What did the British man say to his wife after sex?
What's the difference between President Obama and a bucket of shit?
What's long, green, and smells like bacon?
What's Sarah Palin's favorite thing to do in the summertime?
How did the rabbit know his wife was cheating on him?
Why didn't the failed theoretical physicist use the restroom?
What's the difference between a boy scout and a Jew?
What's the best way to get a Jewish girl's number?
Why did Trump refuse the debate with Bernie?
Did you hear about the rhyming Indian woman?
What's a hot dog's favorite article of clothing?
What do you call sex on a beach?
What do you call it when you accidentally drop a flower?
Why aren't there any Jewish gangsters?
When does CPR become necrophilia?
Damn girl, are you Daenerys Targaryen?
What is a Muslim womans favorite amendment?
What's the top song by the Vietnamese Beatles?
What's brown and smells funny?
Why JFK doesn't wear hats?
Why are there no headache tablets in the jungle?
Why should you never play poker with a crocodile?
How many Suh Dude's does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you clear out an Iraqi bingo parlour?
Why do shower heads have 11 holes?
Why would the jewish cannibal eat you?
What dog is the worst at polishing a turd?
What's the difference between a man biking to a job interview and a clown on a unicycle?
Who answers the Crime Stoppers Hotline?
How does an ethiopian open a beer?
What do you call a gorilla who magically smokes weed?
Why was the cheese so sad?
how would you describe US with first four alphabets?
Why did the railroad thief get caught?
How do you make an elephant fly?
Where do porn actresses wait for their turn in a baseball themed orgy?
What's a great dating app for pedophiles?
Why do irish fried beans only have 239 beans?
What did Caesar say when he ran into his friend at a music lesson?
What does a gay bird-keeper do for fun?
What does a transgender person call their sibling?
What kind of cheese can be used to build a structure?
Why are melons so lonely?
If the cow says moo and the cat says meow, what does the dog say?
What did dick say to the condom?
Does it mean you have a small dick if you never got a toothy blow job?
Was Snoop Dogg being serious when he changed his name?
You know what's pretty cool?
Why do rednecks like to do it doggie style?
Why do most blind folks not skydive?
What was the first porn movie about Rappers called?
Why couldn't Donald Trump cross the road?
what is the best way to smuggle drugs?
What are pedophile's favorite shoes?
Why do tectonic plates wear diapers?
What's the point of Jewish football?
Why are Australians so well balanced?
Why do carcinogens want to give us cancer so badly?
Whats the difference between a good haircut and a bad haircut?
how many Morgan Freemans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why do the Marines call it Parris island?
What's big, black, and explodes when shaken?
What do you call a large group of people who spit on others?
Why is Jesus so sexually frustrated?
How do you turn soup to gold?
What did the SJW say to the person who had just been blackmailed?
What do you call an old man whose retarded?
what do you call the offspring of two lesbians?
What do you call an environmental bicyclist?
Which state has the most progressive bathroom laws?
What is a dentist's favorite time of the day?
Why is air like sex?
is this already a joke?
Why hasn't Donald Trump ever finished a novel?
Don't you hate it when people attach little steering wheels to their penises?
Why was the cow's house empty?
How much is the jackson five worth?
How much does a paint-job on your car cost?
Student: Are you the new English Teacher?
What is the Arabic word for Priest?
How do you weigh a Hipster?
What is Gollum's favourite bird?
How many optometrists does it take to change a lightbulb? One or two?
What did the cheese say when it looked in the mirror?
What comes out of the mating of a donkey and a bunny?
What separates man from animal?
Whats the difference between a shower thought and a joke?
What do you call it when you turn into a vampire before being bitten?
Whats BNAG?
Why don't SJW's like guns?
What instrument do skeletons play?
What do you call a hooker with diarrhea?
What's the difference between a prostitute's vagina and r/Jokes?
What happens when Captain America drinks water?
What do you call a guy who stands under a bull?
What do you call a helpful potato?
How did Godzilla get the job opportunity?
What is a Catholic choir boy's favorite song?
Whats Hitlers least favourite pokemon?
What do you get when you put a tomato in your mothers shoe?
What do you call an armoire that is secretly used as a closet?
Why didn't the melons get married in Vegas?
Why does Donald Trump take anti-anxiety medication?
What wears a bright red suit and knows if you've been naught..or nice?
Who makes coffee for the U.N.?
What do you call a stupid piece of shit?
What's the difference between an apple and a baby?
You ever fingerbang your girlfriend while on her period?
What is the most annoying part of boiling vegetables?
How do you keep a baby from crawling in circles?
If April showers bring May flowers, what do Mayflowers bring?
Who were the world's fastest readers?
What do they call the 13th floor in England?
When is it too cold to build a snowman?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs in a pool?
Did you hear that Oxygen and Magnesium went on a date?
What is Donald Trump's favourite music album?
Remember when you were a kid and when you cried your parents said, "I'll give you a reason to cry"?
What does the chicken give you?
What do you call someone who can't turn pancakes?
Did you hear about Kurt Cobain's new album?
What do they sell at aloo's snackbar?
Why do farmers put bells on cows?
Why can't you play Uno with Mexicans?
Want to know something really bad and dirty about me?
What do you call a stoner when horny?
Why did no-one want to play a game with the leopard?
Why don't people tell Chemistry jokes?
What is the difference between jam and jelly?
What do you call money on drugs?
Who wins the battle of the sexes in Ireland?
Why women prefer devils instead of angels?
Where would Helen Keller park her car?
How do you annoy people on Reddit?
What do you call a snake that works for the government?
Whats the diff between EROTIC and KINKY?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and Hitler?
What did Mr. Cena's fiancée say on their wedding day?
What's the difference between a musician and a suicide bomber?
What does an obese white woman have in common with a brick?
How do you find Will Smith in a heavy snow storm?
ARE YOU GUYS ALL RIGHT?
what do you call it when a cop goes to a rub n tug?
What do you call the entrance to a prostitute's house?
What did the man say after he was hit by the car?
What do you call a Finnish terrorist?
What kind of farm has lots of books but no livestock?
Why wasn't Daredevil in Civil War?
How many Vietnam vets does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is the difference between Dubai and Abu Dhabi?
Did you hear about the guy who robbed a kitchen kaboodle?
What do you get if you fuck someone in the ear?
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton and an acronym?
Why did Germany lose WW2?
What does a pornstar say after a short day at the set?
So what are you doing today??
Where did little Timmy go during the bombing?
What is a Snake in a Cage ?
What do you say to a depressed, overweight person?
What do you call a vagina that talks back to you?
THREADS:Why so many repost from top-alltime?
Why did Thor not invite many people to his brother's wedding?
What kind of bees produce milk?
What's the biggest lie of the Universe?
Where is Macau?
What 's the difference between an emo and a cat?
Why are ships' portholes round?
What does a Jewish man get when he runs into a wall with an erection?
Why are cripples always made fun of?
What's the hardest part about being a pedophile?
How do you know you're at a gay BBQ?
What does a good bar and a good woman have in common?
Did you hear about the African man who refused to accept the fact that he couldn't swim?
What's the hardest part about eating a Vegetable?
What do you call a lawncare company owned by a promiscuous lesbian?
How do you confuse a polish laborer?
Dang girl are you a CS map?
Best Mary Jane joke you know?
What kind of bee makes milk?
What's the difference between Mighty No. 9 and a gay guy?
What is Shaka's favorite Japanese food?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs inside a volcano?
How do you find out what gender a stray cat is?
If there's a bee in my hand, what's in my eye?
JEllo hooker?
What do you call an Italian pizza chef with an erectile dysfunction?
What's Emperor Palpatine's favorite kind of cheese?
What was the Olympic lifter missing from his bar ?
If cancer and AIDS had a love child, what would it be called?
What do you call a racist in the dark?
What do you call a city-dwelling dwarf that keeps perfect time?
What superheroes refuse to fight in North Carolina?
What is Mike Tyson's favorite song?
Where do poor meatballs live?
What do you call a religious capitalist?
What's the difference between a drummer and publicly traded stock?
What do you call a carpenter who needs fewer nails?
ADHD cure (Dark?
What do you call an Angry Bird who just got back from the spa?
What's orange and white and stops at sunlight?
What's the main use for leather in the world?
How does a skeleton solve a problem?
What's the number one cause of dry skin?
what phone service do traveling nuns use?
What's a comedians least favorite drink?
How do you call a gay person from Russia?
Why does the dwarf laugh when he runs?
What's the similarity between concentration camps and your mom?
You know what's the difference between a housewife and a politician?
Why did Hillary cross the road?
Did you here that Michael Jackson died of food poisening?
Why don't Jews make good bakers?
Has anyone seen the movie Constipated?
Where Did it go?
Are you half decapitated?
How does a crazy person travel through the woods?
Where do Muslims go when they die?
How to tell the difference between a bad, a good and an excellent accountant ?
What do you call the tech. at the vets who has to give injections to cats?
Knock Knock. Who's there?
What do you call the sweat on your balls after sex with your cousin?
How did the headless chicken cross the road?
What's the worst part about eating your vegetables?
What do you call a dachshund with no hind legs and balls of steel?
What's the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chick pea?
How did Adolf tie his shoes?
What is juicy on the inside, dry on the outside, and has "apple" in it?
How many reposts does it take to change a subreddit?
Damn girl, are you a maple syrup tree?
Trump for President?
What do you call a dog with two vaginas?
Why did the Mexican throw his wife into the river?
How many dead hookers does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear Donald Trump was in a fantasy action movie?
What's the difference between Mexicans and Jesus?
Did the first woman who lived long enough to stop having her period reflect on her achievement?
Why are pornstars so religious?
What is the population of Somalia ?
What's the purpose of Barry Chuckle's job at British Gas?
Do you know why Adolf Hitler didn't win World War 2?
Why do no communists drink Earl Grey tea?
What’s the difference between Michael Jackson and a Disney movie?
Where does a mansplainer get his water?
Best joke ever?
How does a Plutonium Gun sounds like?
Why did the blonde get fired from the M&M factory?
What begins with S, ends with X and will change your life?
What’s six inches long and two inches wide and drives women wild?
You know what's a funny thing I like to do in my past time?
What's Leonardo Dicaprio's least favorite dessert?
How do you depress a room full of geeks?
What does Batman take with his drinks?
What do you call a musician Trump supporter?
How do you make a baby cry twice?
What does Mr. T say when he walks into a buffet?
Why did Cher go nuclear when the shopkeeper didn't give her the receipt?
How do you sink the unsinkable?
Did you hear about the girl who died in the Italian restaurant?
How do telegraph operators apologize?
Why do Marxists only drink herbal tea?
Why doesn't the U.S. government allow students to visit North Korea?
What did the scale say when it was going to drop a fresh mixtape?
Why did the gentleman hold the door?
What do math and mermaids have in common?
(Music Theory) Why do composers win debates?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a pencil sharpener?
Why are so many blind people religious?
How many Mexican reposters does it take to make me mad?
What do Europeans call fat European guy ?
What does cow shit do?
Why is stormtrooper always late from work?
What did Obi-wan say to Luke at the Chinese restaurant?
Why are bad jokes like dead babies?
What do you call a loud Trump supporter?
Why do atheists scream out 'oh my God' during sex?
What did the polar bear's wife say when she couldn't bear his tantrums any more?
What happened when Honey Boo Boo's mom lost 120 pounds?
What did the sign in front of the Drug Rehabilitation Center say?
If a dove is the "bird of peace" then what's the bird of "true love"?
Why do people with heart disease always lose at poker?
What did the mallard yell in the drive-by shooting?
Why aren't people afraid to submit reposts?
What do you say when you are comforting a grammar nazi?
Why did Russia sign the non-aggression pact with NazI Germany?
Why did the skeleton burp?
Whadya' call a Mexican sinking in mayo?
Did you hear about the chameleon who couldnt change colour?
Has this happened to you ?
Why are bees the superior species?
What has 6 legs and goes "Ho da do, Ho da do Ho da do?
Why couldn't the man marry the melon?
Pretentious?
What is the best vegetable delivery vehicle in the world?
what happens if you cross breed spiderman and Catwoman?
Why couldn't the retarded man talk normally?
What's the key to finding love?
What do you say when trying to catch the elevator?
Why did the campfire turn into a forest fire?
What's the difference between a hipster and a homeless man?
How did Wendy die?
What kind of dog should you get a spanish speaker?
What are Hillary's convictions?
Did you hear the joke about the alarm?
What's the wurst thing about being a black Jew?
Why are black people so good at basketball?
Wanna know the difference between a street performer and a hobo?
Why can't Vin Diesel differentiate Thanksgiving Turkey from his best friend?
Why don't any American football players wear glasses?
Did you hear about the escaped gang of Jamaican stabbers?
What's green, fuzzy, has four legs and would kill you if it fell out of a tree and landed on you?
What would happen if Muslims didn't practice Ramadan?
What was the bridge player's political view?
What's the worst hereditary disease?
Why did the cat befriend the dog?
Why was Marc Antony still interested in Cleopatra even when she's just had a baby?
Whats the difference between Reddit and a Taco?
What's the difference between peanut butter and jam?
What did the police say when they finished interviewing Dylann Roof?
Q: What’s the difference between a Catholic wife and a Jewish wife?
How does a Jewish bird chirp?
Why was the gay man bad at lying?
Why is the pool table green?
Did you hear about the fisherman who was sad about the big one that got away?
What did the orphan poker player say?
Why should transgender people get separate bathrooms?
What do you call a dead body and two planks?
What did the Jewish woman say to her partner?
How many trannies does it take to change a light bulb?
If a picture is worth a thousand words, then how much is a dank meme worth?
Can't remember, does anyone remember the joke about the nut behind the wheel?
What's the worst thing about being in an incestuous relationship with your own father?
Why do midget's laugh when running?
What Austrian girls and wine have in common?
Why are commercial flights always cheaper for vultures?
Why do people nickname Cersei's kids after sandwich meats?
Why was the lion alone and disheartened?
Whats the fastest way to cut down a tree?
Did you hear about the guy who got his whole left side cut off?
Did you hear about the Casino that hired a Blacksmith?
Cure for Aids/Cancer is the solution mathematical?
Did you hear the one about the deaf man?
When two ants want to run away and get married, who do they seek for help?
Why don't they have Oktoberfest in Africa?
What is JigSaw's favorite genre of music?
Want to hear a joke about Russia?
Did you hear about the depressed man going on a cross country road trip?
What do you call an expert that studies sign language?
Why did the little crab keep all the treasure for himself?
How long does it take for a Homeless man's stomach to be full?
How many Irishmen does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why do black people only have nightmares?
What did one meme say to the other meme?
What do you call it when George Thorogood farts on a throne?
Why is CoD: Infinite Warfare set in space?
What's the difference between a fridge and a gay guy?
What's the easiest way to get a little head?
Why did Mary Magdalen love Jesus?
What do you call an Irish sniper?
How can I give myself a 12 inch penis?
What's it called when you have sex early in the day after a funeral?
Knock knock? Who's there? Come in. Come in who?
What's the difference between Isaac Newton and the baby I just killed?
Why did the Romans pay their soldiers in salt?
Where do computer scientists go to have a drink?
What's the difference between eating out pussy and drinking American Beer?
What's the national bird of Pakistan?
Did you hear the joke about the sewage back-up at the juice bar?
Why did the gay man wear a Nicoderm patch?
What's green and eats nuts?
What do you call a dirty ear?
What do you call somebody with no body and just a nose?
Would you marry again?
Why do so many people like Harry Potter?
What did the alien say to the cat?
How do you start to politely tell someone that their God isn't in the stars?
How did the T-Rex feel after his workout session?
What's up?
Hillary and Donald are in a plane that crashed. Who survived?
What is Trump's favorite disney movie?
Could eating a lot of spaghetti make me a better dad?
Where is the best place in town to buy marijuana?
How do Jewish kids learn to count?
You know why you shouldn't eat spaghetti late at night?
Why didn't the American get the burger?
How do you get Sigmund Freud to screw a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a tire and 365 used condoms?
What's ET short for?
What do you call a homeless college student?
What did the coach say to his star player after he pissed his pants?
How can you tell that God is a man, and not a woman?
Why are children's birthday parties never held in outer space?
Why did the hard drive crash?
What goes over the water, and under the water, but stays dry?
What days are strong days?
u know whats funny?
Did you know musicians have a special bone in their body that helps them play better?
What do you call a person who is outstanding in their field?
How do you know a joke is a repost?
What is the difference between ID and ED?
What do you call 10 Mexican kids in a school?
Did you know Helen Keller had a dog?
Why am I just so naturally funny?
Who has seen more black dick than all the Kardashians combined?
How do you stop a rhino from charging?
What's the best Disney song to listen to while having a threesome?
Do you know any columbine jokes?
What did the man say after he forgot to pull out?
How are the homeless like votes?
What's the difference between cereal, bagels, and babies?
Are you my homework?
How many 'sah dudes does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is it called when you sleep talk about your subconscious feelings ?
What do you call a funny psychic?
Why are popcorn just like people?
What do elves learn in school?
What do you call a fat alien?
Have you heard the joke about the kid who was deaf?
How do you kill a vegan?
What's the difference between America and a pot of yogurt?
Why black people can't be seen in black and white movies?
Why did the doctor go the furniture store?
What do you do if a women assaults you with a knife ?
What do you call a guy who gets drinks for a fat girl in a nightclub?
How do you get out of jail in Mars?
Why do so many college kids need free healthcare?
What is the similarities between Bernie Madoff and Atoms?
Why do New Zealand farmers now wear kilts?
How do Mexicans greet Dr. Seuss?
Where did Sally go during 9/11?
What do you call a robbery at a bakery?
Why is six scared of seven?
What do you call a Mexican drowning in a vat of cheese?
Why did Hellen Keller's dog run away?
What's a monks favorite song?
What is God's favorite guitar chord?
What do you call a lizard on drugs?
What's the difference between Iron Man and Iron Woman?
What do a necrophiliac and an alcoholic have in common?
What is a gingerbread woman's favorite thing to wear for a porn film?
What's the Pope iTunes play-list name?
What does an engineer use for birth control?
[META] What's the deal with reddit being obsessed about puns?
What do you get when you visit the dentist with a dollar?
What does a walrus have in common with tupperware?
What animal is best at playing hide and seek?
What happens to a girl with anxiety when she sees a Spanish person?
What is long, black, and smells like shit?
What was the ancient language Link needed a book to translate in "A Link to the Past"?
What do you call an automatic goalkeeping machine?
What do mutiny and an orgasm have in common?
When to leave your girlfriend?
How did Jared lose 40lbs?
What do you call a gun inside a church?
What's the difference between a white bodybuilder and a black bodybuilder?
What are the two best arguments against democracy?
Why were the Beakers all packed and moved out of the university lab?
How do black people say their vowels?
How do your organize a space party?
What's the difference between Iron Man and Iron Woman ?
What is a group of hooligans acting like they are Vietnamese called?
What do you call the High Sparrow who is caught molesting kids?
What did the sheep say to the sheepdog faking deafness?
What's worse than a baby stapled to a tree?
What was the engineer's reaction to his wife being too heavy?
" What's the difference between snowmen and snowladies?
What did the Swedish chef say to his girlfriend when he found out she was pregnant?
What's the scariest thing about a white man in prison?
What do you call a Filipino yoga instructor?
What's the difference between a Jew and a pizza?
What do French labor reforms and French citizens have in common?
What's the difference between a corvette and a blowjob?
Do you know the difference between 5 minutes of blowjob and 5 minutes of sodomy ?
Why haven't any subscribers to r/TheRedPill played Overwatch yet?
What is a nickname for any black man?
Why is your shit tapered?
What you call a black priest?
What's got 9 arms and sucks?
Why is it impossible to mistake a penis for a vagina?
What do you call a song being played 100 yards away that makes people pass out?
Did you hear about the accountant that audited the greengrocer?
What does Michael Vick do in a plane?
How did the Manicurist feel after her salon was robbed?
What do you throw a drowning Mexican?
Why illegal immigrants are never seen on dvds or cassettes?
What's the most fucked up thing you can do to a blind person?
Why did Romeo and Juliet break up?
What's a pedophile's favorite music scale?
What begins with an "s", ends with a "x" and leaves a guy blown away?
What do you get when you make a condiment out of an expensive car?
How can you tell if a farmer is a good farmer?
How many Dragonball characters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you get when you mix a fly, a snake head, and Mickey Mouse?
What do you call a group of paralyzed hippies?
Why can't Ray Charles see his friends?
How do you get an emo out of a tree?
Who knows why my face is so repulsive?
Whats the most stupid thing you've seen a Bernie Sanders supporter do?
What does the United States and your asshole have in common?
What does a man say after sex?
Why do black men cry after sex?
What do you call a cow masterbating?
Are you being followed?
what do you call the most famous canadian hacking group?
How, would you answer this question?
What kind of bird does not make babies?
Why does Middle Eastern civilization have no major accomplishments?
What's a foot long, is as hard as wood, and is slippery?
What do black people do after sex?
How many Hal 9000 computer systems does it take to change a lightbulb?
WTF?
Why is Paul Walker and Rihannas new song the same?
Why there are so many avenues in France?
What do you call a gay keyboard layout?
What did the hungry boss give his worker?
What did the man ask the bush after being attacked by it?
Do you know what I miss about my childhood?
What is Walt Jr.'s favorite movie?
What is red and green, and goes over 3000 miles per hour?
Hi, what can I get for 25 cents?
How do you save a suicidal procrastinator?
What has a beginning and an end, but nothing in the middle?
What do you call a woman with a purple vagina?
How do you keep a club exclusively for straight edgers?
Did you know your kitchen faucet might raid your house?
Why did the shower heads at Auschwitz have 11 holes?
What did the baby corn say to the mommy corn?
what's another word for "religion"?
Why does Ken fit in so well on reddit?
What do you call a skateboarding preist?
What word starts with N, ends with R, and you never wanna call a black guy?
If Microsoft created a dynasty, would it be called the Bing Dynasty?
What is the difference between a joke and three dicks?
Why did Levi invent such nice trousers?
What's the difference between Mr. Jokes and Mr. Dicks?
I farted...want a spoon?
what has more brains than kurt Cobain?
What's a pedophile's favorite musical scale?
What do you call it when a really large number marries a small number?
Why did Karl Marx hate Earl Grey?
Q: Why couldn't Hellen Keller drive?
Why do Hutterites children pretend to be pirates?
What do gays and my car have in common?
What do you call a love triangle between a white person, a black person and a native american?
How did the feminist die?
How many surrealists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Who was the only president that was not guilty?
How do the Irish cure a hangover?
Why did the kid cross the road?
Why cant Miss Piggy count to 100?
What do you call a lesbian version of Grindr?
Has anyone heard the joke about the baby with AIDS?
Why do feminists always complain about video games?
What is faster Hot or cold?
Why do chicken coops have only two doors?
Why did Donald Trump pardon the Mexican pole vaulter who jumped over his wall?
What's Al Gore's dancer name?
How does Soylent Green taste?
What do you call a chicken staring at lettuce?
What do you tell someone annoying you need a moment?
What do you call a deaf dog?
How do porcupines hug?
Why did John F. Kennedy take a cab home?
Why'd the dog cross the road?
Did you hear about the comedian who was arrested for domestic violence?
Why did the man break up with his girlfriend who had a lazy eye?
How did Jesus stay in shape?
What do you call a kid with no arms and an eyepatch?
Did you read the novel about the US drug epidemic?
How many kids with ADHD does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the Mexican civil war last so long?
What are the two dirtiest farm animals?
Have you ever eaten an eyeball?
Why does Donald Trump insist on Mexico building the wall between at the US/Mexico border?
What lies upside down a hundred feet in the air?
How do you make a salad wrap?
What is the difference between 400 dead babies and a watermelon?
What do you call an Asian woman who lives next to a data centre?
What's Jacob Sartorius' Favourite Anime?
What's the Difference between Michael Phelps and Hitler?
How are Dale Earnhardt and Pink Floyd similar?
Wanna read a really dirty joke?
Why do people carry around umbrellas?
What's a nickname for a procrastinator?
What's the difference between a woman and a man?
What do you call a Spanish matador who is not very good at his job?
What wood doesn't float?
How many vegans does it take to change a light bulb?
What do this joke and a vacuum cleaner have in common?
How can you tell if your son is gay?
Shall We Try Different Position Tonight?
How can you tell when an idiot's depressed?
How many dothraki does it take to open a door?
How do you kill 200 flies at once?
What do you call an angry prostitute?
What do you call a shooting at a Mexican golf course?
What did the Jewish guy say to the atheist?
What's a Dragon Ball fan's favourite food?
Why can't you put two dicks in one condom?
Why don't poor people go to funerals?
Did you see the movie about the demolition team?
What do you get if you put 20 blondes in a row standing ear to ear?
What did the Borg's existential brother say (Star Trek)?
What do you call an abortion in Prague?
Why does Jesus hate M&Ms?
Why do Canadians like doggy style so much?
What do you call an astronaut that doesn't like being touched?
What animal do psychiatrists bring in to mental hospitals to help patients with social anxiety?
Grandad: hey Sonny, what's the name of that German?
What did Bill Gates say to Steve Jobs?
What did the milk say after it got beat?
How do you know if an introvert likes you when you're talking to them?
Why do bird watchers invest so much money in breast cancer awareness?
What is the name of your car?
What is Hitler's favourite game?
What do you get when you cross a pig and a Christmas tree?
What was Hitler's favorite letter?
Why did the bad demon burn after finding the length it took to rise diagonally from hell?
Why does the US love Israel so much?
What do you call nuts on the wall?
How are Fabio and a bagel the same?
What will they play at the presidential inauguration if Republicans win?
whats the difference between Congress and a condom?
How many Redditors does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you calla nosy pepper?
Why are redneck murders so hard to solve?
What do you call a Mexican midget?
Guy exposes himself with a boner and is arrested. How did he get off?
Why did the bartender put on a sweater?
(Amazingly, an original joke!) Where will they put Deadmau5 when he dies?
Is there any upside to living in Switzerland??
How do you kill vegetarian vampires?
Hey you hear about that gay midget?
What do a woman and a bar have in common?
Why did the agnostic man cross the road?
The one good thing about Hitler?
What does a cannibal do after dumping their girlfriend?
How do you surprise Helen Keller?
Where do Star Wars rebel officers eat?
Why did Hitler get hit in the face with a baseball?
What do you call an addiction to dead black people?
What does an egg say when it gets turnt?
What do you call a slutty toaster?
What did Stalin say to all the thousands of people he killed?
What did the Dog say to the Chipmunk?
What's the best part of having Alzheimer's?
How do electricians meditate?
What do you call 100 black people on a plane to Africa?
How do you get a hippy pregnant ?
What do you say to a girl with a black eye?
How do you know if your room mate is gay?
How do you create Offspring?
What do Prostitutes offer?
What do you call a happy cow?
What did the sea monster have for dinner?
Why Are Cats Bad Debaters?
Why are black jews the worst off race?
What do you call the fourth musketeer if he's gone to the dark side?
Have you heard of the pelican?
Did you hear about the guy with the right side of his body removed?
Why did the Pokemon Company offer me a role in their upcoming TV Series?
Why did Hitler lose WWII?
What happens when you text while driving?
What is the best "bang for your buck"?
What's thr difference between the chinese and racism?
Why do Pokémon have eyes?
What do you tell a woman with two black eyes?
What do you get when you cross an atheist and a christian?
How much of northern Canada is habitable?
What do you call Nightwing in a coffin?
What do you get when you cross a retard with a gang banger?
Why was Luke Skywalker late?
Why are black men taller than white men?
How can you tell when the Mexicans have moved into your neighborhood?
How many immigrants does donald trump need to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a pop star that marries Rowan Atkinson?
Have you ever tried to eat your own watch?
How do you put an elephant in a safeway bag?
How to you get rid of the dandelions on your lawn?
What's better than winning a Silver Medal at the Paralympics?
What is the difference between a baby and a mars bar?
What did the bra say to the hat?
What's the difference between an oral and a rectal thermometer?
Did you hear about the Woodstock Killer?
How did one pothead greet the other?
What do you call a guy who has sex with bums?
What's the difference between a golfer and a skydiver?
What do you call chickpeas cooked in a waffle iron?
What's the difference between a Ritz and a lesbian?
You hear the one about the transgender student?
Why should you never hire a Jewish plumber?
Who's the grumpiest pirate?
Wanna know which brand of glasses I have?
What is the tastiest car ever?
Why are atheists so dumb?
What do you call two guys above a window?
Did you hear about the dog who committed suicide?
Why are airplane crashes in the ocean so visible?
What did Darth Vader say to Admiral Motti after browsing his collection of George Michael records?
Which Greek god was annoyed by his invitation to the Goddess Dyslexia's party?
What do you call a Hispanic midget?
Whats the difference between a dollar and a jew?
Did you hear the one about the Mexican train bandit?
What has caused Caitlyn Jenner to put on weight?
How would you describe frankenstein's birth?
Interviewer: Where do you see yourself in five years?
Who did the ghost-boy write to during his trip to ghost-summercamp?
What do you call a clean, good looking well behaved monster?
What's a similarity between Hitler and Gordon Ramsey?
How many TSA agents does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's a Cuban's favorite song?
Did you hear about the score of the football match between Egypt and Ethiopia?
Where do poor noodles live?
What happens when you give a lawyer Viagra?
What's Ludacris' favorite cheese?
What's E.T short for?
What's Ned Stark's favorite cereal?
Know what's the best part about my supervisor having an identical twin?
You know how to make a tissue dance?
What is grey and comes in quarts?
How do Jewish children tie their shoes?
How many Suhhh Dudes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why do tampons have strings attached?
Why don't ants like to have sex?
Why couldn't the redneck kid play baseball?
What was wrong with Han Solo's "Hanburgers"?
What kind of guy enjoys a girl on her period?
What is the most common pickup line in a gay bar?
Why do you never see a pregnant plane?
How long does an owl live?
How do you stop an Internet troll?
What did the defendant say when he saw his picture hung up in the courtroom?
How many psychologists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What does a gynocologist and a pizza man have in common?
How many "friend zoned" guys does it take to change a light bulb?
What did one frog say to the other?
What did the man eat for breakfast that was so outlandish, not even he could believe it?
Why did the hipster cross the internet?
What do you call a know-it-all that likes doing bad stuff to kids?
Why can't Harry Potter tell the difference between his cooking pot and his best friend?
Whats's better than roses on your piano?
Q. What is the color of the wind?
How do you call a homosexual, German bird that happens to be a father?
Q: Why did Xzibit cross the road?
Q: What size of sweaters do seagulls like?
What does a lawyer, a pine tree, and a hydrogen atom have in common?
Why are dwarfs so good at math?
How do you make a Kleenex dance?
Why doesn't Hermione keep her money at Gringotts?
How do you make a Cat sound like a Dog?
What's so meta that you almost crap your pants?
Would you like to know the best way to avoid drama?
What does a junkie use for protection during sex?
Where do the stormtroopers like to eat?
What's the difference between a tuna, a piano, and a tub of glue?
What do you call an organization that does demographic surveys of energy weapon owners?
What did the sign on the closed brothel say?
Why is the Energizer Bunny such a slut?
What do you call a chiropractor in Egypt?
Did you hear about the woman who got Alzheimer's after removing her breasts?
Q: What do you call a boy named Lee that no one talks to?
Did you hear about the pirate captain selling cheap corn?
What did Ernie say when his friend tried to convince him he was ice cream?
Sweatshirts are my favorite thing to wear, like am I wearing a bra?
What is the most religious martial art?
Why did the cowboy buy a dachshund?
Why is Coolio always able to play craps?
Why did Soviet dictator always drive an automatic transmission?
Why do Jews have such large noses?
What type of meat do catholic priests eat on Friday?
What did Obama say to Dalai Lama at last peace conference?
That kid didn't really find a lost Mayan city. The sites that promoted the story?
Why was the comedian so depressed?
What do you call a white goose?
What fight style involves fighting for money?
How many mangoes make a dozen?
whats the difference between my driveway and 14 year old daughter?
Have you heard about the insomniac agnostic dyslexic guy?
What does a terrorist tell hes son?
Why couldn't the leopard play hide and seek?
What is it called when Batman leaves church early?
Why is does a chicken coop have 2 doors?
What do you call a Chinese conga line?
What do fat girls do in the summertime?
What do a plate of homemade brownies and a golden shower have in common?
Did you hear about the mooning emoji?
What do you call two hobos hitting each other with cardboard?
Why do toilets flush after getting pissed on?
Why did the dog chase the bulldozer?
How do you make a chocolate omelette?
What kind of tree likes a high five?
How does a gay religious terrorist spend his vacation in Cuba?
What is the only bent straight line?
Why does Donald Trump hate Casper the ghost?
How does Donald Trump plan to silence the terrorists?
What do you call a French bathroom with a bomb in it?
Who Let The Dogs Out?
Did you hear about the gay Irish Dentists?
What happened to the guy who replaced his laxatives with Prozac?
Did you hear about the blond who got hurt while raking leaves?
what do redditors and dick pics have in common?
What did the student say to his math teacher after his dog ate part of his homework?
What's the difference between an epileptic corn farmer and a hooker with diarrhea?
What's the difference between the United States and some yoghurt?
Why do you give children who swallowed poison some milk?
What do you call someone who pretends to be gay?
How do two psychiatrists greet each other?
Who makes more money a drug dealer or a prostitute?
Why did the hotel refuse hospitality to the Navy?
Why is the second traffic citation always easier to read?
What was Jesus favorite games?
Q: Why did Adele cross the road?
What do you call a feminist sea creature?
What would you call Macaulay Culkin if he was black?
How do you stop an elephant going through the eye of a needle?
Why did the French chef commit suicide?
How did Sigmund Freud die?
What do you call a joke on drugs?
What is the greatest right given to Muslim women?
What do you call the opposite of a cynic?
Why is there a "D" in fridge but not in refrigerator?
Why do rappers always get arrested?
What did the bartender say to the girl that tried to steal a drink?
Why did Rick Astley get fired from his job at the video store?
What do French people do when vacationing in Laos?
What did the oyster say when the monster broke into his home?
Why didn't JFK ever like vodka?
Did you hear Peter Dinklage got pickpocketed?
Did you hear about the failed Indian musician?
Why do Jews love sandwiches?
Did you hear about the snarky prisoner who smarted off to the guard on the elevator?
Why was the Nigerian toddler crying?
Did you hear about the midget psychic wanted for questioning about a murder?
What did Trump say to the Human Cannonball?
What do you call a group of philosophers?
What happens if Russians fall from an Afghan boat?
Why should civil war be taken seriously?
What do you call a melon that will be single forever?
How did Micro-soft get it's name?
What did the pamphlet say to the booklet when it asked for help?
How do you make a Snoop Dogg martini?
Why was the wildlife reserve worker weeping next to poached rhino?
Why do feminists always seem so unhappy?
How do puppets have sex?
What is the Hulk's favorite fruit?
Why do women fake orgasms?
How do you tell if your eggs are rotten?
What do you call a collection of memes?
What is a pirate's favorite statistic?
What type of car did Yoda eat?
What's long, hard, black, wet, and full of seamen?
What's the difference between most complex life forms, and the internet?
What's Forrest Gump's Password?
I bet you want to hear a ghost joke right?
What has 3 legs and 3 eyes?
What's the useless skin around the vagina?
Whats the best part of having sex with a transgender?
What do you call a mollusk on a boat?
What do you call a person with native american ancestry and alopecia?
A: What are you planting???
What do you call an alien that's also a pedophile?
Why do women have orgasms?
With what do Mexicans use to cut pizza?
How do you hold your liqour?
What do you call four white guys in a band?
What is Donald Trump telling Barack Obama supporters?
What do a moped and a fat chick have in common?
What is a difference between Jesus and a Picture of Jesus?
How did the elephant get into the room?
What's the difference between KFC and China?
What's the best part about banging twenty two year olds?
What do you call an arranged marriage between two communists who don't like each other?
What did the vegan say to the celiac?
What did one galaxy say to the Lagoon Nebula?
What did Hitler say when he ran out of soap?
Who brew in the jewish house down the street?
Why are European cars the lightest?
What's a computer's favourite snack?
What would a Prius minivan be called?
Did you hear about that new lesbian reversal medicine?
What's the difference between a snowwoman and a snowman?
What do you do when a bird attacks you?
What do you call a black priest?
What do you call two guys on a pair of curtains?
What's he difference between Santa Claus and a Jew?
What do you call a nun using katana?
What do you call a P'ed off pirate?
How can you tell a hippie's been in your house?
What is a better name for cows?
Where does Bran Stark keep his things?
Has anyone heard of the movie 'Constipation'?
Why were a bunch of realist artists offended at a Matisse gallery opening?
Girl are you a Louis Vuitton store?
What's the difference between acetone and Hitler?
What do you call a dog wearing headphones?
Why does bread not have eyebrows?
How many nuclear war survivors does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why can't Rabbis eat pork and Priests can't have sex?
Why didn't Mick Jagger pick Randy Moss up from the airport?
What do you call a Russian with 3 balls?
What does a high school dance have in common with the parking lot at a Keith Urban concert?
What kind of car does Jesus drive?
What do you call two nuns playing a bongo?
why does bill Cosby have high blood pressure?
How do you get thrown out of a concentration camp?
What's in a white mans pants and more than 4 inches long?
What do you call a letter from a feminist?
Why do you need to take notes during jokes?
What is the worst time to have a heart attack?
What's better than roses on your piano?
What's a redneck's last words?
Why is your mom like a vacuum?
is there a subreddit for paranoid people ?
What is long, black and smelly?
Why didn't the waffle go to the pancake party?
Why was the leaf hanged?
Why is it so hard to date fossils?
What type of pants does Mario wear?
why did the oil rig workers all leave Fort Mcmurray?
What is white on the top and black on the bottom?
Why do midgets laugh when they run?
Did you hear about the Hipster that drowned in the canal?
why do women wear makeup and perfume?
Why did the Weimar Republic ban balloons?
How long can an Owl live?
What did Bruce Willis say to motivate his son?
What's the difference between an intern and bird shit?
What two words result in the most marriages?
What do you call a kid with an eye patch, braces and a lisp?
Why didnt the illiterate man like my post on r/Jokes?
What do you call a 5 year old with no friends?
Why is pulling out 100% effective for superman?
What's the difference between a gay guy and Hitler?
Why is reddit so liberal?
What's the difference between a refrigerator and a gay man?
How do you make soup golden?
What are red heads good for?
Why did Donald Trump win the Republican nomination?
How do you win an election?
Whats the difference between you and an orphan?
Why shouldn't you hang out with zombies?
How many men does it take to fix a women's watch?
What do you call the system of honour of French horses?
Why did Bernie Sanders cross the road?
What did the deaf, blind, mute, handicapped kid get for Christmas?
How do you know when your vegetables are boiled?
Why is gigabit internet good for you?
What do you call children born of ginger people?
What's brown, and ryhmes with Snoop?
Why is Reddit full of liberals?
Hey girl are you a league player?
Why don't women need umbrellas?
What do you call a jewish Pokémon trainer?
Why do watermelons have water in Them?
How do apply for a job at the NSA?
Where does the sick calculus student go for medical help?
What do a Rubik’s Cube and a penis have in common?
Why doesn't George R. R. Martin use Twitter?
What do you get if you water a melon?
What is a slut ?
Where should you take your cat, if it somehow loses its tail?
How many Redditors does it take to change a lightbulb?
after a trainning lesson, everyone can ask only 1 question. my question is May i ask a question?
What sound does a pool make when someone you don't like jumps in?
What did the geologist say at the Chinese restaurant?
Why don't women wear skirts in San Fransisco?
Why does the Mexican guy take xanax?
What is brown and runny?
Do you file your nails?
Two cats sit on a roof, which one will slide off first?
What do you call a Trump supporter on a Friday night?
What does walking a tight rope and receiving a blow job from your mother-in-law have in common?
What’s the definition of a woman?
What is the hardest part of rollerblading?
What did one suicide bomber say to the other?
Why can't New Yorkers play chess?
What do you get when you drop a piano on an army base?
What's green and smells like bacon?
What does a brain eat?
Why isn't the Vice President running for President this year?
Why does Hillary Clinton not like working out?
Which place has the strongest gravity in the whole universe?
Did you hear about the man who died of a viagra overdose?
What does Popeye put on his dick to have sex?
What does wearing crocs and getting a blowjob from a man have in common?
What do you call a normal potato?
What do you call it when you tie a brick to a jar of Miracle Whip and throw it into the ocean?
What does a pirate do when he has a cold?
Knock knock. Who's there? A little old lady. A little old lady who?
What do a Jew and a Spy have in common?
What did the black man say to the white kid?
Why did American football player Michael Vick want to see the film "Top Gun"?
What do the South and the Sun have in common?
What's the gummy stuff between sharks teeth?
How do you reunite the Beatles?
How is a fish like a bicycle?
What's the difference between a bucket of sand and a bucket of afterbirth?
Do you know how much of Canada above Edmonton is livable?
What will you find in the toilet of a ship?
What's the similarity between American beer and making love in a canoe?
What do you call an old people's swingers club?
Why is Leagues patch 6.9 gross?
Why did the kid run across the freeway?
What do you call an overweight star wars fanatic who drinks too much coffee?
Who wants to play war?
Why frogs don't use Google?
Why is having phone sex such a bad idea?
What's the difference between arguing with a girl and arguing with a knife?
Why was the camper so focused?
Why did Hitler turn to genocide after a failed career as an artist?
Why did Princess Leia get a job at Cinnabon?
What's the difference between a joke on Reddit and a joke on 9Gag?
Why does Kylo Ren have a hard time making friends?
How does Darth Vader manage to eat through that mask?
What do Ted Cruz and Donald Trump's father have in common?
Do you know what 80 year old vagina tastes like?
What do Ted Cruz and Donald Trump's dad have in common?
Who's the fattest Knight at the round table? Why?
How do blonde brain cells die?
What happened to the guy who ingested helium?
Did you hear about the suspicious vagina?
What signal tells you that a politician is lying?
Are you a software update?
How is Bernie going to pay for free college for everyone?
Why did God give women legs?
What did Ted Cruz's wife get after being elbowed by him?
Did you know that I can see into the future?
What would you do if the world blew up?
If mathematicians were to make a phone, how would they call it?
What did Noah tell his son while they were fishing?
What's a 69er got in common with the mafia ?
Two reposters are in a plane crush. Who survives?
What is the problem with high frequency?
Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump are in a plane crash. Who survives?
What's the difference between a bunch of sly pygmies and a girl's track team?
You know which presidential candidate in 2020 will have the hardest time?
Excuse, where is the opposite sidewalk?
Which chord is essential to every Christian song?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are in a plane crash. Who survives?
'Captain, there come the indians!' The captain asks: Are they friends or enemys?
Why isn't there a Jared's for boys?
Did you know that 95% of Jews aren't Jews?
Why did the hipster only listen to dead musicians?
Why did Cruz pick Carly Fiorina as his running mate?
What's the difference between harry potter and jews?
Why does Snoop Dawg carry an umbrella?
What noise do veterans make when they eat?
What's often on the end of a man's genitals?
What's the difference between a masochist and a blogger?
What do you call a ruckus in a string orchestra?
What are the similaritie(s) and difference(s) between O.J. Simpson and Simba?
How is Game of Thrones going to end?
What do you call a brain dead Swede?
What do you call a midget psychic that just robbed a bank?
Why do feet stink?
Why did the window blush?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster shucker and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What do you call a squid after a car crash..?
Why wouldn't the Doctor wait in line?
What do you call a high person with Downs Syndrome?
Why Am I Single?
How do you make Donald Trump laugh?
Boyfriend: Dear do you know that exams are like girlfriend?
What do you call an abortion in the world of Mortal Kombat?
What's the difference between a Jew and a boy scout?
What do you call drunken techno music?
What has only one arm and can't swim?
What is Son Goku's least liked food?
What does the cannibal think after seeing a wheelchair user?
If there's something weird in lands beyond the Wall and it don't look good Who you gonna call?
Have you ever had African food?
What's Black and White and Red all over?
Why did the Italian wear handcuffs to bed?
Why didn't the vegan gamble at the meat raffle?
Why did balloon prices keep rising?
Q: What time is bedtime at Neverland Ranch?
What do you call a middle eastern man flying a plane?
Why does Jesus Jaywalk?
What do you call a castrated unicorn?
Why are pirates so mean?
Why is the Dead Sea a mod on /r/leagueoflegends?
When does Sean Connery usually arrive at Wimbledon?
Did you hear the one about the deaf comedian?
Why did the police shoot the black insomniac?
Want to hear a joke about coffee?
What do you call a negative antelope?
What do you call a fight between Jews?
Where do you get virgin wool?
What’s the worst thing about getting your keys locked in your car outside an abortion clinic?
Why Do Ranchers Love Getting A Sore Throat?
How many lawyers does it take to change a light bulb?
What's Queen Elsa's favorite fruit?
Can a kangaroo jump higher then a house?
What do you call a female driver?
Why did the insomniac get arrested?
What is the difference between a misogynist, and anti feminist and a guy who can't get laid?
what do you call a duck addicted to drugs ?
What do Gay men have in the morning?
What has 10 letters and starts with gas?
Why do American's take letters out of words?
What do you call a potato with no limbs?
What did Mozart and Beethoven do whilst in the grave?
Have you heard about the new advanced ABS system developed by an Israeli company?
Why didn't Otis Redding eat his food?
Why do I support extreme racist political parties?
Why does Pakistan never get a corner during a football match?
Did you hear ISIS secretly makes sex toys?
What's the difference between a brick and an MRA?
Why shouldn't you wear Ukrainian underwear?
What's The Difference Between A Men's Rights Activist And A Gun?
What's the difference between Santa Clause and Tiger Woods?
What do you call a basketball that rolls off court and deflates?
What do you call a deer that has really good eyesight?
What airline allows you to pee in cruise?
What did the mathematician say about vertical videos?
What's the difference between Reddit and Facebook?
Did you hear they found bones on the dark side of the moon?
What did the frog say in the massage parlor?
What's the difference between a BMW and a porcupine?
Have you heard the joke about the happy roman?
What do r/jokes subscribers and Catholic priests have in common?
What did the homeless men yell when they hit each other with cardboard?
Why is apple afraid of microsoft?
How to be a grown up at work?
What did the fish say when it crashed into a wall?
What is the longest word in the feminist dictionary?
What did Luke Skywalker say to his sister's bully?
What does the son of God do when he is the victim of medical malpractice?
Why are pills white?
Why did the Eagle go to store to buy some Rogaine?
How do you get a New Yorker upset about ISIS terror attacks?
What do you call a nut that can't talk?
What do you call a positive transformer?
Why do Jew's love jokes?
What do you call 10 blondes standing ear to ear?
What do you call a group of lesbians from Pittsburgh?
If April showers bring May flowers, what do May flowers bring?
What do Bernie Sanders supporters call their parents?
Why do people think Saint Stephen was a marijuana addict?
What happens to a frog's car when it breaks down?
Why didn't the math teacher sin?
Happy Greek Easter! Which Greek God loved to collect animals?
Did you hear about the Mexican terrorist...?
Why did Ally refuse to do her homework, when all she had left was to square the x and y axis?
What's a good way to get gum out of your hair?
Have you heard the one about the ceiling fan?
What do you get if you cross Michael J Fox with a dildo?
How do you know when to use "fridge" or "refrigerator"?
Why did the train go to the brothel?
Have you heard that new Ethiopian kids rap group?
Any coincidence jokes of the like? Is it any coincidence, 24 beer cans in a case, 24 hours in a day?
What's a pirates favourite letter?
What do you get when you cross a pirate and a pedophile?
So what's the deal with Jesus?
What is Saddam Hussein's favorite band?
How many girlfriends does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between a Blonde and a person with a different colour of hair?
Why did Cain kill his brother?
Did you hear about the epileptic who won the dance contest?
What did the fish say when he ran into a concrete wall?
How is a picket fence like a mini skirt?
What is a vajazzle made of?
Why is it a bad idea to swim in the Mississippi River?
Have you heard about the three holes in the ground?
How many activists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a shitty bungalow?
What do you call a nun who's drinking a pint?
What do you get if you breed a hedgehog and a grass snake?
What was the best magic trick Osama Bin Laden ever pulled?
What do you call really good tea?
What is the difference between feminists and Nazis?
Which character of Pokemon is a jew?
[Pun] What do you call it when you admit to being a prisoner?
What did the handicapped racecar driver say?
What do you call a German theatre that only does suspenseful dramas and plays?
Did you hear about the guy who repeated a joke on /r/jokes?
Did you hear about the starving horse?
Why does the Trump campaign hire people in groups of three?
What's the difference between a lobster and a bus stop?
Why were the baker's hands brown?
How do animals cross the ocean?
Why is American beer like having sex in a canoe?
women secrets?
What's grey and bad for your teeth?
Why is it never safe to tell a joke about corn?
What's sexist and not a concern for feminist?
How do the Chinese name their kids?
What did the scientist say when he stubbed his toe?
Why did the chicken run into a well?
Why did the Libertarian Cross the Road?
What happens when the PS and XBOX servers go down?
What did the cat say when it was wrongfully accused of a crime and sent behind bars?
Why can't a t-Rex clap it's hands?
​What is the difference between the hot girl at work and the one at home?
How do you keep brown bears off your property?
Why didn't the feminist picnic work out?
Wanna Hear a Corny Joke?
How can you tell your girlfriend is getting fat?
what's common between a puppy and a good book ?
What does a prostitute and a waitress have in common?
Wanna hear a joke about my dick?
Why the turnout at Michael Jackson's funeral?
What's more useless than a condom at a feminist rally?
Why won't bankers go to the opera?
If American dogs dig holes to China, where do Chinese dogs dig holes to?
What would albert einstein's name be if he was blonde?
What workout routine did Jesus stick to best?
What is the difference between snowman and snowwoman?
Why don't auto repair shops fix golf carts?
(TERRORIST WARNING) Why did the suicidal air go to the airport?
What's SRS's favorite beverage?
How do you determine which of two people is a chemist and which is a plumber?
What is the weakest armour made out of?
Why do squirrels swim on their backs?
Why was the doctor annoyed?
What do you call an investment banker who's always watching you?
What do you get if you fill a suburb full of Mermen?
What did the football coach say to the broken vending machine?
Why is that whenever we talk about pokemon, we sing the theme song?
Where did the memes make their last stand?
How can you determine which of two people is a chemist and which is a plumber?
What do coins call each other?
What would I be if I doubled myself?
What is heavy forwards but not backwards?
What's the difference between a Ferrari and a box of dead babies ?
When did the convict's period come?
What's the difference between Harry Potter and the Jews?
Did you hear about the mathematician who's afraid of negative numbers?
Why did the dyslexic, Russian astronomer hate the revolution?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs who gets shit and pissed on all the time?
How do you get republicans to not repeal Obamacare ?
What has 52 teeth and can hold back the incredible Hulk?
Where do hipsters get their water?
How do you tell the difference between a physicist and a plumber?
What did Spock find in the Enterprise Bathroom?
What do you call a Canadian in a blizzard?
What's the average lifespan of an owl?
What do you call the 72 virgins that Allah gave isis?
How do Jewish turtles greet each other?
Why did people call the late man a tiny ass?
What do you call a helicopter mixed with a rhino?
Why aren't there any Mexicans in China?
What's a drug addict's favorite music genre?
What do you call spending time with you family through BDSM?
What’s the difference between a redneck couple, and two variables in a dataset?
What did the dash say when he failed his exam?
How did Hitler sneeze?
What do you call a blonde who dyed their hair brown?
What do you call a person who will only give back rubs to men?
Did you hear about the guy who stumped Trump?
What do you get when you smoke pot with a bee in a candy shop?
Why shouldn't you buy Russian underpants?
What spice is the most welcoming?
HR: Sir, why is your secretary standing with tens of underwear in hand?
What do you call a blonde female driver?
What's the difference between feminists and cancer?
Did you hear about the nun that bites her nails?
What's worst than finding a worm in your apple?
What do you call a mentally challenged lion?
What did the banana say to the hippo?
How do you become popular on the internet?
What do you call a creamsicle in Russia?
Why Can’t Coffee Shops Spell Correctly?
Why did the hen fall in the well?
What is the difference between your mom and Kim Kardashian?
Wanna hear a joke about pizza?
What do you call a woman who obsesses over learning about sex?
What do you with a dying chemist?
What is Britain's most popular newspaper amongst breastfeeding mothers?
What did the Pink Panther say when he stepped on an ant?
why do farts stink?
What do you call Mexicans living in the USA?
Why was Cinderella kicked off the baseball team?
What do you call the feeling of being a tortured insect?
What is the difference between a tire and 365 used condoms?
What do you call a vegetarian lesbian?
Did you know LSD can make you lose weight?
Who is the supreme religious leader of the corns?
What's the hardest part of being a paedophile?
Did you hear about the famous nudist?
What famous hotel chain do muslims prefer when travelling on religious holidays?
Did you hear about the two antennas that got married?
How do you scare away a Vestiphobic?
Jack: What is your name?
What's Dr. Dre's favorite vegetable?
What's the most common disease in Canada?
Have you ever heard the joke they don't tell dumbasses?
What's the United States favorite brand of shortening?
What do you call a mother who lies about being a father?
What did Batman say to Robin before they got into the Batmobile?
What do you call fake pasta?
Why did the cop stink?
Chemistry joke thread?
What does the ISIS member say about telling good jokes?
How alcoholic is a drink that's guaranteed to get you drunk?
Did you get that joke about the Titanic?
What do you do when you see a fire man?
Who did the crocodiles call when they found one of their own dead?
What is a geeks favorite horror novel?
Why does Mexjco do poorly in the olympics?
What's the difference between a Syrian school and a terrorist camp?
How did Darth Vader know what Leah got Luke for Christmas?
You know which singer really cut the mustard?
Why couldn't the American leave Russia?
How do you know a girl with leprosy likes you?
What did the spice merchant say when someone knocked on his door?
How many religious women does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Teacher: Why are you Late Today?
How do you blow a tranny?
Are We use a really strong sunblock??
What's the hardest about being a pedophile?
Why did the scientist get punched in the restaurant?
What do you call a cardboard belt?
What do you call 4 mexicans in quick sand?
What did the cripple get for christmas?
Why would Batman always beat Superman?
What's the second to last thing the redneck said before he died?
What was Osama bin Laden's favorite football team?
Who was the first man to masturbate in space?
Why is it considered socially wrong to make fun of a crying 10-year old boy in Africa?
Do you guys know the story of Flip Flap the Giraffe?
Why did the scarecrow get promoted?
What do you call a lesbian ice cream sandwich?
What do you call the camera used for colonoscopys?
What do you do with a dead chemist?
What do you call 1000 Jews on a train?
What do you call alcohol in a birdbath?
What's the difference between Mic Jagger and a Scotsman?
What's got four legs and one arm?
What do you call a ginger(red head) hick?
What do you call a drunken asshole?
What do you call an animal rights' activist that never grows old?
I don't mind asking anyone anything. What's the worst they could say? No?
What do you call the concentration camp prisoners who kept pestering the guards with questions?
What did the shoe say about the customer who didn't like that it had yellow shoestring?
Why do farts smell?
Why is Barbie not pregnant?
What did a pirate say to fellow pirate?
What do you call a mentally impaired French Man that cant say no?
Jimmy: What has 100 legs but can't walk?
What were Steve Jobs children told to do when their father passed away?
What was the favorite chicken dish of Hitler?
What is the difference between Bing Bong and Neil Armstrong?
What is the most popular hacking tool preferred by hackers in Bangladesh?
What do you call a black person who smokes?
What's infinity minus one?
What was the musician doing when he was struck by lightning?
Why do SCUBA divers fall backwards out of boats?
What do you call a gay man's ball sack?
Did you know that Hitler made a rap album?
Why don't astronauts take anything seriously?
Do you know why I don't like simple chord progressions?
What kind of bat hangs upside-down?
How does a American mom know her daughter is on her period?
Why was the plumber sad?
How many therapists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why Won't Monica Lewinski vote for Hillary?
What's a dogs favourite cooler?
What do you call a box with a treasure location?
Why do doctors hate treating each other?
What bug has to watch it's sugar intake?
How many dead babies does it take to change a light bulb?
What do anal and spinach have in common?
What did José name his son?
How do you get a jew girls number?
What did the unicyclist say to the bicyclist?
How many Hillary Clinton supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do Pink Floyd and Dale Earnhardt have in common?
Did you hear about the day your parents got married?
Why do scuba divers fall backwards off of the boat?
How much alcohol does it take to get a black person drunk?
Which band does rockclimbers listen to ?
What's Dave Mustaine's favorite science?
Where do elephants keep their luggage?
How do you know if a wizards gay?
What's the difference between an inaccurate hunter and a constipated owl?
Whats the most politically divided animal?
Why do the Lannisters have such big beds?
How long does it take Han Solo to screw in a light bulb?
Are you in a fight with another person?
Did you hear about the crocodile who got waxed?
How do you find out if the cat is dead or alive in the Schrodinger's cat paradox?
What's the difference between a strip club and a circus?
How many South Americans does it take to change a light bulb?
What's a cats favourite alcoholic drink?
What clothes do Quakers wear?
What did the Alabama Police officer call the black guy who had been shot 6 times in the head?
A child drinks bleach, why is milk often given?
What's the difference between Bernie Sanders and Donald Trump?
What was Beethoven's favorite fruit?
Did you hear about the cactus that went to the party?
What is a ferret funeral?
Did you hear about the kid who slept through every class in school?
What do you called a prince-sized bed?
What is a crevice that is owned by someone and not allowed to be stepped into?
Whats the difference between a Pizza and Jew?
What's the difference between a microwave and anal sex?
What's the difference between the strippers and the circus?
What do you do after you rape a deaf girl?
What did the midget give her boyfriend after his concert?
You know why i love hiking?
Why did Luke want to become a jedi so badly?
What happened to the man with two wooden legs whose house burnt down?
What is the difference between Game of Thrones and Twitter?
What's the difference between acne and a child molester?
Why is the grass greener in Ireland, than it is in England?
How does Hitler give directions?
Who invented triathlon?
What car does Luke Skywalker drive?
Dad, are ghosts real?
What planet smells the worst?
What did Obama say when he was alone?
What lies on it's back a hundred feet in the air?
What do you call it when...?
Why don't you give a college kid fried chicken?
What do you call a zoo with only Giraffes?
Why do old Jews watch pornos backwards?
What do prisoners used to talk to each other in jail?
What do Welshmen call a sheep dog in Wales?
What do you call a Jamaican redditor?
You know why the Baptists don't make love standing up?
What do you call it when a sewer collapses on itself?
What do you say when you leave the UAE?
What does an 80-year-old person taste like?
Why is the number of black priests so small?
How many flies does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the gayest way to die?
Why did the boy drip his ice cream?
Where did the Jewish girl go during the bombing?
What do you call a Jamaican who likes spaghetti?
Why do seagulls live by the sea?
Why did the Chemistry Teacher go to Jail?
What is Jamaica's favorite TV series?
What do you call a snake that's 3.14 metres long?
Whats the difference between a smart midget and a venereal disease?
How does William Shakespeare make chili?
What do you call a Norwegian prostitute?
How do you starve a neurosurgeon?
What's the difference between a terrorist training camp and an orphanage?
What do you call a trespassing camper?
What do you call a computerized rock band?
Why are homosexuals always happy?
How did the psychiatrist break his leg?
What is the driest soda you can buy?
How do you celebrate Christopher Columbus day?
How many optometrists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Whats the difference between a terrorist training camp and an orphanage?
Why do men die before their wives?
What's the difference between a Catholic priest and acne?
How many software developers does it take to fix a light bulb?
What do you do when you see your wife stumbling around in the backyard?
Why did Insane Clown Posse never learn about magnets?
What will Stevie Wonder's next album be called?
Where's the best place to pick up a girl who plays hard-to-get?
What's green and smells like pork?
You know why matter is fond of using the metric system?
What's another name for Krav Maga?
What do you call a Bear who is just learning to use the force?
How do you start making big bucks?
How many Jersey girls does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about the identical twins who robbed a bank?
What's your favorite word?
What do pedophile sex-tourists and napalm have in common?
When are Latkes traditionally eaten?
Did you read the article about corduroy pillowcases?
What is Gordon Ramsay's favourite movie?
Could Cat Stevens beat Wolf Blitzer?
What do you get when you have an ant with 8 legs?
What's the diffence between a thong and a bandsaw?
What is the best way to stop rape?
What is a group of gay pirates favorite pastime?
Which wrestler has the finisher that stings the most?
Why is it easy for gays to escape a fire?
Why did the chicken cross the road today?
What's Bernie Sanders's favorite insurance company?
When is my wife's favorite day to make love?
What's an epileptic's motto?
Do you know what Jafar's original name was?
How did the blind girl accidentally get pregnant?
Why did the Boxer Rebellion fail?
What happens when your friend from Prague topples over?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Andrew Jackson?
RIP Prince. But are there any updates from Michael Jackson?
What if Stephen Hawking is the real Slim Shady?
What are the best kinds of speedbumps?
Why does a pony have a sore throat?
What happened when Hamlet discovered his love dead?
Did you hear about Prince?
What does a belt like to do?
Where does the 3D shape go when it murders someone?
What comes in hard, comes out soft, and what do you blow hard?
Why us it not good to have an oily face?
How do you find the circumference of a sheep?
Why do the French not pronounce "h" at the beginning of words?
What do you call a group of hot moms in space?
What's it called when a priest is always late?
How many muslims does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the deal with comedians who use observational comedy?
When drinking liquor while watching baseball, at what point will you be the most drunk?
What do you give a girl that has everything?
Why was the powerlifter fired from his job at the restaurant?
Why do black people have big nostrils?
Have you seen the new French Flag?
What does a dyslexic, agnostic, insomniac do at night?
What do you call it when an eclipse occurs?
What animal can only survive in temperate climates?
What's the opposite of Christopher Reeves?
What is DNA short for?
Was JFK born in USA?
How many stoners does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Where does Santa keep his nuts?
Why do wrestlers love video games?
What does Bill Clinton say to Hillary after sex?
If 4/20 is national weed day whats 4/21?
Why does black lives matter affect the postal service?
Who was the chicken's favorite musician?
What did the mouse say when his cheese was stolen?
Did you hear they finally caught the watch thief?
Why did the blind man become Hitler?
How are a pizza maker and a gynecologist the same?
What's the difference between bacteria and rednecks?
Why will the artist formerly know as Prince only hire former FBI agents as his house maids?
What subject did the Warlock major in at University?
Donald Trump, Hillary Clinton, and Ted Cruz are on a plane. The plane crashes. Who survives?
Why is golf better than sex?
Why did Hitler really commit suicide?
What's worse than being stuck in traffic behind a driver that's vaping?
Why is Hillary Clinton just like a man?
If Hilary and Trump were to be stranded on an island, who would survive?
Have you seen the movie Constipation?
Why do cops make good farmers?
What do you call a laughing labradoodle?
What's 18 inches long and hangs in front of an asshole?
Problem with fire ants?
What's attractive in a prostitute ?
What do you call someone who does a BA in Arts, a MA in English and a PhD in Gender Studies?
Where do all the normies play?
How can a vegetarian satisfy himself in a non vegetarian Indian restaurant?
Why do marine biologists have such a high job satisfaction rate?
What did the pirate say when he walked into the brothel?
Why don't Mexicans play bridge?
What's the difference between Trump and a pile of poop?
How does procrastination start?
Where did Josef Stalin watch pornography?
If Matthew McConaughey was in the KKK, what would his catchphrase be?
What do you call someone who was born in a camper?
All your responses must be oral, okay?
What do you call a white girl that can run faster than her brothers?
Why are Republicans so insistent on a war in the Middle East?
How does a handwriting analyst determine how his lover is feeling?
What does a fat person, a match, and a phone have in common?
What do u call a bad jokester?
What did the hammer announce over the intercom to the evacuating screws screaming for help?
What's a blind person's least favorite theme park?
Where does a general keep his armies?
Why do people in tumblr like quantum computing?
Why did the tomato blush?
What do you call a balding Native American?
What's the Riddler's favourite beverage?
What's worse than an adult?
How many dead hookers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why didn't Edward get on the plane?
What do you call a person in the White House who is honest, intelligent, and law-abiding?
What joke would piss off any redditor?
How many freudian psychologists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What the difference between a catholic priest and a pimple?
Why did AMD release black edition cpu?
Wat do you call the entrance to a whore house?
Why did dave go into the backseat?
Why did the masturbating murderer turn himself in?
What's the difference between USA and USB?
Why did the ghost go to rehab?
What is Jack the Rippers favorite restaurant?
Why did the man wear a diaper to the bar?
What Does Trump Say When His PC Crashes?
Why does Sirius Black get all the girls?
What did the basic girl say after all her writing utensils broke?
What is the difference between being Scottish, Irish, or Welsh?
What is Cthulhu's favorite cookbook?
What's the difference between friends and potatoes?
What's the worst thing to come out of The Armenian Genocide?
What is a chiropractor's favorite movie?
How do you greet the cold horse across the fence?
What do you tell a diabetic girl in bed?
How do you know your sister's having her period?
What were the last words of the Mayor of Hiroshima?
What does all pirate music have in common?
What does Hillary Clinton use to drown the noise of Black Lives Matter protesters?
What's black and screams?
Why did the midget laugh while walking across the field?
Why does Victoria beckham shave her twat?
Why was Vladimir late to gym class?
What do you call an anarchist grandmother who just found out she's pregnant?
If H2O is water, and H2O2 is hydrogen peroxide, what is H2O4?
What does a frog do when it's sad?
What does dark humor have in common with food?
Why are most reactionists black?
How do cannibals pick up women?
What's Donald Trump's favorite dance move?
What do people do for a party itinerary in the Jersey Shore?
What do you call a group of armed nuns enforcing the status quo?
What do you call a native american women that has 2 periods a month?
What do you call three Make-a-Wish Foundation kids?
Pssst, what's the answer to question number 5?
What do you call someone who is sexually attracted to a crocodile?
Do you like any sports?
Why was the illegal immigrant so offensive?
What's the difference between a Kindle and a Kindle Fire?
Whats the difference between the circus and a strip club?
What did the ancient Egyptian cheerleader chant?
What do Princess Diana and Pink Floyd have in common?
Q: What food diminishes a woman's sex drive by 90%?
What does the Dodge driver say when someone knocks the door?
How do you tell 2 Scotsmen apart?
What do you call an insane nocturnal blood-sucking parasite?
why the animale go to the store?
What did Sam say to the young Americans?
Why Indian restaurants are so good at JavaScript?
Why does Barbie hate Amazon?
What do you call kangarooo jump and play hocky?
How do cows move in groups?
Why did Sally fall of the swing set?
What's the difference between a good haircut and a bad haircut?
How do you tell the sex of an ant?
Did you hear about the horny squirrel?
Did you know Darth Vader had a wife?
Did you hear about the Energizer Bunny?
How does a mermaid give birth?
A kid asked his mom : how did you make me ?
How do we know that Dumbledore was a horcrux?
What do STDs and jokes have in common?
What should be Serena William's nickname?
What did Sean Connery do when he saw a guy drowning?
Whats the difference between a pile of dead babies and a ferrari?
What's the difference between a Ferrari and a boner?
Why does Kim Jong Un love books?
What do you call a gay guy who blends in really well with his straight friends?
What happened when the sausage came in first?
What's a Frenchman's favourite social media button?
What's long and black?
How will Trump fund the wall?
What's the difference between a Jew and Harry Potter?
Why did the circus animals go on strike?
Where do you buy a baby?
How many police officers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's better than getting gold in the Special Olympics ?
Asked my friend from North Korea how has life been going?
How long does it take for a black woman to poop?
How does the Mexican national anthem start?
What did the German physicist call his beer mug?
Why did John Lennon get shot?
You know what's better than Tennessee?
What Nationality has the easiest time learning sign language?
What's addicting?
How many Sandpeople does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is 50 Cent's guiding philosophy?
What the rapper's younger brother say when he got hit by his Molotov Cocktail?
What kind of wolf never runs?
What do you call an annoying Chinese chef?
What do you call the security guards outside a Samsung factory?
What was the name of the Mongolian warlord's favorite cow?
What Color Is It?
How do the Lanisters make large beds?
What do a porn star and an IT security analyst have in common?
What's worse than finding half a worm in your apple?
What do you call a bodybuilding Mexican who's run out of protein?
What's a pigs favorite morning tv show ?
What did the BMW say to the Audi on the side of the road?
What type of curry sets fire to the rain?
Do you know why Trump's name is on all of his buildings?
Why does pokemon have only one save file per game?
What do Emos and automatic lights have in common?
did you hear about the flying German pancakes in WW2?
What smells like shit, looks dead, and doesnt give a fuck?
What's it like to have a social life?
What do you get when you cross a slaughterhouse worker and a bad comedian?
How many tickles does it take to make an octupus laugh?
What's 12 inches and white?
What do you get when you cross an octopus and a lion?
Why is Bernie Sanders seems like having a long nose?
What does a Jamaican Liar sit on?
Did you hear about the new pop singer that has giant nipples?
What's the difference between a catholic and and a catoholic?
How many Jews can you fit in a car?
What did Mike Tyson say to Vincent van Gogh??
Racist: What's black and white and unemployed?
What do you call a construction truck wearing a toupée?
What do you call a man wearing two rain jackets?
Why are linear equations so easy to interrogate?
What's the hardest thing about having a colostomy bag?
What is the bravest organ?
What do you call a woman who does not have all her toes on one foot?
What is Robb Stark's least favorite band?
What's long, straight, and found between a pair of legs?
What do you call a Russian bovine made out of small flowerless plants?
Where does Lorena Bobbitt get her chicken sandwiches?
Why did the melons get married in a church?
Why do traffic lights turn red?
What is cheese's favorite music genre?
Can February March?
What do you call a group of black people?
What do you call a prison for gays?
What is Peter Pan on death row?
What word has the most letters in it?
What do you call it when you get a blowjob from a woman with Zika?
What's the difference between Hitler and Donald Trump?
What's the most influental animal rights philosopher?
Why did everyone make fun of the economist's fetish?
What do you call a horse that lives next to you?
What kind of bees make milk?
Is it just me or is champion op-ness kind of rotating ?
What do you do after raping a blind, deaf and mute girl?
Why did Hitler move from Germany to Westeros in full support of the Starks?
Why did Donald Trump outlaw grated cheese ?
What do you call a Jedi who worries about not making deadlines?
Which composer do lumberjacks prefer to listen to?
How many black guys does it take to cook chicken?
Anyone know why jewish people like coupons and deals so much?
Why is Six afraid of Seven?
What do you call 1000 emo kids at the bottom of the ocean?
How would you rate an average upholstery job upon completion?
An emo kid, a Jew, a Mexican, and a black guy jump off a building, who wins?
What's 12 inches long and makes your wife scream all night?
What did the ghost of Kurt Cobain say right after his death?
what do you call a magical dog?
What do you call a Robotic Abortion Doctor?
What do you call a group of Spanish-speaking moms who band together to protect their neighborhood?
What do you call a Jew who gets beat by women?
What kind of cancer always stands by the government?
How should justice be brought about on criminal semites?
Do you have any raisins?
Why are no murders solved in West Virginia?
What do you get when you mix a elephant and a rhino?
What did the passive-aggressive raven say?
Which bees produce milk?
Did you hear about Trump getting Pink Floyd back together?
How can you tell if a girl is under 18?
What do you call a Jew who is terrible with money?
Why are the Irish considered lucky?
Why is mustard gas so dangerous?
What do you call a Jew with no chance of getting ahead?
What's a Jew's favorite classic rock song?
Why was the potato chip angry?
What's the difference between a baby and baby Alien?
What do Mathematicians use to fry their food?
What's the most popular Internet meme in China?
What does a rich guy from Israel wear?
What happened when the composer got angry?
Whats the difference between boobs and batteries?
What do you call dirty white underwear?
What do you call an incredibly flexible chicken with an alien wristwatch?
Why is it that sumo wrestlers shave their legs?
What did the fly say to the other fly?
Why did the dolphin get a fair trial?
Why did they give a megaphone to the dog who couldn't climb a tree?
How are eating a girl out and working for the CIA similar?
What happens when you get a bladder infection?
what do you call a gay guy on roller skates?
How did the man find out his sister was actually his half-sister?
What's a tree's favourite composer called?
Girl, do you watch football?
Why does Bob Ross hide his wife's razor?
What does a bee from Asia do?
What do you get when you dissolve Zyklon B into Israel's water supply?
What is it called when Lebron James has sex?
What do baby showers and golden showers have in common?
You know what they say about girls with big feet...?
What did the Russian tell his nervous Socialist Dictator at the amusement park?
Why do women love chocolate?
Why was Ohm the Empire's best scout?
What do you call the worst Dr. who graduated from the worst med school?
How much does Dickbutt make an hour?
Who is this "one"?
What is the difference between catholic priest and acne?
What does Stephen Hawking say when his computer crashes?
what do you call a mexican who lost his car?
What happened to the cross-eyed circumcist?
What is light and red?
Where did the little Japanese girl go when the little boy dropped by?
Did you hear about the scarf that Eva Braun knitted for Hitler?
What's the difference between sex and a slice of pizza?
What do you call a Russian snake that's eating its own tail?
What do you get when you cross a cow with an octopus?
What do you call a crocodile/robot sent from the future to save the past?
Where do you take a sick ship?
Why did the hypothalamus want to join a band?
What's the difference between a person with a forehead and a fivehead?
What did Mexican Anakin say when he heard about the Catholic Priest sex scandals?
Why did the Mayor take so long to endorse a Presidential candidate?
How do you kill a fox?
What do you call a Mexican detective?
What do you call it when a jugaloo sleeps with his girlfriend after a fight?
If a well endowed woman works at Hooters, where does a guy with an amputated leg work?
Why are men typically smarter than women?
How rare was the disease that killed Tom Jones' wife?
Who would steal an artificial leg?
Why was a guy arrested for peeing on Indian land?
Why was I sentenced to 1 year in prison with 6 months probation after killing a nigger?
Why can't Democrats sell pants?
What do you call a /u/LegitLizard that can't move?
Why do asians squint all the time?
Where did Suze go during the bombing?
What do you call a white guy with a small dick?
What do you call a fart in a gay bar?
Why is the bottom of the ocean so dark?
What's a communist's favourite beverage?
How was the roman empire cut in half?
When is a car not a car?
Why was Michelangelo banned from bukakke porn?
What did the doctor say to the midget in his waiting room?
What's the difference between plants and black men?
What's brown and walks upstairs backwards?
What do you call a masculine Arab?
Why did everybody where white pants at The Masters?
Why did the blonde call an exterminator?
Why didn't the Mexican take Xanax?
What's a bad way to stop a pedophile?
What does A&W stand for?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are on a sinking boat. Who survives?
what did the router say to the doctor?
What's the difference between rape and football?
Why was the Gungan sent back in time by the Weeping Angel?
What's a polar bear?
Which rappers had a flow that could simultaneously speed up and slow down at the same time?
[Dark] What is black on the bottom and white on top?
Question: What river separates China and India?
Why does Windows 10 say "Hello"?
Why didn't the grizzly bear dissolve?
Why are the Mexicans building a wall?
What could be a good name for a really inappropriate French porno?
Why does Mexico always underperform in the summer olympics?
Tired?
What is the difference between SETI and Donald Trump?
What's the best part of Chinese food?
Why they never refuel in Fast and Furious?
What's yellow and goes around?
Q: What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea?
How do the French defend a city?
What do you call a female comedian?
What do you call it when you think you've lost your Italian cured meat, but then you find it again?
What is harder than telling the difference between Chinese people?
What is west saharan favourite number?
What do you call a criminal that cant see?
Why did the lead acid battery have to tell the truth?
What does a cloud with an itchy rash do?
What kind of car does George Bush the younger drive?
Why are the Panama Leaks so important, anyways?
Did you hear that the North American Man/Boy Love Association go a new tech support guy?
What did the duck say after it split the atom ?
What do math teachers grow?
What's the difference between a cat and a period?
Two crows are in jail. What are they in for?
What did Death say when his furniture was repossessed?
How did the turtle call his friends?
Why did the rancher stop attending poker night with his marijuana smoking steers?
What does a Syrian pirate say?
What do you call the conversation between two birds after they've had sex?
Did I tell you about the time I was going down on my grandmother?
What's black and eats pussy?
What do you call a fish that likes to cook?
Why is Jabba so fat?
What's Donald Trumps favourite album?
How will Donald Trump build such a huge wall ​without congressional approval​​?
Would you like some salt?
What's the difference between a collection and an addiction?
How many dead memes does it take to change a light bulb?
What does a duck put in its burrito?
What's a KKK member's favorite car?
Where does almond and cashew milk come from?
What's a fundamentalist Christian's favorite type of car?
what did coke call his daddy ?
What's Hillary Clinton's favorite sitcom?
What do you call a blank piece of paper?
Why the largest state in US has their own Airlines?
What did the rabbit say to the carrot?
What's a large bird hiding in the bushes called?
If a stork brings a white baby and a crow brings a black baby, what brings no baby?
What gives you uncontrollable gas?
How can you tell a dog is a cool dog?
What do you call a racecar driver?
What did the pedophile write on his Tinder profile?
What did the baby corn say to the momma corn?
What do you call a dad butt?
Why couldn't the homosexual Irishman with an oral fixation order at the restaurant?
What´s a Muslim´s favorite cologne?
What's the difference between a tuna, a piano and a gluestick?
Whats Saudi Arabia's highest rated sitcom?
What do you call a sudden breeze at The Masters?
What is the difference between homeless people and feminists?
How do you catch a unique bird ?
What has tiny balls and screws old ladies?
Why is the new Star Wars film called Rogue One?
What do you call a dock that lost it's cock?
How do you know a stranger could be an engineer?
Why when you spill red wine on a carpet do you take the stain out with white wine?
Why did Dory warn Nemo about escaping through the toilet?
Why did the gifting company fire their last employee ?
Ever have sex with a schizophrenic?
What do Whitney Houston and Jeremy Clarkson have in common?
Why do the French get high so fast?
What do you get when you cross a German and a Mexican?
If you could have one super power what would it be?
What do you call a guy who likes touching unripened cheese?
What do you call two gay Irish men?
How is food purchased an an Irish grocery?
What did the Nazi doctor tell his fully dilated patient.?
Why did the illiterate man with the 3 foot penis get dumped by his girlfriend?
If Hillary brought a carpet bag to New York, what did Bill bring?
What do you call the doctor for dogs?
Why is Bill Cosby like the The Wizard of Oz?
Is it I 'ran' through the campground?
If my blood type is A+, can I use that for my GPA?
What has four legs, two humps, and is given a copy of Metal Gear Solid for their computer?
What emotion does a tree feel every spring?
How Many Business Analysts Does It Take To Change A Light Bulb?
Did you see the video of the woman on her period with a yeast infection?
Why is it called almond milk?
Did you hear about the cvs looted by BLM supporters?
What's the worst thing you can come across while browsing the Internet?
Why can't Chinese have Caucasian children?
What do Catholic Star Wars fans say?
How many heretics does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many feminists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why are women such bad drivers?
Where do bots go for fun?
Why isn't Hitler allowed at barbecues?
How are women and computers the same?
What do you get if you cross Donald Trump with a reddit user?
What happened to the man running in front of a car?
Why was the feminist picnic cancelled?
Knock, knock. Who's there? Deja. Deja who?
What gets easier to pick up as it gets heavier?
What do you call a lobster dressed up as Santa?
Why does my son Richard like playing in the mud?
Where do Robots go for fun?
What's the difference between a Muslim and a Suicide Bomber?
Why did Kesha switch "$" back to an "s"?
Why is Jupiter both the favourite and most hated planet for Jews?
Woman 1 - Your husband now comes home early. How has this happened?
Did you hear about the lazy pig always making fun of the other pigs?
What does caravans and women underwear have in common?
What doe you call a banana's grandmother?
What do you call Batman who skips Church?
How do you write the sound made by a pot or pan bouncing down the stairs?
Why do Scottish men have long skinny dicks?
What's the difference between an infinite line and an infinitely large circle?
[Dirty] What is the difference between Harry Potter and a Jew?
Why do seagulls fly over the sea?
What do you call an Irishman who's had eight beers?
What is good on pizza, but not good on pussy?
How does Kanye West screw in a lightbulb?
What did Stella McCartney say during a threesome?
Did you hear that Robin got married?
Where do pirates store their files?
Why do they call Hannibal Lecter “The Mail Man”?
What do you get when you cross and elephant with a rhinoceros?
Why doesn't the sun pack it's bags?
Why didn't the scarecrow win his award?
What was more important than the invention of the first telephone?
What's the other name for Game of Thrones?
Why did the feminist cross the road?
Why did Hitler commit suicide?
Why are do many Italian-Americans named Tony?
What do they call divorce in India?
What hangs at a man's thigh and wants to poke the hole that it's often poked before?
What's the difference between between a pizza and a black person?
What's the difference between a Jew and a Bullet?
How do you know a presidential candidate is lying?
Why do all the trees in Kansas lean south?
What did the Sewage Worker say to his apprentice?
What do you call a gathering of otolaryngologists?
What is One Direction's favorite place to eat?
Why do Jewish men get circumcised?
What do Mediterranean volcanoes make for dessert?
What's the difference between a vegan, a crossfit instructor, and a psychological test subject?
What did the clam say when a crab attacked him?
What do you call a Mexican with a small penis?
What do you get when you cross an elephant and a grape?
How much did the pirate's new earrings cost him?
How many times can look at the sun with a telescope?
What do you call a German with no good inside?
What do you call a black astronaut?
How did Darth Vader know what Luke got him for his birthday?
Where do stoner cars store their weed?
Who did E.coli call after it lost a fight in school?
What are a fedora tipper's three favorite pokemon?
Why was the A.I. afraid of instagram?
How do you call a lesbian, black, Canadian woman?
Why is Japan the only country to celebrate the Penis?
What did Abe Lincoln say after a three day drinking binge?
Why can't you trick an unemployed jester?
What did the dad say to Michael Jackson at the beach?
How do you say goodbye to an epileptic?
What is Dwight Schrute's hometown?
How do programmers get a sixpack?
Why should you always take at least two Baptists with you when you go fishing?
Whats a printer's favorite sandwich?
What do you call a dizzy asian?
What do you call a serial killer that deals weed?
Why can't you trick unemployed jesters?
What's the difference between Batman's parents and jokes about Batman's parents?
How many animals can you fit in a condom?
Why do school nurses bring a red crayon to work?
Have you heard about Will.i.am's new sitcom?
What's Gordon Ramsay's favorite sex position?
What did the newly paroled French prisoner name his restaurant?
Why are there so many trees in Harlem?
How does a lawyer from Panama play his guitar?
What do you call an armadillo at a fashion show?
What color is the most metal?
Why is Islam in Iran so bad?
What do you call a pink slip served inside a bag of coffee?
Police Officer: How high are you?
What's a dentists favorite time?
Where does a guru get his sandwiches?
What does a terrorist and a soccer player have in common?
How can you tell when a politician is lying?
What would you call a Mexican that lost his car?
Why did the arborist plant new pine trees on their front lawn?
What's Kanye West's favorite fish?
Why did the pregnant woman love to tell jokes?
What's the difference between Audi drivers and a cactus?
What do you call a Spartan king with a disease?
What does a British guy say when he beats an Eastern European at chess?
If everybody became a zombie, which zombie would be the most life-threatening one?
What do you call a booth babe at Apple's events?
What did they gay necrophiliac say about his ex-lover?
What shoes do roosters wear?
Want to know why everyone loves time warner cable?
What vehicle does Hitler use to fly ?
Why aren't there any Muslim feminists?
What do you call it when Al Capone goes camping?
You need to chew poop. You can only chew one tsp a day. How do you eat 8tsp in two days?
What's the most overused joke nowadays?
What do Mexicans cut their pizza with?
What do you call a farm full of blacks?
What did the bartender say to the alien?
Why did the ram run off the cliff?
What type of music does the Easter Bunny listen to?
Why do you want to run for President?
What could have been the most stuppidest result of Napolleonic wars if France won?
What do you get when you drop a piano down a mine shaft?
How can you tell when Clinton is lying?
What is the best way to determine if someone is ticklish?
Why did Kyle Crane have to change the lightbulb?
how much does a deer cost?
Why is it so easy to fool a vampire?
What do you call a cow that will go down in history?
What do you call a strong woman with a successful career and family life?
Why is dog man's best friend?
Why did Barty Crouch Jr. stop drinking?
What is the difference between Michael Phelps and Hitler?
What do you call a nose that can see into the future?
How does a **real** man know when a woman is having an orgasm?
How an Illuminati living in the arctic is called?
What did the peasant say when he went surfing in the Russian Revolution?
What do you call a black man with a gun ?
What's another name for a Jew?
How much does a Polar Bear weigh?
Why did Constantinople fall?
Whats the difference between the government and a stripper?
What's the difference between a Priest and Acne?
How do people at rodeos heckle the riders?
What did the hat say to the scarf?
What did Marvin Gaye's dad say to him on his birthday?
What's the most popular Russian streaming service?
What's the Boogeyman's part-time job?
How does a nihilist propose to his fiancee?
How did the Hipster burn his tongue?
What did the man say when he stopped piggybacking his fat friend?
What did the duck say when he bought the chap-stick?
Why do accountants make the best serial killers?
What's the most popular religion for addicts?
How man Sah Dudes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you make a neato burrito?
Do you know the difference between 1 minute of oral and 1 minute of anal?
What's pink, wrinkly, hairy, smells of pee, and hangs out you boxers?
What do gay Asian men do in the bedroom?
What do you do when you lose your Kia car?
What do you say to an native american who, you think, is telling you lies?
What do you call a perfect society formed by an Asian?
Have you heard of the new sex scandal in the church?
How much do all the bones in the human body weigh?
What's E.T. Stand for?
Did you hear about the meteorologist competition?
What do you call an Indian man who fought for years for peace that then transitioned into a woman?
What do you call an imaginary color?
What do you call a sick russian?
Why did Jesus die ?
Where does Arnie sit at the movies?
How many children does it take to change a light bulb in America?
What does an American actor say when going to Europe?
What happens when Donald Trump takes cialis?
How many mitochondria does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did the Earth suddenly enter a manic episode then go back to a depressive episode?
What's the difference between men and women?
How many antisocial guys does it take to change a flat tire?
What body part never seems to win?
What does a pirate light on the Fourth of July?
What's the difference between a women's track team and a tribe of pygmies?
What's Rick Grimes' favorite holiday?
What saying is discouraged in both the USA and North Korea?
What will i do when i die?
Have you heard the ethical rapist's motto?
How did Lex Luthor hide his money laundering from superman?
How many fuck boys does it take to change a light bulb?
What did the lazy suspect say to the court?
What do you call a half Mexican half Japanese jedi master?
What's the difference between a prostitute and oreo?
Why did Elon Musk's wife leave him?
What do a pizza delivery boy and a gynecologist have in common?
What's the name of the Iraqi basketball team?
What's Forest Gumps password?
Why should you separate something into 62 parts if you want to make it tiny?
When is the worst time to get Cancer?
What's the difference between TheFineBros and r/Jokes?
What is Mr. T's favorite month?
Did you hear about the house the two lesbians made?
Why is r/Jokes like Donald Trump?
What did fish on the kitchen bench say to the other fish?
What do you call a chicken that's looking at a cabbage?
How can you tell if someone is ticklish?
Why is Russian the most dangerous language to learn?
What does one saggy boob say to the other saggy boob?
What do you call it when two amoebas say hi?
What's the difference between Rutgers and Rikers?
What does /r/jokes and the iPhone vs FBI case have?
Did you guys hear the news?
What musical instrument do people with STDs play?
Why didn't the pretty woman walk down the street?
What does relative humidity mean to a redneck?
What is the opposite of Turkish?
What do you call a Unicorn with his horn cut off?
What type structural support do you make out of phone books?
What do you call a tuber that buys his girlfriend chocolates?
What do you call a Muslim Elvis Impersonator?
What do you call it when a car full of Mexicans catches fire?
What would Al Pacino be called if he marries Daenerys Targeryen?
Did you know that a person born under caesarean section is not eligble to run for presidency?
What's it called when you get a boner on a movie set?
Once a girl lied to her husband about her extra martial affair .. You know what happened next ?
Why doesn't Trump's campaign manager answer his phone?
Why did Hitler commit suicide ?
Have you heard of this new drug?
How can you tell if someone has Alzheimer's?
What did one boob say to the other boob?
Did you hear about the Indian that drank 50 cups of Tea?
What do you call a Mexican Juggalo?
How do we call a skinhead with an Afro?
Why was Selena Gomez suspended in elementary school?
How many vegans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between Jesus and a hooker?
Did you hear about the corduroy pillow?
What do you call a confused Asian person?
What do you get when you play a country song backwards?
What's the difference between a gambler and a Kasich supporter?
What's the term for when the pool breaks during water birth?
What do you call a rainbow of Jeeps in the driveway?
How do you find a blind man in a nudist colony?
What did the hebrew tree say when the French man asked it's name?
Why is Hannibal so rich?
Why Romeo could not meet Juliet at an Apple Store?
How do Muslims cook their eggs?
What do you call someone who supports Hillary?
What do you call it when a therapist falls down for no reason?
What do Driving Testers and Vegetarians have in common?
Remember when I pissed off Apollo?
What do you call a Hillary supporter?
What do you get when you cross a Chicken with Peanut Butter?
How can you tell a bernie sanders supporter from a hillary supporter?
What do dyslexic Koreans eat?
Why are aliens bad at high-fives?
What do you call a rigged carnival?
Why couldn't the anthropologist find any Lomekwian tools?
How many zen buddists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why doesn't an old man ever go down on his old wife?
Why did the human cross the road?
If donald trump marries donald duck ,What will they name their child?
What do you call a drummer who just broke up with his girlfriend?
What do you call a mentally retarded chef?
What do you call a man trying to conceal his boner?
What do you call the act of press-ganging someone into a monastery?
How is a Trump campaign chief like a vibrator?
What do frogs deal?
Where do country music artists become country music greats?
How do you know your dog is gay?
What's the difference between an oral and rectal thermometer?
How are two gay guys who are perfect for each other similar to an Ancient Chinese Emperor?
What's a pirate's least favourite letter?
Who do you call when a sleepwalker injures himself?
Hillary and Trump are on a sinking boat, who survives?
What do you call male and female Jewish baristas?
Remember back in the day when you'd call someone gay and it was an insult?
What do people store their fondest memories in?
Why is safe sex a dumb idea?
How many tickles does it take to tickle an octopus?
What do a pimp and a cowboy have in common?
You know what amazes me?
Should computers be made of glass?
What do you call a bolt that dresses like a woman?
What would be the perfect theme song to Oscar Pistorius kicking trying to kick down a bathroom door?
What do Child predators use to get dry skin off of their feet?
What's the difference a kidney bean and a chickpea?
What is the first thing you feel when you shoot a baby with a gun?
Why do cows wear bells around their necks?
Whats the difference between beer nuts and deer nuts?
Why does a bride wear white?
What do people and pizza have in common?
A man has 300 candy bars, but eats 137 of them. Now what does he have?
Why did the egg get a ticket from a lady police officer?
What does a spanglish speaking chicken say when it's sorry?
What did the stripper say to the father figure?
How do you recycle a condom?
How do you make a gay man have sex with a woman?
What do you call a sheman wearing a bikini?
What's the difference between acne and a Catholic priest?
Another tasteless joke about Alzheimer's?
What's Stephen Hawking's favorite meal?
Porn stars' favorite drink?
What did Jay Sherman say about your breath?
What's in common between a sprinkler and the answer i got if she wanted anal?
What's the different between Twitter and Game of Thrones?
What do you call a blond woman who dyes her hair brown?
Who you must not greet on a plane?
How many men does it take to moderate /r/MensRights ?
What did Batman give Doctor Freeze with his whisky?
Have you ever wondered why Severus Snape taught Potions and not Herbology?
What do you call a balloon animal made out of a condom?
What has seven arms and sucks?
What do you call a bunch of male pornstars on a flight together?
How best to save the iPhone from FBI?
What slides in and out until it's balls are busted?
What's long, hard, and full of seamen?
Did you know that Subaru used to be called Subalu?
Why does a priest never get married?
Why can't Bernie Sanders win the election?
What's a good pickup line in a New Age bar?
Why do rappers make bad carpenters?
What did the ghost say to the bees?
Why do urologists like UTIs?
How many blondes does it take to screw a light bulb??
What do you call part of a poem written by a Seinfeld character?
How big is the US-Mexico border wall going to be?
What's Hillary Clinton's favorite Christmas carol?
What did the mountain climber name his horse?
What's Donald Trumps's favorite Christmas carol?
How do you ruin someones peaceful thoughts?
What is a catchy Girl's name?
Pickup line: Hey girl, did I take a loan from you?
What do you call a nerd after highschool?
You heard about the guy who had a heart-attack when the police entered his house?
Why is a hemiola unfair?
Why do engineering students call themselves engineers?
How can you tell if an engineer is an extrovert?
What's the longest word in the English language?
What do you call a bagel that can fly?
What is the difference between Trump supporters and everyone else?
What does a lesbian couple do for fun while they're having their periods?
Who stole the golden necklace? Was it a High Elf, a Nord or a Khajiit?
What do you tell a metal head who's walking on an icy street?
Mum, why do people in our family die so suddenly?
What browser do you use to watch porn?
What do you call an English teacher who used to have anxiety?
What rock group has four men that don't sing?
Why is a UTI such a bad thing?
Why are thousands of kittens dying everyday?
What is 12 inches long and keeps a woman up screaming all night?
Did you hear about that new Jewish car?
Did you hear about the suicide bombing camp?
What animal is endangered by tooth decay?
What killed the Aztec?
What do you call someone with lots of imaginary friends?
Who led the Jewish people through the semi-permeable membrane?
How many pepes does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is it hard to break up with a Star Trek fan?
How do you play the Oscar Pistorius drinking game?
Did you hear Trump announce he's doing one more season of Apprentice?
What is a woman ?
What's white, hard, and 12 inches long?
Why doesn't Ted Cruz like doing laundry?
Why is the mushroom so popular?
Wanna hear a cheesy conspiracy?
You know how light travels faster than sound?
How does Hitler line people up to get ready for mass genocide?
Why does Teller piss everyone off when he leaves a party?
Why did Jesus come back from the dead?
Did you hear the one about Bernie Sanders?
Why is rotten egg the best comedian?
What is Hitler's favourite type of pizza?
What's the most American food?
Why shouldn't you run over a mexican kid on a bike?
What's long and hard when you first put in in your mouth, but soft and wrinkly when you take it out?
What is Whitney Houston's favorite coordination?
Why did the Indian not show up for work?
If Hillary Clinton and Bernie Sanders are on a boat together, and it sinks, who survives?
Did you ever try to shave your own butthole?
What do you call a female pilot's vagina?
What do you call a person with no skin?
What's the difference between blue paint and red paint?
What's the difference between your mom and 3 dicks?
What is a caveman's favourite audio compression algorithm?
Why are germans so bad at marathons?
[OC] What did the asian say when he saw a line at the local soup kitchen?
What does a tree do when it wants to go home?
What did Darth Vader say to the vegetarian stormtrooper?
What do you call it when a lizard cums?
Did you guys read the book about the midget that hung himself with a belt?
Did you hear about the blackout?
What insect is the Wood Ant related to?
Hear about the time Mohammed's wife called him a pedophile?
What do you call a peaceful Bruce Lee?
what qualifies a woman in hollywood for disability benefits?
What do Caitlyn Jenner and WWII have in common?
What do giant steel beams say when they come across a nugget of gold?
Does eating fish makes you dumb?
Why did the woman fire her masseuse?
What do you get if you pour boiling water down a rabbit hole?
What was Poppin Fresh's new name after he was put into the witness protection program?
How do you see countries neighboring Russia?
What is the female equivalent of a sausage fest?
What did one cannibal say to the other cannibal while they were eating a clown?
Why aren't there any pedophiles in Japan?
What is another word for children who haven't learned how to do math?
Why does the divorced guy keep a tampon on the top of his tv set?
What does Belathor call his balls?
What does Damn Daniel and pedophiles have in common?
What kind of a belly button does a German car mechanic have?
Son: Mom, when I will grow up enough to get out of the house without asking you?
How do you know you've been making too many jokes?
Why did the feminist fail algebra?
Why did the orange juice fail his math exam?
Mom mom! Is light edible?
What do santa and a Jew have in common?
Who was the fattest member of Nsync?
How does Donald Trump plan to get rid of the mexicans?
What do you get when a superhero has to use the restroom?
What's the difference between a sweatshirt and a jacket?
What does Game of Thrones have in common with The Sixth Sense?
What's a dogs favorite part of a tree?
What kind of meat do priests eat on good Friday?
Why does the Little Mermaid wear seashells?
What's the difference between the holocaust and killing 5 black men?
What do you call two girls having their menstrual cycles?
What's the first step in getting accepted to carpentry school?
How do you find an ants forefathers?
What is the highest point in Israel?
What is it called when two lawyers are fighting?
Which scientist invented the nuclear powered floor cleaner?
Did you hear about that terrorist attacks in Moscow?
Dad, What is your favorite music genre ?
What do vegetarians love to do during sex?
What is the difference between complete and finished?
What's the difference between an original joke and a repost?
Can you imagine how hard it must be to intern a suicide bomber?
Why would you wrap a hamster in duct tape?
Why did Faraday shop at the discount bird cage store?
What do you get when cross-eyed and looking at a solar eclipse?
What do you call a dumb musician?
What do you get hanging from orange trees?
Did you hear about the guy whose toilet flushes with hot water?
Which famous pop duo were the best at delivering cereal?
What is a proctologist's drink of choice?
What's the paradox of 'lingerie'?
Have you heard about corduroy pillowcases?
What did the car-painter say to the carpenter?
Why do women have legs?
Did you hear the one about the guy who got his left side cut off?
What do 50 cent hot dogs have in common with lumber?
What's the hardest part about rollerskating?
What do you call a pothead that murders?
How do you get a Kansas alumni off your porch?
What super hero league is Caitlyn Jenner part of?
Which web developer enjoys finding bugs?
In a communist country, what does a woman say to a man before having sex?
What do characters at Disney World and strippers have in common?
What would I be if I were twice myself?
What does a burnt pizza, a frozen beer and a pregnant girlfriend have in common?
How many programmers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is it so windy in Texas?
What do you call a fish that can't sing?
What do you call stuffing an orifice with chilies?
Did you hear about the new Die Hard where Willis Infiltrates a Corrupt Nunnery?
Why did no one notice Thor's brother?
What's the difference between a neurotic, a psychotic and a psychotherapist?
Girl, do you need an inhaler?
Girl are you a dishwasher?
Why can the Devil never go back to Georgia?
How do you tell a crazy Jew that it's all in his head?
Did you hear about the emo pizza?
What do Caitlyn Jenner and my Chrysler have in common?
What's the worst part of having to break up with a Japanese girlfriend?
What prize did the dead body receive?
Do you think Hitler got his inspiration from Hansel and Gretel?
What is a nurse in the maternity ward's favorite kind of food?
What's the difference between your mom and my mom?
What would you call a set of old school rapper emojis?
What is a hemophiliac's least favorite song?
What's the difference between your mom and your dad?
You know what's white and crawls up your leg?
Why do sailors drink so much?
What do boobs and margaritas have in common?
Why isn't there a college in the world of Harry Potter?
Q: What's a little quicker than a shark?
What's your ringtone?
What do you call a small byte?
What did the sarcastic left hand say to the right hand?
Where do cats go to vacation?
What do you call a redneck virgin?
What does an impatient cow say?
How do you defeat an American?
How do you put an elephant in the refrigerator?
What does a flying rabbit has on his back?
What does the Sargeant of the Knowledge division always tell his troops to get?
Why did the cow get a divorce?
Why is New Jersey called the Garden State?
Why do chicken coops only have two doors?
What's the last thing that goes through a bug's mind when it hits your windshield?
Why do fish always have c-sections?
How do you teach your dog to roll over ?
How do you call the current situation in Syria?
Why did the Ottoman empire collapse?
Do you know why one side is longer than the other when birds fly in a "V" formation?
What falls faster from a tree, a leaf or an Emo?
What do prostitute Equine wear?
What do you call a group of transsexual surfers?
What do you call a good looking Lebanese man?
What do you call a fashion designer, who is not yet sure about his new collection?
What do You Call Someone Who Self Harms In The Antarctica?
What Do Bernie Sander Supporters Call Their Parents?
What do you call a pretentious criminal going down a flight of stairs?
Want to hear a joke about time travel?
What do you call little kids in Belgium?
If Donald Trump, Hillary Clinton, and Bernie Sanders were stuck on an island, who would survive?
How many Mexicans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why is it possible for a door to be made out of kittens?
Is it appropriate to force an adult to wear diapers?
Did you hear about Brussels?
What do you get 18 years after fucking your sister?
What do people say when they eat very tasty jam?
What kind of car does Yoda drive?
Why is Joey Tribbiani a presenter on the new Top Gear?
When is the earliest time of day Nintendo fans play games?
Why were the pirates on the ship fighting?
What's the difference between a Jew and a woman?
If you were stranded on a deserted island, what's one thing you'd bring with you?
How is an easily-offended person like a broken GPS?
Why did the picture go to jail?
What's the difference in a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
Hillary and Bernie are on a boat, it sinks... who survives?
Did you hear about the zygote that joined the army?
Where does Daredevil sign contracts?
Why didn't Cinderella makes the Soccer Team?
What do motors and the Soviet Union have in common?
What do a good joke and a child with cancer have in common?
Why did the Mexican push his wife off a cliff?
What's the name of the best brewer in the world?
What falls faster from a tree? A leaf or an emo?
Did you hear about the kidnapping in Southampton?
Why don't blind people go skydiving?
If Caitlyn Jenner were a super hero, what team would she be on?
What did the teenage boy who was jerking off in his room say when his mother called?
What do you call a drug addict who has been awake for 14 days straight?
What is a sure way to get a girl at a bar?
Why does the Little Mermaid wear seashells for a bra?
What did the two gay sailors bring on their camping trip?
What did the nurse say when she found a rectal thermometer in her pocket?
Why do gay men have good fashion sense?
How do you know that ET is a Donald Trump supporter?
What do designers of gum call new flavors from old ingredients?
Why does Bank of America not have a backspace on the ATM keypad?
What is the most independent kind of cheese?
Whats the difference between normal barbie and divorced barbie?
Do you know how electricity works?
What kind of fun do priests have?
What's the difference between r/circlejerk and r/The_Donald?
What do you call a terrorist from Paris?
What's the best reason to date a pornstar?
Why are sea sponges good at statistics?
Why did the siamese twins moved to England?
How do blind people sign contracts?
How can your make 7 even?
Why did the astronaut break up with his girlfriend?
How do you reject a French girl?
Why did the man become a baker?
What did the U.S. airdrop to the children of Afghanistan?
What is the Pope's favorite breakfast?
Why did the porkchop scream for help?
Why did the milking stool only have three legs?
How many Freudians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why were the strawberries sad?
Did you hear about the guy who broke 17 world records while sitting on a pastry?
Did you hear about the comedian who gave an old lady a defective piece of cooking equipment?
What did the Jew say when he evaded the Nazi officers?
Did you hear what happened to the latest edition of Mein Kampf?
We all know how women can fake orgasms, but do you know how a man does?
What are the strongest days?
Why did the hen win a Wild West duel between it and a Peacock?
How do you know when a firefighter passes away?
Girl, are you my brake pads and rotors?
What's the difference between a green lentil and a chickpea?
What move does the karate kid practice the most?
Why is Dubya voting Republican this year?
Why did Bernie Sanders's chicken restaurant throw out so much food?
Why 4D was invented ?
What's the difference between a Mexican and a computer?
Why don't Germans compete in marathons?
What do Ted Cruz and a tenage girl's bedroom have in common?
Whats the closest a Mexican will ever be to happiness?
Why did the blind couple get divorced?
Why can a Cheetah not hide?
Why does Donald Trump hate pre shredded cheese?
What was the hexadecimal 6 afraid of the Canadian hexadecimal 7?
What do you call a fancy toilet?
What's more disgusting than a hickey on a haemorrhoid?
What did Helen Keller say when she put down the cheese grater?
What's the difference between sex every day, and a tire?
How did the Scot die?
Where do comedian Eskimos live?
If an opinion is worth 2 cents, how many cents is an argument worth?
What is Yellow and Red?
Whats the difference between Hospitality and Business?
Why are there hardly any dental professionals in the South?
Donald Trump and Hilary Clinton are on a boat that is sinking, who survives?
What happens when you pet a cat in the opposite direction?
What's the best way to get bubble gum out of your hair?
Why is Michael Jackson not able to back into a parking space?
How do really crazy people get through the forest?
What do you call a gay guy's kidney stones?
What does a robot do at the end of a one night stand?
Why was the milkman afraid on Christmas eve?
What do you call an owl escapologist?
What do you call an Asian who's tolerable some of the time?
What is the difference between a Muslim baby and a Christian baby?
What do you call a chicken coop with 4 doors?
Why does a chicken coop only have 2 doors?
What is the most common blood type among pessimists?
What do you call a dream about soda?
What do a walrus and a zip-lock bag have in common?
Did you hear about the people who were sick in June from eating bacon past its use by date?
Did you know Oxford university was founded before the Aztec Empire?
Which unit describes the intensity of light in South Africa?
Did you know there is one colour that can time travel?
What do you call someone who like massages but hates women?
How many redditors are needed to screw a lightbulb?
Q: What's the difference between a cello and a violin?
How does Donald Trump rile up his constituency at a rally?
Why aren't there any white jokes on /r/Jokes?
What's a Christian's favourite guitar chord?
What is the hardest part of a vegetable?
What do you call a Mexican fighting a priest?
Wanna hear a dyslexic joke?
how do you organize a party in space?
How can you tell that truckers like nuts?
How do you jerk off a sprinter?
What did one cell say to its sister cell when she stepped on him?
Why is the Democratic electoral landscape like a Moebius strip?
Why did the midget cross the road?
Knock knock, Who's there?
What do skaters, kidnappers, and hipsters all have in common?
What is Tumblr's least favourite show?
What did the vegatable say to the fruit?
What is the similarity between a weiner and a Rubik's Cube?
Why would someone name a dog "pistachio"?
Why wasn't Jesus born in Washington DC?
Why was it so easy to find the buried communist treasure after the Cold War?
What has 4 wheels and flies?
How did we build a tunnel to china?
What's the difference between Jesus & a picture of Jesus?
What do you call someone with no legs?
Why was the policeman sent to talk to a bunch of crows?
Why did the young Mexican solve the problem so easily?
Why did the comedian say he preferred his hamburger on a croissant roll?
What do you call a young plastic covered sheep?
What is the only alcoholic beverage Muslim extremists are permitted to drink?
How do you kill a vegetarian vampire?
What do Godzilla and shrimp have in common?
What's the similarity of a dough and a human?
What did the man with five penises say when somebody asked how condoms fit?
Whats the difference between an Irish wedding, and an Irish funeral?
Infatuation prick is the answer, what is the question?
What do you call the inhabitants of London?
Why a centipede cannot fly coach?
What's the opposite of marshmellow?
I have orange skin, a lot of green and dislike mexicans. Who am I?
When is it okay to punch a midget?
What did Picard say when Riker asked him what kind of Chinese food he wanted?
Why don't SJWs go to college?
What did Snoop say Dr. Dre while binge watching their favorite TV show?
What do you call a deer with a missing eye?
How do you starve a right wing christian?
What's the difference between mlk day and st. Patrick's day?
What can stop supervirus from destroying humanity ?
How do you know the economy is only getting worse?
What do you get when you cross Game of Thrones with Cartoon Network?
Why are suicide kits so hard to sell on Amazon?
What does 2 electrons say when the meet each other ?
What's the difference between a dilapidated bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
What do you call a pretzel that got his ass kicked?
How many teachers does it take to solve algebra?
Why did the man build his house out of a tree instead of bricks?
How does Donald Trump plan on deporting 12 million illegal immigrants?
How many acrobats does it take to change a lightbulb?
Man: How did you compromise with your wife?
Why does Harrison Ford run from Wesley Snipes?
What's the difference between a dog and a cyclist?
Why didn't the weightlifter like doing chest exercises with Coke cans?
Whats the difference between a jew and a boyscout?
What are the chances of familiarising myself with a semiaquatic amphibian to the point of ownership?
What was the last thing that went through Princess Diana's head?
How do deer get revenge?
What is a wolf's favourite dance move?
How do you confuse an irishman?
Did you hear about the farmer that failed dairy farming school?
Why did they produce a reality show about midgets?
What time is it in Ireland when someone farts too much?
How did Kurt Cobain die?
Tasteless Irish joke: How many potatoes does it take to kill an Irishman?
What do you call and Irish person who stays outside all night?
Do you know where there are only 239 beans in and Irish bean stew?
What do you call Pixar porn?
Why do Irishmen grow mustaches?
What's Edward Elric's favorite band?
Why do the Irish only put 239 beans in the pot?
What do you call it when an Irish band is caught lip syncing?
What's a redneck's favorite type of bread?
What do you call a short sleeved British shirt?
When is the best time to sail?
Did you know the USA is banning shredded cheese?
What's a mile long and has an asshole every two feet?
What do you call a five year old with no friends?
Why did God create Adam before Eve?
What do you get when you mix a leper and a con man?
Have you met the two gay Irish men?
How many beans are in Irish Chili?
Why does a chicken coop have 2 doors?
Where did the Irish guy get cancer?
Why couldn't the fireman put out the fire?
Why did they bury Rock Hudson ass up?
Q: What's the worst thing about eating out your grandmother?
What do you call an Irishman with Leprosy?
How long does it take for George R.R. Martin to finish a Reddit post?
What did the muslim man say when he arrived at his resort in Hawaii?
Why are all black people fast?
Q: What is long, black and stinks?
What do you get when you cross a blowjob with the Arctic?
Why didn't Michael J Fox order food at McDonalds?
Why couldn't Helen Keller drive?
What did the cool dinosaur say to his mating partner?
What does a nosy chili pepper do?
Why did Helen Keller's dog run away?
You know how drinks always mention "Please drink responsibly" ?
Why did the otter cross the road?
What do you call a Greek arsonist?
What do you call a guy with two marijuanas?
Have you heard of the new deodorant called umpire?
What's the difference between pedophiles and acne?
What's the difference between a Bernie Sanders supporter and a fat stripper?
Why do mice have such small balls?
What do a WW2 German Soldier and an Animal Doctor have in common?
What device can make prostitution legal?
What do you say when your girlfriend accuses you of being an ass man?
What do you call an emotionless Asian woman?
Why can't a T-Rex clap?
Why are American options more expensive than European?
What do you call a movie about a low-magnitude Iron ion that skips school?
Why does Jeb Bush drink RedBull?
What did the Zen master say to the hot dog vendor?
Why are gametes so popular?
What do you call a fight between two blacks?
What's bruked, broke, and fucked all over?
Why do cows have hooves?
What do people call Miley Cyrus in Europe?
Why was the Facebook post redundant?
Why has Hot Topic's sales revenue gone down?
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton and Bill Clinton?
Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump Are Sinking On A Cruise Ship, Who Survives?
What sea mammal controls Nazi Germany?
what is green and always happy?
What does Bernie Sanders say when he gets a haircut?
What kind of exercise did Jesus do?
What is black and screams?
What do Trump and Sanders have in common?
What do you call it when a person falls ill from watching too many BBC period dramas?
What did one druid say to the other?
Why do time machines make you happy?
Have you seen the new globe they're making?
What do Paul Walker and Nelson Mandela have in Common?
What's the instrument of oppression?
What symphony is a pedophiles favorite?
What do you call a fat female assassin?
Why do pedophiles always get wines produced in the same year?
What is the most common cause of blindness worldwide?
You know what gives me the shits?
Did you hear about the snail who used to be shipped around the world in wooden crates?
Whats the worst part of breaking up with a Japanese girl?
Why did the blind guy crashed his car into another car?
Did you hear they're making an Indiana Jones 5?
How did the hipster narco escape from prison?
What's the difference between a 4 year old boy and a bag of cocaine?
What do you call it when you have a bad dream about having sex with someone you hate?
Why are people afraid of Donald Trump?
what do you call a cow with no legs?
What's the difference between a vacuum cleaner and a lawyer on a motorcycle?
What's an American's favourite day of the week?
What did the incestual burger say to his son who's leaving for college?
Why did Hitler visit the optometrist so much?
What does it sounds like when a Japanese Homer Simpson forgets how to count to 11?
What's the most important part about telling a joke?
What do you say when you get swindled by an Egyptian tour guide?
What is Hillary Clintons favorite type of footwear?
What's the difference between Whose Line is it Anway and /r/jokes?
But is that likely?
How do you make an ugly kid?
What's Pingu's favourite band?
What's the NSA's favourite game?
If a leaf and an emo fall from a tree, who hits the ground first?
Why are gay people so rude ?
What did Bea Arthur whisper in her lover's ear?
What is Spiderman's favourite brand of rice?
husband and wife ?
What do you call a cheating wife with a runny nose?
Who is the favourite communist leader of all the cats?
Why does the KKK wear all white?
What did the doctor say to the lizard who was complaining about problems performing in the bedroom?
Q: Why do Mormon women stop having babies at 35?
What did Elton John call his tribute to Mother Teresa?
How do bees go to school?
Whats up Cake?
What's the difference between sperm and lawyers?
What is a math teacher’s favorite dessert?
How does cheese get more mature?
What do you call a big pile of kittens?
What do you call a group of blind German kids?
What do the "Damn, Daniel" kid and pedophiles have in common?
How does a crackhead lose weight?
Why was I arrested for only 1 year with a $5,000 fine after killing an unarmed African-American man?
Why did my semen cross the road?
What did the buffalo say to his son who's leaving for college?
Whats bigger than your balls?
What's a candidates favorite instrument?
What is a gay guy's favorite kind of yogurt?
What does the lord say when the intern messes up?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a vaccuum?
What kind of suit does a lawyer like best?
What happens when you eat beans with onions?
What do you call 25 attorneys buried up their chin in cement?
How many angels can dance on the head of a pin?
If H2O is on the inside of a fire hydrant, what's on the outside?
What do you get when you cross a fag and a dairy farm?
A leaf and an emo fall from a tree. Who hits the ground first?
What did The Zodiac Killer say before killing his victims?
What did the sexual predator chicken say about the donkey?
What happens if you violate Reddit's content policy?
What's the hardest part about watching a video of somebody being beheaded?
What is Donald Trumps favorite martial art?
What's the difference between a religion and a cult?
Why wasn't the cat moving?
Why are firetrucks red?
Why are jokes about Jonestown so funny?
What do you mean pi r square?
Which animal only feasts during Islamic ceremonies?
What happens when you violate Reddit's rules?
What do Bernie Sanders and Santa Claus have in common?
What's the difference between a kinky guy and a pervert?
Have you watched the movie about polynomials?
Why did Sally fall off of the swing set?
What has 60 feet and 5 teeth?
Why did the peasants hate the Potato King?
Why should you hire a drag queen to help clean your garage?
Have you ever seen Ted Cruz and the Zodiac Killer in the same room?
What did the Pie say when he failed a math test?
Why did the old lady stand in front of three rows of traffic?
What is the best basket ball team ever?
What does Wolverine and Caitlin Jenner have in common?
What's the difference between a bag of cocaine and a baby?
Why is math a scumbag?
If you're a Sanders supporter at a Trump rally, what protocols do you need to follow?
Did you hear about the kid who was outstanding at school?
What is a tick's favorite fruit?
What do call an old man that asks questions?
Did you hear about the 2 guys who stole a calendar?
Why did the writer not like his friends book?
How does Avis feel to be #2?
How can you tell when a vampire is sick?
What do you call a cute homeless girl?
Why didn't the doctor use Twitter to tell the patient that he had a deadly disease?
Whats the difference between 3 dicks and a joke?
What do Monica Lewinsky and a soda machine have in common?
What kind of cheese gives out money?
How many Mexicans are needed to change a light bulb?
you know what never gets old?
What do you call someone who failed rehab?
Why couldn't Arnold Schwarzenegger run for president?
Did you hear about the red luxury cruise liner that collided with the blue luxury cruise liner?
What is the biggest obstacle in getting rich quickly?
Why doesn't Trump like Google?
What's the difference between LSD and my dad?
What's the Priest favorite breakfast?
How do you play Taliban bingo?
What do you call a veterinarian that can only work on one animal?
What is Bill Cosby's favorite ice cream flavor?
What do Brooklyn and pantyhose have in common?
Why did Mike Dukakis lose the 1998 Presidential election?
What do you call two colored folk riding a bicycle?
What Hillary's word for a bribe?
Why do Mexicans never cross the border in groups of three?
What is steam?
Should you make jokes about fizzy drinks?
What's the best things about Anti-Jokes?
What would be a more appropriate name for spiderman?
What's Canada's favorite board game?
My favorite from a Laffy Taffy wrapper: What do you call a twitching cow?
What's the difference between a beggar and a US Politician?
Why is Tumblr so unhealthy?
Why should't old people eat healthy?
What's a barista in France's favorite workout?
Why can't pirates finish the alphabet?
What's the best part of having a kid?
What do you call a lesbian prostitute?
Did you hear about the new skat porno?
Why doesn't the man with an extra penis have any friends?
Why did hitler buy glasses?
What do Monica Lewinsky and NFL players both have in common?
What is the Italian postal motto?
Why is the Pharaoh a rare tuba player?
What sort of meat do you feed a priest?
What did the urologist say to his patient who forgot to take his medication?
What do you call a Zen master from eastern Europe who's been bugging you all day?
What did Sean Connery say to a couple of lobsters he saw take up an extra parking space?
If fire hydrants have H2O inside them, what do they have outside?
Why is Trump like a man with a tuber fetish?
What would have happened if Alexander Fleming met Euler?
What does Bill Cosby do when he can't sleep at night?
How many words does it take to start a car?
How many blacks does it take to screw in a light blulb?
Did you hear about the shoemaker who went bankrupt?
What did the gardener yell when his vegetarian friend visited?
Why do Italian men grow moustache's?
Can strawberry jam?
Where do strippers go on holiday ?
What do you call the accidental nuclear bombing of a furniture plant?
What do you call a Woolworths that burnt down?
How do you pick up a fat chick?
How do you make a cat bark?
How do mathematicians become engineers?
What kind of underwear does a person wear when buried?
How many psychiatrists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the girl who went on a date with a cannibal?
What's the difference between 9/11 and a computer?
What does Reddit and Dating have in common?
How do u kill a blonde paraplegic with one arm hanging from a tree?
What would New Zealand be called if it had a fascist government?
Why was the girl with the Frozen balloon sad?
How many A.D.D. kids does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between a woman and a computer?
What do you call a religious guy from Belgium?
What's the difference between Rick Grimes and Carl Grimes?
Why was Cloud trying to cheer up Sky?
Why old people don't have sex?
How do you greet a Rastafarian who's out of work?
Why is my mom always right about everything?
What's the difference between Paul Walker and Windows 10?
Why did Hitler shoot himself?
Why did the rock star fail his depressing math exam?
How many mexicans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the Revenant about?
What is the difference between a pitbull and a Golden Retriever?
What's a blind deer's favorite dance move?
Why does Michael Scott hate Hamlet?
Where do cows go on movie night?
What do you call an early bird special double date at a black-Vietnamese fusion restaurant?
How do you know an r/jokes mod is a cyberman?
Why should you never high-five a Roman?
Where does the pussy grow?
What's R. Kelly's favorite movie about singing?
Where do South Africans buy their pastrami and salami?
What's angry most of the time and wants you to stick something hard in it?
Why do cannibals prefer to eat blind people?
Have you read GANDOLF'S new book about GENDER identity?
What do you call a natural blonde who dies her hair?
Did you hear about the chickpeas who took a tumble?
What do bees say to psych themselves up at the start of their day?
What's the difference between someone who can mend your pants quick and a famous singer?
What do you call a learned spider?
Have you tried african food?
What's common between a crying baby and a gun?
Why don't hipsters shoot heroin?
How many hippies does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you get when you cross a sheep with a porcupine?
Why did the tortoise get arrested?
You know what my grandfather said right before he kicked the bucket?
Why do they call it a Wonderbra?
Why did the programmer quit his job?
What do you call someone who tops Darth Vader during sex?
Why couldn't Bach be a rapper?
What do call it when actor Charles Dance tries to flirt?
What do you call a girl on her period?
What is black and doesn't work?
How do you cook toilet paper?
What did the pirate say when he spotted a stranded fat chick?
You know that awesome feeling when you finally understand a word problem in math class?
Why do brothels support Hillary?
(from my 8 year old) What do you call a Mexican chicken giving directions?
What type of bean results in premature death?
What's a procrastinator's favorite movie?
What's the difference between a golf ball and a woman's G-Spot?
What can you find on neckbeard bread?
why man thinks cows are stupid?
What type of gun is used by a pig that is good with the ladies?
Why didn't the guitarist get laid?
What title do a sandwich and an occupation in the porn industry share?
What do you call a Mexican child molester?
Did you hear about the Lord Of The Rings and Taxi Driver fanatic who had a bit of a stutter?
Why did Sarah fall off the swings?
Why does Leonardo DiCaprio love his fast car?
What's the difference between a lobster with big boobs and a dirty bus stop?
What do Hillary supporters call their room mate?
What language does a flight attendant speak?
Why did the farmer get an award?
Why can't Abraham Lincoln be convicted for murder?
Do you know how many feminists it takes to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between an 8-ball and a baby?
What's the difference between an spam and a personal attack?
What does dog poo and women have in common ?
Ever have one of those dreams where you're falling and you wake up when you hit the ground?
What does an elderly composer use as a walking aide?
What's a three letter word for Hell?
Why did Leonardo DiCaprio laugh at the Oscar joke?
Which is the most powerful colour?
How can Donald Trump avoid impeachment?
What do you call a weirdo slowly driving a jeep past an elementary school?
Did you hear about that new black hole?
What do you call a graduated spider?
How are dumb blondes like peanut butter?
What do you call a black person flying a plane?
Why does coffee have such a bad reputation?
What did one sunbathing pig say to another?
What is E.T short for?
How does a mathematician solve constipation?
What to you call a russian with 3 Bollocks?
Why is divorce so expensive?
Why do people browse reddit on the toilet?
What is a good opening bridge bid for the Presidential Election?
Hey baby, did you fall from Heaven?
What did a skinny person tell a fat person?
What do you call a guy who wears two condoms?
What stopped winter for coming?
What's the best thing about blowjob?
Why do farts smell so bad?
What you call a responsible porn star?
Why does a cow have hooves but not feet?
Are you dylsexic?
What was Captain Picard's favorite kind of train?
What's the worst part about swim-up bars?
How does the author of harry potter descend a mountain?
What do you call a happy prosecutor?
What do you call transgender Hershey's chocolate?
How did Al Gore invent the Internet?
What will Kayne West's political leaning be if he runs for President?
Do you know why Turkey couldn't see the solar eclipse?
What do near-sighted gynecologists and little puppies have in common?
Did you hear about the secret cure for everything that the government doesn't want us to know about?
Did you hear about the man who killed 47 donkeys?
What's the difference between a garden hose and a the male prostate?
Did you hear about the guy that ran the erectile dysfunction support group?
How do you get Mexicans out of your house?
How many Republicans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is similar between gas and water?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a Twinkie?
Why can't you insult Jewish people?
What is it called when foreign girls spread their legs?
Why couldn't the pornstar join the navy?
What did the terrorist's ghost say?
How many Super Saiyans does it take to change a light bulb?
How do you know princess diana had dandruff?
What does Peter Parker wish he would have went to school for?
How do you get a Jewish girls number?
How can working with cow hide help on a first date?
What has 2 legs and bleeds a lot?
Where do you find a kid with no legs?
I heard a funny dad joke the other day. What color is a boomerang that never comes back?
You know the difference between a hooker and a drug dealer?
How do you seduce a fat woman?
Trump and Clinton fall off of a cliff at the exact same time. Who wins?
Whats the difference between Paul Walker and Tiger Woods?
What is the best way for a pet shop to get business?
What do you get when you throw a dead baby off a cliff?
Where did Cookie Monster develop PTSD?
What is the name of the charity organization that kills 90% of all of its "rescues"?
Why can't Elvis Presley roll backwards with his car?
What did the girl with no arms get for Christmas?
What did the surgeon tell Michael Jackson before he changed his skin colour?
Why are elevator jokes so funny?
What happens to fitbit when a fatty wears it?
What's the difference between Politicians and Thieves?
Why did Hitler take suicide?
What is the scariest part of a cavity search?
What Will Come After Fuller House?
What do you call a communist hip hop dancer?
What's an advantage of being Swiss?
Why are blacks so tall?
How do you get an Aussie to climb up on the roof?
What did the Terminator say when he was invited to a music themed fancy dress party?
Wanna know what makes me smile?
What is a rapper's favorite Email?
you know what makes a joke funny?
Did you hear about the midget fortune-teller who escaped from jail?
How do you make a Chihauhau cross?
Why is hockey a girls sport?
What do you call a fat psychic ?
What were the protestors outside Erin Andrew's court house shouting today?
Why did the man steal mushrooms from the store?
What do you call it when a dog craps on your rug?
What did the cat say to the human after being hit with a baseball bat?
How many donald trumps does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do Chick-O-Sticks and armadillos have in common?
What sort of transport does a sheep use?
how many African Americans "by way of slave ships" does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How many 9 year olds does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do a woman with a tiny butt and a mother donkey have in common?
Why doesn't Jesus play hockey?
Why is Jeopardy the #1 show in the U.S.?
What are the five white things on a nigger?
What do you call a fat pirate?
If animals took over the world, what would be they're first decree?
Don't you hate those people who are obsessed with tracking their steps?
Why was Jesus not Mexican?
Did you hear about the guy who kept fucking cheerios?
Why are blonde jokes so short?
Why can't't Donald Trump's staff satisfy his female customers?
Why did a hungry African man crossed the road?
What do you call a burger made from 50% beef and 50% veal?
What did the Chinese man in an unhappy marriage say when he found out his wife faked her death?
What drink did Hitler absolutely hate the taste of?
What did the RAM stick say to the politician?
What do you call the surgery when a woman gets a sex change?
Why did Robert Oppenheimer's wife go to the beach naked?
What's the similarity between Madeline Mccann and a submarine?
Why was the Baker a part-time drug dealer?
If you could go back in time and kill any person for the good of the future, who would you kill?
What's the best part about getting head from an infant?
Which program do Jedis use to open PDF files?
How does batman store energy?
Where does the pirate put his ear ring?
Why doesn't Donald trump travel in ships anymore..?
How do you tell the difference between a triathlete and biathlete?
What does every clean nose have?
What is the difference between God and Donald Trump?
What is the definition of irony?
A soprano and a violinist fall off a cliff at the same time. Who does first?
What do you call a frog that's in the mood?
Why was the 1 year old Ethiopian boy crying?
You know what people really do when no one’s looking?
What did Ghandi say when he was in the toilet?
Why did Minotaur win an interior design award?
What's Brown & Rhymes With Snoop?
What do you call a snarky criminal going down a flight of stairs?
What is the world's fastest land animal?
What's the definition of innocence?
What's the best part about going in without a condom?
What do you get when you cross a Jamaican with a ginger?
You're a Jehova's Witness?
Why did Bruce Jenner become invisible?
What's the difference between Vincent van Gogh and Evander Holyfield?
Difference between a three ring circus and a strip club?
Why do some people like to date pessimists?
What do you call a wandering caveman?
Spanish class joke: What did the Spanish cannibals have for dinner?
*Hey sugar tits, wanna dance?
What do you call it when a black person has diarrhea?
What do you call someone you want to be stepped on by?
In INTERSTELLAR, why does Tom's voice get higher when he's older?
What's in Pandora's box?
What is the most popular kids show in the Middle East?
Why did the cowboy buy a Dachshund?
If Hilary Clinton is elected president, what title will they give Bill?
Why are pistachios called pistachios?
If Hillary Clinton and Donald Drumpf are in a boat and it capsizes. Who survives?
Why is Donald Trump a good candidate?
What do a $100 grill and a $100 girl have in common?
Ever have sex while camping?
Have you heard about the man born with five cocks?
What is the Blood Alcohol Concentration that makes most people avoid main roads?
What's the worst part about vaping?
Did you hear about the epileptic Roman?
What does Harry Potter say when he wants a cigarette?
What does Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump have in common?
What do you call olive oil that is really outgoing?
Why are fish so educated?
Why are they called Tuna Fish?
Wanna know why donald trump considers my penis a muslim?
How do you know which pepper in the garden is the nosiest?
How many people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a bodybuilder that can't sing?
How can you tell if a fencer is a redditor?
If you set sail from Los Angeles, CA to Barrow, AK, what would your bering be?
What is a hipster russian roulette?
What's the difference between a bull and an orchestra?
What's great about Trumps' little hands?
What was Han Solo's reaction to being taken to the carbon-freezing chamber?
How many chauvinistic male pigs does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How many feminists does it take to screw a lightbulb?
Did you read about the skeleton trapped in the freezer?
How's the oil industry doing these days?
What did Ava Braun say to Adolf Hitler?
Why is it a bad idea to date a girl from the leper colony ?
What did the fancy cat say when he wanted to leave?
What happened to the Asian guy who walked into a wall with a boner?
Hey baby do you build portable wienerschnitzels?
What do you call an acid trip so hard that it gives you visions of the future?
Who took my username?
What do male lawyers call a female barrister?
How long is a Chinaman?
How will Donald Trump decide which ones to deport from millions illegal immigrants?
What did the colours red and violet say to one another when they couldn't agree in their debate?
What do you call a really pompous person with high blood pressure?
What does "Maginot" mean?
How do skeletons reproduce?
What do an Iraqi baby, an American president, and a homesick Brit visiting Jerusalem all want?
What's a pirate's favorite video game?
Why did the liberal go to the gynecologist?
How many white people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did Yoda say when he watched Star Wars on Blu-Ray?
Where do idiots go on holiday?
What's the difference between a 4WD and a rental car?
What do you get when you cross a vegetable with a pronoun?
What did one volcano call the other volcano?
What's the difference between feminism and a $100 bill?
What's Bill Clintons favorite holiday?
What did the manager say to his new Chinese intern?
Where did the kid with adhd go?
Did you guys hear about Freddie Mercury's bedroom furniture store?
What happens if Trump wins the Presidency?
What does gay Fred Flinstone say when he's excited?
What does a leper say to a prostitute?
Where does the USB key come from?
What do skinny jeans and cheap hotels have in common?
What does having kids bring you that money simply can't buy?
What's Ted Cruz's favorite food?
What's so ironic about disabled toilets?
What does Trump have to do to win the election?
What do Mexican people call really upbeat TV shows?
What do you call it when you can't decide between a natural birth and the hospital?
What happens when clowns get divorced?
What's a mobster porn actress called?
Why should you never date a tennis player?
What is the difference between Hitler and a car?
What do you call a computer that can sing?
What is Hitler's favorite drink?
What do you call Trump and Hillary buried up to their necks in sand?
You know what grinds my gears?
Why was John Lennon so ashy?
I look fat. Can you give me a compliment?
Whats a sugar free drink's favorite abbreviation?
What's worse than finding a worm on your apple?
What do you call 6.9?
How can Donald Trump deport millions of illegal immigrants?
Why did the /r/jokes subscriber cross the road?
Why did the elephant bring toilet paper to the party?
What do you call a gangster who is really in touch with his emotions?
Does anyone know how much a blimp is worth?
Do you know what would make this sub better?
What do you call it when Superman craps his pants?
What is worse than a carrot that smells like a snow women?
What do you call a snobby criminal going downstairs?
If Hillary debates Trump for 24 hours, what won't you hear?
Why would an upright vacuum cleaner with no wheels make a better President than Hillary Clinton?
Why couldn't the Indian baker find another job in his city after he quit his job?
What did the tranny say to their surgeon ?
What is the definition of suspicion?
Are we sure Trump isn't a Democrat...?
What's Hillary Clinton's favorite musical?
What's the Russian word for water?
Did you know that West Virginia's state sport is sex?
What do Little Miss Muffet and ISIS have in common?
Do you know the between a garbanzo and a chick pea?
If Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump are in a boat and it capsizes. Who survives?
What do you call a group of Jewish redheads?
Why was the pun so offensive?
What did the policeman say to the jumper?
What is the only way to stop Donald Trump?
What is DJ Khaled's favorite number?
DJ Khaled is a priest in mexico. What does he say at baptism?
What's the difference between a Toronto Maple Leafs fan and a 14-year old girl?
What do you call one billion facebook users piled on top of each other?
How do you call a 100 m race between siamese twins?
How did Vladimir Lenin originally get into power?
Who's killed more natives than General Custer?
Why didn't Donald Trump want to play Marco Polo?
What weighs 2 lbs and is full of shit?
What does someone have when he can tell you how many guys are in a crowd?
Why doesn't Japan have elections?
Why don't elephants smoke?
Ever hear about the box that was coming down with something?
What do you call a hydrocarbon that tells fart jokes?
What disorder will Spiderman get as he ages?
What do you say when your lesbian daughter brings home her girlfriend?
What did the Pirate say when he turned 80?
What did the leper tell the prostitute?
What do you call it when someone gets hit by a bus on his way to pay off his student loans?
Osama Bin Laden, Josef Stalin and Hitler are robbing a bank, who do the cops shoot first?
What do you call souvenirs from the last battle of the Napoleonic wars?
What do you call a Japanese suicide bomber?
Why couldn't the scientist find salt for his breakfast?
Why Eiffel Tower is so high?
Where did Donald Trump go for dinner last night?
What do whales do on dates?
What's the tallest building in your city?
Why did the DJ have such small hands?
How did Hitler originally get into power?
What do you call a dinosaur that hates punchlines?
What were the last words of king Laius?
Why can’t a bike stand on its own?
Honest question - what's with the reposted jokes?
Student: Can I go to the bathroom?
Why can't dwarfs sing?
What's the best part about sex with a transvestite?
Did you hear about the water thief-turned-photographer?
What was Hitlers favorite letter?
What's the difference between a pizza and a pizza joke?
What's blue and smells like red paint?
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton run for president. Who loses?
What's Kayne West's least favorite letter?
What's one advantage of electing a woman president of the United States?
How does Donald Drumpf change a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the insomniac, agnostic, dyslexic man?
What drug did the mathematician do?
Why do gypsies suck at basketball?
What mathematical operation is used to calculate the rate at which lumberjacks cut wood?
Poe, is your baby hungry?
What do you call all Republicans that aren't racist, sexist or homophobic?
Why did the bachelors purchase double amputee strippers for their party?
Why couldn't the infant insect without toes drink milk?
How does Ice-Cube drink his milk?
What keyboard shortcut do the elderly have the most trouble with?
What do you find inside a clean nose?
Want a slutty costume?
How is Trump vs. Clinton like Godzilla vs. Mothra?
Do you know what they say about the guy that invented life savers?
Why does Tom Cruise like Scientology?
Know what stops the Bern?
How Many Jews Does It Take To Open A Door?
What game do French schoolchildren like to play?
What happens when redditors die?
Why is Donald Trump still running for president?
How many optometrists does it take to change a light bulb ?
What do you call a Cult that is hard to get into?
What did the Chinese guy think about assisted suicide?
What do you call a jerk in the space program?
What is the similarity between a tornado and a divorce in the south?
Why did Bowie die?
How does one think the unthinkable?
What's a spice with explosive flavor?
Why do women have shorter feet?
What do you eat when you cross a cannibal and a vegan?
What do you call someone that goes down on both genders?
What do you call a German barber?
How can you ask a Mexican if their zodiac sign is leo?
What's the difference between Superman and Super Delegate?
Why is Edward still in Russia?
Husband: Honey why are there broken condoms on the couch?
Did you hear about the pessimist who hates sausage?
what's the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
What Do You Call A Mexican From The Caribbean?
What is very big, gray, and just doesn't matter?
Do you know why Morgan Freeman's name is Morgan Freeman?
What do you call a boner you don't want?
What looks like red paint but is dry?
What do vegetarians masturbate to?
How did realism get me banned from Facebook?
How do you tell a Communist joke?
What do you call it when a Spanish man goes to court for custody of his children?
What do you call a polygon on viagra?
Why can't Buddhists vacuum in corners?
How much wood does a woodchuck chuck if a woodchuck chuck could chuck wood?
Why couldn't the potato get off the couch?
What goes faster from 100 to 0, an asteroid hitting the Earth or this thread's upvote %?
How is my guitar skill?
Do you know the problem with ordering duck?
What do you call a zombie musician?
What do you call the statistics for the total amount of waste produced by the US this year?
What do you call a sad state?
Why do people prefer shooting stars to vegetables?
Why Does Donald Trump Oppose Single Payer?
What do you call an arithmetic major who murders moms to pay off his student loans?
What is the biggest gender on Tumblr?
What kind of bear is best?
Which is the month in which women talk the least?
Why did Germans in Nazi Germany say "Heil Hitler"?
What did the mama frog say to the baby frog when they left for a party?
Why is Antarctica controversial?
Why are thieves the best actors?
Why do the Japanese have squinty eyes?
What is a soup-lover's favorite sport?
Where do African cannibals get their food from?
Why did the Greenlander get so angry when he didn't win the lottery?
How can you tell if a carpenter is happy?
Did you guy's hear about that peanut in Baltimore?
Whats the difference between illegal and unlawful?
What does Jeb Bush have in common with a threesome?
Why did Leonardo Di Caprio laugh at the Oscar joke?
Why is Donald Trump like a Gibbering Mouther from DnD?
What do you call a fish that performs brain surgeries?
Why did Leonardo Take forever to laugh at my Oscars joke?
How many Seths does it take to rejigger a malflanòse?
How do you make a lemon orgasm?
How many mice does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you know the toothbrush was made in France?
How do you make an archaeologist blush?
Who ships Kate Winslet and Leonardo DiCaprio the most?
I've only heard the setup for this joke, anybody know the rest?
What rating do pirate movies always get?
How many Trump supporters does it take to change a light bulb?
What do is the difference between acne and a pedophile?
What do you call a building that falls in love with its architect?
What did man create that inevitably destroyed man itself?
What do a thong and Donald Trump's toupee have in common?
What's the difference between Pizza and Jews during the Holocaust?
What did the Mexican fire chief name his two sons?
What is Anon's favorite coding language?
Can a woman make a man a millionaire?
Why will Donald Trump never have an amputation?
What kind of girl gets away with being five years old and having sex with 20 guys?
What do you call a homosexual on rollerskates?
What is a Jewish person's favorite job?
Why is your optometrist gay?
What do you say to piss off a british farmer?
How do you describe Neapolitan ice cream to someone?
Why do Jamaican philosophers shit together?
What do Monica Lewinsky and a vending machine have in common?
Whats a tacticians favorite cut of meat?
Why does Hillary Clinton not give good blowjobs?
How many psychologists does it take to change a light bulb?
What's Super Mario's favorite type of jeans?
What should you do if you come across an elephant in the jungle?
When's the best time to come out of the closet?
What does Donald Trump say after sex?
What do you call a pan-sexual man named Nick who works at a CD store?
What do you call a black jew?
When does Hillary Clinton have sex with Bill?
What do they say for jokes about German sausages?
Why rivers are never viewed on dvd or video cassette?
Do you know the most popular place in town?
How many potatoes does it take to kill an irishman?
How do you ask an Uber driver if he drives for Lyft, too?
What's your number?
Where did the Grim Reaper find his missing keys?
When the animal kingdom had a poker party who didn't they invite?
Did you guys hear about the movie called Constipation?
What do you call racist jokes that are made about black people?
How do you know when it's NotTheOnion?
How do you know your roommate is gay?
Why does Bernie Sanders write in lowercase letters?
What happened to the the Pentagon after the plane crash in 9/11?
What's the difference between an accident and a catastrophe?
What's it called when you're using Tinder on the toilet?
What does a priest and a christmas tree have in common?
What's brown and rhymes with snoop?
What do you call the space between a Mormon's butthole and balls?
What does a fedora guy say on the Singapore border?
Did you hear about the Mexican painter who lost two fingers?
Who get's the best grades?
What's the name of Tyler The Creator's dad?
Why did the blonde freeze a pot of boiling water?
What did the human torch say before he cooked the beef?
Why aren't there any British Communists?
What was the most popular TV show in Ancient Rome and Germany in early AD?
What was Snoop Dogg's ghost arrested for?
How do you say the name Ray in Jamaican?
What bait do you use to catch a space fish?
What's Spider-Mans favorite online music app?
How do you stop Carlos Santana from molesting your children?
What's a transgender's fabourite pokemon?
Knock knock. Who's there?
Did you hear about the guy who had his whole left side cut off?
Why are there no white chinese people?
Why can not Stevie Wonder read?
What's the saddest sea-creature?
What's hard, long and has cum in it?
What do fish talk about at work?
What does Ryan Seacrest say while having sex?
What kind of doctors do elephants become?
Why didn't Hellen Keller learn to lip-read?
What's the difference between premature ejaculation and hide-and-seek?
What do you call a badly cooked beef?
What do "Damn Daniel" and pedophiles have in common?
Didn't Snoop Dogg change his name?
Why did Chris Christie endorse Donald Trump?
What do you call a fire pokemon mixed with Donald Trump ?
What's the worst kind of media?
What foods are still good the second or third time you've eaten them?
Where's the school for the blind?
What do punctuation marks win in competitions?
Have you heard about Bruce Willis' new movie in which he has to infiltrate a Nunnery?
What is more inappropriate than a 7 year old saying "I drink coffee"?
How many dead babies do you need to paint a wall?
What does a German call a party without Sausage and Cheese?
What is the difference between a Mechanical Engineer and a Civil Engineer?
What is a hairdresser's favorite herb?
Why is it so hard to find Thor's brother?
How does a coffee maker know it might be pregnant?
What do politicians do for fun?
What did 0 say to 8?
What gets larger every time I see my Girlfriend?
What's Kylo Ren's Favorite Order of Chemical Reaction?
You know what the difference between "Pay to Win" and "Play to Win" is?
What are crusty girlfriends good for?
Why are men smarter during sex?
Would you rather have parkinsons or alzheimers?
Why didn't DiCaprio laugh at Oscar joke?
What do you get if you chop off Trump's hand?
Why didn't the Soviet Union send Cosmonauts to the Moon?
Q: How do convicts get drugs while they're in prison?
What do you call a midget psychic that's on the run from the law?
How is a cock listening to live rock music?
What is Martin Luther King's least favorite Christmas song?
Did you hear the news about the collision between two black holes?
What's the hardest thing about being an audiophile?
Why should you not tell jokes to sand paper?
Why was there so much chaos at the sperm bank?
Why do white girls always travel in odd numbers?
How do you compliment a girl with a cold sore?
What phrase do prostitutes and mafia members both say?
Why don't women drink beer at the beach?
Why didn't Gordon Ramsay like the Girl Scout cream pies?
What do your call a fish who starts a drug empire?
What's the worst thing about breaking up with a Japanese girl?
Men, what's worse than Satan himself?
What do you call jeans that haven't been worn before?
Why are all castles disabled?
What do call the two midgets who ran an impound lot?
What makes Kirby a great all-around fighter?
What do Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton have in common?
Why did the student fail the exam?
What do you call a jungle where animals talk about current events?
What do you call an asian golddigger?
What's the difference between me and a pile of bricks?
Baby are you an iphone encryption?
Where do dock workers like to shop?
Which is the most common font i Mexico?
Why did the bicycle fall over?
What do a cue ball and a mexican have in common?
What type of dog suffers from being inbred?
How do you make the Reddit front page?
What did the ISIS fighter say when he went to bomb the Hawaiian cafe?
What's for food today?
What do you get when you crossbreed a negro with an octopus?
How do you know when your sister is on her period?
Why did Vader deceive everyone about his love affair with the Emperor?
Why do Jews hate soda?
How did the gay got hooked by a ladyboy?
How do you annoy a Reddittor?
What do you call it when a hobbit lives in the ghetto?
How to make money on youtube?
Why are there no Walmarts in Iran?
Why do scuba divers always jump backwards off the boat?
What kind of degree do you inherit through marriage?
What do you call a muslim body builder?
Why was Muhammad's dad always successful in business?
What kind of bees get you high?
Did anyone else catch that TEDx talk with the mentally disabled guy?
What do you get when you cross a pickle with a deer?
Why did the cell phone need glasses?
Why did the Mexican train driver kill all of his passengers?
What is the KKK's favorite dessert?
What tense do Italians speak in?
Did you hear about the Italian playwright ?
What did the lazy slut do?
What do you call a speech so scary it makes you crap your pants?
Why is there no aspirin in the jungle?
What is Kylo Ren's favorite beverage?
What do statistician's eat for lunch?
What do you call a gay fascist leader?
What do graphic designers smoke up to get high?
Did you hear that they're producing an action movie about a team of crime-fighting composers?
Whats similar with a Dick and a Rubik Cube?
Are instant noodles male or female?
A: You look nice today, is that a new shirt and haircut?
Why does Pinocchio lie?
I just don't understand kids. My kid says he wants to play heavy metal. So why's he so mad at me?
Whats the difference between driving and getting a blowjob?
Why don't Brazilians wear condoms?
Why did princess Diana cross the street?
What's the difference between a chocolate bar, and a cop?
What did the bird say after its cage fell apart?
Did you know that NASA sent a bunch of cows into orbit?
What's better than having a garbanzo bean on your face?
What do you call a Jewish stoner with Downs Syndrome?
Did you hear the one about the man who was run over by a Nissan?
Did you hear about the obese millionaire?
Did you hear One Direction is breaking up?
How do you make a small fortune in the movie industry?
Why are white people racist against black people?
What is Jesus' favorite video game on earth?
Why can't white people hit the whip?
What car does Jesus drive?
Why is a banana the most attractive fruit?
What's the worst part about being a pedophile?
What happened when Steve Irwin forgot to put on sunscreen?
Who wears a red suit and knows if you were naughty or nice?
What's the difference between a woman and a laundry machine?
What does the grim reaper and a pedophile have in common?
What's the difference between a thug and a phone charger?
What do scientists wear?
What should we name this ancient Japanese throwing knife?
What do you get when you mix a bulldog and a shih tzu?
Why did the miner feel so low?
Did you hear about the little Mexican fish who became a great actor?
What is the best things about the a 90 year old's tits?
Ever heard of a 6.9?
Why isn't John Oliver having sultanas in his fruitcake?
What's the difference between a lentil and a chick pea?
What do you call an empty jar of Cheez Whiz?
What does an academic call masturbation?
How is a hipster like a pedophile?
What is the one thing you can't say even on the internet?
What do you call an angry, seafaring mathematician?
What do xbox services and prostitutes have in common?
Where do criminals like to eat?
What do you name a deaf dog?
Why aren't there many jokes about the Jim Jones massacre?
Who invented the North America?
You know what I like about high school girls?
How many babies does it take to stop a puck?
What do Steve Harvey and a dentist have in common?
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton and the American people?
What do Kim Kardashian, and my girlfriend have in common?
What do you call a Chinese baby in the oven?
What did the seahorse say to the fat man?
What's a frat boy's favorite toy company?
Why was the Amish girl kicked out of her community?
Why couldn't Mark think of a dad joke?
Did you hear the doctor's excuse when he botched the circumcision?
Why doesn't Kanye West take his wife to the beach?
Why is Christopher Walken so tired?
What's the useless skin around the vagina called?
Why Didn't The Skeleton Go To The Party?
What happened to Donald Trump when he visited Switzerland?
How do you know there's a Bernie Sanders fan at your door?
What does a Mermaid bring to math class?
How does Steven Hawking refresh after a long work day?
How do you make a Bloody Nicole?
(Dirty!) Why was the guitar teacher arrested?
What is Bill Cosby's favorite flavor of ice cream?
What Would Darth Hitler Say to His Son?
How do you pay for incense?
Damn Girl Do You Work At Subway?
Why was the poker game at the zoo cancelled?
How do you trap a polar bear?
Knock knock. Who's there? Dishes. Dishes who?
What are 3 things a black man can't get?
Why is the robot good at one night stands?
What's the problem with leptokurtic data sets?
What's the best fabric Softener to use on a cat?
What is politics?
Why did the Chili Pepper cross the road?
You know what the definition of "competitive" is?
What did the Japanese chef say when his mother died?
Why do Mexicans eat so many beans?
What's the difference between a pregnant woman and Jeb Bush?
What's the best part of growing up in Compton?
Why do rabbits prefer IPA's over other kinds of beers?
What is a cannibal's favorite fruit?
Why is Peter Pan always flying?
Did you hear about the guy who got fired from the calendar factory?
Why do Eskimos have wide noses?
What is wrong with the number 6.9?
What type of sushi does Bob Seger like?
What do you call it when two bottles of lotion start dating?
why don't foot fetishists ever win anything?
What's the hardest thing about skydiving?
Do you know why there's no Apple wireless charger?
What's green and red, and goes round and round?
What's black and sits in the back of a cop car?
What do you give a paedophile who has everything?
What’s the difference between news of the US elections and Madeleine McCann?
Why so many conservative white Americans voted Obama?
Why did Gigi leave the party angrily?
What's the difference between Kanye West, an American College student, and a homeless man?
What is a virgin's least favorite fruit?
Ever heard of Black Jesus?
Why did Hannibal Lecter try DiGiorno's Pizza?
Did you know those round bales of hay you still see in fields were outlawed?
Why did Trump run in Us instead of Canada?
What do you call a Jawa's favourite magician?
Why are black people fast runners?
Why did Gandalf have to go to the hospital to get a splinter removed?
Pro is the opposite of con right?
What is Australian cuisine called?
How do you circumcise a whale?
What do you call a sour black man?
Why'd the semen cross the road?
Where are all of the creative Calculus jokes?
Why does Mario never parks his kart near the Koopalings Castles?
Why are nuns like a brand new TV?
What do you call a broken can opener?
Have you heard the latest joke about physicists?
Why was the ink happy?
Why do Jews get circumcised ?
How does a Chinese man start a religious video?
Why do cannibal children go to the hospital?
T NOW! what do we want?
Did you hear about that synthetic type of weed they made using dog hair?
Why did the trumpet player cross the road?
What did the blind man say when he walked by the fish market?
What is the worst thing about Ancient History Class?
Why did the elephant cross the road?
Where do Zika babies come from?
Why did the blind man use chopsticks?
Why did so many people support the colonist protest of tea?
How did Mr Cheese paint his wife?
What's funnier than a one liner?
What did the grilled Seabass say at the Nuremberg trials?
How do you find a blind man on a nudist beach?
What sound did the slot machine make when the Chinese person won the jackpot?
What do you call a Persian lesbian?
How does a feminist screw in a light bulb?
What's common between Hillary and Bill Clinton?
What are the options?
Why your oven doesn't attend an university?
What's the last thing you want to hear while using a urinal?
What's the difference between your job and a dead hooker?
What do you call a chicken with lettuce in its eyes?
Why do sumo wrestlers shave their legs?
Why did Jeb Bush cross the road?
What word in the dictionary is spelled incorrectly?
What do you call someone who smokes two joints?
Why did cavemen pull their women around by their hair?
Why did the pentagon change it's name to the square?
What do you do with a no-legged greyhound?
What do you call a human that's now a cactus?
What language do bugs in the Middle East speak?
What is a police officer's least favorite dessert?
Do you know how Canada got its name?
What online payment service does the Pope use?
What's worse than a centipede with sore feet?
Why are most runners single?
What do you call a car made out of Canadian money?
What vocal art did the mountain climber from Dagobah practice?
Which trigonometric fatio is obsessed with the pokemon Suicune?
Daddy, did you ever eat cat food when you were little?
What's the best thing about elevator jokes?
What's the best thing to do when someone close to you dies?
What's the worst thing about getting bitten by a poisonous spider?
What do you call someone with no shins?
Why dont they use phone books in China?
What's another name for a supernova?
Why don't people drink pig's milk?
What do you call a snobby thief running down your stairs?
What do you call a dehydrated French man?
Who is Soulja Boy's favorite person ever?
What's clear and smells like red paint?
How do French girls hold their liquor?
Which body organ works out the most when masturbating?
What do you call a thief running down your stairs?
Why did the Jedi cross the road?
What sort file do you you need to turn a 1.5 inch hole into a 4.5 inch one?
What did the man who ate a clock say?
Do you that thing about German people?
What's Green and Smells like Pork?
What does SAG-AFTRA call a low-budget foreign production?
Why did the asian man get arrested for stealing a Buick sedan?
What's the difference between necrophilia and a pizza?
What is the difference between a battery and a woman?
What does a slave owner do with his slaves when he's finished with them?
What's the difference between a bmw driver and a porcupine?
What do you call a Nun in a wheelchair?
Headmaster: I've had complaints about you, Johnny, from all your teachers. What have you been doing?
What do you call a cow that can't produce milk?
How do you get a retard to leave you alone?
What did the pastor say when his blanket rose up from his bed?
What's orange and sounds like a parrot?
Why couldn't Marco Rubio register on a web forum?
What do you call it when someone shoots a group of fish in a barrel?
What did the terrorist say to the racist and the socialist?
What's Big?
What kind of meat can a priest eat on Friday?
What does Sarah Palin eat when she's high?
Do you know why latin is a dead language?
Why does Bono never get any mail?
What did the Mexican say when two houses fell on him?
What do you call a complaining adult?
What did the left pussy lip say to the right pussy lip?
What is a goat herder known as in the Middle East?
My Mexican friend told me this one. Whats an owl say?
How do you get a grad student off your porch?
There is a clerk at the butcher shop. He is 5'10" and wears size 13 sneakers. What does he weight?
what aftershave does James bond uses after retirement?
Who was the first full size sex doll?
How do you seat four gay men on a bar stool?
What's better than four roses on a piano?
What do you call a hooker that was shot by a sniper?
What would it take to reunite the Beatles?
You guys wanna hear something really corny?
What's long, hard, goes in a vagina, out of a vagina, and leaves a whore feeling good about herself?
What's the difference between a vegetable and a berry?
Does anyone know the Tom Jones Siamese twins joke, and could they explain it?
How do you pick up a black guy?
Why shouldn't you burn scented candles inside of a Buddhist shrine?
How big are pedophiles shoes?
What do you call a dead asian?
What do dolphins like to listen to?
Why did Hitler need to get a new car?
What do you hear if you hold a kebap to your ear?
What is stephen Hawking's favorite food?
What's the best way to get a fat chick to have sex with you?
I'm a dad. Here's my joke: Why would Bart Simpson never go to a pub?
What's the atheist's view on God?
Why did Thor sit comfortably on a cactus?
What does a pirate's beard feel like?
What's a mole's favourite fruit?
What do whores and sailors have in common?
What is Hitlers favorite juice shop?
Why was the teacher arrested for writing in permanent marker?
What did the Jihadist say when he had explosive Diarrhea?
How do chemists poison each other?
What kind of vision does Fetty Wap have?
Why do Jews have blue penises?
Why do I love putting down kids without parents?
Have you heard about the restaurant on the moon?
What's the difference between a garbanzo and a chickpea?
Why did the man get kicked out of the "Russian" bar?
Why is B so cool?
What did the buffalo say to his son when he left for college?
What is a horse's favorite condiment?
What do you call a party with no Filipino people?
Can you fly a black hawk?
Why do people with OCD like Family Feud?
Why did the chicken decide not to cross the road?
What's the difference between feminism and Islam?
Why does Trump want to build a great wall?
In World War 3, which country would retreat first?
Did you hear about the guy who accidentally took a ride on a dolphin?
How did Helen Keller break her arm?
What do you call a comic book hero that is constantly hooked on having sex with female superheroes?
What's the difference between someone falling from 21st floor and 1st floor?
What do you call a Hawaiian pizza with Jalapeños?
How many Germans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why does a blonde nurse carry around a red pen?
How do you know if a redditor gave money to Bernie Sanders?
What's the difference between a chic pea and a garbanzo bean?
How do you know when you are a drug addict?
Why was the Amish girl excommunicated?
What's one thing the Hulk would struggle tearing down?
Why didn't the life guard save the hippy?
What's long, dark, hard and grotesque but very satisfying to beat?
What does Bill Clinton say to Hilary after sex?
What do you call a homeless horse with a Borderline Personality Disorder ?
Did you hear about the construction worker that got arrested?
What do you tell someone who feels that life has shorted them from a purpose or calling?
What would you call the easter egg roll if Bernie Sanders became president?
What did the tampon say to the other tampon?
What did the skinny Cuban say to the fat American?
How many US Congress members does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the best part about living in Flint, Michigan?
Why was the scarecrow promoted?
Why was Kylo Ren embarrassed at McDonald's?
Have you heard of the band 1023 Megabytes?
what do you call an animal that's neither a herbivore nor a carnivore??
What came first the egg or the Chicken?
How many Ricks from TWD does it take to change a light bulb?
What's Michigan's favorite beer?
What do you call a rooster looking at a vegetable patch?
Why can't American engineers design linear actuators?
Why couldn't the physicists change the lightbulb?
Hey baby, are you an oven?
What do you call a Mexican who acts like a white person?
If evolution is real how come?
Do you now the first sign of HIV ?
Why are pizza makers always poor?
Whats the most dyslectic part of Asia?
[Computer Games] Enemy: Where have you learned aiming?
What do books wear on a rainy day?
What happens to a gay man every month?
Where do muslims go when they die?
Which beer did the flower drink that made it realize that it was smarter when it was young?
Why would Donald Trump make a great addition to The Walking Dead?
Why hasn't there been a Mexican Disney Princess?
Why did God give women yeast infections?
How do you get a Jewish Girl's number?
How do you get people to pirate an album?
What's worse than getting raped by Jack the Ripper?
Where do Muslims go after they die?
What do you tell someone who occupies space and has mass?
What do you call a pot head with down syndrome?
Why are drums a fire hazard?
Did you know that Princess Di had really bad dandruff?
Why did the mexican man throw his wife off a bridge?
What do you call an old man's hard on?
What do you call spaghetti pretending to be rigatoni?
What do you call an annoying black person?
What's the difference between snowmen and snowwomen?
How is a chronic disease unlike the 9th Doctor, but like the 10th Doctor?
Do you remember what the picture on your pass looks like?
Is it common?
Why do dyslexics drink tea when having a heated argument?
How do you bury a Jew?
What form of humor do Dentists find most offensive?
What is the Great Gatsby's favorite superhero?
Why did they not allow farmers in Greece?
What do Pink Floyd fans and NASCAR driver Kyle Larson have in common?
What's the best thing to say if a pizzaman does an AMA?
What does every funeral begin with?
How did the Linux admin commit assault?
Why was the programer killed by a snake?
How often do you use algebra?
What song does Freddy Krueger listen to when he gets a manicure?
What do you call a lost Asian man?
Why did my friend get a screw in her pizza?
Which Mary is it?
How do Chinese name their kids?
Why aren't the Williams sisters competing against Michael Phelps?
What do you call a mean general?
What's invisible and smells like carrots?
Why did the train driver crash his train off the bridge?
Why did the chair suck at poker?
Why did the vulture cross the road?
What did one plate say to the other?
What did the buffalo said to its bisexual son?
What's the difference between Bill Cosby and a Snickers Bar?
What's the difference between date rape and necrophilia?
Why are there no feminists in Japan?
Why did the man name his daughter Candy?
What's the most unfortunately named place in the world?
How does Geppetto exact his revenge on Monstro the Whale?
Did you hear the one about the peanut who rode the subway?
What did Sushie A say to Sushi B?
What do you call a deer with one good eye?
What's Gordon Ramsey's favourite movie?
Why do honest ducks dip their heads under the water?
You want to know what's ironic?
What's the difference between you and me?
What do you call Batman when he ditches church?
What do you call it when the bull impales the bullfighter?
Which computer sings the best?
What does a chef and a gravitational wave astronomer have in common?
Have you seen the movie constipated?
What came first, the chicken or the egg?
Where's the best place to go if you want a little head?
What is the stinkiest number in Ireland?
[OLDIE BUT GOODIE] What did the five fingers say to the face?
What do you call that feeling when the bus finally arrives?
Why can't midgets be accountants?
What's Chris Brown's favourite time of day?
What's pink and retarded?
What do you call a chicken looking at a bowl of lettuce?
Why was the web server down?
Who will Donald Trump blame when he loses the presidential bid?
How do you protect yourself from ghosts?
What's the one thing missing from the offensive jokes on r/jokes?
What is Adam Johnson's favourite kill streak?
Did you hear about the magician who became a farmer?
Cringe-Worthy St. Valentine's Joke: Which candy is never on time?
Why Donald Trump doesn't ask money from people?
What are the loneliest elements?
what is 40 feet long and only has 3 teeth?
How come the dog never finished his game?
What do you call a deaf gynecologist?
How do you piss off r/jokes?
Who the biggest Loser of them all?
What do you call a con artist panda?
Where does the General keep his armies?
What did the egg say to the pot of boiling water?
What did the sprinter with diarrhea do during the race?
what do you call two crows on a branch?
What do you get if you run in front of a car?
What do you call a racist grandmother?
What do you call a stereotypical flan?
What is a dilemma ?
Want to here a joke?
Why aren't there any Wal-Marts in the middle east?
Why are redneck murder cases the hardest to solve?
How did the failing Heroes of the Storm player apologize to their teammate?
Guess who's addicted to pussy?
Why did the oil covered seagull get sued?
Where did the general keep his armies?
Where did Adolf Hitler hide his armies?
Why didn't Johnny go to the 7 A.M. funeral?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs in a bush?
What do you call a Korean with a dog?
What is a casino dealer's worst nightmare?
What's the slowest vehicle on the road?
What's the difference between a Jew and a truck?
What is the difference between outlaws and inlaws?
Did you hear the one about the asshole, the jew, the immigrant's son, and the woman?
What do you call a house full of black people?
What's the difference between black people and cancer?
How did you quit smoking?
What do you call a Spaniard that is a violator?
Why did the poor dog chase his tail?
Who's the opposite of Christopher Reeves?
What did he do ?
Do you believe in love at first site?
What does Tupperware and a walrus have in common?
What do a Christmas tree and priest have in common?
What's the best thing about alzheimers?
Do you like cheesecake?
Where did the sick boat go?
Why is urine called pee?
He drank an entire bottle of olive oil?
Why is trigonometry so hard to talk about?
Did you know George Washington is not on the 1$ bill?
Have you heard about the Rosa Parks sex move?
Why did the policeman shoot the empty LED?
What did the ninja do when he failed to kill his target?
What's the best part about football?
What's the best part of being a necrophiliac?
What did the mohel bring to the BBQ potluck?
Why do lesbians always win against journalists?
What do you call a Chinaman that does everything given what other people do?
What would American Psycho 3 be called if it had Martin Shreli as the lead actor?
What do you call a deaf lesbian?
What does a cannibal without a kitchen eat?
Why don't you see any transgendered parents?
He drank the entire bottle of olive oil?
What led to the discovery of gravitational waves?
Why is spongebob an ass man?
Why did the blond get fired from the banana plantation?
How do you get gum out of your hair?
What is Bruce Lee's favourite drink?
Why did the germ cross the microscope?
What do you do when someone has an epileptic fit in the bathtub?
You ever hear the one about the super-competitive guy who joined a circlejerk?
What's the difference between a week-old human and a weak, old human?
What does an egg say at a party?
#TBT How do you wake up Lady Gaga?
Are you a banker?
What does the number 668 represent?
Hear about the tornado that hit the vacuum cleaner factory?
What do you call an amputee masseuse?
What did the ancient Greek mother say when her sons toga got torn?
Why was the Muslim sad when he bought a pirated disc?
How do you open a banana safe?
How can you tell if your water is about to break?
Whats the difference between a chickpea and a garbanzo bean?
What does the unemployed starving man ask his rich baker friend?
Who did Alaska vote for?
What Did Chris Christie Give Up For Lent?
What's a bear's favorite fruit?
Why did the freshly circumcised penis experience uncontrollable road rage?
Why did the football coach go to Aldi?
What was the name of the Antartic terrorist group?
How was my soup?
What do The Walking Dead and Fast & Furious have in common?
Did you hear about the kidnapping in the park ?
What does an excited Japanese horse say?
What did Journey say to the critic as he stormed out of their concert?
What is Medusa's favorite cheese?
Why are some girls so odd?
Why do hipsters not wear cardigans anymore?
What brand toothbrush do Mexicans use?
Where are you from?
Ya know what's a real pain in my ass?
What did the toaster say to the pop tart?
Why did the audience hate the pedophile guitarist?
What's the difference between a blonde and a washer?
What do you call a blonde in a closet?
How do tennis players prefer their steak?
What do you call a Gay Dictator?
What's a pedophile's favorite part of a hockey game?
Why was the mathematician fired?
What is a mathematician's favorite food?
Why did the police chief hate going into the basement?
What's the same between a smart blonde and a UFO?
What do you call a Chicken staring at lettuce?
A chicken was flying when it laid an egg. Why didn't the egg break?
What did the grand child say to his drowning grandpa?
What did the pillar say when he forgot to wish his friend happy birthday?
What do you call a werewolf that knows it's a werewolf?
How does one respond to a black guy sending you a dick pic?
Which laptop has the most pleasant speakers?
Why did Martin Luther King have so many pink shirts?
What's Pharma Bro's favorite musical?
What do you call 6.022 x 10^23 avocados?
What did the pedophiliac rabbi say to the young boy?
How can you tell if a loaf of bread is a boy or girl?
What seperates man from animal?
What do you call a weird Russian?
What is easy to get into, but hard to get out of?
how do you know when a prescription is being written for bulimia?
What's a Russian's favorite service provider?
What's a mathematician's favorite drug?
Why couldn't the snowman spend his money?
Why was the snowman smiling?
What's the difference between an Iraqi middle school and a terrorist training camp?
What does a Mexican duck say?
Pete and Marco Rubio are on a boat. Pete falls off. Who is left?
Why is that Bono still hasn't found what he's looking for?
Why did Bill Clinton say NO to testosterone meds?
Why is morning wood full of holes?
What's "Bob" backwards?
What does Cam Newton and Fig Newton have in common?
What's the difference between a hooker and an onion?
Why did the marijuana addict lose the race?
What did the shy pebble wish for?
Why was Jimmy so excited to go to Clown College?
What do you call a fat North Korean?
Why cant #alllivesmatter?
How does a penguin make a decision?
What is the best city to stream a movie?
What s the difference between an ostridge ?
What do you call a dog with no tongue?
What do you call a German sausage fest?
What can a goose do, that a duck can't, that a lawyer should ?
what is a short, yet a long password?
Why are most demolitions experts happy?
How do you know you're kissing a french horn player?
Why are Gametes good at marketing?
What's yellow and can't swim?
What goes in hard and comes out soft and sticky?
Why is school like a boner?
What's the difference between obese and morbidly obese?
What do you call Kurt Russel playing an archaeologist?
How to piss of a reddit moderator?
Why is it bad that Peyton Manning shilled for Budweiser?
Why is a fire truck always red?
What is Victoria's Secret?
Why couldn't the boy keep his documents open when he left a window open in winter?
What did Will Smith's toe say to his face?
What did one pimple say to the other?
Why did the Broncos wear white jerseys in Super Bowl 50?
How did the stoner propose to his girlfriend?
a blonde and a brunette jump off a building, who reach the floor first?
What did the male computer say to the female computer?
Why did the bible cross the street?
What do you call a chicken staring at a head of lettuce?
How do you make the hippie run out of money?
How does a black man ride a black stallion?
Who would win in a fight between John Cena and Chuck Norris?
Why can't Stevie Wonder see his kids?
Boss: Where were you born?
Why are millionaires bad at swimming?
Have you been to Iran?
What do you call a barista with big tits?
What did the Puerto Rican dish say when he lost his Android?
Do you know why doctors are prescribing medical marijuana for arthritis?
How do we confirm life on another planet?
What's the most common pickup line at a gay bar?
What did the rising sun say to the morning dew?
Where do Sarah Palin and Hillary Clinton go to worship?
Why did the clam get in an accident?
How many people with OCD does it take to fix a lightbulb?
How do you call a person from France, with whom you have casual sex?
Why did the orange stop rolling down the hill?
What do Dave Mirra and The Offspring have in common?
Do you know what the secret of encouragement is?
What does Cam Newton have in common with a Fig Newton?
Ever wonder why Dallas Cowboy fans are so rich?
What do you call a sick eagle?
What do Russians call their barbers?
Why cant Miss Piggy count to 70?
What's the most obvious slang word in the Star Wars universe?
How do you get wishes from cheese?
Do you know what Minnesota doesn't have?
How do you keep a clown from laughing?
What was the old man in despair about?
What is Jesus' favorite band?
What bands did they hire to play at the Developmental Disability Conference?
Why have the French lost the war?
What do you call a chicken staring at a lettuce?
Who's the opposite of Willem Dafoe?
Why does Donald Trump secretly want to lose the election?
How do you start a racist joke?
Whats the difference between two dicks and a joke?
Whats the difference between a zippo and a hippo?
What does a power ranger say before they do drugs?
What's a Sicilian terrorists favorite treat?
A blonde, brunette, and a redhead are all in the 9th Grade. Which one is the sexiest?
Why did I throw my phone out of my window?
Why do rednecks make the best sandwiches?
Why was the archeologist sad?
What do you get when you throw a baby against a wall?
Why do elephants drink so much?
Semi clean jokes that aren't pervy and don't include death?
What does Joe Pesci order at Burger King?
You ever been to the strip club on that ice planet?
Why did the stressed out zombie go on vacation?
what's the best part about electing Hillary Clinton?
What is the best part about having sex with twenty eight year-olds?
Which joke is better?
What do you call someone who points out the obvious?
Have you heard that president Assad has been making cheese?
What did the urologist say to his physician before he hired him?
Why can't you trust girls?
What's the difference between Finebros and Humiliation pornstars?
How much does it cost to clean up Germany?
How do you piss of an archaeologist?
How do you cure depression?
Have you guys heard about Wendys?
Why doesn't America knock?
What does ISIS call wine snobs?
What do cannibals call a fajita made out of a vagina?
Why Twitter deleted so many terrorist accounts recently?
What's Pink and Hard???
(Warning - Shitty Pun) What do you call a mentally-deficient louse?
Why was the little boy speaking gibberish?
Where do poor Italians live?
What did the boy tell the priest in the confessional?
What do you get when you combine a black guy and an octopus?
What do the Superbowl and the OJ Simpson Saga have in common?
Son: Dad how do stars die?
How do you sell a chicken to someone who is hard-of-hearing?
Why can't you take a shower with a pokemon?
What do you call a black woman whose had an abortion?
What kind of joke do peeping Toms like?
What did the proctologist say to the pirate?
Why doesn't r/jokes like fencers?
What is green, fuzzy, and if it fell out of a tree might kill you?
What do you call a computer with an amazing singing voice?
Did you see the story about the missing dolphin?
What do you call a chicken looking at a lettuce?
What do you call a bad joke about prostitutes?
Why didn't anyone like the bread store owner?
what does my dad and christmas crackers have in common?
Why do they call it "Ben Folds Five"?
Hey girl, are you an F5 key?
What is green and smells like bacon?
What kind of pistol should you use to shoot a bear?
What's the difference between 3 and 13?
Why did the teacher have trouble controlling her pupils?
How did Metallica get their band name?
What do you call a dog who digs for bones?
What do Lena Dunham & ISIS have in common ?
What did one otter say to the other otter?
What do you call a man with no feet and is allergic to milk?
How do you sell a chicken to a deaf man?
How did the prostitute get a job at the zoo?
Where do post go when they die in Reddit?
Do you want to be the greatest superhero of all?
What do you call a mouthwash for tiny scientists?
What do you call an Asian who acts like he is black?
Have you ever wondered why wizards are such snobs?
What does an epileptic vegetarian eat?
Why doesn't God like pizza?
What did the redditor do with the embarrassing naked picture he found of himself?
What do you call group of mentally handicapped kids at a performance of "Peter Pan"?
What does a hippy tell you when you ask them to leave?
Do you think you'll get fake teeth when you're old and gray?
How big was osama bin Laden's hard drive?
Why did the foreigner vote for Trump?
What did the chemist say when he caught his brother stealing halogens?
If you spin an Asian person around, what do they become?
Where do really smart birds roost?
Why are Mexicans good at bow hunting?
What's the opposite of effort?
What's it like being frozen to absolute zero?
What do you call a person that ran away but changed their minds?
how is bungee jumping like having sex?
What do you call Shia LaBeouf's alter ego?
Why could Hitler become Fuhrer?
What do you call a comedian that can't get a girl pregnant?
What do you call a short cowboy?
How Do You Call 5 Black People Having Sex?
What do you call a bunch of gay slaves?
What do you call a nomadic neanderthal?
What is the main material used in the manufacture of TIE fighters?
What's DJ Khaled's favourite number?
Q: Have you ever tasted Ethiopian food?
Why is Trump's suits made from the same material as panties?
How much...?
Did you hear about the man who was into asphyxiation and vegetables?
What app do nervous ppl order on dates?
Have you heard that rumour about butter?
Why can a penguin never win Best Actor?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs?
What kind of computer can also sing?
What do Pink Floyd and Dale Earnhardt Sr. have in common?
Whats the difference between an Audi and a porcupine?
How long is a pedicure?
How many dead hooker's in your basement does it take to change a light bulb?
What does your sex life have in common with a highway bridge?
How did the sheep get a Nobel Prize?
Why were the Native Americans in America before us?
A geologist hit a man with his car. What crime is he accused of?
What do you call a constipated German?
What type of rock is this Holmes?
Why does Iraq have no Walmarts?
What was Lenin's favourite film?
What do you call a centaur that works as a prostitute?
Why did the arsonist get kicked off the basketball team?
What is the Difference Between a Pretentious Asshole, and a Brilliant Artist?
When does a gas become a liquid?
A blue man lives in a blue house, a red man lives in a red house, who lives in the white house?
What's the difference between a politician and a computer?
What would you call a porn parody of "The Incredibles"?
What do you call a Chinese cameraman?
What is a baby's favorite Fall Out Boy song?
What did the homeless man get for christmas ?
Whats the difference between a house cat and a polecat ?
What's in the toilet of the Star Ship enterprise?
Who leaked all of Reddit's most sensitive secrets?
What is another word for Pokémon?
What is a Chinese person's favorite wound?
What did the woman say to her husband who constantly turns the heater up way too high?
Why did kurt pull the trigger?
What do you call a 20 year old spaceship that whines all the time and never wants to run properly?
Girl, are you the New Deal?
Why does an ethiopian baby cry?
How many feminist does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did 'b' say to his friend 'e' after 'e' saved his life?
Why doesn't Hitler play table tennis?
What's the most immature gaming console?
What's the difference between jews and girl scouts?
What's the difference between YouTube and Redtube?
What does Facebook and a conversation between two teenagers have in common?
What's the difference between the space shuttle and a 2.5 kiloton bomb?
What is the black kid getting for Christmas?
What do a pirate wench and an alcoholic have in common?
What do you call a sheep taking Ambien?
Did I tell you about my old girl friend with only one leg?
How do you put an elephant in a Safeway bag?
What type of punch hurts kids the most?
How is air like sex?
What is Canadian graffiti like?
Where are the best leaders made?
What's the best part about sex with 28-year-olds?
How much toilet paper do people use on a daily basis?
Whats the similarities between black people and bikes?
What's on the inside of a clean nose?
Are you a beaver?
Why is the fungus such a hypocrite?
What kind of ice cream runs for president?
What does poker and sex have in common?
what did the kid say when asked about elections?
Why are most male politicians gay?
What is another name for a pregnant Mexican dog?
What do you get when Hulk holds the American Flag?
Why can't Floyd Mayweather Jr drink pints quickly?
Is it ok to have sex with a third cousin?
Why did the monkey fall out of the tree?
What happens when batman takes viagra?
Why is the Chinese language called Mandarin?
What do you call batman when he skips church?
How did voldemort look like when he was hiding in albania?
What's the difference between the stock market and women?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a baby who just got HIV?
Did you hear about the Buddhist who refused Novocaine during a root canal?
What's long and white?
Where is Disturbed's favorite vacation spot?
What caused Captain Morgan's shipwreck?
What did the mathematician's apprentice say when he didn't get acknowledged?
Why do Canadians like to do it doggy style?
Have you ever had Somalian food?
What did the fisher say to the fishkin?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a sandwich?
What happened when fire and the wheel were invented?
You want to know why we couldn't put together an Eighties Music Festival?
Hey Reddit, Guess What?
Did you hear the one about three holes in the ground?
Why is the dating app called Tinder?
What did the blindman say when he walked by the fish market?
What do you call a rich black man?
Sunbathing on the beach, the wife came up to me asked what I thought of her flip flops?
What is your best sushi-related joke or pun?
A tree falls in the forest and kills a baby, whos fault is it?
Got any nuts?
How can you see if a Hairdresser is not suitable for the job anymore?
What do you call a rapist with shaved pubes?
What did Tarzan say when he saw a heard of elephants?
So Clinton won 6 out of 6 coin tosses in Iowa?
Why are there so many more men in the military?
Why would you rather run into a bmw driver than a cactus?
Why do tigers eat raw meat?
What do you call a man with three cocks?
What is the first question you ask a baby cow, after its gotten over an illness?
How could I forget, mate?
What is the Hamburglar's favorite David Bowie song?
What do you call 9 idiots who laugh at repetitive joke?
What is the difference between a black man and a couch?
what do you call a feminist who secretly craves for men and also loves to swallow?
I ask myself, what city has the most feminists?
What do you call americans flying to space?
What did Treebeard say when he took a piss?
What does a vagina and the Mafia have in comman?
What did Mexico City say to his father before he left for college?
What do you do with epileptic lettuce?
What do you get when you have an Asian and MLP?
What do you call 99% of /r/politics?
What band's fanbase is the most charitable?
If Sanders win the nomination, won't that make him mainstream?
What is a pedophile's favorite soap opera?
What's the difference between a necrophiliac and someone with a granny fetish?
What did the Shit Summoner say at the bar ?
What do you call it when somebody kills a perfect circle of religious leaders?
What do you call a professional tennis player that keeps serving out?
What did the driver say to the one-legged hitchhiker?
Why did Kennedy throw his head back?
What do you call an explanation of an Asian cooking show?
Why did the rich guy crash his car?
What has four legs, is big, green, fuzzy, and if it fell out of a tree would kill you?
Why do all black people have nightmares?
Why doesn't Jesus play hockey anymore?
How does Michael Jackson Beat It?
What's a Mexican sound technician's favorite cereal?
Why is air a lot like sex?
Why can't British people go to North Korea?
Why was the fire alarm in the trash?
Did you hear about the suspect who's alibi was that he was at a restaurant?
What's the difference between a Rottweiler and a Jewish mother?
Would you like to hear a joke about pizza?
Why aren't puns called pows?
Why don't black people go on cruises?
Why does an Ethiopian baby cry?
How do you shut down all the nuclear reactors in the world?
Whats the difference between a black guy and a bench?
How do 3rd world countries get clean water?
Wtf this movie was not at all like the book! Friend: It was, are you sure you read the book?
Should I have a baby after 25?
What do you call two siblings that take your money?
What's the best thing about having sex with twenty five year olds?
Did you know Hellen Keller had a treehouse?
Who is Patrick Swayze's favorite author?
What's an asexual person's favorite thing to do in the bedroom?
Did you hear about those chicken proof yards?
What do you call a Japanese pirate?
Did you fall from heaven?
How do you circumcise a hillbillly?
What do you call a prostitute on her period?
How does Mario talk to the dead?
How do programmers say 'I love you!' ?
Did you hear about the pirate who wanted to cut hair for a living?
What does as electronic engineer make for breakfast?
Wanna read the worst joke ever?
Do you like dragons?
Why's Guantanamo Bay full of actors?
Why does America spell colour without the u?
How did the mermaid prostitute make all her money?
What do you call half a ginger?
Does almond milk come from crazy cows?
Why did Michael Jackson always lose in a race?
What's DJ Khaled's favorite number?
What is a bigot?
What is the best place for politicians?
What does Yao Ming stand for?
What's grey and comes in litres?
How do I know that Trump will be our next president?
Why are all these jokes about unhappy relationships?
Don't you hate it when people ask for upvotes?
Did you hear about the new Fairy BDSM book?
Why do women die from suicide five times less than men?
What do people with memory loss and posters on r/jokes have in common?
How did the sun die?
What do you call a virus named Enza that causes the flu?
What would you call a Pokemon Trainer if they were Jewish?
What do you say to your laces to make them go away?
Do you know what "La Quinta" means in Spanish?
What kind of operating system do horses use?
What does the ghost of Al Pacino say?
Where do cotton balls come from?
What did Adele say when the chicken crossed the road?
Why don't Jews like to give rim jobs?
How many possibilities does a man with no arms and legs have?
Did you hear about the guy who'd just broken up with his Asian girlfriend?
What does an amoeba call its friend?
What do you call homeless BDSM?
Who's the biggest player in the Hundred Acre Wood?
Why are gay guys so good at moving?
How does a mathematician deal with constipation?
What did the giant wave say to the man?
How did jew get beer?
Why was there a dyslexic stormtrooper?
How do you change the light bulb in the dark?
what did 0 say to the 8?
What color are mirrors?
What do you call a woman who loves small dicks?
What Slenderman doesnt have?
Did you hear about the guy who eating crackers in bed?
Why is leather armor the best for sneaking?
If r/jokes was a person, what organ would he be having problems with?
Do you know why there are so many great bakeries in Germany?
What is a spaceman’s favorite chocolate?
What was Bin Laden's favourite brand?
Have you heard the news about the courduroy pillows?
Isn't it great to live in 21st century ?
What does the train use to fuel it's gaming addiction?
Why were 80% of Chicago police dash cams broken?
What do you call a boomerang that doesn't come back?
What do you call John Cena in camouflage?
Why couldn't the Mod get into the club?
Why is it good that the Vietnamese man won first place?
What did Leonardo DaVinci call his house?
What is the difference between the Leaning Tower of Pisa and the Twin Towers?
What do Kim Kardashian and her dad have in common?
What do you call a man chasing a car?
Hey John, we expend every night together watching the moon and the stars. What we are?
What do they call eating pussy at a Convent?
What do you call a black woman that has had seven abortions?
Why was the gay triceratops so frustrated?
Those Islamic's coming to america?
How many out of date redditers does it take to change a light bulb?
Who's the coolest guy at the hospital?
Why do conspiracy theorists have such long beards?
What do nails like to do on the weekend?
Teacher: If a chicken give you meat, a pig give you bacon, what does a fat cow give you?
What do you call a man who can smell the future?
Why Does Captain Kirk Have 3 Ears?
How do you make pickle bread?
What did the little boy with no arms and no legs get for Christmas?
What do you get when you mix pie and onions?
What do you call a fight between a Mexican and Jared Fogle?
What should be done in case of apparent drowning?
Why can't blind kids have imaginary friends?
Math teacher: What is the value of x?
What's the difference between Bill Cosby and Lena Dunham?
BB8, are you hungry?
What do you call Alan Jackson eating Pho Soup?
What did the physics professor shout when he disproved Hooke's Law in early to mid March?
What is grey, very big and when it falls out of a tree the stove breaks?
If Amy Schumer was a football player, what team would she play for?
What's the difference between a woman and a nun in a bath?
What's the difference between the charismatics and the nacists?
Everyone keeps guessing who Rey's parents are, but who delivered her as a baby?
What does a mod do in their spare time?
What's the difference between a magicians wand and a police baton?
Why was the Bears-Packers tie called off?
Why was the Turkey v Germany match called off?
What do you call a jewish pokemon trainer?
What's the difference between a rabbi and a priest?
Did you hear the one about Jerry Sandusky molesting kids?
What's the difference between a joke and three dicks?
How do you look for Will Smith?
What are a Mexican's favorite dimensions for square dancing?
What's the safest font?
What did the Nazi Officer say when he saw the Americans approaching?
You know how some people make food exactly as it appears on the cookbook?
What's the Mexican version of the KKK?
What was Jesus's favorite band?
What do you call a student that graduates bottom of their class in Med school?
what do you call an American Tardis?
What's the difference between pussy and actuall pussy?
What does Mike Tyson use to represent his sewing skills?
How did they know Christa McAuliffe had dandruff?
Whats the difference between a dirts bus stop and a crab with big boobs?
What do you call a pizza who's a DJ?
A bird pooped on my head today...Am I gonna die?
What did the adrenaline addict say to the serial killer?
Why the long face?
What's the difference between squash and zucchini?
What is it called when your crush has a crush on you too?
Why do hipsters hate ice skating?
What do you call a legend of Zelda fan theory?
Why doesn't Kim Jong Un ever defecate?
What does Michael Jackson do when he gets kids to the top of the Empire State building?
Who is a man's best friend?
What did the fisherman and his girlfriend do last night?
What do you call a nun sleep walking?
What do you get in the Netherlands, when you fail your driving test three times?
What kind of a battery does Dj Khaled use?
What is the difference between a black Jew and a white Jew?
Where does a prostitute go to rat out her pimp?
Did you hear about the tarpaulin conspiracy??
What is Eminem's favourite food?
Where did Suzy go when the bombs fell?
So this guy with a premature ejaculation problem?
Who Shot First? Boba Fett or Jango Fett?
How did Tarzan get his cry?
What's a Buddhist's favorite physics law?
Why is there so much "twang" in Country music?
What's the difference between a Trump rally and a Klan rally?
What is the difference between a girl in a church, and a girl in a bathtub?
What do you call a Nazi turkey?
Why don't Mexicans cross the border in groups of three?
Are you addicted to masturbation?
Why did the Mexican fail English 101?
What are the pros and cons of wearing two watches?
Why couldn't Moses believe his mother sent him away in a basket?
What hairstyle does Christopher Nolan get at the barber?
How is a Christmas tree like a man who's had a vasectomy?
What do you call a group of scientists discussing different ways to recycle power?
What does Bill Gates call it when someone drops a $20 bill on the ground?
What has 2 legs and looses a lot of blood?
Why is only black people can call black people "nigga" but white people cannot ?
What do you call a horse who goes freerunning?
What's a four letter word for "a butt load of fun"?
What should you use to make a boat explode?
What do white people and fences have in common?
Do you have elections in Japan?
Why wouldn't the race car driver pick up the hitchhiker?
Who won the Asian cooking contest?
Which company saw the end of disco coming from a mile away?
How could batman possibly defeat superman?
What do you call a Jewish vagina?
Q: What do agnostic, insomniac dyslexics do at night?
Why/How do bakers work?
What happens when a T-rex gets strep?
What's the difference between a Harley and a hoover?
What do UP! and push-up have in common?
What do you call a Transformer that engages in illegal activities?
Do you remember how before social media nobody cared what, where and with whom you ate?
Why do so many people hate circumcision?
Did you guys hear about how Mattel took back all those Terminator action figures?
How did Whitney Houston take the drugs?
What's the difference between a black and a white fairy tale?
What do you call a female manager?
What's the difference between Trump and a Tree?
What do Marie Curies Notebooks and a defected KGB agent have in common?
What are the similarities between a donkey and a Sikh?
How do you make a horomone?
What does the flint water crises and Chicago PD have in common?
What can't teenage girls do?
What did they call Jesus Christ when he was crucified?
What's the Biggest Jobs Killer in the United States?
Why did the robot cross the road?
What do you call a Mexican who lost his car?
What's the best thing about finger blasting a gypsy on her period?
At the sushi restaurant: What kind of eel is this?
What is a pedophile's favourite pair of shoes?
Why is a creative writing workshop the first step when training to become a firefighter?
How do you fit 4 gay men on a barstool?
What do you call a really quiet dog?
What Australian city has the most cats?
How many Vegans does it take to eat a cheeseburger?
Why did the blonde stare at the Ford?
What do Baptists and cats have in common?
What is the Technical name For IronMan Overreacting?
What do you call a Marshmallow eaten by Aliens?
What did the racist ghost say?
Why couldn't I call back a Bernie Sanders volunteer?
What do you call a skinny tree that raps?
What's the difference between Australia and Yogurt?
What does the fat cow give you?
If humans have politics, then what do bees have?
Why do woman have faces?
You know how they say your smile is your strongest weapon?
What deity has the worst teeth?
When is a mass shooting not a mass shooting?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and a bag of shit?
How can Russia love pickles and vodka but hate gay people?
Why is it bad to mix Islam and Hinduism?
You want to see something intense?
What is the difference between a man and a woman?
I asked my heart why I can't sleep at night?
Why are portraits of George Washington displayed in British bathrooms?
What do you call a well-endowed Asian man?
Time to start a race war. Which race is superior?
Why is Darth Vader black?
What do you call a gaming double entendre?
How do you make an Amish woman happy?
Where do polar bears go to deposit money?
What did the mayonnaise say when the refrigerator was opened?
Why did Adele cross the road??
What are Marios overalls made of?
What's the difference between RPGs and Drunken Style Kung Fu?
What did I do when I had a bomb strapped to me chest?
What did Dorothy do to the mean Asian Munchkin?
Why did black beard kill his first mate?
Why did Hugh Glass go to the doctor?
What does a calculus teacher say when a student doesn't get it?
Why do the best swimmers come from Flint, Michigan?
What do you call a cross between a human and a monkey?
What do you call a guitar that has completely changed parts?
What is the difference between USA and USB?
Why do aliens only abduct white people?
Who was the hide-and-seek champion of 2005?
Why did the scarecrow earn an achievement award?
biggest joke ever?
Why did the Indian cross the road?
What is Bill Clintons favorite instrument to play?
What if Stonehenge was made to satirize the achievements of mankind?
Why do honeydew melons have to get married in a formal ceremony?
Did you hear about the movie based on an Australian dystopian future society?
What sentence did the man who took 2 minutes to turn around get?
Why did the number of parking tickets spike after Persephone was carried off to the underworld?
What will you get when you put Donald Trump and politics together?
What type of car would the Hamburglar drive?
How do jockeys stay on their horses?
What does a cat call its black best friend?
Why is Edward Snowden still in Russia?
What is the definition of diplomacy?
What do you call a superfluous elephant?
What fish tastes great with peanut butter?
Why did the iguana get a prescription for viagra?
Whats the fastest way into a woman's heart?
What is worse than finding 100 dead babies in a trash bin?
How is the world like a bag of jellybeans?
What is the frat guy's favorite ion?
Why do the Vietnamese never eat fruits?
How does Dr. Dre like to be told a story?
What did the Atlantic Ocean and Pacific Ocean say to each other?
Why do skeletons have so many kids?
what does a clock do when it's hungry?
What do you call the field of study for dad jokes?
Why was it so hot in the stadium after the game?
Why is Reddit called "Reddit"?
How does a Space Marine from Warhammer 40K get fit?
What does Stalin do on a night out?
How long do black women need to bring the garbage out?
Why does Karl Marx not take milk in his tea?
Whats Dj Khaleds Favourite Jetski Brand?
how do yu offend a tumblr person?
What's Princess Leia's first name?
What does a woman get every month that lasts 3-5 days?
Why do Jews have such big noses?
What do you get when you mix blood and piss?
What do you call a fat computer?
(x-post /r/meanjokes) What's worse than 10 dead babies in a dumpster?
What are the similarities between my work shirt and the children of Flint, MI?
Why could Edward not leave his driveway and get back to his home country?
What's the capital of Greece?
What's the same about a smart blonde and a UFO?
Does anybody know a rad trigonometry joke?
What do you call an Asian male with no penis?
Don't you just hate clickbait titles?
What do you call a manic bear?
What did Mr. Freeze do with his wife on their first date?
What happens when 2 meets 3 at Times Square?
Why can't astronauts stay in a long term relationship?
Why do black people have white hands and feet?
What does a memelord put on his sandwich?
What's the hardest part of running over a baby?
Did you hear about the cow that doesn't give any milk?
What does Captain Falcon drink in Hawaii?
Why do people in Afghanistan air dry after they shower?
What do you call an Australian singer who was born in Australia?
Why do historians believe all nazis were women?
What's the deal with the phrase "door ajar"?
What do you call a bear that's questioning their sexuality?
Why can't Russia extradite US top-secret whistle-blowers?
Have you heard about the internet couple that broke up?
What do you call a fat person with a flat butt?
A black man and a Pakistani fell from a cliff. Which landed first?
What do you call a fake spaghetti?
Who is Samuel L Jackson's favorite historical figure?
What are Hillary Clinton's favorite shoes?
How to avoid clickbait?
What's the difference between Sarah Palin's mouth and her vagina?
What did the shooting range instructor say to the guy in a wheelchair?
Why did the recruiter hire a Spider ?
How well did the sailor do in school?
What did the boy with no hands get for Christmas?
Bio joke time! What did one cell say to his sister cell that stepped on his foot?
Why does C-3PO always tell Han the Odds?
Why can't women explain feminism to men?
What does Brock Lesnar do if a website isn't loading?
Why is Jesus terrible at hockey?
How do you measure a snake?
What's a prison executioners favorite beer?
Why did I quit my job in Mexico?
Do you like tapes and CDs?
What do quantum physicists do when life gives them lemons?
What do you call a depressed cow?
Who is the greatest author of the medieval era?
What Do You Call 5 Year Old With No Friends?
Did you hear about the new Tarantino movie about a Nazi banquet?
Who loses in a basketball game between two Vietnamese guys?
you know who makes the best cocoa?
What's the relationship between the pound, the dollar, and the ruble?
What do you call a vegetable/fruit that dies for it's religion?
Why does a chicken coup only have two doors?
Did u hear about the new plane that's going to be 2000 ft long?
How do you get a hippie pregnant?
What was the Sci-fi remake of A Streetcar Named Desire?
What did Ben Franklin call his pee hole?
What happens to crude people?
Why couldn't the salad bowl play Scrabble?
Did you know condoms had serial numbers?
What goes, "Clip clop clip clop clip clop clip clop BANG BANG clip clop clip clop clip clop..." ?
How do you call a dog without legs?
How do you find a blind man in a nudist camp?
What do you call it when you talk to God?
What do you do when you see your tv hover around the place?
You know what I hate about Reddit?
Where did Sally go when the bomb went off?
Why did the plane crash?
Why did the engineer wrap his hamster in electrical tape?
Why didn't the Cancer Cowboy head out West?
Why does Snoop Dogg carry an umbrella?
What's another term for anal bleaching?
What would you call Martin Luther king Jr if he was white?
What's worse than raining cats and dogs?
What do you call a black person with a PHD?
What's 5,000 lbs and sexually confused?
Why didnt Craig buy Anne Franks shoes on Ebay for 2000$ ?
What do you get when you cross astronomy and cosmology with a dyslexic girl at starbucks?
What does the Mexican gang member say to the 15 page document?
What does it take to be a president of Russia?
What's a pirates favourite video game genre?
How do you call the piece of fat around the vagina?
Who do people hate and love but is really hot and goes to beach everyday?
When are you allowed to play with scissors?
Whats the difference between a kangaroo and a kangaroot?
What do you call a man with no arms or legs being pulled behind a boat?
If you're american in the living room, what are you in the bathroom?
You know those kinds of Reddit posts that just frustrate you to death?
If the police police police police, who polices the police police?
How is sleeping with a girl whose dad is in the other room the same as being kidnapped?
How do you tell who loves you more. Your wife or your dog?
How many babies does it take to paint a fence?
What is white and 14 inches long?
What has 2 legs but doesn't use them?
How do you spell "Pringles" in Spanish?
What was the name of the operation to catch Juaquin Guzman?
What's the difference between this post and a fire truck?
What's the difference between people on Reddit and dead people?
You wanna know why I don't buy Velcro?
Why do baby birds love Amy Schumer's comedy?
What is the opposite of a protein?
Why does the ocean have water?
Why couldn't Obi-Wan calculate the volume of Bespin from the ideal gas law?
What does Disney and the porn industry have in common?
Where is Wallace at?
What is the difference between chicken and blondes ?
What's the difference between a woman and a washing machine?
What's the worst part about being a railroad conductor?
Was the discovery of a new planet an accident?
When is a man smartest before, during or after sex?
How many South American's does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do space-related scientists call themselves in Australia?
Why did the bull get a sex change?
What do they call the Hulk when he has an erection?
What do you call a destroyed bomb shelter in Poland?
What do you call an Arab who's been everywhere and done everything?
What did Brad Pitt in Seven and Harvey Weinstein in real life both get?
Why won't you ever see an American slav squatting?
What did the slug say to the police?
What's the best thing to come out of a penis?
Is it just me?
Why doesn't Seattle have a professional volleyball team?
What do you call a terrorist-run snowball stand?
Are you a game developer?
What are there no black people in the Flinstones?
What do you call a bipolar Sith?
How much work does it take to send a packet across the internet?
Did you hear you can get cocaine as a suppository?
What's the food equivalent to Rachel Dolezal?
Why won't Bernie Sanders win the rational election?
What type of clothing does a House wear?
Y'know what really brings out the inner child in you?
Why didn't the XML goto the Gym?
Why did the midget who drove British cars get cabin fever?
Why did the flood barrier rupture?
Why did the chicken cross the Mobius strip?
Why won't you ever see an ant walk in a church?
Q: What happens once in a minute and twice in a moment but never in a decade?
Where do you see yourself in four years?
Why you shouldn't have sex with a deaf prostitute?
Why do gingers get sunburned so easily?
What's Red and crawls up your leg?
Ever needed a taxi but you had no money?
Why are Muslims so violent?
Why can't Pakistanis play soccer?
What do you call an isolated mystical forest creature?
What's the difference between a condom and the congress?
What do you call a sad coffee?
What did the human call the bee after it stung him?
What do you call tossing a Hawaiian's salad?
What do you call El Chapo suffering from seizures?
Why is the grass in Anfield Stadium so green?
Why did the banjo player get into heaven?
What did the atheist say when he saw Jesus?
What do you get when you cross a dog with an amplifier?
Why did the Udon noodles stop drinking?
What did 2 say to 3 about 6?
Why is your paper blank?
Have you seen Alan Rickman's newest movie?
What do you call a Chinese prostitute with no legs?
Why is sex like snow?
What's worse than a worm in your apple?
How many women does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is small, salty and melts in your mouth?
What do you get when you mix a black and asian person?
What do you call a Frenchman wearing sandles?
Ever get high off of watching Rambo?
What's the difference between radical feminists and a Valentine's Day mascot's tricks?
Whats the currency of North Korea?
What do you call a Renaissance snack?
How does the enthusiastic chef serve his burgers?
What do you call a Jamaican gynecologist?
What do multiculturalism and the movie Jaws have in common?
Why did the masseuse give her lawyer a happy ending?
What do you give to an owl who is not being himself?
Where can you always find kids by themselves?
Why do lesbians shop at Sport's Authority?
What's 8 inches long, and black as the night?
What's the difference between a jew and a boy scout?
What's the difference between RAM and ROM?
You wanna hear a funny joke?
How do you know your at a gay bbq?
What is the difference between jelly and jam?
Where do military chaplains buy their regalia?
Did you hear about the old Italian chef?
You guys know what Jesus' favorite band is?
What did Snape say at Alan Rickmans funeral?
Why did the cheese maker not enjoy the movie?
What is the difference between Martin Luther King Day and St. Patrick's Day?
What happened when hitler fell off his skateboard, and the wound got infected?
Why are girls always cold?
What do you call a British voyeur?
What a Chinese Restaurant Owner's Preferred License Plate?
Did you know that Ireland is the richest country in the world?
What's Forest Gump's Facebook Password?
What did Hillary Clinton say at the last debate?
Why was Cinderella bad at basketball?
What's the difference between a Lambo and 1,000 dead babies?
What type of jokes do Sikhs hate?
Did you hear about the explosion in the cheese factory?
How do you piss off a transgender?
Why do black men only have nightmares?
How to play Kayle more effectively?
Why do Black People only have Nightmares?
What did the black eyed peas say when they left the dentist?
What did adam say to eve?
What did the Asian guy say about all the recent celebrity deaths?
What does a mole think, when he digs trough lower Austria?
What is red and hurts when you bite it?
Have you heard of the movie *Constipation*?
Why are shopaholics in the UK generally very skinny?
What is a Nazi's favorite type of hotdog?
How much is a $1,000,000 Bill worth?
How did the dad know that his daughter is on her period?
Why aren't Tyler Perry movies for the light-hearted?
Tell me why this is funny?
What's the difference between acne and a priest?
What car transmission do Mexicans use?
Why couldn't the life guard save the drowning hippie?
Why are people at Star Wars conventions so happy?
What do a midget and a dwarf have in common?
Why was the pianist so depressed?
How does the man in the moon cut his hair?
Having a bad day?
What does robbing a Scotsman get you?
Why did the farmer take a bale of hay to bed?
Why did Lionel go to the medical store?
Dentist: when was the last time you flossed?
What was Aladdin called after he went Vegan?
What does a crow call his penis?
What do you call the western half of Kenya?
Rihanna, what did you mean the wind gave you this black eye?
Have you heard of the hypochondriac who had issues with his bowels?
How much does a moil get paid for circumcision?
What is the monkey that can't peel the banana?
What's the worst part about raping a deaf chick?
What did the rock say to the other rock?
What does a gay man and an ambulance have in common?
What's the difference between water and gasoline?
What do you call a German tampon?
Why is it called the "color TV"?
Why did the cowboy adopt a Weiner dog?
Why are there no suicide books on librarys?
Why do pirates love Playboy Magazine?
How do you fit 25 Jews in a car?
What happened to the blind circumciser?
Why did the Russians send a dog to space to die?
What is the favorite note of a priest?
What's the worst gear for America?
Why did the hippie lifeguard not save the drowning boy?
What's the connection between the Star Trek Enterprise and toilet paper?
How many "All Lives Matter" protesters does it take to change a light bulb?
How to spot a blind guy in a nudist colony?
What do you call a dead bird that was suicidal?
Did you hear about the terrorist with a house fetish?
What do conspiracy nuts do to fall asleep?
Why do Black People hate country music?
What do you call a narcissistic plant with an erection?
Why do Muslims not eat pork?
What have sex, money and depression in common?
what did little billy get when he stumbled upon r/twoxchromosome?
Have you ever thought about the word racecar and how it's a palindrome?
Why do most chicken coups have 2 doors?
What vegetable parties the hardest?
Girl, are you pi?
Where are you when you're in the U.K. waiting for Vietnamese soup?
Why was the computer tired when he got home?
What did the hurricane say to Hillary?
How can you spot the blind man at the nude beach?
Why couldn't the cop save the hippie from drowning?
What do you call a bear that will fuck anything?
What has a bottom at its top?
How many Chernobyl survivors does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call the Wal Mart cheer?
Why did the redditor go to /r/zelda?
Whats a mile long and has a thousand arms?
How many sovereign citizens does it take to change a lightbulb?
What us the difference between garbage and Jersey Girls?
Where do you find an enlightened mosquito?
What do airlines and prostitutes have in common?
What did the flower say about the tree heading to the sky?
Whats the difference between a noose and a leash?
Why doesn't Barbie have kids?
What gets easier to pick up, the more it weighs?
[REPOST] How many narcissists does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
How do you feel when there is no coffee?
Why did two owls get arrested for the same crime?
What does a baker say before he orgasms?
What do you call transgender superheroes?
Where can you find the strongest tea?
Which African country has the most obese inhabitants?
What do penguins do in a race?
Why are calculators grey and boring?
How does the Addidas executive work through the night?
Teacher: How Old is your father?
Anyone watch story on the news about the corduroy pillows?
Teacher to Student: Why are you late?
Why should you never watch a movie with a generous Nascar driver?
Why is there all this hate against necromancers?
What's the difference between America and Yoghurt?
What did Haley Joel Osment find at the top of Mt. Everest?
Why is Karl Marx a fan of the Galactic Empire?
[Destiny] Where do Year 1 Guardians buy their clothes?
What do you call a black guy flying a plane?
What did the man say to the Formula 1 driver who nearly rear-ended him?
What does a Super Saiyan always put on his sandwich?
What's In Hitlers Nose?
What did the cheese say to itself in the in the mirror?
What's a terrorist's favourite car?
What is the difference between an Irish wedding and an Irish funeral?
What does a condom have in common with a coffin?
Have you ever had a female horse escape from the stables into the forest in the late evening?
what is the disease that killed princes diana?
What is easy to register for, but something you never want?
Did you hear about the new divorcee Barbie?
How did experts know Princess Diana had dandruff?
Have you heard about the guy who posted about a mod's cousin?
What's Alex's (from 'A Clockwork Orange') preferred type of light?
How do you call a male prostitute?
Why does England always get attacked in the summer?
How can you tell a redneck has got money?
Teacher: What comes after 69?
Why do melons have fancy weddings?
What do cheese and cancer have in common?
What did Matthew McConaughey say to DiCaprio about his chances of winning the Oscars this year?
Do you know how to catch a polar bear????
What do you call a drummer who has lost one of his drumsticks?
What cell carrier do Mormons use?
Did you hear about the pair of university professors who got sued for sexual harassment?
What do you call a faggot with an axe?
How would you call Hitler if he was a musician ?
Where's your assistant?
Why do some people dislike twitch chat?
What does a Tusken Raider eat after his dinner?
What is the difference between an american and a canadian?
How much sex does Sister Mary get?
Why do you have to pee so quickly after you start drinking beer?
What do you call a black Gohan from Dragon Ball Z?
How does Moses make coffee?
[NO SPOILERS] Did you hear about the stormtrooper who fell asleep at The Force Awakens?
Who's the most racist super hero?
What is the last thing to go through the mind of a suicide bomber?
Why did the watermelon and the honeydew decide to cancel their spontaneous wedding in Las Vegas?
How do you know an angle is dead?
Whats the difference between being hungry and horny?
What would Ronald Reagan be doing if he were alive today?
How does King Arthur take his pills?
Why did Jerry Hall marry Rupert Murdoch?
Why did they hire the police department to design a new superconductor?
What do you call a manager that hasn't grown up yet?
When Does This White Privilege Thing Kick In?
Did you hear about the guy who fell asleep during The Force Awakens?
How many blondes does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a Black man that walks by a Cop?
What does a vulture bring with him on the airplane?
Q: What three words will emasculate any man?
What's Irish and sits on a porch?
Have you guys seen the Petrified Forrest?
Did you here about the kidnapping at school?
What does a nosy pepper do?
What's the difference between God and Trump?
What comes after 69?
What do they call Muhammad Ali on bean night?
what are your hobbies?
What do you call a cow stuck in a hurricane?
What do you call a bunch of crazy Rabbis?
What did the patriarchy serve at their dinner party?
Is molestation rape foreplay?
Why are asymptomatic cardiology patients so trustworthy?
What are Starbucks two shipping options?
What does a balding man and a tortoise have in common?
Did you hear about the latest Calvin Klein Lawsuit?
What's the difference between mathematicians and Syrian refugees?
What do you call a Mexican on a bike?
How do you piss off a Texan?
Why couldn't the coal worker get into the movie?
What do you call a virgin on a water bed?
Did you hear about the uncircumcised volcano?
How do you circumcise Luke Skywalker?
You know what Donald Trump is actually really good at that most people don't realize?
Why did the airplane crash into the building?
What's the fastest way to kill millions?
What do you call a police officer that stays in bed all day underneath the blankets?
If Adele were a computer, what would she be?
What did the Nazi say to the clock that went tick-tick-tick?
Why did Adele leave the house?
How do street urchins communicate with each other?
How many lovers do the religious have?
What's the difference between a large pepperoni pizza and an Art History degree?
What do you call an escape artist dog?
Which gun has a perfect rating?
A Polish man and a Palestinian woman married and had a son. What was his name?
Why did the double arm amputee unsubscribe from r/jokes?
What do you call the offspring of Rick Ross and an Ostrich?
Did you see that new porno with the invisible man?
What type of music do they play at Chinese Restaurants ?
Why was Adele underneath a cow?
How did the hipster burn his mouth?
Why did Obi Wan not kill Anakin when he had the chance?
Why did chicken cross the road?
What did Hitler invest his money in hand sanitizer?
What's the most embarrassed tree in the forest?
What did the horse say when he regained his vision?
What is Jesus's least favorite gun?
What does a rapist wear to feel sexy?
What happens when you cross and owl with a bungee chord?
Which nut could pimp the Prince of Darkness?
You call comcast and end up speaking to apu in India, how do your problems get fixed?
I have 10 guns. Obama wants 8 of them. How many guns do I have left?
I ever tell you about the time I dated a midget?
What does a black guy get after sex?
Why can't Donald Trump get elected?
Why do women wear make up and perfume?
What do men and pizza have in common?
What happens when The Past, Present, and Future walk in to a bar?
Why doesn't anyone ever add Paul Walker on Xbox?
why do terrorists dislike coffee?
Why is Empire Strikes Back the best Star Wars movie?
Did you hear about the pecan orgy?
What do you call it when crows make noise?
What starts with E, ends with E, and has only 1 letter in it?
What does my penis have in common with JP Morgan Chase and Bank of America?
What's the best part about dating an epileptic?
What do porn viewers and Donald Trump have in common?
How do you get a Baby in a bowl? How do you get it out?
Do you like apples?
Damn girl are you a planet?
Who wants ice cream?
What is the volume of Monica Lewinsky's mouth?
Why can't an IT guy be a doctor?
What is the worst place to hide in a hospital?
What did the dwarf pimp say to the two prostitutes at the beginning of the night?
What kind of trophy do I get every time I lift weights?
World's Funniest Joke?
What's a vampire's fetish?
What do you call a flying Jedi?
What do you call a short, round-bellied Salarian?
What is a Juanito?
What does a man with a 10-inch penis eat for breakfast?
Why did the farmer cross the road?
Why will there never be an Asian president?
How much does a rabbi charge for a circumcision?
What's a neckbeard's favorite asian country?
What is the wettest animal in the forest?
What show depicts a new pair of Jordons getting ruined?
What's a bear's preferred weapon of choice?
What was Bruce Lee's favorite beverage?
What do you call a blind trig function?
Me: Siri, why am I alone?
Why was the priest afraid of trigonometry?
What was Hitler's favourite aquatic animal?
Why could'nt one cat impregnate the other cat??
How do you stop a metal from rusting?
What is the United States doing to fight pedophiles?
Why was the nose running?
What did the doctor say when he saw two fetuses being too affectionate in public?
What type of file would you use to make a small hole bigger?
What do you call a crappy skin cream?
Why is PMS called PMS?
What do you call a half-white and half-Hispanic baby?
Why didn't Ronda go to Prom?
What fetish does winners hate the most?
How many plates do you need to draw a picture?
Did you hear about Bill Cosby's new biography?
What is the ONLY good trait of pedophiles?
What's the difference between driving in the fog and eating pussy?
Why are Mens bathrooms usually to the left?
What do you call oral sex with a fresh corpse?
What do mormons and tweakers have in common?
How do you get a Mexican across the border using only math?
What's the difference between David Bowie and porn?
What is an Arabs favorite fighting technique?
What does Tupperware® and a walrus have in common?
Why do thugs play basketball?
How do you make an orphans hands bleed?
why do italian women wear long black gloves?
What's the difference between a gun and a penis?
what's the difference between an elephant and a sicilian grandmother?
What do you call someone with no arms?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a police car?
What's the difference between politics and engineering?
What does a turtle and a pedophile have in common?
What's Bill Clinton's drug of choice?
What do you call a man doing dishes?
What do you call an extroverted snail?
What do you call a dissection performed by drunks?
What's the best thing about having sex with 29 year olds?
Why did Lt. Lenk and Sgt. Colborn cross the road?
Why did the villagers hate Frankenstein?
How's the new Chinese restaurant downtown?
Why are monkeys pedantic?
What does a frog do when it barbecues?
[no spoiler] Why is the BB unit droid not hungry?
Why are dockhands never featured in Miley Cyrus music videos?
Why are there no men's studies classes?
How do you know if someone is a vegan?
Why did the drunk guy call the sheep Legolas?
Why David shorted his surname to Hoff?
Why does windows 9 not exist?
Why is the British weather like Islam?
What's round and hard and full of acidic semen?
What do you call two healthcare professionals hanging out?
Do you know how our planet got it's name?
Why do they say "Amen", not "Awomen"?
Wanna hear a joke about a German sausage?
DAE keeps struggling with fitting their shopping cart into a row of parked shopping carts?
what's the hottest pun on the street?
How did Christopher Columbus 'discover' America?
How do you walk a chicken on a leash?
What's the difference between a girl that's praying and a girl that's having a bubble bath?
What is a hipster's favorite element?
Why doesn't God like grapefruit?
When is the closest Leo will get to an Oscar?
Why does Gordon Ramsay always use a condom?
Why are blacks excited for 2016?
How did Obama celebrate his reelection?
Why do midgets laugh when they play soccer?
Why were the Star Wars made IV, V, VI, I, II, III?
Wanna Play Barbies?
Did you hear about the guy who said there were no rivers in Africa?
Can you guess what the hardest part about being a pedophile is?
Know the best part about dead baby jokes?
Wanna hear something fucked up?
What's a somali's favorite sport?
Why is sonic the answer to every google search?
Why was the paranormal convention cancelled?
Did you hear about the sequel to "The Thing"?
If bird-watching is called bird-watching, what do you cal cow-watching?
Why is six such a nervous number?
What's black and sits on top of a staircase?
Why did the circle stop arguing with the two intersecting lines?
What's pink and hard when it goes in, and soft and wet when it comes out?
What is James Bonds code name when he is abroad?
What does a 16 year old girl say in West Virginia?
What do you call a turtle without its shell?
What do you say to a crazy person who's talking to themselves?
What's tall, handsome and muscular?
Did your mom get those plane tickets?
Who is Ric Flair's favorite director?
What's 9 inches long, rock hard, full of semen, and the ladies scream at?
What was Hitler's least favorite sauce?
Wanna hear something ironic?
Weekend special: What has 142 teeths and can hold back the incredible hulk?
whats black and burns?
What has six balls and rapes the poor?
What's the difference between Gabe Newell and a toddler?
Q: What's long and hard and has cum in it?
What happened to the plant outside the math class window?
How do you call the mexican who lost it car?
What did the Hispanic fireman name his two twin sons?
Did you hear about the paranoid print operator?
Why does my computer say Hello?
Did you see that Sargento is going to stop selling shredded cheese?
Were you home Schooled?
I have this song in my head I haven't heard in years. I'm pretty sure it's called "Don't Speak"?
What did the kid ask the Pirate?
Did you hear about the ambidextrous golfer?
Did you know there were vegetarians in Medieval Europe?
Did you hear about the guy who got his entire left side ripped off by a shark?
What's the difference between Jesus and a whore?
What do you call a girl with an hourglass figure?
Why does the philosopher have an automatic car..?
Which area of Zelda: Ocarina of time uses the most resources?
Whats eazy e's favourite drink ?
What' the bare minimum?
Do you know about Bassist heaven?
Why did the banker bee go to prison?
A Dietitian X Nun's favourite song?
What is the difference between American teen girls and Muslim teen girls?
Why didn't Hitler cross the road?
What does Bill Cosby eat for breakfast?
What is a masochist's favorite condiment?
What did the homeless yogi say when told to leave the yoga studio?
What do you call an sexual intercourse between Nigel Thornberry and The Incredible Hulk?
Where do you drown hipsters?
How many more times will I watch "A Walk To Remember" tonight?
What do you get from a dollar-an-hour hooker?
Why wasn't Christ born in Ireland?
Why don't women like to wear dresses in the winter?
Have you see the movie constipation?
Why did the jalapeno put on a sweater?
Why did the pharaoh retire?
Why are X and Y fascist letters?
What do you do with unruly shapes?
Did you hear that scientists recently discovered a new state of matter?
How did Jack get rich?
Why is the archaeologist depressed?
Knock knock. Who's there? She. She who?
What do you call an exercise group run by Jesus Christ?
What Do You Call An Asian Billionare?
How did the trigonometry teacher, prone to waffling, commit suicide?
What does a southern woman call her period?
Did you guys hear scientist just discovered a new state of matter?
If there's something strange, in your neighborhood, Who ya gonna call?
What did the ghost say when he looked in the beehive?
Why is the mathematician mad?
Why are Lawyers buried forty feet deep when they die?
Who is James Bond's favorite bartender?
How do you tittilate an ocelot?
Why doesn't 'Murica have any knock-knock jokes?
What do you call it when a dinosaur crashes his car?
What made me become a baker?
Ever seen an idiot magnet?
What room is missing from almost every house?
Where is the most conflict in a loaf of bread?
What do you call a magical Owl?
Why is the archaeologist sad?
Why do writers hate the bible?
What happens when a calculus teacher with one arm can't figure out a proof?
What do you call a gingerbread man with one leg?
What's the difference between an old Greyhound bus terminal and a lobster with 38 D breasts?
What's today's date?
What's the difference between having a boner and being cyberbullied?
Whats the difference between a hospital and a terrorist stronghold?
what is a woman to cant give birth?
What is a gay boxer's favorite drink?
Can a ninja throw any pointy object with lethal accuracy ?
What did the pirate say when he turned 80 years old?
Why did the horse get a divorce?
Why is diarrhea hereditary?
What size lumber is used to build homes in Dubai?
What's the opposite of drunken noodles?
What is like tomato but better?
Whats white blue and rectangular?
What will be on the Denny's Menu when ISIS takes over?
What song did Scar sing when he fixed his car horn?
Whats the number one reason for Pedophilia?
Did you guys hear about gay 9/11?
When did 888 equal zero????
What is Forrest Gump's favorite pasta?
What do you call a mexican barber?
Is bb-8 hungry?
Q: What's faster than a black man stealing a T.V?
Why do women like to be on top during sex?
Why did the worker get fired from the hp computer factory?
What do you call a top-ranking Mexican dude that oversees everything?
Why does Luke Skywalker never have trouble getting laid?
What do Polar Bears and Black Men have in common?
How does a 49er fan change a light bulb?
What is Poseidon's favourite shortcut?
How long does it take for a black woman to take the trash out?
What's the hardest part about rollerblading?
What do you call a half-length lightsabre?
How does a blonde turn a light on after sex?
What happened when Grandpa went to the strip club?
Did you hear about the fellow whose whole left side was cut off?
What kid blows you and gets you all wet?
Why am I fat?
How many dead hookers does it take to change out the light in my basement?
How many Surrealists does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between Jesus Christ and a picture of Jesus Christ?
Q: What's the difference between ginger pussy and a bowling ball?
if 9-5 is a full time job, and 11/4 is a part time job, what's 9-11?
Why is th earth so mean?
What do you call a snake who works in the government?
What kind of car does Bill Cosby drive?
Where do Mormon deer call home?
How can you tell if someone is from Texas?
What's the difference between a pickpocket and a peeping Tom?
How to emberass an acrchaeologist?
What is the name of the restaurant chain that serves sushi burritos?
Did you hear about the misanthropic statistician?
How do you stay warm outside in the winter?
Why did the computer say Hello?
Did you hear about the deadly fire at the ice cream parlour?
How did Mars feel when the colonists were approaching?
What to hear something funny?
What did one necrophiliac say to the other as they walked by the morgue?
Why do Chinese only care about themselves?
What instrument does the Irish chemist play?
What do you call slapping hands with (5^.5+1)/2?
Have you ever been camping with a guy who has uncontrollable diarrhea?
What do you call an underwater ride sharing service?
How do Mexican dogs say "hello" when in Japan?
Why didn't the clam share his ipod?
Why do you always see beggars at protests?
What do you call a Mexican after he gets electrocuted?
What did the grizzly bear study at college?
How do you know Satan's barbeque ribs are good?
Did you hear about the Indian guy who opened up a grocery store?
How many Germans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do Bill Cosby and the Little Dutch Boy have in common?
What's the opposite of shell shock?
Can february march?
What did the little boy with cancer get for Christmas?
Who is the most successful liar in the world?
What is Carrie Fisher's favorite snack?
What is 12 inches long, rock hard and full of semen?
What's 6 inches long and 2 inches wide and drives women wild?
How do you circumcise a hillbilly ?
What's Caitlyn Jenner's favorite comic book?
Did you ever hear about that movie constipation?
What do Pizza Delivery guys and Gynecologists have in common?
When do we need airplane noises?
What's 6 inches long and 2 inches wide and drives women wild ?
Why are the police so corrupt?
There is white wine and red wine. Have you heard of the new black wine coming out of California?
What's the difference between your job and a dead prostitute?
What do you call a team of Christian mutant superheroes?
What did Gandalf say when he tried to shut down Auschwitz?
What do you call the armed group in Oregon?
Why did the Ogre cry when he left the doctor's office?
Where does the President keep his armies?
Why do molluscs only think of themselves?
what do you get if you mix a dachsund with a cocker spaniel/ poodle mix?
What's the meaning of life?
Does money shrink when you wash it?
What does Ebenezer Scrooge serve at his Christmas Party?
What does a Jewish cat say at weddings?
Q: Why was Heisenberg such a bad lover?
Why did Jon Snow wait in line at the Apple store ?
How did Jim Henson die?
How do you know you have a high sperm count?
What is a Jawa's favorite drink?
What is a cowboy's favorite salad dressing?
Who handles font related crimes?
What is the best spanish joke you've ever heard?
Why are there so many Indians working with telemarketing?
How many animals can you fit into a pair of pantyhose?
Why did god give women legs?
What's a dinosaur's least favorite reindeer?
What does a scientist who has an epiphany while peeing say?
How is a Bill Cosby better than Ronda Rousey?
How do attractive men pay for things?
What do you call a cab driver who lost his brakes?
Why can't New Zealanders tell you how many sexual partners they've had?
What did the ninja say to the waiter when asked what to drink?
You know what's way better than an iPod?
What's the difference between a chef and a gay guy?
What is the worst part about having sex with an old woman?
what phone service has the fastest internet?
What did the Nihilist whisper into his lover's ear?
What does Harry Potter say after he purchases slaves?
What do you call the procedure for female to male sex change?
Why do dwarf's laugh while playing football?
Do you think Dr. Seuss' wife liked to be called Ma?
What's the difference between a degree in Theoretical Physics and a theoretical degree in Physics?
How do you become invisible?
Why should you never mention the number 288?
What was Rudolph's nickname?
What Is Brown and Rhymes With Snoop?
What do you get when you combine Bromine with Barium?
What did Buddha say to the Pizza guy?
How do you know its noon on an Apple Watch?
What do you call a basketball player who likes Indian food?
Have you ever eaten ethiopian food?
Which country has the loosest regulations on incest?
How does Father Christmas request a four-way at a brothel?
What kind of shoes does Solid Snake wear?
What's the difference between a coat and jacket?
Why are people afraid to talk to black people?
Why don't cats like online shopping?
How many Mexicans does it take to change a light bulb?
What did water say when ice farted?
How does the moon cut his hair?
Why was the Muslim rubbing the goat?
What do you call a snobbish criminal going down stairs?
Is BB hungry?
What was the first mention of soccer in the bible?
Who made Lewis and Clark's footwear?
What's 50 Cent's name in Zimbabwe?
What do you call a metalhead with a cold?
What is green, fuzzy and very deadly if it falls on you out of a tree?
What does Ronald Reagan have that Jimmy Carter doesn't?
What did one gay sperm say to the other?
What do the mob and eating pussy have in common?
What does a Mexican say to piss you off?
How much does it cost to kill a Jew?
How did the New Orlean Pelicans get their name?
What part of the vegetable can you not put in a mixer?
Did you hear about the newlyweds who mixed up the lube and window putty?
Do cats stutter?
What is the theme song for the KKK?
You know what's better than having roses on your piano?
How many kids with ADD does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a doctor that graduated at the bottom of their class?
Why can't your hand be 12 inches long?
Why do female skydivers use tampons?
Why do they call it the Star Wars Universe?
Why don't they let blind people sky dive?
What are Mexican hackers called?
What's Isis' favorite race?
What pen company did Lance Armstrong buy?
What is the type of conference that brings together knights and mathematicians?
Why did the rapper die after being shot?
What does Michigan State football and Marijuana have in common?
What is the motto of the French navy?
What animal did they have in concentration camps?
Who was the greatest motherfucker in history?
What has three eyes, three hands, and three legs?
What's the word that starts with 'n', ends with 'r', and you wouldn't ever want to call a black guy?
What do you call an Orangutan, a tortoise and a hamster in cars?
What did the Jewish father say when his daughter asked for fifty bucks?
What do you call pasta in a poor neighborhood?
Are Ginger Ale made from real gingers?
Are you a magician??
Why are elephants grey?
What is the difference between a rooster and a Hooker?
Did you hear about the guy whose whole left side was cut off?
What's the best thing about being black?
What do gamers make for New Years?
What did Bill Cosby say when he was arrested?
How do magicians hide their boners?
What is the difference between Windows and the US Goverment?
How many dogs does it take to change a tampon?
How do you sell a deaf guy a frog?
What's the difference between a green elephant and a purple one?
What commercials are the longest?
How do you know a wood pieces history?
What is the most honest vegetable?
What was Hitler's favourite computer game?
Where do you see yourself in 2020?
What if a side effect to laxatives was death?
What kind of wood doesn't float?
Affirmation or irony?
Why do white people hate being called crackers?
What is the only difference between this year and last year?
What do girlfriends and sperm have in common?
What does Arnold Schwarzenegger call a colonoscopy?
What do you call a cold hotdog?
What do you do with a Jew with ADHD?
What happens to a plate made out of cookies when you drop it?
Can you milk these?
Q: How many lawyers does it take to plaster a wall?
What do teachers drink at school?
Why do Jewish men get circumsized?
What do you call a three-humped camel?
What's the real reason Mr. Clean is always smiling?
Why do scuba divers falls backwards off of the boat?
You know what really makes my day?
Why do girls wear makeup and perfume?
What did undead Superman say to his date?
What do you call the day before a trip to an otolaryngologist?
Why do Chinese knights have a low rate of survival?
What do you call a rooster drawing sh*t?
Did you know John Lennon was really into bukkake?
What human organ would survive the longest in the hunger games?
Why did Helen Keller only masturbate with her right hand?
Ever hear of the Infinite Monkey Theorem?
Why did Sally the stripper stop dating the guitar player?
Who is the only man to record more knock outs than Mike Tyson?
Why didn't Ronald McDonald like to go fishing?
How do mathematicians solve constipation?
How many people does it take to circumcise a whale?
What kind of music did Jesus hate?
What's the difference between two dicks and a joke?
How can you tell that the movie Martian is not realistic?
Have you heard about the blind hooker?
So, the new year isn't a screen?
Whats all of this fuss about reposts?
Where does a rapists train stop?
War. What is it good for?
Which is better: blind or deaf?
What's the difference between the Amish and a Ferrari?
Do you know which country they only write songs about poverty in?
An American and a Muslim are at a bar. Who got there first?
Why shouldn't you trust a midget?
Why are there no jehovah's witnesses in Italy?
Why did the horse feel famous on Reddit?
Did you hear about the solider that survived a mustard gas attack and a pepper spray attack?
What's the difference between a drunk and a stoner?
What do you get when you cross the Cosby Show with Law & Order: SVU?
What do people do when a chemist dies?
What do you call a protein that has anger management issues?
How does a neckbeard address a black person?
What's a golf club's favorite type of music?
How many push-ups can Chuck Norris do?
Have you heard of the hysterical TIE fighter squadron?
What playground equipment do kids hate the most?
(Dark humor) what's the difference between a sandwich and a dead baby?
What's the difference between a famous book by Dickens and a woman who buys fake boobs?
Why are government employees constipated?
Whats the difference between Bob Marley and Heracles?
What type of overalls did Mario wear?
Why is it best to ship boxes using a UPS truck?
How did the pothead propose to his girlfriend?
What do you call a dictionary on drugs?
What do you call a homosexual weight lifter?
What's the difference between a pig and a ham sandwich?
What's a Jedi's favourite programming language?
How many portuguese people can fit on a scooter?
What's brown and rhymes with 'snoop'?
What did the banana say to the orange?
What do girls always wear to math class?
What did Chewy say after episode VII?
What's the difference between a TV and a newspaper?
What do you call a person who sexually identifies as a Xenomorph?
What do you call a midget psychic wanted for murder?
What do you get when you cross a Mexican and an Asian?
Where did Suzy go during the bombing?
How come you never get into a fart contest with a girls?
What do you call a weed smoker with abs?
Whats the difference between John Wayne and Jack Daniels?
Did you hear the one about the dyslexic insomniac agnostic?
Why is PTSD like riding a bike?
Did you hear the one about those kids in China?
What do you get when you cross a railroad with a refrigerator?
Why are there no Jews on Jupiter?
What do you call Abe Lincoln having sex?
What do Chinese people call Chinese food?
Which of the Three R's does this subreddit like to do the most?
Why are black people afraid of high fives?
Why do green beans meditate?
What does Darth Vader identify as on Tumblr?
Why did Elliot Rodger kill more men than women?
Why were the students confused by the gay kid's performance in school?
Why don't NFL players wear glasses?
Why don't professional athletes ride bikes to warm-up before games?
What do you call a lousy psychic?
What do you get when you cross peanuts and almonds?
What do you call it when you punch someone with an avocado?
Where is the best place to hide a dead body?
Fun fact: Did you know that HIV is Roman for 'high five'?
How do rednecks circumcise a baby?
Who Has a Chance for the Title: The World's First Gay Ass Motherfucker?
Is this math joke going to be bad?
Why were the two Chinese scientists having trouble cloning a caucasian?
Why do astronomers eat steak before skywatching?
What do you call a boring banana?
If the universe were not absurd, would it make sense?
Whats the difference between 8 dicks and a joke??
What did the spanish fireman name his 2 sons?
How did the Girl Scout Samoa cookies get their name?
What do you call a picture of an electric piano?
What's worse than the Holocaust?
How would Saitama defeat all S class heroes?
What's the difference between a hedgehog and a Jeep?
Why are there no knock knock jokes about America?
How do subscribers of r/jokes like their ribs?
Why was the chess player pregnant?
(NSWF) Why did Micheal Jackson go to JC Penny?
Did you hear about the woman who got caught with pot in her fake breasts?
Did you get those pants on sale?
What's the difference between between a piano, tuna, and glue?
How do you drive a Unitarian out of town?
What's the difference between a dirty bus-stop and a Lobster with boobs?
How do Jewish mothers prevent wrinkles?
Why did the sperm cross the street?
Who is the best Podracer in Star Wars?
What's the difference between a hotel and a lodge?
What is a ghost's favorite type of porn?
What do you give an actor playing the role of an angry street gang member?
Why did my family serve Eggs Benedict on a hubcap for Christmas breakfast?
Why should you always invite mushrooms to your parties?
What do pirates call fat whores?
What did Michael Jackson ask his father's mother when she slipped and fell to the ground?
What's the difference between spinach and sodomy?
Why do you never wanna see an elevator in a horror game?
What is Kim Jong Un's favourite video game?
Why did Waldo go to therapy?
What do you call it when a pimp catches a roomful of hookers snorting coke?
What did the martini say when someone put a toothpick in it?
Did you here they opened a pasta joint in hell?
What did the yoga teacher say to her land lord when he tried to evict her?
Where was Soloman's temple located?
How do you know if you're in a French Village?
What do you get when you cross and owl with a bungee chord?
What do you call a gay Chocobo?
What do you call a foot doctor, curled up in a ball on the floor?
Hey, you know why goldfish are the only snack that smiles back?
Have you heard about that new dating app for serial killers?
What do you call a dinosaur with an extensive vocabulary?
How do you kill a clown?
Why didn't the principal of the school for the blind allow his students to go duck-hunting?
What do you call an overweight psychic?
Why ya going to the airport?
What do Volkswagen and a boy going through puberty have in common?
Why were the bakers hands brown?
What did one lesbian vampire say to the other?
How do you circumcise a Trump supporter?
What has 5 arms and rocks?
How do you get a fat lady in a car?
What do you get if you play a country music song backwards?
Have you heard the one about the 10 apples and 8 of them were good?
Why did Elton John have to go to hospital after the Queen concert?
Did you hear about the new restaurant on the Moon?
Why was the topologist confident about performing a vasectomy?
What's worse than finding half a worm in an apple?
why do indians hate snow?
What do you call a Frenchman wearing sandals?
What do you call a Roman with a wet mustache and a smile?
Why can't the bicycle stand on its own ?
What does Miller Light and having sex in a canoe have in common?
What's DJ Khaleds favourite number?
What does Green Day say before bed?
Did you know that each condom has a serial number printed on it?
Is there any Indian left?
What do you call an Chinese family with a pet dog?
What's the one thing pacifism and Hinduism have in common?
Why is Santa so jolly?
What is an extremist's favourite thing to have sex with?
What do you call a person who supports abortion yet believes it's murder?
Are you a mixologist?
What do you call a dentist gunfighter?
Why are oceans called "The High Seas"?
What do you call a person who kills babies and gets paid for it?
How do you stop a dog from barking in July?
How did the farmer find the sheep in the tall grass?
Why was the juice company losing customers?
The Revenant: How do you call a scalped Leonardo DiCaprio?
Did you hear about the restaurant on the moon?
How does Harry Potter go down a hill?
What do you call an anti-social black man?
Why Do Jews Make Good Philosophers?
What's worse than lime?
What happened to the gay dude whose lover kicked him out his house?
Why did Erdogan stop a man from jumping off a bridge?
Why can't the homeless ever get by in America?
Why is Santa so Jolly?
Why did Arnold Schwarzenegger inspire George W Bush to become president?
What's the only thing that grows in Oakland?
Why do you wrap gophers in electrical tape?
You hear the one about the 13 inch ruler?
Where do you see yourself in 5 years?
How do you tell the time in the US?
Do you love sex?
What did the french baker ghost said?
What do a priest and a Christmas tree have in common?
Did you hear Chewbaca won the NFL MVP his first year in the league?
Why can't you trust stairs?
You remember those yardsticks?
When can you store food in a door?
What's long and hard and full of "SEE-MEN"?
What did the Zune say to the iPod?
What do you get when you throw a Canadian down a flight of stairs?
What's the difference between an elected official and a piece of garbage?
What is an amputees favorite movie?
What did the three-legged horse do when it started to rain?
What jedi is the best at opening PDF files?
Why can Unicorns only be ridden by a adult female virgin?
What happened in China on Christmas?
Why don't we elect fat presidents any more?
What's the worst news for a NASCAR driver before a race?
Why are dyslexia kids scared of Christmas?
Why is the iPhone 6 the coolest smart phone around?
How do snowmen get around?
How many Americans does it take to change a light bulb?
How is the 85 year old Contractor that survived lung cancer doing?
Why did the T-Rex fail his business project?
Why did the Tumblr killed the Reddit fan?
What do you call it when you lobotomize a bunch of terrorists?
Why can't Emma Watson ever play Hermione Granger again?
What do you get if you cross a shark with a snowman?
Why was the vegetable store robber embarrassed?
What do you call a child afraid of Santa?
What do you call a pansexual guy named Nick who works at a cd store?
Why Do Farts Smell?
Why did the monkey fall of the tree?
What do they sing at a snowman's birthday party?
What did Trump say to Obama?
What did Hitler dream of during the holidays?
What do you call an elf that sings?
What do the lady reindeer do on Christmas eve?
Why do Yoda's jokes always suck?
What do you call someone who would do *anything* for a chocolate snack cake?
What do they call shrimp killing a bunch of other shrimp?
Q: Why does vegan cheese taste bad?
What did the A/C unit say when it suddenly turned on?
What happened why the grape was squished?
How can you smuggle 500 Jews across the border in one car?
How can you tell when a fax has been sent by a blonde?
What do you call a night watchman with deep-set self-esteem issues?
What game do M Night Shymalan's family play at Christmas?
How did the blind man know Santa was in his house?
What do you call a person who likes white rice, and not brown rice?
What did the blind man say when he walked into the fish market?
What did the Roman say when the Greek accused him of stealing his gods?
What do you call 4 condoms?
What do you call Sting 5 minutes ago?
Where does Santa go on vacation?
What's the difference between a snowman and a snow-woman?
Why doesn't Santa Clause have any kids?
Why does Santa Claus like to go down the chimney?
I wonder if poor kids in Africa dream of a white christmas?
First sign of your mother not loving you?
I met an elderly at the park and asked him what was going on?
What do US Jews call Santa?
What do the female reindeer do when they want some fun?
What is Santa’s motto?
Did you hear about the guy who drowned in a glass of Ribena?
What do you call a fast zombie?
How did Peter Parker know Mary Jane was cheating on him?
Why was Santa upset when he got a sweater for Christmas?
How tall is Luke Skywalker?
Why is santa's sack so big?
Who is your Grandma's favorite politician?
What do you call movie night at Bill Cosby's house?
What do a Christmas tree and a Priest have in common?
Why couldn't the skeleton cross the road?
Why can't you give bad news to someone on the Moon?
Why Is Reddit Called Reddit?
What do you call two lesbians in a canoe?
Why did the BDSM store get behind on its shipments?
How do you know Santa Claus is married?
Did you hear the one about the guy who had to go to the ER with six toy horses in his anus?
What us the difference between white, brown and black people?
Wanna come over and play Jenga?
What do black people and bikes have in common?
What is Donald Trump's favorite Christmas song?
How do you blind an Asian?
Why does doctor pepper come in a can?
How do you call a whores pubic hair?
What do Aids, Syphilis and Chlamydia have in common?
What's worse than a moron?
What do you call a lesbian with fat fingers?
How do you react when looking in the mirror?
What do you call five black people having sex?
What is the direct competitor for Dungeons and Dragons?
Why don't you see Santa for the rest of the year?
Why is Santa Claus always a man?
What cologne do engineers wear?
Where do twin lesbians party?
How do you get to the top of a weather beacon?
When is Independence Day 2 coming out?
Why did I go to the dentist at an Indian Reservation?
Why can't two even numbers be together?
What does the train say as its heading toward Auschwitz?
What is the safest place in the galaxy?
What do you call the child of two redheads?
Why did the black man wear a suit to his vasectomy?
How do you know when a vampire is sick?
Have you heard about the one-armed super hero?
Why do men with prostate issues have issues stealing video game systems?
Why were Jeremy Clarkson's colleagues excited to try his mulled wine?
Q: Why is air a lot like sex?
Did you hear about the amazing new prosthetic device for paraplegics?
What do you call Apple's next beauty product?
What did Anakin Skywalker cry out as he lay dying and on fire?
Why do some Italian Christmas cakes cause so much trouble?
Why didn't the Germans eat their Christmas cake?
Do you want to hear a trick to get a head in life?
Where did Santa meet his wife?
Why did the tennis player get thrown out of his workshop?
What are your favorite jokes for the Holidays?
What a plates scared off?
Did you know the anthem of the USA is about a Mexican immigrant?
What does Eminem think about Trump?
What do you call a law enforcement agency that refuses to buy it's own vehicles?
What do little green men do to stay in shape?
The father of Mike Davidson, what's his full name?
What's the difference between broccoli and cat poop?
How do turtles communicate?
What 2 things do Winnie the Pooh and John the Baptist have in common?
What do you call a herd of cows masturbating?
What's the difference between a small bird?
Why did the butcher get fired?
What do you call it when you torture corn to death?
What kind of magic does a love-struck giraffe practice?
How is Islam like a GPS?
How does Darth Vader know what Luke is getting for Christmas?
What's a shopaholic's favourite boy band?
What’s the difference between your wife and your job?
How did the Kentucky woman know her daughter was on her period?
What’s long and hard and full of semen?
What's the difference between a chick and a woman?
If you put a crown on a donkey, will he be king?
What did the Ice Cream say to the Birthday Girl?
Why are people who vape always trying to chase after bigger clouds?
Why aren't ants going to church?
What is Soulja Boy's favorite type of Christmas song??
What does a Chinese gay man have for dinner?
Do you know what the Steve Harvey autobiography is called?
What do you call an epileptic in the garden?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and Tiger Woods?
Why don't bunnies make noise when they have sex?
How does every racist joke start?
Why does Saudi Arabia have so much oil?
When does John Cena get scared?
Whats is long and black?
Why did the crow go to the gym?
Why do Jewish girls love circumcised dicks?
What goes 99 clonk, 99 clonk, 99 clonk?
How does Trent Reznor's mom hang up his Christmas stocking?
Why don't you see hippos hiding in trees?
How does the astronaut cut his hair?
What do you do with a dead scientist?
What goes 30 miles per hour and smells like curry?
Did you hear about the girl with twelve nipples?
Why can't Jewish girls be basic?
What do we have for dinner? Wookie steak. Is it any good?
What did the Jewish paedophile say to the kid?
Why didn't the boxer cross the road?
What did the lawyer say after the short trial?
Have you seen the new Broadway production about the dictionary?
You want to hear a funny joke?
What has five arms, three legs and a head?
Why did the chicken droid NOT cross the road?
What does Santa listen to while delivering presents?
Did you hear the joke about the piece of paper?
What do you call the injury a black guy gets after he gets punched in the eye?
What do you do when ISIS attacks?
What do you call a beaten up pretzel?
Which is the best kind of dinosaur to play hide & seek with?
What's the hardest part about fucking a cripple?
What do cats eat in the summer?
Why would the Holocaust have failed if the victims were Islamic?
Why is Jar Jar Binks so lonely?
Why did the smart phone eat a lot?
What makes rock stars great campers?
What car does Boba Fett drive?
What do you call an obnoxious potato?
You remember the singer Gotye?
Why did the chicken fall into the well?
What do you call a blowjob from a short person?
What did the Invisible Man's mom say after he came out as invisible?
How do you know if Buzzfeed article is stolen?
What's the difference between a onion and a prostitute?
Whats the first thing you do when you spill something on your keyboard?
When is a rabbi dishonest?
What did the reindeer wear to protect itself while Santa was watering the garden?
What does a unionized hooker say when she is done work for the day?
What do you call meat that is on sale for half off in the south?
What do you get when you cross a mountain climber and a mosquito?
How did Michael Jackson pick his nose?
What do you call political yeti?
Why can't witches have babies?
Why did Anakin kill all the younglings?
Why is. Dr.Dre's Headphones so popular?
What do you call an illegal wristwatch trade?
How many passive aggressive people does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a bench with white people?
What did one plumber say to the other plumber?
What did the moderator say to the redditor?
What does a War Boy from Mad Max say when he goes to court to sign an affidavit?
Whats your best dad joke?
What do you call a girl who likes men with small d**ks?
What did the pervert get for Christmas?
What caveman say when he get hurt?
What do you call a iPhone 6S when its out of memory?
What do you call a colorful nipple?
How many Libertarians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is the most popular social media form at Hogwarts?
How do you know when your at a gay bbq?
Whats the only thing two Jewish men can agree on??
What is Zack Morris's favorite type of word?
What do you call a Mexican walking on the moon?
Why don't men like going Downtown with women?
What's a crusader's favourite drink?
What did one lesbian frog say to the other?
What sways from side to side?
How do Russians put windows in?
What's the difference between a white Jew and a black Jew?
Since it's so close to Christmas: Why did Kim Bauer hate Christmas?
What do you call a Psychic Midget who escaped from prison?
What did the Olive say when it fell off the table?
Why should white blood cells never discuss God?
What did Pontius Pilate say to Jesus?
How do you confuse a gay person?
What do a Christmas tree and a priest have in common?
What do you call a surfer who loves Muhammad?
[SPOILER] Who is going to die in the new Star Wars?
What do porn stars and prostitutes say when they wake up in the morning?
How many redditors does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the rudest part of the body?
Why does Jesus like Japanese food?
"Why can't a Christmas tree walk?
What's the brightest airship ever made?
What is a terrorist's favorite board game?
My wife asked me what I wanted to eat that's fast and easy?
How long does it take for a black woman to take a shit?
What do you call a group of racist mathematicians?
What foreplay does the praying mantis girlfriend enjoys ?
Did you hear about the murderer in India?
What do a pair of briefs and a cheap hotel have in common?
How many millennials does it take to change a light-bulb?
Did you hear about the electron going through an existential crisis?
What do you call a hilarious ghost?
How do you catch a unique rabbit?
How do you catch an elephant?
What do Santa and Jared from Subway have in common?
Why does Hillary Clinton want to have sex with Bill Clinton first thing in the morning?
What does Jim Jones and Saitama have in common?
What's the difference between a whore and a prostitute?
Why did the father of the asian couple know the baby was not his?
Why did Chewbacca turn down Princess Leia?
Why did the baker have stinky hands?
Want to hear a Star Wars joke?
How Can Atheists Make Money, and Get Free Food?
How do you piss off winnie the pooh?
How are relationships like algebra?
Why was Santa upset he got a sweater for Christmas?
Why are pirates always angry when they go to the restroom?
What did the homeless got for Christmas?
Whats brown and rhymes with Snoop?
Can I Bring a Playmate?
Why was Santa sacked two days before Christmas?
Why don't you ever say a joke about Jesus to a Christian?
[begin metajoke] What did the drunk Chinese customer say to the bartender?
Why was Mrs. Clause's stocking full on December 21st?
Why is 'The Game' the most powerful rapper?
what do you call a mentally unstable ursine that lives in the antarctic?
Whats the difference between a baby and a bag of cocaine?
Did you hear about the new housing being built where dwarves can live at no charge?
You know why it’s women and children first off of a sinking ship?
How does an ugly guy get the girl?
How do you ruin a date with Princess Leia?
How many Mennonites does it take to change a light bulb?
How many metal heads does it take to change a light bulb?
How is working in I.T. like being a wizard?
How many germans does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many atheists does it take to change a lightbulb?
How much do I trust reddit?
What's the difference between a Harley Davidson and a Hoover vaccuum?
do you know why the chameleon couldn't change colors?
How can you tell a golf course is owned by Donald Trump?
Why was Mary's phone bill so high?
What do you call a person with a meat pastry on their ear?
What do you call a black Asian bird?
How did the Greek army separate the men from the boys?
What's the worst part about getting raped by an eskimo?
What do you call a Nun who is moving?
Why did the hick move to a toxic waste dump after winning the lottery?
Why did the stoner eat cannabis-infused chocolate laxatives?
What do you end up with when your pig smokes pot?
Where does Chewbacca research his college essays?
Why should you never fight a dinosaur?
What's a difference between snowmen and snowwomen?
What state is the highest on every top 50 list?
What do you call a Sith lord who refuses to fight?
How Can Athiests Make Money and Get Free Food?
Why does Ed Miliband like advent calendars?
How do you make beef stew?
Did you hear the guy who invented predictive text has died?
Why did the genie turn the man into a toad?
What do you call people who worship paper bags?
What do Han and Chewbacca use to communicate?
Why are Redditors naturally great at swordfighting?
What does a sheep call a film it doesn't like?
What do you get when your iPhone auto-corrects "lardass"?
What gets really high in Colorado?
Why is Harry Potter so popular?
What's the difference between Olive Garden and Reddit?
What do you call an Irish guy who can't keep off the weight?
Why is China so politically in bed with Africa?
How do you eat the Flesh Hounds?
What do Brussels sprouts and pubic have in common?
Why were the Indians here first?
Did you hear, John Wayne Bobbit got his penis cut off again?
Did you hear about the microbiologist who travelled around the world?
What is a fishes favorite kind of sandwich?
Why was the girl in such a bad mood when she got out of jail?
How do you tell if Lady Gaga is dead?
What did the mole hill say to the mountain?
What happens if you steel?
What kind of Aircraft is into Men and Women?
What animal has exactly 12 grams of carbon?
Which phone??
Did you hear about the overly-eager bread dough?
What do you call two Canadians buy coffee?
What do you call a crazy professor?
What's the difference between rape and necrophilia?
What is a double amputee's favorite video game?
Do you remember your first blow job?
Why did the fish blush?
Which Knight invented the Round Table?
Did you hear about the fight at the homeless camp yesterday?
What does RoboCop use for fuel?
What's the best music to listen to while stoned?
What did the programmer from the biker gang say?
What's another name for dick pics?
What do you call Central Florida?
Why are there no black RV'ers?
What do you call a group of trees?
What do you call a (insert racist minority slur here) on a brand new bicycle?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs on your front porch?
What kind of porn does Smurfette make?
Why do the lawyers for the reindeer say they have to pull Santa's sled?
What do you call a 2nd grader with no friends?
What did the poplar tree say to the weeping willow?
How is Jesus different from other carpenters?
What's the difference between deer nuts and beer nuts?
What's Thor's favourite piece of clothing?
Do you know the difference between a dildo and a chair?
What did Anakin give to Padme for christmas?
What's an avocado's favorite music?
What do you call a smiley face if someone uses it that lives in an igloo?
Where did the general put his armies?
Did you know Helen Keller had a male roommate?
Why do some people think Jesus was black?
What's a thoughtful person's favourite dip?
What do you call a sad asparagus?
Change sentence to tense?
What was the pornstar doing in school?
What do you call a daredevil Gigolo with dwarfism?
Why can't Gingers sing RnB music?
Why is North Korea so depressing?
What do Italians do when they're waiting for somthing?
How did Satan turn an unbeliever holy?
Why do people get divorced in the holiday season?
How can you tell if a good ole boy from North Carolina is married?
What do you get when you cross the devil with a Donald Trump impersonator?
You know what makes me angry?
What do you get with breaking news?
What's the same about Christmas and work?
What do you call a conversation between two people who are pooping?
Why do children cry when they find out Santa isn't real?
When/If Scotland becomes independent, what will the national currency be called?
How do you shut Donald Trump up?
Why was 6 happy to see 7?
What did the scientist say when he discovered the lowest possible temperature?
What do you call a mentally challenged feather pillow?
How do you know Adam and Eve weren't Chinese?
Why are Ethopians so fit?
What kind of condoms do frogs wear?
Who is Shrek's favorite basketball player?
What did the tsundere degree say to the radian?
How many American presidents does it take to change a broken lightbulb?
Why are hairdressers never late for work?
Wanna hear a joke about Reddit?
What does the KKK use to bake cookies?
Where does Santa go for a sexy carwash?
Why did the ghost get in the elevator?
How does a penguin keep itself hydrated?
What do you call Virgin Mobile?
What kind of cheese would you use to disguise a small horse?
Whats the difference between a chick pea and a garbanzo bean?
What is the difference between a bachelorette party and Cirque du Soleil?
Can a kangaroo jump higher than the Empire State Building?
What do you call four drowning spanish teachers?
Whats you favorite Christmas joke?
What's the best thing about an Ethiopian blowjob?
What's Paul Walker's favorite drink?
Why is Chewbacca bad at sports?
What do you call a developmentally challenged member of the ruling elite?
What did the spanish teacher say to his one student, who was a member of the cartel?
Why did Moohamad eat his wives out so much?
Why are Americans so "fat and ugly"?
Is Google a male or a female?
What did the engineer say to the flood?
Why do moslem girls love black guys?
How do two lawyers greet each other?
If pro is the opposite of con, then what is the opposite of progress?
Why will you never see a politician at your Concealed Weapons Permit class?
Why is it important for pious Moslem girls to wear the hi.jab?
What's the difference between a quarter and a nickel?
What do you call a dinosaur that practices Islam?
What do you call the woman on the end of a line?
What do you call a whore house with only men?
Who was the dankest dictator of all time?
Why is it important for pious Muslim girls to wear the hijab?
What happened to the pie dish that got arrested?
How did ISIS do on their French exam?
Why is Santa always jolly?
How can you tell that someone's a vegan?
Whats the devil's favorite meal?
Why was Yoda afraid of 7?
How do you help someone with ADD or ADHD?
What's the hardest part to eat when eating a vegetable?
Why are there so many Smiths in the phone book?
Why are Americans so bad at League of Legends?
What's the difference between a guitar and a fish?
Why doesn't Santa have any children?
You hear the one about the two guys who stole the calendar?
What do you call a group of scientologist almonds?
How did the toad feel in the morning?
What type of computer sings well?
How did ISIS do on their French test?
Did you know Thailand has a military?
What do you say to someone who just uttered a tired, old reddit catch-phrase?
How did the bottle of whiskey laugh?
Why do Storm Troopers like churchs?
Why can't you checkmate a christian?
What happens to illegally parked frogs ?
What did the terrorist send in the mail?
What do you call someone who has irrational and prejudiced views against motor races?
Damn girl, are you an alarm clock?
What do you call someone who speaks two languages?
what do you call 6.02 X 10^23 atoms of avocado dipping sauce?
What holiday does a Jewish stoner celebrate in December?
How many gay guys does it take to flip a car?
Do you whats amazing?
How many Grateful Dead fans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's long and hard, except for Asians?
What's the most capable element?
What religion is Santa?
Why does coffee take so long to make in a purcolator?
Where does the brown sugar go to watch a movie?
What's black and blue all over and hates sex?
How do they calculate global warming?
Do you know; what is the best thing to put on a delicious cake?
Mike Tyson asks you: How do you think the unthinkable?
Why do you never see black people on cruises?
what is a vegetable's favorite singer?
What do Australian terrorists say before attacking?
Why do Russians always wear track suits?
When is your door annoying?
What dries your clothes but can also make you writhe around in agony?
What's the 6 things that's white on a black guy?
Honey, can we eat the nougat ?
What does an elephant say when it kidnaps someone?
Did you hear about the Christmas Party in San Bernadino?
What was the gay Swedish guys favorite thing to do?
How are Cigarettes like Hamsters?
Why did the terrorists have to blow up a Paris nightclub?
Why was the tomato red?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and Adolf Hitler?
Why do jews have so big noses?
What did Santa say when he was in the strip club?
How long does it taken for a black woman to take a shit?
You guys want to hear a racist joke?
What do you call a pack of sorority girls who aren't in law school?
What's long and hard on a black guy?
What do you get when you mix a rat and an elephant?
Why does the Brotherhood of Steel from Fallout hate '80s music?
What was Pablo Escobar's favourite pool party game?
What instrument was Donald Trump named after?
How do you deal with radical Islamists?
How does Donald Trump plan to expel all Muslims from the county?
What did the rat say to the cat?
How many people can ride on a bird?
What is Donald Trump thinking?
What's the difference between the Serengeti and the White House?
What does the weather do when Hitler's around?
Why should you never take a shower with a pokemon?
Two kittens are on a sloped roof. Which one slides off first?
What do you call a Redneck Blind Reindeer?
Did you hear about the guy who had ADD and schizophrenia?
Why do you call the US government when a blizzard of secret information gets released?
What is the national vegetable of Germany?
Why does the nazi love to bring his jewish friend to indian restaurants?
Why was Harry Potter hufflepuffed after his date with Hermione?
why was the 6 month old African baby crying?
A Christmas joke for you: Where do snowmen go to dance?
Why do women love Satan?
Who died and left the US in charge?
How is Santa like a paedophile?
Why do Asians squint with their eyes?
What's the difference between a round piece of plastic and a babies head?
Why did the anorexic cow take great offense when the farmer wished him Merry Christmas?
What do you call two fake number fours next to each other?
How do Jews celebrate Christmas?
Ever heard of the movie Constipation?
Did you know they were trying to ban MSG?
Why do so many Italian men wear mustaches?
What kind of food can you color with?
Dad: Did you get gas?
Have you heard about the dating site for radical jihadists?
What's a good thing about a novelist conman?
What did the big chimney say to the little chimney?
What's the difference between the IRS and Jared Fogle?
What did the Muslim bring to the Holiday party?
What does a KKK member wear to a business meeting?
You know the difference between a chick pea and a garbonzo bean?
What does it mean if holy water sizzles when it hits your skin?
Why is Toblerone shaped like a triangle?
Why did the bear dissolve in water?
Why are so many Italian men named Tony?
What happens to your car insurance if you don't notify them that you've wrecked a car?
What did one lesbian vampire say to her lover?
What happens to the water level in the aquarium when one of the fish dies?
What do you call a dead guy hanging on your wall?
Why do some writers have a hard time graphing equations?
YOU KNOW WHAT THE BEST PART OF BEING ADDICTED TO METH IS?!?
How often does Mary see her special friend?
Why should the Pope play NBA basketball?
Why do they want to change the faces on dollars but not on coins?
Why did the girls in *Requiem for a Dream* go ass to ass?
What is the favorite Christmas Carol of the Aryan brotherhood?
What do you call a seagull who's smart enough not to eat its own poop?
How do you call a black guy that uses testosterone boosters?
How do gingers make friends?
What do you call a skinny, Islamic cow?
Who is Hitlers worst nightmare?
Is it true that you can get an STD from public toilets?
How British is Adele ?
What do you call a fat guy, from New Orleans, that never tells the truth?
What does a gay guy say when he can't remember?
What is the hardest thing in driving through a field of babies?
How do you know when it is raining cats and dogs?
What's a capitalist's favourite dessert?
Did you hear about the transvestite?
Why did the kids not want to eat their pbj sandwiches?
How does Tinkerbell pleasure herself?
What was the #1 summer blockbuster, according to Cat Fancy magazine?
Who was the most well rounded knight of Arthur's round table?
You hear that Adele married a farmer?
What does Team Rocket and a Peeping tom have in common?
Damn girl, are you a calculator?
Why don't married men live as long as single men?
What's the difference between a badminton birdie and 'Netflix & chill' on a microfiber couch?
What Came Before The Big Bang?
What's the ultimate Jewish dilemma?
What do poor countries already have but also receive?
What do you call the entrance to a whorehouse?
Why do Muslims like Sex dolls?
Hear about the white guy in the NBA?
What do you call a kid with no legs, no arms and an eyepatch?
How do you solve world hunger and poverty simultaneously?
What do you call an Arabic photo-sharing porn app?
What does a blonde and a tornado have in common?
Whats a hippies favourite weather?
The reason Santa is so Jolly?
What do Spiderman and I have in common?
Why are Jewish men circumcised?
How many Grateful Dead fans does it take to change a lightbulb?
why do seals swim in salt water?
How did the farmer find his daughter?
Why did the one-eyed pirate run his ship aground?
How does the Moon get its haircut?
Why is it impossible to surprise a snowman?
How many kids with ADHD does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did the monkeys say when they saw the Northern Lights?
What will happen if people just stop trying altogether?
What did PSY say when he choked on a burger?
What do you say to a black guy selling drugs?
What does a drunk police officer do?
What should you call someone with a different color of skin than your own?
How do you catch a whale?
What do you call 4 lepers in a jacuzzi?
How did Jesus lose his virginity?
What's the difference between an Arab and an American wife?
Why is it bad to be an African American Jew?
What does 90 year old Pu$$y taste like?
What do you call three brothers taking acid together?
Do you know what's black and doesn't work?
What do you call a made-up orange?
want to hear a honest joke?
Why do black people like to "whip" when dancing?
What happens when you sing a country music song backwards?
What's more annoying on the internet, a troll or spam?
Mom I am 15 now, can I finally wear a bra?
Why Did The Chicken Cross The Road ???
Whats the difference between a pizza and a jew?
What do you do if a black man is harassing you?
What version of Counter-Strike do feminists get?
What did the Jewish pedophile say to the kid?
What's the best way to get bubblegum out of your hair?
What did Hitler ask the Jewish boy who was playing with an ashtray?
What's big and round and full of seamen?
Did you hear the one about the perfume store?
Why does the prosecutor only choose jurors who drive Hummers?
What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?
What do u call a Mexican with a rubber toe?
What's the difference between a black person and a bench?
Why are sewer covers called manholes?
Have you heard of Eats Unwanted Leftovers Man?
What’s so good about an Ethiopian blow job?
What did Santa said when he ran into the 3 prostitutes?
What do Gingers and Extinct Dinosaurs have in common?
What's the difference between a boy scout and a jew?
What happens when you are banned on a muslim server?
What's the difference between a fly and a bird?
Why don't people name their kids 'Napoleon'?
Why does Hollywood loveee to hire British Actors?
Why did D.R.E. call his headphones Beats?
What is the most prudent thing to do when someone is having an epileptic seizure in a hot tub?
What do music producers eat for breakfast?
What are a mathematician's five favourite numbers?
What do you call a hippopotamus that's a gigalo?
What did the U.S airdrop the the children of Syria?
How does a black woman fight crime?
What did the losing army call the Greeks?
What did the tuba say to the clarinet?
What's the hardest part about a fat nun's job?
What's Malcolm X's favorite Mountain Dew flavour?
What the difference between an IS training camp and a primary school?
Why don't blind people bungee jump?
Who was Japan's favorite racist comedian?
How can you tell if an American has a conceal carry permit?
Where do Jedi go to get inked?
What is round and hates French people?
Which number confuses people?
What color was George Washington's white horse?
Did you know Stalin got hit in the groin with a potato when he was young?
What is white and lies in the grass?
Why do the Japs like Sony?
Why do Jews never deck the halls on christmas?
What is my dentist's favorite indie band?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Disney Movies ?
Why'd the band teacher go to jai?
Where's Finnick?
What did the pre-school math teacher have to say about her students?
How do you blow up a Muslim's phone?
What did the snowman say when he got coal for Christmas?
What do you call a Muslim husband who beats his wife?
What's the difference between roast beef and pea green soup?
What do you call 5 black guys on a stage?
Why does NASA drink sprite?
Have you heard about the Oscar Pistorius drinking game?
What do you call an alcoholic with Parkinson's?
What do redditors and litterers have in common?
What is the most dangerous thing in america ?
What's the difference between a Christmas star and a bad pickling job?
You hear about the new radio talk/comedy show in the Middle East ... ? Isis in the Morning ?
What kind of overalls does Mario wear?
What do you call cold chili?
What's a orphans favorite ice cream flavor?
What did the son get his father for christmas?
Where do singing seahorses live?
What is another word for a rap battle?
Why was the doctor in a hurry to move to the big city?
why was 6 afraid of 777?
How do you make your girlfriend cry while having sex?
Why is acne better than a catholic priest?
Why do gays want to join the military so badly?
What did Jesus said to his girlfriend in the morning?
Why do scuba divers fall into the water backwards off the boat?
Why is 7 afraid of 6?
Who is the most popular guy in the nudist colony?
What does a chameleon that can't change color suffer from?
When can you tell your waitress is having a bad day?
What did the hippie say when asked to leave the party?
Why don't dirty commies shower?
Why does your Penis bend?
What's a Grecian Urn?
Did you know that Diarrhea can kill you?
Where can you find lubricant in the library?
Why are sprinklers so racist?
Why did the midget with the helium-filled head pass out?
Which video game do Mexicans play the most?
What do you call a psychic midget who has escaped from prison?
What did the blind, deaf, mute quadriplegic boy get for Christmas?
What did the black guy see when he went down the roller coaster?
What do you call it when a dinosaur can't get it up?
What is red and smells like blue Froot Loops?
What do you do with spoiled fish food?
What do a Feminist and a Broken ATM have in Common?
What do you call a snobby criminal walking down the stairs?
What is a Latino gang member's favorite type of exam?
Why can't midgets run?
(Kinda offensive joke) How do you get a black man to stop raping you?
What do you say to a lady that has to make 100 shirts by tomorrow?
What's the difference between a race car and a woman?
What do you call a girl with a unibrow?
How many cops do you need to change a light bulb?
How do you get "Dick" from Richard?
Why can't Cinderella play soccer?
How Do Mexicans Play Basketball?
Why did Gandalf never listen to the song "Dream Police"?
Why did the Chinese Government cross the road?
What do you call an Ethiopian with a yeast infection?
Why did the muslim with a toothache go to the airport?
How do you kill 10 flies with one hit?
How do you walk out of a Casino with $1 Million?
Have you heard that duct tape can be used as an aphrodisiac?
Did you hear about the guy who thought he saw a fog?
Dad, what do you call the guy who made every gay as lovely as the next?
Why do midgets make bad parents?
How does the Navy separate the men from the boys?
Why do feminists hate Apple?
How does a lawyer sleep?
What happens when a university math professor and a high school math teacher get it on?
Did you hear about the fight in the bathroom?
what do you call cheese you use to lure a bear out of the woods?
How do you get a clown off a swing?
Why did they spray rose water cologne on Scott Weiland at the funeral home?
Who is fastest girl in the world?
What's an example of suspicious behaviour?
What does school and the male reproductive organ have in common?
How do police know that princess Diana had dandruff?
What grocery store does Charlie Sheen frequently visit?
What is the difference between Christmas music and Kobe Bryant?
What do choosy moms choose?
What's the best way to become a Russian leader?
What disease do police give black people?
What do you do when you are riding a horse, and a cheetah and ostrich are chasing you?
What do you call a cute girl in an Amish church?
Why couldn't the BMW fit into a narrow parking stall at Target?
Guess what?
Want to know why?
How does Santa make new baby reindeer?
What do you call a chick who studies astronomy and has a big booty?
How do you call sons of australians and germans?
Want to hear an awesome lyrebird impression?
Why do social justice warriors hate math?
Where do children that die home alone go?
What's the worst gift to give to a Jewish person on Christmas?
Why did the walrus go to the tupperware factory?
Why was the tree stretching?
What do you call introverted hobbits?
What famous person is a huge fan of trees?
How does a woman fix a ceiling problem?
What happens when a tree masturbates?
What do you call an Ent prince who betrays his dad?
Boy: Are you made of Copper and Tellurium?
What do you call a unicorn that's had its horn removed?
Heard about that Judge from America who has no thumbs?
What body of water separates Italy from the word 'goodbye'?
What did Grandma say to the frog?
How does a female deer get revenge on her cheating husband?
Where do one-legged waitresses work?
What did the boy with no arms get for Christmas?
What do you call a friendly Mancunian midwife?
What does a Syrian refugee and an American abortion have in common?
What has walls, but no corners, and an opening, but is not a room?
What comes out of a reasonable volcano?
Whats it called when you give a dolphin food for it to do a trick?
What 6 inches goes to your mouth?
Why are Wendy's burgers so good?
Did you hear about the scarecrow who won the Nobel Peace Prize?
Do you ever feel like a tampon?
What did the upset horse use to row his boat?
What does an ear of corn hang on his fireplace during Christmas?
What do you call a bird born in the 90s?
Where is the lift?
What's Donald Trump's favorite kind of milk?
What is the only man made object visible from space?
What is Swiper the Fox's favorite app?
What do you call inexplicably missing aioli?
[Rhymer] What do you call the female bear version of a centaur?
What is a female genitals favorite slide to slide down at the playground?
What does the Native American say to the male prostitute?
What's the mass of a large chunk of tree?
What do you tell a cow blocking a road?
What do you call a cow that just had a baby?
What are the sexiest animals in the barn?
What do math majors get when they graduate?
How many animals can fit into a pair of pantyhose?
Why was the neighbor mad at the Mars rover speeding around her neighborhood?
What do women's breasts and toy trains have in common?
Is your ass the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty?
What do you call the German word for Vaseline?
What do you call cows that don't have a sense of humor?
Why don't cows play poker?
What do you call a german that does the exact opposite of what he says to do?
What do you call Jewish coffee?
What did Abe Lincoln say to the judge when he asked how he pleas?
What is the difference between a Garbanzo bean and a Chickpea?
What do you call a hobo with an afro?
Why does the little mermaid wear sea-shells?
How do you know the Alphabet is celebrating Christmas?
How many questions did the politician answer?
Why would Adele cross the road?
What did the apathetic philosopher doctor say?
Why does Yasuo never get locked out?
Did you hear about the man who broke both his left leg and arm?
Why did you leave me here all alone?
Why was the monkey attracted to the paint?
Father asks 11 year old daughter what she learned in shcool?
What do necrophiliacs get when they wake up on the day of a funeral?
Why did Johnny cross the road?
What's accounting?
Whats the difference between congress and a US mint?
Anybody ever get paid to smuggle drugs in their butt?
Why did Hitler called it ethnic cleansing?
How do you put a baby to sleep?
What are the differences among a piano, a tuna, and super glue?
What is a pirate's favorite fast food joint?
What happens if you pee on Putin's head?
Do you NOT like Undertale?
Whats Big, Black, Hard and full of semen?
Why does salt come in a bottle?
What's crunchy on the outside and airy in the inside?
What the the planet Jupiter say to Neptune?
Why do SJWs hate Apple computers?
"HUGE for an Asian" slogan stupid or funny?
Why do i call my dick "chess"?
What do you call a well-behaved Indian takeaway?
What did the grape say when the elephant sat on it?
What is that thing called when your crush likes you back?
What time did the man go to the dentist?
Why don't they have driving classes and sex ed on the same day in Saudi Arabia?
Whats the worst the thing about having to attend a funeral?
What's the worst thing at a bad joke party?
What would call a person who isn't worthy of being looked at?
What did the little boy with no hands get for Christmas?
Do you know what they say about girls with big phones?
An ice cream truck flips over on the highway, what does it leave?
Why did the German get their tailor and their barber mixed up?
Why did the black man walk backwards?
What do you call a Russian Duke who makes butter the old fashioned way?
What do Cher and Tasmania have in common?
What did Davey Crocket say at the Alamo?
What would you call Vanilla Ice if he was asian?
What does your girlfriend and my garage have in common?
Why did the developers have to delay their pirate game?
Why can Chinese bands rehearse so much?
What's a pornstars favorite soda?
What did the German clock maker say to the broken clock?
Why did the pope have so many children?
What's the difference between a Porsche and a trash bag full of dead babies?
Going out with Ariana Grande , makes you?
What do you call it when you make fun of somebody else's gambling addiction?
What did Hitler get for Christmas?
Have you heard of the John Denver omelet?
Why did the post office get sued?
What do you call a New Zealander with a sheep under each arm?
Did you hear about the scarecrow that got an award?
What do rednecks do on Halloween?
Why did the Muslim fail his Chemistry Exam ?
Why does Santa have a huge sack?
Why shouldn't you date a tennis player?
What's Mr. T's favorite band?
What do you call a Jewish rapper?
What do you call a ginger who can't spell?
What's the difference between a group of pigmies and a lesbian track team?
What happened to the concussed gravedigger?
Why is Ironman a superhero?
Where are average things built?
What's the difference between being horny and being hungry?
Where's your bin?
What's the difference between a baby and a freezer?
What is Buddhism measured in?
What is the difference between a baker baking a cake and a gynecologist giving an exam?
Have you ever met a vegan that does crossfit?
What did the sorority girl say when she couldn't eat another bite of pie?
Are you the 7th planet from the sun?
Wanna watch Netflix in H?
Anyone hungry?
Why are gym memberships illegal?
What has 142 teeth and holds back the incredible hulk?
How much horsepower does a mustang have?
Why are girls so hot?
Where do kids with ADHD go?
What did the Turkish guy say to his babe when she invited him to eat?
What did the kid with cancer get for Christmas?
What was the first thing the stowaway to Mars said after he landed?
What's the difference between a bad golfer, and a bad skydiver?
What's the difference between and elephant and a mail box?
Why do Communists only drink coffee?
Why did the comedian go to the dog pound?
Why didn't Beethoven sell his house?
How can you tell if your wife is dead?
Why does DMX hate sweatshirts?
How do you call it, when the internet is not working in Germany?
Why won't the Alzheimer's patient pay attention to you?
What's Canada's spy agency?
Why would people always stand still to hide from Martin Luther King Jr.?
What's a bulimiac's favourite porno?
Why did the dolphin run away from home to start a new life?
How come Star Trek fans never grow out of it?
Did you hear the one about the woman who couldn't handle a 9 inch dick?
What happens to all Vertibird pilots?
What's Captain Hook's favourite kind of shop?
What do Indian flowers grow?
What do free masons do when they want to make a frame-by-frame remake of "Back to the Future"?
Why is Islam a religion of peace?
What's the difference between you and a brick?
What should you do when you see a spaceman?
How Swift is Kanye?
What is a geometry teachers favorite movie?
What did the artist say to himself before drawing his first penis?
What did the cow say to the hay?
What is an architects favorite movie?
Whats the funniest joke you know?
Why is there echo every time Bono sings?
What is the difference between Stephen Hawking and his E-Wheelchair?
Why are Cal Tech and MIT constantly Fighting?
What is called when a woman gets a sex change?
What's small but effective?
What's the difference between PHP and PCP?
Why was Tigger always filthy?
What do you call it when you go down on a paraplegic?
What's worse that burning the turkey on thanksgiving?
Did you know gullible came from ancient Greek?
How do you get over trophobia?
Why don't people in their 80's have sex anymore?
What do you call a man who makes fart scented candles?
Why did Sweden change their immigration politics?
Where do you find a dog that has no legs?
What did the Japanese woman do when the Titanic sank?
What do Taylor Swift and Charlie Sheen have in common?
What do you call a religiously-praised feces?
What do you call a family in which everyone from grand parents to grand kids smoke weed?
Why do pirates wake up early on Saturday?
What did baby corn say to mama corn?
What do chicken, beef and Russia have in common?
What do people from West Virginia do on Halloween?
What does a bee style his hair with?
What would you call Scott Adsit if he was a skirt?
How do Mexicans cut their Pizza?
What do you call a slutty midget?
A Jew walks into a wall with an erection. Gets a broken nose. What does an Asian get?
Have you ever woken up because of a boner?
Have you heard of the, great, ancient Greek philosopher Mediocrates?
Where did Hitler send his Oranges?
What do the Kardashians and penises have in common?
Why are Twilight fans obsessed with it?
Why do you call someone who doesn't like the ideas in Islam?
Have you tasted Somalian food?
What do you call a turtle without a shell?
Hey Dad, do the Indian people celebrate Thanksgiving?
What do you call a gassy greek?
Do I speak German?
Why is it impossible to argue with Trump?
What do you call a Muslim Girl dating an Agnostic Guy?
What is Hillary Clintons least favourite instrumeny?
What's the art of having multiple personalities?
What does a pirate call his idiot son?
So Donald Trump wants to be president and move into the white house. Why not?
How do you say goodbye to an Indonesian?
Why can't pirates learn the alphabet?
What's the difference between a sperm bank and an regular bank?
What's not 50% off today?
Why is there so much segregation today?
How do you become president of Russia?
What do you call a Russian farmer who's masturbating?
Why doesn't Mr.Sodium like to spend time with Mr.H20?
What is the difference between a painting and jesus?
What do American beer and a canoe have in common?
Think you can save humanity?
Don't you hate how long girls take to dress before goin' clubbin?
How can you tell between a graphic designer and recruiter?
What has 5 arms, 3 legs, and 2 feet?
What rock group has 4 members that don't sing?
What do you wear to dance the salsa?
What do you call a rock band with a perfectionist in it?
What do you call a black guy who sells flowers?
What do you call a black lesbian in the workplace?
What do you call children born into a whorehouse?
Why do some fish live in saltwater?
Why did grass do 8/10?
What do you call a residential area for horse lovers?
What do you call someone who commits piracy?
Did you hear about the guy who was on trial for masturbating to obscure court cases?
Why couldn't the pirate have gravy with his thanksgiving dinner?
How many philosophers does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you calla brown guy that asks a lot of question?
What do you call children who are born into a Whorehouse?
Did you hear about that new species of mosquito?
What will Russians be cooking for Thanksgiving...?
What did the flatulent man say to the preacher during confession?
What never eats at thanks giving?
What is the number 1 activity to do in Syria on Trip Advisor?
which hollywood character does the numbers six and nine hate most?
What were Nazi turkeys forced to do each Thanksgiving?
What did the circus owner say to the human-cannonball when the he wanted to retire?
What do Asian pirates do?
What's the easiest way to get the chewing gum out of your hair?
What is the most recycled joke that keeps getting used?
What do Aaron Hernandez and Jared Fogle now have in common?
What's the difference between a genealogist and a gynecologist?
Why did moses break his glasses in half?
What does the Jolly Green Giant have on his feet?
What Does A Nazi Turkey Say?
What are you doing when you Sentence almost a Dozen Surfers to death by the Gallows?
Have you had an accident that wasn't your fault?
What's the only thing better than winning a gold medal at the Special Olympics?
Who was Noah's wife?
What's annoying about going 90 in a school zone?
What will Putin be having for Thanksgiving dinner?
What's the difference between parsley and pubic hair?
Doctor, doctor, is it alright to masturbate?
Where does steel wool come from?
What do you call a turkey with no arms?
What do heavily-armored army vehicles celebrate for the holidays?
What do you call an Asian prostitute?
Why did the movie scene have a rusty pan?
What's the difference between linearly independent vectors and the World Trade Centre?
What noise does a Nintendo ambulance make?
What do zombies use to prepare their turkeys for cooking on the smoker?
What happens when the smog lifts over Los Angeles?
Which side of the turkey has the most feathers?
What is a lesbians favorite day of the week?
Why was the ghost sad?
2 midgets and a black guy walk into a room, how many people are in that room?
What is a Jedi's favorite car company?
What do you call a gullible Indian?
Why are magicians always sad?
Why did Marlin and Dory never date?
How do you make a dog go meow?
What do you call an empty bud light can on the side of the road?
How do you call black guy that missed his train?
What did the male eskimo say to the female eskimo right before having sex?
What will Putin have for thanksgiving dinner?
How do you put 50 yews in a car?
What does Fozzie the Bear do when he can't find a ride?
What animal do you get when shake a pig?
What do you call a Mexican who has just lost his car?
USA to Russia:" What will you have for Thanksgiving dinner?
Did you hear about the Homeopath who forgot to take his medication?
What did the guy on LSD say while driving on the highway?
What did the hipster say the day after thanksgiving?
What do you get when you inject human DNA into a sheep?
How do you get a jew out of his car?
What do you call Dwayne Johnson having sex with a rock?
What did the duck say when he bought lipstick?
Why is a laundromat a really bad place to pick up women?
What's the difference between JFK and Bill Clinton?
Which 20th Century Business tycoon was a top?
What do you call a person without a son?
How many dead hookers do you need to replace a lightbulb?
What is a toilet in Ancient Mexico?
What's the best way to reheat turkey?
Black Fridays Matter?
When do terrorists go to bed?
How do you kill a giraffe?
Did you hear about the mohel with no knife?
Why was WWI so short?
What Should I Do Today?
What's white on the outside and black on the inside?
What are ISIS militants using to stuff their Thanksgiving goat?
How did I get out of Iraq?
How do people with leukemia know they have cancer?
what's Putin having for Christmas?
Why did the blonde stare at the orange juice box?
What do you call Whoopi Goldberg after sex?
What smells bad and sounds like a bell?
What does a dog from Minnesota say?
What's the most common activity people do while wearing safety vests?
Why did the bunch of grapes exile one of the grapes?
Why did the turkey cross the road?
What did the pot-smoking alien say when asked what toppings he wanted on his sammich?
Why is it funny when someone fractures their upper arm?
How does Good King Wenceslas like his pizzas?
Where do you send a Jew with ADHD?
How do dogs do business?
Why did they build a shrine to karl marx in Japan?
Why cant Mexicans have Sex ed and Drivers Ed on the same day?
Why aren't redheads very good R&B singers?
Whats the difference between a girl and a washing machine?
How can you tell if someone is a marathon runner?
Why Are Germans Buried 20 Feet Underground?
Why doesn't Santa give gifts to naughty kids?
What's long, hard and a bit shitty at the end?
What's better than a joke on /r/Jokes?
Why do whales have really good immune systems?
What do you call an egg that always gets picked on?
What do you call it when Paul scores?
What is an omelette?
What do you call a limp snake?
How do you make a black man run faster?
How do you get an anarchist to kick your ass?
Hey what was the ending of that movie last night?
What do you call a lost legion?
Was your Daddy an enzyme?
Whats the most confusing day in Detroit?
Why did the Seahawks win the 2015 NFC Championship game against the Packers?
What do you call a twelve faced shape made out of genitals?
Why are orphans bad at poker?
What's a hipster's biggest problem?
What's the Difference?
Where do Mexicans get their car parts?
How many redditors does it take to post a joke to /r/Jokes?
What did the double hand amputee get for Christmas?
What's the resemblance between a bungeejump and a african whorehouse?
What's the difference between a bike and a car?
What do you call a Jamaican in Italy?
How did one dinosaur insult the other?
What's the difference between an epileptic corn shucker and a hooker with diarrhea?
What comes after Z?
Why did the samurai hate nonsense?
What's the difference between a homeless wanker and a pimp?
Why is it better to date a woman with heavy thighs during the winter?
What are the first words Jared Fogle's girlfriend said to him?
Have you tried Ethiopian Food?
What do you call a Russian sovereign with dwarfism and a taste for both men and women?
What does a pescatarian librarian eat when they're hungry for a little snack?
Whats the difference between a lesbian and a wheat-thin?
What is the difference between ass-kissing and brown-nosing?
How do you kill a Mormon?
Did you hear that Tom Brady is running for president?
What do you call a jihadi that owns both a goat and a donkey?
What do your mother and the ground have in common?
What's the difference between an Irish wedding and an Irish funeral?
What's frozen water and dangerous?
Did you hear about the ice cream man that committed suicide?
What are the advantages of living in Switzerland?
Did you hear about that earthquake yesterday?
Who are the world's fastest readers?
Why are you not able to boil water in a tauntaun?
what currency does the sun use?
Was that pun intended?
What did the girl on her period say when she got caught?
Why was Santa in the asylum?
What is the comeback that fits well with any argument?
What's ISIS's favourite band?
Why do handicapped people wear shoes?
How come there are no Jared Fogle jokes on reddit?
What's the difference between an old bus depot and a lobster with big tits?
What was Tigger doing in the toilet?
What's Forrest Gumps password?
Which lake is named after the Cleveland Steamer?
What do you call a gay man on roller skates?
How do the Lannisters save money on new beds?
What's the internal temperature of a Tauntaun?
What do you call a spy that likes to spend time with his son?
What do you call the stage a ladybug goes through before it becomes an adult?
what do you call a gassy Scotsman?
You know what happened when your mom went swimming?
Do you know Andy Griffith's wife?
What's the difference between classical music and Barry white?
What have Kim Jong-Un and Viagra got in common?
What noise does a homosexual horse make?
What is a brain dead couples' favorite pizza?
What do Winnie the Pooh and Jack the Ripper have in common?
How do you tell if your roommate is gay?
What did Justin Beiber say to his teacher?
What's a junkie's favorite videogame?
Want to talk about rape?
What happens when you cross a mountain climber with a mosquito?
What one noun, verb, and US President sums up a scientist's hopes and fears?
How do blondes carpool?
Why was the accountant constipated?
A black guy and a mexican are in a car, who's driving?
What do you call it when a waiter at an internet cafe gets your order wrong?
What did the nun wear to the casino?
Did you know someone in London gets stabbed every 52 seconds?
Did you hear about the cheese truck that crashed?
What U.S. State has the smallest sodas?
What's an Islamic extremist's favorite baseball team?
Why did the black guy loose all his money?
What is hitlers favorite yugio card?
What do you call a psychic, midget fugitive?
What do your mom and Poland have in common?
What do you get when you go to a concert in Paris?
What does my dad do for fun?
What did Jarod from subway get on his first night in jail?
What muscle do Egyptian soldiers generally lose control of, shortly before major battles?
What do you have when you are having second thoughts about your booking on Native American land?
How many muslims does it take to climb a building?
What's the smelliest breed of dog?
What does 80 year old pussy taste like?
Why did the woman fall in love with the surgeon?
What did Jeffery Dahmer say to Lorena Bobbitt?
Why do black people talk funny?
What did the gay guy say when he found out his boyfriend cheated on him?
What is a terrorists favorite snack?
What's the hardest dinosaur to ride?
How many people does it take for Prince Andrew to be accused of gang rape?
Which class the The Flash hated the most while in college?
What do you say to your girlfriend when you are on the toilet and she is braiding her hair?
How did you get out of Iraq?
Why does the shortage of strip clubs in the middle east make ISIS so angry?
What do you call an angry terrorist?
How do you make any woman wet?
What screams "Allah Akbar" and then smashes your crockery to pieces?
If your father is a Priest, could you call him Father dad?
What do you call Muslims on a Plane?
What do terrorists and the American government have in common?
What is comedian and former MTV show host Tom Green's favorite brand of pen?
Girl, are you organized?
have you tried subways new jared special?
Did you hear that the Titanic was a conspiracy?
What happens to superficial people when they die?
How much does a pirate pay for corn?
Who wrote "The Tiger's Revenge"?
What's a North Korean farmer's favorite time of year?
What do you call a poor pepper farmer?
The first and last thing I saw, is nothing. What am I?
what did the angry German man say when he was asked to count to 10?
Why is the Computer D Drive always sad?
What did Jeffrey Dahlmer say to Lorena Bobbit?
Did you hear about the latest innovation in french tanks?
What did the ocean say to the other ocean?
What do you call a fish out of water?
What's the one thing Spider-man can't eat?
What does a wolf lick a ram with?
Why can't muslims eat pigs?
Which cable provider offers ISIS 24/7 support?
Where do you eat toaster waffles on the beach?
What does the aquarium janitor use to clean?
What is the hardest part of a vegetable to eat?
What do the alphabet A and a flower have in common?
What did the demonic junkie get charged with?
Did you hear Jared Fogle got sentenced to 15.5 years in prison today?
What do you call a line of diamonds on fire?
Did you hear about all the problems going on in the middle East?
What do museums and girls have in common?
What's the difference between you and a calendar?
What is a vegetable's favorite martial art?
What's the difference between dollars and Jews?
Did you hear about the chemistry teacher that yelled NaCl during class?
What's the difference between Hitler and the Boston bombers?
How does a mathematician solve his constipation problem?
What do black birds pick?
What is one thing you never say to a Muslim?
Why didn't the hipster have HIV?
Did you hear about the law student who became a suicide bomber?
Why did the pervert cross the road?
Do you know any sodium jokes?
Why is something that keeps you from burning your fingers on a joint called a roach clip?
What does a Russian use to wipe their mouth?
Why do 19th century dancers repeat the last word in their sentences?
How can you tell if a 14 year old smokes weed?
What do Zero and Nil have in common?
What does Arizona name Colorado?
Did you hear about the jihadist birthday party?
Did you guys hear about the scarecrow who won the nobel prize?
Why will people click on any link with sperm or eggs in the headline?
Why do black people have white palms?
What's the difference between pussy and parsley?
If Mississippi asked Missouri for her New Jersey, what would Delaware?
What do you get when you cross the CIA and the Republican Party?
What goes in long and hard and comes out soft and wet?
What do you call an accurate dog?
What does a Polish groom give his bride for their wedding that is long and hard?
What's a zergling's favourite newspaper?
Why did the barracuda want to hire the clown fish's anemone?
What makes a talker become a stalker?
Did you guys hear about that Egyptian con-artist?
What was sonic's diet advice to mario?
What's the difference between a freezer and a woman?
Why don't Jews eat pussy?
How did Charlie Sheen contract HIV?
Mgmt: What makes you qualified for this job?
What's the difference between a waitress and your mom?
Where did Hitler place the black jews?
[Racist?] Why do all Asian kids get straight A's?
What do you call it when ISIS soldiers run for cover?
What does a polish bride get on her wedding night that is long and hard?
Why did Willow Smith whip her hair?
What's it called when an isis member takes a selfie?
Did anyone else read about that Bulgarian guy that got guillotined yesterday?
Did you hear about the employee at sea-world who killed his entire audience?
What's the difference between a radical and a moderate Muslim?
Why are there three letters missing from the alphabet?
How do the Sith ascend?
What's an alcoholic's favorite type of soap?
What did the Frenchman say after 80?
What do you call hundreds of crows at a Catholic church?
Wanna hear a good joke?
How does the stork bring babies?
What do you do if an elephant comes through your front door?
What did the Italian diver say when he saw an eel?
Why is it difficult to punish vampires?
How do you spell hypocrisy?
What song title is best used to describe the France terrorist attack?
What do you call a skeleton in a closet?
Have you heard about the cation?
What did Simba tell everyone in the lunch line?
What do Islamist extremists eat for breakfast?
Why did Isis cover their bullets in butter?
Why did Moses only go down on redheaded girls?
Do Irish people make good optometrists?
Did you guys hear about Anonymous declaring war on ISIS?
You heard about the concert last friday?
What do hillbillies do on halloween?
What do you call it when a chameleon can't change colors?
What's blue and sits on the toilet?
Why is Gordon Ramsey always so angry?
Why did the emo chicken go across the road?
Why don't Asians get constipated?
Why couldn't Cain make God love him?
what did the sign outside the rehab center say?
Why is Santa such a jolly old elf?
Q: What does a horny toad say?
What's an incestuous mother's favourite drink?
Did you know tank tops were illegal until the U.S constitution came out?
What do you call a camera mounted on a ISIS-truck?
Did you hear about the lumberjack who worked overtime?
Why was E the only letter in the alphabet to get Christmas presents?
Why does Wiz Khalifa brush his teeth?
What do you call a terrorist who's always late?
Teacher to child: 'do you know how to spell banana?
What's a pornstar's favourite spice?
What's long and black and dangerous to cut into?
What is the worst part of eating vegetables?
What do you call a Chinese man allergic to dogs?
Whats the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
What's the definition of an Irish homosexual?
What do you call fast midget house cleaners?
What do ISIS and cats have in common?
What is Donald Trump's favorite movie?
What is Oedipus' favorite flavor?
How do you find Will Smith in the Snow?
Too soon?
who are the shortest people in the bible?
Who are the fastest readers of all time?
What kind of pizza would the twin towers order?
What's the difference between Joan Crawford and an abortion doctor ?
Why couldn't the incontinent man print his documents?
What's another name for a cocoon?
What were the names of two gay Irishmen?
How do you start a conversation about men's rights?
Why don't black girls wear underwear to cookouts?
Why does Titan belong to Saturn?
Why do Caitlyn Jenner's kids see right through her?
What is the difference between a marshmallow and a blowjob?
Why did the Irishman eat only two hundred and thirty-nine beans?
What is the difference between a wife and a mistress?
What do you get when Italians join ISIS?
What do you call someone addicted to both crack and weed?
What do you have when you feed a nigger 7 warning signs?
What time of day is it in France right now?
You know what's fucking shit?
What did one asshole say to the other?
Why did the farmer fail to bring in the whole harvest before winter frost?
Why can't java programmers see well?
Why were episodes 4, 5, 6 made before 1, 2, 3?
What do Philadelphia Eagles fans do after they win the superbowl?
What do you call it when you finger a pony?
what do you say when you're out of spoons?
Why do the horses hate the jockey?
What did Frank say when he dropped his last slice of Pizza Hut in the toilet?
What do you call a censored DMX song?
If people were animals who would be the dolphin?
What Do People Have In Common With Jellybeans?
Why did the cows return to the marijuana field?
what is a jew that has eaten too many beans?
What do you call drawings of dog poop that don't have outlines?
How many Mizzou students does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's squawky, worn out, and falls from foot easily?
Did you hear about the kind and humble Jew that donated a lot of money to charity?
Q: How do you reuse a condom?
What's a space pirate's favorite planet?
What's the hardest part of skydiving?
What hood was the Swedish cholo from?
What do you call the misuse of a meme?
What do you say to a fig on ice?
Why did the math student fail his exam?
Mom, what is a transvestite?
What's the difference between the ISIS headquarters and a kindergarten?
Why are artificial intelligences in movies always female?
What did Ronda Rousey's face look like after her fight with Holly Holm?
What do you call an retarded rich kid?
What is the most racist dinosaur???
Did you hear about the guy who was told his genitals hadn't developed properly?
What did a young Pink Panther sing when he was playing with his magnifying glass in the back yard?
How did the hipster burn the roof of his mouth?
What does a cow say in the winter?
What's a pirate's favourite game?
Why'd the chicken cross the road?
What do you call a short Mexican?
What will ISIS be called once it is destroyed?
Mouldy sausage?
What happens to a person when they move out of Asia?
What's the best thing about dating a black girl?
What's a Jihadist Muslims least favorite sex position?
What's the difference between slavery and a cow?
What is the best part about taking a shower?
What does a masturbating thug say when he's mugging you?
Why does the French flag have Velcro?
What do you do when the dishwasher stops working?
What did one orphan said to the other?
Looking for some clarified butter?
Do you have a Dickiedoo?
What do you call cheese that isn't your cheese?
what do you call a french kebab?
What do you call a paedophile pirate?
What DJ should you never trust with directions?
Why did Steph Curry cross the road?
What kind of music does a pirate like?
What smells of cheese and is filled with holes?
What's a german's favourite number?
How does Michael J. Fox deal with his Parkinson's disease?
Want to play the rape game?
Did you hear Obtuse Angle lost weight?
How many wife's does a catholic priest allowed to have?
What do Penises and Rubik's Cubes have in common?
What's a great way to say I love you to your wife?
How do you make a faggot have sex with a woman?
How can you tell the difference between a chemist and a plumber?
What is the cheapest type of meat?
How do you stop a dog from humping your leg?
Who is the Prime Minister of Israol?
What did the weeaboo Southerner name his daughter?
What would the war be called if Donald Trump started war on the Mexicans?
How do cats admit they're gay?
What is the worst thing about dating a Japanese girl?
What do you call it when you stab a vampire in the lungs?
How many Retards does it take to change a lightbulb?
can you draw a pentagram with your left hand?
What is the difference between Reddit and a fetish party?
What's the most offensive joke you have heard?
Why did Hitler go to Sea World?
Do you know a good veterinarian?
How old was the kid that dressed up like Hitler?
Why are all of the accountants supporting Hillary Clinton?
What can hunger do that a woman simply can't?
What's a transgender's favorite action flick?
How long does it take to build a castle?
What do you call a stupid fish?
Why didn't Neil Armstrong catch cold while he was on the moon?
What did the SJW say to the man who appropriated culture?
Why did the Star Wars movies come out in the sequence 4, 5, 6,7, 1, 2, 3?
What game does a black dad and son play forever?
What does the closed sign at a brothel say?
Have you hear the onomatopoeia police's new siren?
Why was the mermaid embarrassed and crying in the classroom?
What happens when a plant is sad?
What do you call a Mexican guy who steps in dog shit?
What deadly disease can bowls contract?
Did you guys hear that you can survive just on plants?
Wheres my dog gone?
How do you know it's time to clean up your room?
why is the bank for international settlements located in swizerland?
How fast do lesbians have sex?
What does a deaf math nerd speak?
How many Northern Californians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Whats a mexicans favorite type basketball?
What fun drink can put your kid to sleep?
What do you call a mexican with a rubber toe?
What do you call a black mage?
What's the Difference Between Guts and Balls?
Where's the best place to have a waffle on the beach?
What do cows do for fun?
What's the difference between boogers and broccoli?
What do you give to a merperson in distress?
Why do people at Disneyland hate coke heads?
What did the french say to the Nazis when they invaded ?
What did the man say when he got his dancing robot to work?
Why did the mermaid wear SeaShells?
Where do terrorists go to have a drink?
Why did Eric Clapton make the switch from PC to Apple?
What did the police officer say to the white man running away with a TV?
Why can't a T-rex clap?
How are Jail and Olive Garden Similar?
Why does a Canadian with a stutter never run low on batteries?
What colour is eight?
What's the most stupid part about telling a rude joke on Reddit?
What is a hypocrite?
Why couldn't the Mexican work a wrench?
Why are the Soviets Russian?
What country is next to USA?
What do you call someone who reads in the sun?
How many SCPs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is a dog's favorite camp sport?
[OFFENSIVE] How do you circumcise a hillbilly?
What did the phone say to the other phone after a bad rejection?
What do people with huge penises eat for breakfast?
How's your day Dog ?
What's the difference between me and an egg?
Which Christian denomination knows the most about dinosaurs?
What do you call a horny dog in the kitchen?
What do you call a cock-muncher's favorite meal..?
Why can you only ran through a campground and not run?
What is the difference between ovaries and testicles?
How do you tell if someone is being a karma whore?
What do the Police and Pokémon have in common?
What do women and turds have in common?
What do you call 5 black people having sex?
Why did Blacula get kicked out of a Yale Halloween party?
How do you make a baby politician cry?
Whats the difference between a priest and acne??
If I have 3 cakes and I eat 2, what do I have?
What's the best part about having sex with twenty eight year olds?
How do farmers party?
Why did the man throw his clock out the window?
What's a Hater, Homophobe, Racist, Bigot, and Sexist?
What did the orphan say when the orphanage burned down?
Why was the Robot angry at the engineer?
Why don't you have to pay for the items on a will?
What is your best casino joke?
Where do you take a cheque?
What's the favorite color of horses?
Have you seen the Paralympic version of Lord of The Rings?
Do not adopt a snow leopard?
Why does hiring a ship illegally always cost $3.14?
What do you call a color-blind pop artist?
Did you hear about the African American girl who was quiet during the movie?
What's the difference between an onion and a prostitute?
Why did Jesus fall on the side of the road?
Do you guys know the story about the broken pencil?
What brand of pen does Lance Armstrong use?
What did SMG say to his son before he left for school?
Why didn't the tree like to play checkers?
Did you hear what happened in the Multi-Language Translation Race?
What were Charles Darwin's favorite fruits?
What's the difference between a joke and 3 dicks?
Why was the magnet seeing the Psychiatrist?
How do you request another Mormon wife?
What do you call a spanish child molester?
Why did 9 bust 1?
What does Santa Claus and Jared from Subway have in common?
Why does your son call you big brother?
What's a nature philosopher's favorite rap song?
Why Did The Black Guy Crossed The Road?
How do you take the letter "f" out of the word "way"?
How many Marines does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What made the triangle high?
Why did Adolf Hitler hate math class?
What kind of bees do female ghosts have to deal with?
How do you find Will Smith in winter?
How do you kill 20 flies?
Why can't the main character of Fallout 4 get a girlfriend?
What is Stewie Griffin's least favorite Fallout weapon?
Why do you never find elephants hiding in trees?
What kind of overalls does mario wear?
Why did Heisenberg remove the speedometer from his car?
Where's the best place to hide a body?
What did the yoga teacher say when someone asked if she wanted to leave the party early?
Did you know condoms have serial numbers?
What does a drug addict like to do in their free time?
Did you hear about the prostitute that got a vagina implanted on her hip?
How many IT people does it take to change a light bulb?
How many ants does it take to rent a house?
What was Hitler's favourite air vehicle?
If a stork makes white babies, and a crow makes black babies, what makes no babies?
What did the dyslexic person worship?
What flavor do termites like best?
What do you call Neil deGrasse Tyson pouring champagne all over his naked chest?
How do men and women fill the fuel tank differently?
[Racist Joke] What does a black men and the Terminator have in common?
How is a NASA Shuttle similar to Sex with Your Mother?
Why does Santa have such a beautiful garden?
How the hell did Caitlyn Jenner win women of the year?
Where's the best place to hide after a murder?
Why did the Italian get thrown out of the hotel?
What did the American vet did when he came to back from Vietnam?
What do you call a gay sailor who happens to have a cold?
What do you call a pessimistic black man?
Why was Hitler bad at math?
Why does nobody play poker in the jungle?
What’s the difference between chemistry and cooking?
Why was the homeless man unsuccessful at stand-up comedy?
Why did the vegan zombie visit the coma ward?
Why does Mexico never do well in the Olympics?
Why can't a Stormtrooper have a baby?
What's my best pickup line?
Why a baker?
Did you hear about the bombed hospital in Afghanistan?
Why did the gynecologist need glasses?
What is a pedophile's favorite part of a basketball game?
Why does the Easter Bunny hide his eggs?
What does a geography graduate do with a lightbulb?
Did you guys know that the entire Miami Dolphins team is missing?
What do you call a family that runs a gas station?
What do you call the Israeli PM when he switches search engines?
What do xenophobes do on Star Trek when the holidays come?
What did the Rei say to the Hachi?
What's the difference between a women's high school track team and African Pygmies?
What did the holy shit say to the priest?
What makes cows and horses so valuable?
Do you know what the best part of wearing a watch is?
Did you know it's impossible to piss your pants on purpose?
Q: What's the difference between bird flu and swine flu?
Why was the Egyptian boy confused?
What is "moving and walking straight"?
What happened after Hitler dyed his hair blonde?
What do you get when you mix human DNA and goat DNA?
Did you hear about the robbery at the bakery?
What's the best part about having sex with ninety-nine year olds?
Why does spider man so great with his stunts?
What do you call an attractive person in a wheel chair?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs in a pile of leaves?
Difference Between Thief ?
What do you call four Mexicans at the bottom of the ocean?
What did the dwarf say to the prostitute?
How many Americans does it take to change a bulb?
why was the chicken population so large?
Did you hear about the Mexican train bomber?
What did Mike Tyson say to the boy who gave him a bouquet at his final boxing match?
How do you know when the Moon is going broke?
What did the ventriloquist say to their friend?
How can you recognise a blind man among a crowd of nudists?
Did you know that human meat preserves really well?
What does Egyptian airport security have in common with Los Angeles airport security?
What's the difference between a blimp and a blow job every day?
What did one alcoholic say to the other alcoholic?
What do you call a brony in a wheelchair?
How many chans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's a mass in your body that is really helpful?
How does JokeExplainBot work?
What's the difference between a circus and a strip club?
Why was the mathematician stressed out?
Why do women talk non-stop?
You are in a room with nothing but a table and a mirror. How do you get out?
What did the poop said to the other poop?
How many post-minimalists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did Marx pay for dinner on the first date?
Have you heard of the newest study?
Who's a bitch?
What's the hardest part of rollerblading?
Ever hear the one about the deaf guy?
What do you call a cow with two legs?
Why is Jesus happy people hang pictures of him?
What was the hardest part of being happy in the 1920's?
What do you call a nun that is lost?
Where can you find a dog with no arms and no legs?
Why did the young boat dock before it was ready?
What's the first thing you know?
What do you call a cow with only legs on one side?
What three things does a woman need to do an oil change on her car?
Have you guys seen the Hitler biopic starring Mike Tyson?
What's better than roses on my piano?
Did you hear about the little boy in CA that saw Jesus?
Why are turtles so grumpy?
Know why polish airplanes only fill half of an airplane for each fligth?
Did you hear about the cooked turkey?
What is Justin Timberlake's favourite Ukrainian river?
Why is diabetes like a fumble recovery?
What do you call a group of thirsty Rabbi's with a tan?
Where do most Mustangs get into car accidents at?
What do you call getting high and having sex?
Why is it NASA has never sent a woman to the moon?
Where is Donald Trump gonna put all of the illegal immigrants once he arrests them?
What does an empty bottle of Champaign and an orphan have in common?
whats the most uncomfortable thing about a prostate exam?
What kind of shoes does Jack Lew wear?
What do you call a retarded camel?
A man walked into a bar and took a girl home. What drink did he have at home?
Why did the man tell his mom to get him out of prison?
Where do Amish people go to get medicine?
Why did the console cross the road?
What has a whole bunch of little balls and screws old ladies?
What's a ghost's favorite sexual act?
Why can't leopards hide?
Who would win a Race from New York to LA, two Homosexuals or two Lesbians?
How do dogs own cats?
Why couldn't the Chinese herpetologist see out his car window?
What did the penny say to the other penny?
What would a horny hen order at a bar?
What's the speed limit for sex?
How did harry potter get down the hill?
What do you call a teacher who's always late for school?
What happened to the ice cube?
What is it called when you eat Cinnamon Toast Crunch at noon?
What's the difference between a $1000 used car and a Rolls-Royce?
Where do Canadians play Basketball?
Can I ask you a question?
Did you hear about that car that runs on seafood?
Poison anyone...?
How do you know a cat is ready to leave?
Did you know sugar is the only word that begins with an 's' that makes a 'sh' sound?
Why do gay men always have candles near their asses?
Why did my wife cross the road?
Why is the son of Josip Tito and Adolph Hitler no fun at parties?
You know what really gets on my nerves?
Why did the skull win 1st place in the race?
Why is the white guy the scariest guy in prison?
Have you heard of the hard-working blind prostitute?
What happens when you combine Rick & Morty with a Solar Flare?
Why does Oedipus hate to swear?
What do you call a Russian with three testicles?
What kind of pizzas can tell the future?
Halloween joke (late): What do feminist ghosts keep fighting for?
What's the same about nail care and black people?
Why do dogs lick their dicks?
Is your pH 14?
What's the worst thing about being a gynecologist?
Did you hear about the brown paper bag cowboy?
Did you hear about the blind dog that never got lost?
Did you hear the Miami Heat's new theme song?
Whats the difference between Pink Floyd and Princess Diana?
Why did the Jewish parents get mad at the rabbi?
How many skin divers does it take to circumcise a whale?
How did the autistic boy survive his jump from a plane?
What's the difference between a saxophone and an onion?
Why are none talking in the ladies sauna?
What do you call a group of singing killer whales?
What do you call a math teacher in an anime?
What happens when you see two twin sister witches?
Why can't you trust an Adam?
What do books and sex have in common?
How long does it take to microwave a dead baby?
What is the difference between you and school tomorrow?
What do you call 2 medics?
What do you ask a Jamaican who's baking a cake?
What did the melon say to his daughter after she tried to get married?
Did you hear about the convicted grammar Nazi?
Why is North Korea horrible?
What do you call a black detective?
Did you hear about the Paragraph that went to jail?
What's Blue and not heavy?
What does a Korean need when they're taking their dog out?
What do you say to Aziz Ansari when you forget his birthday?
What's a wavelength's favorite animal?
What do you get when you cross a peach with a bunny?
What does Joaquin Phoenix say when a car almost hits him?
Why do engineers work out a lot?
What do you call saplings in the army?
Why'd the baker resort to prostitution?
Did you guys hear about that pastor who refused to perform a Full House themed lesbian wedding?
What does black spiderman say to spiderman ?
Why did Billy not care who he offended while posting on the internet?
Why shouldn't you beat up a retarded midget?
What is Vladimir Putin's favourite subject?
Why did the run on sentence think that it was pregnant?
What's red and smells like white paint?
How many Chinese people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is the most popular style in Moscow salons?
Why was the old Jewish woman afraid her chauffeur got her pregnant?
How many Mexicans does it take to pave a driveway?
A partnerswitch?
What did the redditor do to a post?
How is a woman like a condom?
What did the Game of Thrones character say when he saw the slutty door?
What does your mom and Pac-man have in common?
Have you ever heard of the lady who was accused of being the infamous Quilted Killer?
what to ketchup and a condom have in common?
Dang girl, are you a zombie?
What does a neckbeard call a disease or ailment?
Hey baby, have you got a time machine?
Why can't you feel photons?
Why shouldn't Hellen Keller drive?
What's the difference between a musician and a 14-inch pizza?
What does the Lego man do for fun?
Why aren't pigs invited to black tie events?
What did the statue say to the other statue?
How do you get Holy water?
What's another name for a dictator?
What's the difference between an Elephant and a post box?
Why is a marriage like a hurricane?
What do you call Judge Judy when she dresses like a vampire?
What does the dead comedian cook with?
Schrödinger, what have you done to our cat?
What did the swollen prostate say during the prostatectomy?
what do you call a gay dinosaur?
What is the first thing they teach you at Gardening school?
What is white and disturbs your lunch?
Why is it really hard to convince Egyptians?
What is worse?
why Palestinians have the fastest computers?
What do you call a wanker on a plane?
Did you hear about the constipated accountant?
What do you call meat on the back of a cow?
How do you make your wife scream after sex?
What happens when a bull and a horse go to a bar?
Why won't Americans switch to a dollar coin?
On Kashyyyk, Chewbacca's homeworld, would amateur junior-level warriors be called Rookie Wookies?
What do you call a sea Captain's hilarious fictional book about bellybuttons?
Where does the midget pizza chef with epilepsy work?
What do you call a joke about oral sex?
Did you hear what happened to Lot's wife?
Why do gangsters save so much money on clothes?
Where do sick boats go?
What did the druggie do when he got acid?
Did you guys hear about the kidnapping today?
Why are there so many fish in the sea?
Why was Hitler doomed to fail?
What shakes and sits at the bottom of the ocean?
Why didn't Abraham Lincoln go to jail?
Whats the difference between congress and parliament?
Hey girl whats your sine?
Are you alone?
What do you get when you're bitten by a mosquito wearing a fedora?
What's the difference between Gordon Ramsey and a run in the forest?
What's the difference between fog and mist?
Where do douchebags get their clothes?
What do you call a doctor who only swims with his t on?
What are Kierkegaard's two favourite fruits?
What do you call a fat Mexican?
Why did Verizon's mailman get fired?
What did the Mexican doctor tell the Lone Ranger?
Why do blondes have bruises around their belly buttons?
What's the bro-iest airport in the US?
The girl asks her father "what's the difference between theory and reality"?
Why did the Mexican push his wife off the building?
What does FIAT stand for?
What do you call someone who has sex for spaghetti?
What's the difference between a Lamborghini and a dead baby?
What do you call a former CIA agent when a winter storm hits?
What do astronauts do to host a party?
Did you know diarrhoea is hereditary?
What's dirtier then fingering your sister?
Who's your friend who likes to play?
What's the difference between /r/jokes and your mom?
Why don't they make bouncy houses for adults?
What's green, has 6 legs and if it fell from a tree it would kill you?
What do you call it when an alcoholic stops drinking?
Why do donut shops not hire security?
What do you say to a person at a funeral held at 10 A.M.?
What do you call an Asian driveby?
What is the favourite part of Halloween for a pedophile?
Why did the electric car finish the race early?
What's a pirate's favorite fast food restaurant?
What do you call a train that eats too much?
What does an orphan and a bottle of champagne have in common?
Why did the Chemist give up a singing career?
How do you know you're talking to a pilot?
What does Batman get in his drink?
What do mexicans drink in the morning?
Where is the best place to buy chicken broth?
Why cant a Gorilla get a job?
Why did the Kenyans win the marathon?
What email service do gay people use?
What's a Jawa's favorite salad dressing?
What do you get if you cross a Boxer and a Pug?
What did the gay guy say to Pinocchio?
Did you hear about the straight white male viscount who ruled with an iron fist over one field?
Why did the cowboy get a dachshund?
Who's the best grammar Nazi?
Why does government matter?
How do you know what kind of Jewish wedding you're at?
How do you call a singing PC?
My dad just text me, "I'm fleeing the cuntry." I'm like, "Wtf does that mean". His reply?
Have you heard the joke from the kid with short attention-span?
What do you call a black man that has three children?
Why does noone listen ever to the guy who talks with his mouth full?
Why was the piano teacher arrested?
Lame number joke: Why is 8 scared of 7?
What is a British Scholar's favorite store?
What do you call the sweat between two rednecks making love?
What falls first an apple or a black man?
Why can't ghosts have babies?
What kind of shoes do ninjas wear?
Why don't you go down on a girl first thing in the morning?
What do you give an injured alligator?
What's the best thing about an Ethiopian?
Why should you never take a swordfish out to dinner?
Did you hear about the man who lost his left arm and left leg?
Why are politicians different from prostitutes?
Which plant talks the most crap?
Why shouldn't ISIS be destroying ancient Mesopotamian buildings?
What is brown all around and looks good on a motorcyclist?
What's the useless skin around a vagina called?
Did you hear that some aquatic mammals escaped from the zoo?
What do you call Chinese jewelry?
What do you call a wolf that's aware of its surroundings?
Why was everyone mad after the annual animal race?
What do Italians eat on Halloween?
Who's Bill Cosby's favourite Disney princess?
What do you call a Canadian group of racists?
how was copper wire invented?
What's a skeleton's favorite dish?
Why do Mac users have such high electricity bills, but low gas bills?
So I asked my wife, were you faking it last night?
What is 90-60-90?
What do you call a teacher who's always late?
Why did the shark go to the doctors?
Why cant witches get pregnant?
Have you heard about the homeless assassin?
Which is heavier, a coin or a ship?
what if princess leia went to the dark side?
Have you heard about the new club with the gloryholes?
How can you spot a blind man in a nudist camp?
Damn girl, are you a pig?
What's your favorite genre of music?
What do you call a myth from the middle east?
What do you call two lonely bastards drinking together?
Why does a squirrel swim on its back?
What time is it?
What drink did the Karate Master order?
What did a cyberman say to John Smith?
What is Worse than Ants in your pants?
Heyy Ladies how are you dressing up for Halloween?
Why are so many ghosts alcoholics?
How can you tell when a bar is haunted?
Why did the chicken cross the basketball court?
What did Robin Williams say to the tortilla chip?
Why do old computers develop so many errors?
Is your birthday the 10th of October?
What is the difference between acne and a catholic priest?
Who led the Jews across a semi-permeable membrane?
Why was the ghost sad on Halloween?
Why do programmers celebrate Christmas on Halloween?
what is the most confusing day in the ghetto?
Why did the short vampire like to gamble?
Did you hear that actress got stabbed?
What did one kangaroo say to the other kangaroo?
why is rain the best kind of music?
What sort of activity is eagle hunting classified as these days?
What do you call a quadriplegic time traveler?
What did one plate say to the other plate?
What do you say to a woman with 2 black eyes?
What did the woman say to her husband after her mastectomy?
How many Irishmen does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why do Nuns always wear the same thing?
Q: How do Chinese people name their babies?
What noise does a Hebrew train make?
What's DJ Khalid's favorite number?
Why did the joke on /r/jokes get removed?
What do Hitler and Terry Fox have in common?
What's the difference between a pirate and a necrophiliac?
What do you get when you goose a ghost?
Why do we call rulers "Your Highness"?
How do you make a post man sad?
What will the sequel to Lake Placid that takes place 50 years later be called?
What do you call a quantum physicist's hair style?
What do Michael Jackson and McDonald's have in common?
What do you call a rotten potato?
What's the difference between a baby and a bag of cocaine?
How do you keep niggers from hanging in your backyard?
What do you call the place where lesbian Eskimos meet up?
Why do seagulls fly by the sea?
What's Karen Carpenter's Phone Number?
What is the best kind of weed?
When is a fairy NOT a fairy?
What do you get when you mix an octopus and a Mexican?
What does a dyslexic klan member hate?
What did the snail say when he jumped on the turtle's back?
How much does a Cockney pay for shampoo?
What did the former governor of California say after he helped the old lady cross the street?
Why do white people think they can say the N word?
What do you call a fat alcoholic?
My 3yo told me this joke Tuesday morning...What do Humu Humu fish say on Halloween?
What do Canadian women put behind their ears to attract men?
How attractive are skeletons?
Why did the computer programmer get stuck in the shower forever?
What do you call a German virgin?
A magnet walks into a bar...., what does he order?
Looking for Texas?
What do you call a fart in the middle of the night? What do you call a fart in the mourning?
What is something all Hispanic people write in college?
What do you say to your girlfriend with two black eyes?
What would be a Jew's fighting stance in mortal kombat?
Why couldn't the expert fisherman get any dates?
What was the fat asian rapper's name?
How did the Norse god of mischief celebrate his birthday?
What do you call cute seeds?
What is the worst way to ask for a cigarette in San Francisco?
Did you hear about the emotional wedding?
Bras come in sizes A, B, C, etc. So what's the biggest bra?
What happened when the 26th letter of the alphabet hit puberty?
What do you call an Ape cooking a BBQ?
Who let the dogs out?
Which Norse God consistently uses VPNs?
Did you hear the joke about the dead baby?
Did you see the 75th annual ninja parade in downtown Tokyo?
How do you call 4 blacks in a car falling off the cliff?
-Do you know what the girls say when the see a large penis?
what's alike about jeffrey dahmer and a taxidermist?
What do you call it when you study the Quran while eating a scoop of vanilla ice cream?
What's does a cannibal eat for breakfast?
How do birds kiss?
Why do Demons and Ghouls hang out together?
What's the first thing a Browser does?
What is a long distance love?
Ancient egyption Pickup lines?
Why Did The Vulcanologist Go To Jail?
Why do you need to carry radioactive materials in sealed, lead containers?
How do you tell X chromosomes from Y chromosomes?
Why did Steve hate being the youngest clone?
What does an asylum have in common with a squirrel's house?
Why do engineers mix up Halloween and Christmas?
Why is Jesus so bad at hockey?
Where does Muscle Milk come from?
If the Army has chaplains, what does the Navy have?
Why does Gru speak with an accent?
Has anyone here ever tried Ethiopian food?
What did one mushroom say to the other as he passed him on the street?
What did one nihilistic dolphin say to the other?
How do you ship 100 jews across the country?
What letter has to wait in line the longest?
Why don't black people stain white clothes when they pick them up?
How do you sell a chicken to someone who is hard of hearing?
What's the difference between Americans and Europeans?
What vegetable is a bug most afraid of?
What do root vegetables do at tha club?
How many Mormons does it take to drink a 12 pack of beer?
Did you hear the one about the guy who farted in the Hollow Log?
Why are elephants so poor?
What do Glenn Rhee, Jon Snow, and the Terminator have in common?
Why are jews afraid to eat pussy?
What's an Xbox fanboys' least favourite film?
Whats the leading cause of pedophilia?
What is the hardest part about being a pedophile?
Why couldn't the Dali Lama go out and play with his friends?
Why should you always invite more than one Baptist on a fishing trip?
What do you do when you see your neighbour staggering in the back yard?
Why was the poor comedian tubing on a communist river?
Why did Satan need life alert?
How many vegetarians does it take to eat a whole hotdog?
What is a Canadian's favorite board game?
Interviewer: just imagine you are on a 8th floor, it caught fire. How will you escape?
What do you call a dumb elephant?
Why do they never serve a beer at math party?
What made the orange stop suddenly?
What did the snowman do when he saw a snow blower go by?
Why did the cannibal stab the chef with a toothpick?
Why did James Bond higher a man with Parkinson's to be his butler?
What is iron-man's gender?
How is a meditating monk and a fiber-optic cable similar?
Have you ever traveled in time?
What do Ethiopians and Yoko Ono have in common?
What did the critic think of German food?
Why did the small Egyptian climb to the top of the pyramid?
What is white on top and black on the bottom?
What do you call a door with no legs?
What happens when the smog lifts in Los Angeles?
What do you call a traitor with a lisp?
What did the Métis people think of the look on Stephen Harper's face when he lost the election?
Which administrative ghost is responsible for auditing all of the incoming/outgoing hauntings?
How much is the price of sex in New Zealand?
How cute does one have to be to make sparks fly?
What does a French carpenter say when he runs out of nails?
You know who could really get a party started?
Why did the crab take the last slice of pizza?
How was the Red Sea formed?
What do you get when you cross a Jehovah's Witness with a Skinhead?
Why can't a Mac sing?
Why was the programmer's code incomprehensible?
what do use to lure really big fish?
What kind of music do balloons hate the most?
Whats the best part of living in Switzerland?
What do cigarettes and pussy have in common?
Why did the strawberry take the fig to the movies?
What do you call a collection of research and papers on a child molester?
What did the black man get for his son on christmas?
How did the cavemen in the far east protect them selves?
What do you call a mouse with no balls?
Why are the landmarks in Paris quarantined?
What do you call a drum that causes problems?
What did "Nock" say to "K"?
How does a sailor remove a condom?
What do you call a politician with premature ejaculation?
How do you get Akbar to shut up?
How spicy would you like your clairvoyants?
Why do Communists drink herbal tea?
What do you call a guy who's great at tying flies?
What does a owl say when it stumps it foot?
Ever hear the one about the Chinese Godfather?
What Were Franco's Secret Police Called?
What do you call bagels that can fly?
What do you call an unconscious foot?
What do you get when you remove the center board from a wood bridge?
Why is stephen harper a bad stripper?
What is a Minnesotan's favorite state to vacation in?
Do you fall for 'click bait'?
What did one sperm say to the other?
what is Bruce/Caitlyn Jenner's latest award?
Where was Matthew McConaughey headed in those Lincoln commercials?
What do you call a fat Asian?
What do you call an Indian Pornstar?
How does Batman's mom call him home for dinner?
How did the German dad scold his son for eating too much frozen dessert?
Did you hear about the iguana that couldn’t change colour?
What did the balding German frau exclaim when her husband left her?
What is Long, has two balls and you lift it ?
What is a hippies favourite type of cigarette?
What is the entity responsible of sending lions to space?
What's a sheep's favorite type of alcohol?
What did the father say to the pedophile at the beach?
What's the difference between a deaf person and my wife?
What do you call someone who slaps their siblings daughter?
What kind of doctor never leaves the hospital?
Why did the boy drop his Ice Cream?
What do you get a kid without arms for Christmas?
What does a dyslexic Christian worship?
Where do Shitposters hang out?
What do you call a talk on male anatomy?
What was the name of the Indian DJ?
What do you call a mentally handicapped lion?
What does an Asian chicken sound like?
There was 30 cows in a field and 20 8(ate) how many didn't?
How many physicists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the grinch cross the road?
Why is a physicist's dream vacation in Alaska?
What did Bobby Mcferrin say to his beer?
Why was the horse kicked out of the country western bar?
How many dead-heads does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the black guy get mad at the pirate?
What's the difference between a robber and a politician?
What do you call a armless, legless man in water?
What do you give Sean Connery when hes eating nachos in a bathtub?
Knock knock. - Who is there?
Why do hurricanes have women name?
How do you know tickle me Elmo is male?
Did you hear about the guy who chugged 8 cokes?
What do you get when you cross my brain with a cat?
What do the USA and a black hole have in common?
What do you call a fat rat?
How do you know your local police are South African?
What do your girlfriends personality and breasts have in common?
What do you call 16 white American people?
What do you get when you drop your frozen waffle at the beach?
What happens if you feed Link some Speed?
Why can't you have multi-story buildings in China?
How does Darth Vader like his milk?
What do you say to pasta that gets thrown out?
What do Kim Kardashian and Hurricane Sandy have in common?
Teacher: What is the difference between lightning and electricity?
Did it hurt when you fell from heaven?
How does a sloth hang itself?
How did the Ethiopian escape prison?
What do you call 10 Ethiopians tied together?
Why couldn't Mario ever watch Netflix with Peach?
Why was the Energizer Bunny tried in court?
What did Hillary Clinton say to the battered black woman?
Why do pessimists always think it's the weekend?
How do you impregnate a nun?
What do you call a super cool assassin?
Whats a rapists perfect date?
Why are sinks depressed?
Why do hurricanes always have female names?
Windows 7, windows 8, windows 10, Why did they skip 9?
What's the fastest way to ruin free pie?
What do you call a Social Justice Warrior in a society of strippers?
What is a recently divorced woman's favorite fruit?
What does the base-jumping gardener say?
How many Frenchmen does it take to defend Paris?
Hey girl, are you made of lead?
Hey girl, are you a group of integrable functions?
Did you hear about the popcorn that was demoted?
What do you call a wookie in concentration camp?
What does Mark Wahlberg eat for breakfast?
How do you get 50 Canadians out of a swimming pool?
Have you heard about the Dead Sea?
Why does skrillex suck at fishing?
Do I look like a fan to you?
What´s the difference between a baby and a 10g of cocaine?
How do you know humans can't reincarnate as insects?
What do you get when you cross Tumblr with anything?
Have you heard of the joke about the broken coinfactory?
Why is Santa's sack so big?
What do you call it when frankenstein's monster's wife gets her period?
You know how I can prove Jesus wasn't black?
Why is King Arthur seen as the Father of England?
Why did the pop star die of hypothermia?
Did you hear about the chameleon who couldn't change color?
Why did Taco Bell hire Eminem?
Why is Alabama the worlds biggest sandwich?
What does a Mexican do when their cake is insulted?
What happened to the Mexican after he took heroin for the third time?
What the difference between the titanic and climate change?
What's the best part about sleeping with twenty five year olds?
What were the French children doing in the pool?
What letter do pirates guess most often on Wheel of Fortune?
Want to piss off a female archeologist?
Why did the chickens cross the road?
Why did 20 blondes stand outside the bar?
What's the favourite toy of Turkish rulers?
What do scientists say when they meet each other?
Why do most men die before their wives?
What's the difference between erotic and kinky?
If Ebenezer Scrooge were a sheep, what kind of hat would he wear?
What do you call a transformer in a canoe?
What do you have left after you burn a French alphabet?
Where do the Japanese store defective mannequin feet?
Where would you park your camel?
What happened to when the coke bottle was ran over by the steam roller?
What do you call someone who is skilled with their mouth?
Why don't biology and physics get on?
How do you start a baby shower?
Did you hear about the guy who died to a bear?
Whats Your Favorite Color?
What do you call two ordinary ghosts?
What's Michael J Fox's favorite song?
You hear about the bodybuilder who got Alzheimer's?
Did you hear about the wimp at the seafood buffet?
What Do You Call A Person Who Hates Everyone?
What do you call a Muslim organization that rejects Muhammed?
Whats the longest running Canadian joke?
What's wrong with the phrase "War on Drugs"?
Who invented schools and teaching?
What did Pac-Man say when he almost got run over?
What's the best thing to do when your tinder date never shows?
Have you heard the joke about the Butter?
Have you heard that HPV had spread to birds?
What do you call an elephant/rhino mix?
What is the similarity of pizza and your parents?
What pizza chain does Michael J. Fox drive for?
What do you call a philosopher that kind of wants to play soccer?
How does a french alcoholic greet someone?
What happens when you eat too much seafood?
How do you make music by releasing fish?
What do termites put on their toast?
Why did the drill instructor squirt condiments on his trainees in the morning?
What's John Cena's favourite part of the sunset?
Do your Dads know your straight?
Why does a montonegran man keep a chair next to his bed?
What did Michael J. Fox's dad say when Michael J. Fox tried to parallel park?
What looks like grass but is red?
What's black and all over the place?
What do you call the space between Pamela Anderson's breasts?
Why were the German tomatoes drunk?
What does a polite Southerner call a golden shower?
What language do pigs speak?
How many potatos does it take to kill an Irishman?
Why did Nike release a vine of the "Back to the Future" Power Lace shoes??
Why do you need sauce with sausages?
How do you tell if your girlfriend's ticklish?
Why are most Hotwheel cars Ford?
What's Magneto's favorite type of music?
What do you call a pair of eyeglasses that questions its surroundings?
What is Jabba the Hutt's favorite snack?
Did you hear about the midget psychic on the run from the law?
Why did all the gay people in china go out to vote?
Q: How many buddhists does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you get when you put 50 lawyers in a room with 50 lesbians?
What's Piccolo's preferred type of car?
What is the difference between a robot and a sandwich?
Whats a Pirates favorite letter?
Did you download the new Jewber app?
Why does rain make people sad?
Do you know why the guy who picks up medical waste from the vet drives a car shaped like a dog bone?
How many Roman pirates does it take to change a light bulb?
What are those hats called?
What's the easiest part about eating Jews for dinner?
You know why fish are so smart?
What are mountain men famous for?
What is the most pirated movie ever?
How do you call a lesbian's pussy?
What's the difference between America and yoghurt?
What do you call an exceptionally smart Native American?
Why does a blonde woman close her eyes in front of the mirror?
Why don't north Koreans listen to funk?
Why do jews drive so fast?
What do you call an underwater masochist?
What side dishes did Jesus eat at the last supper?
Did you hear about the helicopter that crashed in the graveyard?
What was Forrest Gump's email password?
When in Canada, what is Bruce Lee's favorite vegetable?
What did the farmer say when he found dynamite in one of his cows?
What do you call it when two pedophiles get into a car accident?
How much of the First Nations vote did Stephen Harper get?
What is a duck's favorite drug?
What did one ox say to another ox?
What's the trick to satisfying your wife or girlfriend with only 3.5 inches?
Why is it OK to wash an American flag in hot water?
Who was the first mathematician?
Why can't Keanu Reeves eat his soup?
Know why everyone likes bananas?
Why do seagulls fly over the sea, not the bay?
What do you call a Knight that cuts beef?
Hey girl, are you my math homework?
Why did 2Pac go to the gym?
What's the one movie that Rick Astley won't let you borrow?
Who make great murderers?
Can anybody share something nice about Switzerland?
What is white and goes up?
Why does Waldo always wear stripes?
What happens when a feminist and a sociopath date?
What are renal doctors good at?
How to pass a very difficult exam?
How does a police officer go to the bathroom?
What did the pirate say when he saw a woman giving head?
How many tickles do you give an octopus?
Why should one masturbate while calling Comcast customer support?
What do a homeless woman and an American football player have in common?
How do you call mosquitoes where you live?
What was the first 3D printer?
What do you call a sad strawberry?
What do you call a fusion between Batman and Superman?
Damn girl, are you a 48-pack of frozen corn dogs?
How many tickles does it take to get an octopus to laugh?
What happened when the cheese factory exploded?
Damn girl are you a Scientology Church?
What did Mr. Freeze call himself when he joined Batman's fight against criminals?
Does anyone know how to get make-up off a dog?
Do you know what I hate most about Reddit?
Why did the Crip cross the road?
What do you call a Greek guy walking down the stairs?
What does modern horror films and the 2000 presidential election have in common?
Why did the skeleton go alone to prom?
What do you call a greedy roman god?
What's the difference between my ex and my toaster?
Hey US sports fans of reddit, did you know you can play fantasy sports for money online?
What's a zombies favorite exercise?
What's grey and can't fly?
Why does a flamingo stand on one leg?
Why did the chick cross the road?
Hey girl, do you like trucks?
What's the fastest thing in Bulgaria?
Q: Why can't a blonde dial 911?
What is the worst way for a donkey to die?
What was Will Smith's occupation before he was an actor?
Did you hear about the whale that went to the party?
What do rednecks do on halloween?
What do you call a black hitchhiker?
How many times should you check whether a sentence is written in English or Spanish?
What's the sound of a one-handed corpse clapping?
Did you hear about the bread store that burned down?
What type of bees make milk...?
What do you call the kids claiming "We don't need no education"?
Why do all Jewish guys have purple penises?
Why is Lamar Odom so much fun...?
How do Jedis close their programs on a Mac?
Why wouldn't Hannibal Lecter eat clowns?
How do depressed people lighten' up?
What do you say upon hearing a bad Halloween joke?
What does Michael J Fox do when his son parks in his space?
What happens after Amy Chua?
What does a vegan ghost eat?
What do you say to a Jewish New Zealander?
Where do the Mexican truckers hang out?
What did Nietzsche tell his editor when he finished writing Thus Spoke Zarathustra?
Hey girl, are you a fan?
Did you hear about the optometrist who fell into a lens grinder?
What do you call it when batman skips church?
How many angels can a pinhead dance on?
Why couldn't the radish finish the race?
What do you call a Tumblr user who identifies as a device which inflates a tire?
Why was Han solo so suspicious after sticking his dick in Princess Leia for the first time?
How do you get Holy Water?
What do you call a cylinder with a GED?
How do you surprise a blind man?
What was the title of the soundtrack to 'The Inconvenient Truth'?
What do you call an overweight homosexual?
What do you call the teacher who's late?
What do rednecks do for Halloween?
Did you know Bonnie Tyler has released a cardiology DVD?
What's black and screaming?
Why did the storm trooper decide to buy an iPhone?
What's Whitney Houstons favourite kind of co-ordination?
What do you call a tick on the moon?
How tall was Hitler?
How do you get a horse out of jail?
What do you call a punctual urban garden gnome?
What did the umpire say when Randy Johnson hit a bird with his pitch?
Why'd the short man take the elevator up?
So girl on a scale of 1 to America how free are you tonight?
Why don’t you ever see hippopotamus hiding in trees?
What do you call a sad tree?
Whats the best thing about duct tape?
What did the Mexican firefighter name his two sons?
What do you call a Mexican who can't find his vehicle?
Did Y'all Hear About the Cutlery Salesman Who Got in an Accident?
What do you call a man with no legs?
How many Ukrainians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why can't the train lady have a baby?
What do you get when you cross a dove and a serpent?
Is there a month between April and June?
Why were people angry wen the chiken crossed the rd?
Damn girl are you the meta?
How do we know Jesus was a man?
How come Jesus didnt play hockey?
What's black and white and red allover?
What kind of shoes do bears wear?
What did the dyslexic chemist do?
What do you use when you go fishing for nudes on the internet?
What was the slogan for the cross-dresser's party?
How do you get a one armed Canadian out of a tree?
Why did Hitler like his Adidas's?
What do you get when you cross the Queen and Prince Charles?
What's the difference between saying sorry and apologizing?
What picture does a cup get when it goes to prison?
What is the most commonly heard four-letter word in a whorehouse?
How do alien hunters keep from oversleeping?
What do you call someone who refuses to fart in public?
Did you hear about the curbs going on strike?
What does a Pirate say when he turns 80?
Why do astronauts bring their phone into space?
Did you hear about the two guys that stole a calendar?
What do you get when you put a flight stick in an egg?
Hey, bud. Who's Charles Foster Kane's favourite character in Titanic, bud?
Who do you call for the console police?
Why was the United Nations concerned when the waitress dropped the platter on Thanksgiving?
Why couldn't Jesus play marbles?
What pets think about their owners?
What's a cheetah's favorite food?
How many babies does it take to open a door?
Which hand did Henry VIII use to wipe his bottom with?
What do you call a gamer girl on her period?
Where does Eskimo-Senpai live?
What a common problem with r/jokes and FedEx?
What did the lonely ghost do at 2 in the morning?
What's a slave's favorite type of music?
Where does a knight go to get his armor?
What did San Andreas said to the Earthquake?
How is Ducktape like the Force?
Who's the most popular guy on a nude beach?
What's the difference between white socks and red socks?
Which joke has the maximum HOT Nuns in it?
What do you call a bra designed for neutrois?
What do you call 3 mexicans breaking into somewhere?
Did you hear about the Irish firing squad?
Why did the janitor file for a divorce?
Teacher - if my cup is half full, what does that mean?
Did you hear that the guys from "The Expendables" are doing a movie about classical composers?
Why is almond milk called almond milk?
Why don't cows smoke weed?
What is the opposite of a meme?
Did you hear about a vampire that joined the Nazi party?
How many Bill Cosbys does it take to change a light bulb?
Son, do we have any dop Ted?
Where did the zombie go on his night out?
If the women with big boobs work at hooters... where do the women with only one leg work?
how long does it take for a woman to reach orgasm?
How many cats can you fit in a smart car?
In what situation would you need Nancy to come out of the ground?
Why does the KKK hate bowling?
Why are the streets in Paris lined with trees?
What's the difference between a Mexican and a notebook?
What's your birth certificate?
What do you call a Jew that can fly?
How does our solar system organize a party?
How can a mouse kill an elephant?
Knock knock. Who's there? Budweiser. Budweiser who?
What do you call an Irish gay couple?
What do you call an elderly nun riding a scooter?
Do you know what a Pokemon is?
Why did Hitler like blind people?
Did you hear about the jurisprudence fetishist?
Why are white girls always tired?
Why are Michael J. Fox's milkshakes the best?
Why are softball games so hard to follow?
Are your parents bakers?
Did you know Canada was initially spelled Cnd?
What is a prostitute's favorite vegetable?
Have you heard the Eric Garner joke?
What is Lil' John's favorite exercise?
What do you call people who immigrate to Sweden?
Did you hear about the zombie that went vegan?
What's the name of a musical collaboration between Shia LaBeouf and a Judge?
What do you call a Scotsman with gas after a dodgy curry?
How will an IT guy fix a lamp?
What kind of meth do nerds like?
What's the difference between a Priest and Pimples?
Why couldn't OP make it as a standup comedian?
What's an Impressionist's favorite condiment?
How many transgender people does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a car tire and 365 blowjobs?
What does Bruce Lee drink when he's thirsty?
Why do engineering majors refer to themselves "engineers"?
Why Is there a little angel on top of the Christmas tree?
Did you hear they removed the essay portion from the SAT?
What's a young monkey's favorite time of the school day?
How many narcissists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a Mexican little person?
Did you hear about the birthday party thief?
What do you call a French boy wearing Sandals?
What's the difference between Lamar Odom and a hooker?
Why did the square breakup with the circle?
Why are divorces so expensive?
Do you know why Petyr's last name is Baelish?
What a few black wolves and a classic musician have in common?
What do you call a slutty UPS driver?
Why does Stevie Wonder smile all the time?
Why didn't the oyster have any friends?
What do you call an online correspondence with a transvestite?
When's sex not work?
What did the roach say after a series of disappointing hotel stays?
What is the difference between a feminist and a machist?
What do biographers and serial killers have in common?
Which vitamine are feminists missing?
What do you call two Korean lovers?
Did you hear about the first time Alexander The Great went to a brothel?
What runs, but never sprints?
What’s the difference between a Catholic priest and acne?
What does an Ethiopian eat for breakfast?
What is a cucumber and a dolphin doing in the same room?
You know what's funny about Asians?
Urban babushka, why can't I use GPS?
What did the dumb Electrical Apprentice say to the journeyman?
[moved] and [removed] were in a boat. [moved] fell out. Who was left?
Why was the little strawberry sad?
What does the bumper sticker say on Caitlyn Jenner's car?
How does a queen get around her kingdom?
What do you call a single man who doesn't masturbate?
What's the difference between Americans and ice cream?
If you had a donkey and it bit off my rooster's legs, what do you have?
Why did the Hydroxyl molecule blow up the US Mint?
What's a shrimp boat captain's favorite drink?
What do you call a sarcastic abyss?
How do you change the number of sides on a Pentagon?
What do you call books about orange juice?
What was the root of the problem dark ages?
What do you call it when a Dinosaur can't perform in bed?
Why does the dog lick his balls ?
What do you get when you cross Tom Cruise with nails?
What does a cell that's full of shit do?
You guys wanna hear a miscarriage joke?
How do you know that you are dating a french horn player?
What's a disulfide bond's favourite holy site?
Why did I break up with my vegan girlfriend?
What happens when a sweatshop gets busted?
What do you call a teacher that doesn't fart in public?
What are Mario's pants made of?
Why did the horse stumble?
How do you call a car enthusiast who's interested in bikes?
What does a suicidal man say to a suicidal girl?
What's it like being bipolar?
Why are frogs happy?
why do men like boobs?
Did to hear about the man with a cold who bought gold tissues?
What did one butt cheek say to the other butt cheek?
What is Link's favorite Final Fantasy character?
Why do pencils shave?
Did you hear about the dispensary that was selling suppositories?
What's the best benefit of working for ISIS?
How can you tell if a black girl is pregnant?
What did they give the guy who invented the doorknocker?
Hey girl, are you Karma?
What's grey, has four legs, howls at the moon, and eats cement?
What did Batman say to Robin before they got in the Batmobile?
How do scientists develop chewing gum flavors?
What do you call Mr. LaBeouf when he converts to Islam?
What do you call a Polish chicken stuck in a tree?
Why do girls wear so much make-up and perfume?
What happens when so-and-so step in the neutrino's urine?
How do you say "touchdown" in Polish?
Did you hear about the arms dealer who's giving away M18 Claymores with every purchase?
Girl, is your name Hoover?
What do you get when you combine a dill pickle and a doughnut?
What are your best corny jokes?
You know what's funny?
Why didn't Harry Potter want to date Hermione?
What did the cow is standing all alone in a field say?
How many Northern Californians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How old is Cam Brain?
Whats the most common day to get sick on?
What does a landmine field and my pet friendly apartment complex have in common?
Where's the best place to hide an elephant?
What is long, hard, and full of seamen?
What's the most prominent religion in Canada?
What do you get when you mix yoga and scouting?
How many Comcast customer service agents does it take to change a lightbulb?
Q: What do you cast a containment device out of element 28 in?
Why did the hillbillies save some doe?
What's the difference between a bass player and a large pizza?
Did u hear about the prostitute with no legs?
Why did the scarecrow receive a prize?
Whats the difference between a Hippo and a Zippo?
Why is hay so unreliable?
Why doesn't Gandalf dress as a pimp for Halloween?
Why did the hipster salmon not get to breed?
An invisible bomb was just invented, what do you call it?
What do you call a long bike ride with a bunch of cheap wine?
What's the best part about sleeping with a Cubs fan?
Why is Columbus a slang term for cocaine in Native American communities?
What do you call phrases that Jews often say?
what's the difference between acne and a Catholic priest?
What is Tom Selleck's public relations firm called?
Have you heard a dad joke about dad jokes?
How do you call an intelligent blonde?
Why did the black guy wear a tuxedo to his vasectomy?
Q: Why is it that programmers always confuse Halloween with Christmas?
What do call a Mexican midget?
What is worse, ignorance or indifference?
What's made of brass and sounds like Tom Jones?
Why are MMA fighters told not to blow their nose when in a fight?
What did the smoked salmon say after it realised it was no longer ill?
Why do people have sex when they go camping?
Why do feminists hate church music?
Does syria have any walmarts?
Q: You're sailing on a boat with a pack of cigarettes, but do not have a fire source, what do?
What do you do with 365 used condoms?
What do you say to Micheal Jackson when he is on the beach?
Why did Kermit the Frog never get with Ms Piggy?
Did you hear about Instagram, the weed delivery service?
What do you call a female meat cutter?
What happens when a lumberjack doesn't know which tree to cut next?
Why did a man bring a ladder to the party?
Why do babies love sticking things in their mouth?
What do you call a female barber?
Damn girl, are you a gibson?
What do you call a famous Internet pirate?
Why is Boromir such a hit at orgies?
you know why Santa sack is so big?
What do you call a Black Fisherman?
Damn girl, did you fall from heaven?
Damn girl, are you a Mediterranean fruit fly?
Why do cows wear bells?
Whats the only free food you will get from a Nigerian scammer?
Damn girl, are you misplaced silverware?
Why did the black man wear a tuxedo to his Vasectomy?
Damn girl, are you bubble wrap?
Why was the blond excited when she finished her puzzle after 6 months?
What's going to be thinner than the IPhone 8?
What did the Nazi with celiac disease say at the breakfast table?
What happens when Turkeys get the common cold?
Are you made of berillium, gold and titanium?
have you heard about the couple who confused the tube of K-Y Jelly with window putty?
Damn, girl! Are you Iocane Powder?
Want to Hulu and chill?
What's the name of the rockstar who invented mouth ulcer gel?
Damn girl, are you Deja Vu?
What's the difference between my guitar and my girlfriend?
Did you hear about the dyslexic musician who tried to do magic?
Do you believe in God?
Why do golf commentators speak softly?
Damn girl are you math?
damn girl, are you "damn girl" jokes?
What do you call a chihuahua with a rainbow colored fur?
Damn girl, are you damn girl?
Damn girl, are you some fresh coffee beans?
What kind of dog does Sauron have?
Damn girl, are you a gear?
Damn girl, are you a "Damn girl, are you a..." joke?
Damn girl are you a beaver?
Damn girl, are you a door?
Damn girl, are you Nutella?
Damn, girl are you a sketch on Saturday Night Live?
Damn girl, is your dad in jail?
Damn son are you a girl?
Why didn't the Siamese chicken cross the road?
What's a loli's favourite car?
What does a priest have in common with acne?
Damn team mate are you the ladbible?
What's an asian's favorite drug?
What did the singers say right before they had sex?
Damn girl, are you a huge piece of shit?
What do a chick and KFC have in common?
What do you call gay Dracula?
Did you hear about the drug that cures lesbianism?
What did the Jewish lady with Alzheimer's ask her husband?
Damn girl are you a Reddit trend?
Did it hurt when you fell?
What's a terrorists favorite sex toy?
What does a British midget get when he is told he is going to be crucified?
What's blue and gold and comes in brownies?
Damn girl, are you a ghost?
Why are there no bears in Antarctica?
What do you call a religious bird?
Excuse me ma'am could you tell me the date?
Why should you be quiet in a pharmacy?
Damn girl, are you Jamaican?
Damn girl, are you today's date?
Damn girl are you today's date?
Damn girl, are you from Syria?
Why did the football coach call his quarterback a hairdresser?
What kind of cake did Noah enjoy?
Why shouldn't you gamble in Africa?
Damn girl, are you the brownie I just dropped on the floor?
What happened when the man put in mypenis as a password?
Damn girl, did it hurt?
What did the toilet say to the pee?
Wanna Know SomeThing Funny?
What do ghosts dress up as for Halloween?
Damn girl are you deaf?
What do you call a running gag on crutches?
Damn, girl, are you a Black Hole?
What do you call a band of otters!?
Damn girl are you a pet rock?
Why did the snooker player go to the toilet?
Damn girl, do you have a phone in your back pocket?
What do Reeva Steenkamp and Leondardo DiCaprio have in common?
What does a mixture and a gay scientist have in common?
Damn, Girl, are you a rollercoaster?
Damn girl are you a Rubik's cube?
Damn girl, are you from Tennessee?
Why did the hen cross the road?
What do you call a coast ghost that's a guest at a celebrity ghost roast?
What does a black man get after sex?
Does anyone remember that show where Ron Howard was a kid with a paper route?
Did you fall out of heaven?
What is brown and rhymes with snoop?
Knock knock. Who's there? App App who?
Whats the difference between jelly and jam?
When do virgin guys get some ass ?
Why is a Mexican midget called 'a paragraph'?
What's a pedophile's favorite kind of shoe?
Hey girl, did you fall from heaven?
Why did the boxer bring a bar of soap into the ring?
Where does an octopus go to buy shoes?
What is a Muslims favorite type of vinegar?
How do you prove triangles congruent with attitude?
What is the difference between a priest and a pedophile?
If you throw a party how do you know Mrs. Elephant is in her period?
Why didn't the stick of butter confess his feelings?
If straight people use Tinder, what do Germans use?
Hey, are you the bottom of my laptop?
Why is a rat and a jew alike?
What's Hitler's favorite football team?
Did you hear about the Chinese couple who had an albino child?
What's the name of the hat Jewish people are always seen wearing?
What did Octavian say when he stormed Cleopatra's gardens?
What did the German brat say to his father?
What's the difference between domestic beer and domestic violence?
What does Salvador Dali eat for breakfast?
What do you call a black man walking down the street?
Did you know that the 16th presidency had the best records kept?
What's the wisest kind of modeling putty?
Why did the baker have dirty hands?
Why did Jesus quit playing hockey?
where did Marry go after the explosion?
Punchline request: What is the most mysterious cheese?
What did one eye say to the other?
What’s the slipperiest country?
What's the difference between priests and gay men?
What did the man say to the fly?
What's the worst name a transvestite could choose?
What do you get when you see Bill Cosby in double-vision?
What did the /r/science mod say to the user?
Having trouble making friends?
What do you call a Korean girl, who lost her virginity at a young age?
Are you an arson and a musician?
What Pablo Escobar And Other Narcos Fear Most?
Whats the derivative of Amazon?
Why doesn't Casper have any children?
What do you call an Asian person that is hit by a car?
Hey gurl are you an integral?
Why does Sunscreen break atomic rule?
What would ISIS be if George Bush was still president?
What did the homeowner say to the fruit growing gardener?
What's a stoners favorite marker?
What did the fisherman do when he really liked a woman?
What did Obama say to his depressed painter?
Do you think Kanye West will becom president?
What sound does a cow make?
What kind of computer can't sing?
What is amnesia?
Why is it called the cock?
What did the hands say to the flour?
Why did the cheese cry?
What do you call a Mexican stationed out at sea?
What cajun food did Donald Trump order at the barber shop?
Why did the artist throw his eraser away?
Why couldn't Pikachu read his book?
What does a Necrophiliac have when he is turned on?
What's an Asian's favorite time to go to the dentist?
What did the nihilist say to the physicist?
What is Mexico's national sport?
Why did the North Korean defect to South Korea?
Did you hear about the man who hit my ex?
Why doesn't ISIS appear in any Sci-Fi shows or movies?
What do you call vampires vagina?
What's a hipster's favorite kind of cigarette?
What do you call it when trash pandas pleasure each other orally?
How many handles do a black dude's coffin have?
Why did the blond get fired from the M&M factory?
What do you get when you cross a dairy farmer with someone who moulds and fires clay?
What do you call a cow if he enjoys burgers?
What's black and comes in little white cans?
How did the blonde break her leg from raking the leaves?
What kind of fish is made of two sodium atoms?
Did you know that the NY Jets are 0-2 against Pittsburgh in the NFL Playoffs?
Why couldn't the restaurant patron get into his car?
What killed Rick Moranis' movie career?
What's the difference between HP computers and HP in a video game?
How do you get a one armed man out of a tree?
Why can't you have Christmas dinner in the EU?
Why do people soil themselves when they die?
Why were people in the Medieval times so self absorbed?
What do you call a shity poet?
Q: Why did Ariel wear seashells?
Where does a one-legged woman work?
What happened when the vase revealed it was the father?
Who has one thumb and survived a band saw accident?
What do we want now!?
What service did Michael Jackson use to do his taxes?
What happens when you eat middle eastern food?
What kind of fish is made of only two sodium molecules?
Why was the sea snail sad?
Which animal is always down for sex?
Are you smart enough to avoid click bait?
How do you get a blonde on the roof?
How do you censor real life hentai?
How can you tell when Halloween is coming too soon?
What do you call a sad gay Brit?
How come Puerto Ricans don't like blow jobs?
How many Shia laBeouf's does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you describe every gf in one word?
How did the Santa Lawn Ornament feel the day after Christmas?
How do you piss off a feminist?
Did you hear about the man who was murdered in an elevator?
A black guy and a jewish guy jump off a building, who lands first?
What do you call two British men, searching for a donkey?
What do you call a kleptomaniac who doesn't understand figurative speech?
Are you a whore?
Why do Redditors get excited when a tornado rips down miles of fences?
What do you call a racist dog from Animal Crossing?
What's the best part about abortions?
What do Mormons say when they go to the strip club?
What do parsley and pussy hair have in common?
Why was the female turkey such a good fit for the Nazi party?
So did you hear about the brother and sister that got married?
How do you jump out of a fifteen-floors building without getting hurt?
[pick-up line] Boy: Did you give me any loan?
What did the conservatives say to the abortion rights supporters?
What is the best part of a Jonestown joke?
What are you doing tonight?
When asked to provide proof that he had cirrhosis, what did OP do?
How do you know the toothbrush was invented in Kentucky?
Do you want to hear a word I just made up?
What kind of shoes do paedophiles wear?
What do you call a muscular black man?
What do you get if you digitise a map of northern Europe?
How do ya get a fag to fuck a woman?
Hey man, you play guitar?
Why is it forbidden for ants to go in a church?
Why didn't the rest of the fractions like "mc" very much?
If you remove ET from the alphabet, how many letters are still there in the alphabet?
What cooks better than women?
Why didn't the patient sue the dentist for pulling the wrong tooth?
What do Mexican and Black people have in common?
How can you tell that microchips are made in the US and not the UK?
Why was Helen Keller a bad driver?
What was written on the UNIX user's doormat?
Why can't Arabs manage the scoreboards at ball games?
Why are outdoor workers so in fit?
Why can't there be some sort of mathematic formula for making friends?
Why was the garbage man arrested?
What do you get when your cat wins a prestigious beauty contest judged by sir-mix-alot?
Have you tried that new cocktail called Hurricane Sandy?
Why did the Skeleton cross the road?
Knock Knock...Who's There?.........9/11.....9/11 Who?
what's the difference between a loaded potato and a normal one?
What's the difference between a black man and a pizza?
What do you put in a box to make it lighter?
How much Squidwards does it take to fix a lightbulb?
What does a neckbeard tip his fedora to in soviet russia?
What has four legs and a cunt halfway up its back?
Did you hear about the Mexican that was shot on the golf course?
Why did Carrie Underwood run out of cheese?
If Olive oil is made from olives - baby oil made from what?
What's the fastest thing on land?
What's the most awkward aspect of bar-tending at an internet cafe?
What do you call the website Chewbacca started that gives out Empire secrets?
Why is it more expensive to use air pumps nowadays?
What's pink and slowly turns red?
What do you call a dog with no hind legs and balls of steel?
What is Jar Jar Binkss's favorite song?
What would you say to a rocket shaped infant?
What do you say when you see two cleaning ladies making out in public?
Why was Ed single?
What is an emo nerd's favourite brand?
What do you call a poo which still remains after flushing?
What's your most fucked up joke?
What is the difference between erotic and kinky?
What is black and smells like blue paint?
What does a Ferrari and poverty have in common?
What's the worst thing about having sex with 22 year olds???
Which is the longest toilet in the world?
What do you do when you hear a woman got hit by a car?
How many cockroaches does it take to change a light bulb?
Do you remember blowing bubbles when you were a child?
Why is it a bad idea for China to become a democracy?
What is the definition of masurbation?
What does it mean when a man is in your bed, gasping for air, and calling your name?
What's the hardest part about roller-skating?
How does a psychic cokehead tell the future?
What did the butter say to the jam?
Why are redneck murder victims so hard to identify?
Why couldn't the 5 year old go to the pirate movie?
What do you call a cannibal who only eats comatose people?
Where does a fish keep his life savings?
Why was the young mosquito up all night and stressed out?
How did they know Princess Diana had dandruff?
Why was the Rastafarian poor?
What's the difference between a tea bag and England?
What did Mick Jagger say when he walked in on Hugh Hefner in bed with Dennis Weaver?
What happens if you steal in Afghanistan?
Why do scuba divers fall backwards out of a boat?
Why did the pet owner get upset with his parrot?
What did the commander say when she realized that she had left Matt Damon on Mars?
Why can't Mexicans win the Olympics?
What's the difference between the English rugby team and a teabag?
Why are teenage girls so odd?
Today we gain an hour thanks to Day Light Savings Time. What are going to do with it?
What's the only acceptable filetype at The Xavier Institute for Higher Learning?
How did Moses feel after falling for a craigslist scam?
How do you tell the difference between an oral and a rectal thermometer?
What do you call a homosexual on roller skates?
What do you call a Palestinian women?
What kind of drink does a ghetto drinks?
Have you heard about the collapse of the boxer shorts industry?
What do you call a snail in the sea?
how is sex like math?
What does your body's government do to a fresh cut?
How much do flying broomsticks cost at Hogwarts?
What happens if Donald Trump pulls out of the election?
Q:Why doesn't ed have a girlfriend?
Where did the mobster go to college?
What do you call a horny fraps program?
Where was the male lion's favorite vacation spot?
What did Dave Grohl say when he accidentally dropped his sandwich?
Why are there no gay suicide bombers?
How many police does it take to change a lightbulb?
Q: What do you call a nun in a wheelchair?
How to tell if someone has Rhotacism?
What do you call a mexican midget?
Why did the husband bring his wife's sick dog to the salon?
What did the male robot say to the female robot?
Why can nobody understand sausages when they talk???
Why doesn't Justin Bieber shop at Sports Authority?
What do you call four Mexicans in quicksand?
What do you call an Arab who flies a plane?
What did the Grapefruit basketball coach say to the worst player on the team?
Who's your dad's cousin's cousin's daughter to you?
What is the favorite vacation place for people with CFS?
Who would you rather have mark your exam, Gandalf or Dumbledore?
Whats The Devils Favorite Style Of Football?
Why are double amputees always wrong?
What do you call a late teacher?
Did you see the story about the psychic dwarf escaping prison?
What's the difference between a teabag and the English rugby team?
Did you hear the one about Sandusky at the beach?
Why do only 2 Mexicans pass the border at once?
What did the tumblr user do when she got arthritis?
What's good on pizza but not on pussy?
What is the difference between a white guy and an asian?
What do you get if you cross Islam with Christianity?
Why did sodium stay home all day?
What does a fresh egg say when you try to hardboil it?
Why does James Bond like Michael J Fox?
Why was the fruit farmer losing money?
What`s the difference between a Doctors Without Borders hospital and ISIS?
What is worse than being kidnapped by the Talibans?
What is the difference between snowmen and snowwomen?
Why did the Frog cross the road?
Whats the difference between a coal mining company and the Catholic Church?
If we become engaged will you give me a ring?
How Many Feminist does it take to Screw SRSer ?
What do Muslim men do during foreplay?
How do you know when a woman is about to say something smart?
Why do people throw coins into foutains?
How does Planned Parenthood paint their walls?
What do you call a doctor who is always available?
What's the us army tanksman's favorite song?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Disney Movies?
Want to hear a funny abortion joke?
What do you call a group of militant feminists?
Did you hear the one about the genius Redditor?
What do they say about building an erotic statue?
What do you call a Mexican woman with no legs?
How do you circumcised a whale?
Whats the difference between a terrorist camp and a high school?
What's the difference between a peeping Tom and a pickpocket?
What do you get with legalized prostitution and a highly competitive marketplace?
How do generals show their gratitude to their troops?
NSF(Life) Why was the strawberry crying?
What is Jeb Bush's campaign slogan?
What comes before OP?
Why did the bear start playing music when the priest tried to absolve him of his sins?
What's the difference between a cow and The Bible?
Now why do sumo wrestlers shave their armpits?
What's a horny pirate's worst nightmare?
What is green, red and goes 90 miles per hour?
Why did they ban Liquid Paper, White-Out, and all other correction fluids in Poland?
What's the difference between a feminist and a vacuum cleaner?
What did the bird owning whore tell her waiting clients?
Did you hear about thw new holy water based personal lubricant?
Did you hear about Oscar Pistorius' home improvements?
What do you call a cranberry cross guard?
Why do sumo wrestlers shave their balls?
How many cow-lories does a cheeseburger have?
Did you know George III never even bothered to leave his couch during the American Revolution?
Do you know what smells funny?
Which sex position produces the ugliest children?
How was the Roman Empire cut in half?
What was Eve charged with after murdering Adam in the Garden?
A clever joke?
Is it wrong to watch porn alongside a Disney inspirational video?
What do you do if an epileptic has a seizure in your bath?
Whats worse, being a vegan inmate or non vegan?
Why did the comedian go to doctor?
Did you hear about the couple who stole a calendar?
Do know who the ultimate CrossFitter was?
A punchline my Japanese girlfriend came up with: What's black, white, and red all over?
What's a Chinese fisherman's least favorite part of living in Hollywood?
What do you get when a vampire eats a dachshund?
How much does the average gay man ejaculate?
Why didn't the penguin close on his mortgage?
Have you ever played the Oscar Pistorius drinking game?
What do you do if you're Fighting a group of circus performers?
What's blue and doesn't fit?
What do you get when you wreck a Honda Accord into a Saturn Ion?
How do you stop a dog humping your leg?
What does a ghost say after a bad joke?
Why did Mother Nature trip the last day of summer?
Did you hear about the new iPhone?
What's Mohammed, Moses and Noah's favourite dessert?
What do you call two marry-go-rounds having sex?
Why did the californian celebrate his birthday a day earlier?
What's the difference between a secret Taliban hideout and an Afghan public school?
How was the bear able to move in order to get honey?
Ever had sex while camping?
What do you call an Austrian woman's undergarments?
What do a burnt pizza and a pregnant woman have in common?
Why did the privileged white guy fail his algebra test?
What's red, white, and full of holes?
Did you know the right Woman can make you a Millionaire?
Did you hear about the guy who traded his car or a phone?
How do you hide money from a Republican?
What happened when Rick fell down a hill?
Did you hear Ellen DeGeneres drowned?
What do you call a heard of masturbating cows?
What smell foot, pussy and ass in the same time ?
What do you say to someone who studied media at university?
A hurricane is going to hit the east coast?
Where does the Joker keep a record of his favourite shrubland areas?
What do you get if you cross goat DNA with human DNA?
How did the Welshman find the sheep in the tall grass?
What video game would Adolf Hitler play?
What does Iraq and Bristol Palin have in common?
Did you know that an airplane's propeller is only a big fan and is there to keep the pilot cool?
How many germans does it take to change a lightbulp?
What do you call it when people line up well?
What did the scientist say when he created something super BASIC?
What's the tallest building in the world?
What did the counselor say to the hologram?
What Nationality was Otzi the Caveman?
What did one poop say to the other poop?
Why did Comic Sans's girlfriend leave him?
What do you call a book case hogging all the books?
What's the best feature of Apple Pencil?
What is the most popular soda in candy land?
What did Nietzsche call his Yiddish cab driver?
What does a zen ghost say?
What will Kim Jong-Un name his child?
Whats the best part about dating a black girl?
Why was the little ant confused?
What is the ultimate pleasure?
Which state is actually a tiny soft drink?
Why do Republicans make good DJs?
What's the number 1 cause of Child molesters?
What did the pope say to Aretha Franklin?
Why does George Bush not know how to read?
What car do dogs drive?
What do you call a vegetarian prostitute?
Whats black and sits at the top of the stairs?
What do you call an old John Cena?
What was Sisyphus's favourite type of music?
Why are the dinosaurs extinct?
What do you call a calm Asian?
What's the difference between an Anorexic girl and an escalator?
Why did the inventor of panadol think I had no parents?
Does a farmer eat female sheep?
What is the best pickup line a robot can say to another robot?
When is a mountain goat not a mountain goat?
Why does Voldemort always sit in the nosebleed section at events?
What did Serena say to Venus before they faced off in the US Open?
What smells worse than an anchovy?
Why are teenage girls so much better at English than boys?
What do you call a cow with only two legs?
Why don't boxers have sex before a fight?
Remember when?
What do you call a cow with a nervous twitch?
How many Trumps?
What do diapers and politicians have in common?
What do you call a cow with no nipples?
Why doesn't Jesus Play Hockey???
What's better than winning a gold medal at the special Olympics?
Why shouldn't you kiss someone on January 1st?
Why do sorority girls travel in odds?
If you went camping and woke up with a condom in your butt, would you tell anyone?
What be a pirate's favorite letter?
What do you guys think of this quote I came up with?
What's the difference between congress and a circus?
What is the difference between a Snowman and a Snow-woman?
What's the secret ingredient in Bush's Baked Beams?
What's the difference between an owl and a bungee cord?
What do you call a programming language designed for women?
How do you know Moby Dick was a gay whale?
Why is a raven like a writing desk?
What's the difference between a bird and a fly?
You know what a fat woman and a brick have in common?
How do you say dinner in spanish?
What is Al Qaeda's Favorite Football Team?
Why is religion like mobile gaming?
What is Shulk from Xenoblade's favorite thing to type?
A landscaper's favourite musical genre?
What is a neckbeard's favorite language?
What's big, black, and hard?
What's the difference between a refugee and a terrorist?
Whats the difference from a terrorist and a psychopath?
What's the difference between a regular horse and a police horse?
What's worse than a truck filled with dead babies?
How does the moon get a haircut?
Why did the sick bird come in jail?
Why are girls so odd?
What do blondes and spaghetti have in common?
What do you call an inspiring jerk session?
Why was the Moon in a bad mood?
What do you call 100 drowning vegans?
Did you hear bout the new iphone with professional camera?
What is small, bald and wrinkled?
What Journey song to Chinese people sing at funerals?
How to make your ears pop?
Why did everyone wanted to hang out with the mushroom?
What did the number 0 say to the number 8?
Which singer would be best suited for the roman military?
Heard about the news the acientist allover the world have been talking about?
What do tofu and a dildo have in common?
Have you ever seen Stevie Wonder's house?
What do you call a friendly Chinese man who gives out free firewood?
What was Bruce lee's favorite drink?
What does an elephant and a carton of milk have in common?
Why are you so gay?
Did anyone see the lunar eclipse tonight?
Me: How are you feeling Grandpa?
What does a Fire cracker and a duck have in common?
What is the difference between a golfer and skydiver?
How is Harry Potter and Kermit the Frog's penis similar?
Why wasn't Sarah Jessica Parker cast in "Seabiscuit"?
What do Hillbillies do for Halloween?
What happened when the mathematician put seaweed on her boobs?
Why doesn't the guy with OCD ever get laid?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, an unwilling agnostic and a dyslexic?
why do they put gates around a graveyard?
How many redditors does it take to answer an /r/AskScience question?
Did you hear what happened to the blind circumcision doctor?
Why do sheep love Star Wars Episode V?
What's the difference between a cranky two-year-old and a duckling?
Why can't siamese twins be trusted to render fair judgments?
What do you get when you have sex on the beach?
Why did the Chicken cross the road?
What do you call a rhetorical fish?
What is Facebook?
How do you make your wife a dildo?
What does the sun and cleavage have in common?
What's it called when a terrorist's wife cheats with an American?
What's the difference between Jelly and Jam????
What do lonely terrorists have sex with?
How do Muslim women get wrinkles off their faces?
What’s the similarity between Income Tax and a Caller Tune?
What if Forrest Gump's e-mail password?
The priest says to the alter boy, What's the difference between a penis and a banana?
What is the square root of 69?
Why did the philanthropist learn how to subtract?
How did Darth Vader know what Luke was getting for Christmas?
What is Red and Smells like Blue Paint?
What's the difference between Dubai and Abu Dhabi?
How do you tell a dyslectic to take the left turn on the road?
What do you call two homeless people hitting each other with cardboard?
What is the sexiest type of dolphin?
Eskimo: If I did not know about God and sin, would I go to hell?
Why was the necrophiliac depressed?
What do you call the useless skin around a vagina?
How many black people does it take to start a riot?
How does a carpenter effectively build stairs?
What do you call a Syrian refugee on the Mediterranean?
What's it called when your Uber is filled with potatoes?
What's A Sign of Maturity? ( Conversation at Gas Station)?
Did ypu know premature ejaculations are hereditary?
What is a racist's favorite seafood dish?
Why Did the Native Americans Car Break Down?
Do you know why George Washington 's father forgive him?
Who does a Jedi call when he forgets his keys?
Where does Wonder Woman buy all her stuff?
Why didn't the monk's clothes fit properly?
Did you hear about the dyslexic atheist?
What does a Satanist take when their allergies to Christians act up?
What do you call someone who gets high fast?
What is the difference between a Jew and a pizza?
How can you tell if a hippy came to your house?
Have you seen that new film about a tractor?
How do you swat one hundred flies at the same time?
Hey baby, are you a whale?
Why shouldn't you play American football with feminists?
What is a mushrooms favorite type of music?
Whats the difference between a hippy chick and a washing machine?
What's the difference between a jew and a Canoe?
What kills thousands of smokers a year?
What did the Taliban soldier say to his buddy?
Q. What are 2 girl chickens that fall in love?
Why do they call a "pap-smear" a "pap-smear"?
Why should Mexico accept Syrian refugees?
Why did the gay pride movement use the rainbow as a symbol?
Did you see Matt Damon's character in Invictus?
Did you hear about those 3 guys who stole a Calender?
Why did the leper fail his driving test?
Why don't black pitchers throw three strikeout in a row?
What TV personality lives in your phone?
What's the difference between a cockroach and the Japanese?
What type of overalls does Mario wear?
My attempt at a joke?
What do you call two hobos having sex on a freight train?
What happened to the embarrassed bungalow on the street of two story houses?
DAE accidentally call the wrong replacement when you can't teach your classroom that day?
How do you Organize a Space Party?
What's the difference between a feminist and a knife?
What would Inception: The Porno be called?
What does a mathematician do when they have constipation....?
How's a fart and a teenager alike?
How many Steam employees does it take to change a light bulb?
How's a Volvo just like a woman?
What do you call a stubborn Egyptian?
What is Nux's favorite browser?
Have you heard of the beer Jesus made?
There are so many old jokes on this subreddit... Want to hear a new one?
What do gays and Donald Trump have in common?
Did you hear about the bureaucrat who was a Platonist?
ignorance or apathy?
What happens when you throw a hand grenade into a kitchen?
How do you compliment a pickle rapper's verse?
What do you call a cowboy with erectile dysfunction?
What would you get if Geddy Lee, Neil Peart and Alex Lifeson all died in a plane crash?
What's the greatest gift you could give to a trashcan?
What's the difference between hanging with friends and jacking it on the toilet?
Why did they go from Windows 8 straight to Windows 10?
How do you tell if a girl is ticklish?
Little on the nose that the Pope's riding around in a Fiat, isn't it?
Why did the fetus kill his twin?
What do you call tea made by a stoned marsupial?
How do crabs travel cheaply?
How does the Pope get around New York City?
What did the diabetic's girlfriend call him as pet name?
Why did the pirate go to Ireland?
What do you call 2 Nuns & a Cheerleader?
What are eukaryotes' least favorite subject in school?
How many amateur masochists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a dead skunk?
Want to hear a joke about Subway?
What's the best side to eat from a chicken?
Q: How do you know if a chef is a clown?
How many electrons does a negatively charged oxygen atom have?
Do you know what moth balls smell like?
what do you call a lesbian in a ford windstar filled with penises?
Whats the difference between an in-law and an outlaw?
What's a pirate's worst nightmare?
What do you get when you take an HIV medication and raise the price 5,000%?
You know what the best thing about Alzheimer's is?
What type of carpet do you put in an igloo?
Why did the crew abandon the chili pepper boat?
What do you call a deaf quadriplegic?
Did you hear about the chameleon that couldn't change color?
What's the difference between having sex while skydiving and a smelly vagina?
Why is Chapstick so popular?
Why did Gandhi lose the race?
What's in Heaven and Hell?
What do you get if you cross a gardener with a banker?
Why did Elvis' mom get mad when people called him "Elvis the pelvis"?
What do you call a pigeon with 4 feet?
Why is the last chapter in a chemistry textbook about benzene?
Why did Snake walk into the bar?
why did the little shoe cry?
What did the miner say when he struck gold?
How does Donald Trump plan to get rid of illegal Mexican fans of Stars Wars?
What did the gay Zombie crave?
What's the difference between a BMW and a cactus?
Why did the scare crow get a raise?
What do you call an angry gay guy?
What do you call a trombone player who just broke up with his girlfriend?
Why are lesbians statistically more poor than the average person?
What's the only thing worse than finding a roach in your food?
How can you tell which nurse is the head nurse?
What did the suicide bomber from the Rebel Alliance say before detonating?
What do you call a band that comes out with a new song 12 times a year?
What's a sluts favourite drink?
Why don't girls in San Francisco wear skirts?
How do you greet a racist murderer?
What do you call an airline run by nazis?
What is 18 inches long and hangs in front of an asshole?
What's the difference between iFunny features and the gif subreddit?
What do you get when you blow up a police station?
What's the difference between a cloths hanger and a flight of stairs?
Why is it that arms tell the funniest jokes?
How do you make a strawberry shake?
Did you see the new joke posted on reddit?
What do you call a slutty egg?
What did Obama say when he proposed to Michelle?
What Did Kid Davis Say To The Lesbian Melons?
Why was the Narwhal kicked off the volleyball team?
What is zero in Roman numerals?
What did the square say to the root?
How do you find the Pun Bar?
how much onion does dad use in his bolognese?
How do you make a Sea Lion?
What did the pirate say?
Why is all the racism in America downstairs?
What's an otakus favourite dessert?
Did you hear the iPhone 6S Plus is selling really well?
What kind of tea is sometimes hard to swallow ?
Why did Misty want to sleep with Brock?
What do you get when you squeeze a Synagogue?
how to know if a thin girl is anorexic?
Ever heard a band called 1023 Megabytes?
Why is toilet paper no good for wrapping presents?
What do you call a girl gamer that always pirates her games??
How did the gay wizard dissappear?
What do you call crystal clear urine?
Did you hear about Taco Bell's new sauce?
Why are life long overweight people funny?
When is it time for bed at the Neverland Ranch?
What's the difference between reddit and a fish?
Why can't Stevie Wonder see his friends?
Why did the gum cross the road?
What movie title best fits The Flash's sex life?
What do you call the sequel to Straight Outta Compton about Dr Dre and Snoop Dogg?
What do your sister and snow have in common?
What does a dentist do in his free time?
Why DID David Cameron fuck a dead pig, anyway?
What do you get when you mix free running with golf?
Why does wally wear stripes?
Did you know that Dublin, CA has the fastest growing population of all time?
What's the opposite of the word uncle-off-her?
What do vegetarian zombies eat?
Wanna hear a Bill Cosby joke?
Can Neon form a chemical bond with Indium?
What do you call a werewolf who has taken an interest in social justice?
What is the difference between snow men and snow women?
How is Donald Trump like a VW Bug?
Why did the clock get banned from the library?
What's worse than being struck by a lightning?
What's Hitler's least favorite planet?
Why were all Roman buildings made of stone?
What's David Cameron's favourite Shakespeare play?
What's the difference between a watermelon and a baby?
What is a joke that only makes sense in your own regional dialect/accent?
Why don't mathematicians build bridges?
What do you get when you cross a bear and a spider?
What does the pedophile feel when raping 2 month old baby?
Why don't bears wear socks?
What is the difference between a dentist and a New York baseball fan?
Have you heard Schrödinger's joke?
What do you feel when you accidentally run over and kill a group of geese crossing the road?
What do you call a popular joke on reddit?
What beats a binos dagger?
[Request] What's your favorite adult-themed Halloween joke?
When will Cameron stop fucking with the system?
How do you make a Welsh person comfortable while playing Scrabble?
Did you see that crazy news story on the internet?
What are Asian Tennis Players most well known for?
Hey Spongebob, what's funnier than 24?
How do you blow square balloons?
What is the friend zone?
How to 4-dimensional aliens get around?
How do you know when you've been eating good pussy?
Why did the fire fighter call off work to spend time with his friend?
Did you know Jesus has nice abs?
What's the first thing a woman does after leaving spousal abuse therapy?
Why are yachts and ships so scary?
What kind of medicine do you give a kid having a fit?
Why did the "upright man", a humanoid species, went extinct 70.000 years ago?
What kind of water do you put into a waterbed?
How do we know Floyd Mayweather isn't a bomb?
What do you call a Mexican Standoff between two people?
Why did Ahmed Mohamed get delayed at the airport?
What did the Mexican firefighter name his twin sons?
Wanna hear something gross about USA?
What did the Australian Chess player say to the waiter?
What did the perverted scientist say to his colleague?
How many blondes does it take to make a great joke?
What's a pirate's favorite letter of the alphabet?
Why was the Texan afraid of the clock?
What does Neil Degrasse Tyson say to pickup a lady?
What do a zero-legged spider and a one-legged bear have in common?
How much does a Qur'an weigh?
How many black people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is it called when you kill a chickpea?
If I hold one moth ball in my right hand and another moth ball in my left, what do I have?
Who is the only one that has smoked as much weed as Wiz Khalifa?
If you had a 14 inch penis growing out of your forehead how much of it could you see?
What did the ear of corn say when all of its clothes fell off?
What do defensive linemen and porn stars have in common?
Why do bears' mouths water whenever they look at Trump?
Which hotel does Link use when he goes on vacation?
How did the ancient Greeks seperate the men from the boys?
What are pigskins used for?
What do Afghan stoners smoke?
What goes great with Alphabet Soup?
Why did Microsoft go straight to Windows 10 and skip 9?
How Many Wal-Mart Workers Does it Take to Screw In a Lightbulb?
What do you call a pie who made his own ears?
What is Guns N' Roses' favorite type of sandwich?
How does the redneck's wife know that her daughter is pregnant?
How do you keep a black kid from jumping on the bed?
What do amputee bears and regular bears have in common?
How do you help a paraplegic kill themselves?
What did the beef broth say to the chicken broth?
What do you call a sometimes homosexual arctic bear with heavy mood swings?
What do you call someone with a large head?
How'd Florida man break his leg raking leaves?
Why do gay men float?
What do you call a dolphin that is out of the water?
How can you make your wife scream for an hour after sex?
What does a Playboy Magazine and a Model T Ford have in common?
Did you hear about the guy that ran into a window?
Why should you never bring a fat person to see a dramatic movie?
How do you starve an black man?
Why can't Americans play chess ?
How does a blonde set the time on her alarm clock?
What's the difference between your mother and a crackwhore who charges 3 dollars for a blowjob?
what did one mexican mouse say to the other mexican mouse?
What is the difference between my ex-girlfriend and a beer?
How do you make a dead baby float ?
What do you call attempting to jump to light speed before checking the Hyper Drive first?
Why do Palestinians have faster computers than Israelis?
What do you call an unborn child that is excessively ready to accept failure?
Son: Dad, how do stars die?
What do two people kissing and a toll bridge have in common?
Ever heard of the undertaker who accidentally dug another body?
1. Religion. 2. ?
What part of the Vatican is made entirely out of amino acids?
Why is it called PMS?
What do you call a group of white people?
What do you call a feminist that eats really, really fat cows?
Why can't you hear the pterodactyl going to the bathroom?
How did the Roman cut his hair?
Why are all smart Mexicans guys gay?
What do you get when you breed an elephant with a rhino?
Why didn't the Turkey cross the road?
What does a man with a foot long cock eat for breakfast?
What do you call a chinese duo that plays ping pong?
What do a ghost family and the Kardashians have in common?
Whats the difference between a woman president and pizza?
Why can't the plane fly?
Old joke for Halloween. Why do witches not wear panties?
How do you summon a wizard taxi?
What do you call a dog with a 7 inch boner?
Why did Christopher Reeve lose the debate?
What would BuckWheat from Little Rascals be called if he were a Muslim?
Why did the Chinese man tell a joke?
How did Magic Johnson get Aids?
What do you get if you don't pay your exorcist?
What number is the oddest prime number?
What do Mexicans use to cut their pizza?
Why was Biggie hungry at school?
What does your mom and a 4-stroke engine have in common?
What has four legs and quacks?
What's your emergency?
What did the Ohioan Satanist say when he arrived to cult?
Why can't Z generationers swim?
What is Saturn's favorite movie?
What time is it when a Muslim immigrant brings a clock to school in Texas?
Why did the boy think you hit menopause when you graduated high school?
What do you get if you walk under a cow?
If your dad wrote the Bible, who would he have building the ark?
You know why it's called PMS?
Did you hear about the kid who brought a home made watch to school?
What did the police do to the sweater?
What's the difference between Donald Trump and an oompa loompa?
What's Terrance Howard's favorite Radiohead song?
What do lesbians like best about sex?
Let me tell you a Statistics Joke. What is a Car in the U.S.?
How many moths does it take to screw in a light bulb?
You know what channel The Republican debate is on?
Can anyone help me with starting a rocket science club at school?
What did the terrorist say as he walked into a classroom with a clock strapped to his chest?
What do you call a communist pirate?
What does Donald Trump order at a Mexican restaurant?
Hey Dad, did you hear about the construction workers?
Why did Ahmed take his clock to school?
Did you guys hear about the kid getting arrested for bringing a clock to school?
Why did the mathematician ignore the tan lady on the beach?
Did you hear about the injured condiment?
What did the daddy salt say to his son?
What is a computer scammer's favorite band?
Why did the stutterer get shot in the ghetto?
Where's a good place to get Italian food in the middle east?
What do you call a dwarf without a mouth?
What did the leper say to his mistress after a round of unfulfilled sex?
What's the most popular website in Illinois?
What'd the homeless guy get for Christmas?
Have you heard about the old wheel that got a new image?
Still waiting for the FedEx joke?
Who's the best detective in Mexico?
Grandmothers are not always right?
How can you tell when your sister is on her period?
What's the difference between autumn and fall?
What is the cheapest way to get a slut?
What sounds like a frog but keeps me up all night?
What's the difference between apathy and ignorance?
why did the man cross the road?
What is the best joke you have heard?
What does a bad salesman and a toilet have in common?
How was the bird able to pass his math test?
What do you call a funny jar of mayonnaise?
Why couldn't the gay guy cross the road?
Why the rabbits love Selena Gomez?
What did the policeman say when the Arabic man escaped from jail?
Did you hear about the new cologne Chris Brown put out?
How do you frighten a Bee?
What do you have when lounge chairs multiply?
How much hummus did the anorexic Arab eat?
Why can't you run through camp sites?
Anyone know any good optometry jokes?
which 2 insects are the most foolish?
What do read heads get when they don't brush their teeth?
Why did the twins have twice as many shirts as pants?
What did your last slave die of?
What's the difference between a hippopotamus and a Zippo?
What's the difference between a Catholic and Baptist?
What's the difference between Al'qaeda and civilians?
What do you call a Jewish New Zealander?
What does a man with a tiny penis have for breakfast?
What's the difference between Usain Bolt and Hitler?
How does Schrödinger apologise?
What's the most dishonest creature in the sea?
What did the suave frog say to the hot frog?
Why couldn't the NSA go outside?
What do you get when you cross a dyslexic, an insomniac, and an agnostic?
What's the Al-Qaeda's favourite sports team?
What's the fastest way to become a general in the Rebel Alliance?
What do you call a fish with no eye?
Is it cocky to have more than one penis?
What medicine do you take if your butt hurts?
Why do Asians have squinty eye balls?
What do bacteria eat for breakfast?
What sort of cheese do you use to get a bear to go on a outing with you?
What do you call a North Korean Gorilla?
Why did the Buddhist monk refuse Novocain?
How does a jew celebrate Christmas ?
What do you call a woman that is beautiful and smart?
Did you hear about the butcher who sat on his bacon slicer?
What is a gay man's favorite vacation site?
What happened to the hippy chemistry teacher when he spilled his chemicals?
Did you hear about the alcoholic chemist that died?
Whats the difference between Jesus and a picture of Jesus?
How can you tell if someone is having a stroke?
Why wasn't Geronimo considered a proper lumbersexual?
Teacher: Did you finish you homework?
Why did robin williams cross the road?
What did the chinese guy say to the mongoose?
Hat did one prick say to the other prick?
Why do writers always feel cold?
Have you heard of that movie, "Constipation"?
What's the difference between a gay man and a fridge?
Why are camels known as ships of the desert?
Several people dancing around a pen... What is the movie name?
Who is the richest painter?
Why can't Atheist solve exponential equations?
Why are the best accountants twins from Prague?
Did you hear about the guy that could not afford personalized license plates?
Why is the U.S dollar getting stronger?
You know why I don't have a spine?
Chef's favorite personal dish?
What do you call a gay indian?
Why did Humpty Dumpty have a great fall?
Do you know what paraplegics can't stand?
What "c word" describes my girlfriend and why I'm not getting any?
What did the vowel say when it had to go to the bathroom?
What's the difference between fire and water?
what did the man say when he tried to get FREA with his dog?
What do you call an Irish lesbian?
On Halloween, how do skeletons call their friends?
Did you hear about that book on constipation?
How many Australians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why was the Redditor mad at Reddit?
What did the Priest say to the Church of Vegetables?
Whats the favored pasta dish among ISIL members?
Why was the Energizer Bunny in court?
Why did Kirk and Spock march into the woman's restroom?
Why didn't the neuron cross the road ?
What do call a fish with a Phd?
How do you know when you're too drunk to drive?
Didn't will.i.am once say he was going to make a car?
What's green, has six legs, and would kill you if it fell out of a tree?
How do you get Sarah Jessica Parker to say her lines on set?
What is Long and narrow and becomes bigger when given a blow ?
Have you ever noticed that in a pack of biscuits there are always broken ones?
Who did the dyslexic man sell his soul to?
What's brown, sticky and runs down your leg?
What do you call a fruit that won't get married?
what's the difference between time and ronaldo?
Why was Thor so worried about his hair looking good?
How do you stop your bacon from curling in the pan?
Why do Jewish bachelors like latina women?
Who makes dinner in a lesbian relationship?
What’s Al Qaida’s favorite football team?
Did you know you can order a taco at a Japanese restaurant?
Ever hear the one about the "gay moon"?
What music is good to listen to while having a snack?
What is Rihanna's favorite song?
Why did the hippy drown at the beach?
Why should you always rent, rather than buy, a multimeter that measures ohms?
Why should you attend someone's funeral although you know they won't be attend yours back?
There is a blind guy called Miles, what is the name of his guide dog?
Why are there so few Mexican athletes in the Olympics?
What's darker than 3am in the morning?
How did Oedipus convince his mom to have sex with him?
where does a queer download his illegal software from?
Why did the guitar teacher go to jail?
What water does Snake drink?
What's the difference between an introverted physicist and an extroverted physicist?
Whats the difference between a cow and 9/11?
Why didn't the buzzard have any luggage on the airplane?
How do Mr. and Mrs. Weasley have sex?
How warm is the inside of a tauntaun?
Knock Knock. Who's there? 9/11. 9/11 Who?
Why were the people in the twin towers pissed off?
What's the difference between Paul Walker and a computer?
What is the difference between a Jew and a Canoe?
What was the last food delivered to the Twin Towers?
What's the worst part about 9/11?
Why are Black people so tall?
On a scale of 1 to 100 how immature are you?
You guys want to hear a joke?
What do you get if you cross a Buddhist monk and a 16 year old blonde cheerleader?
What do you call a Cloyster that wants to learn the move Rain Dance?
What do bears take at raves?
Anyone have any special planes for 9/11?
What is the loneliest number?
Why did Mickey Mouse leave Minnie Mouse?
Why do 2 bit gamblers never win at blackjack ?
Why is the word "smiles" the longest word in English?
What's a hooker's favorite soda?
Teacher - how did our grandparents kill time without smartphones or internet ?
Why do Americans suck at DOTA2 ?
What are the other letters of the alphabet?
What is a good title for a movie about bacon?
How many dead prostitutes does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you get if you cross a rooster with peanut butter?
Who isn't white or black but shows you no color?
What do you call an arrogant robber?
What is the healthiest college?
Heard about the honest politician from Illinois?
Did you hear about the Polish bank robber?
What do you call a sheep tied to a lamp post in New Zealand?
How much does automail cost?
Did you hear the one about the German sausage?
What's the difference between a lesbian and a canoe?
Why do bees sting?
What happens when a Jewish man with an erection walks into a wall?
What's the best way to figure out if someone smokes Marijuana?
What's the difference between a Boy Scout and a Jew?
What's Rihanna's favorite love song?
What's the biggest Jewish conundrum?
What do you call a masterbating zombie?
How do you get an Indian girl pregnant?
What do you call a car accident between two Nissan pick-up trucks?
Why are Americans bad at League of Legends?
What is a Lumber-Jack from Massachusetts' favorite drink?
How does Liam Neeson like his martini?
What is the most expensive type of prostitute?
What do you call it when dolls have a cookout?
What happens when the Batman sees Catwoman?
What's for dinner Dad?
What did the fireman say when he noticed his hammer was on fire?
How many Harvard graduates does it take to change a light bulb?
What looks like celery, tastes like celery, but isnt celery?
Which animal is the best to be in cold weather?
Why couldnt the bike stand on its own?
What do you call a scouser in a suit?
How do you kill a one-legged fox?
What did the Italian baseball coach say about the only woman on the team?
Why female sys-admins restart systems more often then men?
What did the woman do when she broke up with her boyfriend for her Mexican lover?
Why did the woman leave her overweight husband unconscious in a burning building?
Why don't hipsters live in Alaska?
What do you call an elephant that looks like a rhino?
[OC] Why did the mortgage broker go out of business?
What's the difference between a baby and a pie?
What do you call a nurse with dirty knees?
On the subject of jokes we made up as kids, what do you call a group of hams?
What's a cheese's favorite kind of drug?
What do you call a country that doesn't use credit cards?
Have you heard the joke about the man with no tongue?
Thought of this the other day as a 22 y/o... How do you win the vegetable race?
Corny computer jokes? Why was the spider inside the Computer?
Another one a 7 year old appreciates: Why did the anti-terrorist soldier blow up the toilet?
Why couldn't the bicycle stand up?
What is the easiest way to kill a frenchman?
What did the robot say to the gas pump?
Why was the computer embarrassed?
What did the Libyan Dictator's wife say when she didn't want to have sex?
What do you call two breath mints that were turned into humans by a scientist?
I see your childhood joke and raise you mine: What object crashes the most?
What are 5 black people in a red car?
What was the terrorist's pick up line?
What is a pedophiles favorite Italian meal?
Why do mathematician never go to the beach?
What is Michael Bay's favorite chess move?
What do you call an old person trying to fit in with today's kids?
How many socialists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did u shoot your wife ?
What is a Mexican's favorite Queen song?
Whats the most slippery country?
How do you call a boomerang that doesn't come back?
What do you call it when a banana eats another banana?
What happened to the two gladiator olives?
What is it called when you kill a friend?
Why would you throw a rock at a Mexican man riding a bike?
What's it called when you go around looking for stuff to buy that's made in America?
If I eat lots of preservatives, won't I live longer?
What do you call a nautical plunderer who assists with the flight of an aircraft?
Why do mules not work as hard as horses?
How do you know if your wine was made in the 90's?
What do you call a midget fortune teller running from the police?
What do you call fast food emergencies?
Did you hear about...?
What do you call a crocodile who always lies?
Did you hear about the epileptic midget who works at the pizzeria?
My mexican friend told me he is far sided, I said so does that mean you cant see far away?
How can you tell a mechanic just had sex?
What did the conceited man say while he stood on the north pole?
How to know she's the one?
How often do i make jokes about chemistry?
question about god?
What do you call a terrorist's girlfriend?
What's the difference between firewood and a jew?
How did the underage mathematician get drunk?
How many Jews does it take to kill Jesus?
How many redditors does it take to screw in a new lightbulb?
Why US didn't attack India, after twin-tower incident, looking for terrorists ?
Hey guys, wanna hear a joke?
How do you keep an idiot in suspense for 24 hours?
Who let the docs out?
What do you call a biscuit on a motorbike?
Why is it once you go black you never go back?
In a room of engineers, how many does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the best thing about having insomnia?
Has this been posted before?
How do you know the passengers of the missing plane are alive?
What does a gas discharge lamp?
If Terminator had a horse, what would its name be?
Yeah, you like getting choked don't you!?
What do you call someone who is always disagreeing with their calculator?
Why was Chuck Norris born by her aunt?
What did the shower say to the toilet?
What's the easiest way to make a homeless person bleed?
How many JokeExplainBots does it take to change a lightbulb?
John Oliver ?
What does the sign of an out of business brothel say?
What did they say about the guy who woke up and jerked off on his alarm clock every day?
What do you call the foreskin on a gay guy..?
How would Hitler conquer African countries?
Why was John Lennon shocked when he got his wife's gynecologist bill?
What is a terrorist's favorite wine?
What to toilet paper and the starship enterprise have in common?
What did the soccer player shout to the baker who's cakes kept sticking to the tin?
what comes after the bar?
What do midget's bodies produce more of?
Why did the tennis player get her radio taken away?
What's easier to get, aids or lung cancer?
Why did Aristotle hate French fries?
What's the most popular search engine in Israel?
Why are there no transvestites in space?
How did the blonde burn her ear?
What does a clock do when it gets hungry?
What do you call a reindeer trapped in a storm?
(Quick one-liner joke:) Why are pretty women like pianos?
How can you tell if she is virgin or not?
Why did the stop sign get an STD?
At what age did Hitler's uncle try to molest him at?
What 3 candies do you find in school?
What do you call an all guy Christian party?
What is the hardest part of eating a vegetable?
How do you make a Giraffe go to war?
What do you call a half elephant, half rhinoceros?
What does a baby in a blender sound like?
What's worse than lobsters on your piano?
What are the consequences of smoking weed?
What's the strongest muscle on a pig?
Where on Earth can you find the highest concentration of Jews?
Narcos + Sushi thought for the day: How have I never come across a roll called the "Pablo Escolar"?
How many psychiatrist does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you get when you sit under a cow?
What’s the difference between a fish and a mountain goat?
How does Snoop Dogg keep his shirts so white?
What's common between a lawyer and an eccentric billionaire with bad teeth?
Why is it so hard for an eighty year old woman to pee in the morning?
Why was the smurf's hat blue?
on a scale of 1-10, how funny is reddit?
How come Mr. and Mrs. Claus don't have any kids?
A little boy , aged 7 asks dad , "daddy what is sex " ?
Why did the baker have sticky hands?
What's a single mother's favorite dessert?
What did David say when the tourist tried to touch him?
Why can't your penis be 12 inches?
How does a train driver operate a train while eating gum?
Does anyone know what subreddit "your mamma" jokes are in?
Why should you never bet on Germany at the Olympics?
If X-Men and Legend of Korra had a crossover what kind of bender would Magneto be?
How does a Syrian family have a meal?
What do you call the continuous urge to suck dick?
What do you say when a robot explodes into pieces?
(OC) What did the auditors say to the South American shopkeeper?
Why do bees hum?
How do you fit 15 Jews into a car?
What's the difference between a jew and a pizza?
What's the closest synonym to a love boat?
What did the old billy bobs eat at McDonald's?
Why do white girls only travel in packs of 3's?
What's the difference between a chickpea and a garbanzo bean...?
What's the difference between a mechanical and a civil engineer?
Why Do Sorority Girls Travel In Packs Of 1, 3, 5 or 7?
Why did the teacher cross her eyes?
Did you guys know that water can talk?
What Do You Call Fake Spaghetti?
Did you hear about the guy who ate his trousers?
What's the difference between a piano and tuna?
Who ate a lot and conquered Rome?
After being away from Reddit for a day, how do you keep up with what you missed?
Why did the plane crash into the mountain?
what did the locomotive conductor crave once he became a zombie?
What happens when you throw a piano down a mine shaft?
What porn do vampires love?
What's the Pope's least favorite human bone?
Whats do a baby and old people have in common?
What's the difference between a High School girls track team and a tribe of pigmy?
How can you tell the difference between a crocodile and an alligator?
Did you hear about the clairvoyant midget that escaped from jail?
Did you hear about the two Jamaican Turtles at the RNC?
What do you call a football team full of retards?
What comes between fear and sex?
What's a cats favorite song?
Are you're hungry now?
A 64 years old male tourist swept away in Amazon river, where did he end up?
What do you call a bread place that doesn't make any money?
Why does a chicken coupe have two doors?
How much business does an Amish prostitute get?
What's the difference between tuna, a piano and glue?
This isn't a racist joke..is it?
Why are there only 49 'Black Miss America' contestants?
What do you call an overweight Scott Walker?
Did you know David Guetta was French?
How can you tell there is a Canadian in your closet?
Who's the most popular guy at a nudist colony?
How do you get heaps of pikachu on to a bus?
How do you get pickled bread?
What do you do with an epileptic lettuce?
"When you realise your friend is an idiot" Stories!?
What is the political correct term for hipster?
How many gays does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a Toaster and Hitler?
How many hipsters dose it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the cowboy want a Weiner dog?
What do you call a black pilot?
[request] Do you like bad jokes?
What is Donald trumps favorite street?
What did Groot say when he had amnesia?
What's the worst part about being a black jew?
What do you call a black person that flies a plane?
How many Mexican clowns can you fit in a car?
What did N say to Z?
How does a jew make coffee?
What's the easiest sport to get into?
Did you hear about the magician who turned himself into a driveway?
What do you call a russian with three testicles?
Why do white people not like playing uno with mexicans?
How do you starve a black person?
What do you get when you cross Donald Trump with Einstein?
Why was the carpenter crying?
Why do they bury child molesters 10 feet under?
What do you say to a woman with two black eyes?
Did you hear about the guy with two wooden legs who's house burnt down?
Why was there semen on the clean laundry?
Why don't you want to win an award for Best Feline Sphincter?
What's the name of the smallest pub in the world?
What is the difference between a rat and a person?
Why wasn't the son of God worried when Microsoft Word crashed while he was writing his term paper?
Miracle?
how do you starve a black person?
What kind of music did the caveman who liked rocks and rolling about create?
What type of curry has cumin?
AFFLICTED?
How do you make a witch pregnant?
How do you kill a poet?
Does Batman make this look bad?
What's the Indian way of saying 'Bread of Heaven'?
How do you fit 4 gay guys on one chair?
Why did Loki want the tesseract?
How would you describe sex with a midget covered in sugar?
What element can you find in almost any shoe store?
How many Emos does it take to change a light bulb?
Where was the first discovered potato located?
What do you call a woman who has a lot of sex?
Did you hear about the new Jason Bourne movie, still Bourne?
What did the wise man say to the science class?
What did the fat piece of shit say when he screwed up?
Why was the chef fired?
Did you hear about the overweight prison escapee?
Are you from Russia?
How often does jet fuel melt steel beams?
How many French people need to defend Paris?
What's the difference between a gay man and a Christian man?
Did you hear about the guy who died from eating too many doughnuts?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you know that pigeons die after they have sex?
Who loves fast food?
What does a Jewish pedophile say to an 8 year old boy?
What's grey and comes in gallons?
How do you build a boat?
How many blonde's does it take to screw In a light bulb?
Want to hear a joke about my penis?
What do you call a lesbian Dinosaur?
Why did the hipster burn its tongue?
How many Hipsters does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the sheep who's young son carried him off the farm?
-Why did the console peasants cross the road?
What does a 1337 pirate call his friends?
Why does Torque live on campus?
If your mother and your wife fell into a river, who would you save?
Why is the rainbow a symbol of homosexuality?
Why didn't the man go to dat place?
How much does a hipster weigh?
How do the Jedi imprison Siths?
Why did the hipster burn his tongue drinking tea?
What do you call a depressed bear?
Have you guys heard about Reese Witherspoon?
What did one casual necrophiliac say to the other as they left their day jobs?
What did the doubting monocled feminist say to the mourning mammogram specialist about semen cake?
Wanna see an asshole wrapped in plastic?
What's Varys the Spider's favorite OS?
what did the prostitutes knee say to the other one?
What do call an ant that helps you with your taxes?
Why didn't the white officer shoot the black guy?
Why do hipsters never die?
what do you call a clean idiot?
What's the difference between jews and pizza?
Did you hear about the African who loved Monday Mornings?
What happens to a jew when he runs into a wall with an erection?
What did the blonde's left leg say to her right leg?
What did the hoodrats have for thanksgiving dinner?
How do you make a buff guy talk to you for hours?
Why can't you starve in a desert?
What's the difference between a catfish and a Russian prostitute?
What does the Fox say?
What does it taste like to go down on a senior citizen?
What do Mormons and tweakers have in common?
Why did the dislocated finger leave the party?
Why are there only 49 entrants in the Ms. Black USA competition?
What do you call a black guy that flies planes?
When's a door not a door?
Hello? Is the Communist Party here?
Did you hear how they caught the guy who burgled Will Smith's house?
What's the difference between an oral and anal thermometer?
What do you call a black man who flies a plane?
What's the difference between Jesus and a framed picture of Jesus?
What's the best thing about punching twenty one years olds?
What's the difference between Michael j. Fox and an earthquake?
Did you hear about the woman who drowned in semen?
What do you call a pig that does karate?
Why do seals swim in salt water?
What did the English man say when he walked in on his wife making love to three men?
What song did the gay guy sing on his way back from vacation in Thailand?
How do lumber theives offload their stolen goods?
What did Stevie Wonder say when he found out he was blind...?
Whats the difference between seeing a rapist in the daytime and seeing a rapist at night?
When is the best time to schedule a Dentist Appointment?
What do moths study at school?
Why can't blind people bungee jump?
Did you hear about the hobo who won the marathon?
What does Bill Cosby put in his garden?
How do you get holy water?
Why did God make four cheeks in the human body?
What is the definition of a Yankee?
Knock knock?
What do you call a bull dick wrapped in a pita?
Why did the short guy lose the basketball game?
What did the sign on the whore house door say?
How many dead babies, does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the porn star put at the end of their resume?
What would Jesus's favorite gun be?
Where does a North Korean go after he upvotes a thread on Reddit?
How do you stop volcanoes from erupting?
What's similar between Gump and Trump?
What's the difference between a smoker and a crossfitter?
Who is the biggest slut in the whole wide world?
Ever tried 77?
Did you hear the one about the constipated math teacher?
What were the lawyer's final words to the man who killed him?
What do you call a fat pedophile?
What's the difference between a piano, a tuna, and a pot of glue?
What do you call a vehicle that has changed gender?
Why was little Billy so sad when his friends played on the swingset?
What does hippie sex and base jumping have in common?
How do you call a jockey falling from his horse ?
What did the astronaut from AA say in space?
How do you tell an astronaut where they're going?
What did the first airplane engine say to the second airplane engine?
What's a cardiologist's favourite kind of music?
What do you call a black man that flies an airplane?
Why is marriage like thin toilet paper?
Does your state have less water than California?
What happened when the cow tried to milk itself?
What was the suicide bomber greeted by in the afterlife?
Why are LED's a good investment?
why did the scarecrow win a medal?
Do you know why computer parts are not expensive?
What do lesbians cook for dinner?
Whats a famous piece of shit, that hates mexicans?
What did Jared say when the girl asked him for a footlong?
How many Democrats does it take?
What did the farming professor say to his new students?
What do you call a smoking hooker?
What do Palestinian children dream of becoming when they grow up?
What do you call your gay Uncle?
Where did Sally go after the explosion?
What's a Chinese woman called with one leg shorter than the other?
What did Batman say to The Joker ?
What's the worst way to convince an officer who's pulled you over not to ticket you?
What's another name for a chicken testicle?
How can you tell when your wife has died?
What's the difference between tulips and roses?
what did the offensive Subaru say ?
What sexual position makes the ugliest babies?
A Batman Joke for Indians - What do you call Batman without a soul?
Why do you never see any Stormtroopers as photographers?
Why some of your hair are white dad ?
What do you call a fight between a mexican and a pedophile?
Why do most movie sequels stink?
What's the difference between a Yankee, a Damn Yankee, and a God Damn Yankee?
You know what's a good joke?
Why is it illegal for a man living in North Carolina to be buried in South Carolina?
Why don't you see many chemists with master's degrees working with acids and bases?
Why did Ken and Barbie never have any kids?
Why do men find it difficult to make eye contact?
What's an MLG's smartphone of choice?
What's a neckbeard's favorite spread?
How many Mexicans does it take to wax a car?
Who are the most decent people in the hospital?
Why can't you see hippopotamus hiding in trees?
Why does West Virginia have so many unsolved murders?
How did Jared from Subway get food poisoning?
What’s the difference between a hippo and a Zippo?
Have you seen the new karate opera?
Is your name Google?
What do hand grenades and wives have in common?
What did the left tit say to the right tit?
How do you fire a Chinese cook?
You know how I found out I have a fruit fetish?
What did the white guy say when he found out his sister got knocked up by her black boyfriend?
Have you guys heard the joke about the airplane?
What take out food should you avoid at all costs in Hospital?
What's the worst kind of T-Shirt?
In what realm does Thor use his hammer the most?
What do waiters and prostitutes have in common?
Have you ever smelled Moth Balls?
What do you call blonde girls in a wrapper?
What do you tell a woman that has 37 stab wounds?
What did the Mexican say when his roof fell on him?
Why can't you fight an accountant ?
How do you change the number of sides in a pentagon?
You know what I like about bathroom humor?
What's Jared from Subway's favorite chord?
What would Matthew McConaughey eat if he were a horse?
Why is Germany uninhabitable for cats?
What do you call someone who is racist against Asians?
How many ADD/ADHD kids does it take to change a light bulb?
Why does the chicken cross the road?
What's the difference between a lobster and an oriental woman run over by a steamroller?
What do you call the female version of Donald Trump?
What did the jihadist do when he forgot to study?
What kind of nuts you got?
If Cookie Monster was going to eat a country, what country would he eat?
Why is 6 divorcing 7?
Have you heard the one about Hitler's speech writer?
Neo Nazi?
Why has Stonehenge been there since 2000 BC?
What do you call someone who puts a picture of themselves in a locket?
What do you call a little spanish girl that searches for Redditors?
What would Voldemort name his pet tortoise ?
What goes, "Pieces of Nine, Pieces of Nine"?
What happens when a lighter smokes weed?
Did you hear about the new sprinklers from Australia?
Do you know why Station Masters are so good at their job??
Ever hear about the farmer who bought a tractor with no seat and no steering wheel?
Why do Mobius strips make such bad politicians?
Why did the rock band get in serious treble?
what is worse than finding a worm in your apple?
What does a successful rapping cow struggle with?
Why is it Windows 10 and not 9?
How do they say "fuck you" in Los Angeles?
What's a karate experts favourite beverage?
What is it called when you butt dial from your front pocket?
Why is it faster to download Midget porn?
Why did the cyclops quit teaching?
What's the name of that German guy that keeps hiding my stuff around the house?
How many libertarians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How many NRA spokesmen does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the farmer screw their sheep on a cliff?
What do you call a seaside shanty for kids without parents?
Why did the late man stand on the clock?
What is Bin Laden's Favorite Football Team?
What do you call the new policing strategy of communities such as Ferguson, Missouri?
What's gray and can't fly?
Why do you never play uno with a mexican?
Why does Woody Harrelson's wife call him Moses?
What's something that you can catch but not throw?
How do you call a car designed for midgets?
Why couldn't the soldier feel his legs?
What does a child without arms get for x-mas?
what type of meat does the pope eat?
What would happen if the BLM people became white lives matter?
What's long and hard on a black man?
Why should you always run next to a car?
How does the Ultimate Warrior repair his car?
Where do Turkish people go to purchase their furniture?
what do you call a Canadian alien?
What does a Jewish man, an Asian man, and a black man have in common?
What do you do with an elephant with three balls?
What happens when you insult Terrance on the Oregon Trail?
What made the world stop being Blue?
What file archiver do Tigers use?
You know what's a job I could really see myself doing?
What’s the difference between an illegal Mexican and ET?
One direction splitting up?
If Chris Brown played Quidditch, what position would he play?
Why do women get so upset when they miscarry?
Did you hear Al Gore's new electronic / R&B album?
hey girl, are you a fridge?
What do you get when you cross a polar bear and a seal?
How do Italians light their dynamite?
What two friends belonging to two different alien species call each other?
What do you call a Chinese rapist?
What do you get when you throw a grenade into a kitchen in France?
What's the opposite of a hipster?
What's the hardest thing about rollerblading?
Why do chemists love bad jokes?
How can you teach Jamals and Juans?
What language does a Jewish homosexual speak?
What kind of coffee do the Islamists hate the most ?
Did you hear about the Mexican racist?
What type of pasta is no longer used in Canada?
What's the worst thing about running 100 meters in less than 10 seconds?
Name a bird which doesn't lay eggs?
What do you call a potato that thinks he is in charge?
Why did Jared go to a Goat farm?
What is a burp?
what after c?
How did Jared lose 150lbs?
Why wasn't Hitler invited to the BBQ?
What do you call a Mexican firefighter?
How does a Mexican cut their pizza?
What did Helen Keller scream when she got mugged?
What do Paul Walker and Pink Floyd have in common?
What do Mexican jokes have in common with black jokes?
What does Osama bin Laden and my wife's clitoris have in common?
What do you call two lesbians in the closet?
what did the boy with no arms an no legs get for Christmas?
What do you get when you cross sriracha, Little Caesars, and a donkey?
Have you heard about one direction?
What's the biggest similarity between a bottle of Draino and a Danish stripper?
How many saiyans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why was the Redditor's picture crooked?
How do you call an unfanny comedian?
Why was the sun wearing sunglasses?
How many lawyer jokes are there?
How does a ghost defend its self?
Did you hear who Deez Nuts is picking as a running mate?
What critically acclaimed movie did Zeus star in?
Why couldn't Helen Keller drive a car?
Why did David Schwimmer need ear drops?
How do you make an egg laugh?
What do you call a group of 5 guys named Curtis that are all wearing matching suits?
Did you guys hear about the new exorcist movie?
Whats the useless skin around the vagina called?
What did the judge do to the lawyer who insulted him?
What's small, orange and sounds like a parrot?
What do you call a gummy bear with no teeth?
What does the guy who has been backpacking just a bit too long miss most about home ?
Daddy can I go out dancing with my friends tonight?
Where does a digital photographer hang his work?
Where can you meet horny girls?
Why was the Butcher depressed?
Who did they cast as the Hulk"s dog?
[OC]Where was the pirate when he was hit in the crotch?
What's the fastest way to heaven?
Why are there so few black hockey players?
Why do Pedophiles love Pianos?
What's the difference between a 'hippo' and a 'Zippo'?
Who was the greatest prostitute in history?
What has nine arms and blows?
Why do black people wear lots of chains?
An old man told me this old joke: What did the blind man say when he walked past the fish store?
Are we dangerous?
What did one penis say to the other penis?
Whats Fetty Wap's favorite restaurant?
- Hi, this is NSA calling. - Yes, I know. - How do you know?
How many white people does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you tell an Irishman if you catch him urinating?
Where is my favourite body part?
What is a cats favorite website?
What's a dank memer's favorite letter?
What's a zombie's favorite snack?
How do you start a Mexican bedtime story?
What do you say if you meet someone from Anonymous in an S&M club?
When are jousting tournaments most commonly held?
How cops does it take to change a light bulb?
What do nuclear physicists eat for lunch?
Why do porn stars always talk the same way as they would to a pet?
What's better than a Spick on a Stick?
How do do you get a Redditor to do what you want?
Whats blue and pretty on top, and brown and kind of a bummer in the bottom?
What did Donald Duck say to Goofy?
What do you call a far-ranging debate?
What do you call water that hasn't been changed?
Any funny student council election catchphrases for posters?
What do you call a little Mexican?
What did the homeless prostitute's boyfriend call her?
Why did the mathematician quit his job and join NASCAR?
what's a pirate's favourite letter?
Why do people hit things (ex. TV, computer, etc.) when they don't work?
Did you hear about the guy who broke into Tiger Woods' house?
What does Che Guevara call his house?
Did you hear about the insomniac, dyslexic, obsessive compulsive butcher?
How many qataris does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the difference between black, morbid and brutal humor?
How many Canadians does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between Marty McFly and a Bears fan?
Why is Ashley Maddison the best hook up site on the Internet?
What do you call a pimp with his whores?
What does a Spanish dog say at the marina?
What do you call Kansas overrun by pirates?
Did you hear about the 2 guys that stole a calendar?
What do you call a town in the middle of the Arctic Ocean?
How did Hitler react to the fall of Berlin?
What do you call an egotistical anorexic?
If you blew up Mount Rushmore, what crime would you have committed?
Ever heard of The Mental Challenge ?
What is worst then the holocaust?
Why did the kittens turn atheist?
Why has Ten been flirting with Seven?
How do boats apologise?
Why did the pasta chef take his car into the body shop?
What's the mating call of a sorority girl?
Why is a woman like a KFC?
Who do Egyptians pray to when the public transportation breaks down?
What did the cowboy say as he walked into a German car garage?
Why do sailors use liquid soap?
What do you call an affectionate island?
Kid: Hey, Mum! What's an orgasm?
What did the pirate say after his successful pillage?
You know those before-after models?
What do you call a Jihad male cow?
Why did the Crab not share any plankton with his friends?
What do prostitutes work for?
Who takes a shit while they're at a party?
What do you get when you feed an Eevee a sandwich?
What did the fish say when he ran into a wall?
Why are autistic people like black people?
Three kittens were on a roof, which slipped off first?
Why do felines always win board games?
What's the plural of compass?
What do you call being sick because of an airport?
What did the lumberjack say when his colleague went home sick?
On a scale of 1-15, how bad is the economic crisis in Greece?
Do you guys know what a minstrel cycle is?
Why did the suicidal chicken cross the road?
What do marriage and hurricanes have in common?
What would have Hitler been if he was blind?
If there is a hurricane coming why don't we just name it a black name?
Why couldn't the lifeguard save the hippie?
How many Protestants does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do the French Train for War?
What is hard when it goes in and soft and sticky when it comes out?
What do you call a funny baked good?
What do Reptiles love to smoke?
Why do indigenous people hate snow?
What did the Trump supporting viticulturist say Monday morning?
What will they ask Jared of Subway in the prison shower?
How many cocks does it take to make your mother cry?
Did you hear about the blind prostitute?
How do you know that a dog is a man's best friend?
What do you call a mexican with two dads?
Do you know how the store Menards got its name?
Why do gay people dress so well?
Have you read that new book on antigravity?
Are you guys all right?
How does Jared like to play his flute?
Did you hear about the guy who bought a ring for his under age fiancé?
What plays in a diamond and eats box?
Where does dragon milk come from?
What's worse than one bee?
Why did Jared vote for gore in the 2000 election?
Why do they name all hurricanes after women?
What are Hindus' favorite flowers?
Hey, do you guys remember the one REALLY good scene in hitman?
What's the difference between a white girl who likes to tan and a burger?
Did you hear about Josh Duggar's cheating scandal?
What do you call a black guy?
Has anyone heard of the potato mail thing?
What type of weed does a reptile smoke?
What did the black man say to the Mexican?
Why is it called Mother Nature?
Why did the cowboy adopt a weiner dog?
Who is Pitbull's favorite nascar driver?
What is a ghost's favorite part of school?
Why did the tear testify in court?
What did the deaf guy get for Christmas ?
Did you know the Bible forbids sunbathing in Greece?
What present can you give to the woman who has everything?
Why do fat women always have a cat?
Why are baby cows considered lunch meat?
What type of porn do Canadians watch?
Have you heard of the grammar nazi?
Where does Q come before P?
Want to hear a joke about /r/science ?
What's the best part about bangin' twenty six year olds?
Why are so many Italians named Tony?
What do you call an unemployed Rastafarian?
Where does a sad chemist find employment?
What's Jared's favorite side dish?
What's a dick's favorite song?
How do you say "I surrender" in french?
What's the final digit of the square root of 2 (√2)?
What do you call a women who has had a lot of sex?
Why a fruit doesn't walk?
What's Subway Jared's favorite song?
What ya call a lesbian with large fingers?
What's the difference between Tom Brady and Ben Roethlisberger?
What do you call a knuckle sandwich in California?
What do you call a stingy crab?
What do you call a shitty reptile?
(Neighbor, curious): What's wrong with little Timmy?
Why did Jared Fogel have trouble having sex with twenty seven year olds?
Does anyone know the punchline to this joke from the book "straight to hell"?
Did you hear about the construction worker who was hired to frame a house?
What did the dubstep valentine's day card say?
What's Subway Jared's favorite TV show?
What's the official sports drink of the KKK?
Why was the little boy crying at the diamond store?
What do you call a Chinese fly with no wings?
How many actors does it take to change a light bulb?
Why don't Jedi Knights use the Kelvin scale?
Why did the Mexican put hot sauce on his taco?
What do we want ? Race-car noises! When do we want them?
Why couldn't you trust the king of the jungle?
Why does the american loose at billard ?
Why did Snoop Dogg buy an umbrella?
Why did the fiancé say "Yes!" and why did the little boy say "No!"?
Why was Saint Peter so good at basketball?
What do you call a fake Sony phone?
Do you know why Jesus doesn't play hockey?
Do you know why every new bride smiles?
What do you call it when two Vietnamese people are together?
Why should you never have unprotected ear sex?
What was Rudolf Hess' favorite band?
What's the difference between Jared from Subway's gut and his junk?
What's worse than a Jimmy John's full of dead babies?
Where did Josh Duggar take his first Ashley Madison date?
Why was the Dragonborn arrested in the Whiterun bakery?
What do you call a fish with no eye's?
Hey did you guys hear about Jared from Subway?
Have you heard Subway's new slogan?
Why did the gay guy refuse to spit in the water?
What happens when something travels faster than the speed of light?
What's the best way to wipe a computer server?
Where does a dog get a new tail?
Did you hear the Fresno Library is sinking?
Isn't this whole Ashley Madison hack exactly what their users wanted?
What does a bird with an injured wing need?
What did the community do when there was an injustice involving law enforcement?
Why are there only 239 beans in a bag of beans?
Why were the dyslexic lesbians frustrated?
Did you hear about Jared Fogle?
Why did the pedophile lose weight?
Did you hear about the girl who resembles a rat?
Why did the black kid fail algebra?
What does Rabbits and Eggs have in common ?
How do you please a Mennonite woman?
Why did god create man?
What’s the difference between a Jew and a pizza?
Why are pregnant women given priority on public transport?
I made 2 eggs this morning and my son ate more than half. How many eggs did he eat?
How did president Obama win the election?
Why are League of Legends players the most skeptical people on Earth?
Do you know poop is tapered at one end?
What do you call a porno with conjoined twins?
What did Matthew McConaughey yell at the drive that was about to miss his turn?
Did you hear the one about the feminist stand-up?
Give me a compliment?
How do you get reddit to upvote any sentence?
How many tumblr users does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the clam go to jail?
How do you circumcise a Hill-Billy?
Why can't you rape an Eskimo?
Doc, give it to me straight. How is my wife doing?
What's the difference between a pretty girl and an apple?
What did the man who invented the bum shaking machine realize when he turned it on?
What's the difference between a Private and a Private First Class?
Why did the lady with multiple personality disorder share her food with a friend?
What do you call an Asian man blowing another guy?
Did you hear about the guy who was run over by a train?
what's the difference between cocaine and a 4 year old?
what do you call a bunny in a kilt?
Did you hear about the cow that won the nobel peace prize?
How did Copernicus become the first Polish astronomer?
Where does Vladimir keep his shit?
what do exorcists and alcoholics have in common?
What do you call it when a cat gets angry?
[OC] Where do all the cutest electrons hang out?
What city would you be in if you dropped your waffle on the beach?
Why are some musicians so antisocial?
What do you get when you cross a gay man and a jew?
What do Marylanders call their ex-girlfriends?
Why did the lion lose at poker?
What's the most popular pickup line in gay bars?
What did the organic chemist use tinder for?
How Many Feminists Does it Take to Change a Light bulb?
How many christians does it take to change a lightbulb?
What type of gun does a feminist carry?
Why was 1 all salty?
What did JayZ say to the theoretical mathematician?
What's the difference between U and I?
How do you tell if someone is a metalhead, pot-smoker or pro-gay?
What makes teaching gender studies so great ?
What's the best score you can get on a test?
What do we want? Racing car noises! When do we want them?
What does a time traveller do when he's hungry?
What do you get when you cross Hilter, the Terminator, and Cthulhu?
How is American beer comparable to having sex on a boat?
What do Harry Potter and Kermit The Frog's penis have in common?
What did the train say on the way to Auschwitz?
What do runners eat before a race?
Why don't feminists carry handguns?
What does a laser in a church sound like?
What do you call a woman who thinks she can do anything a man can do?
Why did the Golfer feel aladeen about his socks ?
What does a cue ball and a mexican have in common?
Hey mind if I try some of your chloroform?
How do you make a sheep jump off a cliff?
You guys know who holds the record for speed reading?
Why don't owls make love in the rain?
How did the group of 4 dogs win the golf tournament?
You know what most people hate about ambiguity?
Whats the problem with feminist picnics ?
What do you call two detectives tracking down a ghost?
How did the hipster burn his tounge?
What do we want? Race car noises! When do we want them?
What does pizza and vagina have in common?
What are 8 Nougat-Bits?
Have you heard about the movie called 'Constipation'...?
Why was 110 afraid of 111?
What do you call a loaf of grumpy bread?
What is something a lot of redditors mix up?
What's the name of the car of a hipster batman?
Say friends, why is it tough to play poker with cattle farmers?
Are you constantly in a rush and have ZERO time to just sit around and relax?
What kind of cuisine did the rude Jamaican serve?
What band does a wannabe join?
What do you call a white grandmother?
What the difference between a Mexican and a bench?
What does Mario wear?
How do you get a hotdog to dance?
Why do most people from Russia wear track suits?
Whats the difference between puberty and prostitution?
How do you call a bucket list created by a 16 year old?
Hey gurl, are you an inaccurate answer?
What's an author's favorite drink?
What kind of meat does the Pope eat?
What did the dyslexic traveller say when he arrived at an unknown station?
What did the fish say when he swam into a wall?
Is is best to do your homework on an empty stomach or a full stomach?
What do you use to transport pittas?
What do you call a dinosaur that raps about life?
What did the Middle Eastern terrorist say when he was captured by the police?
What is the difference between a bad haircut and a good haircut?
Why is the moon so grumpy?
Could you buy me something cheap for lunch, please?
What did the bird say in gratitude?
How do you impress a girl?
Did you hear about the power surge across the street?
Did you hear about the guy who ate glass?
Why does voldemort have flat face?
What is black and white and black and white and black and white?
Why are glasses required to do math?
Why did Serj Tankian cross the road?
What direction does a Walter White-themed GPS tell you to turn?
Why do you go to a black mans garage sale?
Why did Princess Diana divorce Prince Charles?
What was the name of the pakistani hide and seek champion ?
What do you call a grocery store for people with dementia?
What do you call a cannibal that only eats disabled people?
Why isn't your nose 12 inches long?
What did the feminist baker blame for all of her life's problems?
Why do feminists hate the post the USPS?
Why are urologists selfish?
What did the potato chip say to the battery?
Why do flowers and beer get along so well?
Did you hear about the teacher who never farted in class?
What's the only thing Gary the gay geneticist loves more than he loves his boyfriend, Bill?
What did the ghost say to the bee?
What happens when you get hit by a rental car?
Where do sad Ukrainians go?
Why can you trust a musician?
Why Mathematics make you a Terrorist?
Herr Freud, why would you absentmindedly sketch a dick while talking on the phone?
Do you know what the white stuff in bird poop is?
Why didn't Microsoft release Windows 9?
Why did the student act crazy each time he worked on math homework?
How does a black woman know she's pregnant?
Daddy what is a transvestite?
Why don't you ever see an elephant in a tree?
What do you call Dubstep on a Mac?
What's the difference between sand and menstrual blood?
What do you call a fish in orbit?
Why is Canada the part of the Illuminati?
Why was the church opposed to fire on torches?
So another way of saying a no-brainer would be…?
Why are muscles poisonous?
What do you call a mexican drug dealer?
What's so fragile that even mentioning it breaks it?
What do disabled people get when there's a fire in the building?
What did the gallon of pasteurized milk say to the other?
What do you call a White Crocodile?
What do you call a dead Australian Wrestler?
Do you why I never excel during a meeting?
What did the cannibal comedian say as he battled through his steak dinner?
What do ladies-of-the-night do when in their garden?
Q:where do you see yourself in 5 years?
What is the difference between a Cat fish and a lawyer?
How many Asians does it take to change a light bulb?
What branch of the military did the hipster join?
Why couldn't Miss Piggy count to 100?
What is the name of Turkey's most beloved actor?
What did the vegan say when he saw someone familiar?
Racism Test- What do you call a black guy who flies an airplane?
Why did Walmart go out of business in Iraq?
What did the little cell say to his sister when she stepped on his toe?
Where do people send crazy cigarettes?
What do you do when your dishwasher stops working?
What type of condom does Spock use?
Why did the maniacal chemist drop a rancher into his latest concoction?
How did Kobe Bryant go on his math test?
What do you yell at a Muslim striptease?
What did the Ancient Romans use to cut their hair?
What does a preverted frog say?
What do you call a Roman fighter with curly hair in his teeth?
What do you call a ghost who had a sex change?
How did Jack grow his portfolio?
Did you hear about the Korean who entered the lottery?
What's the difference between Barack Obama and Cecil the lion?
What do frogs say?
what did stevie wonder say when he recieved a cheese grater for Christmas?
Why do girls always walk in groups of odd numbers?
What do the U.S.S. Enterprise and Toilet Paper have in common?
Why are there no walmarts in Iraq?
Want to hear a corny joke??
How many times does a blonde laugh at a joke?
Why did the palm tree win the plant race?
Why can't Redditors lose their virginity?
What's the difference between a potato and a chickpea?
What does a healthy dog and a near-sighted gynecologist have in common?
Do you know what you get when you mix an elephant with a rhino?
What do you call a serial killing cannibal who catches on fire easily?
Did you hear about the pyromaniac who was on the dating website?
What did Putin say to the U.S. and E.U. after invading Ukraine?
Why did Mickey Mouse go to outer space?
Why are dogs such terrible dancers?
What kind of blowjob does a screwdriver give?
What is a teacher's favorite candy?
What was Spider Man's major in college?
What do you call a family of Orthopaedic doctors ?
What do you call a short psychic who's escaped from rehab?
What happens when women have their period?
What brand of car would the Roadrunner be?
What did one lesbian pirate say to the other?
Hamster PickUp Line?
What did Jay-Z call his girlfriend before getting married?
Did you hear about the comedian terrorist?
What do Albanian kids want to be when they grow up?
What do you call a cow that can go 3000 feet per second?
How do you catch a runaway laptop?
What do you call a gay man who just got fired?
What do you call a bunch of killer whales playing musical instruments?
Hey'd you hear about that guy who's half Indian, half Canadian?
Ferguson? What about Fergdudaughter?
Why can't rappers take holidays?
What was a positive accomplishments made by the Nazi party?
What do you call someone who has 6.02 * 10^23 dollars?
What's a vampire's favourite dance?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, an agnostic, and a dyslexic?
Why do vultures hate flying?
How do you say 50 cents name in Zimbabwe?
What does the devil eat in Japan?
What do you get a man who has everything?
Have you heard about that cop that shot the black guy?
How many of you guys experienced this?
What do you call a Mexican ready-meal?
Which director is Hollywood's darling?
What do you do if you enter a room and a clown is having a stroke?
What did the fry cook do when he found out he was cooking burger patties made of feces?
How often do I make chemistry jokes?
What is the difference between a dead hooker and spare tire?
What do you call a boat full of Karma?
Why is an Alabama divorce like a tornado?
Whats reddits favorite tv show?
What does a dominatrix say when she's late?
It may be illegal to steal kitchen utensils, but what can I say?
Why is golf named "golf"?
Why are there no good jokes about men?
What do you call an unemployed classical musician?
How can you find a blind guy at a nude beach?
Why don't Baptist's have sex standing up?
Why Can't Atheists Solve Exponential Equations?
How does Mike Tyson get smarter?
30 cows, 28 chicken. how many didn't?
What is Bernie Sanders' LEAST favorite band?
In the presidential election, who does the elephant vote for?
What do you call a Russian bovine covered in lichen?
What do they call a list of athletes in Jamaica?
What can you say about a car and not a girl/your gf?
What is the most dishonest fish in the ocean?
If a midget smokes weed, does he get high or medium?
What are Alphabet employees gonna be called?
Why don't you buy Ukrainian underwear?
Why are Saturday and Sunday strong?
What does an agnostic man with insomnia and dyslexia do in his free time?
what do you call an asian supply warehouse party?
What is a whale's favorite song?
What is a priest's favorite candy?
Why are indecisive miners the worst?
How many Latvians does it take to screw a lightbulb?
What do you call a handjob from a midget?
What would happen if all of the mass in the universe turned into energy?
Why Beyonce?
What is the KKK's favorite soup?
How are Asians and Smart Cars similar?
How many polacks does it take to change a light bulb?
Why do mathematicians never have to pay for sex?
Have you heard the rumor about butter?
Why did the spy stay in bed?
What do you call a little girl who's very close to her dog?
What do the Japanese call a large apartment?
What part of a chicken is a musical instrument?
What do you call it when a bunch of deer have an intervention for one of their friends?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl in the bathroom?
Who likes wet cock and hates soggy cereal?
Why did so many black people die in Vietnam?
Why can't Mexico beat the US in the Olympics?
What kind of sex do you have twentyseven year olds?
How does a neckbeard neurologist address a Hispanic midwife who can't quit her job?
Can you help me write this joke?
Why is it that when a woman sleeps with a bunch of men, she is a slut?
A mexican and a black guy are in a car, who is driving?
Where do male army priests live?
Why did the fish cross the ocean?
Remember the old times in the Internet?
Why is a giraffes neck so long?
Do you know what the problem with toilets is?
Where do astronauts leave their spacecraft?
How can you tell if you have a high sperm-count?
What does a dyslexic agnostic wonder about?
What does Johnny Depp say when cutting down trees?
Why don't you ever see three mexicans crossing the border at the same time?
Why did the cz-75 get the girl pregnant?
Anyone remember this from the Austin Powers commercial?
What is a Detective's favourite pastry?
Do you have a small 2$ to spare?
Why does society think less of a man when he strikes a woman instead of sparing them?
What did the pirate say when he became an octogenarian?
What do you call a person who thinks every day is Halloween?
Can I man and a woman have sex while running?
What happens after an alligator commits a crime?
What's Sideshow Bobs least favorite creepypasta?
What did the Mexican wife say to her Husband?
What's the difference between a Mexican and a park Bench?
How does Dwayne Johnson Party?
Have you heard about the recent discovery about that moon of Jupiter?
Who had the best dinner with Megyn Kelly after the Fox Republican Debate?
Did you hear the one about the woman with a breast implant made of wood?
How are an armless man at a buffet and a kleptomaniac the same?
Where did little Sarah go after the bombings?
Did you hear about the Knock-knock joke champion?
Whats the differance between a terrorist and a yiddish mama?
Did you hear about the blonde identical twins?
What's the difference between a Mexican and a bench?
Why don't they call the Batman film "The White Knight" instead of "The Dark Knight"?
Why are fishermen so good at geometry?
Why did Vietnam revolt against the French?
What do you call a prehistoric humanoid who likes to take his time?
What does Donald Trump call a hundred dollar bill?
What did the blind man say when he sipped a frozen drink and was cured?
What do you call a Death Sentence for a Movie Theater Shooting?
What kind of haircut does the black judge have?
You know why i hate MCU Thanos?
Did you hear about the Psychic midget that escaped prison?
What's a dish best served cold?
How does a solar system have a party?
Why does Donald Trump and illegal Mexicans have in Common?
What does Batman ask when he enters a butcher shop?
How are babies different from feminists ?
What kind of pastry do you need a thesaurus to eat?
What's it called when two morticians argue for hours on who gets to bang a corpse?
What do you call a person who teaches about Drones?
When you're cold inside, where do you stand?
What is a germans favorite passtime at a concert?
Whats Wolverine's favorite genre of music?
What do they always forget to do after filming a season of Game of Thrones?
Who wins between a black guy and a fencing champion?
Where's the middle of nowhere?
How do you describe Catwoman in one word?
What does a little sister ride?
I work as a guide at a zoo. What's your favourite animal joke?
What's the worst part about breaking up with a Japanese Girl?
Why did the Native American curse the snow?
Why do college girls only hang out in odd numbers?
Why can't you wear shorts in the Ukraine?
How do feminists get away with murder?
why is there no windows 9?
What does Donald Trump tell Barack Obama supporters?
What do a marriage and superglue have in common?
What do they call a whore's fart?
Have you heard about the jewish comedian?
Why did the angles have such high self esteem?
How many koalas does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does all Audi owners have in common?
When does Ronald McDonald's baby sleep?
What do we want? Low flying plane noises! when do we want em?
What is cock soup?
Tell me Jeeves, are lemons tweeting?
What country's citizens are most affected by global warming?
What do they call grits up north?
What would the headline read if an average redditor were killed by a venemous spider bite?
What's an alcoholic's favourite type of Maths?
What does the torch represent in the hand of the Statue of Liberty?
What do you call a fish who went to medical school?
What do you call a fat Irish family?
How were people born ?
What do you call a Mexican that's lost his car?
What do you call a fat guy with an unhealthy interest in his mother?
What does a wife and a tornado have in common?
How do you call a black man in space?
Hey babe, are you a Sasquatch?
What do you call a promiscuous woman who travels a lot?
How do bored cows sound like?
Would you like to hear a joke?
What do Mexican midgets use to cut pizza?
What was the beef doing as he watched the salad dressing?
What's the difference between Harry Potter and a Jew?
Why does it go from Windows 8 to 10?
What do you call a group of very traditional orthopedic surgeons?
Why are so many gay rights activists mechanics?
What do you call the 12 step program for people who talk too much?
What's a lesbian's favorite game?
What do you call a Black Jew?
What's the difference between what Bill Cosby did and rape?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's wife lately?
What happens when you throw a green rock into the Red Sea?
Did you hear that Donald Trump's wife doesn't want him to run for president?
What happens on the first date with Bill Cosby?
Whats the fastest way to a women's heart?
How do you call a beautiful feminist?
Where do Polar Bears keep their money?
what is worse than locking your keys in your car parked at planned parent hood?
Did you hear about the chicken who liked classical music?
What is Hitler's least favorite letter?
Have you heard about corduroy pillows?
What do you call a starting indie dev?
What's the difference between a puppy and a kernel of corn?
Why do white girls like odd numbers?
What did the pirate say when he saw the dank meme?
What do you call someone who hates cold weather?
Did you hear about the overweight introvert who thought he had won the hot dog eating contest?
Why did the whale cross the road?
What did transferred epithet tell hyperbole?
Why did Johnny drop his ice cream?
Do you remember that time you met Bill Cosby?
What's the difference between a large pizza and a bass guitarist?
What is the name of Woody Woodpecker's girlfriend?
You know what I don't get?
What do you call a group of kangaroos?
Why was President Banana of Zimbabwe elected?
What do you call an anorexic girl with a yeast infection?
Why do orphans like playing tennis?
What do you do if you get bit by something poisonous?
What's the definition of a great farmer?
Why did Sally drop her ice cream while crossing the street?
What did the test tube baby ask its father?
What's brown, dirty, and sticky?
What's the last thing a Tickle-Me Elmo gets before leaving the factory?
What kind of person are you if you open the door from the bottom of the door?
What do you call two men hanging from a window sill?
why are grills so hot?
How did the constipated mathematician solve his problem?
What's red and smells like yellow paint?
What's the difference between anal sex and oral sex?
What's square-shaped and yellow?
Why do priests have lots of kids?
What does it sound like when two churches fight?
Why does the internet always mourn the death of politicians?
What did the man with five penises say?
What is the thinnest book in the world?
What do you give a losing horse with lockjaw?
What's the difference between dog food and a hot dog?
Why can't you see elephants hiding in trees?
What's the first thing a redneck buys when going to a family reunion?
What do you call a Grizzly Bear with no teeth?
Why was the farmer disappointed when he tried to marry his prized melon?
What's the difference between a doctor and a chair salesman?
What's a dog's favorite chip?
What's the Difference Between Roast Beef and Pea Soup?
What are cats favorite Internet Service provider?
What do you call a vegan zombie?
What do you call a girl with braces?
Why did the otter want to work at NASA?
What's blue and doesn't fit anymore?
Who is a KKK members favorite superhero?
What do you call a cup with a Confederate flag on it?
What do you call that gnarly smell around cow pastures?
What do you call a superhero-duo run over by a steam roller?
What do you call it when Oxygen and Nitrogen train at the gym together?
What does idk stand for?
How do you package a 21st century classical jazz singer?
Why can't you hear a Pterodactyl go to the toilet?
How many theoretical physicists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did microsoft go straight to windows 10 ?
Is it considered sexual assault to masturbate while cyber bullying?
Has anyone had a glass of F5 lately?
How do you spot a egocentric vocalist?
You know they say the same thing about Bill Cosby and Mexico?
What do, you call a handicapped person with a, vasectomy?
How does an Alcoholic teach the ABC's to their children?
Whats wrong with four black people in a Cadillac driving off a cliff?
What did the duck say to the cashier after she purchased some lipstick?
Why did microsoft go directly to windows 10?
Did you see the joke written on recycled paper?
What is the difference between a wife and a parasite?
Why do software developers make the best relationship partners?
How did Arnie convince his wife to move in with him?
Why did the pig quit running the the marathon?
What kind of gas supports violence?
Why don't rabbits make any noise when they have sex?
What reddit page has that link/picture you're looking for?
How does a Jew make beer?
What is faster? Hot or Cold?
The worst part about being told you have Alzheimer's?
What's the difference between outlaws and in-laws ?
Who's a Dinosaurs least favorite reindeer?
Did you hear what the ridiculous fraction ordered for lunch?
Have you ever seen Gregor Clegane fight?
Hypochondria?
What do you call traffic in The Czech Republic?
What's 12 inches long and snaps a cunt?
why was 6 afraid of 7?
So, did you hear about the first monkey to be allowed to vote?
What is worse than blacking out after a crazy night and losing money?
Have you ever eat a clock?
What do you call memories of old Playstation?
What's heavier, 200 pounds of bricks or 200 pounds of feathers?
how many chefs does it take to change a,light bulb ?
What did the Cherokee-Polish couple name their firstborn?
What do you call a tea knight?
Why is pound cake called pound cake?
Where will you find the most powerful man in Los Angeles?
Did you hear about the guy that died of a Viagra overdose?
What is the most fascist letter?
Hear about the guy that built a car out of a bank vault?
(Best New Pick Up Line) How much does a polar bear weigh?
What do they call cunnilingis in India?
What do amputees and cricket have in common?
What do you call a bee that gets engaged?
What's heavier, 200 pounds of bricks, or 200 pounds of feathers?
Did you hear about the hunting rule change?
What do you get if you cross the Atlantic with the Titanic?
Why don't blind people go bungee jumping?
What's a traffic cop's favorite kind of sweater?
What's bad about being a Black Jew?
How do dentists like their eggs?
Why was the Dark Age dark?
Did you hear about the recent earthquake research?
What do you get if you share your Earbuds with all your friends?
What is Minion's favourite brand?
Did you hear about the constipated math teacher?
What instrument does Mother Earth play?
What's another name for a necrophile?
Have you heard of the film constipation?
What happened to the cow who jumped over the barb wire fence?
Where does a race on the Swedish border end at?
How do you brainwash a liberal?
What's the difference between rubber balls and steel balls?
What do you call the useless bit of skin at the end of a penis?
Why did the termite got divorced?
Where does Napoleon keep his armies?
What did the pirate say when his wooden leg got stuck in the freezer?
What's the most sought after ball in Biopsy Bingo?
Why can't melons get married?
You prefer white wine over red?
what do you call a sad ditch?
How did the police determine which turtle ate the diamond ring?
What's blonde and intelligent?
What did the ill kitty say to the playful puppy?
What do you call data on a Pediatricians computer?
What is Titus Pullo's Sandal Size?
Why did the ghost go to jail?
What's the difference between a knife and a feminist?
Did you hear about the Chinese military general who deserted his position during a time of war?
Have you heard of the man from DeMizes?
How do you know if a hippo is in your oven?
Why does a honeymoon only last 7 days?
What's the difference between an onion and a prostitute ?
What sound does a baby make when you put it in a microwave?
How did the detective know the Necrophile Killer was a hipster?
[Serious] Have any animals besides humans been shown to exhibit humor in their social interactions?
What did Lewis and Clark only have one sack of on their expedition?
Why are lawyers buried 18 feet deep when they die?
What is Bruce Jenner's nephew's favorite movie?
You know what Schwarzenegger is up to these days?
whats the difference between a woman and a computer?
What do a walrus and Tupperware have in common?
What do you call a sheep giving birth in a bedroom?
What kind of jeans do Mario and Luigi wear?
What do you call a mushroom who strongly believes in radical Islamism?
What do Sting and a prostitute have in common?
How does Walter Palmer like his eggs?
What are goosebumps for?
Why did we skip windows 9?
What's the difference between eating pussy and eating apple pie?
Did you hear about the grizzly who didn't like his daughter wearing a crop top?
What comes after huehuehue?
Mirror mirror on the wall, what is the fairest element of them all?
What's the difference between a lawyer and God?
How do you know when a politician is lying?
What do you call a white girl who can run faster than her brothers?
When's a dentist's favorite time?
Did you hear about the 2 guys that stole the calendar?
What's the difference between a dentist and Jimmy Savile?
How many figures does a stripper make?
What's the difference between an old cat and a little kitten?
Where can you go to fill all of your rhino related needs?
What is the difference between sack of dead babys and ferrari ?
What to Bill Cosby and Peter Pan have in common?
Why do they run the credits at the beginning of Game of Thrones?
what do you call a girl on a swing with no arms?
Why did they skip Windows 9?
What u call a Jewish Asian?
What do you call a poor photographer who works for a tabloid?
What did the zoophile scientist say to his assistant?
What disease causes people to swear at the dinner table?
What do you call a nun on the run?
What do you call a bee that produces milk?
How do you turn fruits into vegetables?
What soft drink did Hitler ban during WWII?
How do you make a woman scream?
What shoes do pedophiles wear?
What did the pirate say to the flying prostitute?
What's the difference between a man who owns a gun and a man who owns a bank?
What do you say when you friendzone a brony?
Why don't dwarfs smoke pipe weed?
What do tasty weiner's and attractive bitches have in common?
What is a Coronal Mass Ejection?
What do sex and air have in common?
What is yellow and cant swim?
Why was the Mathematician frowned upon?
Did you hear about the Chinese Chef who broke out of jail?
What is white and disturbs your breakfast?
Why do rappers love weed so much?
Why is it called Justice League of America?
What's white and smells like black paint?
What does a redneck do when he misses his girlfriend?
How often do I tell chemistry jokes?
Did you know lotr could have come out a lot earlier?
How big of a difference is there between the male and female reproductive system?
What Did Superman Tell Superwoman?
How do you get 20 Jews in a car?
Why was 10 afraid of 7?
Possessed by a demon? Need help?
Scientists say they are working on bringing back the wholly mammoth. But at what cost?
What's a Muslims favourite animal?
Who reads the news AND makes coffee?
Damn girl are you playboy magazine?
How do Harry Potter fans flirt?
Don't you hate it when people answer their own questions?
What do you call a security guard in a jumping castle?
Thoughts on "The Hunt for Red October"?
What did the Ocean say to the Beach?
My dog has no nose. How does it smell?
Why is there no gambling in Africa?
Why did the bear eat his own arms?
You know what sucks about being an agnostic dyslexic insomniac?
What's an elephant's most sexual organ?
What do you call a Muslim standing between two buildings?
What do Rick Astley and a loyal partner in crime have in common?
What's the difference between a black and a white fairytale?
What's Ronald Reagan's favorite vegetable?
Who's your favorite comedian?
What do you call it when a ninja keeps something to himself?
What did the CN tower say to the clouds???
What do you call a ring of iron atoms?
Did you hear about the baby that was born in a high tech. hospital?
What's an epileptic persons favorite appetizer?
What is the Islamic State's favourite frozen dessert?
What's so difficult about being a camera man in the porn industry?
What do warm toilet seats and pussy have in common?
Heard a great black joke today. Have you guys heard the one about the honest hard working black guy?
How do they call women that don't suck dick?
What is a great way to baby-proof a house?
How did Moses make his tea in the morning?
Howdeepisthepool?
What is a difference between acne and a catholic priest?
What fabric is Mario's overalls?
What's a poops favorite color?
Who is the funniest American politician?
What do you call a fragile camera?
Why did the blonde move to California?
Whats the difference between a diamond player and a master player in League of Legends?
What did the Jihad name his concession stand?
Which is the best side of a banana to eat?
Why does Trump hate McCain so much?
What is the biggest plot twist in spanish soap operas?
Pepsi?
What is the difference between a fridge and a pussy?
How can you tell when a girl is vegan?
Why don't kleptomaniacs get jokes?
Why did the Turkey cross the road?
Why do push up bras not work for some girls?
What do you call it when someone is mistaken about you having a penis?
How can you tell if someone is an entrepreneur?
What do you call a disaster that only affected shopping malls?
Why should you never stand behind Elsa from Frozen?
Why were all the numbers afraid of 7?
Where do French lawyers like to relax?
Knock-knock. Who's there?
What is the most searched word on Bing?
What is green and smells like paint?!?
A Spaniard, an Irish man, and a Greek go into a brothel. Who pays?
What do you call a snail on a ship?
Why didn't Thor like the party?
What do you call a fight between an Illegal Immigrant and a Pedophile?
What do you call a self absorbed lobster?
What do you call it when a man is given an order to take another man out lunch?
[Racist] So a black guy and a Mexican fall out of a tree. Who hits the ground first?
Why was the high schooler in the gun store?
If you'd throw an egg on a concrete floor, ...?
What do you call it when the robot from Futurama gets in a minor car accident while wearing a dress?
Why are dogs and engineers alike ?
Why did the dog scratch itself against the tree?
What's best about hiring an immigrant midget?
All these what?
What did president Obamas father say when he was born?
What do you call a dog with no legs and brass balls?
Why was Betty Boop never attracted to Mickey Mouse?
What is white and interferes with the meal?
Did you guys hear about that actress who stabbed her waiter with her fork?
What's the difference between rock and jazz?
What's the difference between herpes and friends?
Do you like this hotel?
Why did the car swerve off the road?
Hey, do you like wind?
After the man was named bishop by the church, what was his next move?
Why don't shrimp donate to charities?
Why did Bill Cosby go to the gynecologist?
Where do homeless accountants live?
Remember that AMA guy whose mother slept with him because he had broken his arms?
How do you start a rave in Ethopia???
Why did Sarah fall of the swing ?
What do you get when a basketball player gets a lung infection?
Why did the personal trainer break up with his girlfriend?
the average man takes just over 6 minutes to cum during sex, do you know how long it takes a woman?
What do you call a Mongol with an infectious skin disease?
Why do women only use putters while playing golf?
What do you call a stylish molecule?
What do you get if you turn an evil laugh backwards?
What do you call a chameleon that doesn't change color?
How did Harry Potter get down the hill...?
Would you rather have a threesome or dinner with your parents?
What do you call a horny man ghost hunting?
What did the astronaut say to the other when he pressed the wrong button?
What's the difference between a chair and an asshole?
Whats the greediest nut?
What did the Mexican fireman name his children?
What did the dog say after stepping off a sailboat?
How is a woman like a bar?
What do you call a black woman who flies a plane?
What weighs more a pound of bricks or a pound of feathers?
What do comic book collectors use in their hair?
Avocado or Donald Trump?
What did the pints say upon landing on Planet Metric?
Why did God have no sense of humor when putting the planets in order?
How do jews get around town?
Why are aspirins white?
What does Julius Ceasar say after sex?
Why Is A Man's Mind Dirtier Than A Woman's?
Why don't women run fast??
What's the difference between a BJ and reddit gold?
What do you call a group of chickens dressed up like crows?
What did the Muslim Sonic say?
What does a German say when you finally explain a funny meme to him?
What's a man's definition of safe sex?
What do you call a Chinese pilot?
Why do Americans spell colour as color?
Why didn't Helen Keller scream when she fell off the cliff?
What do you call a wandering cave man?
What did the banker say to the tongue when he rejected his loan application?
what type of swimming does a paedophile like?
How do I know you're not John Cena?
Bad Joke?
What's the best part of an ISIS joke?
What's worse than a fish in the SS?
How did the blind kid burn the side of his face?
Ever hear the joke about the 3 Irish guys who left the pub?
How long does it take for a White woman to take a crap?
What do you call an epileptic giving someone a pat-down?
How about that airline food?
A Mexican and a black guy are in the back of a car. Who is driving?
If H20 is on the inside of fire hydrants, what is on the outside?
Wanna hear a stupid joke?
What did Jaws call his solo banking firm?
Why one's dick can be only 11 inches long?
Why shouldn't you ever take directions from a Nazi?
Why is a roach clip called a roach clip?
What do a woman and a toilet seat have in common?
Why do you want your lawyer to be a U2 fan?
What does an agnostic, dyslexic insomniac spend his time doing?
knock knock......... who's there??
Why couldn't the two melons go to Las Vegas for their wedding?
What mammal dies after it mates?
What's the worst gift to give to an anti-vaxxer?
Who is the drummer for the Mexican Beatles?
Does the KKK still exist?
What do you call a jelly bear that died and came back?
What was the blacksmith's slogan?
Did you know Kim Khardashian's dad was a member of OJ Simpsons legal team?
Why is the mushroom so happy ?
Why is peter pan always flying?
What do you call a lesbian chicken?
What does a hippie say when he runs out of weed?
What did one shark say to the other?
If you're American in the Living Room, what are you in the Bathroom?
Why are rapists terrible at academics?
What did the doctor say to the strange beer that walked into his clinic?
Why is Jay-Z allowed to ride in the carpool lane by himself?
Why don't women parachute naked?
Why are monkeys such great friends?
What did the salmon say to his shy Japanese girlfriend?
Did you hear about the gardener that had an aneurysm?
Why did little timmy fall off his bike?
What is worse than finding a worm in your apple?
Why had the two algae never had sex?
what is the stupidest animal in the jungle?
did you hear about the freak birth at chernobil?
Why do they refer to network ports as female?
How did Helen Keller lose her arm?
What do fat people wipe their butts with?
Why was the midget fired from his job?
What was the last thing that went through the hostages head?
What did Dracula say to Frankenstein ?!?
Why does the alphabet like to piss on the periodic table?
What sucks about being an egg?
Do you know why Santa only work on the 25th of December?
Why are elephants big and grey?
What does a Texan do if he breaks up with his girl friend?
What did batman say too robin before they got in the car?
What do selfies make me want to do?
What's the difference between Einstein and Kim Kardashian?
Why did the doe give the faun an umbrella?
What does a pig put on it's nose for a sunburn?
What does it take to have a Beatles reunion?
Exam question: According to Germany how much is Greece worth?
What do you call it when you grind your teeth because you are bugged you forgot your dental floss?
What is the definision of mixed feelings?
What's the difference between a skeptic and a conspiracy theorist?
Why are Mumford & Sons the only agnostic rock band?
What did the black kid say to his mom when he had diarrhea?
Whats the best thing about dating a Cleveland Cavaliers fan?
What did the sea say to the river?
What's similar between a 9v battery and an asshole?
What do you call a gathering of Arthur's Knights?
How do you kill a 1 legged fox?
What is ISIS' favourite OS?
Why is Ariana Grande called Ariana Grande?
What do you call a bird that drunkenly conveys a compelling perspective on racial hatred?
What's the best thing about a penis?
Why was Joan of Arc never good in debates?
What do you call a Mexican cutting a Mobius Strip??
What's the hardest part about roller blading?
Why can't black people swim?
What's Gandalf's favorite band?
What did Reddit almost change their name to during the Victoria controversy?
Why was the lumberjack executed?
How's your day been?
What's the difference between a retard and a baby?
Have you heard about these new super-sensitive condoms?
Did you know Stevie Wonder got a cheese grater for christmas?
Why did the Germans bail the Greeks out?
How do you pick up Mexican Girls?
Why was the waffle jealous of the pancake?
Why did the guy get an erection when he saw a ruler?
What happens when Jack is angry with his beans?
How does a psychiatrist like his sausages?
How does a Facebook employee greet each other?
Why are there fences around graveyards/cemeteries?
What type of fossil fuel likes to tell dick jokes?
Why isn't there a Windows 9?
What do a walrus and a Tupperware container have in common?
What do you get if you cross Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Phillip?
How does NASA organise a party?
Why is a duck when it's round?
Why did the man have to sell his hospice?
Have you heard of the new Xman?
What is Donald Trump's favorite flavor of ice cream?
Why wasn't there a Captain America movie tie in videogame?
What happens when a neckbeard takes drugs?
Who's the only person known to have had sex with OP's mom?
Why did the blonde pull the dildo out before she came?
What's a gambler's favorite time of day?
What are some of your favorite Math (or Science) jokes?
What do you call a bee that lives in America?
Anyone know the difference between an oral thermometer and a rectal thermometer?
Grandma, how old are you?
Why are there so many jumpshots in the WNBA?
What do you say when German secret police is bugging you?
How much is your dick worth?
Wanna hear something really disappointing?
What do you call a magic door?
Which star do the dinosaurs like best?
What does Elvis say when he gets an infection that standard antibiotics can't treat?
What do you call a German taking a shower?
How does one enter a brothel in Westeros?
What's a trees favorite drink?
What do you call the ghost of a chicken?
How do you keep water warn in the winter?
What does a bunny do to a bank?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs, who can swim the English Channel?
What do you call graveyard shenanigans?
What's the difference between Reddit and Voat?
How many moths does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did hitler commit suicide?
What did the abacus say to the adding machine?
What did the lumberjack say to the trees?
Why did the angry Jedi cross the road?
Is your dad retarded?
What do religion and a penis have in common?
What does a rotting corpse say?
What do a married guy and a single guy have in common?
What does your wife/girlfriend want more than anything in the world?
What do you call a crowd-sourced internet database for turntables?
Did you want to row or paddle?
What did Father Buffalo say to Child Buffalo as he left for school?
What do you call a marine who can't swim?
Why doesn't a rooster wear underwear?
Why your fingers have spaces in between?
What do you say to a Jedi who stole your sicilian dessert?
What do you call a pedophile musician?
Why did the scarecrow win the Nobel prize?
How many kids with ADHD does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Which type of bees make milk?
Why did the pig avoid the cooking class?
What do they call American Liberty in Israel?
What did the pirate say when he turned 81?
What do you call a bra that tightens the more you try to take it off?
What does an identity thief look like?
What do you call an owl that does magic?
What's the capital of Zimbabwe?
What do you get when you wear wool socks in a tortilla chip factory?
Why are pirates funny?
What do you call soap for your ass-hole?
What sound does a horny toad make?
Why did the geologist's wife leave him?
Any recommendations for a new chiropractor?
What street in Paris is well-known for its transvestite community?
What do you call a relationship that never works out between guitarists?
What is another name for a Jewish guest?
What's Sauron's favorite soft drink?
How can you tell a mechanic recently had sex?
Why did the golfer wear two pairs of pants?
Did you know the pope really loves cats?
What do you call an expert on fishing hooks and lures?
Why did the cheeseburger fight the veggie burger?
What type of food do firefly's love to eat?
Why don't vultures eat at restaurants?
What did one coconut say to the other?
How did "El Chapo" escape prison?
You know what really gets my goat?
You heard about Pluto?
What is it called when you ride around on a horse asking people questions?
Did you hear about the nudists that attempted to forcefully take over a local beach?
What does a Knight do at night?
How do you make someone holy?
What do you call a fat model?
What's the answer for question #2?
You know why it's so difficult to put together a baseball team of egotists?
What do you call a Muslim slug?
Why did the dog fail his driving test?
What is the largest moth the world has ever seen?
What did Louis say to Clark?
how are bi planes different from regular planes?
Why should Donald Trump be grateful to Mexicans?
What do you call a dark or melancholy verse of text?
What was the first thing the emcee said at the pornography convention?
Why should you always bring charmander along when camping?
What do you call a country ruled by dank memes?
Why did the marble countertop leave the kitchen?
What do you call two chinese guys in a firebird?
What is big and hard when you put it in your mouth and small and soft when you take it out?
There were many docks along the seashore, but one of them couldn't handle itself and collapsed. Why?
Did you see the new clock porno?
Did you hear about the fire at the convent?
Where do otters come from?
Why did the Anti vaccinator leave the solar system?
Why did the lawyer refuse to take payment when defending the lead singer of U2?
Why was the drug dealer late?
What was Batman's greatest accomplishment?
What's black and does not work?
What do you call a group of eight cowards?
What has 9 letters and makes everyone mad?
Why Was The Canvas Maker Late Home From Work?
Why do high school girls always travel in odd numbers?
Why is there no point in sending medicine to Athiopia?
Two black men jumped off the building. Who reached the ground first?
What do you call a gay date mixer?
how do you start a rave in Ethiopia?
Why did the boy die when a car ran over his finger?
How many of my fellow Germans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What does the mafia and a girls pussy have in common?
What did one stegosaurus say to the other stegosaurus?
Did they ever identify that unknown female deer crime victim?
What do you call the chicken between the chicken thigh and the chicken wing?
What do nosy peppers do?
Q: Why are all black people fast?
What is the loneliest bayou in Louisiana?
What does Rolf Harris like to play with on the piano?
Who was the best boxer of all time?
What do you call the people that always are around musicians?
Whats the difference between a kink and a fetish?
Why does the sky cry sometimes?
Did you hear the one about the man who panicked when his friend started to drown?
What's the smartest kind of blonde?
How many rapists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the highest rated hotel in the world?
What's the difference between Amazon Prime and the Amazon River?
What is Josh Duggars favorite thing about 19 year olds?
What is the smartest fruit?
Did you know cats can jump higher than houses?
What did the lawyer say to the other lawyer?
Who killed the Corn Flake?
Why does Dr. Pepper come in bottles?
On a scale of 1-10 how retarded do you think we, as humans, are?
What's pink and sits on a piano chair?
What happens when you get more than you payed for with a Mexican Gigolo?
During the '72 World Series, who took the most balls to the face?
What side of a chicken has the most feathers?
What do you get when you cross an owl with a bunji cord?
What is the hardest part of eating a vegetable ?
How do astronauts say they're sorry?
What do you call a Mormon who switches religion?
what kind of pants does a monkey wear?
What is the ideal weight of a lawyer?
Which kid?
You hear about the guy they caught masturbating in the Law Library stacks?
What do you call it when you jerk off in the bath?
Why did Ayn Rand lose the pool tournament?
Did you hear the story of the Rabbi who lifted his synagogue into the air with a bunch of balloons?
Have you seen the news about the Seamus Costello Celebrity sex tape?
Why is there no scope for dealers/middle men in the field of extractive metallurgy?
Did you hear about the guy who died of a Viagra overdose?
What's the best part about having a deaf child?
What do you call a dog that goes to the beach?
What do you call a divorced FBI agent?
What was Ryu's response when someone asked if they could have his autograph?
What is the difference between a 5 and a 2?
What's the worst thing about Michael Jackson teaching your kindergarten class?
What's your favourite food if you hate Microsoft Word?
What does the alchemist do to please his girlfriend?
What is a rednecks favorite pie during the holidays?
Hear about all those Japanese people killing dolphins?
What happened when the mexicans wife passed out on a hot day?
What Do You Call A Winery In Alabama?
What do you call rude fungi?
What did the mexican do when he lost his car in the parking lot?
Why did Harry Potter's friends pick him up and pass him around on his birthday?
Did you hear the Bill Clinton has given up the saxophone?
What does a subatomic duck say?
Why are lilypads round?
What do you call an elf singer?
What gas is best dressed at a dinner party?
What do you call a very cold vodka?
Did a T Rex have two copies of each chromosome?
What would be the best color to make a joke about?
you know what really turns on a nerd?
What's 50 Cent's new name?
What's China's national colour?
How can you tell if you're racist?
Why are so many guys mean to their girl friends ?
What is the difference between a generalist and a specialist?
Why did the rapper scream into his Easter basket?
What did the Russian people light their houses with before they started using candles?
What did tie say to the hat?
What does a redneck do after she bangs her second cousin?
What receives a man's first blowjob?
What is that thing, which the maker cannot use, and the user cannot see?
Wana hear a Canadian joke?
What does a tech geek say when they're taking a shit?
Why can't Bane play baseball?
What was the ambulance saying when they were carrying Satoru Iwata?
What's the best part about dating a Patriots fan?
Why do thieves have such a hard time understanding sarcasm?
What's a redneck's favorite dating website?
How many feminists does it take to screw a vegan?
What's the Russian word for Internet outage?
What's the worst thing to say to an anorexic person?
Worst part about a dead puppy?
How did Ian Fleming become so wealthy?
Mom, why am I dark if my father's skin is alabaster and yours is too?
What do you call a Canadian in outer space?
How do you get banned from a subreddit without breaking the rules?
How can you tell if a picture was taken with a GoPro?
What do a pornstar and Godzilla have in common?
Why wasn't the aeroplane invented in China?
What did they say when they forgot to embalm Satoru Iwata?
Do dogs know about light switches?
How do you know you are sitting next to a ski instructor?
What did one businessmen voyeur say to the other?
Whit's the differ atween a rich Scotsman, a puir Scotsman, an a deid Scotsman?
What do you call a door only prostitutes use ?
Why do Jewish men have to be Circumcised?
Why did Kobe Bryant go to New Jersey after he got arrested?
How many confederate flag bearing husbands does it take to beat up their wives?
Have you heard the tagline for the new Ghostbusters movie?
Why is the letter 'B' commonly regarded as a pervert in the alphabet?
Why don't jokes in base 8 work?
How do mute people tell each others secrets?
Wasn't gay marriage always legal?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and pimples?
What did the Italian dressing say to the French dressing?
What do people typically get at Whole Foods?
What did Han Solo say when Leia asked for help with a crossword clue?
What's the difference between a wife and a dog?
How did Jesus get his beach bod for the summer?
Do you know why you will never go hungry in the desert?
Why didn't the blond want to use her phone while using the bathroom?
What's the difference between an epileptic corn farmer and a prostitute with Diarrhea?
What are the three most important things to an orthopedic surgeon's business?
Why don't you mess with one-ply toilet paper?
Did you hear Lorena Bobbitt died in a car accident?
How does a Mexican wrestler enter a room?
Why Did Princess Diana Cross The Street?
Why was number 6 scared of number 7?
What does a duck say when it goes to the doctor?
How does a lawyer name their kids?
Why do pedophiles love reddit?
What did Tony Abbott do when he heard Denmark had surplus wind power ?
What is the gardener's favourite fruit?
What is the worst animal std?
How much cum can a gay guy make?
What's a good treatment for insomnia?
What do you call an Indian man with motivation?
What does a lesbian pirate say?
Why do failing college girls always screw their professors?
What's a Lumberjack's favorite drink?
Did you hear about the erectile dysfunction support group meeting?
A Portuguese, a Greek and a Spaniard go into a bar. Who pays?
Do you know which place has the highest concentration of Jews?
Where do bees go to the bathroom at?
What did the Grateful Dead fan say when he ran out of pot?
What do you call someone who's got a horse for a mother and a fruit for a father?
Did you hear the submarine construction business closed down?
What did the group of unborn babies say when they were hungry?
Why should you date a Greek woman?
Have I been shadow banned?
Why is there no market for white tires?
What is faster than silver surfer?
what did the boy with no arms get for Christmas?
Did you hear about the reusable condoms?
What's a sports fan's favourite disease?
What did hitler say when he smashed his thumb with a hammer?
What do you call someone who masturbates on a plane?
Did you here about the IKEA corporation getting away with having that guy killed?
What do you call a dinosaur with good dental hygiene?
Why do happy people like to sleep in late?
What do you call an Indian bloke in a submarine?
What's pale, lives in darkness and sucks blood?
Have you heard the one about the deaf guy?
What did the egg say after he was put in a pot of boiling water?
Knock knock. Who's there? Benjamin. Benjamin Who?
Why have the Chinese not got telephone directories?
What does a blueberry do at a party?
What did the Mexican name his two dicks?
A Portuguese, a Greek, and a Spaniard go into a brothel. Who pays?
Do you know Forest Gump's Facebook password?
What does a gay crow say?
What do you call a German who is up themselves?
What do my jokes have in common with toilet paper?
Who am I?
What do you call a lesbian with big hands?
Why did the brothel only employ ugly prostitutes?
What do Hispanic midgets cut their pizza with?
What's the correct instrument for measuring how fat your mom is?
What do you call a whiny dog?
How come Greek salad doesn't have any lettuce?
What do you call a Pirate you share an apartment with?
How does one cook toilet paper?
What worse than finding out your wife has cancer?
What's Ron Jeremy's favorite shape?
Why did Bill Cosby go to Japan with a bag of roofies?
Why did the company hire the glutton?
Why did the accountant cross the street?
Why do teen girls travel in groups of three?
What a greek says as he get his paycheck?
What was the last thing that went through Lady Diana's head, moments before the crash?
How do you get a tree pregnant?
How long does it take to drive across France?
Why couldn't the clown make balloon animals for the children?
What are 3 naked woman on a crate of beer?
Why was epsilon afraid of zeta?
What's Jared's favorite ingredient for his Subway sandwiches?
You know what would be a good name for a cocaine delivery service company?
How many birds does it take to change a lightbulb?
Which porn video release are you most looking forward to?
What is a caterpillar afraid of?
Did you all hear about the new terrorist group called Al-paca?
What is Forest Gump's email password?
If you use a meat tenderizer to repeatedly hit a backless bar chair does it become a stool softener?
Whats 2 + 2 ?
How long does it take light to travel from the sun to the earth?
Why do jews have big noses?
Did you hear about the penguin that flew?
What's brown and screams?
what happens when you're singing in the shower and get soap in your mouth?
What's the best part about Subway sandwiches?
Why are atheists so light?
What did one renewable power source say to the other?
What's Mozart doing?
What do kids yell at old people who are just trying to play?
What do you call a serial killer who can kill with both hands?
What's the difference between a baby and A goat?
What's Jared's favorite Subway bread?
How do you know If your girlfriend is Canadian?
Why did the chicken kill itself?
Why were Porn Stars not affected by the recession?
Why didn't Jarred order the meatball sub?
Did you hear about the cow that jumped over the barbed wired fence?
why arnt there any walmarts in the middle east?
Why do the homies call their friend Paragraph?
What did the dementia patient say to the other dementia patient?
Why did Sauron buy the sedan instead of the coupe?
What do you get when you leave a dog inside a car when it's 100 degrees outside?
What do you call 4 dicks tied together?
What do you call a guy with no hair named Gary?
What's the advantage of being black in Africa vs black in America?
What did one Japanese man say to the other?
Did you hear Jared Fogle was arrested for child pornography?
How do you measure a Lego minifigure's shoe size?
Name and Address?
Why did Santa want a divorce?
Did you hear about the guy who was caught having sex at Sea World?
Why do white girls hang out in odd numbers??
What do women and dog shit have in common?
What kind of pants does Super Mario wear?
Was Hitler really such a bad guy?
Why wasn't Jesus born in the United states?
How do you turn tap water into holy water?
What does a 75 year old woman have between her breasts that a 25 year old doesn't?
[engineering] what kind of fight sees two fighters enter the ring and only one leave?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's new limousine?
How do you have a rave in Greece?
Who would want a "Semi" tattoo on their colon?
What does oral sex and being in the mafia have in common?
What do you call a seizure you have while mining?
What do you call a theft by a stumbling person?
What would Hitler have said to the Jews if he were a Keynesian economist?
What is the difference between a Lannister and a Greek?
What do you call a marathon runner that refuses to stop?
How did Stevie Wonder respond when asked how he coped with being blind?
How many seconds are there in a day in Africa?
Why can't Albert Einstein drive?
Why do maxi-pads hate tampons so much?
Why did Subway take Jared so seriously?
How did the woman feel after her legs were amputated?
Did you hear the one about the gynecologist who was looking for a job?
Why were people in the Twin Towers so upset?
Why did the artist go to the bakery?
What do you give a Greek man with a scratchcard?
What do you call fat people eating McDonalds?
What do Canadian squirrels eat?
Why are chickens never virgins?
What do you get when you cross Tesla and Thomas Edison?
What happens to eskimos who sit on the ice too long?
What peanut butter do total dicks eat?
What does a greek say when gets his salary?
Shout out to /u/Flame mech for inspiration. Why was the violin coach arrested ?
What did the black Jesus say to the black Black Buddah?
How do you fit 4 queers on a barstool?
what sport does every hacker enjoy?
What's got 8 feet and 10 shoes?
Did you hear what the Feds found at Jared Fogle's home?
Did you hear that Jared from Subway was caught up in a child pornography investigation?
What did the blind kid get for Christmas?
What do you call a bulimic tree?
Why was the ukelele teacher put in jail?
Ever ask yourself who, in a perfect world, would raise a child?
Why shouldn't you take away a hobos shit?
Wanna know a joke?
You know why men die earlier than women?
What is the difference between an old bus depot and a lobster with boobs?
Did you hear about the strawberry jam and grape jelly hooking up?
Why did the Cephalopod get coal for christmas?
How does a woman know she's sleeping with a forklift driver?
What do you get when you have Tiger Woods, Stephen Hawking, and Dwayne Johnson in the same room?
What do you call a gender confused toddler?
Greeks lined up for ATM?
What happens if you spin an oriental person around really fast for an extended period of time?
What kind of dog is the quietest?
Did you hear about the tennis star who hit his wife?
What does a north Korean and a ginger have in common?
What do you use to cover a herpetarium floor?
What is a pedophile's favorite shoe?
How do you take your coffee?
Are you all right?
Why did the female warrior prefer the armor smith over the weapon smith?
Why wouldn't the Kabuto share his Potion?
Have you heard about Reddit OP having a miscarriage?
What is a 6.9?
What do you call someone who is not nice?
Why did Shakespeare refuse to join the army?
Why are Canadians atheist?
What functions worse than the US Government?
How many New Yorkers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a child who shoots with twigs at a PTSD victim?
Why are there different species of hyena?
What's the difference between the United States and a yogurt?
Did you read the article about the automated journalist?
Why would Ellen Pao not do her own AMA?
What do you get when you mix a Mexican and an octopus?
What's the last thing you want to hear when you're blowing Willie Nelson?
Did you hear the one about the man who let a firework off on top of his head?
Why is the US so much better at the accurate placement of round objects than Japan?
What does a Jewish guy say when he's making eggs?
What dictator had the best bureaucracy?
What did the Japan team say after the first half of the Women's World Cup?
What do you call Triple H practicing for a WWE match?
What shoes does ninjas use?
How did the media find out that princess Diana had dandruff?
What does the Starship Enterprise have in common with toilet paper?
Why did Microsoft skip windows 9?
Where do Irish people go for breakfast?
What do you call fireworks that don't work?
What did the Jamaican say when he lost the smelliest feet contest?
Why did the hipster burn the roof of his mouth?
What religious group does reddit belong in?
What do you get when you cross a sheep with a robot?
Why does /r/fencing suck so bad?
Why was the washing machine laughing?
What is punctuation's favorite curry?
Where does Neckwear go on vacation?
What did Donald Trump say to the Mexicans?
Why did Mary fell from the swing ?
How do you know if you're a bogan?
Why do elephants have four feet?
What do American beer and sex in a canoe have in common?
Why can't a bicycle stand on its on?
Where does Santa's stripper mom work?
What do you call porn with transgender midgets?
Why did the tree keep getting grounded?
Why does Hillary Clinton want to be president?
what is the most terrifying sound to a redditor??
What is potential energy's favourite season?
What is R. Kelly's favorite group to feature?
What do you call the beginning of a porno?
Why r/Jokes has too much tiny jokes?
What do you call a party with 7 girls & 70 midgets?
What would a reddit restaurant be called?
When do cops blow up and destroy shopping centers and Walmarts?
What's a police officer's favorite party game?
Where do shadowbanned Redditors go?
What did Victoria say to the tailor?
What did Marily Monroe and Lee Harvey Oswald have in common?
How is having a new dishwasher at a kitchen job like being in the Matrix?
Whats the difference between a retard and a woman?
Did you hear that they upgraded the lighting system on the Goodyear blimp?
What does a woman's A**hole do when she has an orgasm?
Why did Ellen Pao try to sue the users of Reddit for gender discrimination/ sexual harassment?
What did the cat say when the delivery man was leaving?
What's Pao's favorite Chinese dish?
How does a nucleus get out of prison?
How many SJW's does it take to fix a lightbulb?
Why did Ellen Pao punch the puppy?
What is Ellen's favourite food?
What do goats do on election day?
Why did the melon insist on having a big wedding?
What do Steam users and Reddit admins have in common?
What does rappers eat for breakfast?
Why Adolf Hitler is a bank robber?
Why does America not have knock knock jokes?
What's Reddit's new favorite movie?
Funniest YouTube channel?
Who fancies going to Tunisia?
Hello Alcoholics Anonymous?
What do you call a cat who steals someone's identity?
Why was Disney's massage parlor so successful?
Why do redditors hate Ellen Pao as CEO?
Do you know what happens when gay marriage is legalized?
Where is Victoria working now?
How do you escape a fascist authoritarian regime?
Why did they fire Victoria?
What do you call it when your lizard doesn't know how to use the internet?
What's the difference between Ellen Pao and a pitbull?
Which Dinosaurs love electricity?
Did you hear about a reddit user creating a new website?
What's brown and Rhymes with Snoop?
How many reddit admins does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between Ellen Pao and a catfish?
Did you hear that sugar is magic?
Do you want to have a home?
Why is masturbating in France like cooking an egg?
What sound does a bloated dead horse make when you beat it?
What has a slice of burnt toast and a pregnant girlfriend got in common?
What did the army recruiter say to the gay wizard?
How do you get rid of a Reddit admin?
What happened on Reddit yesterday?
What do people hate about CEOs of big internet companies?
How do you catch a politician?
What sound will reddit make when it blows up?
Why was the G-Spot Club not making profit in the nightclub business?
What do you get when a topless blonde rubs suntan lotion on a topless brunette?
Why didn't the French soldier fight in the battle of France?
Since reddit is nearing its demise, how do i cash out my gold?
What Do You Call An Arab Dinosaur?
What does it sound like to shoot yourself in the foot twice?
Who's Batman's greatest enemy?
How could Donald Trump support Mitt Romney?
What do you call the game that centres around weak leadership?
What do you call someone in the army that knows the capital of every country on earth?
What did the reddit admins say to the mods?
What sound does Reddit make when it blows up?
What do you get when you cross Batman with Mountain Dew?
What has shadier inner workings, Reddit or FIFA?
Why did the bear eat his phone?
What do you call a powerful, asshole-ish potato?
Whats the difference between reddit and hell?
What goes CLOP CLOP CLOP BANG BANG CLOP CLOP?
To you Star Trek fans: what does the Star Ship Enterprise and toilet paper have in common?
How do golfers get away with cheating?
What is a rift valley?
Why does Piglet smell so bad?
Why did the water turn into steam?
What do you get when you put a root beer in a square glass?
Have you heard of the band 150 megabytes?
Why did Luke Skywalker never really know his father?
Did you hear about that vampire that's never tasted blood?
Have you heard of corduroy pillows?
What do you call a baby pizza with epilepsy?
How can you tell if someone does crossfit?
What does the ISIS donkey say?
A giant and a midget are asked how did they get so tall and short?
What did the dinosaur say to the caveman?
What type of dog leaves a mark?
What was Hitler's least favorite holiday?
Why can't guys do the splits?
What is green and 2 meteres beneath the ground?
Why are all computer scientists such pessimists?
Why doesn't Michael Jackson play chess?
I have glasses but cannot see. I have feet but cannot walk. What am I?
Why doesn't God like fruitcake?
Which insect do asian people eat the most of?
Why didn't the penguin jump off the iceberg?
Why'd Sally fall off the swings?
What was the vegan craving when he got bit by a zombie?
What did the cow say to the police officer, giving a speeding ticket?
Why did the girl fall off the swing?
Why did Papa smurf go to the aviary?
When you neutralize an acidic solution in a titration, what do you do?
How many teenage mutant ninja turtules does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Where do suicide bombers go when they die?
What do you call a Hawaiian homosexual?
What are a plumber's favorite shoes?
How did Jesus get those sexy messiah abs?
Why was the guy wearing the fedora upset?
Why do the French like Easter?
Why didn't the bear go to college?
What did the limestone say to the geologist?
When a boy falls, what does he fall against?
What is meant by 'a pull factor'?
What do you get when you cross a stock broker, a detective, and an alligator?
Why don't Canadians wear tank tops?
How many dancers does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Jesus come to Earth?
What's the difference between Greece and a good software application?
Why are highly successful people named Mark always so depressed?
When someone has Taken your car who should you call?
What do you call someone who begs for a free copy of "Return Of The King"?
What do you get when you pour hot water down a rabbit Hole?
What do you call a Snorlax that wants to win a race?
What is the date in Germany/Brasil today?
What does a Muslim redneck wear?
What happens when you accidently add an extra p to tp?
What do you call it when a stripper works for free?
What did the man say to his penis when it offered him a fight?
What animal should you never play cards with?
Do you know why the European stock markets are sliding down?
Why don't ants go to church?
What did the Circle say to the Square on the bus?
What did the insurance company say to the applicant?
May I have a quick word with you?
What's the difference between a crackhead and a methhead?
What do you call an anorexic with thrush?
Whats this new apple product I keep hearing about?
What is the best way to lose money?
Why did the female war reenactors need to throw away their costumes?
How did the scuba-diver pay for his drinks?
What does Jimmy Buffett's chicken say?
What's the most confusing day in Harlem??
Where do Muslims go after their Friday prayer?
What’s Darth Vader’s corrupt brother’s name?
Why chicken commit suicide?
What is Pitbull's favorite restaurant?
What would you call a terrorist organisation run by wielders of the dark side of the force?
Whats the most essential part of telling a joke about terrorism?
What did Santa say at the brothel?
How do you make a gay person angry?
Why did a surgeon go to prison?
What do you call Nitrogen after the sunrises?
Whats long, brown and sticky?
Why wasn't the pirate invited to the movie theater?
What do Jaqen H'ghar from Game of Thrones and Christina Aguilera have in common?
What do you call a crazy judge?
what's harder than closing your blinds?
Did you hear about the Crucifixion victims?
What do you call lying furniture?
Why is outer space so cold?
Where do sick boats go to?
What do you call a galaxy full of Brazilians?
What do you call a man with no arms and legs that falls into a body of water?
Why was purple jealous?
What is the difference between a Lira and a Dollar?
Y'all notice how Tumblr is full of people blogging about guns?
How do you confuse a feminist?
What did the penis say to the condom?
why is a divorce so expensive?
What do you call a snobby felon falling down the stairs?
What do you say to a feminist with no arms or legs?
Have you ever thought about dying instantly?
What's the longest word in the world?
Why did Ted get fired from his job?
How did the Italian chef break up with his girlfriend?
Q: What do blondes and beer bottles have in common?
Why isn't Kanye West allowed in rural Pennsylvania?
What is hot, carbon-dated and buried deep inside Georgia?
What does a mathematician get from a day at the beach?
What is large and grey and shoots tourists in Africa?
Where did Little Suzie go when the bomb hit?
Why should you tell bad jokes to cocaine addicts?
How did the baker put his opponent in checkmate?
What's the difference between a school of children and a terrorist camp?
Which actor is best suited for a programmer role?
I don't understand why fat people get so much hate?
You hear the one about the gay judges?
What is the car that everyone sleeps in?
What's a Rastafari's least favourite product?
Was Jesus Gay?
What happened when the husband tried to deep fry his wife?
What do you call a master at guessing Anime characters?
Why do black people like the rain?
What's a Vikings favourite dance?
What do gay marriage and the World Series have in common?
What's the difference between Jelly and Jam?
Why did the SpaceX rocket explode?
Why are lesbians such poor cooks?
What does train tracks and breast have in common?
Why did the star go to the bathroom?
Did you hear what the Kathmandu?
What do Mexicans call a commando?
what is the mods favorite joke?
Did you hear about that African-Asian summit?
Do you know whats black on the bottom and white on top?
What do you call Indian flowers?
How is Christmas just like another day at the office?
What serious crime has Michelle Obama done?
Did you know you can see through Caitlyn Jenner?
What do you call a musician without a girlfriend?
Whats the difference between Mashed Potatoes and Pea Soup?
You hear what they are calling Bruce Jenner's new TV show?
Why did they name the T-Rex in Jurassic World Rexy?
*REQUEST* Anyone know any good "show me a ..." jokes?
Why are flowering plants such good test takers?
Hey, wanna hear a Jew joke?
What do you call a cow stable in Egypt?
Why couldn't the feminist change the light bulb?
What did the Nazi without a car say?
A Mexican has 2 kids. He names the first one Jose. What did he name the other?
How do Mexican cut pizza?
What's the difference between a pizza and a baby?
Who was the most active of the chinese khanes?
What do gays and republicans have in common?
How long is a short circuit?
What do you call ten thousand pastors setting themselves on fire in protest of marriage equality?
What does a half-dressed Sikh wear on his head?
How do you tell a chemist from a non-chemist?
How do your trigger a SJW?
What are gay people's favorite pizza?
Why do cow wear bells?
What does a sassy ghost say?
What do you call a smart mexican?
What do you call a stealthy gay guy?
Whats the difference between pork and beef?
What's the difference between a seal and a sealion?
Why did the Mexican take xanax?
What does a Pirate say on his 80th Birthday?
What is green and has wheels?
Where does a king keep his armies?
what's the best part of living in Sweden?
What's red and orange and looks great on hippies?
What console does god use?
Why did the lesbian cross the road?
Why is steak harder to cook than spinach?
What did Dora say when Swiper got ahold of her tinder?
Why did the IT Admin marry Sally?
Ever wondered why there were no knock knock jokes about America?
How many ants does it takes to fill an apartment?
How do you get rid of chewing gum in your hair?
What do you call someone who takes everything literally?
Why did the opossum cross the road?
Why does Snoop Dogg wear a condom?
What do you call a train when it's eating?
What's the difference between a paddling pool and a swimming pool?
What do the mafia and 69 have in common?
What do you call a baby born at 4 months gestation?
Why is the number 6 always angry?
Why doesn't Jesus play volleyball?
What's the similarity between a blonde and a tornado?
Why did the orange stop in the middle of the road?
Want to have a haircut like Jesus?
What do you call Stephen Hawking before he got motor neuron disease?
Usian Bolt's favourite country?
What was Cambodia's biggest export in the 90s?
What does walking a tightrope and having period sex have in common?
What is it called when Batman abandons Gotham city?
Why did Mr. Steaks decide he would take his wife's surname?
What's the ultimate rejection?
What did Russia say to Ukraine after the conflict was over?
What do you get when you ask for a Roman pinch hitter?
What do you call a fruit that is a vegetable?
What's the most difficult thing about roller-blading?
What's the difference between a Harley Davidson and a vacuum cleaner?
What do they do with Tickle-Me-Elmo's before he leaves the factory?
What's your favorite racial (but not racist) joke?
Why are people with celiac disease more likely to get into heaven?
How much steel can a dank meme melt if a dank meme melts steel beams?
Why should've Christians chosen farts over bread?
What does a Russian call a product on clearance?
What is the difference between a black guy and a couch?
What did the Amish IT guy say about the computer?
What concert ticket costs 45 cents?
What's a questionable hole blocker?
If you could travel the world with only one person, who would that be?
What do you call Batman when he skips church?
Why did the junkie walk into the pet store?
Hey should we dry out these grapes?
Do you want a quick joke?
What's the difference between a pregnant lady and a light bulb?
What do you call a poster of a sexy pepper?
Why do a lot of math nerds wear glasses?
Why was the hippo afraid to go skiing?
How do you know a gypsy woman is pregnant?
What do you get when you mix a Mexican with an octopus?
Did you hear about that actress that stabbed herself? Reese something?
Why are vacuum cleaners made by gays the best?
What would Jesus say if you angered him?
What is the best way to pass the time on Tatooine?
What goes clip-clop clip-clop bang!?
Do you think you are stupid?
Why are Plumbers always so tired?
What do accountants use for birth control?
What do you call a person who never passes gas in public?
What do you call a wanderin' nun?
Did you hear about the three-legged dog that never won an argument?
What's grey, yellow, grey, yellow, grey, yellow, grey, yellow, grey, yellow, grey, yellow?
Where do generals keep their armies?
What's one thing that a canoe will do that a Jew won't?
What's a boxer's favorite part of a joke?
What's the difference between a high-wire circus trapeze act and the Rockettes?
Are you a fan of nintendo?
I can't remember what age I am?
Did you hear about the pirates who became shoe shiners?
Is there a shorter word for monosyllabic?
Two guys are fighting, who should get the last painkiller?
Why shouldn't you make jokes about dwarves giving fellatio?
What did the cow say in winter?
Did you know cat's are impervious to most rattle snake bites?
Hermione Granger: What can I wear that won't make me look fat?
What do you call a starving robot from space?
Why did Kim Jong Un's father go to hospital?
What do you call a woman drowning in money?
What do you call three Egyptian women in a bathtub?
Who is ant man's worst enemy?
What do you call someone who only tells knock-knock jokes?
What did the Hawaiian terrorists say when they blew up a restaurant?
How did people charge their phones before electricity?
What do Canadian banks and psych wards have in common?
How do you tell the difference between a Fabric Designer and a Science Professor?
You know what the hardest thing about rollerblading is?
Where did the Nazis send the Juice?
What's black and doesn't work?
This may be one all of you have heard, but what do Eric Clapton and coffee have in common?
What do bad photographs and the Irish famine have in common?
What do you call a group of animals who decides to kill themselves?
Did you hear about the man who found a dollar in his beer?
Why did the dinner roll spend his afternoon knocking on doors?
What do you call a British circle jerk?
Guess who's been sober for 10 months?
What was an elephant doing on the freeway?
What does Hitler do on a windy day?
What's the lawyer's favorite fruit?
What does a Mexican use to cut pizza with?
What do you call a cat who takes a shortcut in a race?
Why do midgets love playing soccer?
What is a wok?
Are you sure that only fools are unarguably convinced?
What do you call a dinosaur from the Middle East?
-Where is your wife ?
A gynecologist and a pizza delivery man. What do they have in common ?
What do Pizzas and parents have in common?
What starts with an 'M', ends with 'arriage', and recently made me the happiest man alive?
What is Biz Markies favorite farm animal?
How do you get 100 Canadians out of a swimming pool?
Did you hear about the kidnapping in the park?
What do you cal a wine hangover?
Why didn't Greece vote for Tyrion?
What do you call an apathetic Russian?
Call out to CAN_ZIGZAG: what do they call it when a mechanic frees up a stuck gearshift?
What is the Sun's favorite type of music?
What is every bodybuilder's favorite city?
What is a Sloth's favorite breakfast food?
Why is there such a big contrast between Greek yogurt and regular yogurt?
How much sex does one of God's brides have?
What do you call a Mexican who can't find his car?
What do you call Hindu ideas about pacifism?
How do you spell Canada?
What was Abraham Lincoln's seating preference?
What time does Sean Connery arrive at Wimbledon?
Whats long, green, and smells like pork?
how do you confuse a blonde?
Why was the ghost late to the halloween party?
What do The Walking Dead and the Fast and Furious series have in common?
Did you hear about the time Hitler and Stalin shared an apartment?
Who invented the knock knock joke?
How does the quadriplegic cross the free way?
Guess What Happens When Ur WIFE Gets ROMANTIC While U Taking a Poop ?
What do you call a Jewish gentleman with a healthy sperm count?
Did you hear about the workers who couldn't stop making subway sandwiches?
What do waiters want most after dinner?
How heavy is the moderation on this sub?
Hey friend wanna hear a joke ?
How do you make Canadians?
Why was Skippy falsely imprisoned?
Why did Plato's worst student always have stuff stuck in his teeth?
Are you looking for work spreading the word of Jesus?
What do we say to the god of procrastination?
Are you frome Tennessee?
If H2O is inside a fire hydrant, what's outside of it?
What's a 90's kid's favorite salad?
What happens when you give an Autobot a blowjob?
Did you hear Caitlyn Jenner got a new cat?
What is an astronaut's favorite power tool?
What do you call cheese that's not yours ?
What's blue and doesn't weigh much?
What do you call a robbery of Italian ice cream?
How many potatoes does it take to kill an irish family?
If you had bad legs, why wouldn't you want to be a college professor?
What did Barack say to Michelle when he proposed?
How many Einsteins does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does Batman do on Father's Day?
Why is women's soccer so boring?
What do you call an elderly burglar's vagina?
Why did the Catholic church decide to abandon science?
Where do you find a liberal at a convention?
I get wetter as you get dryer. What am I?
What kind of fish has no father and looks like shit?
Why does Carlos Mencia love r/jokes?
Why did I spill root beer on a DNS server?
Why do girls always get mad when I try to read their shirts?
What do you call a singer who enjoys spicy food?
Mom, have you seen my turtle?
Who do Canadians call when their car breaks down?
Why does everybody hate tampons?
Why can't an eel and an eagle team up?
Why do Jihadist Muslims drink only instant coffee?
What's the difference between a chestnut and a walnut?
What do you call a Jewish man, mid ejaculation?
Why was the terrorist masturbating on the plane?
Why did the Jamaican go to Syria?
What do hillbillies do on Halloween?
What's the difference between a vegetarian and a brony?
Why did the plant get sentenced to death?
Why did the chicken cross the road with a knife?
What do you call a duck that's a drug addict?
What did the jews not like about the Holocaust?
What did one hat say to the other hat?
You know why someone who's good at something is "The Shit"?
what do you call 4€ and 25 cents?
What's the difference between a battery and a women?
How come no one tries to blow up the Pope?
How do you make an internet addict wait?
Have you guys seen the movie about Flapjacks?
What has 6 arms, 3 legs, and 2 feet?
How many hipsters does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call 2 gay Irishmen?
Why is 'secret' such a popular password on Brazzers?
How many blind men would it take to change a light bulb?
Ddi Humpty Dumpty have a good winter?
What do you call a baby Muslim?
Why did sexual frustration impede the development of mathematics in Ancient Greece?
Do you want to hear a joke about sports cars?
How did Ramadan go?
What's the code name for a nitrogen molecule?
What did the child with no hands get for his birthday?
What Rock group has four men who don't sing?
Did you guys ever hear the peanut butter joke?
What's the difference between the NRA and ISIS?
What kind of fruit can't get married?
what do you call a Cow with no legs?
Why is it so hard to breakup with Japanese girls?
What do you call two doctors with colds?
What does Chick-fil-A and their CEO have in common?
Why did the redditor stand on a piece of fruit to check his weight?
What do you call two nuts on the wall?
What do you call an Fit Chick?
Did you hear about the crowd of Catholic priests at baby Gap?
Did you hear about the wheat farmer that got sent to jail?
Did you hear about the kidnapping at the daycare?
What do Jewish people drink after they spray tan?
What is the male cover band of The Cranberries called?
Why is gravity the weakest of the 4 fundamental forces?
What do you call a gay man's nut sack?
Why did the fatty cross the road?
What do you call Bill O'Reilly?
Why don't Jewish cannibals eat Germans?
Did you hear about the Chicken who went for his job interview?
What's a woman who always knows where her husband is?
Why is a Christmas tree like a bridegroom?
Why couldn't Helen Keller vote?
What can a mathematician and a pedophile agree upon?
What's another name for a ghost writer?
What's better than two roses on your piano?
Did you hear the one about the guy who could never remember the punchline?
How was marriage instituted?
What is better than Roses on a Piano?
Whats the difference between a black man and Batman?
(Not a joke) Can have some flairs for the type of joke?
What kind of sex toys do terrorists prefer?
What's the main difference between a man and a woman?
What does blue paint taste like?
What do you call a heard of sperm whales?
What did the scientist say when he found 2 isotopes of Helium?
Why do gyms produce the best Rebels?
How do you say nachos in English??
Whats the difference between jam and jelly?
What happens if an Asian gets stung by a bee?
Dad Joke - Did the melon get married without permission?
Why did the WTC get hit by Terrorist?
What do my ex and a box of chocolate have in common?
Whats a cannibals favorite game?
What do Chinese lumberjacks do?
How does Pocahontas celebrate her Cake Day?
Whats white and likes to shoot?
What do you get if you spray tan a bunch of Jewish people and throw them into Auschwitz?
How do you stop a woman giving you a blow job?
Why do Nazis hate Canadian summers?
What happened to the Russians and Austrians at Austerlitz?
What is the difference between a terrorist training camp and a Pakistani elementary school?
Q: Which is the most courteous State in the US?
How many fat people does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Olly call the manager for help, outside the store?
What do you call a French baker who sucks cock?
What do you call an angry black man?
How does Thor's brother like to party?
How does Frodo make his own food?
What did the SMG dad say to his son?
Did you know that Jose is an American name?
how much can you take?
What is the only thing easier to break than a Razer headset?
Why did Mickey Mouse get shot in the foxhole?
What's snoop dogg's favorite author?
Why did ygritte break up with Jon Snow?
What's the worst thing you can hear when Willy Nelson is going down on you?
Why does Bob Seger always laugh when he plays chess?
What does the B in Benoit B. Mandelbrot stand for?
Why did?
What's Jon Snow's favorite children's book?
Whats worse than finding a worm in your apple?
What do you call a confused baker?
Why did the lion eat the tightrope walker?
Why do nursing homes give men Viagra before they sleep?
Did you hear about the Mexican man who went to the old people home to visit his grandpa?
Why are there so many dogs at the pound?
Why did religion cross the road?
Two hippies, a man and a woman, fell off a cliff at the same time. Which one died first?
Why don't Buddhists have Instagram?
What is Polands national sport?
How did Donald Trump manage to stay away from the H?
When and where do chemists have sex?
What ever happened to Windows 9?
Why didn't Jon Snow skateboard?
What do you call a Wolfman who barks at a half moon?
Where can a hand refuel its car?
How do you stop a North Korean tank?
Why did Jon Snow buy an athletic cup?
Why are gay guys always butthurt?
Why should you never use r/television 's fridge to store mutton?
Where would you find more Leifs than in a forest?
Any good Jokes?
What happens when a Jew walks into a wall with a boner?
Do you know what the President said to Michelle when he proposed?
What is Vladimir Putins favorite food?
How do you pick up a jew?
Why do Nazis love Vinyls?
You know Michael Jackson had a pro baseball contract?
Why did Jon Snow stand in line for 6 hours at the Apple Store?
How many blacks does it take to change a light bulb?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl go to the bathroom?
What was the last thing that went through the Sandy Hook child's mind?
Guess what the sky said to the transmission tower?
What is the correct way to refer to an OP who resides in Europe?
How do you get 1000 dead babies into the bed of a pickup truck?
What is white a d 14 inches long?
Why does Arnold Schwarzenegger kill all the bugs at his ex girlfriend's house?
Did you hear that Michelle Obama banned reddit?
Oldie but goody... What's the opposite of Christopher Reeves?
How many police officers does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many gay guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Who is modern fiction's most notorious serial killer?
Have you heard about that new program that only the living can watch?
Why are people in jail always mad?
Is this funny?
Why did Jon Snow need a new battery?
Want to know what makes my johnson magic?
Why can't Miss Piggy count to 100?
Do you want to know what Jon Snow and yo momma have in common?
Do you want to hear a Knock Knock joke?
What's the difference between a hipster and a fire hose?
Why doesn't Barbie have any kids?
Where do poor people live in Italy?
Is having a penis easy?
Where do cousins come from?
What the difference between a pick pocket and a peeping tom?
What is the difference between a human dad and a moth dad?
Wenn ist das Nunstück git und Slotermeyer?
What do auditioning for an acting role and playing sports have in common?
What happens when you flip an 8 to it's side?
why are terrorists so popular at parties?
What do you call a coi fish that can't swim?
Guess what God said to Joan Rivers when she just arrived in Heaven?
Did you hear about the mathematician who’s afraid of negative numbers?
Why did the acronym buff decide to go join the etymologists instead?
did you know that the earth used to be 100% water?
What do do you call a Mexican rolling in the sand?
What's the difference between a corn farmer with epilepsy and a prostitute with dysentery?
What do you call a rooster who is okay with his wife screwing other cocks?
Why are Asians no good a football ( soccer) ?
Why can't truck drivers ever fully retire?
Why did the fisherman decide to go fishing?
Why can't Java programmers see well?
Why does Game of Thrones always kill off its main characters?
What's the difference between a hipster and a lumberjack?
What does DNA stand for?
Why is it the worst for Stevie Wonder when stopped by the police?
What do I have in common with neutrinos ?
What did the pianist do when someone smashed his piano?
What do you call someone who raises poultry?
What's the first thing you do when attacked by a gang of clowns?
What makes you special?
Q: What is the tallest building in the entire world?
What do you call a starving artist from 17th Century England?
What do you call a man who jokes that women always make mountains out of molehills?
What brand of Vacuum Cleaner does Snoop Dogg use?
What do Chefs and Murderers have in common?
did you know that protons have mass?
How many months have 28 days in a leap year?
What did the janitor say when he came out of the closet?
The worst part of being a pedophile?
How many dead hookers in a basement does it take to change a light bulb?
Whats the last thing to go through a bugs mind as it hits the windshield of your car?
What's the difference between a woman and a bowl of ramen noodles?
How many hippies does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call an Arab with a jet?
Do you have a turn down?
What is long, pink, and drags along the ocean floor?
What is the hardest part about breaking up with a Japanese girl?
What do you call a collection of Tyler Perry's movies?
What happened to the egg when it heard the joke?
Where do hipsters buy their clothes?
Why does VALVE end with 2?
Do you know what a 9V battery and an asshole have in common?
What do you call the guy who envies his friend's gelatin?
What do you call a pushy asshole potato?
Why does BuzzFeed skip every other number when counting?
Did you know Zimbabwe loves the rapper 50 Cent?
What do you call a depressed dog swimming in a pool?
Why doesn't Bono like Google?
What is blue and smells like red paint?
What do 'Free bird' by Lynyrd Skynyrd and my orgasms have in common?
Why doesn't God want to argue with Satan?
Where does Iron man get his e-mail?
What the difference between Reddit and other sites?
Why is the Champs-Élysées lined with trees?
Why did the cook go to jail?
Why was Joseph late to the meeting?
Why do hipsters love Raiders of the Lost Ark?
What's pirates' favourite meme?
What's the warmest organ in a dead woman's body?
Why is the hipster sweating?
What have you done wrong if the wife keep complaining when you try to watch TV in the living room?
If you could pick any superhero name and power, what would they be?
Why does a dog?
What do you call a belt made out of watches?
Did you hear about the murdered essay?
What makes Skrillex skillful at the chemistry lab?
What paint is most popular in modern buildings?
Why did the Chihuahua laugh?
Did you know that Chuck Norris's tears can cure cancer?
Which university has the most muslims?
What do you call a man with no arms, no legs, and is on fire?
What's the difference between a midget and a dwarf?
what did the horny man say to his girlfriend?
What do you call someone who is obsessed with a constant breeze?
What's Batman's favorite food?
What do lawyers and sperm have in common?
How do you find Will Smith in a snowstorm?
What type of transporter does Mr. Scott use?
Is it true that in Siberia, bears walk on the streets?
Why does lightning strike in France so often?
Why did the plane crash into the ocean?
What does a man eat when he cannot run off with his girlfriend?
What was the last phone call made from the Twin Towers?
Why does Star Wars Movies numbering scheme starts with 4,5,6?
what do you call a fat woman who has 28 men in bed with her each night?
What makes a black joke funny?
What do you get when you cross an Elephant and a Rhino?
You know what's been making headlines?
Why did the guitarist go to prison?
Why are black people unfair?
Have you heard of Evil Knievals brother Ku Klux Knievel?
Why was the double leg amputee sentenced to life?
Have you heard about the man with no dick ?
How can you tell that Caitlyn Jenner was once a man?
What did one orphan say to another?
Whats in the middle of girl's leg ?
Whats that when you keep moving constantly produces something white ?
Wha do you call when a whale gets circumcised?
What do you call a white woman that identifies as black?
Did you hear the one about the man who got swallowed by a whale?
What was the best thing Kurt Cobain ever released?
How many times can your grandmother orgasm per hour?
How does a neckbeard make a scotch egg?
Wife: Can you check the dryer?
What breaks when you give it to a baby?
What do you call a prisoner who's psychic,has dwarfism and escaped the prison?
Who is Bobby Long?
What do you call it when someone accidentally gives you a handjob?
How do you sink a norwegian submarine?
A Spanish-speaking sailor met Poseidon and asked the God of the Water if he was wet all the time?
What do you call a sexy BLONDE that understands what you're saying?
What do you call a lamppost in Niger?
Why did Jesus have to walk everywhere?
Did you hear about Ryan Seacrest's beard?
What do you get when you cross the world's most famous skater with the world's best physicist?
What do you find at an end of the rainbow?
Why is MetLife Stadium the windiest stadium in the NFL?
What did the bookshelf say when it looked in the mirror?
Why do black men weep when they make love to white women?
Why do black men smell bad?
What did the prostitute bring to the can drive?
Why is the topmost floor the best place to drink in?
What starts with e, ends with e, and only contains one letter?
How many 3rd wave feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is it so hard to learn the C programming language?
What's the shortest organ in a goat?
What is the main difference between real numbers and women?
What's a life without units?
What did Spock find in the toilet?
What does a stick of Big Red and a Jamaican prisoner have in common?
How come computers are soo smart?
Why did Ellen Pao cross the road?
What's the difference between an oyster fisherman with epilepsy and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What's better than winning a gold medal in the quadriplegic (crippled) Olympics?
Have you ever smelt moth balls?
Hear about the lady who backed into a fan?
What do you call bacon wrapped frog legs?
why do hens have no tits?
How do you spot a vegan at the gym?
What's the difference between a 6 month old and a 20 year old?
You know how I deal with migraines?
If a hipster falls in the middle of the woods and nobody is around to hear it, does it make a sound?
How many country singers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Did you here about the woman who got attacked by a gang of mimes?
Why are there no Wal Marts in Iraq, Iran, or Afghanistan?
What's the M0D's name before they're triggered; turning into a furious, putrid, lump of blubber?
How to you make an octopus laugh?
Did you know diarrhea is a genetic disorder?
What do reddit admins eat?
What is Will Smith's job ?
Q: What's a dinosaur's least favorite reindeer?
What is the number 1 pickup line at a gay bar?
What did the Chinese say to the American?
How does a cow quickly do math?
Whats the best part about having sex with Caitlyn Jenner?
Why does Ur anus look so smooth compared to other gas giants in our solar system?
How many fat people does it take to get a subreddit banned?
What is Ellen Pao's favourite piece of Malware?
(DARK HUMOR) Why can't Jesus eat M&M's?
How do furries have sex?
Knock Knock. Who's there? Knock Knock. Who's there? Knock Knock KNOCK KNOCK. Who is there?
Why did Hitler invade Poland?
What did capital 'O' say to capital 'Q'?
You guys wanna hear a joke?
When's the best time to see an optometrist?
Why don't suicide bombers bathe?
Does Caitlyn even have a vagina?
What do Angels fans and gay men both have in common?
Did you hear about the dyslexic baker who advertised a job vacancy?
Do you know what a gay snake sounds like?
Where can you find a turtle that has no legs?
What is Spiderman's perfect job?
You know what I call drowsy driving?
What do you call a confident chicken?
Where did bob go during the explosion?
Did you hear about the romantic comedy that has a cast consisting only of Vine stars?
What is the difference between a garbanzo beans and a chickpea?
Why do nuns always travel in pairs?
What was the name of Hitler's Political Party: A, B, C, or D?
Why wont Goldilocks drink a glass of water with 8 pieces of ice in it?
Would you guys buy Apple's new product for lumberjacks?
In the song "Fancy," why do Iggy Azalea and Charli XCX sing about getting drunk on the mini bar?
What do you call a female with down syndrome?
What do you call an ugly dinosaur?
What size bed comfortably fits a married couple?
Why did the dog go to the vets?
Did you hear about my cruel psychic Maths teacher called Moe who's great with a sniper rifle?
What do twenty blondes standing ear to ear make?
Two blondes went to a drive-in movie. What movie did they go to see?
What's better than eating a mandarin?
What is yellow and eats beetles for a living?
How can you call someone and sound fabulous?
Why don't the dutch have a space program?
What beverage should you give someone who is publicly intoxicated?
What does the farmer, looking for his tractor, say?
Why does Snow White turns yellow when she's angry instead of red?
What's the most boring cut of meat?
What do you call a charming tool?
Why was Sir Lancelot too tired to jump over the moat?
What else can you call pictures depicting children sexually?
What's your name?
Why are sandwiches better in space?
Q: What do you call a lawyer who has gone bad?
The difference between Chuck Norris and Bruce Lee?
What do scientists and vegetables have in common?
How many ghosts does it take to change one lightbulb?
What do they eat instead of "pigs in a blanket" in McKinney, TX?
What happened to Wendy from Wendy's?
What's the difference between an English pig and a French pig?
What's a pirate's favourite amino acid?
What's the difference between a joke and two dicks?
what did Spock find in the ships lavatory?
Why do they put cotton in the top of pill bottles?
Why do Ethiopian girls give the best head?
What does star trek and toilet paper have in common?
Wife: You said you'll keep me as a queen but you make me dig the farm all day. WTF is this about?
What did the Brontosaurus say to the Stegosaurus?
who is a skeletons favorite music artist?
What's long, hard, and has cum in it?
Why does Hellen Keller use two hands for masturbation?
What would you call it if Hitler was mad?
What's a divorce attorney's favorite dessert?
Did you hear the one about the three holes in the ground?
What’s the difference between cats and dogs?
What did the kid with no arms and legs get for Christmas?
What does a television have in common with a rabbit?
What is Beethoven doing right now?
What's his name?
What's pink and fluffy?
What killed the Wicked Witch of The West?
Why does a milking stool only have three legs?
What do you call a Chinese Podiatrist?
What do a woman and a grenade have in common?
Why don't many buddhists work in the railroad industry?
Have you ever smelled moth balls? Oh, you have?
How many guys wearing turbans does it take to change a light bulb?
How do you sabotage a space mission ?
What is the difference between a yogurt and america?
What's the difference between Hitler and cops?
Did you hear about that group of midgets suing the local bar?
What do you call a white athlete who wins a sprint vs black athletes?
How are Women and Hurricanes Similar?
How do you say no in German?
What's the best part about buying dishes that are made in Mexico?
How do you blindfold an Asian person?
Why don't dentists display their awards?
Why don't people raid dodo nests anymore?
Why did the Native American feel so reluctant about booking a hotel room?
Why are dogs in a lot of pain?
What do you call a shy rapper?
Ay girl are you a fire truck?
Why aren't cremations given out for free?
What do you call a stripper donkey?
What's the main ingredient when making pickle bread?
What did the boy octopus say to the girl octopus?
What's a Mexican pimp's favorite investment?
What Does Reddit stand for?
If you have a bee in your hand what do you have in your eye?
How can you tell that your dog just gave birth?
WHAT DO YOU GET WHEN YOU MIX A RETARD AND A FUCKHEAD?
What do you call a large group of prostitutes?
What kind of stationary can't you defend yourself with?
What do you call 2 people with identical penises?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl go to the restroom?
What'd they call that place with the collection of escape artist memorabilia?
What's the square root of sixty-nine?
What do you call two bees at the seaside?
Did you hear about the hermit in the storm cloud?
Why is Windows going from 8 to 10?
Why did Microsoft skip from Windows 8 to Windows 10?
Why is Grace never thirsty?
What did the Hispanic chef say when he went down on his girlfriend?
What did the vegan give the homeless guy?
What happened to the cow that jumped over the barbed wire fence?
How do New Zealander's find sheep in long grass?
Why can't some people help being born Chinese?
What do you and 1 ply toilet paper have in common?
What's the difference between a chick pea and a garbanzo?
What's at the beginning of the rainbow?
What was the butcher doing when he got caught?
How does ISIL prefer their eggs?
What do you see when a Native American Princess pokes a space smuggler in the chest?
You know what they say about wizards with big hands?
how do u do molly safely?
What happened when Moses went to Mount Olive?
What do you call a vegetable that's only kinda cool?
What do you call a snobish criminal walking down the stairs?
What do you call a robotic transforming Malaysian airliner?
Whats a really famous corn?
What do Disney movies and coathangers have in common?
Did you hear about the Pirate suffering from scurvy?
What do you get if you cross a dog with a sniper rifle and a car?
What did the man say when his boss asked him to deal with some potassium?
What do you call a couple of fat people that share the same interests?
What did Obama say to Michelle when he proposed?
What did the choir teacher say to the student who asked to use the bathroom?
Are they moving?
Wanna hear a construction joke?
Have u seen the movie "Constipated"?
What's the difference between North Korea amd South Korea?
What did 50 cent say to his grandma when he saw her knitting?
How can you tell when a bicycist comes to a complete stop?
What did the burger do when he ate his enemy the hotdog?
Why did the 3 year old go to jail?
Why should you never shower with Pokemon?
Why did the apple eat itself with a fork?
Did you hear about that kid who claimed that his age was 2015?
What will happen if you put anal lube where oil should be in your car?
What do you call it when a red head gets a tooth infection?
What do you call a Spaniard kissing a door?
Did you hear about the constipated Mathematician?
What do you get when you divide the circumference of a Jack o' Lantern by its diameter?
What do you call an arrogant con walking down the stairs?
What's the motto of the Mexican army?
What's the difference between a yoghurt and the USA?
How do you know if somebody does crossfit?
Science joke time! What happens if you're late to extremophile school?
What do you call a guy who plays Fallout?
Why is Uhura black?
Why couldn't the birthday clown make balloon animals for the children?
Why didn't the kayak owner and yacht owner get along?
What is the longest sentence in the English language?
Did you hear about the Irish guy who had fun in Limerick?
What's the best way to prepare baby food?
What is it called when a bunch of people, all under 5'2", go to a raging party?
Did you hear about the cyclopic tutor?
Why did the console gamer get a headache at the art museum?
What disease do Spartans get the most?
How did the guy with a foot fetish ruin his date with an amputee?
What has two arms,two legs and eats ants?
What's 9 + 10?
Why did the poor art collector only buy miniature paintings?
Why was Hitler kicked off the track team?
Why is sex with hipsters always unsatisfying?
What goes zzub-zzub?
Why didn't the panda use a glove when playing baseball?
What did the artist say to the dentist?
Is there a punchline to this chemistry joke?
What's the medical term for a female to male sex change?
Why did the sandwich shop sound terrible?
How many trans women does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the time that shallots, scallions, ramps, and leeks all got together?
What did the surgeon say when the doctor declined going out after work?
Did you hear about the contortionist that fell in love?
What's a female lizard's favorite song?
How many South Americans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How is marriage and CPR training the same?
How many Duggar does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Is that a gun in your pocket or are you happy to see me?
How do you eat soup with chop sticks?
What do you call a dating service for lumberjacks?
What smells better than it taste?
When you order a cocktail at a gay bar what do you get?
What is the difference between a cocktail and a dickbutt?
How do you call a dog with no legs ?
Why does an elephant have 4 Feet?
Why did Sepp Blatter cross the road?
What element can combine with two nitrogens and an oxygen, and still have there be only one element?
Besides coke residue, what other particles can be found on dollar bills?
What do you want on your tombstone?
Why do bears poop in the woods?
Do you know how I got out of Iraq?
Why do people studying engineering get to already call themselves engineers?
Why is it impossible to run through a campground?
Where can you find alcoholic sheep?
Did you hear about the drug addict who went to court for flipping off the cops?
Is your mum black ?
What is it called when Skrillex has a throat infection?
What do you get when you mash up an avagadro?
What do you call an international diamond monopoly turned Chicago football team?
What did the computer say to the pirate?
What happens to Stephen Hawking when he stops laughing?
What do you get when you cross an orchard with a concentration camp?
What did the uncircumcised man say during confession?
What made Bruce decide against Jacqueline for his new name?
Twat did you say?
Why do men scratch their balls?
Why do girls have legs?
What does being in the mafia and eating pussy have in common?
Why did FIFA have surgery?
Want a rabbit joke?
Where does bees wax come from?
How do you tell the difference between a redditor and a MOBA player?
How long does it take a black woman to take a shit?
What's the difference between period blood and sand?
Have you been to /r/brucejennerspenis?
Why do Women use perfume and make up?
Why did the dinosaur go to jail?
What's Irish and sits on your lawn?
Did you hear about the man who bought a dolphin?
Did You Hear that Iggy Azalea Got Engaged?
How do you know a car is from Poland?
What Did The Doctor Say To The Dinosaur?
In which sport does one white guy push around a bunch of colored guys?
Why can't there be a League of Legend's team of 5 Lucians?
Why are blood bank workers so good at correcting spelling mistakes?
What do you call ice cream that robs a bank?
Why is Microsoft going straight to Windows 10?
Why did the snowman pull down his pants?
Did you know Kurt Cobain had dandruff?
How many politicians does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is Latvian cross road?
Are the Nazis who fought in WWII veteran-Aryans?
Why did Caitlyn Jenner have a differently spelled version of Caitlin?
What's Pamela Andersons favorite soda?
If a man's signature is called a "John Hancock" what do you call a woman's?
Why do windbreakers smell bad?
What is the average Math teacher like?
My inappropriate uncle told me this one when I was 11: Where do cousins come from?
What does the pedophile jew say to the child?
Computer Joke: What do you call a fat man's jacket?
Have you heard of Charlie Sheen and Lindsey Lohans new sitcom?
How can you tell if a woman is bi-polar?
How do the Chinese decide on their next porn star?
What's the difference between an egg and a root?
Why is it so hard to break up with a Japanese girl?
What did the first stop light say to the second stop light?
What do you call the definitive book on Chinese culture?
How do you buy hair?
Which alligator lives in the arctic?
Why does Helen Keller only masturbate with one hand?
Whats the only fruit that can't run away to get married??
You ever hear about the guy who goosed the ghost?
Why don't you buy your wife a watch?
What will men do if women become extinct?
How do you make a baby float?
What was Helen Keller's favourite colour?
What does a Jewish pedophile say?
What do you call a horse at night?
Do you know what Twitter is?
What do you call Einstein masturbating?
What does D.N.A. stand for?
How can you tell the difference between ignorance and apathy?
You want to know a neat trick to get yourself to stop being annoyed by a baby crying?
What do you call a dead chicken that likes to throw things?
How do you fit 100 dead babies in a barrel?
Are trees really necessary?
What do you call a fake psychic who was found out and now shoots up in ditches?
What's a pirates favorite type of fish?
Why should we hire the chickpeas to be part of our choir?
What did the orphan get for Christmas?
Excuse me - can you tell me the way to the Staten Island Ferry?
Who is Chu?
What is headache ?
What sound does a Filipino horse make when it gallops?
What do you call the vehicle used to carry Henry VIII's second wife to the hospital?
What's the best part of a woman?
What's the worst way to lose your job?
Why being gay is a serious issue?
What is the opposite of progress?
Why was Einstein unable to build a wall?
What did the bird say when he flew over K-Mart?
what's the difference between a cow and 9/11?
What is the difference between phlegm and catarrh?
What is a zombie's favorite cereal?
How do you get down from an elephant?
What gets wet as it dries?
What goes in hard and dry and comes out soft and wet?
What did the robber with an errection say?
What do you call a car without a hood?
Kenya?
How did the Mongols get to Europe?
What happened when the cannibal ate a minister?
How does the modern-day James Bond prefer his women?
What do you call two Irish gunfighters in a duel?
Who could it be?
Do you have pet insurance?
How many US cops does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a Kryptonian who loves popcorn?
What do you call a plane with no wings?
What's worse than locking your keys in your car outside an abortion clinic?
What do you call an overweight Mexican?
If a centipede a pint, how much can a precipice?
What would be the American version of "Duck Quacks Don't Echo"?
What's the difference between a pile of dead babies and a Ferrari?
What do you call Minecraft in Germany?
What does a pedophile and McDonald's have in common?
What the difference between a filthy bus station and a crab with implants?
What's the similarity between Princess Diana and Ferrero Rocher?
What's Forrest Gumps Favorite Password?
Where does geography and geography meet?
How do college students exercise?
What do you get when you put resistance on a stove?
What is the one riddle that everyone gives up?
True or False?
Do you like fishsticks?
Why did the woman cross the road?
What do you call a happy Kia owner?
Why did the airplane no longer work?
What Do You Call A 7 Second Minecraft Video?
What do you call a turtle with a hard on?
What's the least spoken language in the world?
Why is six uncomfortable around seven?
What's the difference between a penis and a criminal?
Did you hear about the preganant comedian?
What do you call someone aroused by shopping?
Did you hear about the guy how lost his whole left side?
What's the difference between Reese and Tyrese?
Why did the skeptic man have high blood pressure?
How do French psychologists like their beverages?
How can you tell if a woman is wearing pantyhose?
What's the oldest age that a boy can have a circumcision?
Free shipping?
What's the difference between a German and a Virgin?
how many indians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How do you make an egg roll?
How will the Duggar's stay on TV and make money?
What do you call it when two gays fight?
What is the official fruit of gays in Texas?
What's white and troubles at breakfast?
What do you call a zoo that only has dogs?
Why does the German dad scare all the other kids?
What's the difference between a potato and a vegetable...?
What's a mouse's best friend?
How many moths does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What part of your punctuality emancipates the Chinese?
Why did KGB officers always travel in threes?
[OC] How does captain hook cook pita bread?
You know what's good about pirate hookers?
Do you know why consuming ants is good for your health?
What did the sorting hat say to the quadriplegic?
What kind of dog do IT people prefer?
What do you call ghosts commiting bank robberies?
Why would anybody ever want to visit New Brunswick?
You wanna read a joke about Sodium?
What is the Great Saiyaman's favorite Adam Sandler movie?
What does the Chinese Candy Crush Saga say..?
Who is the greatest Jewish cook?
What's the difference between hard and light?
Why did the Irishman wear two condoms?
Heard about the new Itailian all-weather tires?
What sex position makes the ugliest kids ?
How does Hitler tie his shoes?
Did you guys hear about the joke about the high wall?
What do you call Bob Marley when he wears glasses?
Why do women like men who can work on cars?
Did you hear about the dwarf fortune teller that killed two of his clients?
How do you get a stoner to comprehend what you're saying?
On a scale of 1 to fucked, how fucked is FIFA?
How many Viet Nam vets does it take to change a light bulb?
Why is Hellen Keller a bad driver?
How do Mexicans cut their pizzas?
Damn boy are you a banker?
What do you call a bullying competition?
What do you call an Englishman with an IQ of 50?
Why did the fish swim off of the waterfall?
Why do terrorist use Nokia phones?
What is the difference between the DMV, and a strip club?
What happens when Superman sees Superwoman?
What do you call a girl who stands in the middle of a tennis court?
You know why God loved Mother Mary so much?
Why do men like BMWs?
What 11 letter word does every Yale graduate spell incorrectly?
Where did little sally go after the explosion?
why don't you see elephants hiding in the trees that often?
What's the smartest animal on the farm?
What do you call a gay Irish couple?
How Are A Prostitute And A Pirate Ship Alike?
What do you call a mound of dirt that is uneducated?
Did you hear about the steak that was knighted by the queen?
Why do Trekkies never grow out of Star Trek?
Have you guys heard about the Pharaoh who thought he was the son of god?
What is batman's favorite food?
What is the difference between Issac Newton and the 5 year old i just stabbed to death?
What cheese is used to block online streaming?
Did you hear about the couple who got married in a gymnasium?
What do you call a Mexican who is high?
What do you call a super soldier that is in a coma?
What did the sign convention management do to the woman who kept pulling down their long signs?
Have you ever visited the area between Thailand and Vietnam?
What's the difference between a Democrat and a Republican?
So doctor how much time do I have left?
Why does a pterodactyl always urinate on the side of the bowl?
What is the difference between a drug dealer and a hooker?
Why does Caterpie like Margarine?
What did the Australian sea captain announce when he decided to wank with both arms?
What kind of trails does a crazy person travel?
Why did the boy want to see a thunder storm in Greece?
What do you call President Bush melting steel beams?
Why do scuba-divers fall backwards off the boat?
What does my girlfriend and Windows 8 have in common?
Did you hear about the guy that spilled curry powder in his bed?
What does Pluto have up on Palestine?
What did George Takei say to the attractive Frenchman on waterskis?
What happens in a chinese restaurant when the power goes out?
How do you make a small fortune in aviation?
How many super sayen do you need to change a bulb ?
What kind of Asian dish takes away your freedoms?
Did you hear that they're bringing back Pimp My Ride?
What kind of charge did the Couch place against the Recliner?
What is the biggest mistake Steve Jobs ever made?
Why did the walrus go to the Tupperware party?
What do you get when you cross a highway with an armadillo?
If Bill O'Reilly and Barbara Walters got married what would they name the baby?
Where does Sean Connery sit?
Isn't technology amazing?
Who ever said time cannot be bought?
How many chiropractors does it take to change a light bulb?
Where do cows go when they die?
How many people from the future does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Germany win so many battles in WW I?
What is a mixture of Hulk and Captain America called?
What is a Mexican bodybuilder's favorite supplement?
What's worst than one bee sting?
How do Chinese people name their kids?
Do you know the hardest part about rollerblading?
How do you know if someone is a vegetarian?
Why did Michael Bay jump off a bridge?
What do women and the square root of 2 have in common?
Have you ever seen the serial numbers on a condom?
What's the difference between a Afghanistan wedding and a terrorist training camp?
What's the difference between a bowling ball and a French girl?
How many Saiyans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call Professor X doing a wheelie?
What is Harper Lee's favorite alcoholic drink?
What's a feminist's favourite coffee?
What happens when ducks fly upside down??
Why's it so hard to find marathon and triathlon reviews in Germany?
Why do Mexicans like spicy food?
How do blind doctors deliver babies?
What do two cousins say after they have sex?
How did the elephant get out of the river?
2 potatoes standing on the street corner how do you tell which one is the slut?
Why couldn't the banana get a date?
How do you spell "apathy"?
Why can't cats vote?
why is math book so sad?
Did you hear about the Mexican carpet salesman?
When a Chinise guy and an Indian have a race fight. Who will win?
How do you get beer from root beer?
What's green and has four wheels?
What do you call an elephant and a rhino mixed?
What did the cannibal Doctor do with his patients?
How many people does it take to start a riot?
Why did the cat get arrested for playing a violin?
why did no one listen to the wheelchair joke?
Do you know what a woman says in the bedroom when she sees a big dick?
If I had a dozen muffins and Carlos took 13 away from me, what do I have now?
Would you like to hear a Helen Keller joke?
What'd the ocean say to the other ocean?
Why can you trust noone in the savannah?
What do you call a natural blonde who dyes her hair?
What do you call a pirate's helicopter?
What are two things dinosaurs can't have for dinner?
What do you call an Irishman who bounces off of walls?
What happens when a lawyer dies??
What are the names of the first two men to get married under the new Irish gay marriage law?
What did one snowman say to the other?
Why Aren't There Riots When White People Get Killed?
Why doesn't anyone watch women's hockey?
Hey why isn't Phil Hughes playing in the test today?
What did the Catholic Mexican say to greet the Greek God of Thunder?
What do you get if you cross 50 Shades of Grey with Blurred Lines?
How do you determine a German baby, a Jewish baby, and a Polish baby?
How did Hellen Keller's parents punish her?
Can you run a bath when you have the runs?
Why don't you ever see rich people wearing glasses?
Why was Cinderella kicked off the basketball team?
What's a... pederast?
How can you tell if a blonde has been using the computer?
What's the meanest thing someone's ever said to you?
what is harry Potter's favorite ice breaker?
How can you tell a blonde is having a really bad day?
what's the male equivolent of a widow?
What's the difference between a dentist and a sadist?
Where'd I drop my waffle?
What happens to lawyers after they die?
What is the difference between a black guy and a white guy that sells drugs?
What do you call an elite team of crime solving tree surgeons?
Why were the baker's hands smelly?
What do you say to a family who has just experienced death of a family member due to anorexia?
What does Snoop Dogg eat when he visits Germany?
A Jewish dilemma?
Who's the only living relative of penguin?
What do you call someone that hangs out with musicians?
What is red and smells like blue paint?
What did the baby order at the chinese restaurant?
Which has less drunks: an Irish wedding or an Irish funeral?
What do you get when you have sex with a truck stop hooker?
Why is the plunger gay?
Do you want to hear a short joke?
How many children did Josh Duggar molest?
what is the difference between a tea bag and england?
Why do photons travels slower through water?
Why did prince Oxygen inherit the throne after the king died?
Where do one-legged people go to eat?
Did you hear about the woman who replaced her addiction to ornithology with alcohol?
Why are track suits so popular song members of the former Soviet Union?
Why do Marlboro cigarettes have white filters in America, but yellow filters in Europe?
Why did Simba's father die?
What do you call a coffee shop where drug deals go down?
[Programmer Joke] Why did the int drown?
How can you tell if you bought lube from Tumblr?
What was said the boiled waters funeral?
Did you blow bubbles as a kid?
You hear about the newswoman with one boob?
What's the difference between shaving a red head's pubes and diffusing a bomb?
What do you call a tree that hates this joke?
What do you call a Jewish beer?
Where do skunks go to college?
What do women and stones have in common?
What do Jews get at night during the holocaust?
Where are the raisins today?
what the elephant say to the naked man?
Would you like to hear a german joke?
How many germans does it take to change a light bulb?
Aren't dad jokes great?
What is hairy and between your grandma's nipples?
What do ducks use to get high?
Why did the bubblegum cross the road?
Why would you wrap a guinea pig in saran wrap?
Why do tulips glow?
How many bruthas does it take to clean a kitchen?
Why did the Bloody Mary need a restraining order?
What kind of bars do lesbian Eskimos go to?
Want to hear a pizza joke?
What is the best kind of plate for a continental breakfast?
Why was the volleyball player drunk at a game?
How many egoists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a karate chopping pig?
What's the difference between a red head and a blue head?
Whats the cheapest type of meat?
What do you call a hairy gay man who suffers from mood swings?
Why did the Millennium Falcon hot a tree?
A man goes into Boots and says: "Have you got Viagra?
Why did the director get kicked out of the bar?
Where does a polar bear keep his money?
What's the difference between a picture of Jesus and Jesus?
What do you call a theatrical performance about puns?
How do beer companies track their sales?
What would Bart Simpson's first Steam game be?
Why don't midgets smoke weed?
Who is consistently the best pro sports team to watch in Minnesota?
What do you call a reptile that can't grow its tail back?
Which fruit wanted to run away and get married, but couldn't?
What do you call a dead fowl that is haunting you?
What's the difference between certain and uncertain?
What's another word for a penis potato?
Why couldn't the snake charmer charm his snake?
Why do vegans hate giving blow jobs?
History teacher: Which period did Cleopatra come from?
Did you hear about the new pill that's supposed to turn lesbian women straight?
What's Chris Brown's favourite game?
What organ in the body never dies?
What kind of liquid does a pig's printer use?
What do you call a guy with a 2 inch penis?
Did you hear about the mathematician who got out of jail?
Where do epileptics get pizza?
What do astronomers do when they have nowhere else to turn?
What did the 3 holes in the ground say?
Why can't a nose be 12 inches long?
What do you call a fat cop?
Was the Nintendo hungry?
Why was the killer whale fired from his restaurant job?
What does a fat girl and a pallet of shingles have in common?
why was Elsa afraid of Sven?
What do you call two lesbians on a canoe?
BEAUTIFUL?
A butcher married a baker and had a kid who grew up to be what?
Did you know that Darth Vader had a wife?
Have you heard of the body of water that's killing thousands of people each year?
What do you say to a broken Xbox One?
Have you heard of the insect that's killing thousands of people each year?
What do you get when you cross menstruation and apples?
Why don't turkey vultures ever lose their luggage?
How many frat boys does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a person who wears adult diapers?
Which teachers make pupils feel good about themselves?
What is E.T. short for?
How did the octopus go to the war?
How many hipsters does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why can a woman never be a good DJ?
What do you call a bee from US?
What do you call a bearded gardener?
Why can you always trust Frankenstein's monster?
How many Freudians does it take to screw their mothers?
What does a beef patty have in common with a blowjob?
What's the hardest part about eating a vegetable ?
What happens when Batman sees Catwoman?
What is a bed's least favourite time of year?
Do you like Wendy's?
Why did the chicken not cross the road?
How do you tell off a toilet?
When is a dog not a dog?
So you wanna learn to speak with an Irish accent do you?
What so you call a religious dinosaur?
Can someone help me find some videos of Al Gore dancing?
Do you know the difference between a cheeseburger and a blowjob?
What is it called when Michael J. Fox smokes a joint?
Why do smarter people last longer when having sex?
What do you get when you mix an octopus with a black guy?
What is Pi squared?
How man redditors does it take to change a lightbulb?
Ever been to a Canadian mosh pit?
What is the difference between the US and yogurt?
Have any of you heard back from D yet?
You know what is blown out of proportions?
Do you know how a suicide wank works?
What is the origin of the word "Boob"?
What do you call a person who hates fat people?
If you had to describe yourself in one word, what would it be?
What will ESPN talk about if both the Hawks and Rockets make it to the NBA final?
How do you get negative inflation ?
Why do Electricians make terrible revolutionaries?
How many Psychologists does it take to change a light bulb?
How do you become really unpopular on Reddit?
How many Freudians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a helicopter with a bad paint job?
Why don't you want to hang out with a dude from Chicago?
Why do divers fall out of the boat backwards?
Don't you find it Funny that after Monday(M) and Tuesday(T), the rest of the week says WTF?
Do you piss in the toilet before getting in the shower?
What would be the name of a gangster who makes terrible movies?
Where does a pornstar go for timeout?
What did the snail on the turtles back say?
What is Kanye's favorite Transformer?
What's black and red, flashes like hell and annoys men?
What do you get if you cross an insomniac, an agnostic, and a dyslexic?
What do French people say when they don't want to see someone ever again?
What do you call a gorilla with a harpsichord?
If you weigh a whale at a whale weigh station, where do you weigh a pie?
What did one elf girl say to the other elf girl who wasn't sharing?
Where do geographers go for a drink?
What's Paul McCartney's favourite food?
Why can't two elephants go swimming?
Did you hear about the guy who jumped off a building after drinking Alka-seltzer?
What's the last thing the ISIS fighters' wife said before she blew herself up?
What did the velociraptor say after his workout?
What's a policeman's favorite gaming console?
What do you say to Simba if he's walking too slow?
What do you call a woman with an opinion?
What kinds of birds are raised by only their mothers?
What did the man say when the lobster gave him food poisoning?
What does "Maginot Line" get translated to in English?
What do you call a crayon without any wax?
How do you stop an elephant from charging?
What happened to the tasty noun?
Are you feeling cold right now?
To all those people who said I would be an unfit parent, have you seen the little guy lately?
What did the Jewish pedophile say?
What is Shrek's favorite book?
What did the mermaid forget to bring to math class?
What a gay spermatozoïde says to an other gay sermatozoïde ?
Why is Oedipus against swearing?
Why wasn't the plastic surgeon worried about running out of breast implants anytime soon?
What do you call a Protestant in Greece?
What is easier to pick up the heavier it gets?
What's the going rate to find out a girl isn't into you?
Did you hear about that new film on the B-17 aircraft?
What did the serial killer say before he killed his victim?
What do you call a midget psychic who escaped from prison?
What kind of bee produces milk?
What's the difference between an old Greyhound station and a lobster with a double D bra size?
What the difference between John Wayne and Jack Daniels?
How did the medical community come up with the term PMS?
Why did Snoop Dogg bring an umbrella?
What's 10 foot long and stinks of piss?
What do you call a questionable porcine?
Why does the lead singer of Sublime hate tennis?
How do you find out that a blonde girl got a bad day?
What do you call two fruits that can't get married?
What do you call someone who speaks 2 languages?
What do you call an Italian with erectile dysfunction?
What operating system does Varys have on his computer?
What do the letters D.N.A stand for?
What piece of bedding can also be known as a Mexican blanket?
What's the difference between a yoghurt and America?
Why did Anne Sullivan decide on "water "for Helen Keller's first word?
What goes blonde, brunette, blonde, brunette, blonde, brunette?
What is the opposite of Christopher Reeve?
What do you call the hairiest man in the camp?
How long is a submarine?
What do 9/10 people enjoy?
What kid of music do old people listen to?
What do onions and people have in common?
Why do Americans hate sunlight?
What do you call a black person on the moon?
What do you call a woman that raps about woman's rights?
Did you hear the one about the constipated accountant?
What do you call a porn site for celeb lookalikes?
What did Mr. Marijuana say to Mrs. Marijuana when she asked if her dress makes her look fat?
What do you get when you cross a joke and a rhetorical question?
What is the difference between a bag of cocaine and a four year old?
— What do you think about sex before marriage?
they asked a 100year old grandpa why were all the women still crazy about him?
What's better than Chrisopher Walken?
What did the egg play in the movie?
How many mice does it take to screw in a light bulb?
So how do I take the gum out of my hair?
What's the difference between Acne and a Catholic priest?
What did Harry Potter say when his waiter gave him the wrong drink?
What, me? Lazy?
Why don't they sell aspirin in the rainforest?
What two places can you find a California roll?
What's A Columbian's Favorite Kind of Drink?
Did you hear Ant Man will be in Captain America 3?
How is a broken clock better than a politician?
What is it called when you get sick from gaming on the internet?
What would Steve Urkel say if he used The Force?
Why was Jesus such a bad carpenter?
Why should you be scared of a white person in prison?
What did the made-to-order breakfast dish say to Taylor Swift at the Grammys?
Why did the hipster go to bed early?
What do you call someone who only speaks one language?
Where is the best place to find hot grills?
What's the difference between Broccoli and boogers?
How does a black man laugh?
What do you call an orange elephant?
What does Joan Jett use when her lips are chapped?
Whag did one cat say to the other?
What do you call a cheap hooker?
What was the name of the meth cook who got caught stealing baked beans?
Why did Bono fall off the stage?
What was the statistician's fetish?
What do you call an Ethiopian with a dog?
Why are yogurt eaters sophisticated?
Why did the English teacher hire a midget geography nut as his lawyer?
Why can't you hear a Pterodactyl going to the bathroom?
How do you tie two half ducks together?
A roger you say?
What do you call a spider that wants to overthrow the government?
What's a pirate's favorite sexual partner?
What's it called when you try not to get knocked unconscious by a Taser?
[Spanish Joke] Cual es el marido de la ballena?
how can you tell your girlfriend is getting fat?
What do you do if your daughter gets dirty in the laundry room?
What happened to the guy who grabbed the Viagra instead of the Allegra?
How do Israeli skiiers greet each other?
What's the difference between a Piano and a Fish?
What's the hardest thing about rollerskating?
want to know why i didnt have sex last night?
What do you call an Indian that's been hit by a car?
What do you call a robot dressed in drag?
What's the fastest way to get a female Officer to arrest you?
Why are redditors American?
Why is it better to be a hooker than a drug dealer?
What's the difference between a Greyhound station and a lobster with a boob job?
What does a German snake sound like?
How is a 9v battery like a woman's asshole?
What did the fisherman from Boston say to the magician?
Why was the calendar nervous?
What do you call a person who uses multiple accounts to upvote their own memes?
What's the difference between falling from the 1st and 10th floor?
Who's faster, The Flash? or Quicksilver?
What is White, Fluffy and swings through a cake shop?
Whats the last thing that went through the suicide bombers mind?
didja hear about the new LGBT libretto for Wagner's Der Ring des Nibelungen?
Why don't you see tampons with maxi pads?
Why wouldn't the two tampons talk to each other?
How does a Metal Wizard perform his spells?
How does a Trigonometry teacher appreciate his girlfriend?
Hibernate?
How do German bread greet each other?
Gaining weight from drinking so much water?
What do you say when you are trying to scare your girlfriend?
Which boxer did Darth Vader put his money on in the fight?
Did you hear about the Spaniard who was obsessed with Greek Mythology?
Where does honey come from?
1. Be born of a virgin 2. Walk on water 3. Get crucified 4. Return from the dead 5. ???
How high is a stoner sailor?
What are Benedict Cumberbatch's fans called?
What do you call a gay chickpea?
What is a gynecologist's favorite snack?
What's Big, White and If It falls out of a tree it will kill you?
What did the mother say to the son after he peed on the toilet seat?
What is so ironic about Atheists?
Why are there so many French orphans in the fruit isle of the grocery store?
You know how some people call their erect penis a 'hard on'?
Why didn't The Cold War happen?
Why don't Jedi mathematicians use the absolute value function?
How do sceptics introduce themselves?
Why do people procrastinate?
Why do plants hate math?
What fills the entire volume of its container and may become volatile and explosive when compressed?
What do you get when you mix an insomniac, an agnostic and a dyslexic?
Did you know that after this next album, Matisyahu will be retiring?
What do you call Pegasus farts?
Why do you never see an elephant hiding in trees?
How do genetically engineered car salesmen from Boston greet their customers?
Why did Regina George's dog only play keep-away?
Geeze, how's all the news in Nepal?
What is the hardest part of watching an orphanage burn down?
What does a prostitute and a book have in common?
What does a bee do with his stinger at night?
How do you describe eating just the right amount?
Who is Hitler's favourite character in Star Wars?
Would you like to hear a joke about violence and torture?
What do you call two Jews having sex?
What Do You Call A Dog With Wings?
What do you call an Iguana that can't stand up straight?
Why are business men's toilet clogged?
Where would be a good place to find 25 million north korean jokes?
What do you call a showoff Texan?
Why is Pharrell Williams happy?
Where do black person go to travel cross-country?
Why can't lions ever conquer the world?
What do you call an Amish guy with his hand up a horses ass?
What's the difference between Males and Females?
Do you know who are the fastest readers in the world?
What do you call the boner of a necrophiliac?
If grandmas had an award ceremony, what would it be called?
Why is the African Justice System so flawed?
Why do people order espresso shots at Starbucks?
Who's coca colas favourite rapper?
where does honey come from?
What kind of weed do reptiles smoke?
What do the films 'Titanic' and 'The Sixth Sense' have in common?
What did the anti-joker say to the joker?
How do you call an unlocked phone ?
[Game of Thrones] What happens if Ramsay Bolton met Samwell Tarly's girlfriend?
What did the physicist say to the man about to jump off a building?
How does Harry Potter travel about?
Response to "LPT: If you ever get cold..." What if your corner isn't 90 degrees?
What was Hitler's least favorite drink?
Whats the worst part of eating 11 raw oysters out of your grandmothers vagina?
What's the difference between Jews and Santa?
Why Did The NSA Worker Have To Stay In Russia?
What do you call the useless skin on the end of a penis?
What is trees' preferred drug?
What does Saddam Hussein and little Miss Moffat have in common?
What do you call someone that lives next a horse?
What does Snoop Dogg eat?
What do you call a black guy wearing an ankle bracelet?
What is yellow and incapable of swimming?
What do Dallas Cowboys fans do after they win the Super Bowl?
What game do they play at Mexican carnivals?
How many gears does a French Tank have?
How do you blind a woman?
You know what isn't a joke?
How many babies does it take to make light?
What's brown, long, and sticky?
What did Timmy get for Christmas?
Why can't Thor play the piano or hide n seek with his brother?
How do you make cocoa powder?
What's a Neckbeard's favourite curry?
What do you get for opening the BEST Vietnamese soup joint in London?
What did the neckbeard say when he looked in the mirror?
What is the only group of cops who get in trouble when a black guy gets killed?
Where do all the orphan chickens end up?
Anyone want to know my secret to quit procrastination?
What does the hot dog say when it crosses the finish line?
Which US national park is most welcoming to Hebrews?
What do you name a combination Gay Conversion Camp/Coma Ward?
Who was the most racist president?
When Peter Rabbit was working as a porn star, whom did his contract require to be on the set?
What's ISIS's favorite Country Band?
What kind of TV show do felines watch?
How can you tell when a woman is faking an orgasm?
Do you know what "clitoris" is in French?
Why do tampons have strings?
What's brown and sits on a piano bench?
What's a spiders favorite way to learn?
How do you know if a black woman is pregnant?
How does Samuel L Jackson create fire with an orange?
Anyone want to hear a really Nepalling joke about an earthquake?
What does a pirate say when he turns 80?
What did the big chimmney say to the little chimmney?
What do a Jew and dollar bill have in common?
Why are Democrats stupid enough to believe in climate change?
Why didn't the cops ever charge Abraham Lincoln?
What did the cannibal do after he dumped his Girlfriend?
Why is pinocchio so good in the bedroom?
Why cant you trust stairs?
What's the difference between a Circumcision and a Crucifiction?
Why was the condom angry?
What no running shoes and Neo-Nazis have in common?
Did you hear about the upcoming play based on the life of Elton John?
What do you call a man with a fetish for US currency who works on a dairy farm?
What does Tupperware and a sealion have in common?
Me...Lazy?
Two crows are loitering in the park; why did they get arrested?
How do you wake up Lady Gaga?
How do you win a Scandinavian race?
How is your job and your wife different?
What's the stupidest, most useless comment that can still earn you some karma?
What service do you get if you sleep in a bakery?
Why do mathematicians love talking about Jesus?
Why does the army want to only recruit married men?
What do you call a frozen swine lavatory?
How do you keep a blonde busy for years?
How do you stop a black kid from jumping on the bed?
What do you call a pub for lesbians in circus outfits?
What do you call a white man surrounded by many black men?
What is the worst city to be a cop in?
What's the difference between a bag of cocaine and a small child?
Did you hear about the guy who ate so many creole sausages that he had a fatal heart attack?
Who fills in for the president of Russia when he's on leave?
What do you call a dead pigeon?
Why don't they play poker in Africa?
Why did Nobelium's car got towed away?
Did you hear the joke about Wiz Khalifa and Charlie Puth?
What do you call a fast sheep in Ireland?
What has two legs and bleeds profusely?
Q: In church, why do they sing hymns and not hers?
Whats a hoes idea?
What did the table fan say to his boss when he couldn't get to work on time?
What do you call a pro-gamer?
What is green and has 4 wheels?
How did the barber win the race?
What has six balls and screws everybody?
What's the Difference between Jam and Jelly?
Why do Japanese Sumo wrestlers shave their legs?
Where does poor spaghetti live?
What's the most political particle?
Why did raggedy Ann get kicked out of the toy box?
How did Hellen Keller burn her ear?
What do you call two Mexican guys playing basketball?
What do you do when you're racist and all the immigrants exhaust you?
How do you break a Pollock's finger?
You know what a satisfied woman sounds like?
How do you get rid of pubic lice?
What type of gun do time travelers use?
What's the difference between a sandwich and a germanwings plane?
What's the different between a pilot and a pepperoni pizza?
How is a bull better then a man?
What's the difference between a football player and a bank robber?
[Not a joke] Fellow Redditors, can you help me find this thesis about morbid jokes?
Did you hear about the eel party last night?
How many people does it take to change a light bulb in Brazil?
What's the only day Asian people can have sex??
[Meta] the number of subscribers in this sub is a joke right?
Didja hear about this new rum for the LGBT market - Morgan Le Fay?
What do you call the state of having confidence?
Why do Scotsmen wear kilts?
What type of pasta is most likely to cheat for a musical award?
What do you call it when you get an erection at a funeral?
How do you become friends with Ben Affleck?
What do rappers like on their burritos?
How do you make exotic matter?
What language do British wrenches speech?
What's the best part about locking your keys in the car at an abortion clinic?
Did you hear about the tumblr user who wrote a play about foxes?
What's the difference between a cat and a politician?
What do you call a tornado holding a spork?
What do you call a sea mammal with a mission?
What did a Vegetarian Cannibal eat?
Why did so many blacks die in Vietnam?
Did you know Paul Walker had dandruff?
What did the Scotsman say when he ripped his trousers?
What is it called when Albert Einstein masturbates?
What is Helen Keller's favorite color?
Who is trusted more than President Obama?
Hi everyone, are you all alright?
What do frozen beer, a burnt pizza, and a pregnant woman have in common?
What do you call a short mexican?
How can you tell if someone voted Green Party?
Why don't blind people like skydiving?
Did you know Princess Diana was on the radio?
Why did Bibi Netanyahu lie on a couch licking his balls?
What do holiday parties and after school clubs have in common?
Why'd the blonde snort a line of Splenda?
Whats the difference between a dead baby and a bag of cocaine?
Why are some flowers gangsta ?
Why did the black Classic major think Oedipus was black?
What will latent pedophiles pay a hooker extra to wear?
Did you hear about the guy who got his tongue cut out by the mafia?
If a tree falls in the forest does it make a sound?
Why did Arnold Schwarzenegger cross the road?
Where does beef come from?
What is Homer Simpson's favorite rapper?
What's the difference between love, true love and showing off?
why did the ambulance cross the road?
How do you tell if someone is a safety engineer?
Whats a potheads favorite vehicle?
What was the last thing to go through Princess Diana's head before she died?
What does a buff zombie want?
What do you call couples that practice pulling out as a method of contraception?
Why do people like r/citrus?
What do you get if you divide the circumference of a pumpkin by its diameter?
Hey guys where do Chemists come from?
Why is there a bucket of shit at an Italian wedding?
What do you call a deer with no eye?
What does a vegan zombie eat?
What has a bottom on top?
Why are there not more black golfers?
What did the brown cow say to the brown chicken?
How does Moses make tea?
What was the cause for Floyd Mayweather's first loss?
How long does it take for mods to remove a post?
Why don't your balls like being chomped on?
What will the "Red Hot Chili Peppers" become when they die?
Anyone know a good lawyer?
What was the pedophile doing on the beach?
What did the Mexican say when the house fell on him?
What do you call a jar of mayonnaise stuck in quicksand?
How did the OBGYN win the election?
What is the hardest part to eat in a vegetable?
What language do farsighted people speak?
Did you hear about the guy that used ivory butt plugs?
What's the most reliable thing about a Honda?
What did Drake say to 2Chainz as he was leaving da club?
What is Hellen Keller's favorite color?
Mom, how are babies born?
What computer monitor sings the best?
What do you call a skinned, animal-throwrug for your vehicle?
The problem with grammar nazis?
Which US president is most responsible for unemployment in the US today?
How do you pick up older Spanish women?
What did Elsa say to her fans on Reddit?
What do you call two physicians?
What's an algebra teachers favorite animal?
what's the longest word in the dictionary?
What's 18 inches, stiff and makes girls cry all night?
Why are there so many Mike Tysons on my news feed today...?
What do you get when you cross dirty double meanings with WWI?
Why do teenage girls not like filing papers?
What's the hardest part about being a Vegan who does Crossfit and owns a Rescue dog?
How is Reddit like fencing?
When the gay guy died, why did they bury him face down?
Is Google a Boy or a Girl?
Did you hear the joke about mountains?
What was the first thing Abraham Lincoln told his friends when they asked him how he got an STD?
What do you call a hooker who specializes in anal sex?
How many pot heads does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How can you tell if something has been posted on Reddit before?
Did you hear about the blonde woman who has three hours of footage of raw chicken on her iPhone?
Why did Hitler save the plaster after his broken arm had healed?
How do Japanese people ask for rice?
What did Charlie Sheen say when he won the Tour de France?
Why do the nurses give the old men in retirement homes Viagra?
Why did the carpenter's wife leave him?
What do you call a blood-thirsty optometrist?
What happens when two blind people see each other?
How many sith lords does it take to change a light bulb?
Which art piece won the Texas Muhammad cartoon contest?
Why does Floyd Mayweather have "TGIF" written on his boxing shoes?
Did you hear about the unnecessarily large string orchestra?
What is the opposite of leapfrog?
whats the difference between your sister and a mosquito?
Did you see the headline about Mayweather being afraid to go outside in the heat?
What do you say to Floyd Mayweather after his arms have been cut off?
Whats the best part about having sex with twenty eight year olds?
What's a porn stars favorite golf course?
What do Hitler and Oprah have in common?
What political party does Jon Snow belong to?
Is there any jokes you know that's about the vegetable corn, but its only in the punchline?
What's the difference between Isaac Newton and the baby I just stabbed to death?
what's the best part about being a man?
Did you hear about the Mayweather X Pacquiao fight?
How do you know if someone's a vegan?
What do you call a broken lizard?
How do you call a sad coffee?
What does a haunted hamburger say?
Why was the Mexican called a paragraph?
What's the objective of Jewish football?
How many nuts does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What happens to a legend's career when he loses his leg?
Did you hear about the bee who married the centipede?
What's the one public place that most people still support the separation of Colors and Whites?
What's the difference between 0/1 and 0/2 ?
What does Lebron use to high jump?
What do you call a Mexican whose lost his car?
You now that fucker that always needs to have the last word?
What is the difference between a dollar and a ruble ?
what does my microwave and women have in common?
What do you call it when wolves get bad breath?
What should I give your sister for unzipping?
Have you ever try ethiopan food ?
What's the worst thing about living with Alzheimer's?
What do you do when a black person gets killed by a cop?
What do you find hanging from cherry trees?
Want to hear a good boxing joke?
What does Vin Diesel call "pin the tail on the donkey"?
How do we fix boxing?
Why don't they have werewolves in Asia?
What did Mr. T start eating when he went on a diet?
What did the scientist who was conducting sexual experiments on dogs say to his partner?
Where did the sick boat go to get a checkup?
who enjoys sex more - man or woman?
You know why Mayweather won't beat Pacquiao?
Why did the reddit mod cross the road?
Why don't we let Google Chrome drive?
What kind of milk do the wealthiest people in the world give to their children?
What's the most outplayed joke in all of /r/jokes?
What do schizophrenic people think when they say an insensitive joke?
What did the clock say to the class?
Why did the Indian pedophile miss work?
Why does 7 make 6 nervous?
What's the main ingredient in mana potions?
What does Diana stand for?
Why was Stalin a Bad leader?
What is the Donner Party's favorite donut?
Why is a reflection always twice as good as the real thing?
Why was the black man arrested?
How many black people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did Microsoft skip to windows 10?
What do you call a cow thats had a hysterectomy?
How many lesbians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call an exemplary black housewife?
Did you hear about the new bolt the apple company made?
Who leaves money under the pillows of children with LGBT parents ?
Didja hear about the LGBT DJ in Paris who'll only play 50's US rock songs?
What do aliens use to buy their coffee?
What do you call a Jamaican guy on the internet?
Why did the 80-year-old man call his dick Jesus?
If Jesus had been LGBT, what would Pilate now be known for asking?
What is the Dothraki font of choice?
How does a Muslim close the door?
Did you know John Travolta's home has an airport in it?
What does an LGBT rabbi call a blessing?
Did you hear about the guy who illegally downloaded Free Fallin' and Refugee?
What did the shirt say to the pants?
What's black and loves to destroy Baltimore?
Why was the Instagram star so bad at making coffee?
What should you do when your girlfriend starts smoking??
what's a slice of cheese's secret fetish?
What do your mom and the Baltimore Police have in common?
What's your favorite pick up line?
Jimmy: Khaleesi, of course means Queen. What's your real name again?
Whats the difference between Taylor Swift and Adele?
What's bright, red and orange and looks good on hippies?
How do cops get rid of flies?
What did the drunkard say when he walked into an Israeli bar?
What do a Cloudy Night and Dancing With The Stars have in common?
What do you call an autistic stoner?
What happens when a muppet gives you a blowjob?
What do you call a talent show where they try to discover a porn star with singing talent?
what is the cruelest joke of all?
What do you get if you dont finish your meal at a cannibalistic restaurant?
What is the difference between a snowman and a snow woman?
How do you stop a mexican tank?
Why do baked goods always have an urge for sex?
Why did Charles Darwin become a scientist?
Hi, what's your name?
What's the difference between an airplane bathroom and your mom?
What is a dog's favorite thing about living in a house?
What do you call a Jamaican motorcycle?
Old rich white men selecting strong young black men to work on their fields?
What would you call a restaurant for anorexics?
Why do jews get their penises circumcised?
Did you hear there's a new LGBT kung fu actor making films now?
What was Bruce Lees vegetarian brothers name?
Did you know that Stalin had a girlfriend that cheated on him?
What did Sacagawea the frog say in the trampoline factory?
What do you call a christian crawdad?
What does an LGBT orthodontist make most of his money off of ?
What kind of pickles does Miley Cyrus like in her relish?
What is an angel's favorite font?
What's in a divorce fruit salad?
What's in an STD salad?
Did you guys hear about the shoe store that got looted in Baltimore?
What's in a honeymoon salad?
What do you get when you get in a fight with the Los Angeles Lakers lead point scorer?
How cute does someone have to be for sparks to fly?
What is the scariest thing about a white man in prison?
What did the pastry from Denmark say to the pastry from Norway?
[On a date] Date: So what do you do?
Which part of the cabbage don't you eat?
What do call a white guy in a burning building?
What do snakes take to combat their allergies?
What's it called when you look in the mirror and say "jesus christ I look good"?
How did the king die?
What does your hot mom where under her skirt?
What if Voldemort's last horcrux was his virginity?
Did you hear about the blind engineer ?
What do you call a squashed Italian?
Where do the happy people of Baltimore live?
What did the farmer say to the chocolate cow?
What type of drugs do ducks use?
What happens when you mix mustard and ketchup together?
Why do java programmers need to wear glasses?
You know they've had sex change operations for men for a while now, right?
What do you call an insect that talks under its breath?
What do tornados and black people have in common?
How many rioters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a woman who uses Vagisil?
Have you guys seen the movie called "Constipation"?
Why are people in silicon valley better coders than others?
My cat deleted my final thesis. Don't believe me?
Did you hear about the woman who had to quit her job as an air traffic controller to date a monk?
Why do tigers have stripes?
Wanna hear a bondage joke?
Who sang at the funeral of those who died in a railroads arson?
Why can't the cops keep calm and carry on ?
What do you call your girlfriend after a tough workout?
Why are periods called "Aunt Flo"?
What's Gemma Teller's favorite herb?
Did you hear about the movie Constipation?
What do you call Murayan Sukumaran's new wife?
What do you call a beast made entirely from egg whites?
There are 10 types of people... too highbrow?
Why couldn't the pregnent women watch all of the Harry Potter movies?
Did you hear the joke about your mother's cooking?
What do you give someone who is about to tear up?
Why can't the motorcycle get up on its own?
How do you describe a Swede, who's not really a Swede?
Why did Minnie Mouse break-up with Mickey Mouse?
Did you hear about the toilet at The Duggars' house?
Wanna know why they burnt down the cvs pharmacy in Baltimore?
Why are Jews noses so big?
What do you get when you cross worms with elephants?
Why did the ocean take a bath?
What do you call unborn twins?
Why do so many Asians wear glasses?
Did you hear the latest joke about Baltimore?
Why do all the best golfers keeping buying socks?
What's the difference between America and a yogurt?
What did jesus say to the romans after he rose on the third day and talked about their behavior?
If a bored JAP says "Sam the ceiling needs painting" during sex, what does a bored gay say?
What is wrong with a turtle who can't come out of his shell?
Why did the nazi work in the animal hospital after the war?
When does a pedophile enjoy a basketball match the most?
What are they gonna start calling plastic surgery for sagging boobs on elderly transgender women?
What's a bigger problem, ignorance or apathy?
Didja hear they're developing a new gameshow targeted specifically at an LGBT audience?
Why do black guys have red eyes after sex?
What do you do before deploying a tickle into production?
What did the duck say when she bought some lipstick?
What mythical creature is the most bloody?
How did Watson and crick blow their chance with a hot girl?
What's easier to pick up the heavier they get?
What is the only law enforcement agency that will get in trouble if a black man is shot?
Why did the Nazi chase the waiter?
How come you never see any Albino porn?
What an old women's vagina taste like?
Why can't you trust a Lithium Ion battery?
How do you make fat look good?
What's the difference between a hippy and a hockey player?
What happens when you get a lot of electroshocks within a short period of time?
What does a Canadian get by mixing black and white?
What's the number for Baltimore chiropractic services?
What did Orville say when Keith Harris died?
Why did the USA invade Panama?
What did the terrorist say to the waiter after his meal?
Why should you never give Elsa a balloon?
How do you like your eggs?
Didja hear that Hershey's is bringing out a new LGBT candy-bar?
Did you hear they're gonna make a new TV show about Bruce growing up as an unloved child?
Did you hear Ben and Jerry are going to bring out a special line of LGBT ice-cream?
How many Vietnam vets does it take the screw in a light bulb?
What will they now use on photos for LGBT magazines?
What does an LGBT couple do to show affection?
If Bruce decides to become a comedienne, what will his stage-name be?
What will they now call hormonally-induced knockers on men?
What does Kayne West masturbate to?
Did you hear about the new line of LGBT costume-jewelry the Kardashians are bringing out?
What was the philosopher's favorite toy growing up?
After his final sex-change operation, what kind of wood won't Bruce have any more?
How are all these African-American's able to take off time from work to riot in Baltimore?
Doctor: Nurse, how is that little girl doing who swallowed ten quarters last night?
What's the riddle?
What kind of game are Americans worst at?
What do Romans use to cut their pizza?
What do nuns do when they get horny?
Remember World War II? Now close your eyes and imagine?
Why do men get their great ideas in bed?
How do you trace a scatter plot?
Hey do you know Deanda?
What did one repost say to another?
You hear the one about the Blind Prostitute?
What do you call a hippy's wife?
What's a Web Developer's favourite tea?
How do you feel if subjected to temperatures of absolute zero?
Where can you go to send a soul to heaven?
Why did little Jimmy cross the road?
What does the Saudi Paralympics team consist of?
What brings a Jewish family closer together?
What if they had a call center where they call you everyday with a mission to make you laugh?
Why do porn stars hate driving?
What's it called when two perfectionists sleep together?
What did the county Sheriff say about the black man who was shot 15 times?
How do you know if Helen Keller just masturbated?
What's a cats favorite color?
Why do french tanks have rear-view mirrors?
What two planets should we keep clean?
Heard about the Berlin Comedy Club in the 1940s?
What's the difference between the TSA, prostitutes, and doctors?
Why should you serve Eggs Benedict on shiny metal dishes?
GOT NUTS?
How does an Australian shave?
How do you recognize a rich ethiopian?
What do you call a french guy wearing sandals?
How do you fit an elephant in a Safeway bag?
What is the difference between the regular police and the secret service?
What did MC Hammer say to his wife when she caught him cheating?
What happens when you give a cow marijuana?
Why did the chicken get into so much trouble?
What's the Only Planet That Gives a Crap?
Why did Star Wars episodes 4, 5, and 6 come before 1, 2, and 3?
[OC] How does Haskell like his food?
What kind of dogs are full of Chinese scientists?
What did the bun say to the hot dog?
How do you stop ISIS?
What's black and sits at the top of the stairs ?
Why don't hipsters like fishing?
What did the Klondike Bar say to Jesus?
What's the benefit of having sex with 24 year olds?
Got Abs bro?
Did you know that Hillary's planning on being the first TG President?
What is worse than bad grammar?
How many drummers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What can conspiracy theorists never explain?
Why do so many kids die in high school massacres?
(Serious) What do you think Michael Hastings was working on before he died?
What's the hardest part of being a gay black cop?
Have you heard the one about the bed?
What do you call a guy in a lot of debt?
Why is Quicksilver so fast?
What game do two strangers with Social Anxiety play?
How do you spell moron?
Why was the ant so confused?
How do you start a rave party in Africa without a soundsystem?
Did you hear the one about the Virgin marrying the Supermodel?
What do you call someone who doesn't like The Simpsons?
Would you watch a turkey dance?
What is a seal's favorite drink?
Where did the dog find her husband?
How do you get the political science grad off your lawn?
What do poor people drink?
Where should you drown a hipster?
How many dead prostitutes we need to change a lightbulb ?
What do Jews drive?
What did the soldering iron say to the capacitor?
What sound does a gun made from church seating make?
What's the difference between a turkey sandwich and a ham sandwich?
Did you hear about the lady who ate her dog?
What do potheads do when they see a fire?
Who would win a fight between an octopus and a shark?
Why didn't the lesbian go to the bread festival?
Why don't tampons talk to maxi-pads?
Where can you find Scandinavia?
What did the radioactive sample say to the other radioactive sample?
What's the difference between a pizza and a bass player?
Want to hear a two word joke?
What web page do orphans visit the most?
How did the captain describe the newborn puppy?
what's the difference between BMW and a Porky Pine?
What's the first rule for hitting on girls?
What did the Palestinians do to honour Yasser Arafat when he died?
how many straight Vassar men does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the worse thing to do to a blind person?
What's a Californians favorite type of comedy?
What did the escalator say to the elevator?
What game do old black people play?
Why's the necrophiliac's blow up doll half inflated?
Which Nazi leader likes the Bulls the most?
What do you call a pile of kittens?
Why don't White Elephants run?
How do you get rid of an obese demon?
What do you call a fish that's good at trading favors?
Did you hear the news about the CEO of Ford?
"What do you call someone who makes cakes in San Francisco?
Did you hear the one about the cannibal who passed his nephew in the jungle?
What would you call the Flintstones if they were black?
Why were the coffee beans upset?
What do you call patriotic pubes?
How many dead babies does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's with all of these racist jokes on reddit?
Why did the researchers stopped their research on embryos?
If you're an American outside the bathroom what are you inside the bathroom?
How do you confuse a Jew?
What did Professor X said when Cyclops whipped out his penis?
What kind of car does depressed Daniel drive?
What do ya call it when a lizard goes completely limp?
What's the deal with airplane peanuts?
Can you believe they got back together after all that shit?
How do you combat espionage?
What do you call a frisbee that's more than a friend?
How does one even?
What should you do when push comes to shove?
What do you call a dancing cow?
If you had nuts on your truck would they be truck nuts?
What did Dr. Evil say when he fell in the rancor pit?
Why do ducks try to avoid eating out?
Hey, want to hear a rape joke? No?
Why did the little Dutch boy have to register as a sex offender?
What was Rob Bartlett's go-to line in his WackyPaki comedian routine?
TBT - What's the difference between Bill Clinton and a screwdriver?
Did you hear about the new gay sitcom?
Did you hear about the lunatic who tried swimming in the river in Paris?
Why did the elephant take off his socks at the golf course?
What do you call a tree that lost its family in a forrest fire?
What's a joke?
What do you call pickled bread?
What do you get when you cross a lion with a stone?
Where did Mary go after the explosion?
Why was the jacket stinky?
What do you call a lizard who can't easily have sex?
What did the fish say when it hit a wall?
What's the difference between a Lentil and a Chickpea?
What do you call an existential lycanthrope?
What did Zelda tell Link when he couldn't unlock the door?
Why is Sigma good at sharing?
Do you have small pox?
What is a UPS worker's favorite cloud service?
do you know how many Viet Nam vets it takes to change a light bulb?
Why did the coach prohibit the blonde from giving any bj's to the team?
What did the robot say to the centipede?
Do you know why the feminist went to church?
What's the best vegetable to bring to a party?
How is a women and peanut butter the same?
What do you call a jewish eskimo?
Why didn't Mario put more toppings on his pizza?
Can you find the the mistake...?
What is the difference between a baby and a bag of cocaine?
What do you do if your daughter starts smoking?
What do you get the girl who has everything?
What did the older terrorist say to the younger terrorist before he headed out for a party?
Out of 10 puns chosen at random, how many actually made people laugh?
Why did got object to the wedding between the catholic man and the catholic woman?
What's your favorite kind of Bee?
Did you know I can raise the dead?
What does Tony Romo and a porn star have in common?
What's the difference between America and cereal?
Is this the Krusty Krab?
What did the pirate say after he turned 80?
How do you make the letter "H" healthy?
Did I tell you that my girlfriend has the flu?
why do girls or guys who look 8/10 go hunched?
How does a train sneeze?
What the difference between a pancake?
What's the definition of "Trust"?
What do you get when you drop a piano down a mineshaft?
Why Couldn't the Billionaire Fit through the circular door?
Why are they called dive bars?
Nan, what is death?
What did one Mexican say to the other Mexican?
Did you hear about the predator in the bushes?
cop: did you kill this man?
Why do people like listening to sex noises?
What do you call a wrecked Irishman?
What does glass taste like?
Why are there no gay men in the army reserves?
You heard the rumor going around about butter?
What happens when you put the Energizer bunny's batteries in backwards?
Are you going to the BBQ?
What do people call Mozart and Beethoven after they died?
What did the zombie say at the urinal?
How do you get a goldfish's attention?
What does an elephant use for a vibrator?
How many black people does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you get when a physics teacher own you ?
What do you call it when a redhead goes nuts?
Are you a tennis racquet salesman?
Wanna hear a joke about blimps?
How can you tell the difference between normal and self-raising flour?
Why couldn't the children see their father after his sex change?
How can a black woman tell if she is pregnant?
Yesterday I told someone that I don't like babies?
Why do some loudspeakers have holes?
How many engineers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the terrorist blow up the playground?
Did you hear that Tropicana funded the Nazi campaign?
Why can't Jesus roller skate?
What would happen if the Illuminati and Half-Life 3 agreed with each other?
How do you tell the difference between a male chromosome and a female chromosome?
How do you bring a joke to the front page?
What state has the best small sized soft drink?
How do you piss off a redditor?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a ferrari?
Did you hear about the pessimistic man who was missing a chromosome?
What's the one thing that will kill you if you kill it?
Why was Hitler born on 4/20?
What is the difference between a baby and a stamp?
Why did Luke Skywalker bluff in a game of poker?
Did you guys see that post about ISIS and Taliban announcing jihad against each other?
What was Hitler's favorite class in high school?
Today is Hitler´s birthday. How about a hitler joke?
What does a mermaid stoner smoke?
What do you need to make a crystal salad?
What's a Mexican's favourite letter?
What comes after Egypt?
What did one turtle say to the other eel?
What's Chris Browns favorite sport?
What is the weather report for Hitler's birthday?
What makes a Mexican saddest about the rise of ebooks?
Did you here about the scientist who got cooled to absolute zero?
How do you embarrass an archaeologist?
What's the difference between a white orgy and a black orgy?
How do dog catchers get paid?
What's the difference between a politician and a comedian?
What cuts four farts in the morning, two farts at midday, and three farts in the evening?
What do you call the feeling of being unable to urinate beside a friend?
What is Whitney houstons favorite type of coordination?
What's the difference between a joke and your friend's blog?
What is the Puerto Rican national anthem?
What do u call an ethopian with a feather up his ass?
What did the melon say to the banana when it proposed?
What do u call an ethopian with a slice of cheese on his head?
Why doesn't Dwayne Johnson's downstairs neighbor understand references to current events?
What do you call a comatose Pope?
Did you hear about the dyslexic who tried to commit suicide?
What do necrophiliacs get at funerals?
How do you keep someone curious?
What could Boston Marathon Bombers do that Hitler couldn't?
What do you get when if you cross an insomniac, a dyslexic and an agnostic?
You heard about the first woman to ever die of a marijuana overdose?
What smells better raw meat or a baby?
Why is salsa dancing so popular?
What's the difference between an old bus stop and a lobster with large breasts?
Where do you find the hottest Jews?
What did Russians used to light their houses with before candles?
What are Mozart and Beethoven up to these days?
Why did all the sea monsters refer to the kraken as a whore when he died?
How do you make five pounds of fat look good?
Why is Italy shaped like a boot?
Why did the Lebo die?
April Showers bring May Flowers. What do May Flowers bring?
What does Han Solo see looking into the mirror?
Where do beers go to pick up girls?
What is an Iraqi children on a playground doing?
What did the man say when he realized the boy who asked him out was an orphan?
What's a procrastinator's favorite punchline?
Did you hear about the boy born with no eyelids?
What do you call an antelope that's really bad at being an antelope?
What did the druggie scientist say when he got high on Helium?
What is the issue with Dr. Dre's releases?
what do you call a gay dyslexic?
What kind of vehicle swerved to miss a talking lizard in the road?
How come Barbie never got pregnant?
Why can't you talk to spiders who get shut in pianos?
Why did the gay man sue the mental hospital?
Q: What happens when a professor teaches for a decade?
What did all of the birds do to the bird that couldn't fly?
What do you call a Roman transvestite?
What do you call a deer missing an eye?
ELI5: what is it like being 6?
What does puritan Mario do with witches?
What's Whitney Houston's favourite coordination?
How do you get an elephant into a Safeway bag?
How do you stay hidden in the Desert?
A horse walks into a bar. The bartender asks "why the long face"?
What do you call a group of pirates having sex?
Why don't Muslims eat pork?
How many cops does it take to push a black man down a flight of stairs?
Why do clouds make good Kings?
How do you make a man like 10 pounds of fat?
What was Hitler's amplifier called?
Why do french tanks have rear mirrors?
What did the pickle say to the cucumber?
Why are there no black characters in clue?
Why can't a bicycle stand on its own?
What does a woman and KFC have in common?
Wife: If i’m lost, then what you do?
What did Batman say to Robin before they got in the car?
Wanna hear a medically incorrect racist joke?
What did Tupac say when his best friend died?
What is the difference between a rooster and a prostitute?
Did you hear about the beef jerky manufacturer who was convicted of fraud?
Want to hear a sex joke?
How do you make an idiot easily wait ?
What do you get if you cross an alligator with Sherlock Holmes ?
Why is a Camel called the ship of the ship of the desert?
Why dogs sniff each others assholes?
What did the fucking zombie say?
How do you get out of tipping on a $100 order?
What man knows the way to a girl's heart more than any other?
What do you call a gay Russian?
How do we know Julius Caesar wasn't gay?
What do you say to an unemployed Rastafarian?
what's the most common allergy among gay men?
Whats the difference between oral sex and anal sex?
What do a clitoris,an anniversary and a toilet have in common???
What is the last thing on a Mosquito's mind when it hits a car windshield?
Two men in a bar?
How do you hit on a Jewish girl?
Whats the #1 crime associated with cell phones?
Did you haer about the dyslexic insomniac atheist?
What do you call a blonde standing on her head?
What do you call a black guy that goes into space?
What can you use to fill your butt crack?
What does a dyslexic zombie eat?
What did the Elevator say to the Escalator?
Another TSA groping scandal?
Why do Canadians wear tuques?
Where do hipsters drown?
How do you spell Canda?
What is it called when you dream in color?
What's the difference between a racist and a liberal?
What's the best thing about having sex with an 8 year old girl?
Why are police officers great musicians?
Did you know they now sell 30 tog blankets?
What do you call a boy with no arms and an eye patch?
What does Nixon's Head use to thicken up étouffée?
Did you hear they invented a new logical fallacy, the "ad homonym" attack?
How does a Nazi high five?
What do you call a giant squid who runs a tow service in Indonesia?
What kind of work out do parrots have on leg day?
Q. Did you hear about the blind man who went bungee jumping?
What was the Christian plastic surgeons specialty?
If a honey bee makes honey, what kind of bee makes milk?
Why is yellow afraid of red?
What is an electrician's favorite vehicle?
what do you call a feminist who loves to swallow?
What do you call a guy who's into beastiality?
What is the difference between a drinking establishment and an elephant's fart?
Did you hear the inventor of cough lollies died last week?
Why did Yellow divorce Red?
How many trolls does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call someone who knows a lot about sea life?
what do 9 out of 10 people enjoy?
What did the rapper ask the pet sitter when he got back from vacation?
What do you get when you cross a black and a mexican?
What's the difference between a cockerel and a prostitute?
What do you call someone who constantly talks shit to horses?
Have you ever tried real Ethiopian food?
Which dinosaur walks with a limp?
Did you hear about the dog who went to the flea circus?
WHY DID THE KOALA FALL OUT OF THE TREE?
Yo girl, is your name Aaron Hernandez?
What do you call a row of rabbits walking backwards?
What is the difference between a 2 year old and a bag of cocaine?
Why was 'EE' acting so funny?
Why do lawyers like women with large tits and tight pussies?
What do you call a handjob from a rocket scientist?
How often do women become completely unreasonable?
What will the first female Mexican head of state be called?
What type of belly buttons do cars have?
How do you make a pool table laugh?
What did one German baker say to the other?
What's the inverse of Kansas?
Have you seen bofa lately?
Why don't you starve in the desert?
Did you guys know that my son is a really big star?
What's the difference between a Grayhound station and a lobster who got a boob job?
What did Captain Cook say to his men just before they got back in the ship?
Why did the USSR have so many lower case letters?
Why do you never see people with disabilities in North Korea?
Why did Poland lose to Germany so quickly in WW2?
How do you castrate a guy from Kentucky?
What's the diff between a rich man and a poor man?
Foreigner?
Why was there a whale in Wales in a well?
What do you call an extremely flamboyant loaf of bread?
What’s the difference between a hooker and a drug dealer?
Why is North Korea disliked by South Korea?
Did you hear about the time when King Arthur slept with another woman?
What game do Africans play everyday?
Why did the cannibal get banned from the hospital?
Why are me and my friends so nosey?
Why are gay people always confused?
What do you call an unfinished Tennis match?
How many tickles does it take to make a japanese girl laugh?
What do you call a dog with no hind legs and stainless steel testicles?
What brand of butter do frogs eat?
What do you get when you cross a foot with cookware?
Why couldn't the NSA whistleblower leave Russia?
Did you hear about the guy who designed the monorail?
How do you get an elephant into a Safeway shopping cart?
What did the homophobic dad say when he heard his gay son was in a coma?
What does a stoner do to work out?
Why don't plumbers ride bikes?
How much blow can Charlie Sheen do?
How tall do you have to be to ride a Kanye West rollercoaster?
What does the Pillsbury Doughboy see when he looks down?
What did the Buddhist say when asked if he'd like to move from Tibet to North Korea?
How many Vietnam War Veterans does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is a redneck wedding and a tornado alike?
What do you call Harrison Ford making a Venn diagram?
What did the farmer say when he tried to milk the cow, but nothing came out?
How do you know if someone owns an Apple Watch?
Why did the police officer shoot himself in the face?
How do you know Bono is selfish?
What did the douchebag say to the chemist when he dropped his beaker?
How do you get gum out of hair?
How many shrinks does it take to change a tire?
Why is Vladimir Putin always Russian?
What did the crop say to the Farmer?
Did you know women are fantastic at exactly 70 things?
Who is Hitlers least favourate character in star wars?
How much energy does hova's DeLorean require?
What do you get when you cross an elephant and a rabbit?
What do the Greeks sing while at sea?
Who was the funniest Communist?
What did Courtney Love say before shooting Kurt Cobain?
What would the US form of government be if the founding fathers had been atheist?
What kind of candy is Hitler?
Did you hear about the mechanic who accidentally punctured the wheels of his car?
What do you get if you play a C&W song backwards?
What's a snake's favorite subject?
Why is there such a big war in the Middle East?
Why are the news media like a prostitute?
What is the difference between a Ford car and a porcupine?
What's Paul Walker's favorite energy drink???
Did you guys hear about the girl that had three vaginas?
What's Scrooge's favourite food?
A guy pissed off 7 bears and is getting chased! How do you describe the bears?
Why don't plumbers like to work on instant hot water heaters?
Did you hear about the kidnapping in school?
What is the only thing on earth that goes "ha ha" on a Monday?
What does Hilter get when he's scared?
What do you call Brienne's Dad?
Why Didn't* the Chicken Cross the Road?
Why are lemons yellow?
How do you tell the difference between a Chemist and a Plumber?
Where does a mathematician go when he gets hurt?
What did the Romans say to each other after crucifying Jesus?
How many prostitutes does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the calculator pay $100 for a pack of cigarettes?
What kind of medicine do Ants use when they have eye problems?
What's the difference between a blowjob and a burger?
What Super Models should you invite to your birthday party ?
How did the hipster got his tongue burnt?
What do you call a herd of masturbating cows?
What car is so cheap that anyone could purchase it?
Whats Paul Walker's favorite TV show?
Hey! Wanna hear my Ebola joke?
What is the difference between a divorce and a hurricane in the south?
Whet is the difference betwen scouts and jews?
What do you call a person who keeps falling over?
How do you catch a unique animal?
Why do we call dogs, K-9?
How is parsley and pubic hair alike?
Where do people go for pasta related crimes?
Why does a middle eastern person not give a blowjob to an American?
What do you call a midget with Down's Syndrome who arrives to class late?
Who is more enthusiastic about performing oral sex, fat men or skinny men?
What's the first step to making your favorite Jewish dish?
Why was Sean Connery accused of piracy while drinking tea?
How do you confuse a blonde?
What does a pizza delivery boy and a gynecologist have in common?
Why is it a bad idea to snort cocaine out of someone's butthole?
What do you call the angel in charge of hydroelectrics?
What did the vacuum cleaner salesman say?
Knock knock. Who's there? To. To who?
Why should you never go down on a girl the morning after a night of sex?
What do you call a cow that doesn't produce milk?
What do you call a marine animal who under-performs at the vegetable academy?
Why does Peter Pan always fly?
What do you call a black man flying plane?
Why do Africans get scared when they get diarrhea?
Why does the Vanu Sovereignty hate plastic bags?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl taking a leak?
How do you spell "laughing out loud" by using binary?
How many people work in the Lada factory?
How do you get honey from a graveyard?
Why didn't the bird cross the road?
What do you call a hapoy frog?
How do you prove that your dog loves you more than your wife?
Why do pills bottles have cotton in them?
What do you call alternative medicine that works?
How do you find Ronald McDonald in a room full of naked clowns?
What do you call an elephant in a phone booth?
What do firemen and Eastern European prostitutes have in common?
Why did the pimp cross the lawn?
What did the lonely clock say to the other?
What do Stephan Harper and pennies have in common?
Why does a German always have the last laugh?
Who translated "The Flat-Chested Woman" from the original Russian?
Girl: Why should I shave my downstairs?
What do you call Asian quadruplets?
Why are shoes always tied in the ghetto?
Did you hear about the zoo with only one dog?
Why is Al Gore bad at dancing?
Guys, how can you tell the girl your having sex with is faking an orgasm?
Why did they name themselves AC/DC?
How do you lose 30 pounds in 1 Minute?
What has 5 eyes?
How do you call 8 Hobbits?
What do you call a promiscuous egg?
What do you call a school that teaches you how to draw hairy butts?
What started feminism?
If 50 cent went broke what would he still have?
Q: How old is Tyrion Lannister?
Where did Mary go when the bombs went off?
What did Diane Feinstein say when her water broke?
Why did god give women two sets of lips?
What did Pongo say to Goofy at the Annual Disney Dog Conference?
Why would Adrian Peterson be a great baseball player?
Why was the lion a terrible cannibal?
What is Kanye West's favorite breakfast food?
Why is Wendy never pregnant?
Oh, you were sexually harassed in the workplace?
What did the carpenter say to the girl he loved?
Someone shit in your fridge?
What did the car say when it's front wheels were stolen?
What is the scariest thing about a white man in jail?
Palpatine what was your involvement in 9/11?
What do you get when you cross Michael Jackson with the Karate Kid?
Ever heard of the movie "Constipation"?
Did you hear about the sailor who had something in his back yard?
How do they separate the men from the boys in Athens?
What's the pink panther's to do list?
How did Jesus walk on water?
What's the difference between Ray Charles and Ray Rice?
Why Are Mexican & Black Jokes Overdone?
What's the most awkward U.S state?
What did Will Smith say to Carleton when he asked if he was ready to leave their yoga class?
Why did the hipster where a toque in the summer?
What do you call an Arab flying a plane?
How are college students like plants?
When is a woman too fat to fuck?
Why did the hipster cross the Brooklyn bridge?
Why do Seagulls live by the Sea?
Which Greek Philosopher was the easiest to manipulate?
What is Whitney Houston's favorite kind of coordination?
What did the scientist say when a stranger came inside his lab?
How would you describe a joke about bones?
What does a physicist text when he's mad and being short with someone?
Why did C++ look down at C?
What did the Egyptian Pharaoh do when he got caught in traffic?
What do you call a one-eyed deer?
What's the best angle to tackle a problem?
Why did the Carpenters wife leave him?
What do a totalitarian mallard and a potato in an air vent have in common?
Where do black Jewish people go ?
What has 72 teeth and can hold back the Incredible Hulk?
Why wasn't Cinderella good at sports?
What did the brick say to the rock?
How many controlled oposition does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call an angry pastry?
What did the fish say when he hit concrete?
Why don't black people like tylenol?
What did the little Chinese boy get for Christmas?
What language does a patio speak?
What are your thoughts on monorails?
Why did the Korean restaurant have a lesbian appreciation day?
What mental disorder did the serial killer who stabbed his victim 23 times have?
Why did the eskimo spend 3 hours arguing with the return counter?
Have you ever heard Yoko Ono sing?
Why are Asian students so smart?
Did you hear Richie Benaud died today?
IS YOUR REFRIGERATOR RUNNING?
What does a mathematician do when he is constipated?
What it Princess Zelda's favorite food?
How do you get a date on Tinder?
Why do you put a fence around a graveyard?
What did the artist ask Shakespeare when he was sketching his portrait?
What gets you a downvote?
Have you heard the one about the insomniac, agnostic, dyslexic?
If a stack is first in last out and a queue is first in first out, what is a circular queue?
What's the difference between an oyster shucker with epilepsy and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What is the most-ignored rule in a convent?
What's the worst thing a girl can wear to bed?
What would George "Kingfish" Stevens say about Obama if he were alive today?
What do you call a rising poll?
Why couldn't Dracula ever get a good blow-job?
What do you call it when three french cats get into a boat only meant for two?
Why did Angelina get wanderlust after her double-masectomy?
Why do sumo wrestles shave their legs?
What's the difference between Haribo candies and blowjobs from an old lady while wearing no condom ?
Did you know that FDR's collection of pet kangaroos were purposely written out of the history books?
What did the doctor say to the man that broke his arm?
When will a proper female AI be made?
What do you call a mexican cyclops?
How much does it cost for a pirate to get his ears pierced?
Why did the black man go to the golf-club on Sunday afternoon?
Why Hitler died?
You know what jokes are the worst?
Who's the biggest bitch in a whole wide world?
Why do ladies prefer 77 over 69?
Cake day: How many scientists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Whats the best way to watch porn?
How does a pirate reenact Travis Bickle's speech?
How do you convert Spanish programming into English?
What do 16 year old boys and drug companies have in common?
What do people wear when they go to a new planet?
Did you know diarrhea is genetic?
What's long, green, slimy and smells like pork?
What do you get when you cross a onion and a donkey?
What's a pirate's favorite element on the periodic table?
What do you call a square that's been beat up?
What do you do when you come across an elephant in the jungle?
Why is Batman undefeatable?
What do you call a gay milkman?
Why didn't Hitler go to strip clubs?
What's the kinkiest leafy green?
What did Peyton Manning said to his younger brother about the new NFL rule?
What did Dave Grohl say when someone stole his Greek food?
Why did Jesus take three days to resurrect after dying on the cross?
How does a Buzzfeed writer catch fish?
In the toy shop in my area, packet balloons cost $0.10 each, but $10 when filled with air?
Whats green, has six legs and if it falls from a tree it will kill you?
Why should a woman President never masturbate?
How do you hide an elephant up a cheery tree?
What's red, white and blue?
What is the hardest thing about learning to ride a bike?
What do you call a fish with no "eyes"?
Which phone is most sold in Australia?
Did you know that Pringles were originally used as a laxative, for medicinal purposes?
Why did the old man throw the matress out the window?
Whats the difference between Jesus and his photo?
What's the difference between someone who doesn't use their turn signal and Hitler?
If farmer A sells apples and farmer B sells bananas, what does farmer C sell?
What does a selfie stick and a tampon have in common?
What would Hitler say to his son?
What does your momma and a hockey player have in common?
What has America come to?
What do you call a terrorist video store?
Did you hear about the guy who bombed the printing press?
What do Nazis do on a beach vacation?
which cola brand sources its water from the oceans?
What kind of fish is the worst friend?
How many quarters does it take to play the Lord of the rings pinball game?
What do you call an easter extremist?
How do you get elected president of my pants?
What's a dentist's favorite time?
Why didn't you visit Chad?
Did you hear that there's a new "Divorced Barbie"?
The Energizer Bunny was arrested this morning. Have you heard about this?
Why is ISIS so good at sports?
What's the difference between a dirty bus terminal and a large-breasted crab?
What did the kid say to his nanny when she stubbed her toe while trying to catch him?
What basketball team does a vampire play for?
What happened to the native man that drank 23 cups of tea?
Whats the best time to go to the dentist?
What do you call a candelabra that refuses to hold candles?
What did the American Chef say to the Asian Chef?
Wanna hear a joke about ebola?
What do you get when two pieces of poop marry each other?
Did you hear Miley Cyrus and her new boyfriend broke up?
Which Nordic country should you never be a part of?
What do the English and Welsh have in common?
How does someone stop ISIS?
How do you find Will Smith in a snowy forest?
Why do towels get dirty?
Why did Hitler suicide?
Q. Who's the coolest guy in the hospital?
How many millenials does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did the FLAC say?
What is dementia?
How many dank memes does it take to change a lightbulb?
Have you ever had ethiopian food?
What has four legs and will kill you if it falls out of a tree?
Why do tumblr users make for poor gunmen?
How do chinese people name their childre n?
Did you hear the joke about the guy who shined a light at his shadow?
How do you increase a pirates morale?
Did you know you can use a condom twice?
What does a fish say when it swims into a concrete wall?
Hey, have you heard of that new movie, "Constipation"?
What happened to the man who had a Disney character lodged up his rectum?
What did the fish say to the man draining its aquarium?
What do you get when you cross a whistle with a blizzard?
Why did the goose cross the road?
Which Asians have the softest skin?
Did you hear about that man who used somebody else's legs?
Why these two fingers?
Did you here about the new zoo?
What does The White House and my underwear have in common?
OK - who knows their Soupy Sales lines?
Why couldn't the baby Jesus be born in Utah?
What is a dog lover's favorite cookie?
What is purple and commutes?
What was Nero's favorite kind of sandwich?
What is a British person's favorite cereal?
Whats the opposite of under?
what did they call the disc jockey who kept playing the same songs again and again?
Did you hear about the guy who wanted to join ISIS?
what's red and smells like blue paint?
How many creationists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's in a Paul Walker shot ?
Why is a Mexican midget called a paragraph?
What do you call a guy who makes "women in the kitchen" jokes?
What's a pirates favorite class?
What's the best part of a boxer's joke?
What do you call a person who is half Jewish?
What does a neckbeard eat for breakfast?
What city is the favorite place for anti-Semites?
Did you guys hear Adele might have cancer?
How do spies eat their waffles?
What do you call a group of sorority girls/fraternity guys standing in a circle?
What do you call a zombie eating a dog?
Did you hear about the woman who walked backwards into a propellor?
Why did Jesus hang on the cross for three days?
Are you a monosaccharide?
What is more funny than a penguin sliding down a hill?
Did you hear about the obese woman who got a job at a bank?
What kind of dinosaur would Eminem be?
What do you call an Irish man that bounces off of walls?
Have you seen the new movie Constipated?
What do a Prostitute and a politician have in common?
What is the main difference between a drag show and a drag race?
Why did no one ever consider Tony Stark (the Iron Man) a protagonist?
Q: What mythological monster casts no reflection?
How do you get someone with downs syndrome out of a tree?
Why does the Easter Bunny hide the eggs?
Did you hear that Jesus was a bit of a drunk?
What do public toilets and homeless shelters have in common?
Why do gay men get so much hate?
What musical group is Jesus most afraid of?
What do you tell a women with a black eye?
Do you know why the Easter Bunny hides his eggs?
What's a blind mans favorite car?
Why are Slavs always squatting?
Where does a black Jew stand?
Too soon for a knock knock joke?
Why did the bar owner by a diamond mine get arrested?
How do you get your partner to give you head?
What's the difference between a Scottish guy and Mick Jagger?
Why did the poor man become a baker?
what do you think of the number 4?
Obama is in a sinking ship. Who gets saved?
Why don't cannibals eat the feet?
What is the 2nd worst reason to become a historian?
What kind of parasites do gangstas get?
Passover jokes?
What do you call a stupid person?
What were Jesus's last words to his disciples as he was nailed to the cross?
Do you think, when they were looking for that Carmen girl, that they ever checked San Diego?
Why can't women drive?
What has two legs and bleeds a lot?
How's the fruit?
Why wasn't Boy George any good at English?
What's a Polygon?
How do you catch a bear?
What do you call a Pakistani with a vest on?
What is the best remedy for cough?
What did one saggy boob say to the other one?
What does a former terrorist playboy say to the officer interrogating him?
Are jokes about Islam funny?
What is Kanye West's least favorite holiday?
Why are gay people so fashionable?
Why doesn't the Easter Bunny make noise when he has sex?
What did John Lennon say when he got egg shells in his cake?
Which eggs are the best for Easter?
Why did Will die?
What's it called if women in heaven still menstruate?
Why is Helium so trustworthy?
What do you get from a frozen zombie?
What do you get when you cross a sheep and a kangaroo?
Did you hear about that glacier off the coast of Italy?
What do you call a circus full of mean people?
Where's the best place to hide money from a Mexican?
What do you call a Rhinoceros mixed with a Rooster?
Why do cannibals hate Pentecostals?
You know what?
What did Anakin order from the Italian bakery?
What do you get when you minus Jeremy Clarkson from Top Gear...?
3 tampons walking down the street .Which one says hi first?
What is Whitney Houston's favorite type of coordination?
Why was the egg late for work?
Which dinosaur named all the others?
Q: How do astronomers organize a party?
Why was everyone afraid of the everything bagel?
what do you call a red head's problem?
What's the difference between Indiana and Reddit?
Why wasn't Hamlet sad when his girlfriend drowned?
Did you hear about the sexually frustrated lawyer?
Why would Target be the worst store to run the Enterprise?
What do you call a Whore that was shot by a sniper?
Why does Popeye have the perfect dick?
What did on western cheese say to the other?
Why are photos in Latvia always such good quality?
Do you want to hear a potassium joke?
Want to lose 10 pounds of ugly fat?
What do Germans say when you show them a meme?
Did you hear about the fire at the flame retardant textile manufacturer?
(Translated from my mother tongue) What does a man do when he wants to end a marriage passively?
Husband to wife: Honey, what would you do if I won the lottery?
Judas: Still on for friday?
Why was the doctor so stressed out?
What do you call that part of the pharmacy where they keep the condoms, birth-control pills, etc.?
What shatters faster than your smartphone screen?
Why do Brides wear white?
How does Furious 7 end?
How do you make 5 lbs of fat look good?
What did Iron say to Silver after 30 years?
What is the difference between walking a dog in America and China?
Wanna here a funny joke?
Why do blondes wear their hair up?
What does the Interstellar soundtrack and a porno film have in common?
What do you get when two Samoans Fall off a couch?
Why do dogs lick their balls? Because they can! Why can't humans?
What's the difference between Will Ferrell and a man with erectile dysfunction?
What do you call a cow abortion?
so many poor jokes, where to begin?
What's the last thing they do to a Tickle-Me-Elmo doll before it leaves the factory?
Do you think Lincoln was good at pleasuring the ladies?
Why did the archaeologist ask a diamond out to dinner?
Have you heard about the movie director from space?
What did the poop say to the pee when he was hitting on her?
What did the police officer say to his stomach?
Why did the local university invite a foreign chemist?
Why did the pilot hit the Alps?
Why did Reddit's restaurant go our of business?
do you know the difference between a carrot and a fork?
Why don't Episcopalians play chess?
How do you cure a mute coworker?
What do you call the version of google maps without pac man?
Did you get a haircut?
Interviewer: It says here you're skilled at saying unexpected things?
How do you fit 3 babies in a bowl?
How do you get 4 girls to sit on one chair?
What does M.Night Shyamalan always order when he goes out for ice cream?
Why do midgets have bad breath?
Why didn't Zeke get that job at the KFC off the interstate?
What type of MMO's does the Taliban play?
Why aren't Jewish Youtube celebrities's work viewed at night?
What do you call a sleeping police officer?
What do your mom and a camel have in common?
What do you call too many chickens on a farm?
What becomes packed between periods?
What did the deaf guy say to the blind guy?
Why is 77 better than 69?
What does a fish say when he hits concrete?
Why is butter dangerous?
Have I told you about my new stereo that connects to the Internet and plays Star Wars music?
why is 77 better than 69? what is better than77?
What's the similarity between a burned pizza and parents?
Whats a pirate's favorite letter?
What do you call a woman with two black eyes?
What rhymes and let's you instantly know a redditor is a moron?
What's a laughing condiment?
What's the speed limit to sex?
What do you call people who play April Fool's jokes?
How many redditors does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did the ambulance show up to a tennis match between Number 8 and Number 9?
Is this a joke?
what will i do when i have an out-of-body experience?
Do you remember when Ray Charles and Stevie Wonder played each other in a tennis match?
What did the referee say to the southwest attendant?
What's the difference between Walmart and India?
What does a girl from Arkansas say when she loses her virginity?
How did Helen Keller burn her face?
What do you call a gay guy in a coma?
Why did Susie drop her ice cream?
Did you hear about the Irish paper boy?
What was INXS Singer Michael Hutchence's favorite vegetable?
How do you know your at a gay BBQ?
Did you hear about the guy who invented the Hokey Pokey?
What do you call lesbian eskimos?
Did youz guys hear about the blow job competition last night?
What did one fetus say to the other?
What kind of investments do musicians make?
What did the guy who liked mustard say when he opened his fridge and saw no mustard?
What's the most logical country?
How is called the funeral of an electrical engineer?
If you're in college, what do you do when your flatmate has an epileptic seizure in the bathtub?
What kind of coffee does an executioner drink?
[God-awful OC] What do you call someone who lets people rent wifi signals from them?
What do you have when you have 1000 whites skydiving?
Michael Jackson: Is Mr. Wall there?
Why did the shit-kicker cross the road?
What do you call a midget psychic committing a crime?
What did the doctor say to the patient who refused to stop masturbating?
What's the most erotic food you can eat by yourself?
What's Irish and stays out all night?
Why did the dog keep dropping his ball?
Where do you send Jewish kids with Attention Deficit Disorder?
What is 40ft long and smells like urine?
What education should a private detective have?
You know all those things that "Have been shown to cause cancer in the state of California"?
What's the healthiest sport a pregnant women can play?
Did you hear about the paperboy who masturbated on the job?
What do you call a symphony where everyone plays at the same time instead of taking turns?
Did you hear that the Vatican elected a new Pope?
What happens when you don't pay your exorcist?
Was sagt der große Stift zum kleinen Stift?
What's bad about being a black Jew?
What does a woman trucker and a hockey team have in common?
What is a prostitute's favorite region of America?
What do you call a cat crossed with a canary?
What did one pencil say to the other?
What do dyslexic zombies want to eat?
Did you see the Stevie Wonder joke on reddit today?
Why did Billy Joel get acquitted?
What is it called when two little people get divorced?
What's a mathematician's favorite kind of music?
What do you get when you merge Revenge with Grey's Anatomy?
What are some (appropriate) ginger jokes I can use in an entertaining speech?
Did you hear about the new wine that the Taliban is selling in the US to help fund its war efforts?
Why were the children jumping for Joy?
In the final analysis, why did Yu do better than Hu?
What do you call a good looking Spanish/Jewish guy?
What does a soviet call someone with good vision?
Why did the vibrator go to the bar?
Anyone seen the movie about the female eye doctor who's always naked when she kills her patients?
How do you find a fat girl's pussy?
Why does the communist party hate planes?
Hillary, why are your socks so saggy?
Why do turds taper off at the end?
How is American beer similar to having sex in a canoe?
What do you call a lesbian with one leg shorter than the other?
Do you know the Greek version of Monopoly?
What do you do if a blonde throws a pin at you?
Why did Hu wind-up worse off than Yu?
How do you know your gf is getting fat?
How many retweets to let me take your sister to prom?
You know what they say about location in real estate?
What do you call an arcade game that involves you hitting avocados that pop out of the top of it?
Why do computer programmers always confuse Halloween and Christmas?
How many politicians does it take to change a light bulb?
What is the smallest part of a little person?
What's Ellen Pao's husband's favourite web plugin?
STEP UP?
Did you hear the pizza guy's joke?
You guys know any Sodium jokes?
Why aren't koalas real bears?
Did you hear about the dyslexic devil worshipper?
If I had a rooster, and you had a donkey, and your donkey ate my rooster's feet, what would we have?
What's a metaphor?
Why can't you make a movie with with Jewish people smoking weed?
Why do programmers produce more garbage than others ?
The two hardest things in programming?
What do you call a lesbian who doesn't believe in gods?
Why did the scout leader get arrested?
What is the difference between a Mexican and a book?
How do you make a prepubescent laugh?
Hey, are you one of the new guys?
Did you hear about the resourceful proctologist?
Your cough sounds much better this morning?
What always stays hot in the refrigerator?
You know how rich people prefer Bose, Bang & Olufsen and Marantz?
Q: Why'd the robber take a bath?
Do you know how I know that diarrhea is genetic?
What's the difference between Arabs and Americans?
What do you call the kinkiest/nastiest move from 50 Shades of Gray?
What do drug dealers sit on?
What makes a feminist prostitute angry?
What's the best drink for a dog?
what's green and floats?
What kind of parents are see-through?
You know what's addictive?
Whats black and screams?
What is the most uptight human instinct?
Have you ever eaten at a Native American restaurant?
Why was the bumble bee wearing a yamaka?
Why shouldn’t you ever have an argument with Möbius?
Have you heard of McDonald's new Obama Value Meal?
Why are my pubes curly?
What would you do of you found Chicago, Ill.?
What do you call an Egyptian surprise attack?
How did feminism start?
What did the fish say when he swam into the wall?
Did you hear about the blonde who got detention for flirting with boys in class?
What do you call a joke that has been internet obsolete for a while?
What do the British say when they're flirting?
Why wasn't Michael Jackson healthy?
If girls with big boobs work at Hooters, where do people with one leg work?
What gun does Jesus hate the most?
What sex position makes ugly babies?
What do you call a caboose that changes its gender?
Why do men like Haunted Bees?
What do you call immigrants to Sweden?
What do you call two roosters having a fight?
Why was the Easter Egg so happy?
How do you know if someone's an engineer without asking them?
What do vegetarian dogs eat?
Why won't Microsoft hire any maids?
Why can't a prostitute count to 70?
What's the difference between a Lamborghini and a pile of dead babies?
Hows a forwardly plural Hitler hailed as?
What do you get when you have barbie dolls standing in a line?
Why can't Mexicans play Uno?
Why did dwarf laugh when he walked through a paddock?
A math joke?
What's the downside of being a redneck kid at Christmas?
How can you get hundreds of women wet all at once?
Why is C afraid of every other letter in the alphabet?
What did Honey Boo Boo's father say after he didn't pull out?
Who was Mako Mori's existentialist monk brother?
Why did God bless Texas?
What's yellow and lives off dead beatles?
What do you call a boat that gives you nothing but trouble?
Do you know what a Freudian slip is?
How many legs does an elephant have if you count his trunk as a leg?
What happens when everyone in the country takes a pee at the same time?
Why don't people tell jokes about the Reverend Jim Jones?
Me: Why is gay marriage such an issue now-a-days?
What do you call an Atheist at a Christian fancy dress party?
What do you call it when Muslim men play naked twister?
How do you make a 90's kid mad?
If my inlaws break a bylaw, does it make them outlaws?
What do you call a female chicken that goes "cock-a-doodle-doo"?
What animal is two animals at the same time?
What do you call a Mexican that loses a car?
Did you know Sasha Grey retired?
What does a Japanese chef shout in bed?
What kind of hotdog did the Buddha order from the street vendor?
Whats the square (root) of a (onion)???
Where do Americans buy their groceries in Afghanistan?
You know what we call comedy gold in the chemistry world?
What do air and sex have in common?
What's the biggest advantage to living in Switzerland?
What do you call it when gay men break up?
Why'd the cookie go to the hospital?
What do French Business Men use to ice their cakes?
What do you call a boxer with an upset stomach?
What did the cat say to the prison guard?
What race of horses is the most popular on Pandora?
What happened when Jesus forgot to look both ways?
What did the dolphin say when he ran into the sea turtle?
Is your name Gravity ?
How many anti-feminists does it take to screw the light bulb?
What did the fish say when he hit the wall?
Why did the pedophile masturbate to Kim Kardashian?
Why do meth heads like to do it doggy style?
What did the buffalo say when dropping off his son at college?
What do you call a dad that works at a grocery store?
Want to know how the Cold War was ended?
How does Moses get his coffee?
Want to hear a joke about nitric oxide?
What do you call a dinosaur in a car accident?
What do fat girls and scooters have in common?
Why was kleenex dancing?
What's Justin Bieber's favorite make of car?
What did the goat say to his friend after he cut his arm?
Why do the ghosts never win races?
Why did the piece of gum cross the road?
What do you call a black guy who plays the piano?
Why were the absurdly dressed chickens escorted from the basketball game?
What game did the Rabbi play with the Baby?
What is the worst part about going to Auschwitz?
What did the cat say to the correctional officer?
What did the grave robber say to his gym buddy in the locker room?
What's worse than being raped by your dad's penis?
Where's the best place to hide during a zombie apocalypse?
Where do you find a quadriplegic?
What did the black Jew say to the non-believers?
Where do 4 gay guys go?
What did Kermit eat after he got divorced?
Do you know what the best part about banging 21 year olds is?
What do you call an Alligator in a vest?
Where is the best place to hide a hippie's weed?
Why are all the fish high?
Why do girls who use Tumblr work so many odd jobs?
Did you here about the female thief?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with a boob job?
How do you get a fat girl into bed?
What's black and white and eats like a horse?
So how about the BBC sacking Jeremy Clarkson ?
Did you here about the French Alps pizza service?
How do you get a homosexual man to have sex with a heterosexual woman?
What's the best part about having a dog lick peanut butter off your balls?
What did the remote controller say to the tv?
Why are all the best Jazz musicians brown?
Have you seen the movie Constipated?
What do you call a Texan who just had sex?
Why does Kim Kardashiani have a big butt?
Why did the gay guy cross the road?
What's the difference between your mom and a pizza?
What did the tiger say to the detective?
Did I tell you guys about my awesome camping trip?
What do Japanese men do when they have erections?
So I hear Reddit likes cats. Anyone ever hear the joke about the cat on the roof?
How do you know your sister's on her period?
How do you make 5 pounds of fat look good?
What do you call a surfing Muslim extremist?
What kind of bees give milk?
What's red, round and goes up and down, up and down?
What do you call a man that marries another man?
You know what's great about jewish tires?
What food do all basketball players hate?
What do you call a Mexican burglar?
Which state smells the worst?
What do you feed someone in a coma from breakfast?
What was Mussolini's favourite dessert?
what do bieber and grumpy cat have in common?
What do you call a Batman that leaves church before its over?
How did Chuck Norris solve the dwindling oil reserves problem?
What did the unimpressed cheese say?
What do you call insects of the order Mantodea during mating season?
So Zayn quit the band?
What is a ghost's favorite drink?
What are the ten greatest years of a woman's life?
What's the difference between a politician and a tiger?
What do they eat on the set of a chick flick?
what did they call the hooker who only slept with vegetarians?
Can a match box?
Did you know about this breed of horses?
whats the best thing about metal clothes pegs?
Why did the cowboy have a brown moustache?
What do nearsighted gynecologists and a puppy have in common?
What happened to the blind surgeon?
how do you mathematically describe the tempo of global warming?
What is the phobia of chainsaws called?
What's the difference between a cheap hooker and an expensive one?
What does a transvestite do on Christmas?
What did Putin say to Ukraine after invading?
Person A: Do you know the shelf life of Cocaine?
Why are none of my jokes funny?
What do you call a squadron of baby soldiers?
What's the difference between Barack Obama and a mark on a gift?
How much cash can you make robbing an Indian restaurant?
Birds can be dangerous. Do you know what's the primary risk that woodpeckers pose to women?
What do you call one Mexican on the moon?
What's the dirtiest little thing that comes to bed with me?
What is that new movie about?
In what font does a mentally handicapped person write?
What does a short sighted gynecologist and a puppy have in common?
What do exchange students and porn addicts have in common?
Did you know i DJ?
What do a bass guitar solo and peeing your pants have in common?
What is a group of Pedophiles called?
Dude, did you hear Willy Nelson's gone..?
Have you heard about the new car from Israel?
What do you call an Arab oil baron with Parkinson's?
Where is the most ironic place to get a girl pregnant?
What do you get when you have a great Dane, a Clydesdale, and a Prostitute?
What did the Australian grandmaster say to the banker, when asked what he wanted to exchange?
What do you call a gay French baker?
How do you know if you have an underbite?
What do you call a boat with a hole?
Why do Americans spell it as 'color' and not 'colour'?
What did one ape say to the the other ape?
What do you call a seabird who's easily taken in?
If April showers bring May flowers, then what do May Flowers bring?
Why couldn't the cat walk through the door?
Girlfriend Pissing You Off?
Where do guys who buy hookers, mountain lions, and cantelopes go for the summer?
Why did the kid drop his ice cream?
Did you see the movie invisible?
Who makes more money: a prostitute or a drug dealer?
(Season 4 spoilers ) Why did a cock named Oberyn Martell kill the KFC cook?
Why is USA so gloomy?
What's a golfer's favourite song?
Why was the socialist kicked from his party?
Why do they put fences around graveyards?
What do you say when comforting a grammar nazi?
What is the epitome of serendipity?
What does a french sheep say?
Why would anyone want to study the Earth and how it rotates?
What do you call it when you make sandwiches at a sleepover?
what do you call an affluent black family in greenwich, ct?
Why was the Trail of Tears so hard on the Native Americans?
What's worse than waking up at a party and finding a penis drawn on your face?
Who would rule in a dog world ?
What's got no teeth and smells?
What happens to a frog that parks illegally?
What kind of house does Fonzie live in?
Where are clowns from?
What do you call a karate expert with a father who has diarrhoea?
Why does Helen Keller wear tight pants?
What did the empty beer bottle say to the other beer bottle?
Why are all these prostitutes advertising?
How did Helen Keller's parents punish her?
What do condoms prevent?
Did you hear about the narcoleptic hair stylist?
How are the Buffalo Bills like Billy Graham?
How many IT guys does it take to Fix a printer?
What is orange, and sounds like a parrot?
Why did the dick cross the road?
What kind of bee can you milk?
What is the one thing wrong with a Piles joke?
What did one sandstorm at a nude beach say to the other?
What does the polite racist say?
What's the best cure to a bad hangover?
Why do nuns hate laundry day?
What do you call a girl in between 2 houses?
Why did the servant of the Airplane King get executed?
Doctor, How was the surgery?
What do you call a cannibal who only eats coma patients?
What did one nut say to the other nut?
What happened to the defeatists poker business?
What do you call a Halal pie?
Did you know the first baseball game was held in the Garden of Eden?
What do you get when you combine a watch with a dog?
Did you hear about the dyslexic atheistic insomniac?
Whats does dissecting a frog and explaining a joke have in common?
Have you heard about that new movie with the poop?
Russia is invading Ukraine?
Why do liberal courts don't work?
How does a Narcissist change a lightbulb?
How do you find the fastest man in Africa?
Why did the grapes gang rape and sodomize the orange with a chain saw?
Do cucumbers make anyone else burp?
How do you get into a haunted house?
How do you define a will?
why didn't the rabbit like his beer?
What do you get when you cross an owl with a bunjee cord?
50/50- What do you get when you put 50 lawyers in a room with 50 lesbians?
Why did little Jimmy break open his computer?
How do Communists achieve a revolution every single year?
A Jew and a black man play basketball in a gas chamber, who wins?
Heya /r/jokes! do you want to know how to keep a loser in suspense?
Why did Megan fall off the swing?
Where do Italian gangsters come from?
How do you measure love?
What do you call Detroit's trash?
How many people live in the lower part of Italy?
What sound does an emo cow make?
Who is responsible for a planes rough landing?
Why didn't Hitler talk to Jews?
Why do black people always finish first in a running race?
What's long and hard and has cum in it?
What do you call an Irish basketball player with a sore back?
What do you do if you see a space man?
Why did it take so long for the postie to deliver the missing jigsaw piece?
Anyone want to come over for a topless pizza party?
Why did the Mexican man push his wife off a cliff?
What do you call a Jew with Down Syndrome?
What exactly is dissassociative identity disorder?
What did the scientist see when he looked up his family tree?
Its poor! But, What happens when Supper stars fart in public?
What's the definition of a redneck virgin?
What did Bruce Banner get after having sex with as prostitute?
Why did Helen Keller fire her maid?
Did you know there are two different types of people in the world?
What's the worst part about going down on a vegan?
What are Pirate clothes made of?
What type of seat does a Drummer sit on?
What's the worst part about going down on a black girl?
What do you call a Latino whos car got nicked?
What has 4 eyes and cannot see?
What did Meghan Trainor say when she got mugged?
Why did I wear no jeans today?
What did the purple policeman say as he threw the purple man into jail?
What is the favorite food joint of dubstep makers?
How does a T-Rex apologize?
How good are the showers at Auschwitz?
What does one toilet say to the other?
Why's it taking so long to legalise gay marriage in the whole of the US?
How do assassins pay for stuff on the internet?
What do you call a drunk dinosaur?
What did Buddy Fletcher, accused ponzi scheme runner and husband of reddit's CEO, say to the duck?
What did the ocean say?
Knock knock. Who's there? Bob. Bob who?
Why do feminists support gun control?
Did you hear about the 80 year old woman that tried to kill herself?
Why was the strawberry sad?
What technology are old people better at using than young people?
What caused The Black Death?
How much power does it take to move a tank?
What do you call a white guy who's beating someone in the street?
How many Social Justice Warriors does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's got no teeth, and smells?
Did you hear about the midget that finally came to terms with his homosexuality?
Ever hear about the Jesus Bomb?
Why are all Quaker truck drivers stuck in the 1980's?
What do you call a musical sheep group?
What kind of car does a ghost drive?
Where do you see yourself in five years?
What's the trickiest part of a penis transplant?
How do you clean a seat for a woman?
Why did the Bee get married?
What sits down but doesn't get back up?
What do you call a 10 ten old Irish boy who doesn't go to church?
What changed to make The Fantastic Four the Fantastic Three?
What Happened when Feminist's found out about Reddit?
What does a prostitute have in common with Sting?
What did the tailor tell the thieving nun when he caught her red-handed?
Did you know the first sniper was a Mexican?
Why wouldn't Pope Pius bless any helicopters when they were first manufactured?
What is Bruce Lee's favorite drink?
What do you call a phobia of chainsaws?
What did the scientist say at the bar?
How do you convince your neighbor to share their water with you?
How do you add up a mountain?
What do you call a female accountant?
What did the musician say when he went back in time?
What does an alcoholic neckbeard drink for breakfast?
What is the cheapest meat available?
What did the neckbeard say when he was punched in the throat?
What happens when a frog's car breaks down?
What do you call a place showcasing gay people in their natural environment?
Why did Mrs. Quartz divorce Mr. Quartz?
Why does Jesus and bartenders have so much in common?
How many femenists does it *really* take to change a lightbulb?
Went to the Optician the other day, guess whom I bumped into?
What type of people are the worst?
How many students does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the maximum velocity while having sex?
What did the bean say to the other bean?
What do you call a resturaunt for bulemia victims?
How many MRAs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's every vehicle's favorite style of dance?
How many Germans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the adult entertainment business for religious visionaries?
How are butter and a prostitute similar?
Why couldn't the Soviet Union get anything done?
What do you call an experienced Nazi doctor who treats animals?
What did the flower couple call their two babies?
What is the best kind of vegetable?
What did the Irishman text his Wife?
How many Redditors does it take to tell a joke?
What do you call a bowl on the internet?
Did you know that Stalin suffered from bulimia?
Q:Whats is fat ugly and gives good head?
What is the most commonly used phrase at a gay bar?
What does bread do when it wants to get married...?
How many tries does it take to get to the front page?
What kind of pants to Mario and Luigi wear?
What travels down an alley and has holes in it?
What does a hippy say when you ask him to leave?
what makes a good pun?
What does a math teacher do when he has hemorrhoids?
What does Math stand for?
How many menstruating women does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a bee's rear end?
How did the blonde break her leg raking leaves?
Wanna hear a short joke?
How do you shoot a blue elephant?
Were you born in another country?
Guess what???
Why did the sauce need a night light?
What's the opposite of evening?
How does a tauren hide in a cherry tree?
What's Jeffrey Dahmers favorite ice cream?
What's the difference between a saxophone and a chainsaw?
Why did the mother bear ask the baby bear to wear shoes before he ran through the forest?
What were Hitler's favorite kind of lights?
What do you call an oblivious wolf?
Why do OP's jokes suck?
How do you say "Jesus take the wheel" in Arabic?
What does a mobster buried in cement eventually become?
What did the stone say to the hill?
Thought up a reddit joke today. When is a triangle a rectangle?
Why can't you give Elsa a balloon?
What's the worst part of a vacuum?
What do Africans eat for breakfast?
Where is Jennifer's husband?
What's the downside to dating a Mermaid?
What is the difference between Jesus and a picture of Jesus?
Why does Usain Bolt hate asians?
What kind of money do they use on superman's home planet?
Whats worst than a super long joke?
How can you tell if your roommate's gay?
How do meth users get the money to buy their drugs?
What's Darth Vader's sister's name?
What did the chauffeur say to the newlyweds as they passed the last rest stop?
What sound does a Baroque chicken make?
What do you call a TV award an Italian mobster cheated to win?
What's the difference between a gay man and a refrigerator?
What's the perfect line of work for a lizard?
What did the left butt cheek say to the right?
Why do trees seem suspicious on sunny days?
What did the 2 say to the 3?
What's the difference between your girlfriend on her period and a terrorist?
What's dumber than a box of rocks?
What do you call a black political figure?
What does a pirate say on his 80th birthday?
What do you do with a dog that doesn't have any legs?
What's the only type of dog that doesn't bark?
Why is vagina better than cake?
What is it called when a blind deaf man commits murder?
Have you heard that awesome joke that's reposted all the time?
What's the difference between a piano, a tuna and a jar of glue?
Have you heard of the paedophile comedian?
What's the forecast for Mexico?
Why doesn't the veteran have a blow-up sex doll?
Have you heard that hilarious joke about Hellen Keller?
What should you do if you see a spaceman?
What do couch potatoes evolve into?
Why did Pinocchio's nose get longer?
Why did Mr Ohm marry Mrs Ohm?
Why do athletes like Sports Illustrated Magazine so much?
What kind of animal goes "LMAO"?
Why does Thor have insomnia?
What pier is disliked by almost everybody?
Hey did you hear about the Red and Blue ships that collided?
Whats George Zimmerman's favorite song?
Do you wanna hear a reverse joke?
What do you call a Mexican that lives on a hill?
Is Rick Moranis dead?
So how do monks stay warm in the snow covered peaks and whatnot?
What does soylent green taste like?
What did the racist chef say to Lenny Kravitz?
Why do chicken coups have two doors?
How did Hitler lose the race?
A Chicken coop has two doors, what would it be called if it had four?
What's the difference between funny jokes, and the jokes that make always make it big on reddit?
What do you call a legless nun?
What do you call it when Britain, Russia, and France make a sexual pun before WWI?
What do you call a Black man flying a plane?
What do you call a pirate from Ireland??
What's the capital of Massachusetts?
What does the window do when the sun shines on it?
What's a short, dirty joke that gets a laugh every time?
What goes clip clop clip clop BANG clip clop clip clop?
Guess what the little boy with no hands got for his birthday?
Why is there no Dick's sporting goods in Hawaii?
Why do Leprechauns always laugh as they run across a field?
Why did Oscar Pistorius lose his court case?
What do you call a color that doesn't exist?
what do you call 6 hwy workers and 6 lesbians on the side of the road?
Did you hear about the farmer who's wife left him?
Why was Herbert Hoover such a controversial president?
What's Whitney Houston's favourite type of co-ordination?
Have you heard about the two gay ghosts?
Why can't two Asian parents have a Caucasian baby?
For the Day that's in it: What did Saint Patrick say as he drove the snakes out of Ireland?
What did one casket say to the other casket?
What do you call a cow with no legs??
Why did the Girl fall off the swing?
Why did the baker rob the deer park?
Why did the football team sack the hairy goalkeeper?
What did the fire say the morning of his birthday?
What does an empathetic kleptomaniac do in an argument?
What do you call an anticlimactic punchline?
How do you piss Voldemort off?
Why did the girls fall off the swing?
What do the leaders of ISIS drink after a victory?
What do you get if a convict goes camping?
What do you call a mouse named Bob who's having an existential crisis?
Why are Canadian Jews so poor?
What do you get when you cross a vulture with a machine gun?
Did you hear about the guy who got the left side of his body cut off?
How do you sort out Ant and Dec?
What does the right kidney say to the left one when he is mad at the other?
Who does Batman call when he needs to cool down his expensive drinks?
What's the highest thing in existence?
What do you call it when you get stuck into a shotgun wedding with a Czech?
In honour of St Patrick's day, can you guess my Irish name?
How Did Harry Potter Get Down The Hill?
What was built after the Indian sandwich maker's shop burned down?
What did the clock say when he was finished having sex?
Why did the horny girl go to Subway?
What did the vertebrate say to the invertebrate?
Two kittens are on a slanted roof, which one slides off first?
What is a Coronation Street resident's least favourite football team?
How is this joke similar to a musical about a thesaurus?
How do you catch a unique cat?
Why did Waldo only wear stripes?
Did you hear about the Pharaoh getting kicked out of the Grammy's?
What do you call an Italian with a rubber toe?
What's the difference between an ass kisser and a brown noser?
What's the most googled word in Mozilla Firefox?
What happened before the Big Bang?
Whats Putins favourite food?
What is the difference between light and hard?
Why was the father centipede annoyed?
How many disappointments can you fit into a van?
Have you heard about the Rwandan massacre?
What does a dirty hippie say after you ask him to get off your couch?
What do you get if you cross a drummer with Mike Tyson?
What's purple and chained to my front porch?
What did the psychiatrist say to the patient that showed up wearing Saran Wrap and nothing else?
How do you make Obama's eyes light up?
What nationality are Sprinters?
Why do fish always sing off key?
What did the elevator say to the escalator?
What clothes do lawyers wear to work?
What do you call a soldier that got attacked by mustard gas and pepper spray??
What do you call an evil cat, who only lives to be an ass hole?
What do you call a Greek skydiver?
Why are librarians so shy?
Hey, man. Can I get a cold one?
Why doesn't Mexico win Olympic Medals?
What did the gay deer say after leaving the bar?
What's your blud type bob?
Wanna hear a joke about my penis?
Pretty offensive joke: Why does all Turkish men have a mustache?
What game do lesbians like to play?
How did the rednecks find their sister?
What's something that some people don't get about jokes with sexual innuendo?
Why do the Dutch enjoy Belgian jokes so much?
What do you call a guy with no body and no nose?
Why does the blood bank never make mistakes?
What do you call a kid with no arms and no legs?
Can somebody please hand me a knife?
Why do black people get hit by cars more during winter time?
What do you call a 7 year old redneck girl who can run faster than her brothers?
What did the yogi have for breakfast?
Did you know that Kraft is building a factory in Jerusalem?
What country has many sugar?
What is a creationist's favorite button in pokemon?
What education program did Eric Wright enroll in?
What does a beer say when it's cold?
Why is everyone afraid of Vladimir Putin?
How do you make five pounds of fat attractive?
How do you piss off a white guy?
What's red and green and spins round & round & round?
Why did the Khmer Rouge smoke weed?
What does a philosopher put his/her food on?
What is the worst thing about getting hit in the face with PI?
What do you call Annoying Orange and his gang having sex?
What did the sadist do to the masochist?
Why is the door to heaven always open?
What do you feel when there's no coffee left?
What do you call a fake Irish diamond?
What was Osama bin Laden's favorite drink?
Fruit flies can fly, but most fruit can't, do you know which one can?
Why shouldn't you tell a philosophy major a joke?
You know what would be ironic?
What do you call someone that likes to show off her ovaries?
What is Carroll Shelby's favorite food?
[In honor of Leonard Nimoy] How many ears does Spock have?
How much electricity is in the ground?
Why didn't the mason jar need a paternity test?
Did you hear about the sequel to Snakes on a Plane with giant, poisonous centipedes?
Which fraternity was George Lucas in during College?
What do you call a boomerang that doesn't work?
In honor of Pi Day: Who founded the round table?
What do you call an angry toilet?
What did I say when my Neutrogena products worked?
Did you hear about the incompetent circumciser?
If Oliver Stone is being a stone and Michael Bay is being a bay, then what is Anthony Weiner being?
What did the cow say when she got hit by a car?
Why can't ovaries sail a boat?
You know what the worlds best play on words is?
What do you call the memory of a camping trip?
What goes: 'click' is that it? 'click' is that it? 'click' is that it?
How does a Jew make his tea?
How do you fit 100 Jews in a car?
You know why those automatic sensor sinks save water?
Why are a good majority of Americans obese?
Why don't they have a concert on the moon?
Did you hear about the gay guy who got in a car accident?
How did Maxwell greet Ampère?
What do you call a Polish dancer?
Why does OP never deliver?
What is a ghosts favourite job?
What is it called when a criminal gets excited?
Why hasn't Harper Lee had any kids?
What's worse: Alzheimer or Parkinson?
Am I a real polar bear?
What do you get when you cross a lawnmower and a canary?
You wanna know about hippie sex?
What's the best way to fit 30 Jews in a 5 passenger car?
Where do mice park their boats?
What religion do ghosts practice?
Did you here about the guy who's whole left side was cut off?
Who do you think was smarter, Jesus or Buddha?
How do you feel about euthanasia?
What's the driest joke you ever heard of?
Why did Michael Jackson invent the Moonwalk?
How many kids with ADD does it take to change a lightbulb?
Ground control to Kerbal III, how willing would you be to share your proximity to the equator?
What do you tell a mathematician if he does drugs?
Where's the best place to go on the first date?
What do you call banana shoes?
What’s the best part about living in Switzerland?
What sound does a piano make when falling down a mine shaft?
What's red and goes up and down?
Why can't you run in a campground?
Why should you never trust advice from a group of gryphons?
What's a similarity between anal sex and spinach?
What's worse than having your car impounded by the police?
What do you call a Graveyard built on sandstone?
Why are normal human body temperatures around 98.7*F?
What do you call an Asian who breaks a lot of wind?
What's blue and smells like red painting?
Did anyone hear of the Pi that was missing the number 5?
What do you call a short Native American programmer?
Why didn't galactus consume the milky way?
What did the Germans name the Israeli Submarine?
What do you call a cholo with one leg shorter than the other?
How did the Vagina want her eggs cooked?
¿Cómo frijoles?
What would you do?
How do you find out that a cricket hears with its legs?
What country always follows Zimbabwe?
How do you kill a bear without a weapon?
What's the most racist letter of the alphabet?
Has legs, but don't walk... has feathers but it is not a chicken... What it is?
Why did Moe finally decide to kill of Homer Simpson's son?
What did the smart chicken say to the stupid chicken?
You know what is the most hated letter in alphabet?
If you commit 90 sins, u will get caught 45 times. Why?
How many Estonians you need to build a house in Finland ?
What do you call a patella that sleeps around too much?
How do cities decide who gets to be in charge of wastewater management?
Why can't women enjoy porn as much as men?
what's it called when a duck farfs?
What did the Physics professor say when he forgot his lines of a speech?
How many kittens can you stuff into a microwave for 15 minutes on defrost...?
What kind of punch hurts children the most?
What do you call a disembodied nose?
What do you call a raft full of black people?
What's green, slimy, and smells like bacon?
When/why do feminists hate cannibals?
What does a Mexican Morpheus say?
What is the difference between my dad and cancer?
What do you get when you have seven dragon balls?
What is a mexican's favourite sport?
If Hannibal Lector is not a vegetarian, what is he?
What are the four words that you least want to hear, after having blown Willie Nelson?
what do you call a rhinoceros mixed with george washington?
Why don't you hear any knock knock jokes about America?
What is green and smells like pork?
Do you remember the name of the Italian/Vietnamese restaurant we went to?
What do fish do when they are angry with each other?
Why was the bi-sexual man so healthy?
What's the difference between Tuna, a Piano, and a bottle of Glue?
Why do republicans hate math?
Geology rocks! Geometry rules! Can you think of anymore?
Why are atoms untrustworthy?
What is the difference between a GOOD and a BAD girl?
Q: What do you call a home sexual on roller skates?
What do you call a dyslexic insomniac philosopher?
What do you call a group of Spaniards in quicksand?
Why does the U.S. Government hate winter?
What does a rich fat Englishman gain?
What is the worst dinosaur to take to a restaurant?
Why did the robot become a museum curator?
What's long and hard and full of seamen?
[Request an Explanation] Did you hear about the constipated mathematician?
Did you hear about the new condoms for frogs?
How did Reddit not fell down yet?
Why aren't cowboys circumcised?
Why did little Johnny lose his ice cream?
Why do ducks have flat feet?
What's the Mexican version of the Klan?
What do you call a dirty Jew?
What do you call a greedy crab?
The difference between a rooster and a lawyer?
Did you hear about the French chef that committed suicide?
What is a six figure income?
What do you call a Mexican supremacist organization against civil rights?
A gay and a lesbian are going to the airport. Who gets there first?
Why did the scarecrow win the nobel prize?
What thinks the unthinkable?
What do you call a black man on the ISS?
What does the German wheat farmer say to his wife in the morning?
Did you hear they found a dead ice cream vendor covered in sprinkles?
Why did Fred put band aids in the refrigerator?
Where did the girl go when the bomb exploded?
Are you a moment of Inertia?
What did they find in the toilet in the star ship Enterprise?
What's the difference between a baby and a trampoline?
Q; What do you call two fleas on top of a bald head?
How many children with Attention Deficit Disorder does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a psychic midget on the run from the law?
What do 0/10 little boys enjoy?
What was Jesus's least favorite bone?
What do you call a Korean bulldog?
What is the difference between a midget politician and syphilis?
You know what's a weird Irish name?
What happened when Billy Mays's ghost floated into the rave?
You eat what?
Why didn't the toilet paper cross the road?
What do you call a wolf that is cautious?
Whats the difference between the English cricket team and a teabag?
What do you call it when a stripper gives you a free lap-dance?
What did the cannibal do after dumping her boyfriend?
What do you call a wolf you cant find?
What's 18 inches and makes women SCREAM?
Where do intergalactic keyboards go to drink?
What do you call two crows sitting in a tree?
Whats the Difference Between Hitler and Stalin?
What does batman call his dick?
What do the letters G, I, T, N, H, N & O have in common?
What did the one tampon say to the other tampon?
What club cancels their meeting everytime?
What does 007 wear on his head?
How many animals can you fit into a pair of panty hose?
What is Vladimir Putin's favourite drink?
What did the fertilizer say to the grass?
Why did Tina Fey cross the road ?
Are one-liners accepted?
Did you hear about the man who lost his whole left side?
A cop stops a drunk man and asks: How high are you?
[OC] Why Did the Paradox Cross the road?
What's the difference beetwen public official and private employee?
How many bugs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call an expensive circumcision?
Why doesn't Pakistan have its national football team?
What do you call a Muslim basketball player's best move?
Which is the worst hand to lose?
Why dont blind people skydive?
What font is alphabet soup produced in?
What's a Jewish girl's favorite wine?
Why was the young snowflake so upset?
What's the difference between writing your will and owning an ant farm?
What do you call a woman who turn straight guys into gay?
Why does my abusive mother hate vegetables?
Did you hear about the baker that died fighting to save his business?
If you are American in living room, what are you in the bathroom?
Why did the coke can throw itself off the building, and why did it become so famous?
Who so thelioma?
Why haven't they sent a woman to the moon?
What do you call a class for dumb gingers?
What did the sluts left leg say to her right leg?
What joke did drake get when talking to diddy?
What's red and silver and bumps in to walls?
What do you call it when a person has a fear of Vietnamese food?
What did Jeffrey Dahmer say to Lorena Bobbit?
What's Whitney Houston's favourite form of coordination?
How many Global Warming nutjobs does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between your mom and a drug dealer?
Why does Tiger Woods bring two pair of pants during a golf game?
What is the cruelest thing you can do to a blind person?
How do you titillate and ocelot?
Do you guys like corny jokes?
How did Helen Keller get punished?
What's the difference between a woman's argument and a knife?
What does a priest get when he wants pussy?
Why don't black people pay rent?
Why did Harrison Ford Crash his plane?
What's the difference between parents who don't vaccinate their children and ISIS?
What do you call it when a neurologist is found embezzling and he later runs away?
What for you call a motivated mannequin?
Did you hear about the vampire at the circus?
What car do polite cowboys drive?
Why is God happy?
Did you hear that Sir Mix-A-Lot's pet snake left his girlfriend because she went low-carb?
why do sandwich fillings look weird ?
Q: How do you say "take a shit" in Japanese?
Did you guys hear the one where the Imam joins the priest and rabbi walking into the bar?
How many policemen does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you get when you cross a donkey and a piece of onion?
Where do Muslims go on a weekend?
Remember when people uses Chuck Norris jokes?
Why do all travelers use the road to get to Jordans most popular destination?
What is a gay guys favorite search engine?
What did Christian Grey say when he read reviews of his movie?
If Patrick Bateman from American Psycho had a butler, what would the butler call him?
My little brother dropped this on me; What do Mexicans say when they're cold?
What do you call a monk that cooks potatoes?
What's Forrest Gump's password?
What did the pirate say when his wife kept asking him about the steering wheel in his pants?
What did one toilet roll say to another toilet roll?
Why can't elephants go skinny dipping?
What do you give a sick microbe?
What's the difference between 3 dicks and a joke?
Why is Time a whore?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster who got breast implants?
What did the teacher do with the student's cheese report?
Why did the rich man go crazy?
What do you call nuts on a wall?
How did Marty McFly react when shown what 2015 would really look like?
What does Santa call his English Elves?
Why did the t-rex cross the road?
Why do penguins never go to England?
What time are most dental appointments scheduled for?
Q: Why did the belt get locked up?
Hear about Harrison Fords plane crash?
What do eagles and moles have in common?
What do white girls and Prime numbers have in common?
Did you hear about the circus fire?
Why did the Irishman only put 239 beans in his bean soup?
Why do bananas get all the ladies?
Why are most weather forecasters men?
What food greatly diminishes a women's sex drive?
What do we call of spill of the world's most abundant resource?
On a hot day, what did the pig say to the other pig after he came back from the car?
What does a vampire's blood taste like?
What is six inches long and stiff in the morning?
Why did the cat stop singing?
Have you heard the Kardashian family motto?
What do you call Bill Gates' penis as he gets out of a swimming pool?
What did Cinderella say when her photos did not show up?
Do you know why so many American kids die in high school massacres?
Why dont applebees employees wear watches?
How did the redneck find his sister in the woods?
What did the mod say to the other?
Why is ten afraid of nine?
What do you get when you squash a bungalow?
If 2 wrongs don't make a right, what do 2 rights make?
Why is it called a Mango?
What do you call a root vegetable that spins on it's axis?
Why did the calculus students get arrested?
Why can't you ever see a hippopotamus hiding in a tree?
Wat the hell would I do with this rocket?
Are you impulsive?
What kind of jeans does mario wear ?
Are you from Mississippi?
What brand of underwear do zombies wear?
What kind of foods do arthritic cannibals love to eat?
Have you ever had an African meal?
How did the redneck find the goat in the tall grass?
Why did cavemen drag their women around by the hair and not the feet?
What is Ronald Reagan's favourite vegetable?
Post?
What's the most terrifying gift your SO/Family can buy for you?
What does a gentleman do after sex?
What's a storm trooper's favorite date?
Did you hear about the group of people who stole a dozen boxes of Viagra?
Why do you have to take two Baptists with you when you go fishing?
Whats the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chick pea ?
Where are otters from?
Did you hear about the ghost who got a vasectomy?
What is the only inedible part of a vegetable?
Why did the cab driver did not get time for his family?
Who Wears The Old Clothes Of Angela Merkel?
Why does nobody talk to circles?
Q: What do you call a cow who's had an abortion?
What's worse than male chauvinists?
A man drives his truck and runs over a woman. Whose fault is it?
Why is Abraham Lincoln on the Penny?
You know what I love about world history?
Anybody want to hear a joke about pizza?
Can a ninja kill someone from a distance?
What did gangster Pooh said to gangster Tigger?
What is the preferred newspaper of lighting fixtures?
What's got a pair of balls and 100 teeth?
Why did Kanye blow up the bakery?
What's the difference between a hotdog and a dead baby?
What did the Asian pirate do when he saw a crowd?
OC: What does Babe Ruth and roughly 100,000 antelopes have in common?
Why did the student take Viagra while preparing for his exam?
Did you hear about the Indian who drank too much tea?
How is cunnilingus like riding a bike with an open face helmet?
What limitations does braille have? Can it represent everything that we read using the alphabet?
Did you hear about the new in-flight corduroy pillows?
Why do Klingons feel very little pain?
What do you call a Muslim who is notoriously late for everything?
What's green, slimy and smells like bacon?
What's the difference between a blond and a washing machine?
What did the calculus teacher tell the crew of his submarine while they were diving?
What do you call someone with no body and just a nose?
What do you call a redneck orgy?
What did the male titanic say to the female titanic?
What do Paul Walker and Pink Flyod have in common?
What do you get if you insert human DNA into a goat?
Which is Reddit's favourite element?
What's worse than dropping a scope of ice cream?
Do you know the story of Flap Flap The Giraffe?
What does a sandal do on Sunday's?
Did you hear about the prank these guys pulled on Hitler?
What do you call a criminal dwarf on an escalator?
What's easier to pick up, the heavier it gets?
Why can we never actually see the sun?
Why did the chicken cross the road, roll in dirt and then cross the road again?
How many contradictory Germans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
So, my mate Vincent cut his ear off and his wife asked him why?
What does an alcoholic nun have?
Why hasn't Nintendo released a Mario themed basketball video game?
How did the Germans conquer Poland so fast?
How many social justice warriors does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's red and dingle dangles from the ceiling?
How does a mathematical pedophile refer to a child who just turned 8 years old?
Difference between a dead dog and a dead lawyer in the road?
What do vegetarian worms eat??
A woman walks into a beauty salon and asks the beautician, can you make me look like Kim Kardashian?
What do you call a pretentious mime?
What characteristics do chemists look for in people when dating?
What so you call an Asian jew?
Why couldn't the lizard have any children?
[Meta] Would it be possible to get a moderator bot to flair each post according to length?
How many Germans do you need to screw in a lightbulb?
Who's the poorest person in West Virginia?
Whats red and sits in the corner?
What'd the banana say to the vibrator?
What kind of blood does a born loser have?
What is better than a rose on a guitarist?
Why do bald men have holes in their pockets?
What did the prostitute say to her customer after he finished paying?
How long does it take a monkey to fly a plane from LA to New York?
What did the elephant say to the man?
Did you hear that actress from Legally Blonde was stabbed?
Have you seen the world's biggest thermometer?
What did the Baskin-Robbins manager say to the employee that wanted to date a co-worker?
What did the geologist say when he got a rock for his birthday?
How is a Mexican like a cue ball?
Whats the difference between a rooster and a gay surfer?
What do you call bad Mediterranean food?
What do you call a German outkast?
What is a pedophile's first guitar lesson?
Ever hear the one about the midget and the razor blade?
Where do trailer park miscarriages go?
What's the similarities between Michael Jackson and the colour changing dress?
Why doesn't Asia wear makeup?
Why did the Limestone feel unappreciated?
What sport do you play with a wombat?
Why didn't the ghost have any children?
Why so serious?
Why can't you trust anything MATTER says?
Who was appointed as a proof reader of Hitler's speeches?
What did one tectonic plate say to the other after the earthquake?
What was the ninja pigs' surprise attack called?
Why doesn't god like bacon?
What should PMS be called?
What would you call Benedict Cumberbatch if he was dating a giraffe?
What does Ronda Rousey's opponents and myself have in common?
Why didn't the ghost have any babies?
What's the easiest way to find a gay West Virginian?
How to you make a Hormone?
What did Putin say when he was finally fed up with Boris Nemtsov?
[Fixed] What do you get when you put human DNA in a goat?
Are you a work of art?
When is a Mexican not a Mexican?
What do you get if you insert human DNA into a monkey?
Why hasn't bigfoot ever gone to prison?
What is the difference between a group of Pygmy riddlers and a lesbian track team?
How many ears does Mr. Spock have?
What is a boxer's favorite meal?
Did you guys hear about the jews hurting dental health?
What kind of nuts go on a carrot cake?
whats the difference betweens a violin and a fiddle?
What does the high elves call Gandalf?
What's Obama's favorite thing to do on the weekend?
What do you get if you drop a piano into a mine?
What do you call a football fan with a cold?
Black and Blue?
How do you make a bunch of Redditors mad?
How does Boomhower describe the Genitals of the Lieutenant from the Reno Police Department?
What do you call an elephant the circus no longer needs?
Did you hear about the guy who couldn't read?
Do you know why they are called dad jokes?
What do you call a terrorist holding an AK47 to your head?
How do you know if someone's from Texas?
Have you heard the one about the man who ran over himself?
How does Alabama keep alcohol out of high school?
Do you know why I hate drinking with blind people?
Whats faster then a Aboriginal with a TV?
Wanna have an argument?
Yarrr, have ye seen me mizzenmast?
Hey Dad? Can you sing me the Alphabet?
What's the difference between herpes and mono?
What did the Greek God say when he could finally take the world off his shoulders?
Do you remember when you used to blow bubbles when you were younger?
Why do the French eat only one egg for breakfast?
What did Wiz Khalifa say when he was asked his opinion on the dress?
How do you say goodbye to 230,000 Indonesians?
What does batman take in his whiskey?
Mythology gags, anyone?
Why do gorillas have such big nostrils?
What did the grape say when the elephant stepped on him?
Helen Keller, what color is this dress?
How did ISIS decide to kill the member of Anonymous that brought down their websites?
What's the best way to be on Instagram and in life?
what do you call a queue of jokers?
Did you hear about the guy who drunk brake fluid everyday?
Why does the sexually active narcoleptic always use a condom?
How does Harry Potter do web design?
Q: What do you call a bunch of blondes standing ear to ear?
Why was the lightbulb invented?
Why are women and noodles alike?
How many black people does it take to change a light bulb?
What does a panther say when it steps on ants?
What's the best way to cross the border?
Why didn't the koala get a job?
What is black and eats pussy?
How many kids does Adrian Peterson have?
What do you call group sex on a boat?
Why did the electron go to jail?
What does God do whenever he gets frustrated with Jesus?
Why did the clothing store close?
Why did they invent the shopping cart?
Why did the man put a dead tiger on his lawn?
What has 5 teeth and 60 eyes?
Why did Blackbeard cross the road?
Did you hear about the woman who had her left side cut off?
Why did the Baker rob the Banker?
What happened to the boy-band member who dropped the soap In the prison shower?
Why does the Indian chief hate snow?
What kind of phone does The Flash use?
Where do famous snakes go?
Why was the African prostitute arrested for murder?
What's a Native's 2 favourite colours?
What do you get if you push a piano out of a plane over a military base?
(Interview question) Where do you see yourself in 5 years?
Why does math class teach kids about Japan, Germany, and Italy?
What's the difference between a psychologist and a groundskeeper?
What is the height of hunger?
Why do bakers start working so early in the morning?
What do you call a snobbish criminal going down the stairs?
What did the little black kid think when he got diarrhea?
How do senior citizens handle indoor skydiving?
Are you Microsoft Excel?
What does a raven bring on an airplane?
what do Nazis drive?
What do you tell a black jew?
Hey Sherlock, what type of stone is this?
What did the black kid get on his SAT's?
What's the difference between a Pakistani military post and a Pakistani elementary school?
How many Hippies does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about the new drug that makes its users apathetic?
What do two Wrights make?
Why did the elf have to play with Mega Bloks?
What does the average Alabama football player get on his SATs?
What did the letter O say to Q?
Why did the programmer put on his glasses?
What is black and in jail?
A green man lives in a green house. A red man lives in a red house. Who lives in the white house?
How do you get an anorexic to gain 25 pounds?
Why did the blonde get so excited after she finished her jigsaw puzzle in only six months?
What is trust?
Did you hear about the vampire comedian?
what do you tell a woman with two black eyes?
Whats the last thing you want to hear before you go to sleep?
What do you call someone who is rude and has no corners?
Which spice is the worst at keeping secrets?
What does the fox say?
Why did the angry skeptic keep ignoring official reports about the eventual release of Half-Life 3?
Why couldn't the effective vitamin supplement achieve true happiness?
Where do you send hyperactive jewish children for summer vacation?
What job can you see yourself doing?
How does the queen bee get around the hive?
What do you call a chubby girl that's high?
Did you hear about the man who had his whole left side bitten off by a shark?
What do floppy disks and Jesus have in common?
Why can't your hear a pteradactyl go to the toilet?
Why are mountains so funny?
What do you call a bitchy midget who can get to places quickly?
What starts with F and ends with UCK?
How do crazy people go thru the forest?
How many Redditors does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is the wettest animal in the world?
What did that cannibal do after dumping his girlfriend?
What is Kathy Griffin's screen saver?
What's a wombat for?
When does a cub scout become a boy scout?
Why the big pause................................?
Do you want to hear a dirty joke?
What's the difference between a dwarven packrat and a venereal disease?
Did ya hear about the new pirate movie?
What did the shoelace say when I tried to tie it?
What did the turkey say to the goat?
Whats the name of the band with the most hits?
You ever notice how many narcissistic pirates there are?
What's the quickest way to lose pounds?
How is marriage like a tornado?
What is a Muslim baby's first word?
Where do you party on a ship?
Did you hear the one about the three deep holes in the ground?
Which country has the most number of bacteria, viruses, fungus and other micro-organisms?
How do call an idiot that has an assault rifle pointed at you?
Why did Bin Laden stop having sex?
What do you do to a dead scientist?
What's the difference between a baby and a washing machine?
Whats grey and comes in pints?
why should you be afraid if you see a bull chasing after you?
What was the first reference to pole vaulting in the Bible?
What do composers prepare their ingredients on?
What do you call bees that produce milk?
[sexist] Not a joke, but can you help me find it?
What do you call a chubby girl who's cranky, has bad breath and doesn't screw?
Who is an archaeologist?
What do you call a reptile wearing a vest?
Dad joke gold?
What did the doctor say to the rude patient who was reluctant to get stitches from him?
What does the fan of a shitty rock band, which canceled a gig in his city, say?
Did you hear about the Circus fire?
Why does SnoopDogg always carry an umbrella?
What do comedians put outside their house on Halloween?
What can a lawyer do that a duck can't?
Where did the Muslim go for his sandwich?
Why do Pillows work?
what do you call a gay french man?
What is it called when a ninja flees the scene of an accident?
What's the difference between Leonardo Dicaprio and Sesame Street?
What do you call a brown woman with a yeast infection?
Which type of soup is the heaviest?
What's white on top and black on bottom?
Want to know how to not get malware?
What political ideology does Hades consider himself to be apart of?
What do you tell a pornstar right before their video to pump them up?
Why did the Blonde's belly-button always hurt after sex?
What did the Mexican student write his essay about?
What is the most socially unacceptable joke you know?
How does the redneck help his wife with the dishes?
Did you hear about the newly sponsored gay NASCAR team?
Why did the prostitute cross the road?
Did you hear about the mushroom?
What do you call a sheep with no legs ?
How to convert QT3.14 into GF format?
Why don't house painters wear wedding rings on the job?
How do you start a raid in Ethiopia?
Why did the giraffe cross the highway?
How much cocaine can Charlie Sheen Do?
What is the difference between females aged: 8, 18, 28, 38, 48, 58, 68, and 78?
If a quiz is quizical, what is a test ?
Hey, want to hear a joke?
Did you hear about the kidnapping in Dallas?
Did you hear about that actress that killed herself? Reese whatsername?
Why do Hasidic Jews dress so strangely?
How do I know if I'm pansexual?
Did you hear about the new "morning after" pill for men?
What do you call a girl that sleeps with you for your Adderall?
Mom, what's an orgasm?
On a scale of 1 to 100, how mature do you think you are?
What do you call 1000 lesbians with guns?
Why do natives hate snow?
What does the CEO of Keurig have in common with ISIS?
How do you find the pilot at a party?
What's the biggest cause of pedophilia in this country?
Want to hear a joke about paper?
Why does a dog lick it's balls?
What do you call a fat man trying out a new tempurpedic mattress?
What do you call the Knight who started the Round Table?
Why did the Mexican food go to counseling?
How does the rabbi make his tea?
Why do mermaids wear sea shells?
What are you supposed to do when someone is having a seizure in the bath?
What's the difference between babies and love?
What can a duck do that a lawyer can't?
What do you get when you cross a muppet with the Loch Ness monster?
What's the most popular dance in Warsaw?
What does a man with a 10 inch dick eat for breakfast?
Why couldn't Sally use the swings?
How Do You Make Spider-Man Cry?
Why are government buildings alike all around the world?
Did you hear ISIS blew up their first Italian recruit in a suicide bombing today?
What did Shakespeare say when Mr. Big proposed to him?
What happens when you cross Elton John and a sabre tooth tiger?
What time does a mechanic wake up?
How do you trolı̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̸̨l someone?
Whos the best jewish cook?
What do you do when you see and Mexican on a bike?
How does a shepherd integrate black and white flocks?
Why is taking spanish 2 so awesome?
Have you ever heard of the exhausted frog?
What do you call a woman with an opinion??
Why did the cow get a job at Google?
What did the elephant say to the naked guy?
What does Monica Lewinsky say to call her dog over?
What are a clumsy person's favorite flowers?
What does the Queen put on her toast?
What do you call a dinosaur having brunch?
why should you never buy a Asian graphics card?
What do you call an Indian stoner?
Who makes more money, a hooker or a drug dealer?
Why should we elect Gabe Newell as President of the United States?
How do Germans tie there shoes?
What was Hitler's favorite drink?
What do Eskimos get from sitting on the ice too long?
Why do Canadians prefer their jokes in hexadecimal?
Who is the poorest in England?
What is the definition of a farmer!?
What's the similarity between a dog and a bulldozer?
What?
What did the egg say to a pot of boiling water?
What is the one food that diminishes a woman's sex drive by 90%?
What did the dick say to the balls?
What do you call a Cuban Atheist?
What is Reddits favorite country?
What did the chef say when Hannibal Lecter sent his breast meat back, complaining it was overcooked?
How do you kill a circus clown?
What did the russian say before Putin penetrated his asshole?
What happened to the tree after it caught fire?
Why is Microsoft skipping Windows 9?
Why are cigars unhealthier than cigarettes?
What is it called when a bull made of snow eats explosives?
Why do the French always were white when pole vaulting?
Want to hear the new word I just created?
What does your mother and a neckbeard have in common?
Want to hear a broad generalization?
Why did the laptop memory have such a hard time in school?
How does a butcher introduce his wife?
Did you know that Australians don't ever actually have sex?
What's a man in a hurry like to drink?
What is the difference between a dead hooker and an onion?
What's green and bad for your eyes?
Did you hear how the crazy camping show was last weekend?
What do you call a deer with flashlights for eyes?
Daddy where do people come from?
What do you call a tree that you can fit in your hand?
What do Kermit The Frog'S fingers smell like?
Where does Christian Grey make photocopies?
What does a WoW player with tubercolosis say when he ends a conversation?
Kind of a pick up line?
What do you get when you cross an Aboriginal with a Caucasian?
Are you celebrating Chinese New Year, gurrrl?
Forty minutes before we get to the first sex scene in Fifty Shades Of Grey?
Want to hear a short joke?
What do you call homosexual dinosaurs?
What do you call a Cuban Prime Minister with a lot of attitude?
What starts with "F" and ends with "UCK"? What starts with "P" and ends with "ORN"?
What department do you not want to end up at in a corporation run by cannibals?
Why did the cow slap the bull?
What do you call a gay loaf of bread?
What is a modern name for a store that specializes in the sale of pornography?
What does a Lamb say after the Chinese New Year celebration?
Why did the mushroom get invited to the party?
What did the deaf, blind dumb kid get for Christmas?
What do you call a moving company owned by cows?
What is Gucci Mane's favorite kind of cheese?
Did you hear about the man with 5 penises?
Why is The Hulk going to get laid tonight?
Whats the difference between acne and the pope?
What would the world be like without women?
Why did the woman marry the shoe maker?
What is the recommended psychological treatment for mentally ill statisticians?
Where did little Lisa go after she got hit by a truck?
A brown bear and a polar bear fall into the water. Which one dissolves?
Whats the difference between a hormone and an enzyme?
If a psychic goes to the bathroom in the forest, does he make a sound?
Why couldn't the Duke of Esterházy find his music composer?
What do you call Winnie The Pooh's grandmother?
Who is Reddits favrite musician?
What is the opposite of Christopher Walkin?
What do all the sexy ladies of r/gonewild have in common?
What do you call a very smart glass of lemonade that is gay?
Why couldn't the troll catch any fish?
Did you hear about the guy who died after eating chicken?
What does a guy with a big dick eat for breakfast?
What do smart blondes and UFO's have in common?
What type of sea creature do Chinese fishermen catch?
Whats the difference between a woman and a feminist?
Why was the comic book series depressed?
Why did Hitler fail math?
Why are quantum physicists so bad at sex?
Do You Know A Good Place to Get Scrod?
What piece of furniture can you find in a gay frat house?
How is a lesbian like a camel?
not necessary to have a high IQ to be an attorney?
What sex position produces the ugliest kids?
Hey, is your name Paul Revere?
What language do teapots speak?
What do you call Bruno Mars?
Why are male bathrooms on the left, and female bathrooms on the right?
What do you call an easy lifestyle revolving around eating Chinese food?
Did you hear about that really successful scarecrow?
How come Smokey the Bear doesn't have any children?
Where do Crows hang out on friday night?
Why was tigger looking down the toilet?
Where does a cow go to watch a film?
Where do all guys come from?
Why did Sarah name her pet Fawn 99 Cents?
What do you get when you cross Paris Hilton with Iggy Azalea?
What's do you get when you mix a zebra and a donkey?
Where do Crows hang out on a friday nght?
What do you call a murderer who pours their mike before the cereal?
What do you call a whistleblower stuck in a blizzard?
What do you call a retarded five year old chained to a slab with his asshole lubed up?
How do u call a Boomerang that doesnt come back ?
What does R. Kelly have in common with Malaysian Airlines?
Why are feet so funny?
What did the spilled noodles say to the sauce pan?
Why are Bananas and Chocolate Good friends?
What phrase would a neckbeard who watches South Park use the most?
What did the right eye say to the left?
What do neckbeards like to spread on their toast?
Innocence, Frustration, Agony, what are they really?
What do you call a Pixar film about Carpets?
Why can't you escape the angry forest?
What makes perfect sense?
What do you call two debunked ghost sightings?
Why is it that there aren't much natural oil resources in China?
If your vagina or dick were to be an animal, what would it be?
Why do we feel like whistleblowers right now?
what did the cookie say to the supermodel?
Why did the guy get aroused by the highway?
What do Grateful Dead fans say when they run out if weed?
Why didn't Hannibal Lecter have any friends as a kid?
What insect would Richard Simmons be?
How many Sayians does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between a crocodile and a toothbrush?
Why are women so afraid of looking stupid?
Did you know 50% of Asians in America have cataracts?
What did Batman say to Robin before they got into the car?
Whats the difference between a burglar and an ex-wife?
What's 12 inches long and stiff in the morning?
Why do women find the guy in 50 Shades of Grey sexy?
What do you call a bolshevik in a hurry?
What fabric is worn in Soviet Russia?
How often do chemists use HIO₄?
What is a Jamaican's favorite video game?
I met a girl with 12 Nipples, sounds funny?
How does Anakin Skywalker get around the Death Star?
How does every black joke start?
What type of milk does Mitt Romney use with his cereal?
How much did the pirate farmer charge for his corn?
What do you call a French cow that grows sprouts instead of fur?
Have you heard about Prince Oxygen?
What is a test tube baby's biggest fear?
What is Kim Kardashian's favorite sex position?
Why do so many new brides get crow's feet as soon as they're married?
What do Mexicans write in school?
What do you call a muslim, jackie gleason impersonator?
What do you call the pirate with the second largest penis?
What is that thing on top of a helicopter?
How many ways are there to please a guy?
What do you call an archer who got his arms cut off?
Have you heard that Gandalf is joining the Seahawks as a coach?
Why are almost all brides dresses white?
Why was the plumber stressed?
What do you call a $300 hand job from a rapper?
What Did The Dying Gambler Say To His Wife?
What is Batman's least favorite TV channel?
What kind of guns do bees use?
Where the most likely place to find a crack whore?
Why Can't the Guy Addicted to Brake Fluid Quit?
What does the president of Russia call his toilet?
Did you hear about the Ramen warehouse that burned down?
What is the definition of a Freudian slip?
What is a pirate's favorite letter?
Why do lesbians never cook?
What is a German's favorite Pokemon?
Why does Edward Woodwood have four D's in his name?
Did you hear they caught the peeping tom in Nunavut?
What do you call an intersection where a lot of Asians cross?
Why couldn't the artist get a driver's license?
How do u know if a company that just hired you conducts drug tests?
What do you get when you cross a tyrannosaurus rex with fireworks?
Will you be my horcrux?
Why were the ants dancing on top of the jar of jam?
What's a sailor's favorite solvent?
Why didn't Hitler ever order the French Dip sandwich when he went out to eat?
Hey, did you hear about the Mexican-Indian twins that just moved in next door?
What kind of cell phone doesn't have a lock?
Why don't men want to go down on a woman first thing in the morning?
How did the hipster burn his tongue ?
What's George Washington's favorite element?
What do the Japanese do when they have an erection?
What do you call an arrogant prisoner walking down the stairs?
What do fat women get for valentines day?
Whats a frogs favourite website??
How many divorced men does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What music do cats prefer?
What's Gollum's favourite food?
Why was the man hanging out in the market all day?
What is "Paulie" Pennino's favorite restaurant?
What Happened to the Man who Threw a Flaming Bag of Poo?
What do single people call Valentine's Day?
Really Google auto-complete?
Did you hear about the guy who could only count using odd numbers?
If a man named Terry Richards kills you because you insulted him; what did you die of?
Why is Superman wanted by the police?
What do you call a Mexican with no car?
Whats the difference between a boy scout and a jew?
Why did the motorcycle suddenly stop running?
What Does an Old Lady's Vagina Taste Like?
What did the french chef give his wife on Valentine's day?
What did the physicist say to the suicidal guy on the bridge?
What is a suicidal person's favorite card game?
What's Michelle Obama's favorite vegetable?
Want to hear a good comeback story?
How many Tenors does it take to screw in a Lightbulb?
Why do we never take the time to thank mislabeled concrete?
Why is the number '9' like a peacock?
What is the difference?
What do two people with Parkinson's disease do when they meet for the first time?
What do you call it when an employee poops in the food at a Chinese restaurant?
How do you circumcise a West Virginian man?
Why did the grain call his sister "momma"?
When should funerals occur?
Why was the piano invented?
What do you call friendship between punctuation?
Why did Angelina tell Brad to do squats?
What does a dog see in the mirror?
What's the deal with rape whistles?
What do you do with a Jew who has ADHD?
Why couldn't the surgeon 3D print a new pair of lungs?
Why are assholes always more successful than you?
Sir, on a scale of 1 to drunk, where would you say you stand?
What do you call it when Wonder Woman does too many drugs?
Did you know that a chicken coop can't have more than 3 doors?
What's the difference between the calendar and you?
Did hear about the explosion at the Kosher bread factory in Berlin?
So, did you see?
How did the Endorian get to school every day?
What have women and condoms got in common?
How many Frenchman does it take to defend France?
Girl, are you wearing a diaper?
Dad-which one do u love more?
What do you call a black guy that you can't see at night?
How do you find a velociraptor?
What's the difference between a horny man and a vampire?
Why are turn signals great workers?
Did you hear about the butcher that backed into his meat grinder?
Why do white girls group in odd numbers?
What do you get when you cross Hitler with a black woman?
What do mathematicians read for fun?
Why did the man with bronchitis get cremated..?
What does a walrus and Tupperware have in common?
You hear what happened to the beauty pageant contestant that came out covered in beef cuts?
What was John Locke's favorite beer?
What's a teenage fish's favorite website?
What's Fermat's favorite topic in Mathematics aside from his theorem?
Did you hear about the man who fell into a lens grinder?
Why was the baby elf sad?
What do priests and christmas trees have in common?
who paid?
Why did the number 6 cry?
What murder mystery is especially popular among mathematicians?
¿Qué tipo de oso es muy desconocido?
Why are all these Juice fad diets so popular?
What's the worst part of locking your keys in the car at an abortion clinic?
What kind of a cake requires goggles to eat?
What did the Buddhist say to the hot dog vendor?
What do you call Kim Jong-un reading a Stephen King novel?
What do you get when you mix an insomniac, an agnostic, and a dyslexic?
What is the difference between Susan Boyle and a aircondtioner?
Why isn't China a democracy?
What do you call a prostitute that has sex for free?
What happens when you combine alcohol and literature?
Two cats are swimming across a river, who made it across?
What did they call that ancient philosopher from China who quoted a lot about a woman's pussy?
How did the bird get his bluetooth to work?
How did Will Smith get caught for committing 1st degree murder?
What does an optimist call the World Trade Center?
What's a redditors favorite governing body?
What do you call a hippopotamus with an STD?
What lives on a farm and says moo?
What do you call a White Woman that has had over 4 Abortions?
What's the most sensitive part of your body after you masturbate?
What can both Christians and Atheists agree on about Jesus?
Why did the chicken nugget cross the road?
What do you call a woman who throws letters in the fire?
What's the best way to get home from school?
What's the one kind of marriage that's still frowned upon in Alabama?
Where do onions fight?
What do you call a dinosaur who knows how to please its woman?
What did the dill pickle say to jennifer lopez?
What's the most sensitive part of your body when you masturbate?
What's the difference between a cow, and 9/11?
What did the cannibal say to his co-worker?
What did the British gentlepimp say to his accountant bitch?
What did the customer say to the overworked seamstress?
Which Spanish superhero has three wives?
what did the captain say when the navigator complained they were off course?
What did one ocean say to the other?
What did the Giant say after he ate Tonga?
How do you prevent alcoholism?
You ever hear the joke about the 3 holes in the back yard?
How do you spot a sumo at a feminist rally?
What do you call a fat Taylor Swift?
What did Rihanna say when asked why she was still with Chris Brown?
What do you call five black men having sex?
Why weren't the baked beans heating up?
Why was the mushroom invited to the party?
What the japanese version of mission impossible?
What's the hardest part about being a gay, black police officer?
whats the worst thing about being a black jew?
How does Big Boss store his photos?
How many tweekers does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a selfless pastrami?
What do all battered women have in common?
How do you have a party in space?
Did you hear about the baby that was born with three knees?
Did you hear about the guy that only ate one chicken leg per day?
Why was the French chef sent to prison?
What did Jesus' disciples say when he caught all those fishes?
Why did so many jews die at Auschwitz?
What does a Christian terrorist say before blowing up?
What did the Arab's father say when the teacher told him his son bombed the test?
Why did the monkey get lost in the jungle?
What kind of flour is independent?
What has happened to common sense these days?
What word becomes shorter when you add two letters?
How do trains from different countries understand each other?
How many Christian women does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do performing oral sex on a constipated woman and working for the Mafia have in common?
What do you call drunken cunnilingus?
What do you call a sexy cousin?
Do you know what my dad and Brad Pitt have in common?
What does the nosey pepper do?
What do vegetables say when they go to party's?
I'm agnostic. What happens to me when I die?
What did the Men's Right's Activist say when he left his piano out in the rain?
What country are you most likely to get a disease?
Why did Bruce Jenner crash his car?
What do you call a woman that sets her bills on fire?
How many people from Svalbard does it take to change a light-bulb?
What is the coldest dish at a Mexican restaurant?
What do you call a priest giving a long, boring sermon?
How is Jerry Sandusky like a tortoise?
What do you call a beautiful woman on the arm of a banjo player?
What has Margaret Thatcher and Jimmy Saville got in common?
What's the difference between a civilian camp and an ISIS base?
Whats the difference between a corvette and a blowjob?
What does Soylent Green taste like?
What's a Russian's favorite Italian dish?
What do you call a guy who hangs out with musicians?
What is a lesbians favorite type of woodworking joint?
What Do You Call an Epileptic in a Pile of Leaves?
I'm agnostic. What happens when I die?
What' the difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
What's black and white and can't turn around in a corridor?
What's the difference between a Pickpocket and a Peeping Tom?
Why are liars so lazy?
Do Muslims scream Allahu Akbar when they blow their load into a goat?
What did one testicle say to the other?
Did you hear about the race between the lettuce and the tomato?
Why does Neville Longbottom like herbology so much?
For my SysAdmins and DBA's: Why did Hitler secretly want to work on MySQL?
why was the sand wet?
What do you call a very forgiving lawyer?
Where can Sihks and Muslims buy headwear?
Is it a coincidence that as soon as Bruce Jenner turns into a female, that she becomes a bad driver?
What do you call a huge pile of kittens?
What do you call a joke that is not funny?
How many people from Cornwall does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do old people read the bible so much?
So, a bird flies in front of a pitcher and gets hit by a baseball. What do the umpires rule it?
So, Bruce Jenner wants to become a women, eh?
How do you leave a bunch of idiots in suspense?
What anime do Mexicans watch?
What's a Redditor's favorite color?
What do you get when a cow jumps over a barbed-wire fence?
What's the problem with North Korea?
Why is Pavlov's hair so soft?
What do you get when you have a nosey pepper?
What's do you call a cross between an elephant and a rhino?
What are the chances you know an Olympic gymnast??
Do you need an arc?
What did Katy Perry steal from Dr. Frankenstein's closet?
Is it weird that Nirvana's In Utero album cover turns me on?
What do you call the most successful vasectomist in American history?
Who do you give a lost gun to?
What do you call it when you hold a Jewish girl under the covers and fart?
What's long, black, and dangerous to cut?
How long does it take for a Somalian to shit?
Did you hear that Lorena Bobbitt got killed in a car crash?
Math joke: Why can't you derivate a social scientist?
More than one punchline?
How many moderators does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do calenders eat?
Where do you get 'Extra Virgin' olive oil?
Did you hear Bruce Jenner was in a car accident?
what's the difference between an oral thermometer and a rectal thermometer?
What's the most annoying thing someone can say?
Why do golfers bring an spare change of pants?
What did they call Muhammad Ali when he got the farts?
How can a law student make it?
What Kind of Pee Comes Out Your Butt?
What's the best language for jokes?
What do you call a lesbian who drives a Chevy Astro full of penises?
What do you call it when a transcendentalist author looks at old photos?
What did Mike Tyson call the groom with cold feet?
Why was Thor disappointed by his birthday party?
What do a nearsighted gynecologist and a dog have in common?
What's the best way to piss off your best friend?
What is the difference between a black person and a tire?
What did the baker name her dog?
Did you hear about the girl who went fishing with 5 guys?
Where did the small road go to college?
What did the two oceans say to each-other?
What do you call a security guard stationed outside of a Samsung?
What does a Mexican magician use?
What do you call a white girl that runs faster than her brothers?
What is the difference between a gay guy and a fridge?
Did you hear about the shooting at the blind school?
What do you call a Mexican Jedi?
Why are redneck murders hard to solve?
What do you call a homeless horse?
How do you stop your dog from humping your leg?
Where does a porn addict keep his videos?
How do you save a drowning black family?
Why are there so many Asians?
If Pokemon had a national holiday, what would it be called?
How did Canada get its name?
How do astronomers organize a party?
Why doesn't Usain Bolt have a girlfriend?
Whats the difference between a Greyhound bus station and a Lobster with a breast implant?
What does a cannibal do after he dumps his wife?
What belongs in the bank and doesn't exist?
What did Ahab yell out to Moby Dick as it swam away?
How did Kikkoman soy sauce move production to China?
What do you call an upside-down "W"?
What did Ozzy Osbourne do after eating a whole Bull?
Why are women's feet smaller than men's?
Did you hear about the SJW that shot up that mall?
What did the cashier say after handing down a wad of currency to Dracula?
Why did the scientist study soda?
What group would an obese racist join?
[OC] What is the emergency number?
How many dead babies does it take to fill up my house?
What do Jesus and a nerd have in common?
Why did the greek philosopher break in two?
Why can't the two melons get married?
I have this idea tell me what you think?
Why did Al Gore have to schedule a dentist appointment?
Did you hear about the flasher who was thinking about retiring?
Why don't sharks eat niggers?
What is the difference between Jesus and Hitler?
Knock, knock. Who's there?
Walk a mile in someone else's shoes?????
What do you do after you licked the softest and sweetest puss in the world?
What's 20 feet long and smells like piss?
What do you call a party with 100 midgets?
What did the triangle need to do before he could get a loan?
How do you get a 90 year old lady to yell fuck?
How is American beer like having sex in a canoe?
Why did the music critic compare the song to a foul-mouthed mixture of sand and wind?
Why couldn't the physicist understand how boats work?
Which person leaves first after a glory hole blowjob?
What sis Selenium say to Xenon?
How did Freddie Mercury do in school?
What kind of drugs to tumblr users take?
Hello everyone. How are we?
Whats the complement to a 40 degree angle?
If a stork symbolizes birth what type of bird symbolizes birth control?
Why are there so few professional pedophiles?
Did I ever tell you about the time I had a fart that lasted for an entire minute?
Why is Cinderella so bad at football?
What's the difference between my meat and my wife?
What was Hitler's favorite food?
What do you call the man who proofread Hitler's speeches?
What is the purpose of the bumps around a womens nipple?
What did the elevator say to the stairs?
Why are Nazis so good at math?
Son, who is that German guy who keeps hiding things in our house?
Did you hear about the native American who tried to beat the world record for drinking the most tea?
What is a prostitutes business motto?
What do elderly zombies crave?
What kind of chili do they serve at the cannibal prison??
What type of bonds deals with the bad guys?
What's the cutest part of a house?
What do you call a condensed version of the history of ISIS?
What do you call a smarty pants?
What's a crossfit bro's favorite Italian dish?
What's a Porn Star's favorite spell?
Is there some organization that evaluates the quality of shea butter?
What tastes good on pie, but not on pussy?
why are most reddit posts medium rare?
Why did the chicken cross the Möbius strip?
Do you know why the nobles always mistreated their peasants?
What did the blind paraplegic get for Christmas?
What will never be read in braille?
What do you call a dog that harasses kids?
Why does it take more than a million sperms to fertilize one egg?
How do cats let us know that they are in pain ?
What do you and a black hole have in common?
Why don't amateur pornstars use big words?
What do hobbits secretly call Gandalf when he drinks too much ?
What do you call a pig that knows karate?
What size box of condoms do you never want to buy?
Anyone ever see Stevie Wonders wife?
What's the worst part about being a gay bathhouse attendant?
How many absurdists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What happens when someone mixes Francium, Oxygen, Tungsten, and Nitrogen after it explodes?
What stresses fish out the most?
Where did the suicide bomber go when he died?
What do your mother and a marathon have in common?
Why did the duck go into Rehab?
Why were the people in the twin towers so upset?
Why are women like magazines?
What do you call a butt inspection by ISIS?
Why should you try to date girls you meet at the gym?
Why would somebody punch a sheep?
What are the inhabitants of Crete called?
Why do asians eat dogs?
Why is 2 Phosphorus Oxygen Carbon the greatest rapper from the elements?
Did you hear about the word that's changed in the dictionary?
What is a Canadian's favourite letter?
What do you call an Arab man who drives a bus?
What do you call a redhead with a yeast infection?
What kind of bird flies around bays?
Why did the banker resign?
What runs well and efficiently except when you need it to?
What does an Alzheimer's patient say whenever they browse /r/funny?
Do Frenchmen like slides?
What did Missy Elliot say to Tony Abbot?
What is the difference between a Chickpea and a Lentil?
What did Chris Christie say when asked if he had plans to run in the 2016 presidential election?
Why the patriots deflated 11 balls out of 12?
How do you describe getting cancer on your resume?
LPT: Think content you are looking for has been removed from the internet?
An art teacher comes across a badly made nude painting. What does she say?
Hey Seattle, Wanna win the Superbowl?
If Gandalf was a women, what color would her robes be?
How did the turtle with no arms and no legs cross the freeway?
Where can you find the best joke book in the world?
What's the worst thing about eating a vegetable?
What's better than being the first Black President of the United States?
How do Russians in the taiga make fun of each other online?
How do you reuse a condom?
Do you know what's the hardest about being a narcissist?
Why didn't the Seahawks give the ball to Marshawn Lynch?
What's a mathematician's favorite plant?
Hey Seattle, wanna win the Superbowl?
Does anyone know any good Groundhog Day jokes?
What do you call an Irishman who slept out on the lawn all night?
What do you say to encourage someone who is masturbating?
Why was Noah the best businessman?
How do you know you're a Seattle Seahawk?
Hey, you wanna win?
What's the difference between six dicks and a joke?
Why should you never tell jokes about Hitler?
Why did the football coach go to the bank?
How do you make the 12th man Happy?
How did King George view the colonists?
How do you win a superbowl without cheating?
How to comfort a homosexuals family if hes in a coma?
What's a woman's best curve?
How did pinocchio find out that he was made out of wood?
How do you kill 10 flies at once?
How was my engagement the same as my divorce?
Did Ilean ever get in touch with you?
What do you call a root vegetable wearing a tank top?
Why did my girlfriend cross the road?
What do you call an interracial dwarf actor?
What's the best part of having kids?
What do you do when you come across a bear in the woods?
The best part about Puppy Bowl?
Guess where my cheating girlfriend now lives?
What's the difference between a waterproofer and a porn star?
Don't you hate it when someone answers their own questions?
What do you call a Lesbian Dinosaur?
What would Michael Jackson be doing if he were alive right now?
My dad told me this one: What do you call a room full of 50 lesbians and 50 nuns?
What do you call a gay tramp?
Why is it called stand-up comedy?
What do you call a wife that knows where her husband is at all time?
What's the difference between a plastic tube and an adjustable spanner ?
What's the best form of protection when you don't have a condom?
What do The Walking Dead and the state of Wisconsin have in common?
What do you get when you cross a rooster and an owl?
What did the quadruple amputee say when he couldn't solve the riddle?
What do you get when you cross egg whites with a bomb?
Why did the baker only date large breasted women?
What does IDK stand for?
What did the Hawaiian Jihadist say?
What did M. Night Shyamalan say about a duck's penis?
What's the easiest thing to lift with a forklift?
what do you call 2 Puerto Ricans playing basketball?
What is the first thing a cannibal does after dumping his girlfriend?
Want to know how to make tons of people mad real fast?
Why did the groom want his bride to wear white?
What does The Lion King have a lot of?
How do you tell who the extroverted engineers are?
Did you hear about the lawyer with a fetish for loopholes?
What did the Jew say to Kim Kardashian's booty?
Why are wedding in Wales so inexpensive?
What's Romeo and Juliette's least favorite fruit?
How can you use a banana as a compass?
What does a man with a 10 inch dick have for breakfast?
What's the difference between an American zoo and a Chinese zoo?
Have you ever seen one of those billboards that just says "AVAILABLE" and a phone number?
What's Adam Levine's favorite holiday?
Why couldn't the dinosaur cross the road?
What disease do terrible parkers have?
What do you call a gang of penguins?
What was the last thing that went through JFK Jr's mind when his plane crashed?
What's the only thing worse than a poop joke?
What do Jews throw when they riot?
What did 50cent say when Eminem made him a sweater for Christmas?
How do tiny Mexicans cut their pizza?
Who does a lobster have in common with a broken hearted chinaman?
What do buzzards in Kansas eat?
Are curses real?
Did you hear about the tourist who visited France?
what do you call twin chinese rappers?
What's the difference between a muffin and a jew?
What happened to the Italian chef when he died?
Why did the man drowning in the river think he wasn't going to die?
Son: Mom! What’s a gf?
What's the best way to get a Punjab in India?
What do you do if a 4 year old girl catches you masturbating?
(Restaurant joke) What's the difference between a Jew and a canoe?
Did you hear about that new restaurant on the moon?
What's the difference between a shrimp with big tits and a bus station full of old people?
Will playing "GTA IV: The Ballad of Gay Tony" make me a homosexual?
What does a baby computer call it's father?
What kind of potato chips do dogs like best?
How many retards does it take to push a bus?
What's the difference between child prostitution & whisky?
What do you call a chocolate cake??
For all you World of Tanks players: what does LTP stand for?
What do you call a robot whose brain is unplugged?
What did the call of duty player say to his girlfriend about gaining weight?
What is long, white, and very sticky?
Why can't you have sex after playing Assassin's Creed?
What do computer programmers and aged-care nurses have in common?
What did the fish thief say to the cops when he turned himself in?
What do ateists wear on their necks as an indication of their commitment to the atheism?
What do you call an actor who converts to Judaism?
A Spanish, Greek and Portuguese man go to a bar. Who pays for the drinks?
What is mother-approved and child-tested?
Did you hear about the Marine Rabbi that travelled the world giving circumcisions?
What do straight guys and lesbians have in common?
What does a baby computer call its father?
Who is both a knight and a spy?
How do you keep an idiot busy?
What did the scarecrow say before committing suicide?
How many successive 'ands' can you fit into a sentence with it still making sense?
Anyone seen "Captain Phillips"?
Do you know the best way to cook lamb?
What's the best part of having sex with twenty seven year olds?
What happened to the road?
Want to hear a muslim joke?
Anyone heard that joke going around about paper?
What Does a Man With a 12 Inch Cock Have For Breakfast?
What did the Lion say to the Rhino?
Why didn't the airline passenger check his vulture?
How did Harry potter get down the mountain?
What do you call a nice guy with hemorrhoids?
What building has the most stories?
What do they tell Soviet children who want to achieve their dreams?
How do you spell Canada in Canadian?
Why do Russians celebrate Christmas on the 7th of January?
How do you know if a flock of geese is from Canada?
Why did the man drowning in the Nile River think he wasn't going to die?
Where does Batman go to get a haircut?
Why was the cop absent from work?
How do you kill a circus?
Why should you never play Uno with a foreigner?
What does a computer say when it encounters a skunk?
What do sick composers drink?
What did Sting get in Amsterdam?
What does a black man and a tornado have in common?
Which video game would Adolf Hitler play?
What's a communists favourite sporting event?
What does a hillbilly farmer call a deer with no eyes?
Did you see the headline about the 5 foot tall psychic that escaped from prison?
How do you have nasal sex?
What do you call a fake piece of spagetti?
What is the difference between a boat and a woman?
Why do New Zealanders have so many furry conventions?
Why couldn't Ray Charles read?
What sexual position produces the ugliest babies?
Why do we all need a Jew for a friend?
How does the Catholic Church make their holy water?
What do you call a midget who directs Dirty Jobs?
Anyone still keeping up with their New Year's resolutions?
What do they call number 17 in black jack ?
What does batman get in his drinks?
Where does virgin wool come from?
When should I borrow the Fatboy Slim joke from the library?
What's the difference between the Rolling Stones and Scotsman?
What color were eyes of the Astronaut on the Challenger when it exploded?
Why are fisherman so successful in business?
OC that I came up with whilst daydreaming: Why is there no sofa in the forbidden kingdom?
What has 10,000 legs and can't walk?
Why don't asians like to applause?
How do you tell if someone is riding a bicycle for fitness or because they have a DUI?
Is it alright to kiss a nun?
What happens to a bacteria when he travels from his home colony to another?
Who are the greatest philosophers today?
What do you call a melon that's had a bit too much to drink?
What do a chop shop and a desperate actress have in common?
What's a philosophers favorite toy?
So, What do you call some soapy water on the floor?
Which is more stable, a hamburger or a steak?
How many women does it take to make me a sandwich?
Do you remember when your grandma was younger?
How come the T Rex was an excellent stenographer?
Are you a geologist?
What do you call the higher-ups of the World Health Organisation?
how many people does it take to save the world?
What did Marshawn Lynch say when he went to traffic school?
Why should the Roman Catholic Church allow priests to marry?
Why do terrorists recruit married men as suicide bombers?
What is the most crucial element of Oology?
Did you hear about the psychic dwarf who escaped from prison?
How do you know your fridge is going through menopause?
How come we never see hideous fish men around any more?
Who can shave 25 times in one day, and still have a beard?
What do you call a farmer who is really good at his job?
What is the most popular vehicle in South America?
How are asymptotes like women?
What do you call a fedora wearing neck beard president's wife?
Are you seeing someone?
Why did God create men?
Why did the physicist throw out his shag rug?
What fruit worries teenagers the most?
what do mexicans and cue balls have in common?
Why are manholes round?
Did you hear about the blonde who tried the Dr. Scholls footmapping machine?
What do you call a dog with no hind legs and metal balls?
Where do people with one leg work?
Why wasn't Jesus born in Puerto Rico?
What do you call a pirate's girlfriend?
Did you hear about the comedian that calls himself "The Sofa King"?
Any golf jokes?
What is Adam's brother called?
What happens when you get mixed up in an undersea gang war?
What is Romeo and Juliet's least favorite fruit?
What did the suicide bomber ask his son?
What did Ernie say when Bert asked him if he wanted some ice cream?
How many theoretical physicists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did the eyeball say?
What website do emo kids use for business networking?
What does Bob the spider do for a living?
How are blizzards and men alike?
How many penises it takes to satisfy president Obama?
Why are Mexicans called spics?
What type of wood is the most expensive?
How many Juggalos does it take to change a light bulb?
Why is Africa hot?
What's the difference between a tropical beach and a priest?
What's the difference between a homeless man and a trash can?
Wanna know how to get an interest free loan?
What is a black's favorite letter?
Why did Eminem make a terrible barista?
Did you hear the one about the Jewish carpenter?
What did the officials say whenever systematic punishment was banned?
What's worse than getting AIDs?
What happened to Loki after he wath hit in hith fathe with Odin'th Hammer?
What do you call a veal-birthing cow?
What is the worst part about being black?
(OC) Where did the frog say his family came from?
What does the Dalai Lama order from the pizza shop?
When do you care for a man's company?
What do you get when a cow has sex with coffee?
What kind of coffee do terrorists hate?
What did little Suzy spy with her little eye?
Did you hear about the lady that had breast implants made of oak?
Did you hear about the 50yo who couldn't deliver a baby?
What do you call a blind person who can't find his/her glasses?
Mr. Belichick how do you feel about these accusations against your organization?
Why can't you use sarcasm with a kleptomaniac?
Why can't you barbecue in Amsterdam?
What do you call a banana you want tomorrow in spanish?
What do you call a hurtful play on words?
Why did the flume ride need repairs?
Why does the Pope kiss the ground when he gets off his plane?
Why do animal rights activists hate NASA?
What do you calla judge with no thumbs?
How do u find an old man in the dark?
What do you get when you cross weed with weed?
Why did the Windows OS skip from 8 to 10?
What's the difference between a divorce and a tornado in the south?
How much did the critic tip the waiter?
What's every neckbeard's favorite singer?
What did the irritated man say to his inguinal hernia?
what do you call the act of masturbation before you sleep?
Who is the most trustworthy lover?
Where do Old Egyptian people go to Swim?
Why is 1 disapproving of 6?
Do you want to hear a joke about Ebola?
Why didn't the mother splinter call her son on his birth-day?
Did you hear about the Vatican's new navy?
Why does Lichtenstien never lose a race?
How did a hipster burn his mouth?
Where was Hitler sitting?
What's long, sensitive, and stimulating?
How much did the critic tip the waitor?
How many pancakes can you fit into a dog house?
What was Hitler's favorite TV show?
What's the difference between a pedophile and a cinephile?
How would Arnold Schwarzenegger describe a sousaphone?
What would a scandal involving Microsoft be called?
Do you know how to keep an idiot in suspense?
Why did the noodle take a bow after the recital?
What's funny about majorities?
Have you heard the one about the seamstress?
What did the bald man say when he got a comb for Christmas?
How do you kill a black man?
What is your preferred type of birth control?
What do you get when you cross a penis with a potato?
What do you call someone who won't get off your lawn?
Why do sorority girls travel in odd numbered packs?
What's a Dungeons and Dragons player's favorite rap group?
Do you know the one step to avoiding clickbait?
What Do You Feel Now?
What would Triple H and Jenna Jameson's adult film be called?
What's long and hard that a Polish bride gets on her wedding night?
How can you tell Thomas the Tank Engine is homosexual?
How do you catch a unique lion?
What are OP's like alone, as compared to when they are combined?
Why do pirates love sunny weather?
how do you know when your sister is on her period?
What did one suicide bomber say to the next?
Did you hear about Klu Klux Knievel's latest stunt?
What feels good in the west but feels cotton in the East?
What do you say to a redhead who has just been insulted?
Why don't Jewish men eat pussy?
What do Jewish people use to power their cars?
How do you know when a Jewish chef is done cooking?
Where can you get away with rape?
What do you call a Doctor who received all 'D's in Medical School?
What does a toddler get drunk off of?
What do you call a faked pregnancy?
Reverend have you been drinking?
What do you call a Muslim woman wearing oculur rift or a VR headset?
What's better than cheese?
This Elevator is out of order.Why?
Why did the narcissistic cannibal end up in the hospital?
Did you hear about Joseph Stalin's personal yacht?
What do you call a Mexican on a hill?
Do you have a Tex-Mex emergency?
On average, how many people are dead in a cemetery?
What do you call a T-Rex with a bomb strapped to it's chest?
What do you call the musical Messiah?
What is a British woman on her period?
What do you call an elderly Mexican man?
What is the Islamic State's favorite crime?
Did you hear what happened between the cook and the onion?
Did you hear about the guy who had avocados for eyes?
What do you call a plane with a muslim on it?
What do you call a muslim sitting on a plane?
What is a guy with ED favorite saying?
What to mopeds and fat chicks have in common?
Do you think horses are negative?
Have you heard the story about the suicide bomber?
What is a Mexicans Favorite book?
What do you call a pokemon with a venereal disease?
What do you call 4 chinese guys and 4 black guys standing in a line?
How was the grand canyon formed?
What did the gay frog say to his bf?
Whats the quickest way to get paralyzed?
What has four legs and is always ready to travel?
What do you call a secular humanist NGO?
Why do Jewish people have big noses?
What did Kim Jon Un say when his father died?
What do you get when you drop a baby into a wood chipper?
Why did the atheist cannibal stop eating Christians?
Did you hear the CEO of Twitter got in trouble for buying shares of rival companies?
Why are riddles about trees so hard?
Whats the difference between to dicks and a joke?
What's the first sign of football in the bible?
Downside to a threesome?
Did you see the guy in Birmingham, Alabama trying to fuck a clock?
What did the wife say to the husband who's penis couldn't talk?
How many alzheimer's patients does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Say you're being attacked by a circus mob. What's the best strategy?
What's the difference between a gay mustache and a straight mustache?
Dark: Whats one thing you can do in a vast quantity without bothering with the quality?
What did Matthew McConaughey say when he saw this year's Oscar nominees?
What do you call a muslim who graduated?
Why do you never hear a pterodactyl go to the toilet?
What's is the difference between a Lamborghini and a boner?
What do you call a group of confused Spanish speaking racists?
What is the difference between outlaws and in-laws?
Did you hear about the triple-amputee who pitched in the majors?
Which dinosaur will never be discovered?
What do you call a robotic prostitution ring?
Is high blood pressure contagious?
Why did the Irishman put 239 beans in the soup pot?
What kind of pizzas did Al Qaeda deliver to the World Trade Center?
what's the difference between a bag of cocaine and a child?
Accounting joke: What do you call inventory that doesn't exist?
What do you call a 90 year old man who can still masturbate?
How many black people does it to pave a driveway?
Why is Jesus bad at hockey?
What's the fastest way to get away from Hell?
What do blacks and bicycles have in common?
What do they call the Hunger Games in Africa?
What do you call an edible ion?
What do you call a jerking off well-endowed midget?
Why was Henry the Eighth so fat?
What did the the black boy get for Christmas?
Who Is every lumberjack's favourite director?
Did you guys hear about the blind man who got hit in the head by a football?
What did one white cop say to another white cop?
What do you get when you combine a parrot and a centipede?
Did you hear about the joke about the 3 wells?
What does a door and a jar have in common?
What is the difference between the deflate gate controversy and my wife?
What did the OCD man get thrown in jail for?
10yr old sons joke: Why was "C" afraid of all the other letters ?
What does a Buddhist order from a hotdogs vendor?
What do you call an Indian and an Asian's baby?
What's a stoner's favorite cheese?
One for the school kids this morning. What do you get when you cross an elephant and a rhinoceros?
Who's the coolest guy in the hospital?
Why are pills white ?
What ship breaks dangerous ice flows in the Arctic?
What does Ebola and US police have in common?
What's the difference between a manly female and a feminine male?
how do you get a dog to stop humping your leg??
What Do You Call Bob The Builder When He Retires?
What do you call a guitarist without a girlfriend?
What is the difference between a priest and acne?
Why didn't Oscar Pistorius get a new bathroom door?
How does praying lead to a blow job?
How do you clear out an Afghani bingo game..?
How do you fix a woman’s watch?
What type of classical music do chickens like best?
What did the caveman say when he tried to have sex in his dark cave?
Why do we have Martin Luther King Jr. Day off?
How do you know if someone was in the navy?
Did you know Yao Ming had a dog?
Have you heard about the Polish lesbian?
Why is UPS so great?
What fruit fits best in your palm?
Why did Microsoft go straight to Windows 10?
What's one thing a man doesn't want to hear the morning after?
What's the difference between acne and a Child Molester?
Did you hear about the dyslexic bank robber?
How do mexicans cut their pizza?
Why should you never trust a cheap circumcision?
Why does the sphere not like being around the oblate spheroid?
Is a man more intelligent before, during or after sex?
Why did the PI detective cross the road?
Why did the Walrus go to the Tupperware party?
How to spot the toughest guy in jail?
What adjective do you use to describe a bad pun?
Why did the Fundamentalist christians give homosexuals viagra?
what is the difference between aspirin and a strippers boyfriend?
Why did the poor man sell yeast?
Why did the Prostitute leave the leper colony?
What do you call 5 black guys having sex?
What is a Muslim who works at Starbucks called?
Where did the amino acid go to church?
What does this joke's punchline & a 50 foot penis have in common?
What is a large group of Sperm Whales called?
ow do you organize a space party?
What do you call an indian food fight?
What is a gay person's favorite animal?
When Jesus comes back, how will they discover if he's Jesus or Robot Jesus?
He asked: how do you feel about sex?
How many people live in South America?
How do you top a train?
What would Marilyn Monroe being doing if she were alive today?
Why was the sprout farmer so assertive?
Why are all Atheists poor?
What did the perverted sauce say to the Chinese Ribs?
Did you hear about the cliff in Helen Keller's backyard?
What was Hamlet screaming when running around a circle ?
What's the difference between David Lee Roth and Snoop Lion?
How often do I drink Blue Moon?
How many bear arms could Bear Grylls bear to bear if Bear Grylls could bear to bear bear arms?
Gaining Weight?
What do you call a cow that goes online?
Why did the hipster burn his tongue on his coffee?
What do you call a gay hipster?
How do you throw an egg at the wall without breaking it?
Why do New Yorkers like to visit Minnesota?
Why did Moses part his hair?
What's the difference between Saint Patrick's Day and Martin Luther King Day?
What did the Chili's waitress say about her kidnapped daughter?
What do you do if an elephant comes through your window?
When's the improper fraction helpline open?
Why did the boy drop his icecream?
What app do you use to browse Reddit on your phone?
What do you call a fat person who judges hippos?
What's the different between a wife and a smoke detector?
You know why I was mad after I had sex with the women I love?
Why did the woman get stoned off her ass?
What did the grape say after the elephant stepped on him?
Do you know beer makes you smart?
What do you call a boy with no arms and an eyepatch????
From my 6 year old: Where do good bees live?
What did the pregnant blonde ask at the doctor's office?
What do you call someone who sells sex in exchange for spaghetti?
Did you hear about the crazy Mexican train theif?
what did the afraid triangle say to the circle that was about to beat him up?
What do you call two Mexicans on the back of a firetruck?
How are the Seahawks and my girlfriend similar?
What do you call Aaron Rodgers' generous daughter?
Who is a chemist's favorite Game of Thrones character?
Did you hear about the lazy perfume-maker?
What is the prettiest thing about a DC girl?
What's the new Taken prequel going to be called?
How ‪did Chernobyl disaster happen ?
Why are relationships complex?
How do Canadians take care of their skin?
How do you know when a woman's about to say something smart?
How does Gandalf know he's pregnant?
When does a Mexican know he's hungry?
Why does Steve Irwin hate sunblock?
Which element of the Periodic Table is the poorest?
What did the Alabama State sheriff call the black guy who had been shot 15 times?
Why did little Suzy fall off the swing?
What happens when a pope dies?
What do the Egyptians call a man who cannot keep his opinions to himself?
What is the difference between oral sex and anal sex?
Why did the train sound effect album get derailed?
Why does Walter get to keep more of the drug money than Jessie?
What do you call a rich Chinese?
Have you heard about that new Tron movie?
What do you call the happy fellow that brings death to the people?
What is Hitler's favorite video game?
Where does a Muslim go for a quick bite?
what type of jeans does Mario wear?
Why did the chicken cross the Mobius Strip?
How do you reheat a cold war?
What do Godot and my wife have in common?
What is the difference between a Texan and a redneck?
What do nazis eat for breakfast?
How many Amish people does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why didn't the girl ride her bike to go water the neighborhood flower bed like usual?
How did the Dairy Queen get pregnant?
What animal has more lives than a cat?
What kind of dog can turn on your car?
What's an ephebophile?
If quizzes are quizzical, what are tests?
What are a redneck's last two words before dying ?
Why don't Polish mothers breast feed their babies?
What do you call a soldier who survives mustard gas and pepper spray attacks?
What did one gay sperm say to the other gay sperm?
Why should you never eat your girl out in the morning?
How does Shrek describe his sex with Fiona?
What's the difference between erotic & kinky ?
Did John Knott mind being the only cited author on his group's research paper?
What do you call someone who just occasionally dabbles in a bit of Islamic fundamentalism?
What's the difference between a Porsche and a porcupine?
What's the difference between CNN and Al Jazeera?
How do you eat a bald pussy?
Whats the difference between a genie and a genius?
What's the difference between a Chickpea and a Garbanzo bean?
Why was my boss surprised to see me screwing with the IT guy?
why can't you keep a jew in jail?
What do you call a therapist?
What is a firefighter's favorite video game console?
What's Michael J. Fox's favorite drink?
I'm starting a new Egyptian fraternity, would you like to join?
What did the bobby (English policeman) say to the hitchhiker with three heads, no arms and one leg?
What is the difference between Emo teenagers and your lawn?
You're a vegetarian?
Why did the L.A. riots last only 4 days?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, dyslexic, and agnostic?
What does a tire made of potatoes have?
What's the worst thing about alcoholics?
How did Bilbo survive the entire Lord of the Rings trilogy?
What was Hitler's favorite Yu-Gi-Oh card?
What kind of car does god drive?
What's the difference between a Hoover and a Harley?
What are some good Asian jokes you know?
How much energy does it take to create a rap star?
So have you heard about the mass immigration problem ALDI has been having?
What Does A Subatomic Duck Say?
Anybody hear about those two car antennas that got married?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster and a hooker with diarrhea?
Why do pigs run from medicine?
What do you call a cow that's masturbating?
What do you call a Spanish man with a rubber toe?
Why does ISIS only drink drip coffee?
Why couldn't the poop get flushed down the drain?
What was left after Pavarotti passed away?
What does a cock and a Rubik's Cube have in common?
Some military humour: why do I call the ol' downstairs resident APFSDS?
What do an alcoholic and a necrophiliac have in common?
Why do 95% of black males like sex in the shower?
Where do dead people buy their cigarettes?
Which kind of sharply dressed, tiny dwarves make the best drummers?
Who says there's no life on Mars?
What is a Jawa's favorite food?
What advice did the frog give to the condom manufacturer?
Did you hear about the incest convention?
Who invented the sucker punch?
Did you hear about the hooker that went to the bank for a loan?
Do scarecrows really work?
Why did the hacker start selling his services?
How do you tell a lonely geologist from a social one?
World peace or all of Bill Gates' money?
What's an Irish seven course meal?
What do you call it when a Catholic remodels his kitchen?
Why are seals such homebodies?
What do you call a hippopotamus wearing Tie Dye?
What does a brick and your mom have in common?
Why does a girl who uses chewing tobacco give the best head?
What do you tell someone from Moscow if he's in a hurry?
Why don't they have driving lessons and sex ed on the same day in Saudi Arabia?
Who has scene a dinosaur?
What do you do after you but a new oven?
What do you call a Mexican knight?
What do you call playful insults between terrorists?
You think it's difficult to plug one nostril and blow out the other?
How do hipsters buy their drugs?
How many dadaists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why couldn't the blind black man play hockey?
What does it take to reunite the Beatles?
Why is there no mexican olympics?
Difference between outlaws and inlaws?
What causes German Earthquakes?
Which gun does Superman use?
What do you call a Spanish baker?
What did terrorists say in Paris?
What do you call a black and white bra?
What would you call a Chinese based arm of Isis?
What does getting pregnant and locking your car keys in your car have in common?
What happens when a lawyer takes Viagra?
What is the burning question on the mind of every dyslexic existentialist?
Why didn't Napoleon qualify for the urgent marrow transplant?
What did the rabbit say to the deer?
do you like dragons?
What do you call terrorists who have degrees in material science and electromagnetic theory?
What do you call the guy who graduates last in medical class?
why don't blinde people go skydiving?
What did southern, black children bring to school to eat?
How did the mystic respond when asked what he's doing tonight?
What do electricians say when they meditate?
what did they start calling the timelord after he started frequenting one too many prostitutes?
Why is the ocean blue?
What is Snoop Dogg's favorite note?
What does an Asian with the biggest erection get when he walks into a wall?
Why are Asians such bad drivers?
Does anyone know if ISIS is hiring?
What did the walking staff say when accused of misleading sheep?
What's the difference in red and purple...?
Why don't black people like pirates?
What do you call a Canadian fish with no bones?
Why did Jim Morrison overdose on drugs?
Why can't you hear rabbits have sex?
Why did the man hire a Mexican gardener?
What do you call a baby seal between two slices of bread?
Why were the Chinese trying to light a bbq grill out in the rain?
Which famous hip hop group are very open about their ongoing battle with their bowel habits?
Why was the Adobe Acrobat document arrested?
Did you hear about the crazy chickens that took over a farm?
Why do men get circumcised?
What did the blind, paraplegic kid get for his christmas?
Why did the geologist quit his job?
What is the shit you didn't see?
What's the Welsh word for shearing a sheep?
What does Lenny (of Mice and Men) do during foreplay?
What would Bill Cosby's name be if he was Russian?
What do you get when you set a dog's tail on fire?
Did you hear about the wooden car with the wooden engine, the wooden doors and the wooden chassis?
Why do black men love pirate porn?
How can you tell your roommate is gay?
How do you circumcise a Texan?
Why did Baby Moses believe he was Egyptian?
What's something that Slaves have and rich people want?
Why did the zombie not eat your brain?
You guys wanna here a joke?
If our body is made of cells, what's a picture made of?
What do you call it when an ex pees on you?
What does alcohol free beer taste like?
What did Obi-wan say to Skywalker the first time he saw him as Darth Vader?
What do you tell a lady with two black eyes?
What do you say when you see your TV floating in the middle of the night?
What's easier to pick up the heavier it gets?
Why do Muslim extremists prefer to drink cappuccino?
How do you cheer up a brand new battery?
What did the white guy say when he saw the twelve black men in the jury box?
Why can't Asian couples have a caucasian child?
What did the mathematician and the dentist talk about?
Did you hear they're making a Source Code 2?
What do you call a scary unexpected post in reddit?
What do Barack Obama and Tiger Woods have in common?
Why did Helen Keller try lsd?
Why did the fly eat all of the butter?
I'm a ginja. What is that you might say?
What do you call a gay black man?
What does Santa do to dragons?
What vehicle do bicycle riders take to the hospital?
How do you spot a vegan at a party?
What did the fly say to the second man on the moon?
whats the difference between jam and jelly?
Do black people get sunburns?
What's it like having sex with a fat chick?
What's Medusa's favorite cheese?
What's the difference between a hooker, a lover and a housewife?
Can secretaries really write memos with both their left and right hands at the same time?
What do you do when you come across an elephant?
Did you hear about the dating website for old people?
What does a pig write with?
What did the monkey say when he put his tail on the railroad tracks?
How do you contact a cross dresser?
How do tectonic plates have fun?
What did the astronaut get on his science project?
Whay did Dairy Queen have a baby?
Do old men wear boxers or briefs?
How do you know when your girlfriend is getting fat?
Why does Snoop Dogg always carry around an umbrella?
What do you say to get gold's attention?
How do you end world hunger?
What do you do in the bathroom if you are trying to waste time?
Why did the architect take so long to get started on his church blueprints?
How many atheist does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the patch of fog that entered the spelling bee?
How do you have a sexy barbecue?
Why was the manipulative ghost so unsuccessful?
How does a man show he's planning for the future?
What is the worst that can happen to an atheist caricaturist ?
What did the ocean say to the river?
What does a writer hope to get in a Christmas cracker?
What do you call a judge with no thumbs?
What did iodine say to Xenon when caesium died?
What did the Jewish baby say to the Rabbi?
Why was the Queen of Horses hated by her subjects?
What do pirates and strip clubs have in common?
Why'd the squirrel fall out of the tree?
What do you call a group of twelve, angry, well-endowed men?
What did the saggy boob also say to the other?
Why are people so sad in Ferguson?
Why dont i watch porn anymore?
Why didn't the Christmas Cake go to the dance?
Did you hear the one about the blind ship captain?
Why did I rob the bank?
Why doesn't people with two dicks get into the porn industry?
How many nihilists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you say when you are comforting a grammar Nazi?
What's the illuminati's favorite month?
What do you get when a camel pukes in the desert?
What did the token black guy say to the other black guy who walks in the party?
When Gordon Ramsay saw a cute puppy gif on Reddit, why did he get mad?
Why is OP's dog never satisfied?
Why does Oregon Ducks need such big suitcases?
What kind of vitamin does a pirate take?
why don't lions like clowns?
Why is the blood of christ wine?
How many hipsters does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you make a plumber sad?
Is it cocky to have 2 penises?
What did the bra say to the top hat?
What was Helen Keller's dog's name?
Why is there no Walmarts in Afghanistan?
What did the one volcano say to the other volcano?
whats orange and black and hates lasagna?
when is it OK to spit a mexican woman in the face?
Do you like pudding?
Whats hard, black, and keeps me up all night?
Why did Bill and Ted join Islam?
Who is a Sea Lion's favorite composer?
How did the hipster burn their tongue?
What fruit makes you confused?
What's your favorite clock time?
What did Vladimir name his member?
Why don't lobsters ever share anything?
Did you hear about the doctor in new York city?
If H2O is in the inside of a fire hydrant, what's on the outside?
What do you call an unsuccessful Jewish pirate?
What do Kim Jong-un and a penis shaped potato have in common?
What language do fast talkers from Moscow speak?
What does a massage therapist with a speech impediment who moonlights as a dubstep dj do all day?
#1 pick up line in a gay bar?
What do you call a leper in a jacuzzi?
Why wasn't the joke funny at the dance?
What do you get when you cross a Jehovah's Witness with a Hell's Angel?
What do you call an Hispanic gentleman who drives a hybrid car?
Did you hear about the new emo website?
How did Samuel Morse propose to his wife?
What does Moses do when he wants a beer?
What do you call an old snowman?
Why do terrorists have high sex drives?
What is Billy Joel's favorite Bill Murray movie?
Why did the Muslim CEO dislike the cartoon of Muhammad?
Why doesn't Connecticut have a name for it people?
What were the Mexican crisps doing in the locked conference room?
Why did the mushroom get invited to a party?
What would Harper Lee's book be called if he was Mexican?
Why is it that lawyers get sick?
Why is my name...?
Where do crows go to have fun?
why wouldn't the black pencil write on the white paper?
Did you know about the guy that invented tampons?
What did the dog say to the tree?
Why is heaven a paradise for the common man?
What did the French man say when he tripped down the stairs?
What do you say when your TV is floating in the night?
What is better than Porn?
How many Nazis does it take to screw in a lightbulb??
What is the difference between roast beef and pea soup?
Why aren't there any introverted suicide bombers?
Have you ever wondered?
What is the last thing a redneck says before he dies?
What are the most offensive jokes you know?
What kind of writing makes the most money?
Why do ducks have webbed feet?
When a rapper gets beer, how much do they get?
What did the pirate say with the steering wheel in his pants?
Why do uniformed soldiers need to eat their fruits and vegetables?
Did you hear about the dyslexic hookers?
What do you say if your mom sees you having sex?
What do you call a shy, soft-spoken hipster?
What is the difference between yoghurt and America?
Why does a redneck find his cousin more attractive than a stranger?
Which one of these is a deadly virus?
Why is Rengar so OP?
How do you save up enough money for a bidet?
You guys hear about the hippy who drowned?
What do Mexicans put under their carpet?
What do you call a kitten's post-mortem?
What do you call it when flu season comes early?
Where did the engine go after he retired?
What is a neckbeard's favorite denomination of time?
What do you call it when a psychic midget escapes from prison?
Why do Jihadists only drink instant coffee?
What do you call a big cat disguised to blend in with a herd of sheep?
Which similarities do Bon Jovi and geologists share?
How to get a liberal arts graduate off of your porch?
How does the executioner like his coffee?
Why do Jews watch porn backwards?
What do robots dip in salsa?
Why are prostitutes cheaper compared to girlfriends and wives to many rich people?
What does your mom and your driveway have in common?
What's white, located in washington and has a president within it?
What do gay guys call hemroids?
What do you call an explosion in a Frencg kitchen?
What street do you put a lesbian restaurant on?
Why do Newfies want Québec to separate?
Why do Chinese people suck at soccer?
What did the failing kidney say to the healthy one?
What do you call an IS-leader on a motorcycle?
Why can't Chinese people eat Swans?
What do you call it when you lend money to a bison?
Whats a Neckbeard's favorite city in Spain?
Whaddaya call a blind nun?
How did the florist act after getting her dream job?
What's the difference between a raft guide and a large pizza?
What do you get when you cross a male chicken with peanut butter?
Why don't Muslims teach driving and sex ed. on the same day?
How does a black woman stop crime?
Do you know any good water jokes?
Why do Jihadist Muslims only drink instant coffee?
Why was the band late to their gig?
What do numbers look like when they get divorced?
What's white, digs holes in your garden and helps with headaches?
Why did the anthropologist eat a lot of yogurt?
What do you call Batman when he skips Church?
What did the bat say to the other bat when he almost flew into a tree?
Why should you never eat Sonic the Hedgehog?
What do walruses and tupperware have in common?
What do you call it when a blond dyes her hair?
How do you make a little girl cry even more?
What’s the difference between an apple and a dead baby?
What do you call a man that as sex with his 9 year old wife?
Did not your mother and I teach you that you should save your money?
What do you get when you have your eye brows plucked in Japan?
What did Uranium-238 say to Helium when they first met?
What do fat chicks, mopeds, and the KKK have in common?
What's the one thing make a wish foundation can't give you?
Why doesn't china have casinos?
Which hotel chain was Nikita Khrushchev's favourite?
What does a gynecologist and a pizza delivery boy have in common?
Want to hear a joke about the next iPhone?
What did Vladimir Putin say to the Ukraine after he annexed it?
What type of bees make milk?
What is an MRI's favorite music?
How do you make a snooker table laugh?
Why do stop lights turn red?
What do you call an Irish midget?
What is the difference between 3 dicks and a joke about Muhammad?
Why is Snow White?
How do you start a powerful woman's movement?
What did Wendy do when she first saw Captain Hook?
What is another way of 'saying caught between a rock and a hard place'?
How many women does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call cake that isn't yours?
What did the Vagina say to the Anus?
Why do girls wear make-up and perfume?
Does pornography degrade women?
What do you call a show about puns?
What did the zombie body builder say?
What's black and blue and doesn't like sex?
What do women and rocks have in common?
What happens to all the unsold christmas trees?
Why did Hitler prefer apples to oranges?
What does Peter Gabriel sing on the toilet?
What is Hitler's least favorite drink?
How is Billy Cosby like Santa Claus?
What were the photocopier's last words?
What does Putin say during his new years speech?
Does anyone have a recipe for sausage and apples?
What do you get when you cross Gnomes and Worgen??
You know why cops aren't on the streets of NYC right now?
What do pussy and cigarettes have in common?
Why can't a bicycle stand alone?
How many women does it take to invent something?
JOKE: How does a woman go about inventing a lightbulb?
Why did the walrus go to the tupperware store?
What's the difference between a feminist and a computer?
What value is higher than infinity?
How many Saiyans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why don't they let whales into strip clubs?
Why did Toronto host the (hockey) World Junior Championships?
How much does a Human shield cost?
How many feminists does it take to dismantle the patriarchy?
What did the Dalai Llama play on stage at Glastonbury?
Wanna know the best part about being in 10 year long marriages?
How many girls does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is the smallest book in history?
How many tries did it take to find out if Lance Armstrong was ticklish?
Why did the walrus go to the tupperware party?
Do you know what my friend said before he kicked the bucket?
Whats camp for kids with ADD called?
What is the most racist type of bread?
Why do lambs go to casinos?
What do you call a mouse with cheese but no crackers?
Why should you never kiss a slutty bird?
What do you call a group of ISIS members with their backs turned?
What's better than roses around your piano?
Why did the cannibal get indigestion after eating his high school debate team rival?
What is the difference between a Southern Zoo and a Northern Zoo?
Difference between a 4 year old and a nightclub?
What do Coors Light and having sex in a canoe have in common?
How do you get a Harvard graduate off your doorstep?
Why does Mexico do so badly in the Olympics ?
What's a fedora tippin neckbeard's favorite country?
Why does Cuba not have any casinos?
Why does everyone like the KKK?
Why are there no casinos in China?
What's a plumber's least favorite type of shoe?
Why did they plant trees in Harlem?
What did the cannibal get when he was late to dinner?
What's the difference between Christianity and Judaism?
What language do bees speak?
Why can't Chinese people have white babies?
whats the secret service of Australia called?
Why do you call a Mexican midget a paragraph?
How does Peter Pan fly?
What do you call a cow that's made out of glass?
Who is Vietnam's greatest superhero?
Why does Snoop Dog carry around an umbrella?
Why do women make bad engineers?
What is the same with you, a pet cat, and a pet dog?
What do you call a reptiloid that crashed landed its spaceship?
What do you call a kid that stands up to bullies?
Why should you never tell jokes on the ice?
Where do Angelfish swim?
What is the difference between acne and gay men?
Where did all the TV remotes go when you can't find them?
What is Stevie Wonder's favorite guitar chord?
Why does Gandalf prefer coupes?
Why did Bob get 'Emo' Grass for his lawn?
What do call the President of Russia with an upset stomach?
What do you call a knighted cow?
Are the UK banning the export of cheese?
What do French people call a really bad Thursday?
What is Mrs. Potato Head's stripper name?
Why wasn't the fish allowed to play in the band?
What's the difference between Tiger Woods and Santa?
Why do Jews always seem to find spare change laying around?
How do you top a car?
What do you call a rapping egg?
What's the difference between a small child and a bag of cocaine?
Why do college students already get up at 7?
What happens if you don't pay after an exorcism?
Is it just me, or are birds really popular lately?
What did Kris Kross tell the nervous paratrooper?
Joke 3 - What weighs 15,000 pounds and is cursed with a sleeping spell?
Joke 2 - What weighs 15,000 pounds and combs her red hair with a fork?
Joke 1 - What weighs 15,000 pounds and wears glass slippers?
How can you tell if a pedophile is happy?
What do you say when you see your television floating in the night?
What shampoo do dragons prefer?
What do you call a woman-hating masseuse?
What is a tresspasser's least favorite number?
Me: Dad, How did you guys manage without Whatsapp & Facebook?
What Do You Call A Jewish Dilemma?
What do you call a slightly impolite canadian dust devil?
What do you call a giant pile of kittens?
Mum: did you masturbate while showering again?
Why was Pinocchio acting drunk?
What do grapefruit and vaginas have in common?
Did you hear about the man with five dicks?
Would a lion cheat on his wife?
What did fish A say to fish B?
Why did the chicken crossed the road?
How do you know if your girlfriend is ticklish?
What is Forest Gump's password?
What do you get if you put morphine on your toast?
What do you call a black widow trapped in a bowl of noodles?
Who was Hitler's childhood hero?
How do you get a one armed Italian out of a tree?
Who's the roundest knight at King Arthur's Table?
What wears a leather jacket, and would kill you if it fell from a tree?
Where does a snowman keep his money?
What's a lumberjack's favorite director?
How do you know that someone you met is a Harvard graduate?
Why do arabs use Colgate before going to the airport?
What is Spider-Man's favorite rice?
What do you call cheese that doesn't belong to you?
A motorist runs over a woman. Who's to blame?
What did the sociopathic cannibal parachutist say?
Why doses a blond open the door after sex?
What was Beethoven's girlfriend's name?
Where do Mexicans shop for books?
How do zombies communicate in times of war?
What's the first thing you should do when you bring a Thai girl home?
Wanna hear an Ebola joke?
Whats a fedora clad, neck bearded gentlemen's favorite color?
How do you advertise a French rifle?
Why do all The Hunger Games fans can't even?
Girl, are you the one ring?
Did everyone hear the news about graveyards?
What type of sound system does a Saab have?
How does a booze thief make you feel better?
What's the difference between Bono and God?
How many cops does it take to push a pedophile down the stairs?
Why do feminists hate the portrayal of women in the media?
What do you call mail that likes to have fun?
Why doesn't Meghan Trainor eat salmon?
If a mathematician were to be any part of a kitchen which would he be?
What is it called when a thief steals a purse, runs into the street, then gets run over?
Girls giving blowjobs for Louboutins - Whatcha call that?
Why does Marx support New Years Eve celebrations?
What do you call a book club that has been stuck on the same book for thousands of years?
What did the blind, innocent, sweet, paraplegic 7 year old boy get for his birthday?
What do you call a pest from the moon?
What do you call two guys with no arms or legs hanging from a window?
why didn't Hitler pass algebra?
What do you call a hula hoop with a nail on the inside?
Why did the thief take a bath?
Why are girls like rocks?
What do you say to a masochistic necrophiliac going through a beastiality phase?
Did you hear the joke about jello?
What do children in north korea study for a science?
What happened to the man who sent a group of crows to the insane asylum?
Why did five not like one?
What did the gynecologist say to his sedated patient?
What did Tony the Tiger say to the kids playing baseball?
Why are you so fat?
What did the hotel clerk tell the guest with paruresis during check in?
What do you call a man with one arm?
Why Weren't There Many Jokes in the Dark Ages?
What did sushi A say to sushi B?
User interface?
Did you hear about the time Orion lost an archery match?
Why shoudn't you take you Pokemon cards to the shower?
Why are there trees in Harlem?
What's the difference between jelly & jam?
What did the LOTR fan say to the LOTR hater?
What did the donkey say to its dick?
How do you choose a stupid policeman from a group of policemen?
What do black people get after death?
What do you call Batman skipping church?
What did the botanist say to the plant he was tired of tending to?
What do you call a wine convention in upstate New York?
What makes a grown man cry?
Did you here about the dead whale that washed up onshore?
How did Geordi La Forge go blind?
What do you call a thirsty cow?
What's the difference between a roasted chicken and a time bomb?
A man runs over his wife. Whose fault is it?
Why did Microsoft skip Windows 9?
What do you call a seagull that catches you sleeping?
hey Colorado, hows your aspen?
Why did Tomato turn red from embarrassment?
Did you hear about the dyslexic agnostic insomniac..?
How do you make stupid people click links?
What's your New Year's resolution?
What does one llama say to the other llama before the smoke some weed?
What is the difference between Rihanna and a coconut?
What did the sick fish say when he got sick?
What is the difference between a epileptic corn husker and a prostitute with diarrhea?
Why is Michael Jordan's Jersey number 23?
Why was the lizard's wife unsatisfied?
Why did Wile E. Coyote have a "Detour" sign pointing to the edge of a cliff?
What did the pro bono plastic surgeon say to their patient on Dec 31st?
What kind of Fuel does the Iron Giant run on?
What's the loudest thing in the last two Harry Potter films?
What is the first name of Mr Rafone?
What is time consuming?
how can you tell if someone is vegan?
How do Eskimos make things stick together?
What do you call a homosexual man on a wheel chair?
Want to know how to make your PC faster?
What do you get if you push a piano down a mine?
How did the Fonz die?
What makes a salami excited?
How do Asians find our they are pregnant?
Whats the difference between a bird and a fly?
What did Nazis do to kids with ADHD/ADD?
What do you call a feline massage therapist?
Did you hear about the plane that flew over the Java Sea?
Why do Polish people's names end in 'ski'?
What is the difference between dragons and dinosaurs?
Whats strong enough for a man but made for a woman?
Did you hear about the Lepers hockey game?
Why didn't Bungie stick with Halo?
What does a retired hairdresser and a bar of platinum have in common?
What do you call a cocktail of iced tea and skittles?
What's the difference between a dirty old bus station and a lobster with boobs?
What's the name of West Virginia's version of Winnie the Pooh?
What does BBW actually stand for?
Why are defense lawyers the best lovers?
What starts out happy but ends in tears?
Made a small donation to a street comedian for this gem... how do you know your at a gay picnic?
How many therapists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the gamer refuse to join the Boy Scouts?
Ever want to have rodeo sex?
Why isn't there democracy in North Korea?
Why can't an Asian couple have a white child?
What do you get when you mix a monkey and a midget?
Whats the difference between a Ginger and a Shoe ?
why did the possum cross the road?
What is the difference between a cock and a penis?
What do you call a cow masturbating?
What do you call a cow that just gave birth?
Why shouldn't you make fun of a paleontologist?
What did King Arthur do in Camelot?
Why did Night fall?
How can Peter Pan fly?
Why do Avon ladies walk funny?
What did the homeless man say to Barack Obama?
If Arnold Schwarzenegger was a composer which would he be?
How many OU (University of Oklahoma) coaches does it take to change a light bulb?
What mistake have you made when your wife comes in from the kitchen to yell at you?
How do you make a peanut butter and Reddit sandwich?
What's the difference between "like", "love" and "showing off"?
Is your mother's name Josephine?
Have you heard about the kidnapper?
Did you hear about the theft at the babysitter convention?
What is the sheeps market called?
What kind of pie can fly?
Why do baked bean cans contain only 239 beans?
You hear about the new cemetery?
What begins with P and ends with orn?
What do rich people and bad flossers have in common?
Why was the Spanish train the primary suspect?
What did Steven hawking say when he first got his wheelchair?
What's one thing you never want to hear your wife say while having sex?
What's the difference between fishing and dating?
What did they bilingual foot model say as he enjoyed chips and warm bread by the fireplace?
What did the silkworm comment on the message board?
How do I like using Tinder?
What's the difference between an IRS audit and prison rape?
What's the difference between a hooker and Jesus?
What do reddit fans and Apple fans have in common?
What did the pig say when his wife left him?
What's 12 inches long and hangs in front of an arsehole?
What did the fish say when it ran into the wall?
What do you call all that useless meat around the vagina?
Did you hear the joke about the sewing machine?
What's the most common phrase at a strip club?
What do you call a dad without jeans?
Did you hear about that Air Asia flight?
Did you hear what they found in Jeffrey Dahmer's freezer?
What's the shortest book in the world?
Why do oysters enjoy being cooked?
Why shouldn't you kiss anybody on New Years Day?
Why can't SCAT be legally banned?
What's the difference between an Aboriginal and a park bench?
how do you wake lady gaga up?
Why did the moth kill the other moth?
Dad, how does it feel to have such a handsome son?
What did the physicist say to the two women he was trying to pick up at the bar?
Am I too fat?
Why did the meteorologist bring a bar of soap to work?
What's the difference between matter and a hormone?
Why don't pediatricians like to wait?
How do you know that the drum riser is level?
why do philosophers love the ocean so much?
Why are there so many people in Ireland?
What did Vladimir Putin say after dropping a smashing one-liner?
Why is it called an XBox One?
What does space smell like?
Where did the crab work inside her new job at the pizza factory?
What did the fat guy give to the fat girl?
What do you call a really expensive tombstone?
Why can't Ross & Phoebe ever drown?
What do snakes take for their sniffles?
What's a great thing to do in Fresno?
What do I do after I die?
You hear the one about the sexually adventurous Eskimo?
Where does a wealthy lady reside?
What do Far Cry 4 and The Big Lebowski have in common?
Have you heard about that new pirate movie??
What kind of coffee does a peg legged pirate drink?
Do you know who Newton is?
What did the mushroom say on his dating profile?
Why can't a bike stand on its own ?
What did the mother Buffalo say when her boy left for college?
What's the oldest trick in the book?
What does Mike Tyson eat after a long time on twitter?
Did you hear about the guy who had to be exorcised?
Best way to keep your money from the casinos in Las Vegas?
Why did the little boy drop his icecream?
Did you hear about the Candy Factory they opened on the East Coast?
What do you call the mineral found in teeth and tooth enamel?
What's Hitlers favourite weather?
What did Santa Clause give all the naughty boys and girls for Christmas this year?
How many Australians have been killed by Ebola?
How does a guy with five dicks wear his pants?
What did Adam say to Eve?
How do you make a 6 year old cry twice?
What's it called when you try a different flavor of salsa?
What Did The Jumbo Shrimp Say To The Jumbo Crab?
What's the difference between a girl's track team and a village of pygmies?
How do Etheopians celebrate their first birthday?
Why wont a Jewish cannibal eat a German?
How do bros want their drinks?
Do you guys like presents?
Why is sex with 92 year olds tiring?
Where does Khal Drogo keep his DVDs?
Why did no one believe the Psychologist ever went to the bathroom?
What's the difference between an Olympic swimmer and an Olympic diver?
What do you call someone who's afraid of Santa getting stuck in their chimney?
Why do Japanese people have slanty eyes?
How do dogs save for retirement?
What can walk over the water, but can travel under the water without getting wet?
What do jedhi's and rape have in common?
Why did the idiot stare at a carton of orange juice?
What did the vampire say to the teacher?
What did one gay pedophile say to the other at the beach?
Do you ever have the urge to eat something right in front of you?
Where is the gangster egg from?
What do you call a man with a penis in the middle of his face?
Why do Scuba divers fall backwards into the water?
What do people with aspergers Do in the bathroom?
How many?
What do moldy corn flakes and Charles Manson have in common?
What do you call a midget physic that has escaped from prison??
What kind of music do they play at Stonehenge?
How do black people tan?
What do you call a child who doesn't believe in Santa?
Why does LeBron James wear high socks?
What do you call a group of disabled people in a pool?
Why is the stick attached to the roof?
Can you imagine what would happen if Kate Middleton started doing porn?
What do you call a story about a WW2 shipyard?
What did the judge say to the attractive woman soaked in pee?
Why do people become bakers?
What is a cheating wife's worst nightmare?
What goes "Ooooooooooo!"?
What do rehab and the days after Christmas have in common?
How long do you need to put the turkey in the oven for?
What did the mentally handicapped kid get on his math test?
What's the cheesiest Stallone film?
What is the difference between a pimple and a Catholic Priest?
What do you call a group of retards in a sauna?
What did Adam say the day before Christmas?
What do pizza boys and gynaecologists have in common?
Why did the rooster cross the road?
What has six eyes but can't see?
Where is the 'L' in christmas?
Why are 490 Romans funny?
What is the appropriate response when your cat tells you a joke?
What do you get when you mix an elephant and a rhino?
What do you call an envious ocean?
What do you call a hooker at Christmas?
Why did the golfer wear two pairs of trousers?
What do you call a monkey sitting on a lions back?
What's the difference between Santa and a Jew?
How do you get an elephant into a Safeway grocery bag?
Why can't Michael J. Fox draw a perfect circle?
What do you call a racist blind person?
What did the Buffalo say to his son when he went off to college?
Did you hear about the Asian guy who was so terrible that nobody mourned his death?
Why does corn in Illinois lean east?
Why are graveyards so noisy?
How do you say goodbye to a thousand Japanese people?
what did the domino's pizza delivery guy say to Satan?
Have you ever noticed that cigars and scotch taste the same?
What's Santa's favourite heavy metal band?
What do you call 100 cows masterbating ?
What's the deal with lampshades?
How do you make Hitler kill himself?
Why is Santa always so jolly?
Why is Santa Claus's sack always so full?
What number is higher than infinity?
What do the NFL and Brokeback Mountain have in common?
A black guy and a Puerto Rican are in a car. So who's driving?
How does a frog greet a rabbit during the holiday season?
What body regulates the welfare of Santa's workers?
Did you hear about the agnostic dyslexic insomniac?
What do you call a Muslim pilot?
How Long is a Chinamen?
What's the difference between a canoe and a jew?
What do you get when a Game of Thrones character sets up your photo studio?
What's a schizophrenic's favorite Christmas song?
What do you call an organized group of people waiting to get drinks?
Why can't the incredible hulk find a girlfriend?
What do you call a muslim flying a plane?
What is the flatulent fat guy's favorite song after his gf dumped him during Christmas?
What do you call the study of butts?
What did the cow say when she saw the Dalmatian?
Why do men finish first during sex?
Why did the punster enjoy the Broadway show about etymology?
Do you know how old I am?
What's the difference between Christmas and the Great Marianas Turkey Shoot?
What is the most said band name during the holidays?
Why do elephants prefer cars instead of motorcycles?
What's the difference between virgin olive oil and regular olive oil?
How do you encourage a potter while he's glazing his bowl?
Why can't a dog clap in the middle of a movie?
Are you an ideal amount of red phosphorus and am I a proportioned tiny wooden stick?
Why doesn't a window scream when you shatter it?
What's a Henway?
What do orphans get at Christmas?
Did you hear about the woman who spent 1 million dollars on plastic surgery for her butt?
What do you call the day before Christmas Eve?
How does a chef ask to leave the dinner table?
What is the difference between Santa and the Jews?
What's Dean Martin's favorite eel?
Why did North Korea lose Internet?
Why did the dog sit in the front seat of the car?
What's the affirmative response to a Jamaican mother?
Do you know the meaning "Happy wife, happy life"?
What's the difference between Light and Hard?
What do you say to change the atmosphere at a dinner party?
How many karma whores does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the definition of a mere myth?
Why do power lines hum?
What do you give to a man who has everything?
Someone has told me that menopause is mentioned in the Bible Is that true? Where can it be found?
What does The Rock said to his Girl Friend?
How do you get a man in a coma hard?
Is it gay when the Doublemint Twins make out?
What do you call a dog with no back legs and metal balls?
What do maggots and Alabama fans have in common?
How many recruits does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why didn't the art thief get away?
How do you make a whore shut up?
How many male chauvinists does it take to change a light bulb?
How do you make German potato pancakes?
What did the physicist say when his wife wanted to go jewelery shopping?
What's Santa's favourite metal band?
What did they start calling Kim Jong Un after he shed 60 kgs in weight?
If OP was a Pizza Delivery Driver, how much would he make?
What's the difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
What is a tree's favorite drink?
What kind of mane does a Chinese lion have?
What is any guy's dream first job?
What is heavy forward but not backward?
How do you make a dog sound like a cat?
Why did the sun-praiser receive the full inheritance from his grandmother?
What did the porn star wear to court?
Can we survive without whales?
What do you call someone who hates people without toes and can't have ice cream?
Why did a Mexican girl get pregnant?
What do reindeer have that other animals don't have?
How are farts and Ancient Egypt similar?
What's the difference between Santa and a jew?
How many jews can you fit in a Volkswagen beetle?
Why are white girls odd?
Whats pink and smells like salmon?
What do prayers and my Reddit submissions have in common?
Did you hear about the war on diarrhea?
Why do people eat carrots to help their eyesight?
Did you hear about the proctologist who had a car accident?
Why does New York have all the lawyers while New Jersey got all the garbage dumps?
Why can't you tell when a Pteradactyl goes to the toilet?
What does the mayonnaise say to the refrigerator?
What do you call one of Santa's helpers?
What do you call an angry Russian?
Where do you find 100 fat cows?
What did one Christmas ornament say to the other Christmas ornament?
How do diapers work?
You know how people called Richard get called Dick?
What do you call a bread that catches a cold?
What's the difference between a soldier and a sailor?
Do you know how to make a Venetian Blind?
What do you call the money a prostitute makes?
Why did Bill Nye crash his car?
Why can you never compromise with a veggie burger?
Why does Snoop carry an umbrella?
Why didn't the Pharaoh believe he was drowning?
How do you know when you've fucked an apple?
What did the two gum diseases say to the one who had a party without them?
How many people do the cops need to kill in order to start a riot?
Why do women hate panty lines?
Why do little dogs shake so much?
Why didn't the oyster give to charity?
What does the average cat say?
How do blondes' brain cells die?
What is better than getting a N64 on Christmas?
What are Mario's overalls made out of?
What's the hardest part of the vegetable to eat?
Why was the little shoe sad?
How do you die by heroin?
What are the 7 Irish drinking holidays?
What do you call a secret agent running for the bus?
Why do stoners love couches?
What do Russians and gays have in common?
Hear about the guy who had a fetish for Christmas?
What's the worst part about pissing outside in the winter?
How do you measure a milf?
What's Tyrion Lannisters's favourite sea food?
Why was the baguette excited for his audition?
What is the best part about showering with a 14 year old girl?
[OC] Why did the mayonnaise win the running race?
Why can't Chinese couples have caucasian babies?
How do you get a guy to stop having sex with you?
What do you call it when water is poured over a clock?
Why did the Teletubbies find it hard to pee?
If you're making out with a Thai girl, what's the first thing you should ask yourself?
Why was the professional so impressed with the farmer?
What do you call a crew of handsome Italian astronauts?
Why was the paleontologist angry?
Who brings all the good little inclined plane girls and boys presents at Christmas?
You know what's best about Texas?
How many Northern Californians does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call twin kittens?
Why is a 12oz can of Coca-Cola more popular in St. Paul and Minneapolis than a 2 liter?
What do you call a septic cat?
What do you call an oyster who can't find another job?
What do you call a Roman warrior with hair in his mouth?
What do you call glasses that make you look wise?
Where did Michael Jackson go to college?
Who knows about math and science and is always close by?
What's the difference between a Jew and a Canoe?
Why do horses have such a low divorce rate?
What do you call a wheel with clothes?
Son:Mom! What's a GF?
Did you hear about the guy who died of an epileptic fit?
What's a room full of saurkraut?
whose playing shaggy so much?
What's the hardest thing about finding a dead baby on the beach?
What did the raisin see when she came home early from work?
What did the guitars do when they were unhappy with their government?
What's the difference between a customer and a weatherman?
Why don't black cops shoot unarmed white kids?
What's a horny pirates worst nightmare?
What's the difference between a corn husker with tourettes, and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What do you a zombie eating ice cream?
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breasts?
Have you ever met that one guy you really want to punch in the face?
What do you call a Hungarian insect who won't leave siddhartha alone?
What's the one knot I can tie with my butt?
What's the difference between me and a calendar?
What's the difference between a bag of sugar and a dead baby?
How does a mathematician get Tan?
did you hear that Frosty broke up with his girlfriend?
What do the elderly eat?
Was I your first?
What are condoms for?
What did the cop say to his belly button?
You know what really sucks?
You know why you can't scare a gay guy?
What goes in dry and hard, but comes out soft and wet?
what do you call a spicy wrap made at an Indian takeaway?
What would happen if a rodent were to crawl into, and die in, a piece of equipment made by Dell?
What's the difference between a tuna a piano and a pot of glue..?
Have you heard of that family fun game Beat the Parents?
Why did the chord get kicked out of the bar?
Why does Shang Tsung always enjoy a religious song from Finland?
What do you call a fart from an Egyptian stranger?
What do you call when a blonde dyes her hair brown?
Did you hear about the jurisprudence fetishist that walked into a courtroom?
Why did the Middle Eastern man not want his daughter to go on a date with a boy from school?
What's the same about Mexican and Black people?
How many calories do you get from eating pussy?
What's the difference between an Irish guy dying in a play, and you getting laid?
How do girls know when they are adults?
What's Mary short for?
How can you tell when a mechanic has had sex?
Why is it hard to break up with a Japenese girl?
Why can't youplay UNO with Mexicans?
What do you get when you cross a cat and a wild boar?
In what sport to balls go flying around at speeds of up to 150 miles per hour?
From my 7 year-old son: What rhymes with 'boo' and really stinks?
Did you know there are only two Lawyer jokes?
What is Sacha Baron Cohen's favorite ion?
How do you make a drummers car more aerodynamic?
Did you hear about the German Jockey?
What did one lawyer say to the other lawyer?
What sound does a subatomic Cow make?
What are your best racist jokes?
Did you hear about the documentary on perforations?
What's the difference between a ruble and a dollar?
What do you call hiding in a Michael Bay movie?
Did you hear about the guy who jumped off a tall building and fell through a manhole?
Why is your washing machine always laughing?
How do you beat someone in an argument?
How do you know ancient Egyptians were black?
What is it that's made backwards?
Which cheese is made backwards?
Why do canadians do it doggy style?
Why are red heads never calm?
Hanukah hip-hop act of the decade?
What's the name of the Hogwarts Professor that has an STI?
What do you have if you are holding a cricket ball in each hand?
Why Did the Chicken Cross the Road?
What do you call a shape that's always worried?
Are you a cop from New York?
Why do polish people all have ski at the end of their name?
Where does Jane Fonda buy her groceries?
What do they call Snoop Dogg in Asia?
Why won't Santa be visiting Nigel Farage this year?
So, have you guys seen the headlines about 'Jesus might have had a wife'?
Did you hear about the protests going on outside of Madison Square Garden?
What is red and white and red and white and red and ....?
What did zero say to eight?
What does a girl have in common with a camel?
What's a rapists favorite meal?
How did Darth Vader know what Obi-Wan was getting for christmas?
Why can't Sean Connery read November?
What is dead on its back, 100 feet in the air?
Do you know why they call them Sperm Whales?
What do you call a violent Buddhist?
How do you get a jewish girls number?
Why are black people always wrong?
What did the man do after listening to a Pink Floyd album for two hours?
What do you call a Christian who comes to your door to sell you vacuum cleaners?
How do you get a blonde on a roof?
Why did the 16 year old Mexican girl get pregnant?
Which war had the most overweight soldiers?
Can people using windows play games online with people with using Mac?
What do you call a pen without style?
What happened to the Christian family when they didn't pay their exorcist?
Hey, baby. Are you cheese?
Why does a chicken coop have two doors?
Why does an elephant have four feet?
How do you get a sweet little old lady to say F***?
Who is the coolest guy in the Hospital?
What's the worst thing you can do in the name of cupidity?
Why is Stephen Hawking so controversial?
What did the man say after he got into a fight with the amputee?
What do you call a bear that's been in the rain?
What did the bull-fighter say to the upset door?
What do you call a gay chicken?
How do you feel when you don't have coffee?
How much does a Rabbi charge for circumcision?
Why did the calf cross the road?
Why isn't having sex with a dead baby considered necrophilia?
What is Doctor Who's favorite snack?
What's the difference between Santa and Jewish Santa?
What's the best thing about having sex with twenty-four year olds?
What do you call a sad Ent?
Why did China lose WW2?
How you heard about the new bad breath removal strategy?
Why are there so many cat photos online?
What would one call a movie about meth addictions?
What's the difference between Marcus Mariota and Floyd Mayweather?
Where does the CIA buy its groceries?
Why is it so hard to give up fizzy drinks?
How do you measure a Lego figure's shoe size?
If Christians made a movie about church attendance, what would they call it?
How do lesbians celebrate special occasions?
what do you call a young Chinese prostitute ?
What do you call a yak that wants to talk to you about a network marketing opportunity?
What's a pedophiles favorite piece of classical music?
What was the jew doing in the ashtray?
What do you call someone with no arms or legs?
[Warning: Dad joke] What is a dog's favorite Christmas song?
How do you hide money from a hippie?
What's the difference between a slut and a bitch?
Who was King Arthur's knight who built the round table?
What is Snoop Dogg's favorite weather?
Have you heard about Betty the cow?
What's the difference between the Holocaust and the Boston Marathon Bombing?
Why is the north pole of a magnet red?
What's a gay man's favorite time?
What do you call a pirates thong?
Did you hear about the riot at the bar mitzvah reception?
What did the apple tell the annoying orange?
Q. What's the rudest type of Elf?
How does a sheep farmer find a sheep on top of the mountain ?
What's the hardest thing about riding a scooter?
What's the difference between a sniper with bad eyesight and a constipated owl?
What did the Pirate say on his 80th Birthday?
Why does Santa give better presents to rich kids?
Why was the atom laughing?
What did the web designer do when a hot girl walked up to him and squeezed his nuts?
What do you call some who is afraid of Santa?
Why was Kanye's Christmas gift to Kim spoiled?
What's Eric Garner's favorite song?
why do chickens cluck?
What's 8 inches long, sausage-shaped, full of semen and stuffed between a sexy Thai's breasts?
What did the Doe say when she came out of the woods?
How do you know your girlfriend is getting too fat?
Why does the pedophile like minecraft?
What is long and hard on a black man?
If an athlete gets athlete's foot, what does an astronaut get?
What do you call it when a stripper does charity work?
What's 10 inches long, hard as a rock, full of semen and makes all of the ladies scream?
Why are Panda's always sad?
Whats the difference between Elton John and a refrigerator?
What is a black guy's favorite game to play with the kids?
What is the generic name for Viagra?
Why does Santa have a garden?
How many Mexicans does it take to fix a light bulb?
What's the difference between a horse and a 13 year old boy?
Why did Al Gore go to the dentist for a tooth pulling?
Did you know in judaism there is no hell?
Have you heard the joke about the corrupt government?
Why is santa so jolly?
What do you call an aligator that likes to wear vests when no one else is around?
Why didn't the two tampons talk to each other?
What's an 80 year old pussy smell like?
What's the difference between the Rolling Stones and a Scottish shepard?
What do you call a disease you get from having sex?
What is it called when Batman skips church?
What do Santa Claus and Bill Cosby have in common?
What's a dog's favorite mode of transportation?
What did the teen say when she found out she was pregnant?
How many gay men does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you guys hear that Lorena Bobbitt was recently involved in a traffic accident in L.A.?
What is the slogan of the Mormon Church?
What was Boaz like before he got married?
Did you know John Denver had dandruff?
What's black and blue and hates sex?
Do you know how to tell your ass from a hole in the ground?
How do doctors treat mesothelioma?
You know what's odd?
What Is An Doge?
how many Irishman does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How do you make cultured milk?
Why is the tailor's daughter such a slut?
What's the difference between a princess and a witch?
What's the difference between myxomatosis and Hugh Hefner?
(A math joke.) What did the acorn say when it grew up?
Why did the condom fly out of the window?
Why did the guitarist keep his condoms in his guitar case?
Why did the Chinese kangaroo turn red?
What is the difference between snowmen and snowomen?
What's the difference between a Kit Kat and an Essex girl?
What do you call a sleepwalking Nun?
Remember when you were a kid and you used to blow bubbles?
How can you tell when an accountant is extroverted?
What is a rapper's favorite tea?
What do Mexicans use to slice pizza?
Should America make China the 51st state so we can get better access to Chinese food?
Why is auto correct regarded as an important invention?
Why did the naughty child not get electrocuted when he stuck a fork in the socket?
What's long and thick and turns conservative women on?
Where does Dracula buy his writing supplies?
What if you had an eye in your asshole?
Why do people on acid listen to Dubstep?
What do you call a search for small guitars?
Why can't you tell secrets in a corn field?
What followed the Big Bang?
What do you call a bakery owned by a redhead?
Why did Sally fall off the Swing??
What does Santa and Hackers have in common?
What’s green, fuzzy, and if it fell out of a tree it would kill you?
What's Santa's favorite snack?
Why did Jesus walk on water?
Why did the climate change denier oversleep?
What did Russia say to Ukraine?
Why do orthodox rabbis like lemonade so much?
Where do you put a black jew?
what do you call a group of Mexicans smoking weed?
Did you know Diarrhea is hereditary?
Are black men becoming an endangered species?
What do you get when you cross a Judge and a Potato?
did you hear about the man who cooled to absolute zero?
Did you hear about the pedophile musician?
Why did Vanilla Ice steal a can of hair spray?
What do you call a pickled deer?
What do you call a Jamaican that wears glasses?
What do the woman from southern California and the clouds over the Pacific coast have in commen?
Why did the chicken cross OP's mother?
What do wolves say when you yell barba streisand in the forest?
What does Taylor Swift tell her boyfriend when he gets toilet paper stuck on his arse?
Why did the KKK member fail his calculus class?
Who punishes Colorado underage smokers?
Why are DJ's so bad at fishing?
How can you tell if someone is vegan?
What do you call a slut during the holidays?
Are you a solution of bismuth technetium hydride with a pH of 14?
What did the Irishman say about the RC car tied to his scrotum?
How many white Police Officers does it take to beat up one black motorist?
did you the one about the girl who lost a cucumber I her vagina?
What's worse than a male chauvinistic pig?
Did you guys know the majority is always right?
What word is always spelled wrong?
You've heard about the Ferguson situation, right?
What did Hitler say when the barber shaved his head?
Why don't cows hang out with camels?
What does Rihanna think of Chris Brown?
What's a Buccaneer?
Why is titty fucking a girl the most romantic way to make love?
What did god say when he created the first black man?
What's the key to a good joke?
Why couldn't the NSA agent leave his house this Winter?
If Ben Franklin was a Nazi, how would he have discovered electricity?
What do you call an Eskimo peeping tom?
Why did the Mexicans only bring 5000 people to the Alamo?
How does Lord Voldemort like his pussy?
Pappu:- Should i punished for the work which I have not done??
How many people of a certain ethnicity does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many metal drummers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a boring taco?
What is Mexico's favorite sport?
What has two holes and smells a lot?
What do you call a weatherman's evil twin?
What do you call a dedicated but untalented gymnast?
What're nuts on a wall?
What do you give to someone who has everything?
Why do feminist picnics suck?
Wanna hear my vegetable joke?
What do white guys do that lasts hours and makes white women scream?
What do you get when you mix up literature and alcohol?
What's the difference between Kim Kardashian and a homeless man who works at McDonalds?
What is Mexico's National Sport?
Do you know 25% of woman are seeking help for mental issues?
What did the astronaut say to his girlfriend?
What does Idk stand for?
What do electricians get for Christmas?
What does a hooker get from Santa?
How do you know a redneck invented the toothbrush?
Why did Vana White run off the stage of Wheel of Fortune?
How do Catholic church priests stay healthy?
Why is Iraq like the weather in Britain?
What do you call an animal with a long neck and a love for oranges?
What do you have when you get 32 rednecks in a line?
What did the set-up say to the punchline?
How many guys in the friend zone does it take to light a light bulb?
What's the difference between a hooker and your wife?
How do you steal something from a crazy person?
If athletes get Athlete's Foot, what do astronauts get?
Q: Why is everyone tired of the king playing video poker on his porcelain throne?
Why does lightning always strike trees?
Why couldn't the auction house find any buyers for the Celtic artifact?
Why was the lettuce scared of the salad?
Why was the turkey (bird) named after the country?
How do Egyptians warn each other about a spreading fire?
How long does it take to cook a baby in a microwave?
Why was the dolphin depressed?
Where to dogs who lost their tails go?
Who says love is dead?
A man in tights was found near a rock. What happened?
What kind of bread do Rednecks like?
Where did the King keep his armies?
What Olympic event that involves throwing should be eliminated?
What's the difference between a bitch and a whore?
What do girls and snowflakes have in common?
What kind of dog can do magic tricks?
What's a baby seals' least favourite drink?
How many assholes does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the difference between a soap and a jew?
why do women wear make up and perfume?
What's the difference between /r/funny and /r/jokes?
Who was the first female commodore?
How do the jews comunicate?
What's the difference between marmalade and jam?
What killed Phil Hughes?
Why couldn't the orphan watch the movie?
What's the worst feeling when getting your prostate examined?
Have uou ever played the Michael Brown drinking game?
What is the difference between a tube and a foolish Dutchman?
Why aren't there any baby Transformers?
How are old jokes on reddit like a herpes outbreak?
What's black and white and being milked tonight?
What do fat chicks and mopeds have in common?
What are some jokes that only a specific group of people will understand?
What do you call a sinking ship from BP's Mexico division?
Why does the forest stink during a storm?
What military rank do you hold while using a pay toilet?
What's brown and runny?
Have you heard the joke that they don't tell assholes?
Whats a good joke including all of these ethnicities?
Did you hear about the musician who couldn't even pay to be in tune?
What do you call an Irishman sitting on his veranda?
What happens when you combine TNT with a hard drive?
Why won't the honeydew marry the watermelon?
So we all know about Gandhi right?
What did a blind french guy said he wanted for christmas?
How do you make holy water from just plain water?
Did you hear about the organic chemical terrorist group?
What do you call a dog that doesn't eat meat?
Why was 6 scared of 7?
Why did 11 eat 12?
Why is the mailman bad at sex?
What is the difference between like, love, hate, and showing off?
What gets harder the longer it stays in your mouth?
Where do hipsters swim?
Where did Little Sally go during the bombing?
What do you call sliding into home plate, on a green field in Mexico?
Why is Unidan's current account called UnidanX?
Who's that one armed rockstar drummer?
Who was the most popular cast member on The Facts of Life?
What do you call it when you rape a girl and cum on her chest?
Why do mice have small balls?
What do the titanic and Madelaine McCann have in common?
What do you call a gay farmer?
Why does Snoop Dog always carry an umbrella?
Wanna hear a joke about paper?
Know any good DJ jokes?
Why did the optimistic Chinese guy wish he had multiple personality disorder?
What do you call a guy that hates Christmas and steals the woman you love?
Why was the kamikaze pilot so depressed?
What's worse than being told by your doctor that you have gonorrhea?
Why is a gay guy dating someone named Andy particularly useful?
How does the drug addict know the cocaine is good quality?
What did Elmo take before he left the tickle factory?
What are the three steps to put an elephant into the fridge..?
How can you tell a rich Swiss from a poor Swiss?
Why did the scale not wear any of his shirts?
Is toasting with deaf people offensive?
What does a 1 eyed, 1 legged, and deaf kid get for Christmas?
Why are you on /r/Jokes?
Why do all polish names end in ski?
How do rocks feel about moss?
Did yoy hear what happened to the dyslexic satanist?
Why did the punk cross the road?
What is a orphans biggest dilemma when it comes to cooking?
Why, in the United States, do we not have the letter "u" in words like "favourite" and "colour"?
Wanna hear a clean joke?
Why was little Jimmy fishing in the well?
What do you call a guy with no arms and not legs laying on a porch?
What happens when you put your grandma on speedial?
Why is everyone in the Soviet Union always in a hurry?
How many tickles does it take to make a squid laugh?
Why did the guitar shop fail a fire safety inspection?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say before he went down the mine?
Q: How many communists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
whats worse than a dead cat on the piano?
How did the private eye use math to find the intent of the crime?
Why did the bride and groom get married in a hot tub?
What's long, hard, and has cum in the middle of it?
What did the hippie say when you told him to leave your house?
What do you call an Indian Jedi?
How do you get away with murder?
What do they call the Hunger Games in Ethiopia?
What do you call the cook on a Soviet battleship?
How can you tell if a hippie has been at your house?
Did you hear about the problem at the Indian bread factory?
What happens when you come across lion?
What's a cats most common written thought?
How many Jon Snows does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the deal with Drake, first he was an actor now a rapper?
How did one Brain apologise to the other?
What do 9 out of 10 people always agree on?
What's the worst part about being black?
How do you know Jesus is okay with gays?
What do you get when you cross The Atlantic with The Titanic?
What do you call a nosy pepper?
How many South Americans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why is there no gang violence on the space station?
What do you call Al-Qaeda's April Fools prank?
Hear about the kidnapping at school?
Want to hear a joke about testicles?
Did you hear the one about the amber alert?
what's black and white and red all over?
Why doesn’t Santa have any kids?
What is the definition of a Barbarian?
What is the job of a gentleman pimp?
Why the young tailor couldn't finish his father's pants?
What's the best thing about fucking twenty-three year olds?
What do members of secret societies use when they get a head cold?
What do you hear when Bill Cosby walks into the room?
What do you get when you put a knife in a babys ass?
What do Native Americans do for the holidays?
What do a guitar and a drum have in common?
Why aren't there many female NASCAR drivers?
If advil is ibuprofen, and tylenol is acetaminophen, what is viagra?
How do you confuse a gay?
What happened when pigs started flying?
What do Japanses pirates do?
Whats better than winning gold at the paralympics?
What do you call your saggy old midwife?
What do you call a jew who works at a brewery?
Where does the general keep his armies?
What do you get when you dress the Hulk in Captain America's clothes?
What's the difference between a Jew and a canoe?
Did you hear about that one statistician?
how do you drown a blonde?
a sphincter says what?
What does Sean Connery do with his quiche?
What do you call a man with no arms?
What is it called when the Queen farts?
What do you call Squidward's Protest Group in Mexico?
did you hear the one about Santa went to the doctors?
How did Roman magistrates keep fit?
why didn't natalie wood take a shower on the boat?
Whats the last thing that goes thru a bug's mind when it hits the windshield?
What do you call an attractive zombie?
What's the KKK's favorite Christmas song?
What did the angry dough ball say to the other dough ball?
What is the most well educated type of nut?
Where do you go when you start up a videogame about Noodles?
What do you call someone who impersonates a lousy mom?
Why would anyone want to be a masochist?
What do you call a guy who plays the guitar unplugged?
Why did the golfer wear a extra pair of pants?
Teacher: why did you laugh?
What do you call Sherlock Holmes when he's constipated?
What do you call black characters in Ferris Bueller's Day Off?
Whats the difference between OP and a magical ram?
What do a walrus and tupperware have in common?
How do you know the difference between snowmen and snowwomen?
How do you make your girlfriend scream during sex?
What's the difficult part about having a dingo for a pet?
Why aren't people from the Westboro Baptist Church archaeologists?
Why does the ocean roar?
How do lions like their steaks?
What do you get when you cross a garden, a rabbit, and some ExLax?
Why is "Z" afraid of all of the other letters?
What do planets like read?
Why don't they have driving classes and sex Ed on the same day in Saudi Arabia?
What is the best offensive joke you have? Can you make me laugh?
Why do the French have so many civil wars?
How does Jerry Seinfeld play ice hockey?
How do you know when you're at a gay barbecue?
How did the little boy save the catholic priest's life?
Which band is difficult to dance to?
Why did the leper chase the leopard?
Did you hear about the lady who backed into a belt sander?
Why did it rain on Christmas Eve?
What does a Mexican cop say when he wishes you a Merry Christmas?
What do you call a soldier who survives Mustard gas and pepper spray?
What did The Mandrain say when he told his wife he'd stop masturbating?
Knock knock. Whose their?
Whats a Floridian hookers favorite drink?
What breaks when you give it to a twelve year old?
Where does Russia get its water from?
What is them difference between a horse and a Harley Davidson?
Why are fat girls so good at giving head?
Did you hear about the Darth Vader rape allegations?
What should you always ask after someone says "I'd fuck her, but only with a bag on her head"?
Why do they say I'm black in the bedroom?
What's the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scottish shepherd?
What's the Incredible Hulk's favorite food?
How can you tell when a wine connoisseur is happy?
Why should jokes always be sent over TCP?
When is the one time when no doesn't mean no?
Why did Dr Facilier cross the road?
ho! ho! ho! why is Santas sack always full?
What's the difference between an oral, and rectal thermometer?
Why does Jesus always leave a door open for you?
How many jews could get in to the cab?
What's the difference between Beer nuts and deer nuts?
Did you hear about the pirate who used to walk the plank every night?
When does a cub become a boy scout?
What's Charles Dickens's middle name?
What did Hitler Drink for breakfast?
Why do women make better pilots than men?
What do you call a white asian who loves cola?
What do crazy girlfriends and chocolate have in common?
What do you call a Nazi who is social and moves freely at a party?
Did you know Princess Diana had dandruff?
Why did the Ferguson protesters not participate in Black Friday?
What's Chris Martin's favorite drink?
Why is Dwayne "The Rock" Johnson always so sad?
What do you call a baseball player who watches porn?
Why does Stephen Hawking do one-liners?
Q: On a scale from 1 to 10, what is your favorite color in the english alphabet?
What is logic?
What's Mario's favorite pants?
How do you make a Jewish philosopher have a Eureka moment?
What did the Asian guy say when he was caught sleeping with another man's wife?
You know what I like better than a good non-sequitur?
Why don't Natives like snow?
Why did the ghost cross the road?
What's the Square Root of 69?
How do you stop clowns from attacking you?
Why cant the Rolling stones ever be pastors?
Why won't the members of the Westboro Baptist Church drink whole milk?
Why did the hipster drown?
What did the white man do at the club?
What do Indians live in?
How do you make a dog meow?
If I had a rooster and you had a donkey and your donkey ate my rooster's feet, what would I have?
Whats 6'2" and doesnt work?
What do you throw a drowning guitarist?
What's the difference between one polar bear and 10 polar bears?
Do you have something against black people?!?!!?
Why doesn't Jesus enjoy manicures or pedicures?
Did you hear about the vegan cannibal?
Wanna hear a joke that ends in a cliffhanger?
Why does Thanksgiving feel like a date with Bill Cosby?
What do you call a round knight?
What was the name of that south Korean who had a foot fetish?
How do you ask a tyrannosaur out to lunch?
What do pirates do with their treasure in the winter?
What kind of organisation is Atheism?
Why did the German baker claim on his insurance at Christmas?
What is a punny play?
You guys hear the one about the little French pig?
What did the barfly say to the other barfly?
What do you call a basketball team full of giraffes?
What does a blind person say when you give them sandpaper?
How do you spot the violent kids at the circus?
You know why it's called Black Friday?
Hey baby, are you a space archaeologist?
What is the #1 cause of paedophilia?
What do you call empathetic bovine?
Guess which city got the best black Friday deals?
What bounces and makes kids cry?
Whats the difference between a woman and a plate?
Why do teenage girls always hang out in odd numbers?
Remember how white people rioted after OJ Simpson's acquittal?
What's the difference between God and Bono?
Can you guess how many turkeys we're gonna serve tomorrow?
Where can you find the best Black Friday deals with items at 100% off?
how did canada choose its name?
How do you say Thanksgiving in Native American?
What's the difference between a hooker and a dead baby?
What do you call a porn star who only does anal when she's drunk?
Where do all the bad hamburger buns live?
Want to hear a joke about Nitric Oxide?
What's the slogan of Jewish proselytizers?
Why couldn't the pickle leave the bar?
What did the sun god say in apology for all he had done wrong?
What does Salvador Dali have for breakfast?
What is the Fonz looking forward to the most in the future?
Why did peasants hate knights' outfits?
What do the Scottish people call iPhone?
What do you call the king of the jungle in the land down under?
Which came first? Chicken or the egg?
How do you get a Catholic Nun to have sex?
Do you know what bald eagle tastes like?
How do you call the homosexuell mathematic department of ISIS?
What is it when you turn off the heat?
Did you hear about the Ethiopian man that fell into an alligator pit?
What's the best way to eat a thanksgiving vegetable?
Why are there no walmarts in Pakistan?
What do you get when you cross an oven with a car?
What do fish in Jamaica smoke ?
What do you call a horny priest?
Did you hear the one about the perverted statistician?
What's a pirates favorite fast food?
What sexual position produces the ugliest children?
Who's the only one who doesn't say thanks on Thanksgiving?
Who was the first black person accepted into Harvard University?
Do you know how do you spell Mississippi with one I?
What's the point of going to somebodys funeral?
What kind of cheese is best to watch Lost with?
What fruit can't get married?
What happens when you combine an alpha particle and a beta particle?
What do you call a nun lost in the woods?
What part does Woody Harrelson want to be remembered for most?
Why did the internet pirate get scurvy?
When is it okay to spit an arab woman in the face?
What did one sailor say to the other on Dec. 7 1941?
How many honest politicians does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why'd the hipster burn his mouth?
Why are there no Bruce Lee jokes?
What kind of shoes does Voldemort wear?
What game is all the rage with the Ferguson rioters?
What do you get when you pour root beer into a square glass?
What's the key to a great Thanksgiving?
Why aren't snowmen called snow women?
Is it too soon for Michael Brown jokes?
A black man and a Mexican man open a restaurant together. What is it called?
What's the best part of having Miley Cyrus over for thanksgiving dinner?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and A Black Rapper?
Why are they rioting in Ferguson?
How does a painter support their art in this economy?
Why do Native Americans like being invited to Thanksgiving dinners?
Why are Helium, Curium and Barium called the medical elements?
What did the blind, deaf, mute girl get for Christmas??
How do a neckbeard's cells divide?
What is the best thing to come out of Italy?
What do you call a muslim on an airplane?
Why did the turkey walk across the road twice?
Why do Ohio State students and alums say "THE Ohio State University"?
What did Harry Potter name his daughter?
How can you lift an elephant with one hand?
What do you call a shitty city?
What's the difference between Michael Brown and Darren Wilson?
What do you call Hitler underwater?
What do you call a bee with a toe?
Which character in Game of Thrones do I envy the most?
Did you hear the one about Ferguson?
Why did the yankee wolf like southern ladies?
What's the thin line between love and hate?
Why didn't the blind man want a seeing eye dog?
What do you call a really shitty nieghbor?
Where did Jimmy go after the explosion?
How do you get a one armed polack out of a tree?
Did you know it's now politically incorrect to say 'black paint'?
My (black) coworkers informed me that black people can't get lice?
What do you call a society governed by men with no testicles?
How are women like tornadoes?
What do you call a bear's dick?
What did Aslan tell Lucy about the Witch and the Wardrobe?
How many niggers does it take to win a war?
What do you call fat dubstep?
What do you call an angry pirate?
Why was the energizer bunny arrested?
Why can't you ever trust an atom?
How many cops does it need to change a light bulb?
What's another word for slaughterhouse?
Who burns their own city down?
What do you do when an angry pack of clowns confronts you and tries to fight?
Why did the Jews have such a hard time in Russia?
What does a astronaut put in a sandwich?
How can you tell a black lady is pregnant?
What's the difference between officer Darren Wilson and Michael Brown?
Why did the Turkey join the band?
What's the difference between a lightbulb and a pregnant girl?
Why can't short people cook?
Why was Harry Potter kicked out of Hogwarts?
What do you call a postmodernist ravioli?
Whats the difference between a cricket ball and an Aboriginals pussy?
How many times can you watch the Godfather movies before you're bored?
Who represents a Ghost in court?
Why did Bill Cosby make his own Jell-O?
What do you call a Nurse that specializes in male genitalia?
What do you call an obese terrorist?
Girl, are you a parking ticket?
What do you call Hitler in the water?
What does Samuel Jackson say when he is mugging you?
Where's Spiderman's home page?
What do you call an Ethiopian on a hunger strike?
How do you study for a prostate exam?
What do you call a grenade thrown into a restaurant in France?
What did the body builder say when he ran out of protein powder mix?
Why did Henry VIII fail his classes?
Which came first, the chicken or the egg?
Why was the picture acquitted of the charge for murder?
Which company makes the best apple cider?
Did you hear about the restaurant on Mars?
Joke my dad told me: What's black and white and red, and has trouble going through a revolving door?
Wanna see an ass-trick?
Have you ever eaten at that Ethiopian restraunt?
How do you get to Matthew McConaughey's House?
What did the dick say to the condom?
Why did the chicken get a strike?
Why did the spy cross the road?
What is a pigs favorite type of acrobatics?
Why don't Geordies use scales?
Whats the best part about sex with a pregnant woman?
How do Japanese politicians say they got their positions?
What is the common point between broccoli and anal sex?
What happens when a linguist gets sick?
In the event of a zombie apocalypse, who's the first to lose his job?
Why is the letter "B" so cold?
how many tickles does it take to make an octopus laugh?
What's the best part about going to a holocaust museum?
What does 80 year old pussy smell like?
What did the McDonald's addict suddenly realize?
Where did the pregnant T-Rex go for a check-up?
What's the difference between a gun and a wife?
What's the difference between Alabama and Mississippi?
How come white girls can only count odd numbers?
What do Pavlov's dogs call storefront bell-ringers?
Why did the Chicken cross the playground?
What do you call 4 lepers in a Jacuzzi?
Did you hear about all the students who are using brake fluid to get high?
How many Ferguson police does it take to change a light bulb?
Why is Peter Pan such a terrible pilot?
Why did the psychic get fired?
Have you heard of Bill Cosby's new T.V. show?
What's brown and runs around your garden?
What does Sting have in common with a snitch?
What's the difference between a barrel rider, and a can of Copenhagen?
What does a 9 volt battery and a girls ass have in common?
Want to hear an Ebola joke?
How do dubstep DJs masturbate?
Why aren't their Mexican Olympics?
Why was the computer programmer single?
What movie did Leonardo DiCaprio's dog recently star in?
why did the pacifist stay away from cows?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's wife?
Why Can't a Nose be 12 inches long?
What is the speed limit for sex?
How many Jewish mothers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the crocodile with false teeth?
What's the definition of a period?
What is a paranoid man's favorite food?
Why is gravity so weak?
what comes after 69?
What's the definition of Eternity?
Why did the train kill people?
How many IT support techs does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is it a bad idea to hunt the US national bird?
What do dinosaurs put on their pizza?
What do you call black people in the military?
Did you hear about the tragedy today at the All Western Hemisphere Ploughman's Competition?
Have you met my vegetarian girlfriend?
What's 668?
Where does a thumb meet its type?
Why did the college student change his major from Biology to Physics after his first exam?
Did you hear about the crime that happened in a parking garage?
Why did little Dan dropped his ice cream?
What did Jesus say when he was nailed upon the cross?
whats white with red stripes and crawls slowly over the floor?
What's the difference between batman and a black man?
What do you call customers at Lidl?
Did you hear about the dyslexic agnostic insomniac?
A joke about rehab and people who think they are better than you...and horses?
What do indian mice do when they get scared?
Why are Dutch people so tall?
What do you call a joke that makes fun of a woman, who has not consented to be made fun of?
How can you tell if a Newfoundlander is gay?
What's M. Night Shyamalan's favorite flavor of ice cream?
Why was Jimmy sad?
What's the difference between a big penis and a small penis?
What do you call a black gynecologist?
What do robots do at the rave?
Why Do Mathematicians Never Go To The Beach?
what do you call a Kentucky farm girl who can run faster than her dad?
what do you call a blond standing on her head?
Why can't Jesus eat a cheeseburger?
What do you do if you're attacked by a bunch of Carnies?
what are pee wee herman's favorite baseball teams?
What do you get when you run over geese?
What's the difference between Batman and a black man?
What's the difference between a cigarette and my exwife?
Girl, do you have a defibrillator?
How can you tell who's the head nurse at a hospital?
(Original) Why should you keep a broken clock?
What's the difference between a dog and a marine biologist?
Have you heard of the man that walked all day and only moved two feet?
What did Charlie Manson get his fiancée?
How did ISIS become so powerful?
What do you say to a urinating Italian?
Why did the programmer's girlfriend move back home so quickly?
What's under the Pillsbury Doughboy's apron?
What is the first thing men newborns do before first breath?
What do you call Dracula's retarded cousin?
Did you here about that concert where the frontman flung his crap into the crowd?
What's the capital of Wisconsin?
How does a French lady hold her liquor?
Why wouldn't the skeleton go diving?
What did the parents say to the Rabbi after the circumcision?
Why did the Computer Engineer retire young?
What has the Middle East and Kim Kardashian's ass got in common?
What's the fastest path to the top?
Why Don't Lobsters Share?
What do you call an elevator with a group of slim, softly spoken, intelligent people inside?
Have you heard about the midget psychic who broke out of jail?
Want to know how I escaped Iraq?
What did the Frenchman say when he saw a dirty toilet?
Why are Americans scared of roundabouts?
Why doesn't the deaf have sex?
Why did the man get sent to jail?
What did the lesbian vampire say to the other lesbian vampire?
Do you know what the last result of the World Cup was?
What does a mother use to keep her childrens' toenails soft and smooth?
What's the difference between a hockey player and a feminist hippie chick?
So, how do you like your job as an elevator repairman?
What is a cannibal's favourite treat?
Did you hear about Russia's preservation new project?
What kind of sound does a whorn make?
What are the rough parts of Italy called?
Damn girl are you sitting on a F5 key?
Did you hear about the new transgender operation?
How many Patriots fans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Who won the Tour de France in 1940?
What do you get when two giraffes collide?
Out of?
What's 12 inches long and white?
Why doesn't men use make-up or perfume?
What do dark humour and food have in common?
Why does wonder woman fly?
How do you kill a vampire dinosaur?
What's red and black and scares women worldwide?
R niggers 2 gay 4 u?
Have I ever taught you South american Judo?
You got some jokes?
What's the toughest type of pie?
Why did the Dictator ban Soda?
Why were the witch and wizard always kissing each other's necks?
Have you heard of the book about airplane factories?
TIL That Oscar Pistorius once opened a pizza parlor only to have it fail and go bankrupt. The cause?
Did you meet the guy who masturbated on the toilet?
What do you call a semi truck owned by an Italian?
What's the cheapest cut of meat?
Why did the English major break up with the pilot?
What did Barack Obama say when he dropped his shell at the beach?
Did you hear about the cannibal Bob Marley?
What do 9/10 people love?
Why was the man with size four shoes turned away from Mount Everest?
Why couldn't Jango wear Boba's helmet?
Why do dogs lick their balls?
Did you hear about the two gay Irishmen?
What does it mean when a lion roars?
What do you call it when two robots have sex?
What would Marilyn Monroe be doing if she were alive today?
What did one testicle ask the other testicle?
Which chocolate stops dogs hair falling out?
What would Gregor Mendel pray for if he had a blender for his experiments?
What is the difference between oral and anal thermometers?
Where do you find a dog with no arms and no legs?
How many kids does a sterile German have?
What is the difference between a joke and sex?
What do you call a female dog with a pH over 7?
What do you call a Mexican Midget?
why wasn't jesus born in mexico?
Did you hear the one where the Scotsman gave his son some money?
What's Hitler's favorite weather?
What do you call a sink that doesn't work?
whats the difference between a jew and a pizza?
What can an elevator do that a black man can't?
What did the blonde say when she saw a banana peel?
Why did the riot police show up early to the protest?
Why do men stare at a woman's breasts?
What is the favourite meal of pakistani taliban members?
Who Makes More Money, A Prostitute Or A Drug Dealer?
Hey, did you hear about the road paver who got fired?
What kind of grass do cows like most?
What do a Marionette User and Tampon Thief have in common?
Who did Chris Brown mistook Rihanna for?
What's your favorite thing about earth?
What's the best thing about a woman?
What does a guy think in the middle of a blowjob?
Want to hear another Ebola joke?
Why does it smell so bad in Russia?
Did you hear about the group Italians joining ISIS?
How do you find out what's in an e-cigarette?
What would happen if for one day nobody could make calls with their cellphone in the United States?
Does anybody know whats heart does?
Where do you hide an airport?
What happened to the cant when it ate a ball of wool?
Good Music Jokes?
What do you call a wrongly accused art thief?
Does anyone know what would happen if the earth rotated 30 times faster than it does today?
What do you call an imam that owns a goat and a camel?
What's the difference between John Kenndy Jr. and Ted Kennedy?
What do you call a fat man in a white t-shirt?
Why were there no feminists in Communist China?
What do Africans eat for lunch?
Has Kim Kardashian Broken The Internet?
Hadron collider?
You know what's nuts?
Who is the original Kardashian?
What's an empty suit of armor doing on the drivers side of a car?
How many second violinists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why isn't Hitler invited to the barbecue?
What do Winnie the Pooh and Attila the Hun have in common?
Why is craving karma points ironic?
What do you call a rich man's white tank top?
If Philae finds an inhabitant on the comet what would be its first words?
How many potatoes does it take to kill an Irish person?
What's that there?
What do you call the facility where they make lower quality, but still acceptable, goods?
Where do bees go to the bathroom?
What's green and comes out of your nose at 160mph?
In the 90's did the backstreet boys have a cafeteria?
Did you hear about the cannibal who cloned himself to see what he would taste like?
What did one doctor say to the other doctor?
What do you call snacks served at a brothel?
What's that again?
What diagnosis did the veterinarian give to the dog with the funny walk?
What do you get when you cross an elephant with a kangaroo?
What did the busy tailor say to the Scarecrow who needed some mending?
What did the slutty DNA say to the other DNA?
How is the elevator business?
What did the bald man say when he got a comb as a gift?
How many WoW devs does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did Jesus say to the Eskimos?
Two gay men and two lesbian are in a race, who wins?
Why can't you have sex with a nun?
What did Captain Picard call his poop?
what did the leper say to the prostitute?
Did you know that 50% of asian businessmen have cataracts?
What is the theory behind Brownian motion of sperms?
What's an owl's favourite pin code?
The difference between dates and prunes?
Who's Zombies greatest enemy?
How does Carrot Top have sex?
What do you call a lesbian who also doesn't eat meat?
What do you call a sugary werewolf?
What do you call a British dinosaur?
What's a bananas favourite business to own?
Why can't you tell puns to a kleptomaniac?
Do you know how to tell when your girlfriend is getting fat?
What did Putin say after he sent his troops to Ukraine?
Why was Hitler diagnosed with blindness?
While escaping from the police, what did one bug say to the other?
Why did the mission control operator tell the astronauts not to eat any food?
Why did hitler kill himself?
How many feninists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the difference between your dog and your girlfriend?
Why is it so cold in San Francisco?
What's two holes in a hole ?
What did Nicki Minaj, Hitler and a Feminist say when they walked into a bar?
Why wasn't Jesus born in Detroit?
What did the slutty girl buy at the furniture store?
What do you get when a horse's food comes to know Jesus?
What is the longest word?
How do you know the universe likes Saturn?
What did the Alligator say to the turtle?
How do blind people know where to find Braille signs on walls and doors?
Did you hear about the new Arnold Schwarzenegger movie?
Why was Homer Simpson in such a rush to get to the Kwik-E-Mart?
Why do Italians carry slices of turd in their wallets?
How many dull people does it take to change a light bulb?
Why are there no awards for excellence in betas?
What did the blonde Buddhist say when she finished her 88th prayer?
What is your best orphan/dark joke?
Why do old men need Viagra?
What do you call 2 Chainz when he gets fat?
What's the most casual crime you can commit?
A riddle or a joke? You are at a party with over 100 people, how can you tell which one is a pilot?
How are bears related to cooking?
What did the fisherman say to the fisherwoman?
How do Africans carry Ebola?
What did Bill Cosby say in response to his rape allegations?
What did Goku say when he heard his wife listening to the song, "Fancy"?
Hey, you wanna hear a joke?
What do you call a comedian who couldn't make it?
What did the two lesbian vampires say to each other?
How many choir directors does it take to change a light bulb?
What do programmers and obese people have in common?
What do you call it when a prostitute makes paper birds?
How did Hitler achieve 99 firemaking?
Did you hear about that nightclub for birds?
What does Bill Clinton say when he is having anal sex with Hillary Clinton?
What did the farmer tell the hoe?
Where do pencils come from ?
What did the mathematician say to the lumberjack drummer?
How do you kill a book?
why did the hipster burn his mouth drinking coffee?
Did you hear about the guy who went for the world fapping record?
Did you hear about the midget Scotsman who does avant garde strip tease?
What do you call a Pokemon with a STD?
Why does AMD call having 2 or more cards Crossfire?
why Jewish men get circumcised?
Why people don't offer chair to Sean Connery when he comes?
Does a cow have the Buddha-nature?
What happens if you cut off your left hand?
Why was the guy with the foot fetish in a bad neighborhood?
What do you call the surgical procedure for a female to male sex change?
Did anyone hear about the new music genre created by the VP in the clinton administration?
What do you call it when a broke person makes a sex tape?
Why Latvian man did cross road?
What do you get when you cast Michael J. Fox as Walter White?
What do you call a country run by a bunch of stubborn old deer?
What did Hitler say when 7 ate 9?
Why did the doorman get a raise?
What did Samsung say after Apple came out of the closet?
What is Bruce Lee’s favorite drink?
When's the best time to go skydiving?
Did you hear about the man who was using apples and oranges for flooring?
What do you call the spaces between the bits on a comb?
What's the difference between Jewish people and Harry Potter?
What do you call a man in the ocean with no arms or legs?
What's the difference between a coyote and a flea?
What's a waste of time, wrapped up and is regular near Christmas?
What's it called when a cow kills itself?
How are a homosexual and a tumbleweed alike?
Where do cats go after death?
What do you call a sleepy relative of a paper towel?
Did you hear about the surgeon that got sacked for having sex with his patients?
What does a Russian woman say to stop her husband from abusing her?
What's the difference between a northern fairy tale and a southern fairy tale?
How did Mark Zuckerberg meet Miley Cyrus?
What do you call a spitting vampire?
What's the award for being the world's best dentist?
What do you call a Mexican without his car?
Am I the only one that sees the irony?
What's the worst part about being black and Jewish?
What did the humanistic psychologist say at Freud's funeral?
Did you hear about the vulture that became a priest?
What's the only animal that can't get hit in the head?
Why do black men make such good husbands?
How do you tell which truck is the mail truck?
Why are toilet tasks called ONE and TWO?
Which do Catholic priests like better—apples or cherries?
How many handicapped guys does it take to change a light bulb?
Why does California have more lawyers and New Jersey have more toxic waste dumps?
What does a Mexican cut a pizza with?
What do you call an elephant that doesn't matter?
Did yall see the Ebola donation thing that popped up on Face Book the other day?
What do you call a pickled female deer?
What do you call 24 carrots?
Did you hear about the dolphin who went thru a existential crisis?
How does a butcher introduce his wife to his friends?
What kind of photograph does Arnold Schwarzenegger take?
Where do fortune tellers keep the fortunes?
Why don't women wear skirts during winter?
where did the lone ranger take his trash to?
What part of the computer the astronaut likes the most?
What do Swedish people put in their coffee?
What do you call a disabled cub scout?
What's difference between dollars and Jews?
Did you hear about the two car pile up in Mexico?
What do you call Batman when he leaves Church early?
Two "is/does yo mama" jokes from the last century?
What's worst than finding a worm in an apple?
Any one wanna hear a funny joke?
How to turn a dishwasher into a snow blower?
Why did Sally fall out of the swing?
Why were the two homosexual melons protesting at city hall?
how did the art student make a million dollar work of art?
How do you get to Matthew McConaughey's house?
What does a burnt pizza and a pregnant girl have in common?
What does the earth eat for breakfast?
What colour socks does a bear wear?
What does Edgar Allen Poe call his women?
What do you call a woman who misses her period?
Why do British prostitutes always carry Vaseline?
What's better than tennis?
What is the difference between beer nuts and deer nuts?
What's worse than two babies in a dumpster?
What's the American settler's spirit animal?
Why did all the potato chips but one jump off the cliff?
What's 9 inches long, pink, and makes my girlfriend scream when I put it in her mouth?
What's the difference between a cow who makes regular milk and a cow who makes chocolate milk?
Why does lanolin oil smell exactly like cow semen?
Did you hear about the girl that went fishing with the three guys?
What did one computer say to the other?
So, hows your DNS lookup up?
Did you know there's a new sub for disputes?
Why did the man cross the road?
What do you call a Mexican pervert?
What do gay men and Xbox's have in common?
How do you get 100 babies into a phone booth?
What do a plumber and a walrus both enjoy?
Why is Forrest Gump as a young boy without his leg braces like a Samurai without a master?
Did you hear about the string of bank robberies committed by a guy dressed up like Jesus?
How are books like dogs?
What did the conformist say to the Guru?
What do you call a love story between resistance and energy?
What do you call a German physician who specializes in the epidermis of the scalp?
Why do presidents have unsatisfied wives?
Where does the vampire deposit his savings?
Where does the vampire sail?
What do Jesus Christ and Male Porn-stars have in common?
What would you rather have Parkinson's or Alzheimer's?
Where did all the Sephardic Jews go?
What do Japanese emperors and rappers have in common?
Have you heard the one about the constipated mathematician?
Did you hear about the shooting with the starting pistol?
What do a gynecologist and a pizza delivery guy have in common?
Did you hear about the new chemical that turns lesbians straight?
What's the worst way to tell a guy his small penis is okay?
What do you call it when a fish fucks his sister?
What do Eskimos get from sitting on the ice?
What kind of container is appropriate for noble gases?
What do you get when you cross 10 sodium particles with the Dark Knight?
Have you seen that movie Constipated?
What did the scientist say before he died by mixing Hydroxide and Nitrate?
How is a Jew like a new pair of eyeglasses?
Did you all hear about this morning after pill?
Why are ghosts bad liars?
How did Darth Vader know what Obi-Wan Kenobi was getting for Christmas?
Why are Wayne and Garth banned from playgrounds?
How do you get a Ford recalled?
What is the scientific measurement for moistness?
What do an anorexic person and Sonic the Hedgehog have in common?
What do you call the death of the Trilobites?
How do mob boss mules open doors?
What did the "O" call the Zero?
What did one pile of burning wood say to the other?
Why do scuba divers fall backwards out of the boat?
Why is Darth Vader so famous?
How far could you see if you had a 12" dick growing out of your forehead?
What do you call a really fast seamstress?
Who is the most popular guy at a nudist colony?
How many Democrats does it take to change a light bulb?
How are sex and pizza similar?
Why is owning a Prius difficult?
Why do Jews hate water?
Whats an African dad joke?
Why was the bullet train behind schedule?
What happens when the president of the United States has to use the bathroom?
Why are dog boners so classy?
You know what a Freudian slip is?
What do you call the illegitimate son of a man with a big face?
Wanna hear a good dick joke?
What did Anna Freud let her underwear show?
How many eskimos does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How does one become an Astronaut?
What is the premier dish in Israeli-Japanese cuisine?
Why are the British known for keeping a stiff upper lip?
How can you tell if a woman is faking an orgasm?
Did you hear about the gangster panda?
What did Truman Burbank's father say to him?
Why Do Giraffes Have Such Long Necks?
What do you call allergy season without any Kleenexes?
Why did the skeleton go to the movies alone?
What does a guy drink when he wants to go out with a girl?
What did the mayonnaise say to the man opening the fridge door?
A black woman has 5 children, all named Tyrone. How does she tell them apart?
Why didn't The African go to the classical music event?
What did the Nazi say to the clock that only went: "tick ____ tick ____ tick ____" ?
Hey baby are you a unbalanced equation?
Why do people say amen instead of awomen at church?
Want to hear a joke about ebola?
Why don't taxi drivers talk to each other?
How many Catholics does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Whats the most popular breakfast food in Africa?
What did Batman say to Robin before they hop on the Batmobile?
What do you call a sad suicidal bird?
What do you call a black man when he is sitting in the cockpit controlling an airplane?
You know why I want to call you Yoda?
How do Emo kids reward themselves?
What do Brooklyn and tight jeans have in common?
What did the polite bacteria say to the mouth?
Whats the most common breakfast in Africa?
Did you hear about the new Christian online video game?
Do you know how long it's been since I've had an erection?
How did the scottsman find the sheep in the tall grass?
What do you have when life gives you melons?
Do you like to draw?
Who was the first Mexican to be knighted by the Queen?
How do historians know that Joseph wasn't Jesus' dad?
What's the difference between juice and cider?
Whats the most obvious feature shared by a leprechaun and a sober Irishman?
What's the best part of divorce?
What's the #1 horror movie in the far east ?
Where did Jewish Rats go during the Holocaust?
Why don't people like to play uno with Mexicans?
why did they invent white chocolate?
Why was the criminal's argumentative essay so good?
How did the Neanderthal dad teach his son how to wear underwear?
What do you call a used rubber in a church parking lot?
What's the difference between a hold-up and a stick-up?
What's the difference between Navy SEAL training and Boy Scout camp?
How does a gay male take off his condom?
What do you call a corn cob on a track team?
Anyone wanna buy any budgies?
What do you call a piece of pasta that doesn't have any friends?
What kind of bees make milk instead of honey?
Anyone got a clean, long joke?
What's difference between good weed and good pussy?
What do you call a cunt squared?
Why was the mushroom a hit at parties?
What do you call it when cosine plays?
What is worse than a dead baby in a garbage bag?
What do you call a hippie with a business major?
How do you know when your gf is getting fat?
What did Ernie say to Bert when he asked for ice cream?
How do you know your GF is getting fat?
What's Whitney Houston's favorite type of co-ordination?
What do you call an autistic kid that accidentally ate a pot brownie?
What is my ex girlfriend's favorite hands on day in math class?
Whats another name for google glass?
What do you call a redneck with two sheep?
What do you get if you steamroll a crab and a Korean at the same time?
What's the shittiest day of the week?
Where does Sean Connery shit?
Did you hear about the new nightclub that opened called "Erectile Dysfunction"?
How do you stop a nigger from raping a girl?
Q:How do you tell the time in Antarctica?
Why ebola medicine doesn't work in Africa?
What do you call?
Why do I like sweet potatoes?
What do you get when you cross a bungee cord with an owl??
Why are astrophysicists always nervous before they launch a new satellite?
How many dead babies can you fit in a phone booth?
How does a fetus like it's amniotic fluid?
Why do we say dogs are man's best friend? Why not say dogs are man's and woman's best friend?
Why did lawyers support the bill to legalize gay marriage?
What is the poo from a fish with no dad called?
Why can't Casper have kids?
What was the black guys reaction to the 3/5ths compromise?
How do ghosts like their chicken cooked?
Why can't a ghost get anyone pregnant?
Why did the Vampire's girlfriend break up with him?
What grows on Seasame Street?
What do you call a bad hairdresser who is also very expensive?
Why do people say love is like chemistry?
What did one tonsil say to the other?
What is the similarity between poop and aliens?
What is an apt gift for a female porn star that collects vintage comic books?
Why do we carve pumpkins for Halloween?
How do you tell a domesticated cat from a wild one?
HALLOWEEN JOKE: Why don't witches ever have babies?
Why can't ghosts have sex?
Why did the golfer bring an extra pair of pants?
What is the rapper's favorite bread?
What's the biggest difference between a crayon and your ex?
Whats the difference between a snowman and a snow woman?
Can someone tell me that Johnny go deeper joke from 15 years ago?
Want to read my favorite dirty Jewish word?
Did you hear about the guy who had sex with his car?
Have I told you about my vacation to Oklahoma?
What's the difference between a kidney bean and a chickpea?
What's another name for a "penis potato"?
How much is the bare minimum?
Why are women so odd?
How do you tell a joke about ISIS?
Guys, I think I just came up with a new joke! Why don't they drill holes in golf clubs?
Why did the groom ask his bride to wear white?
hear about the gay indian?
Why are hours gay?
what are you getting your wife for her birthday?
What kind of karate do Rabbis know?
When are the hiest's coming out?
What do you get when you cross a Mexican with an octopus?
What would George Washington do if he were alive today?
What do you do with 100 peaches?
Why did the John leave the Brothel?
Did you hear about the plane crash in Poland?
How do you turn a computer into a zombie?
How come Jews run the world?
Why did the skeleton cross the road?
What did the chicken say ?
What did a constipated Watson tell Sherlock?
Want to hear an ebola joke?
What do you do when you see an upside down dolphin?
Did you hear about the furry who got detained at the border?
How do you fit 20 Jews in a Cadillac?
Want to hear another joke about Ebola?
Pain Pills?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl going to the bathroom?
What is the most deadliest breakfast?
What is a priest's favorite guitar chord?
What's the difference between the IRS and a baby?
Why dont blind people go skydiving?
How do you tell the difference between a meth head and a hillbilly?
Hey, Gandalf! What is it that bats can do but badgers can't?
Why did the kid cross the playground?
What's green and smells like red paint?
What do you call peanuts in space?
Did you ever wonder what the Para in ParaOlympic stood for?
Did you hear the one about the donkey and the sloth?
Why is it called taking a shit?
WHY CAN'T YOU BE LIKE THAT?
Why do I always sit in the back of an airplane?
What's the difference between a snowman and snow-women?
Why did Jimmy get into a horrific car accident?
What does a Mexican wizard use to cast magic?
Innuendos?
What did onlookers say to the Wright Brothers as they took off?
Why did the little tugboat do what all of the other tugboats told him to do?
What did the host of an orgy say to his guests?
Did you hear about Elon Musk's X in Virginia?
What do you call a phallic music scale, crushed under a piano?
What do Africans want to be for Halloween?
Why are elements attracted to the Noble Gasses?
How many religious people does it take to change a light bulb?
Why do blonde girls have bruises around their belly buttons?
What do you call it when a jaeger licks your butthole?
What do you call a pessimistic clone?
What do ISIL and Little Miss Muffet have in common?
What is Obama's last name?
What workplace benefit do ebola quarantine nurses receive?
Did you hear Nicky Minaj was admitted to hospital?
Why does Barbie never get pregnant........?
Why couldnt the NSA whistle blower leave russia?
What do you call a nomadic caveman?
What did the square say to the blob?
Where could you look up Joan of Arc's profile?
What's an African's least favorite appetizer?
What kind of education does a horny mathematician impart?
What gives a ghost the right to haunt people?
You know what seems odd to me?
Why does Barbie like Halloween?
Why did the puppeteer get out of jail?
Why is it so difficult for women to find a man who is sensitive, caring, and good looking?
What kind of cake does a baseball player prefer?
What is the fastest cake in the world?
Why do Russians love Pho so much?
what do you call a chav in a box?
Why was Darth Vader so ugly?
What' the difference between Adolf Hitler and Lance Armstrong?
What do you call a midget psychic that escaped prison?
What do you call a Frosty's prostitute?
What is it called when an exchange student goes to Malaysia?
What is it like to eat out an old grandma?
Did you hear about the man who did it with a parakeet?
What's a panda's favourite drink?
Why don't quantum physicists have sex?
How do you clean a condom?
What do you call it when you poop and masturbate at the same time?
What kind of car does a pirate drive?
What is Forrest Gumps password?
What's the difference between a bus station and a lobster with breast implants?
What does an unborn fetus and a tube of toothpaste have in common?
What do you call a drug addict that's allergic to heroin?
What do you call a psychic dwarf running from the law?
What is long, green, and smells like bacon?
What do you call a midget psychic on the run from the bunko squad?
Why did the man put condoms on his ears during sex?
What do you call a psychic, escape convict who is also a dwarf?
How does a crackhead order their whiskey?
What does the old Nazi call his favorite reclining chair?
Why do chefs put so much effort into baking cakes?
How many countries' flags make an appearance at every auto race in the world?
What do you call a clairvoyant dwarf that recently broke out of prison?
When does one plus one equal three?
What did the athletic trainer say to the body builder who was allergic to protein powder?
Did you hear about the midget psychic who escaped from prison?
What are the odds of an anorexic girl joining the clergy?
Why did the eyeglasses model become a beekeeper?
Wanna hear a joke about a stupid person?
How many babies does it take to paint a wall??
What do you call an anti-diuretic wine?
Why do technicolor pigs have great breath?
What is the proper definition of indefinitely?
What kind of dog did Dracula have?
You know what the best part about having sex with twenty three year olds is?
How do you start an Ethiopian rave?
What's the difference between me and a dentist?
How do you say virgin in German?
Why is Thor's brother always overlooked?
Why do they call them rapeseeds?
whats the deal with shemales?
Kid: Mommy, mommy! Can I lick the bowl?
What's the difference between a large pizza and an art student?
What do you call a Canadian pimp?
What do you call a vampire that eats period blood?
What do you call a French man wearing sandals?
What do English pirates call each other?
What couldn't the lifeguard save the hippie?
What did the African have for breakfast?
You guys hear about the guy that went bowling in NY after he came back from West Africa?
Why should you never bring your Pokemon cards into the washroom with you?
Did you hear about the statistician's party?
what do you call chicken shawarma wrapped in a tortilla?
Whats the difference between an Irish wedding and an Irish funeral?
What do you call a really bad sausage?
Wanna know something odd?
What do you call and Irishman who works in a French cafe?
What is the difference between a Ferrari and 4 dead babies?
Whats the odd one out ?
What did the suicidal college student say to his room mate?
How many months have 28 days?
What is a pessimists blood type?
What's the difference between a dead baby and my ex-girlfriend?
What kind of poker do stoner cows play?
Why is the peanut crying?
A joke I made up when I was high: Why is it good to know someone who kicks ducks in the face?
What's 6.9?
What's the difference between a microwave and anal?
Why did the pirate have to change wenches?
What do you call an Asian woman with one leg?
What do you call a Chinese guy when he's laughing?
What do you call a Japanese Transvestite?
What's the difference between a Maine girl and a moose?
Where is a pirates favorite place to shop for toys?
What's the difference between a pizza and a gym teacher?
What do you call a paraplegic with Ebola?
What do you call suicide committed while shitting?
What do you call your ex-girlfriend in Maryland?
What do you get when you cross a joke with a rhetorical question?
What is a rapists favourite vegetable?
How do you know you can't trust doctors and lawyers?
What does a data scientist do after an heavy lunch?
What do Sea Monsters eat?
What do you call an epileptic having a fit in a deck-chair?
What's black and sits at the top of a staircase?
What's the difference between a green bean chickpea?
Have you heard of the new constipation movie?
Why did the hipster drown in the lake?
What does a buffalo says to his son before going to school?
why do ghosts like elevators?
What's the strongest plant in the world?
What the NSA say to NASA?
Did you hear about the man who took so much LSD he started spontaneously speaking Italian?
What kind of an erection does a necrophiliac get?
what do you call a rock group with no bassist, drummer, singer or guitarist?
Why is Jewish apple cake Jewish?
What do you call two midgets giving each other oral sex?
If you screwed up something in a science lab, who do you tell?
What Did The Egg Say To the Boiling Water?
Remember when you used to blow bubbles as a kid?
What do you get when you drop a Piano on an army base?
I’ve often wondered, how do devout Christians handle being raped?
You know how Hitler picked up hot Jewish girls?
What do you call a pall bearer in Oklahoma?
What's a lumberjacks favorite animal?
A man dies in the desert next to a rock. How did he die?
Did you hear about the teenager who got his arm pulled off?
Why will the next IPhones be the hottest best selling phones?
Did you hear that France changed their flag?
What did the old Frankish barbarians say to the Roman invasion?
Why did the guy gay go to prison?
What would you do if someone is choking?
What do you call a liver transplant?
What's the difference between Whitney Houston and a black widow?
Why did the hipster burn their tongue?
Why are gays never really supressed?
What do the Green Bay Packers and Monica Lewinsky have in common?
What did Oscar Pistorius say when his cellmate asked him how he ended up in prison?
Why did the woman miss the spaghetti train?
Did you hear about the window installer with two penises?
What does your mom and my fantasy football team have in common?
What do old cars and dead chickens have in common?
Who is the most musical Canadian heroine?
What did the angry Indian man say at the bakery?
What do you call a lonely orator?
Why do I have to say please when I ask for a sandwich at a restaurant?
whats the difference between a woman and a computer ?
What do asian cannibals eat?
What does a blonde woman is doing with her ear bonded to the wall ?
What do you call Batman when he leaves church early?
What do you call an Asian getting mugged?
Why did the stair railing give money to Beethoven?
Whats the difference between a mosquito and a hooker?
What's Vatican City's national animal?
Why didn't the rock make it to work today?
What do you call a bovine beauty pageant winner?
Why is Microsoft coming out with a windows 10 instead of 9?
What joke has sebadoh for a punch line?
What's the difference between my ex girlfriend and ebola?
Did you hear about the communist nymphomaniac?
Where do noobs live in Iceland?
Why did the football go to the bank?
What do you call a cow with 3 legs?
What has 3 thumbs and was born near a nuclear power plant?
What do you call 5 black people having sex in the 1800's?
How do you measure the molar mass of guacamole?
Why did the Soviet union fail?
Did you hear about the outbreak of Urinary Tract Infections at the University of Texas?
What sex position produces the ugliest offspring?
What do you call a pair of snakeskin trousers?
What is it called when a turtle is mentally retarded?
What did they call Hitler after he lost his hair?
What do you call a 5'10" fortune teller parked in the middle of a divided highway?
Why were all of the other fish calling the shark gay?
Did you hear about the man who was to amputate a foot?
What does a cannibal drink for breakfast?
What did one Jew say to the other Jew?
Has anyone seen the trailer for the latest Tom Cruise movie?
Did you hear Kony is raising up another army?
What do you call and autistic child caught in a house fire?
How do bunny rabbits like their beer brewed?
You hear about these new trains that can burn any organic matter for fuel?
Why can't Nietzsche use pencils?
Why Did the Ebola Patient Cross the Road?
How do you separate Greek men from Greek boys?
Why was the gangster sick after going to west Africa?
Where do people with Ebola go when they die?
Have you heard about the tragedy of Canada?
What do you call a 5' 2" fortune teller that has escaped from prison?
(All credit goes to my 4 year old niece) How many tickles does it take to make an octopus laugh?
What kind of alcohol gets stuck in your head for days?
What is worse than 7 babies nailed to a tree?
Why is Rosie O'Donell fat?
Why do they eat snails in France?
What do you call a conversation with your professor when you are blown?
What was the name of the lumberjack in Al-Quaida?
How is a teacher like a hooker?
Has anyone seen the new Ebola video ?
Why could Frankenstein's Monster not have children?
What do you call an innovation in scissors?
What did the sophisticated cow say in response to another cow's joke?
Why don't chickens wear pants?
How do you build a flea circus?
What does a farmer do at a strip club?
What do vegan cannibals eat?
What was Thriller really about?
(SPOILERS) Guess what show I did NOT want to watch after the latest Walking Dead?
What are your go to jokes?
Did you know that Lorena Bobbit was originally from Russia?
How many accident-prone people does it take to change a lightbulb?
How can you tell when a Software Developer is an extrovert ?
You've probably heard of Davy Jones' locker, but do you know who Davy Jones is?
What do hillbillys do on Halloween?
How do you make two Oboists play in tune with one another?
Why was Pluto's child unexpected?
What did the fresh egg say to the boiling pot of water?
What's the worst thing about banging a girl with a cold heart?
What do you do if you step on a landmine?
What business are you in?
You know whats sad?
Ever been to the restaurant owned by the fundamentalist church?
Have you heard the joke about Ebola yet?
Where is the best place to vacation for Halloween?
The difference between sex and pumpkin carving?
How many Germans does it take to screw in a Lightbulb?
What does a Polish bride get on her wedding night that's long and hard?
Why is Iron Man Italian?
What did the french chef say when the cheese factory exploded?
Why did the man throw duck food at Nurse Jackie?
What's Michael Jackson's favorite thing about twenty-eight year olds?
What do you call a french soul singer?
Did you hear what they named the plane that carried nurse #1 to Maryland?
What do you call it when strippers hold a fundraiser for the tattooing arts?
What are the sexiest farm animals?
Why do Russians like pho so much?
Why do soviet policemen travel in groups of three?
What are ducks' favorite drug?
What's the difference between a pedant and a sadist?
Why did the agnostic receive a lighter sentence?
Oh, Obama's credit card was declined?
What did the West African boy eat for breakfast?
Was my French teacher into golden showers?
why did they bury liberace face down?
How do skateboarders see?
What is the strictest part of a ship?
What do you call an 80s band comrpising of only fruit?
Why did the ghosts haunt the bar?
What does it sound like when a pterodactyl uses the bathroom?
Did you hear about the man who died at the spaghetti factory?
How can you tell if a package is gay?
Why didn't Steven jobs get treated for cancer?
What is cat's favourite tea?
Does anyone want to buy a broken yo-yo?
How did the girlfriend satisfy her secretly gay boyfriend?
What would Abraham Lincoln say if he found out there was a movie about him slaying vampires?
What's a pedophile's favorite musical score?
Why did Hitler's Bed'n Breakfast fail?
You wanna know how slow iOS 8 runs on my iPhone 4s?
What happens when a vampire drinks too much?
What is a Muslim's Favorite Dinosaur???
Did you hear there was a stick up on the bridge?
Will you have sex with me for a million dollars?
What's the worst thing about 90's kids?
Why did the pigeon hate the crow?
Did you hear about the man who drank bug spray?
What do white girls and web developers have in common?
What did the dyslexic Satanist do?
What do you call sex with a black person?
What's the difference between an Irishman and a bottle of whiskey?
What is the difference between a laddie and a lady?
What is the difference between a Pro-life girl and a Pro-choice girl?
What is Jamaican Pikachu's favorite dance?
What's the difference between Italian and Polish sausage?
Why did the psych ward escapee never get married?
What is it a volcano has which gives him trouble erupting?
What do you call a man who supports women's sports?
Is Kevin Bacon popular on Reddit?
What do you call a chronic masturbaiter in Turkey?
Did you hear about the guy with the invisible dick?
What's the difference between a Canadian woman and a moose?
Why did the Jew prefer to sleep in the dark?
What's the best thing about fucking a transsexual?
Why was the pianist arrested?
What does Michael Jackson and Santa Clause have in common?
What do you call the hair between your grandmas boobs?
What's red and has 7 dents?
What's the difference between fish and meat?
What do you do to a dog that doesn't obey your commands?
What time does Sean Connery show up at Wimbledon every year?
What is Hitler's favorite letter in the alphabet?
What gets a gold digger off?
What kind of native American is Nikki Minaj?
Where did the one legged waitress work?
Why was the lazy-eyed man a horrible teacher?
Why does Batman wear a mask?
What is Superman when he removes his suit?
What did the wise man say to the fat guy?
What do plums and bunnies have in common?
Who is the hardest person to find in hide and seek?
What do you call a Scottsman with a sniper rifle?
When does it rain money?
How are babies and strippers alike?
What does a lonely Sean Connery building IKEA products say?
What do you call a sick bird of prey that enters the country without permission?
Clean - What do you do if you see a spaceman?
What's the quickest way to make nine million dollars?
What comes after Ebola?
What are the odds of a chronic gambler ever calling the addiction-helpline?
What cell phone service do Stormtroopers use?
What do you get if you group 8 sodium atoms together?
What did the New Yorker order from the Liberian waitress?
What is H.P. Lovecraft's cook book called?
what kind of knife is used to perform female circumcision?
What's black and white and red all over and can't get through a revolving door?
Who lives there?
What do you call a frenchman in the World Cup Final?
Where do pirates go after they are thrown out of Kansas?
What is the definition of torque?
Why did the Amish girl get kicked out of the community?
What is the media of choice for the mallard?
Why was the Jew afraid to eat the pizza?
What's the difference between you and mallard with a cold?
Is it a blow job or a blowjob?
Why do people like office parties AND this joke?
Where does a tugboat go when it feels sick?
Was Billy Idol?
There are 5 flies in the kitchen, which one is the cowboy?
Do you believe in love at first sight?
Did you her about the boy that was born without any eyelids?
did you hear about the guy with five penises?
What's the difference between Rob Ford and a circus sideshow freak?
What do you call two beer drinkers arguing about sea turtles?
Did you hear about the lumberjack who was looking oking for help?
What do you call a woman in Thailand?
Why's the camel considered the submarine of the desert?
What made Gandalf spend most of his time in the Shire at brothels?
What food is given to ebola patients?
What do you call something that protects your fucking cock during sex?
Why are camels called the ships of the desert?
How many stones does it take to kill 3 birds?
Why did Microsoft name their new operating system Windows 10?
What do you do if your girlfriend starts smoking?
What does the skeleton say when ganking bot lane?
What greek letter is always sad?
Women, eh?
How Many Friend Zoned Men Does It Take To Screw In A Lightbulb?
Why did they have to put Michael Jackson down?
How much lube do you need for anal?
Did you hear about the crazy Mexican train thief?
How do you know if someone has run a marathon?
How many letters can you wear on your feet?
What do you call an IT teacher who touches up his students?
Why did the monks go to the casino?
What did the guy say after he finished jacking off?
Who lives in a hut with a couple pieces of trash and two grains of rice?
What do you give a teenage girl who can't even?
How does a women make you a millionaire?
How do you kill 15 flies at once?
Did you hear about the Leper going for the masturbation world record?
Wanna hear a joke about Alzheimer's?
In honor of The Walking Dead returning, What do zombie cows crave?
What is the best stand-up routine of our time?
Why didn't the scarecrow want dessert?
What do Ebola patients eat?
Why can't you keep Jews in jail?
Did you hear about the anxious gynaecologist?
What's the difference between a zombie and a redneck?
Did you hear the one about the shrimp throwing a fit?
What happens when you have sex with a cow and no one catches you?
What do you call a carnivore get-together?
What's the difference between a priest and acne?
What does the perverted frog say?
What type of condoms does Ronald McDonald use?
Why couldn't the life guard save the hippy?
How do Christians eat their icecream?
What does a zombie conductor say?
Did you hear about the patriotic zombie who wanted to serve his country?
What do you call smutty pictures of birds?
What's the the key to telling an ISIS joke?
what did the pirate do after his parrot bit off his genitals?
What was the bear's favourite pick-up line?
Who's got two thumbs and dissociative identity disorder?
What did the noble gas sound like when he laughed?
What kind of degrees do slaves get in college?
What do you call a gay guy paralyzed from the neck down?
What did the romaine say to the spinach before they started to eat?
What's my favorite pirate workout and cereal?
What's the difference between a School and an ISIS training ground?
What did they call Ebola before the Internet?
Why did Saul want to kill Christians?
What do you get when you put human DNA into a donkey?
What the worst part about pulling a hair clump from the drain of the apartment you just moved into?
What was Charles Dickens' favourite experimental pop album?
What is a mortician's favorite side dish?
Why does the mermaid wear seashells?
Que es eso?
Why can't random men check random women's breasts for cancel?
What do you call it when a golfer misses the hole?
What do you call a Russian ninja?
Why don't ghosts play sports?
Where do animals go when they lose their tails?
did you hear about the Indian restaurant that ran out of bread?
What do you call an orthodox jew that is prone to heartburn?
What is a tampon's favorite food?
What did the kid with no arms and no legs get for Christmas?
Who makes more money, a prostitute or a crack dealer?
How are ninjas and soft core porn alike?
What do you call an Asian guy with a great work ethic?
Where do baby soy beans come from?
Q: What is your least favorite force of nature?
What does a blonde do first thing in the morning?
How much does Nicki Minaj sell security devices for?
How did Sarah Palin see Russia from her house?
Did you hear about the carnival fires?
What did one gay man say to the other gay man in the gay bar?
How do you tell the difference between an electrician and an electrical engineer?
How do Japanese people refer to American politicians?
Why did Sally fall down the hill?
How do you know a soprano is at the door?
What is, aside from being rubber, the similarity between an old car tire and 365 used condoms?
Why did Helen Keller play the piano with one hand?
Are you the date?
Why is six afraid lf seven?
What did the Buffalo say to his son that was leaving for College?
What is the difference between a crackhead and a walrus?
Why can't Helen Keller use an iPhone?
How did the Hulk's mind blow?
What did Davy Crockett say when he looked over The Alamo wall and saw 5,000 Mexican Soldiers?
What did the moon say to the window?
What kind of car does a Japanese chef drive?
Why does a chicken coupe only have two doors?
what sex position makes an ugly baby???
What do you call a gay geologist?
What's the difference between a women's track team and a group of midgets playing chess?
What do you call a blond standing on her head?
what's the difference between a cross-eyed hunter and a constipated owl?
Why did they kick Raggedy Anne out of the toybox?
What's the difference between a psychotic mental patient and a man with a bible in his hand?
Why are neutralization reations illegal?
What does Sean Connery wear to avoid the paparazzi?
What do you call a Russian road with a KFC and lots of prostitutes?
What do you call a Rastafarian Irishman?
Do you know why Jesus doesn't eat M&M's?
why did helen keller masturbate with one hand?
What is Forrest Gump's computer password?
What goes; green-red-green-red-green-red-green-red?
What do you call a street full of cheap hookers and a McDonald's?
Why was Hitler a pussy?
So... Do you like dragons?
Did you hear the one about the Rabbi who performed circumcisions?
How do you confuse Hellen Keller?
What was the slutty nurse looking for in October?
what do you call fake spaghetti?
What's red and is bad for your teeth?
What's the most dangerous weapon your wife can get her hands on?
Did you hear about the gay german?
What do a Chinese tourist who got run over by a bus and a lobster have in common?
Did you know how they found out that Dale Earnheart had dandruff?
Anyone else here able to spell "condescending narcissist" correctly on the first try?
How do you fit 20 Cubans in a shoebox?
What do you call titty fucking underwater?
Why does 7 have an odd sense of humor?
Whats the difference between a prostitute with chronic diarrhea and an epileptic oyster fisherman?
What's the difference between terrorists and tourists?
What is a goat's favourite form of comedy?
Why did everyone think the pie was gay?
Why was Han Solo dissapointed in his Blow Job from Princess Leia?
What do you call an agreeable neighbor?
What's big and green and sits in the corner?
How can you tell if a mechanic went home for lunch?
What did Rouge say just before murdering Crimison?
How many Christians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about the kid that became a paraplegic?
What do Dale Earnhardt and Pink Floyd have in common?
Why did the ebo(l)la patient yell?
Where does light go when it is convicted of a crime?
Why did the dolphin commit suicide?
Did you hear about the Egyptian boatman who refused to believe his craft was sinking?
Did you hear about the man that flashed three nuns?
What's the best way to organize your cakes, muffins, and hamburger buns?
What key opens a banana?
What's the difference between a feminist and an archangel that dislikes Biblical prophets?
What do you call a fat guy who jumps around buildings?
What nipple did the UFO crash land on?
What was Jean-Paul Sartre's favorite art form?
What are your best Sports Team jokes?
What do you call a man with a rubber toe?
How does Anthony Weiner like his meat?
What's the difference between a cook and a homo?
how can you tell if you have amnesia?
I'm half-French and half-American, but I know my heart is American, do you know why?
How do Batman's parents call him to dinner?
What's one thing that a beautiful woman and a jar of peanut butter have in common?
What do you call a pachyderm that has nothing to do with the situation?
What's the difference between refrigerators and gay people?
What did the IT guy say to his wife after she complained about their love life?
What do you call a cow who is also a knight?
What are parents that you can see through?
What's the most efficient way to break up with someone?
How does Jesus like his meat?
Guido Mastrobatatti died when he hurt his arm? How?
How can you tell when you're in a bad strip club?
Whats the last letter in the alphabet?
What do these jokes and a ghost have in common?
How many french men does it take to conquer Paris?
What happens when you go to the bathroom scared?
Why are lazy farmers so great?
How many redditors does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about the terrorist on the talent show!?
What do you call a slutty potato chip?
What's the difference between Geno Smith and a porn star?
Why did the zombie move into a studio apartment?
What did the French guy say when he forgot to tell his driver to turn left?
What did the Bacon say to the Tomato?
What do you say if your peeing in Ireland and spot a leprechaun?
What did "O" said to "Q"?
What do you call a pig behind a car wheel?
Why should we call Indians Native Americans?
What do you call an apology written using dots and dashes?
How are dildos and tofu alike?
Did you hear about the new restaurant on the moon?
What do you get when you cross France and Britain?
How Many Dragonball Z Characters Does it Take to Screw in a Light-bulb?
How many cops does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What does a 12 year old redneck girl say when she loses her virginity?
were do animals go when their tails fall off?
How does a redhead shave his pubes?
How do you describe people who tell "I see dead people" jokes?
What do Jews and Snorlax have in common?
What do women and autistic people have in common?
What do Derek Jeter and girls' asses have in common?
What do women and pennies have in common?
What tastes great on pie but bad on pussy?
What Did The Hard Drive Get When It Wanted Data But Didn't Have The Resources?
How does Moses make Coffee?
What's a jewish man's favourite song?
What does Patrick Stewart say during tantric sex?
Why did the hipster burn his tung?
What did one ISIS member say to another?
How many Duggars does it take to screw a planet?
What's a transvestite's favorite candy?
Why is the new OS from Microsoft called Windows 10?
What is something that you never forget on a field trip?
Did you hear about Dictionary: The Musical?
What to brussel sprouts and anal sex have in common?
How can you tell if you're being persecuted by agnostics?
Why was Mr. Strawberry sad?
What do a tuna, a piano, and a pot of glue have in common?
What's the difference between Lance Armstrong and Adolf Hitler?
What do you call a prostitute's vagina?
Know how the iPhone 6+ was invented by men?
What's the best thing about North Korea?
What is the fluid capacity of Monica Lewinsky's mouth?
What is the difference between a polar bear and the World Series?
What does a fisherman say when he catches a fish?
Why does the spanish dude keep walking left?
Why did the lemon go sour?
What drug is most destructive with phones?
If women are people, why are they so stupid?
What did the left ass cheek say to the right ass cheek?
How did the Scottish man find the sheep in the tall grass?
Why will you never starve at the beach?
Did you hear they discovered a soda cavemen drank?
You hear about the dyslexic agnostic insomniac?
Why do I hear noises?
Why am I still hearing noises from the class?
What's the difference between a horse and a zebra?
How did Moses part the Red Sea?
What did the 3D Vector say after making a bad joke?
What's white and kills you if it gets in your eye?
What did Michael Jackson almost name his daughter?
What did one Muslim say to another in a supermarket?
What's the difference between a brothel and a circus?
What do you call a person with short-term memory loss?
Did you fall from Haven?
Today is national Radio day. Do you copy?
How do you get a homosexual man to have sex with a woman?
What do you call gay paraplegics?
Why are aroused campers so extreme?
Why do hunters close one eye when they aim?
Fred has 3 red balls and 5 blue balls in a bag. How many balls does Fred have?
What is Shakespeare's favourite snack?
Can Feburary March?
Why don't gay guys go to lesbian bars?
do all girls make poopy?
What do you call it when 4 giraffes collide?
Why does the speech impaired baker say he got fired?
Did you hear about that cheese factory that exploded in France??
How do we know Jesus turned water into wine at parties?
What did the one eyed thief, with a hook for a hand, call the elven princess?
How long did it take the fish to go to the store?
Why didn't the sailors play cards on the deck?
Why does homemade bread not make your throat itch?
Why did the blonde girlfriend's bellybutton hurt?
What does a Middle-Eastern person eat for breakfast?
Why are crosses not in fashion?
What did the Calvinist say after he fell down the stairs?
What's the difference between a walrus and a vagina?
What Time Is It?
What do iPhones eat for breakfast?
What's Dracula's favorite beer?
What do you call a guy from China who is confused?
What is the dirtiest day of the week?
What's the name of that movie about the war horse?
Why is a woman lie a hurricane?
Hey, did you hear about the kidnapping?
What did batman tell robin before they got in the car?
What does a food lover do when they try a new food?
What do you call it when you drown a baby in soda?
what would Arnold Schwarzenegger say if he was a member of Al Qaeda?
How Many Kids With A.D.D Does It Take To Screw In A Lightbulb?
Do you like Asian Diplomacy jokes?
What is better than coming second in the Special Olympics?
If storks bring babies, what kind of bird doesn't bring any babies?
Why do bees stay in their hive during Winter?
What is white and square?
How many midgets does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does a psychologist wear to bed?
What do you do to an Islamic dog that barks too much?
What does a barista wear?
You know the difference between Catholics and Baptists?
What does one lesbian pirate say to another lesbian pirate?
Why did the cat fall into the well?
How do NASA organize a party?
Why did the blonde have lipstick all over her steering wheel?
Do you want to know where the best place to buy drugs is?
Why did the dead baby cross the road?
What do you call a flea on the moon?
Why did the hobbit go vegan?
What do you call a mexican with no legs?
Why do African casinos always go out of business?
Did you know Princess Di had dandruff?
Have you guys heard of the movie constipation?
Do you know what the difference between pink and purple is?
Why do Canadians do it doggy style?
Why can't black people be virgins?
Where did the "what's updog?" joke come from?
How can you tell if lunch meat is from West Virginia?
Ebola is in Dallas?
Why did Microsoft skip from Windows 8 to 10?
Easy way to earn karma points on /r/jokes?
What's the difference between a fruit and a vegetable?
Why do Europeans hate American food?
What do you call batman when he misses church?
Did you hear the one about the guy who got two tickets to the Cuckold Convention?
Why did the amoeba flunk the math test?
How much do dirty deeds cost again?
Why has Mexico never won olympic gold?
How did the mathematician get rid of his constipation?
Want to hear a joke about a man suffering from constipation?
Do you know The perfect system to avoid condom accident ?
Guy: Can I buy you a drink?
What do you call a professional skittles player on the internet with a life-threatening disease?
Why is the next Windows version 10?
What's the Italian version of Preparation-H?
Why did the man with a stammer never get out of jail?
What did Dr. Frankenstein say when his monster showed up for the ball?
What did Abe Lincoln say when he was arrested?
What do you call a laughing mayonnaise?
Why is the new version called Windows 10?
What do you call a know-it-all Mexican?
How many college guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
So why is the latest Windows OS called 10?
Why don't native Americans like snow?
What's black and white and goes on eight wheels?
Why did Microsoft skip to Windows 10?
Why did Adrian Peterson sign with the Minnesota Twins?
What Operating System does a Redditor use?
You know why people insisted on calling the Higgs Boson for "the God particle"?
Why is there no Windows 9?
Why did Microsoft jump from Windows 8 to Windows 10?
Why is #Windows10 releasing before nine?
What do you can a pessimistic antelope?
What do you get when you cross a lima bean with a Soviet?
What does an 80 yr old lady have between her tits that an 18 yr old woman doesn't have?
What was eating away at the computer's RAM storage?
[OC] Hey, Reddit. Wanna hear a joke about a defective condom?
Why is it called the 3/5 compromise?
What color does your skin turn when you pour molten gold onto it?
What's the difference between a black man and batman?
What is the name of your Russian coworker you see the next day?
What do you call a Batman that skips church?
Do you know what the difference between a chickpea and a garbanzo bean is?
In what direction do five gay guys walk?
Wanna hear a joke about potassium?
Why did Jesus go to a Candy shop?
What's worst than a dead baby in a trash can?
Why did Anakin Skywalker cross the road?
Why can you not hear a pterodactyl go to the bathroom?
Is that a tongue ring?
Why were there no black people in the Flintstones?
Why was the little mountain dying?
What kind of woman are the most irrational?
Whats the difference between a zombie and baby?
Are you saying that if I shoot you with a pistol, you won't get hurt?
[Bad joke] How does a Marine like his eggs?
What did Hitler smoke?
What's the difference between a dead prostitute and a Ferrari?
What is the tastiest liquid in a fruit?
[warning: Dad joke] What country has the most internet crimes?
Hey, want to play the rape game?
What is green and slimy and smells like bacon?
Why did the koala fall out of the tree?
Why do Computer Scientists always mix up Halloween and Christmas?
[OC] What do you call a Latino on a bike?
Why can't the bicycle stand on its own?
Why are there only 49 Miss Black America contestants?
Are you feeling sluggish and tired? Constantly yawning throughout your day?
What's ET short for...?
Why do so many lunatics have ear infections?
What did Tony Abbott (Prime minister of Australia) do with the half-eaten banana?
Did you hear about the barefoot bridegroom?
Are humans closer to the size of an atom or the Earth?
What kind of soup do men have after sex?
How do you get a baby into a shoebox?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac with an agnostic and a dyslexic?
Did you hear Donald Sterling is having a child?
What do you call your disabled study-buddy?
Want to hear a joke about black people?
Did you hear about the Chinese guy who sued his wife for giving him ugly children?
How do you make an epileptic dance?
What time do philosophers like to visit the shopping mall?
What's the main problem with Wookie steaks?
What do Yoko Ono and African children have in common?
Why did the thalidomide man get stopped going through customs?
Did you guys hear about the fight in the bathroom?
Why is the all-seeing eye the symbol of the occult?
Which gospel contains Jesus' parable about the shades of numbers?
Why is Oedipus against profanity?
Did you hear the score of the Germany Vs Ethiopia game?
What do you call a kitten crying on the grass in the back yard?
A skink and a skunk had a baby what did they call it?
Do you know what one ocean said to the other ocean?
Why doesn't the postal worker's wife have sex with him on his day off?
What do you call it when an amputee does Karate?
How was the Grand Canyon created?
Why did the dick go to 7-11?
What do you get when you mix human DNA with zebra DNA?
What do Pink Floyd and Princess Diana have in common?
Where can i learn the skyrim dovah language and daedric too?
Which is an Islamic trait?
What is the difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
Ever had a yellow snowcone?
What is jon snow's favourite slang?
What do you call a Spanish soccer player with no legs?
What is the difference between Spiderman and Superman?
Why does sweden have so many somalis?
How bacteria stay in contact while they're in jail?
How can you tell if your "designer clothes" are made in China?
Which purse runs from the law?
You know what's messed up to find at the bottom of a jar of mayonnaise?
Have you ever played AD Soraka?
If you take the D out of Devil what do you get?
What do you do if you are driving your car in central Manhattan and you see a space man?
How did little Hitler tie his shoes?
Why is Man Utd's chemistry lacking?
why did the bird-shit did not fall on the man standing under the tree right under the parrot?
How did Kanye West ask Kim Kardashian to marry him ??
How did Hitler like his orange juice?
What do a common garbage can and Leonardo DiCaprio have in common?
What's black and runny?
How do polish people show gratitude?
What would you call an EDM producer on a flagpole?
What do I get when u heat up sour cream?
Why do they make condoms with ribs?
What do a redneck divorce and a burning meth lab have in common?
What is a jew's favourite bread?
What do you call the reasoning behind mexican murderers?
Did you hear the one about Stevie Wonder?
How do you spot a blind man at a nude beach?
How do you kill a one legged Fox?
How do you call people that are always squinting at you?
What is a chiropractor's favorite chemical element?
What's the difference between a rooster and a prostitute?
Did you see the frog perform in the opera last night?
Q. How do you make a dead baby float?
How do you poison a hipster?
What did the collard green do when his favorite song came on the radio?
What did Japan say when it heard the US had an atomic bomb?
What do you call Keanu Reeves when he served under Hitler?
Wanna hear a Joke?
Did you hear about the new mobile dating app for pedophiles?
Did you hear about the angry pancake!?
Why did the crowd watch the man futily attempt to blend oil and water for hours on end?
What was Roe v. Wade really about?
What's the best part about living in Switzerland?
What's the difference between love and herpes?
What do you call someone who sings about mints?
What do you get if you cross history and a cow?
Which space on a Battleship grid guarantees victory?
What does a tornado and a redneck divorce have in common?
Two Scottish cows in a field, what one is on holiday?
what version of Windows does Jesus use?
What do you call a white duck?
Why do blondes have more fun?
Whats the difference between Jesus and a painting of Jesus?
How long does it take Putin to give his car an oil change?
Why did jesus take 3 days to resurrect?
What's the difference between the Foo Fighters and Nickleback?
Have you heard about all the decapitations happening in the Middle East right now?
How do mathematicians cure constipation?
Three men walk into a bar, what's missing?
Have you heard about the new IPhone 6?
What's 6" long, bent to the left, and in the front of my pants??
Have you heard about the pussy that opens beer bottles?
What do you call an Irishman sitting on your veranda?
Why did the trout go to med school?
What happened to the Pope when he went to mount Olive?
Why did the elephant paint his balls green?
What STD does a hip black man get?
What's the difference between a nuclear reactor and a woman?
How many cops does it take to push a black guy down the stairs?
The difference between an European that feels fat and an American that feels the same?
What do you call a computer that only plays sad songs?
What did Abraham Lincoln say after a three-day drinking spree?
What do you call an illegitimate fish who crapped itself?
Why did the Rabbi stop buying beer?
Why do soccer players not play in the rain?
What do you use to check your cell from across the room?
Did you hear about the Nirvana tribute act?
Glass coffins - will they catch on?
What is the worst kind of vegetable to run a country?
How do you keep a blonde waiting?
Why did the terrorist's post make it to the front page of reddit?
What do you call a Dr. that shares your medical history with everyone?
What do you call a cheap cicumsicion?
How do you piss off thousands of people on the internet all at once?
What's the difference between a vacuum cleaner and a Harley Davidson?
What do you call a floating penis?
What do Vikings call the people that cut their hair?
Have you heard about the new wine from Israel?
Why do Zelda and Link smoke weed?
What separates the men from the boys?
What Do You Call a Terrible German Hot-dog Stand Owner?
One for the scientists of Reddit: What does a posh duck say?
Why did the jewish boy's ghost costume only have one eye hole?
Did you hear about the woman who gave birth in her 50's?
What's the difference between Jesus and Sasha Grey?
How do you make a pheromone?
Who do fish listen to when they want to hear some dubstep?
What's Hitler's favorite video game?
How many tickles does it take for an octopus to laugh?
What does one tectonics plate say to another after an earthquake?
If you wore corduroy to a job interview, what kind of an impression would you leave?
What do you call a tree if you don't know what kind of tree it is?
How do you know who in the room is a vegetarian?
What does a drama student do while stuck in math class?
What do you call five Mexicans on the bottom of a pool?
What is ISIS's favorite type of text?
What happened when the cow jumped over the barbed wire fence?
What do you call a zoo that only has one dog?
Why did Al Gore get nipple rings?
What will be after homo sapiens in evolution?
What do you call a group of rabbits, standing single file, hopping backwards?
Why do circumcised men lack Jedi brethren?
Who's the artist you find in the supermarket?
What did the fish say when it ran into a wall?
What do you call a flannel cat?
What do lesbians in Alaska sing?
What is the difference between my dick and my life?
Why can't witches get pregnant?
How do black people get tans at the beach?
What do you call a legless man at the beach during high tide?
What's the difference between a clever child and a rude marathoner?
What is Jasmine Tridevil's (girl with 3 boobs), favorite type of cake?
Did you hear about the court ruling on the grammar Nazi who did the double-murder?
What do you call Mike Tyson without any arms?
What do you call an army tow-truck?
What shakes at the bottom of the ocean?
Why did the picture plead innocent at the trial?
What do you call a bee that was born in the USA?
Have you ever gotten shampoo in your mouth while singing in the shower?
How did the astrologer cross the road?
How can you tell if a lesbian is butch?
Why do all kids with down syndrome look like they came from the same father?
What do you call a fish with three eyes?
Do I have any jokes about Sodium?
What did the buffalo say when his son left for college?
Whats the worst part about Crabgrass?
What do a piece of tuperware and a walrus have in common?
What do you call a man with a spade in his head?
What is Superman's favorite thing to eat for breakfast?
What do you call someone who hates browsing the web with Google?
What's wrinkly and hangs out your pants?
Why did Jack get a restraining order?
What's the difference between Swine flu, and Bird flu?
What does a duck and a bicycle have in common?
What does a gay guy call a sausage fest?
wanna hear a joke about my dick?
Has anybody ever seen the Grapefruit technique video?
Does the obama phone ring?
Why is Halloween a crackheads' favourite holiday?
What's the only living organ in a corpse?
Why can't bikes stand up on their own?
Why did god give Women legs?
How do you turn chicken masala into chicken marsala?
what does the chicken give you?
What do you call a watchful potato?
Do you know which End she was talking about?
What do you call a dog that goes through your stuff?
Did you hear about the fugitive midget psychic?
How do you keep a bunch of redditors in suspense?
What did Robin Williams do when he got to his office early?
What do you do when you're attacked by a group of clowns?
What's Alderaan's main export?
Do you know what you call a nickle and a penny?
Why does it take pirates so long to learn the alphabet?
The heart wants what it wants, y'know?
Why are gay guy's houses so clean?
What's it called when Batman leaves the church early?
How much do I use my new lamp?
Q:What happens when your GF illegally downloads a movie?
Why is it so hard to explain puns to kleptomaniacs?
What do you call a valley girl giving a blowjob for louis vuittons?
Did you hear the Vikings traded Adrian Peterson?
What do the French call a bad Thursday?
Did you know Captain Kirk has three ears?
What do you call a person who helps teach others to fart?
What do you call it when alpacas with speech impediments take over Earth?
What do you call a queer redneck?
What do you do for a frog with a belly ache?
What did the disgruntled alien customer say to the store clerk?
Why aren’t there any French Restaurants in Davy Jones’ Locker?
Have you heard Adrian peterson used to play baseball?
Why was the haunted mansion self conscious?
How do scientists celebrate Pirate Day?
How much do pirates pay for piercings?
What's the difference between a wide receiver and Ray Rice's wife?
What did the libertarian shirt say when it was thrown into the washing machine?
What did Luke Skywalker get for his 16th birthday?
The best pirate joke(in your best pirate voice): What is a pirates favorite letter?
What is a cat's favorite alcoholic beverage?
Why did the pirate with the eye patch drown?
What did the pirate say about the steering wheel in his pants?
What do gynecologists and pizza delivery drivers have in common?
What do you call the gay couple who are both named Bob?
What do fat people call the runs?
How do you make a cat go woof?
Where does a pirate keep his gold?
How would a pirate describe navigating Reddit on Talk like a Pirate Day?
What did the Pirate say on his birthday?
How do you know you're speaking with an engineer?
What do you call an Irish woman who stays out all night?
Did you see the guy who didn't have a right hand?
What's a pirates favorite place to eat?
What do Porsche and Apple have in common?
How do pirates know that they exist?
What's big, Scottish and depressing?
Did you hear Adrian Peterson is trying out for the MLB?
Why did the black chicken cross the road?
Heard of the man who banged an ATM?
Which antivirus program does a pirate use?
Why are Pirates pirates???
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Gary Glitter?
What is the difference between Will Smith and Scotland ?
what do you call female-to-male sexual reassignment surgery?
How many Scots didn't turn up to vote?
What has 200 teeth and holds back Godzilla?
What did the hobo say to the prostitute?
What type of jeans do the Mario Brothers wear?
What do you call a poodle that serves coffee?
Why does the boy could not bend his knees?
What's the hardest thing about being a vegan crossfitter who went to Harvard?
What did the recent Sunni convert says about ISIS?
Why is there so little Puerto Rican literature?
Why was the Human Torch arrested?
What's your favorite "I just hurt myself or messed up" phrase?
What do you call a zoo with only one dog in it?
What is an epileptics favourite food?
What do Nicki Minaj and Santa have in common?
What do you call a line of men waiting to get a hair cut?
Did you hear that Oxygen and Magnesium are dating?
Have you heard of the object without mass?
The most scientific pet?
What is 20 inches long and makes women scream at night?
How many Jihadists does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between spider man and superman?
what do you call a clan of barbarians you cant see?
Did you hear about the NASCAR driver who went the wrong way around the track?
What's Italian Alzheimer's sound like?
What is the good thing about Alzheimer's disease?
What was the pedophile's favourite drink?
What do you call two lesbians in a closet?
What did the cannibal do to his girlfriend?
Why are catholic priests so Eco-friendly?
why don't blondes make good cowgirls?
Why did the train go left?
What do they say about the blind prostitute?
what's for breakfast?
Who should of gotten asphalt?
what's the difference between a woman kneeling in prayer and a woman kneeling in a bathtub?
What's a horses' favorite hip-hop dance?
Did you hear about the lesbian couple who couldn't afford a double-headed dildo?
Why isn't anyone afraid of China?
Know how I know I am getting laid tonight...?
Why was the fisherman wealthy and prosperous?
Why do trees shed their leaves in fall?
How did Captain Hook die?
Which chemical compound are you most likely to find at a frat party?
What did the alphabet have before it took a shit?
Why did Bilbo Baggins die with a Erection?
What do you call an Italian with one arm?
What did the Jew say to the homeless man?
How do you shut an Italian up?
How do you know you're talking to a sales guy?
What do you call the debut of a new beer?
How many Mexicans does it take to change a light bulb.. ?
What Do you Call a Bowler that drops his ball a lot?
What is a dog's favorite candy?
What did the physicist say to the depressed hippy?
What do you call a hairpiece on an Asian guy?
Why aren't there any black magicians?
Why couldn't the glue hold the walls together?
Why did the dog feel insecure in her bathing suit?
How do you put a condom on a elephant?
Why was the Ancient Egyptian boy confused?
What did Jesus want when he appeared on a piece of toast?
What do you get when you take Viagra with an iron supplement?
What did Tennessee?
What happened when Jesus went to mount Olive?
What did the ant say when he walked into the insurance office?
Why did Bilbo Baggins live for so long?
What do you use to make boot soup?
What's the best thing about having sex with twenty six year olds?
Did you hear about the man from the experimental group that was arrested?
How Much Food did Soviet Ukraine Need in the Early 1930s?
Did you hear about the man who was dared to eat a spoonful of curry powder?
Why do Muslims hate Hitler?
what did cinderella do when she got to the ball?
why doesn't mexico have an olympic team?
How do you get an elephant into a Safeway?
Have you heard the joke about Whole Foods?
Who says German has no humor?
What do you call a Bull that masturbates?
Have you heard of the annual ginger meeting?
Did you guys here the Twins signed Adrian Peterson?
Why do nymphomaniacs like submarines?
Whats the ISIS members' astrological sign?
Junkie grandson : Grandma,grandma did you see my pills I left on the table ?
What do you call the next generation of motherboard?
Who does the Metric Cult worship?
Why did the Jedi kill his master?
Where do cars get the most flat tyres?
why does traditional Irish chili only have 239 beans in it?
What is ISIS' favourite file type?
What's small, round, and blue?
What do you call 12 enchiladas?
Why should you buy Adrian Peterson sun screen?
Why is it dark in Skeletor's castle?
What did the Physics professor say to the fat kid in school?
What did the author of The Lord Of The Rings say after he completed his books?
House do you know termites aren't lesbians?
What do you use to wipe off a table after breakfast?
What's the smallest thing in the universe?
How many perverts does it take to put in a light bulb?
What do you have to do to have beautiful hands?
Why is it so difficult to convict a redneck?
What is the flattest surface to iron your jeans on?
What are you looking for buddy?
Did you hear about the proctologists collectible Corvettes?
Did you here about the funny looking desert font?
What do you a pterodactyl that can't fly?
What's the difference between jesus and a picture of jesus?
Where do Chinese babies come from?
What do you say when a Canadian won't listen to you?
how many potatoes does it take to kill an Irishman?
Why is Ian Thorpe gay?
Why are manhole covers round?
When is a man up and coming ?
What did the Atlantic say to the Pacific?
What do call a bunch of white people on a bench?
What's the hardest part about cooking a vegetable?
What does a dyslectic, agnostic, insomniac think about at night?
Why are the corners the warmest part of every house?
What do you call a small Mexican?
Why did the Jews hate the holocaust?
What did the author say when he added a chapter about flour to a story about soup?
Why do Gnomes always laugh when the run?
How do you make an Italian plumber cry?
What's the worst part of having a girl repeatedly calling another mans name during sex?
What is a monkeys favorite candy?
What did the Banana say to the other Banana?
What would you do with $1 Million?
What's your favorite terraria boss?
Are you from Tennessee?
What's the difference between a slut and a bowling ball?
How does Batman's mother call him to dinner?
What does the Starship Enterprise and toilet paper have in common?
Did you hear that joke Ray Rice made?
What do women and tornadoes have in common?
What television show best describes a mothers virginity?
What did the Belgian Nazis call themselves?
Excuse me -are you a psychic hooker?
How did the girl with fetal alcohol syndrome tag a picture of herself on instagram?
Why can’t you hear a pterodactyl going to the bathroom?
What did E.T.'s mother say when E.T. got home?
Why don't birds have to wear camouflage?
What's the smallest drink you can order at a bar?
What do you call a disabled man in the hood?
Whats similar between a hurricane and women?
What kind of person is sexually excited from looking at young animals?
How many light bulbs does it take to change a man?
How many developers does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a Japanese Halloween Cake?
What do you call a man from Portugal?
Shouldn't russia have the mos dairy?
Why did the eunuch farmer wake up late?
What do you call it when you throw a black person in the water?
How do they educate locomotive drivers?
What do you call a trip to Spain gone horribly wrong?
Did you hear about the terrible kidnapping?
What do black people and dividing by zero have in common?
did you hear about the constipated mathematician?
why couldn't mrs. claus get pregnant?
Why dont Muslims play Dota?
What's the difference between a telemarketer and a man with a multiphobic personality?
Why does Saturday stink?
What did the astronaut get instead of athlete's foot?
How do you call a blond who changed her hair color to brown?
Why can't cats live on Mars ?
How does a male contraceptive pill work?
What do you call weed from Denmark?
Why didn't Barbie get pregnant?
What do Thomas Jefferson and a WNBA owner have in common?
Did you hear about the new British period drama?
Did you hear about the dyslexic Satanist?
Who is the favorite author of someone addicted to ecstasy?
What happens when you try to eat a fist full of rice?
What did the emperor of Arabia do at tea time?
Do they have any car wash in Albania?
How does a poor man watch TV?
What do you call a dead blonde in a closet?
What do you say to a man with no body and no nose?
Why do black people wear flares?
What did the dog say when he bit the sandpaper?
Do you know why god created leprosy?
Why don't they teach sex-ed and drivers-Ed on the same day in the Middle East?
What is your greatest America joke?
Why did lieutenant Uhura smell bad?
What Do you get when you cross a kangaroo and a Sheep?
why do asians have small boobs?
What Did The Man With Leprosy Say To The Hooker?
What do you call a smelly man who tells terrible jokes?
Did you hear about that new restaurant they put on the moon?
Have you heard Julian Assange never spends more than 20 seconds in the restroom?
What's grey and comes in buckets?
What did one testicle say to the other testicle ago was aggravating him?
What punch line is sure to get upvotes no matter how many times it gets posted?
What does the Russian President enjoy having on his fries?
What kind of rice puts you to sleep?
Did you hear about the Polish assassin that blew up cars for a living?
Anyone up for a Native American joke?
Why did the case against the great dessert robber get thrown out?
How do you know if someone has a Samsung phone without asking?
What did the hot dog vendor say at the World Trade Center?
Why didn't the motorcycle want to go for a ride?
What's the difference between Ray Rice's wife and a fish?
What's the difference between a Pakistani middle school and an Al Qaeda training ground?
Did you hear about the man with no penis?
What does a "yes man" say?
What stops your hair from falling?
Want to hear the world's best knock knock joke?
What is it?
How about an Indian joke?
Do you deliver?
How many Mexicans does it take to replace a serviceable part of a complex machine?
Do you know the best part about having only one eye and bad vision?
What's worse than stubbing your toe?
What do a stoner lost in the desert and Bolivia have in common?
Did you hear about the pillow factory that blew up last week?
What the Diffrence between Chinese and Mexican food?
Why do fencers make terrible Redditors?
Whats the difference between a drug dealer and a prostitute?
Why should you stand in a corner when you are cold?
How long does it take a black woman to poo?
What shoes do Ninjas wear?
Which musician is the most generous?
What time of day are you not able to find your watch?
Why did Cinderella get kicked off the baseball team?
What takes up 12 parking spaces?
Why did the ska guitarist take twice as long to fap?
Where did Napoleon keep his armies?
Why did the contraceptive fly across the room?
What's the difference between a black man and happiness?
What do you call those things on either side of an old lady's belly button?
Will net neutrality be defeated? Is the Gangnam Style finally over? Is Tupac really alive?
What does Batman like with his whiskey?
How do you know you've found Christopher Walken's house?
What do you call a utility knife that doesn't work?
Why did the children cross the playground?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to screw on a light bulb?
What's the first thing a cannibal does in the morning?
What's the difference between coriander and cumin?
why did the tomato cross the road?
Why do Ethiopian women give the best blowjobs?
What did the pirate tell his littler sister when she asked if she could hold his parrot?
Did you hear about the girl who was dating the Berlin Wall?
What's the difference between a cow and September 11?
How did a mom figure out her daughter had hit puberty?
What's black on top and white on the bottom?
Where do we keep our thoughts detained?
Why doesn't Switzerland make good cars?
Why did Einstein refuse to help people fix their cars?
How do you find hundreds of jokes about finding Will Smith in the snow?
What do you call a nurse with flat knees?
Why cant we interpret what frogs are saying?
Are you a Farmer?
What did the horse say when he fell down?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the deal with my laptop?
What do you call a gay Mexican couple that just won the lottery?
What do you suppose Ray Rice's fiance' did when he got her home from knocking her out?
What does a sick bird need?
Where were the first French fries made?
Do you know the worst thing about sex?
Did you hear about the man who got his entire left side cut off?
How is a Man like a Blizzard?
What medication that can make people inspire you?
What's the worst part of an NFL wedding?
What Did the Sadist Do to the Masochist?
What do you call a robot with bad breath who's sister lives on its foot?
What is the most masculine profession?
What does a statistician call a defective butter substitute?
What's a hillbillies favorite holiday? Halloween.... Do you want to know why?
How do you know if a hippie was at your house?
Why did the bicycle fall down?
Did you hear about the Chinese man who was arrested for sodomizing a 9-year-old?
What do you call a couple, who are both in wheelchairs?
what did Putin say to Ukraine?
What do you calls sushi in Serbia?
What do Canadian girls have?
Why did the Japanese funeral home have to turn away new business?
How do you get an elephant across a busy freeway?
What did the blanket say to the bed?
What is it called when one punches a stripper?
What do you call the mercury mine?
What do you call a cat sitting on the edge of a cliff?
What do you call a TV reality show where a 50 year old white man is trying to get laid?
Daddy, can I have another cup of water?
What is the greatest sport in the history of the Olympics?
Why does the police officer get up early in the morning?
What job pays you to shoot people but not harm them?
Why did Joan Rivers die during throat surgery?
What do you call a gay alcoholic?
What do you tell a worried guitar?
Lame joke I made one night. What do you get when you mix a cat and a blender?
How do you find white Canadian reggae musician Snow in the snow?
What do you call a diseased duck?
what did one lesbian vampire say to the other lesbian vampire?
What file turns a 1mm hole into a 10mm hole?
What does Spiderman do when he's not fighting crime?
What did the pirate say to the prostitute?
What's black and full of holes?
Did you hear about the two radio antennae who fell in love and decided to get married?
Why did man invent the shipping cart?
Why do bananas wear suntan lotion?
Why do politicians wear neckties?
What has 100 legs and 3 teeth?
How many Apple executives does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between a tribe of clever pygmies and a girls' track team?
Did you hear about the broken watch from the 1800's?
What do you call a lesbian with a SUV full of penises?
How many Astros fans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does Verizon wireless and abortion clinics have in common?
How does a cat tell time??
Why was the geometry teacher so dizzy?
What did you do wrong if your wife comes out of the kitchen and yells at you?
What do you call a hypnotist that works with wealthy children during the summer?
How many martial artists does it taek to change a lightbulb?
what is better than roses on your piano?
What function do the bumps on a nipple serve?
How many pixies does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How do you know someone went to Harvard?
How many Jewish grandmothers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How many Firefly fans disc it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a German grocery store that carries everything but fish?
How do you organize a Space Party?
How many first-time theater directors does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you get when you cross a rooster and a telephone pole?
Why did Hitler kill the Jews?
How do hair stylists get in shape?
What did the pirate day on his 80th birthday?
Why is Edward Snowden stuck in Russia?
What's the difference between mashed potatoes and pea soup?
How do they keep track of books at the sausage library?
How can you spot a Jewish Pedofile?
What did Joan Rivers say to God when she arrived?
What do you get when you cross a monastery with a convent?
Que es la nombre con un bebe burro?
What should you do with your sick pig?
What do you call the hash marks on your headboard?
What did Tiger Woods' dad tell him on his death bed?
what did the faggot faggot the faggot?
Q. What do Robin Williams and Joan Rivers want for Christmas?
How do you make a mailman cry?
Why did Karl Marx dislike Earl Grey?
What black & White and cool as f**k?
Hey did you know a new medication came out for depressed lesbians?
Hey Joe, did you return that axe to Frank?
What Christmas Carol do they sing in North Korea?
What does a blind pornstar say when she's surprised?
What did the lunatic vacuum cleaner salesman say to his son before murdering him?
What black and yellow and makes you laugh when it goes off a cliff?
What did the egg say when it was about to be hard boiled?
What do you call 144 rotten eggs?
Why did the skydiver die before reaching the ground?
Did you hear Mr. Fanatic started delivering gifts to children?
Why do they call a wolf a wolf?
Did you guys hear about Joan Rivers?
How are burnt pizza, frozen beer and a pregnant girlfriend related?
What's the definition of irony?
What did the rubber say when he was offered a job as the high school choir teacher?
What's the difference between Joan Rivers' face and Kate Upton's tits?
Have you heard of that invention that lets you see through walls?
What did the nun say to the priest?
What's the hardest part of a gardener's job?
A: Have you heard that joke they don't tell retards?
Are you from the 316?
What is a pirate's favorite TV show?
Why does my porn website have a share to google+ button?
Where do galaxies go to college?
Why doesn't Santa Claus have children?
Why don't Chinese Restaurant owners do their dirty dishes?
Why are fire trucks always red?
When is a Pixie not a Pixie?
What do you call italian food that is bad?
What did the pessimist say to the psychologist?
What do you call it when someone makes a slam-dunk wearing shiny handcuffs?
How does a turtle grate cheese?
What do you call a chilly office?
What is the Mexicans favorite credit card company?
Why can't any of the seven dwarfs share the same name?
Why is my dog better than my girlfriend?
What do you get if you cross an owl with a donkey?
What do you say to a dangerously cheesy chicken?
What do you call a bunch of cats sitting in a circle?
What's the difference between a $200 vacuum and a $50 vacuum?
Why do teenage girls have groups in odd numbers?
What do you call an amphibian in disguise?
Why didn't the lifeguard save the drowning hippy?
Why could 8 see that 6 was afraid of 7?
What do you call a Mexican with a broken-down car?
What is your best wordplay joke?
What's a Mexicans favorite protein?
How do you make an elephant float?
Why are camels considered the ships of the desert?
What is the difference between a slut and a bitch?
What's the one car that gingers can't have?
What do you call a nosy hot pepper?
Have you found a chick yet?
What do you call a very unfriendly, female dog?
What do you call a gay avatar?
Did you hear they found the body of the guy that leaked the Jennifer Lawrence nudes?
What do Libyan people put in their TV remotes?
How do you make a German shepherd?
What do you call siblings that play soccer?
Why did the elephant paint its nails red?
Doctor... can I bathe with diarrhea?
5 year old cousin with this one: Who lives in the green house?
A Freudian slip?
Why is Jennifer Lawrence the only one freaking out about the nude photo leak?
Joke from my 7 year old cousin - Why did the ninja go to college?
What's a pirates favorite material?
Why do teenage girls hang out in odd numbers?
What's the thing in common between your girlfriend starting the pill and the muisic group Europe?
Where are average things manufactured?
How are the band "The Scorpions" and rural shepherds alike?
You know what they say about people with big feet?
Why did the man eat all of the bananas?
Want to read a joke about pizza?
What is it called when a woman can't imagine having kids?
What kind of weather puts a smile on snoop dogg' face?
What do King Cong and the Archbishop of Canterbury have in common?
What do you call a Jewish Pokémon player?
What did the computer say to the virus?
What does a mathematician do about constipation?
Why do girls always go in threes when using the restroom?
How does a communist do well in school?
What's the crackhead's favorite song?
What do particle physicists like to drink?
Why doesn't Mrs. Clean get pregnant?
What does a nine volt battery and an asshole have in common?
Why Couldn't 3 Fall Asleep ?
Why did the referee stop the leper hockey game?
Whats the difference between a prostitute with dysentery and an epileptic oyster shucker?
Why do Televisions have buttons?
Whats the only bad thing about head from an anorexic girl?
Why are Peruvians always deported?
How do you obtain Kate Upton's nudes?
[Sick Humour] What sits in the corner of the room, crying and getting smaller and smaller?
Why did the sand scream?
What did one cannibal say to the other cannibal?
What do pancakes do when they are scared?
What's the difference between a turtle and a tortoise?
What did the cannibal ask for in his burrito?
What did the Jewish pedophile say to the little boy?
Why do bad farmers make good DJs?
Why was the marshmallow stuck to the tree?
What type of shoes does a pedophile wear?
What does a fashionable criminal always make sure they have a lot of?
Why could the chef not cook a tree branch?
What was so special about Bounty's new line of paper towels?
What do you get when you mix a hippo, an elephant and a rhino?
Why don't gypsies use condoms ?
Who is the biggest singer right now?
What's Gordon Ramsay's least favorite movie?
What do they call a dog in Iraq?
Why is it so easy to fool an octopus?
What did the spoon say when he caught his knife cheating on him?
What do you call the removal of a fence?
How many non-sequiturs does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the oven go back to University?
What is a pirate's favorite pokemon?
Why did the hipster cross the road?
What do you call retarded cow thighs?
Why were the Three Wise Men covered in soot?
what is hhe hardest part of a vegetable to eat?
Why can't seagulls fly over the bay?
What’s the difference between acne and a priest?
Why did the guy take his time setting up a premature ejaculation support group?
What's the difference between a hippie girl and a can of beans?
Why did Steve Irwin's sunscreen get recalled?
why didn't the escaped peasant want to go to the beach?
What do you call a nine-sided polygon that wishes to remain anonymous?
Did you hear about the narcoleptic, necrophiliac mortician?
What's the sharpest thing in the word?
Did you hear about the burger cook who took a dump on the grill?
What's the difference between organized crime and politics?
How many light bulbs does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you get by cross-breeding a jehovahs witness and an atheist?
Why aren't Mexicans ever indecisive?
What was the Rabbi's favorite frozen treat?
Why does it see like fur is more hated than leather?
What economic theory opposes manscaping?
How much does a plumber make in an hour?
Why are pirates angry after leaving the bathroom?
What do you call a Jew with a pH lower than 7?
What did the baby computer call his dad?
Did you know 60% of all Asian men have Cataracks?
What is the craziest/weirdest/most interesting/most unique/ uncommon phrase you've ever heard ?
Your skin looks great do you use concealer?
Why do Canadian women use hockey pucks instead of tampons?
How do you stop your dog digging holes in your garden?
What is Aloe Blacc's real name?
What do refugees drink?
Did you guys see Micheal J. Fox's icebucket challenge?
What's the difference between an alcoholic and a necrophiliac?
What do you call a detective from Glasgow with three feet?
How many straight men in california does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did Mark Antony say to Van Gogh?
You know who's even bigger than Ariana Grande?
What do you call a rabbit who lifts weights?
How'd you keep an idiot in suspense?
What did the doctor do after he finished reading the book?
Anyone know any kid-friendly jokes about burgers?
What do you call a hooker fart?
Why did the drunk fall asleep at the wheel?
Why couldn't Hitler change a lightbulb?
Where does Joseph Kony train his soldiers?
What does the atheist say when he arrives at the Pearly Gates?
You hear of the movie about a girl's struggle during her time of the month?
Why is British weather muslim?
What is the difference between Sarah Palin's mouth and her vagina?
What sort of undergarments does a succinct pugilist wear?
Did you ever notice how men always leave the toilet seat up?
What does it take for a Beatles reunion?
What do you call a man that stabs many packets of Cornflakes?
Everyone uses body wash these days. What happened to good old-fashion soap?
What do you call two gay black guys?
Why is it called a cunt?
Which sea creature is the most determined?
Why did the Scot screw the sheep on the edge of a cliff?
What's the NSDAP's favourite kind of Jew?
Why do Scots wear kilts?
How much cum does a gay guy have?
Why did the fence get busted for having stolen goods?
What do you call a chicken without feathers?
What do blondes and computer have in common?
Why do scholars use big words?
How do you call a blond who has colored her hair to brown?
Why don't lions eat clowns?
Why are there no cats in Germany?
What do you call an empty jar of Cheese Whiz?
How do you tell a Japanese girl you're breaking up with her ?
What does an existentialist bully say?
Why was the solider nervous about being deployed?
Cakeday special - what did the Chinese gangster do?
What happened after the King of All Cosmos destroyed the stars in a drunken rage?
What do you get when you ask a proctologist for a second opinion?
Where do homeless people read about their friends deaths?
Did you hear there was a blackout last night?
What does a rich physicist wear?
Why are there no living cats on Mars?
What do you call the crucified baby Jesus?
What's the difference between the worst sex you ever had, and the best sex you ever had?
Why is a change machine easy to understand?
How long is the flight?
Why are fish only happy inside?
Whats white on top and black on the bottom?
What happens if you don't pay the priest who exorcises your house?
Are you still looking for a job?
What's the difference between a Bud Light and a vagina?
How do you start a rave party in Ethiopia?
What do you call a sugar substitute that has poor taste?
What sound does a shotgun make?
What three streets in Chicago rhyme with vagina?
Why did Hitler have a thing for men from Hungary?
What's the difference between a condom and a coffin?
What do you call a Russian Lizard?
Why were deer testicles the most popular product at the meat fair?
What does a sarcastic fishing-rod with a broken reeler say?
What do you get when you put your hand in a blender?
What made the New Mexican sad?
You guys ever seen a cockatoo?
Why are the noses of Jewish people so big?
Are candles happy or sad when they are put out?
What do you call a quaterpounder with cheese in Zimbabwe?
What is the most positive thing in a ghetto?
Where are the cleanest bathrooms on college campuses?
What's the difference between a rapper and God in a strip club?
what kind of pants does the godfather wear?
What do you call an effeminate Japanese man with radiation sickness, AIDS and hemorrhegic fever?
How do cows communicate?
What's the same about George Washington, and a tranny?
Why did the mermaid cover her breasts with seashells?
What's the best joke you've ever come up with?
What did the blind man say when he walked passed the fish aisle in the supermarket?
Have you heard about the three Chinese virgins?
Did you know that Davy Crockett had three ears?
Why does the fat chick give the best blowjobs?
Why was the origami class cancelled?
What do you call an alien civil rights activist?
What will the ISIS be called when we eventually destroy them?
Remember the first time offender who was into bdsm? It made him late for an appointment. His excuse?
What does cheese say to itself when taking a selfie in the mirror?
What do you call a bunch of wealthy muslims?
What do you call a Saudi cow?
Did you hear about the new extreme camping TV show?
What do Mexican Zombies eat?
Why are circles so knowledgeable?
What do you call a female alligator?
What drove the British mystery fan insane?
You hear about the moneyless porn star that started selling double-ended dildos?
Why do we eat?
What would happen if Russia ran out of vodka?
Did you hear about the preschool kidnapping?
What's Borat's favorite neighborhood?
Did you hear about the suicidal homeopath?
What do you call a one-legged asian woman?
What do you call a rich muslim god?
Why is twelve an unfair number?
Have you seen how expensive balloons are lately?
What's Rihanna's favorite type of apple?
Why are New Yorkers so depressed?
Do you have Prince Albert in a can?
Why do we sleep?
HELP? I need help remembering a joke. Is it ok to ask this here?
Why did the condom hit the wall?
You hear Jerry Sandusky is revolutionizing pee wee football?
What do you call a right angle that gets beaten into a long square?
How many prolog programmers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Oh my god, did you hear Bob Barker died?
What do you call three lesbians on a bicycle?
Why was the lizard upset with her husband?
How many radical feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a cock blocker?
how do you know you are a real redneck?
What do you call someone banned from an Indian restaurant?
Did you hear about the german who accidently put his hand in boiling oil?
My son keeps talking to me in binary even though I ask him not to. What kind of boy is he?
What is a pedophile's favorite guitar chord?
Why can't the French cook two eggs?
Why was the little drop of ink so sad?
Did you hear about the psychic midget that escaped from jail last night?
Do you know about the unpredictable weather in Syria?
A very old joke: why is the letter r so important?
Why was Luke Skywalker convicted of rape ?
If a tramp and a bunch of rich people are dressed the same, how does the tramp stand out?
What did the hurricane say to the palm tree?
What does the sterile man say when asked if he's gonna get neutered?
What's the difference between a Palestinian woman and a Mackerel?
What is the cutest car?
How long did Dorothy, the Scarecrow, and the Cowardly Lion have to wait for the Tin Man?
What did Hitler say to the Black Jew?
Whaddya call a know-it-all from Europe?
How do thieves kiss?
What is the blackest of magics?
What does a prostitute and a lawyer have in common?
how many corrections officers does it take to throw an inmate down the stairs?
what's the difference between Madeleine McCann and Jesus?
What did the shoes say to the pants?
Did you hear about the support group for people who talk too much?
How do you hide from imminent retribution?
What's Jay-Z's favorite city to perform in?
How do you make the Wicked Witch of the West kill herself?
How did the geometry teach kill himself?
How many blacks does it take to start a riot?
How do you make a baby cry?
How do we know that Darth Vader is American?
What did the match box say to the match?
Have you heard about the new car park crime statistics?
How do you circumcise a hillibilly?
What did the ZERO say to the EIGHT?
What country has the most people?
Why do hot girls always travel in threes?
Why did a chinese man ride a bike to the brothel?
What do men and slurpees have in common?
What's the difference between unlawful and illegal?
Why did the pervert cough when he was caught molesting a pony?
What did ELO say once they found out their stripper was a hermaphrodite?
What would you title a movie about a Nazi roofer with a speech impediment?
Does anyone need a vacuum cleaner?
What's it called when an Arabic author releases their latest novel after dinner?
What is the difference between a horror fiction writer and a disabled physicist?
Why did the dolphin go to church?
What do you call a sad hat?
Did your hear about the man with a broken left arm and broken left leg?
How do married men remember their birthdays?
Why was the rooster angry?
What do paper towels call their family?
With all the different ways to sat the same jokes, how would you know it's not a repost?
What do you call a monkey in a minefield?
What is a gentleman monkey?
Cyanide?
What do dyslexic zombies eat?
Why do all polish names end in SKI ?
What do you get when you put rootbeer in a square glass?
What do you call a white man flying a plane?
What kind of dog did the sad cantaloupe get?
How many Tumblr women does it take to change a light bulb?
Is light a wave or a particle?
What kind of food do zombies hate?
What time does Sean Connery go to Wimbledon at?
How did Viking ships communicate?
Did you hear about that new broom?
What did the maxi-pad say to the fart?
if a blonde and a Asian girl would jump off a bridge who would land first?
How does Kanye make Kim Kardashian's eyes twinkle?
Did you hear about the guy who got his left side cut?
What can jelly beans do that you can't?
Why is Bud light kinda like making love on a canoe?
What is r/jokes' main function?
What do you call a black guy who flies a plane?
What's the worst single thing you could do to someone?
How many roaches does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What insect do you use to capture a slutty woman?
Did you hear about the scarecrow that got promoted?
How many ballerinas does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the guy that made the highest grades in his graduating class?
What did one snail say to the other snail?
What is a 72?
You wanna know the best food to eat when sad?
What's the difference between cum and Jello?
Why wasn't the bear allowed to drive?
Why does no one want to work in the yard with a carpenter?
You know the best thing about Midgets?
Why is semen white and pee yellow?
whats 72??
Why are birds always sad in the morning?
What do you call a group of Idiots?
What do you call an Arab who has many cows?
what does a gay horse eat?
Did you hear about the fight at the bakery?
Why don't good golfers cheat?
Why so the French line their streets with trees?
How many Catholic priests does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a fake shit?
Why do fish swim in salt water?
What do you call an orange cat in summer?
What does a donkey say?
LE NEW JOKE???
Why does no-one use the rhinos ATM?
What's the object of Jewish football?
What do you call a rare Egyptian King?
How does an insane man get through the forest?
Joke I just made up: what's a neo nazis favorite sports drink?
Why does a redneck hold a knife while driving?
Q. Why did the ant fall off the toilet seat?
What position would Obama be if he played football?
What happens when you step on an oily asian?
What do you call a government consisted of burglars?
What did the Jewish pirate say when he heard his wife died?
Why do pedophiles love Old Navy sales?
Feline-loving fashionista's favorite music?
How did Bob die, when he went on a trip to Africa?
How do you blind fold an asian?
Why is the Mississippi so wide?
What is the first rule of eating a banana?
What's the difference between roast chicken and pea soup?
What's the Difference between 3 dicks and a Joke?
What did the boy say when his dog died?
What animal is the moodiest?
how do you keep bacon from curling in the pan?
What plant attacks people?
Why don't smart girls ever get pregnant?
Whats the difference between a duck?
What's scary about a white man in prison?
What does a black person get after sex...???
What do you call a man who has lost the lower parts of his legs, but still somehow has his feet?
Why didn't the President fight with the chair?
How'd the preacher catch A.I.D.S. in Africa?
What college did the eyeball go to?
What would a Chinese person never eat, but a Mexican regularly eats incredulously?
what do you call a play about victorian era menstruation?
What did the boy say after the tailor made fun of him for not wearing pants?
What do you call a hooker with a runny nose?
What do you call a cockroach filing a complaint?
How did the mathematician reach the end of the Y-axis?
Why did the band Wham! break up?
What did the chicken say after laying an egg?
What do Buddhist monks have for breakfast?
What is the difference between a drunk driver and a stoned driver?
Did you hear the one about Gilgamesh?
What do you say to a motivated ghost?
Did you hear the tragic news about Robin Williams?
Why did the vampire miss work?
Why did the stand-up comedian get such bad reviews?
Have you heard the joke about the deaf guy?
Can you believe they're still together after all that crap?!?
A Riddle: What's the only hole that I can't put my dick in?
What is your best weed/stoner related joke?
How does the Rabbi make his coffee?
Where did Sadam Hussein keep his CD collection?
Why did the terrorist kill his wife on their anniversary?
What did the Nazi do after World War II?
What is the opposite of an autistic?
Feeling cold?
What do you call a deaf dinosaur?
Why did The Walrus go to a Tupperware party?
What did one Jersey girl's leg say to the other?
What's the difference between new cops and old cops?
why is peter pan always in the air?
Waiter, what's this fly doing in my soup?
What do you call and eight sided dildo?
How many Missouri Police officers does it take to change a light bulb?
So... what do you call a sexual tree?
A dead person, a 2 year old, and a thot are all asked to count to ten. Which one can do it?
Why Ireland so rich?
What did the dolphin say when three orcas swam by?
What did the hungry whale do?
What does a pickle use to make bread?
What beer do elderly rednecks drink?
What was wrong with Genghis Khan's new suit?
Why has there never been an Asian president?
What do you call a disappointing white wine?
What sound does Korean bread make when it hits a wall?
What does the rest of the colony call an old ant?
Why couldn't the lizard be aroused?
Who was the blind horse jealous of?
What is the opposite of an autist?
Hey baby, is your name Polio?
What kind of disease do you get from birds?
What kind of movies do pirates watch?
Why Did Hitler Quit Drinking?
What's your favorite medical joke?
When is 99 greater than 100?
How does the man on the moon cut his hair?
Why did Captain Hook think Robin Williams death was funny?
What kinds of vegetables did Ghandi prefer?
What do we want? A cure for Tourette's! When do we want it?
What do you call four bees??
Does anyone need an ark?
What's a linguist's favorite beverage?
What did the vacuum cleaner salesman say to his colleague?
What's the difference between a Taliban outpost and a Pakistani elementary school?
How does R. Kelly respond when girls ask for a rating on a ten scale?
Why does it take so long to play Israeli sports?
Why is Mexico's flag green, white, and red?
What do you call someone who worships testicles?
How many corporate drones does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a schoolmaster and a stationmaster?
Monica Lewinsky's favorite Green Bay Packer?
What does a pirate from Boston say?
Why doesn't Mr. Jinks babysit his brother's daughters?
What's the difference between a nun and a woman in a bathtub?
Why did the lime disapprove of his daughter?
Why couldn't the mayonnaise kethup?
Did you hear about that amazing joke that Jesus told as he was dying?
What's the difference between A pope and THE pope?
What do you call an asian women who flies an airplane?
Did you hear about the new anti-consumerism movement?
How do you get high underwater?
What's the funniest thing you can find in a closet?
What is Paul Georges favorite place to eat at?
What's the diffrence between a Chickpea and a Gorbanzo bean?
What do you call a black guy on the moon?
Why do the sharks only swim in salt water?
What do you call a punctuation mark that's got a girlfriend?
What's left when a jew takes a shower?
Did you hear about the Mexican hit-man who was a chronic masturbator?
What did the illiterate man say upon realizing the couch he just purchased was made of fake leather?
What's the definition of an african-american?
What did Robin Williams suicide note say?
What's the difference between a tornado and a divorce in the South?
Ants Dancing ?
Why do they like to watch Star Wars on the big screen on aircraft carriers?
Why do people buy smart cars?
Why did the chicken cross the mobius strip?
What is JPA? Joke point average. Where do people with high JPAs go to?
What do you tell an unemployed Rastafarian?
How many women with PMS does it take to screw-in a light bulb?
What do you do if you see a nigger shot 50 times?
What do you find up a clean nose?
Did you hear that they are rebooting the show Six Feet Under?
Why did Josh Gordon marry Mary Jane?
What do you call an online relationship?
If Apple designed a car, would it have windows?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say at the abortion clinic?
You know why Russia is more productive?
Why did the Irish woman only put 239 beans into her bean soup?
Why did the mule fail his math test?
Did you hear about the worlds greatest magician?
Why did you get a tattoo?
Why was Game Of Thrones banned from twitter?
What is the last thing you want to hear after blowing Willie Nelson?
Why did the snowman have his pants down?
What's the difference between Karate and Judo?
What do you take on a math camping trip?
What's the difference between a dead hooker and a Ferrari?
What do you call three rabbits hopping backwards?
[Pickup Line] Are you a phillips or flathead?
Where did the father of the paper sack live?
Where does the Empire buy their robes?
How do you get 4 old ladies to yell "Shit!"?
What is a toad's favorite genre of music?
What do Jesus, Gandhi and Mel Gibson all have in common?
What did Sonic the Hedgehog say during Ramadan?
What's black, blue, and red all over?
Did you hear about that pirate movie?
How do you call a puzzled amputee?
What do you call it when a shepherd can't find his ram?
What are some names for a dating website that caters specifically to people with diseases?
What does a black guy do after sex?
What is the South American Music Scale?
How do you fit four gays on one stool?
What was the last thing that went through the bugs head after he hit the window shield?
What type of car would Jesus drive?
What happens to a drunk vampire?
What do you call a lesbian Pakistani?
So how was the tourettes convention?
What do you do when a box kotex catches on fire?
How long does it take for a black woman to take out the trash?
What time does Sean Connery show up to wimbledon?
When Lil John goes to a hotel and they ask him if he wants turn down service, does he refuse?
Why did the bike fall over?
Why don't blind men go skydiving?
What branch of government actually listens to the people?
What did the retarded kids call there rock band?
What's the difference between an egg and Elliot Rodger?
How do you make soup from a computer?
How many kids with A.D.D. does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the difference between Bono and Jesus?
Why did the horror fan switch off Cujo?
What do pink flamingos have on their front lawns?
What do you call it when a prayer is answered?
What's a Scottish transsexual's favourite drink?
What's Beethoven's favorite favorite Japanese weapon?
Have you ever seen moth balls?
What's Green and has 5 Wheels?
Why do Italians wear gold chains?
What's the difference between Jesus and Mexicans?
Why was the OCD race car driver so fast?
Why are mushrooms small?
When is the only time a woman says something smart?
Why did John F. Kennedy die?
How many NYC cops does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How are AIDS researchers like Jews?
What's the best thing about fucking a pregnant woman?
What's the difference between a mosque and a school?
Why did Sally fall off the swing??
Why are Jewish men circumcised ?
What is the most useless superpower?
What kind of room has no walls?
Why do girls never travel in odd numbers?
What does a burning Mexican farm smell like?
What do you get when you send a duck backwards in time to the moment before you sent the duck?
What did the bee say to his wife?
What do you call a cow masturbating in an open field?
Do you know how to tell the difference between a rectal thermometer and an oral thermometer?
Q: What do the Mafia and a pussy have in common?
How many gay men does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do soy beans and dildos have in common?
What's Irish and sits outside?
What's the difference between a girl with herpes and a leather shoe?
What is so brilliant with a Arabian blow-up doll?
What's the favorite whiskey of Unidan?
What's a one way streets favorite band?
What's the most romantic pasta?
(UK) Did you hear about the new brand of shampoo for pikeys?
What's black on top and white at the bottom?
What's the difference between a weasel and a stoat?
What did the agnostic, dyslexic insomniac do?
What beer does Sean Connery drink?
What noise does Doppler's cat make?
What do you call an African who plays 10 pin bowling online?
Why did the soccer player have to ask for a bib at the restaurant?
What does a pediatrist do when you ask them which body part they find most interesting?
What do The Pope & a Christmas Tree have in common?
What is Kim Kardashian's favorite hockey team?
Did you guys know a Mexican's brain is the most expensive out all the race?
How do you get half of Mexico to jump off a cliff?
What do you call Kanye dressed as Kermit?
How many Dornishmen does it take to shoe a horse?
What is Putin's favorite new ballot?
You know what they say about camping...?
What is the difference between a hormone and an enzyme?
What kind of pants do Bostonians wear?
What's the difference between a baby and a kilo of cocaine?
What do you call a British midget mother who can barely support her family?
Why does the Illuminati have to be the bad guy all the time?
How do you break a Polish man's finger?
What do you call a midget, that escaped prison, that is also a psychic?
What were the infinite number of Indian Mathematicians complaining about?
What's the worst part about 4 black guys driving off a cliff in an escalade?
What is M. Night Shamalan's favorite game?
What do you call the things on the end of Winnie the Pooh's feet?
What's the worst thing to hear during a prostate exam?
You know what gets me down?
How often do I make a chemistry joke?
[META] Spoiler Tags?
What do you call nondeterministically scrambled Crunk?
Why cant Skrillex go fishing?
What do you call a pimp without a cane?
What did the diver say to the oyster?
How many gay men can you fit on a bar stool?
Why do people take acid at raves?
What do you call someone who's been kicked out of a fraternity?
What do you call a skydiving tonsil who's afraid that something bad might happen?
What did the octogenarian pirate say?
What do you call earrings on a gay man?
[Knee-slappin, terrible OC] Why was the nun named "NPN"?
Why didn't Ukraine go to war with Russia yet?
Is that water coming out of your nose?
Why didn't Bruce Willis star in the movie "Titanic"?
What do you call a boat whose captain has no idea what he's doing and works for free?
How did the hippie remember the number of wives he had?
Want to hear a clean joke?
What type of jokes do planets tell each other?
What do you call a woman flying a plane?
Where do cannibals get their vegetables from?
How many Unidans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What would you call it if pigs were flying yesterday?
Why are pirates good at singing?
What do u call a spanish man with a rubber toe?
What do you call a knight made out of clay?
What's the difference between a gardener and a pimp?
What do you call two ants that run away to get married?
Did you hear the one about the wooden car? With the wooden wheels? And the wooden engine?
Q. How would you write do not touch in Braile?
My Asian friend bought a dog today! Guess how much they got it for?
Where does a lonely ant go when it is separated from its colony?
Did you hear about the guy who accidently used super glue instead of lube while having sex?
How does Wonder Woman like Superman to perform oral sex?
What's the difference between a rabbit on a treadmill and a rabbit with a carrot stuck up its nose?
Where do babies come from?
Want to hear a joke about my dick?
Where do they categorize the history books in an Indian library?
Gay pride parade? Why isn't there a straight pride parade?
How did the astronaut break up with his girlfriend?
How do you spot Will Smith in a snowstorm?
What kind of water do you drink when the snow melts?
What do you call a coked-up Iron Man?
What's God's favorite guitar chord?
Surely people with the middle name 'Will' are the most nominally determined people possible?
What is one item which has never been affected by inflation?
Where does a bee put its stinger?
What do black people and Apple Inc. have in common?
What did Neil Armstrong do after walking on the moon before Buzz Aldrin did?
Have you ever heard of the s-shaped well?
What do you do if an epileptic falls in your swimming pool?
How do you know if your friend has an iPhone?
You know how racist make their pancakes?
What do you call someone who gets stoned and baked?
Did you hear the one about the guy with no ears?
What does Batman put in his drinks?
Yarrrr! What's a pirrrate's favorite letterrr?
Have you heard of nihilism?
Have you heard about the man with five penises?
What did the farmer's daughter say when she lost her virginity?
Why do the Irish wear kilts?
Why're they called hemorrhoids?
What did the left boob say to the right boob?
What do corn and staples have in common?
What do you call one-tenth of a bell?
Did you hear about the computer that ate an entire hamburger in one go?
How did Jim start losing weight after the holidays?
What is the most awkward day in Harlem?
why are sex ed and drivers ed never on the same day in Iraq ?
What do you call the first sperm that reaches the egg?
What does snoop doggy dog use to do his laundry?
What's a pirate's favorite firework?
What do you get when you stick your dick in yogurt without asking first?
What's a farmers favourite metal band?
What kind of dog is best at keeping secrets?
Why can't you tell a joke to a dwarf?
What did the janitor say when he jumped out of the closet?
What kind of phone does a molester have?
What is a East Indian child's favourite game?
What's the difference between a good Samaritan and a Jew?
Did you hear about the accountant who daydreams about being an actuary?
[DARK HUMOUR] What do you call a fat baby?
What do you call a racing horse that's never been groomed?
What's the difference between family bonding and family bondage?
Why are African Americans called Negroes?
How did the anus win against the race car driver?
What's the difference between a happy person and ET?
Why is North Korea so evil?
Did you hear about the new cemetery?
What's a sucker's favorite drink?
What is a Jamaicans favorite country to visit?
Why did the arsonist go to the gym?
Whats it called when batman leaves church early?
Where can you go to pick up black birds?
How do trees access the internet?
What do bed detectives solve?
What do you call 2 doctors walking together?
What did the buffalo say when his kid left for college?
Why did the T-Rex go extinct?
What's the difference between and epileptic oyster shucker and a hooker with dysentery?
Why the F1 driver doesn't get along with his crew?
What's the similarity between Michael Jackson and a raped Middle Eastern woman?
What do you call optimistic lube?
What do you call someone who has blonde hair, blue eyes and worships the Flying Spaghetti Monster?
How did Dairy Queen get pregnant?
What do you call a duck on a rampage?
What is Stannis Baratheon's favorite genre of metal?
Barack Obama is on a sinking ship, who gets saved?
Did you hear about the guy who is addicted to drinking brake fluid?
What's the difference between a moan and a scream?
If God were a guitar chord, what would he be?
Why did Hitler lose the war?
What do you call a spoiled girl blogging about her 1st world problems?
Under what circumstance is mass a unit of time?
Why did Dave Grohl buy such a tall house?
What is the biggest joke?
What do you call a news anchor with diarrhea?
Why did the couch give the table a dollar?
What is a dark comedy?
Can someone please explain this joke?
What did we call IT before computers ?
What dose a old lady got between her tits?
What did the horny frog say?
Why was Jesus so ripped?
What do you name an African tech startup?
Did you hear about Hellen Keller's tree house?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs in the middle of the ocean?
What do you tell someone who doesn't like Depeche Mode?
What's the difference between a million dollar car and a pile of dead babies?
What's the difference between a baby and a pound of coke?
Did you hear about the horror movie set in a campground?
What do women and hurricanes have in common?
Why did the peanut go to jail?
What do you call money that grows on trees?
What do you call an Indian with a question?
What is a neck beard's favorite country?
How do you make three pounds of fat attractive?
How do you silence an Italian?
Why can't your nose be 12 inches long?
Whatever happened to Robot Jones?
Are you waiting for my comeback?
What do you call an apple filled with cement?
Why doesn't Barbie get pregnant?
Why didn't the feminist get a job at the post office?
What is a drug addict's favorite series?
What is white and streaks across the sky at blinding speeds?
What does a German say at a Dude Ranch?
What do you call a soldier with long arms?
What do you call a black person that flys an airplane?
What does 70 year old pussy taste like?
How many Mexicans does it take to change a light bulb ?
Which fish is the redneck's favorite?
What's the difference between Kung-Fu and Judo?
What does a Mexican use to cut pizza?
What do ducks get hooked on?
What's the cheapest meat?
Why does the Asian News Anchor not stand up from behind his desk during presidential races?
What do you call the ticket to get into a giant space station shaped like a vagina?
What do you call it when a blacksmith makes something white?
What's a terrorists favorite sports team?
What effect does global warming have on Pennsylvania?
Why did the police drop the charges against the man accused of being an olive branch?
What is the smartest thing to come out of a woman's mouth?
What is Moses's favorite beer?
Why do teenage girls only hang out in odd numbered groups?
What kind of pizza did the Dalai Lama order?
What happened to the over amorous clam?
Is anyone else having problems with their spellchecker?
What did the double-amputee say when he stood up?
Quickest way to turn someone into a Nazi?
How are electric outlets punished?
What did Sushi A say to Sushi B?
What do you call it when two designers argue about what file type to export a graphic to?
Why does granny have black eyes?
Did you guys hear about the Great Potato Famine in Ireland?
What sport do Japanese people watch?
How do supernatural entities cum?
What do a puppy and a near sighted gynecologist have in common?
How do you turn on a female mathematician?
You are riding a horse. There is a giraffe beside you and a lion chasing you. What do you do?
What do you call spaghetti made by Jamaican?
Did you hear about the hipster with heatstroke?
What did one statue say to the other statue he hadn't seen in a while?
Why type of nut do Wallflowers like?
Omg! Leonardo DeCaprio! Wanna hear a joke about the Oscars?
What did the philosophically-wise Mongol general say to motivate himself?
Did you hear about the scarecrow that won the award?
What does Shakespeare's dog eat?
Why do female drivers sit higher up in their seats than male drivers?
What did the knife say to the pretty lady?
Did you hear about the monkey lawyer who kept throwing his shit at the witnesses?
What is the primary job of an alligator?
How can you tell if an elephant has been in the fridge?
Did you hear about Ken M.?
How do you greet a gay Hispanic?
What do you call a stripper with a cattle prod?
What did the little Iraqi girl tell her father after he bought her a new backpack?
What do you call a colored man ?
How many seconds are in a year?
What do you call 500 old white guys chasing a black man with clubs?
How do you get three popes into a Volkswagen?
How do you tell when a girl really wants you?
In Greece how do you separate the men from the boys?
A bunch of angry redditors get pissed because of...?
What did one pee drinker say when he surprised the other pee drinker?
What do you call a blind gynecologist?
Did you hear about the baby that was born without eyelids?
What is the best part about duct tape?
whats the difference between Court and Supreme Court?
What's the slogan for Orion's Pizza?
How do you keep a turkey in suspense?
Where does Putin negotiate?
Where do you buy a Walrus?
Did you hear about the new Chinese rap duo?
What does the math teacher do when he gets constipated?
How many apples grow on trees?
What is Putin to Ukraina, a friend or a brother ?
Why are valley girls so odd?
How do you fit 500 jews in a smart car?
Did you hear about the Polack that crashed a helicopter?
How do you know if someone grew up in New York City?
You know why Miss Piggy can't count to 70?
Why don't anteaters ever get sick?
Why was Jesus I such good shape?
Did you head about the rabbi who only drank lemonade?
Why are all Mexican jokes and Black jokes the same?
What do you call an obese terrorist who plays for the Yankees?
Where did Hitler watch TV?
What did the marine eat for lunch?
What does CNN call back-to-back aviation disasters?
What did the clitoris say to her therapist?
Which is worse, ignorance or apathy?
What did the blanket say when he fell off the bed?
How do you organise games in Pompeii?
can you guys help me find an AC/DC song?
Who steals from the poor and gives to the rich?
Why do Native Americans make good strippers?
Why did the medium cross the road?
What do you do when you meet a robotic genie?
What's a butt's favorite exercise?
What do you call a politically powerful shrub in Jamaica?
What did the snowman say to the other snowman?
What did one ameoba say to the other ameoba?
What do you call a dog with no hind legs?
What do you call a guy dumped by his Asian girlfriend?
What's the difference between dead animals on the road and dead lawyers on the road?
What's even harder to find than Bigfoot, UFOs, the Loch Ness Monster, and diamonds in Minecraft?
What do you call a group of obese gender reassigned persons?
Why can't Vader find a steady relationship?
New girlfriend?
Why did the punk-rocker cross the road?
whats the difference between hell and gaza?
What smells like pork?
What did Hitmonlee say to Hitmonchan when he said he said his jokes sucked?
Why did the Fonz have red eyes?
Which came first, the chicken or the egg...?
What's the worst thing about being a paedophile?
How did the clerk greet the prostitute?
Why can't Indiana Jones find a long lasting relationship?
Do you know the major difference between Hitler and Michael Phelps?
How do you get a philosophy major off of your porch?
What does a slave driver do with his slaves when he's bored?
You know what they should call "Tinder" in Manhattan?
Why are Russians so heartless?
Why can't Two-Face kill Batman?
What did the Vietnamese sandwich salesman say to the unhappy mod?
What does a witch take when she can't poop?
What does the ninja call his penis?
How does Lady Gaga like her meat cooked?
What's half of 8?
What do you call a clever pig?
What'd you call a German businessman?
What type of flour do you buy an orphan?
Which is more promiscuous, a Northern girl or a Southern girl?
What is Bruce Lee's Favourite Drink?
What does the number 3 have in common with a Tumbler user?
What was Bruce Lee's favorite hotel?
What's brown and black and looks good on a hippy?
What do you get when you push a cow out of a plane?
What's a duck's favorite drug ?
What is the difference between Elliot Rodgers and Malaysia Airlines?
What is an alto's favorite drink?
what do you call it when Batman skips church?
What do you call 2 Mexicans playing basketball?
What do you call Christopher Walken when he is sitting?
You know pterodactyls' don't make noise right?
Did you hear about the two guys who stole a calender?
What do you call a melon with overbearing parents?
What is Weird Al Yankovic's favorite pick up line?
What did the duck say to the hooker?
What do you call a constipated mason?
You know how to spell "Canada" right?
Whats the difference between Yoghurt and the USA?
What's your best mattress joke?
What's the easiest way to get laid?
What's the difference between an Art major and a guy who mops bathrooms at KFC?
Wanna hear my construction joke?
Hey you know how people say they hate math because it doesn't make sense?
what retail store does a cat go to when it loses it's tail?
What is a skeletons favorite tool?
Where did the Fonz go for his drinking problem?
Did you hear about the constipated chancellor of the exchequer?
What do you get if you inject a baby goat with chimpanzee DNA?
What happened when the Malaysian asked the Russian out on a date?
How do you get a kleenex to dance?
Why did America remove the "u" from "colour"?
What can bring The Beatles back together?
Why are the Ninja Turtles on the No-Fly list?
How do you stop a lawyer from drownng?
What if Hitler was cast for 'The Matrix' instead of Keanu Reeves?
YOU KNOW THE FUCKING DIFFERENCE BETWEEN PAUL WALKER AND MY COMPUTER?
What is something that everyone overlooks no matter how hard they try not to?
Why was the tree soooo happy?
What do you call a magic dog in French?
What do you say to a chav that has got a job?
What did the hippie say when somebody told him to get off of their couch?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs laying in a pile of leaves?
If a plane crashes on the US/Canada border, where do you bury the survivors?
What's the difference between a greyhound bus station and a lobster wearing a bra?
What do you call an anorexic blonde with a yeast infection?
What's the difference between a chick pea and a garbanzo bean?
What does your s*** smell like?
What do you call a dirty drug addict with a lisp?
Why did the shark cross the ocean?
What do your call a deer with no eyes?
How many times do you have to tickle a squid to make it laugh?
How do you fit an elephant in the subway?
What did the blind man say to the deaf man?
What do you call a hot chick in Boston?
Why did the Egyptian spit out his water?
Why did the Cell Tower Cafe get bad reviews?
What's the last thing that goes through a bug's head as it hits the windshield?
What do you call a woman on her period?
What do you call a non-violent venereal disease?
Why does James Brown like South Korea?
What is worse, ignorance or apathy?
When are they going to bring slavery back?
What's the difference between communism and capitalism?
Can somebody help me debug Malaysian Flight Simulator?
What did Batman say to Robin before Robin got in the car?
What did the autobots call Optimus Prime after he died?
Where do bears go after smoking some weed?
What's the difference between Father's Day and Mother's Day?
What do you get when you cross a pyrotechnician and Mexican food?
Why can't Asian parents make a white baby?
Do you need a bag?
What do you call breads ability to smell?
What is Superman's greatest weakness?
How did the Jewish man take advantage of the wasted girl at the bar?
Why doesn't India celebrate halloween?
What is the fiercest animal in the savanna?
What did the Mexican firefighter name his sons?
How much did Juan weigh after eating Chinese food?
Did you hear about the constipated math teacher's problem?
Why do hot girls always go for assholes?
What are the similarities between fat chicks and bricks?
What did the fish say when it bumped its head?
What food guide does a Chicagoan need in Japan?
How do you prepare corn like Sean Connery?
What did the farmer say to Lil Jon?
What gets bigger every time I watch my neighbor undress in her bedroom window?
Why did the brother octopi look so alike?
What did the black horse name its daughter?
Why don't cannibals eat clowns?
How many Software Engineers does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the hardest thing about eating a vegetable?
What did Mustafa's dad say after he founded Turkey?
What do you call a Latino on a trick bike?
What do you call lesbians doing karate?
What is the difference between a sock and a camera?
What did the mother bullet say to the father bullet?
Why did the plumber cry?
Why are Muslims so good at driving at night?
How many dads does it take to change a light bulb?
Why does snoop dog carry an umbrella?
How do Malaysian airlines serve all their drinks?
Did you guys know that diarrhea is genetic?
Do you know what i did the first time i got a boner?
What's red and smells like green paint?
Do you know what band really bugs me?
Did you hear about the guy hit with the 2 x 4?
What's the leader of north korea's wife wear when she's not in the mood?
Do you want to hear a joke about pizza?
Why don't blind people skydive???
Why don't hat store owners and pet shop owner get along?
Why is it called an Xbox One?
What do you call silly pasta?
What do delinquent shapes get up to?
Did you hear about the 4th place winner with the muscle condition?
Why can't French people count to 5?
What is a doctor's most important quality?
How does one robber ask another how they're doing?
How does a Jew make coffee?
What is Reddit's favorite pirate?
What do you get if you cross a rooster with a jar of peanut butter?
Why can't Iron Man stay in a steady relationship?
Did you know Canada was originally going to be called "CND"?
What's the best way to save on toilet paper?
What do you call a coin featuring the image of a spaceship and a rooster?
Why was the vampire's girlfriend mad at him?
At what age are musicians the loudest?
How many people do you have to kick out of their houses to have a World Cup?
Why did the relationship between the creationist and Organic molecule not last ?
How many mens' rights activists does out take to change a lightbulb?
How was copper wire invented ?
Hey guys ,wanna hear a joke about a broken pencil?
Who always gets to the LGBT rally the fastest?
Why don't witches wear panties when flying?
Why can't you hear a psychiatrist urinating?
How does Mike Tyson track Will Smith in the snow?
What do you get when you put root beer in a square glass?
What did the spice say when it was told it wasn't flavourful enough?
What's orange and sounds like a carrot!!!????
What do you call a single Mexican man?
What is Batman's favorite thing to do with his money?
Do you think it's ok to lie to a girl in order to sleep with her...?
What is the difference between 3 dicks and a joke?
How do you get a fly out of the kitchen?
Shouldn't you pet him first?
Did you hear about the guy who couldn't afford vanity plates?
Hey are you from Gryfindor?
What is the difference between Snow White and Brazil?
What is the difference between Iron man and Iron woman?
How do Russians drive to Alaska?
What's the most popular contraceptive in Israel?
What is more dangerous than a polar bear?
Why did the gamer start working out?
How is a raven like a writing desk?
What do you call a man who loses pounds for a living?
What kind of bug do you find on a long car ride?
Can you tease, please and never squeeze Argentina?
What do you someone with no body and no nose?
Hey can you take the next left?
What did Putin say when the world got mad at him for invading the Ukraine?
what do you call a man who has a rabbit up his bum?
Why don't 90 year old women have sex?
Why is an executioner a terrible high-fiver?
[Programming Joke] What method did SFML perform when the Human lost to the AI?
How do you blow a movie quote?
How do you know that you are a redditor?
Why do scientists call Helium , Barium and Curium the medical elements?
Where is the best place to hide something?
Why did so many people show up to see the cannibal get cremated?
Why did the washing machine stop?
Why is it never hot in churches?
Why can't your nose be twelve inches long?
Why do gay people smoke cigarettes?
What do you call a midnight run to get ecstasy?
Whats a good come back for this joke?
How did the jews fight off Nazis?
Why did the crazed Packers fan throw out all of Aaron Rodgers's forks?
Knock knock. Who's there? Hotel. Hotel who?
What gave the blonde a stomach ache?
Ever heard the one about Superman, Wonder Woman and the Invisible Man?
What do you call a guy with rabbits up his arse/ass?
How do you overcome tyrannical pancakes?
Whats your favourite brand of beer?
Why did the rapper go to Whole Foods?
What did socialists use before candles?
Did you hear that the king of the jungle fell into a deep, deep sleep?
[Game of Thrones] How do Littlefinger's prostitutes get in & out of the brothel?
What do you call a nervous javelin thrower?
Why do frat bros hate fruit loops?
What's the difference between a pile of dead babies, and a Ferrari?
Why do rednecks hate math?
Why did Johnny Bravo go to the pet store?
How do fish make calls?
What was the Neo Nazi's favorite computer game?
What do you call it when you use Icy Hot as lube?
What do you call two black guys walking down the street?
Why did the fat girl cross the road?
What is a ducks favourite drug?
What can turn a fruit into a vegetable?
Did you hear the one about the guy with five dicks?
Why did the meatball chef get fired from the middle school cafeteria?
Why the long face ?
What Time Did Sean Connery Arrive at Wimbledon?
Why is Dave Mustaine described as "heavy metal"?
What's more fun then swinging a baby on a clothes line?
How about a dirty joke?
Why is Adam known as the first accountant?
How many goals did Germany score?
How do you catch a unique bird?
Why was the circuit arrested?
How did Hitler masturbate?
What do you call a hobo who becomes a pimp?
Did you hear about the skywriter's autobiography?
Need an Ark?
What did the pig say on a hot summer day?
When is a door not a door??
(Another nerdy joke) Did you hear the one about the anorexic girl?
How many Brazilian national football players does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a rich South American?
Why doesn't Waldo wear stripes?
What's the difference between a singer-songwriter and a puppy?
Did you hear about the opera singing monk?
How many sad soccer fans are there today?
What do you call someone who walks into a building full of people?
Why did Brazil lose the World Cup?
Did you know Sally Ride had blue eyes?
Did you here about the nun who took up knitting?
Whats red and smells like blue paint?
What do you call an eagle that is sick?
What's the difference between a pimple and a Catholic Priest?
What's the difference between a lawyer and a prostitute?
Why do jews watch porn backwards?
what did the fish say to the jelous fish?
Why are pirates, pirates?
Did you guys hear about the talking polar bear?
what do you call a dog magician?
Did you hear about the new show, Scrabble on Broadway?
What did the tampon tell the other tampon?
What do you call a Punjabi fellow stuck in the middle of a shark-filled ocean?
what is the hardest part of being a pedophile?
What do hackers do when they go on vacation?
Who is a chicken's favorite composer?
What did the suicide bombing instructor say to his students?
what is the best gift for a jehovah's witness?
Dad, can I have another cup of water?
Favorite joke as a kid. How did Hitler tie his shoes?
What did the Queen fans say at the stoning?
Have you heard about the guy who had his whole left side amputated?
Did you know that camels can last longer without water than sex?
Why was Anakin Skywalker king of the pub crawl?
What do you call a white guy with an air horn?
How do you make a German Shepherd?
Where is Hitler's bathroom?
What do you call a guy that never farts in public?
What does sex and banks have in common?
Did you hear the one about Laurence the Roman Pot Smoker?
Why did the chicken kill himself?
Why does C. Ronaldo comb his hair every game break?
Did I tell you the one about the maize?
Why are Firetrucks red?
What's the worst thing about a September harvest?
What does the most interesting man in the world eat for breakfast?
Did you hear about the man whose first girlfriend was a dwarf?
Did you here the joke about the dead guy?
A fly gets hit by a truck. what is the last thing to go through it's head?
What do you call a bunch of Indians running down a hill?
Why would you get mad?
Did you hear about the kidnapping at the elementary school?
How Much Did the Pirate Charge For Corn?
Why couldn't JFK become a boxer?
When did mathematicians get their independence?
Why doesn't anyone care about the plot in porn?
What do you call a german tampon?
What was the name of Europe's most famous Jewish knight?
What do I have in common with Franz Kafka?
What do you call it when a sheep sells his wool for money?
Do you remember when you were a kid and you'd just sit a blow bubbles all afternoon?
How did Jack know exactly where to find the goose in the giant's castle?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to change a light-bulb?
Why did the cowboy get a wiener dog?
What's the difference between Tim Howard and Jesus?
What do you call a fake record player?
You know what a vegetarian will never get?
Why did the Nazi cross the road?
Grossest Joke I've Ever Heard. What's the difference between Menstrual Blood and Sand?
What do you call a road full of giraffes?
What has 72 teeth and holds back the hulk?
Why shouldn't you eat meat from pot smoking cows?
How many drums does it take to make a good ska band?
How many American golf fans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the difference between a drunk driver and a high driver?
How does a young man make an old woman feel young again?
How does J.G. Wentworth tell you that he's hungry?
Why should you never order the eggs while in France?
What do you call a game of basketball between two Mexicans?
Why did the CIA torture the Russian wasp?
What do you call it when a psychic midget escape from prison?
Why couldn't the man open a fish and herb shop?
What do you call a mollusc that's just short of consciousness?
What do you call an amphibian in hiding?
What do you call a thief that leaves a trail?
You know what the doctor told the midget?
What did a lemon with a lisp say to the juicer?
Have I told you how much I don't like the cars that can go up vertical surfaces?
What did the band kid say to the other band kid after she found out he was cheating on her?
What is Miley Cyrus's favorite color?
Best short jokes?
Why did Frosty the snowman pull down his pants?
Why do white girl groups only walk together in odd numbers?
How many Norwegians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
You know how you'll see something a million times, but can't find it when you need it?
Did you hear the joke about the Dutch speaking farmer?
What's so good about being Swiss?
Do you know where the Belgium waffle design comes from?
What did the college junior say just before her toe was cut off?
Why did the little boy flush a pencil down the toilet?
How did the Mexican want his sex?
Why Are Demons So Fat?
What did the pirate Louis Riel say to the villagers?
What do black guys do after sex?
What do you call a mexican on amphetamines?
How is religion like a penis?
Why is Thors bother so secretive?
What do you call an someone who's an itch that begins with a B?
Where did Zooey Deschanel grow up?
Where do Na'vi go when they get hurt?
What did the bicycle repairman done?
What does the Chinese government call an American with a PhD in physics, math and chemistry?
How many anarchists does it take to change a lightbulb?
What kind of tea is hard to swallow?
What's a pirate's favourite type of weaponry?
How can you tell retarded kids form the art students?
What's the difference between up and down?
what do you call the study of color?
racist joke, any better?
What do you call a flock of crows who are resisting the urge to sin?
Why did the kid drop his ice cream cone?
What does a guitarist say when he gets to his gig?
What do you call a partying Hansen's disease patient?
Why can't anarchists draw straight lines?
What's the difference between a magic show and a strip show?
What kind of Bees make milk?
Why aren't hippies good pitchers?
What do truck drivers and porn stars have in common?
What kind of melons always have big weddings?
Why do the Amazons like Sundays?
You know whats hard?
Did you hear about the guy who swam the English Channel with no arms or legs?
What do you call the National Conference for Bridgebuilders?
How can you tell the clan of a Scotsman?
Why wouldn't the man dance?
How do soldiers tell if a woman is a genuine Red-Head?
What does Tony Stark call his semen?
Why is the Star Trek enterprise like toilet paper?
What's the difference between a black person and cancer?
What's a gay guy's favorite city in Africa?
Why can't Spongebob make the honor roll?
What is the name of an annoying creature that is notorious for biting humans in the tropics?
What is a cat's favorite vacation spot?
Why do christians avoid trigonometry ?
What do you call a woman leaving an abortion clinic?
Do you know what is laziness?
Why did the blonde climb the chain-link fence?
How do you know if a homeless person has a girlfriend?
What have working for the KGB and oral sex got in common?
What does Mexican binary code consist of?
What did the mute say to the priest?
How do you get down from an Elephant?
What kinda meat does a priest eat on Friday?
What do you call a bra stretched across a road?
Why are cows so horny?
What did the french bloomers say to the sexy thong?
Why didn't the camgirl show up for work?
What's the difference between ignorance and arrogance?
Why do melons insist on having big weddings?
What's the president's favorite vegetable?
Why do guitar amps hum?
Why do teenage girls seem to always hang out in odd numbered groups?
What's Obama's favorite game console?
What is a Ninja's favorite beverage?
One of my campers made this up today: What do you call a bear with no teeth?
What do you call someone with no body and a nose?
What did the American football coach say to the Germany coach after losing in the world cup?
How much did Adidas spend in advertising at the World Cup this year?
What do you call a rapper who likes honey for breakfast?
Why did the tea-bag fall down the hill?
What is the most common owl in England?
What is a nomad?
What's the difference between your bonus, and your penis ?
Where do you get sent if you have a brainfreeze?
What did the Pope say to the hot atheist girl?
What's hard, white, and 10 inches?
What happened when the butcher backed into his meat grinder?
Why should you always take at least two Baptists fishing?
What do you buy a recently neutered cat?
Why should they have hosted the World Cup in a different country this year?
What does the Pope Jean-Paul 2 and the little girl kidnapped by Boko Haram have in common?
Why was Luis Suárez expelled from the rap contest?
What do you call a blonde who dyes her hair black?
How do you make your penis bigger?
What are the advantages to living in Switzerland?
Why aren't there any knock knock jokes about America?
What has 3 heads, 2 legs, and 4 arms?
What's red, 6in. long and my gf cries when I feed it to her?
What happens when you join two Koreans together?
Why did the orange fall out with the orange-peeler?
What's the difference between my grandma and a baby?
How do you know that William Wallace is normally distributed?
How can you tell that your waitress is having a bad day?
What do you call a woman who wants lots of compensation?
What's the difference between ignorance, apathy, and ambivalence?
How do you use an african man to get people to meet your demands?
What do you get when you cross a ring-tailed lemur with a U-Haul truck?
Whats an Italians favourite part of football?
Did you hear the one about the gay midget?
How does every racist joke begin?
Want to hear my impression of an extractor fan?
What's the worst thing about Mexican and Black jokes?
Why did Jesus not play FIFA World Cup in 33 ?
What do you call a black persons toe?
What did one lesbian frog say to the other lesbian frog?
What do you call a poorly made massive dumpling?
Does your dog bite?
Why does pasta always have to pay so much for car insurance?
Why are gay prostitutes so expensive in China?
Why did the Broadway star with a tiny butt get evicted?
What is a castrated male's favorite operating system?
What do you call an article written about a dead astronaut?
Do you know there is a serial number printed on every condom?
What did the busy port master say to the rowdy pirates who wanted to dock?
How did the depressed man get around town?
My favorite clean joke: What do you do when you stub your toe?
wut equasion do u use when u wanna kno tha prbility that u & ur girl are gonna b 2gether 4ever?
Why did the cat go to the doctors?
Q. What do you call a black man flying a plane?
What did the old Kentucky colonel say when he got his Viagra?
What's a mathematicians worst nightmare?
You know why the Germans lost WWII?
What did the boulder say to the other boulder?
Why doesn't Ronald Reagan drink orange juice?
There was a question about Greece's economy in a German maths exam. What was it worth?
How many Latin Americans does it take to change a lightbulb?
What does a black man do after sex?
What do a three paragraph term paper and a 5'2" Mexican have in common?
What did the cannibal get when he was home late for dinner?
What do all 'Tickle Me Elmo' toys receive before leaving the factory?
What's the main difference between light and hard?
What do you call a missing shape?
What's the difference between England and a cup of tea?
How do you tell an Italian has a flat tire?
What is Arnold Schwarzenegger's sexual orientation?
What do you call a terrible performance of Han Solo: The Musical?
did you hear about the agnostic dyslexic insomniac?
What do you call an integral that doesn't like derivatives?
What should you do when you see a blond with a pin in her mouth?
What's the difference between lobsters and crabs?
What's worse than biting into an apple and finding a worm?
Have you heard about Corduroy pillows?
What's the difference between an oyster with epilepsy and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What did the father lightning bolt do to his son when he miabehaved?
Why did the nigger walks into a bar?
What do you call a group of millionaires sitting around watching the NBA finals ?
What do you call an Englishman in the World Cup final?
Whats the hardest part about being a pedophile?
How does Bran Stark get into a whorehouse?
What's better than winning the Special Olympics?
A gay deer eats what ?
What about the two old ladies who brought a bottle of whiskey to the baseball game?
What's the difference between England and a teabag?
How come when a woman is pregnant, people rub her tummy...?
What did the buffalo say before sending his son off to college?
How many Jews does it take to fix an oven?
What did the grad students call the new Asian post-doc?
Whats the difference between roast beef and pea soup?
[OC] Did you hear about this new restaurant they're opening called The Glory Hole?
What do you call a crossdressing nanny in Martha's Vineyard?
what did the priest say before he ate his salad?
What's the difference between England and a tea bag?
What do you call a black guy who just graduated from medical school?
What is it called when two tectonic plates have a romantic relationship?
What does spinach and anal sex have in common?
Why isn't Helen Keller a good driver?
What instrument does the uterus play?
What is it that separates humans from animals?
who says homosexuality isn’t a decision?
Did you hear about Lance Armstrong having a threesome?
What is the speed limit of Sex?
Whats the difference between acne and a Priest?
Why should you never play poker with African cats?
What's good about Switzerland?
What's the difference between a crackhead and a John?
How many performance artists does it take to change a lightbulb?
How did the hillbilly find his sister in the woods?
What did the Urologist tell his newly accepted resident?
Two kittens are sitting on a roof. Which one falls off first?
What's the difference between UFOs and an honest politician?
Why are 90 degree angles so cocky?
Did you hear about the skydiving company that stopped providing their own parachutes?
Why Do Elephants Have Big Ears?
did you see Iran play in the world cup?
How is Harrison Ford like the Reddit admins?
How do you make a Swiss Roll?
Where are your buccaneers?
Cloudy with a chance of meatballs?
Why did the atoms cross the road?
What do you call a nursing bear?
What kind of underwear do old people wear?
How are Roman Polanski and pimples similar?
why don't vampires go to frat parties?
Why was Snape in the middle of the road?
Why is the love of a woman with 20 children magical?
Just made this one up... Q: What's a theater student's favorite drink?
What do you call a senior citizen from Mexico?
What's a good example that oil is a bad lubricant?
What's the great thing about 25 year olds?
Why do tigers always beat cheetahs at hide-and-seek?
What did the DJ say to the jazz musician?
Why did that animal's wife get a divorce?
Why shouldn't you get a Bachelors in Science?
What's the difference between a woman coming out of church and a woman taking a bath?
What does a piano, tuna, and a bucket of glue have in common?
why didn't the cannibal want to be late to dinner?
How do you know when you're in a true, tough lesbian bar?
Have you ever heard about the man who wrote the funniest joke in world?
What's the difference between a drug dealer and a hooker?
What's black and hard?
Have you ever heard of a torture device called a Chinese finger trap?
How should a doctor treat a patient with Mesothelioma?
Why is Jesus bad at crossword puzzles?
Where do people in Ghana go to watch football?
How do triangles communicate?
How do you measure how funny an electrical engineer is?
What should I buy for dinner?
What celebrity is most likely to stab you?
Why did the porn-star get hit by a bus?
Can a ninja throw a star?
What did Jay-Z call Beyoncé before they were married?
Why did the bread machine go to see a therapist?
Why can't the Chinese be Nazis?
Did you ever blow bubbles when you were a kid?
Why do lesbians have cats?
Hey did you hear the punchline about the scary cow?
Why was the young strawberry upset?
What is worse than a worm in a cherry?
Whaat do you get when you cross a Swede and a Norwegian?
What's the difference between a nun, and a prostitute in a bathtub?
What term is used to describe a phenomenon where a European mans ejaculates prematurely?
What is Sherlock Holmes' favorite tree?
How to blind parachutist know they're close to the ground?
What do you get if you take off the red dot on the Japanese flag?
Did you know that calculus was never taught in southern schools before the 1960s?
What's yellow and lives off dead beetles?
What's the difference between hazelnuts and deernuts?
What happens when Bosnian terrorists start attacking municipal government buildings?
What did the salesman at footlocker say to the customer?
What is the proudest body part?
What is something that is always heard but never seen?
How much power does a hearse have?
What do you call a space pub filled with white chicks?
How do you make a fireman cry?
Why can hipsters listen to Michael Jackson again?
What's Adolf Hitler's favorite letter?
What do you get when you mix S&M with R&B?
Where does a divine beaver live?
What's the difference between a freezer and a faget?
Did you hear about the two radio antennas that got married?
What's the worst part about locking your keys in your car, outside of a planned parenthood center?
Whats the difference between a boner and lamborghini?
Why didn't the tree get any presents for Christmas?
I made up a joke: What did the physicist say to the Jedi?
What do you call someone who believes rotten eggs smell bad, but doesn't care?
How do Frenchmen share files?
What is a menstruating woman's favorite genre of movies?
What do you get when you boil tree trunks with sugar?
What is the world coming too?
Did you hear George R R Martin committed suicide?
what do you get when you give chimp bluetooth?
Why did Waldo wear a striped shirt?
Knock Knock* Who's there?
What happens when you piss off a pepper?
How do you get Squirtle, Charmander and Pikachu onto a bus?
How do Germans tie their shoes?
What town in the continental United States produces the most alligator pears per year?
What do you call an orgy with five black people?
What did Patrick Stewart say when he proposed to his wife?
What's Sean Connery's favorite sport and when does he play it?
What came first the chicken or the egg?
What's the worse quality of a hermit crab?
What type of fruit is not allowed to get married?
When does Sean Connery like to show up at Wimbeldon?
What was the yacht doing while it played heavy metal music?
What was the name of Russia's first female traffic cop?
What does Batman do for Father's Day?
What's the difference between a Triscuit and a Lesbian??
What did the lesbian vampire say to the other?
What do they call Bro Chads in the U.K.?
Have you guys heard the joke about the broken pencil?
What do Tiger Woods and baby seals have in common?
Why did the Raisin take a Prune to the Prom?
Why couldn't the drummer make it to the show?
Why do they call the hardest group, "The Group of Death"?
Why did the lone dolphin stop swimming?
What do ducks smoke?
Why should you never trust atoms?
Why did Demi Moore replace Sarah Jessica Parker in Wild Oats?
How many Polaks does it take to come up with heliocentric theory?
Why couldn't Batman go to the movie?
What did the boy with no arms & legs get at the World Cup?
What is green and flies above Poland?
How do you get your girlfriend to stop smoking??
What do you call a wireless network that goes down?
What do Americans call the summer holidays?
Did you hear about the dog who had sleep apnea?
How do you know if someone is half texan and half Canadian?
What do vegan zombies say?
Why don't they teach sex ed and drivers ed at the same time in Mexico?
Why does Yoda like sheep?
Why does the U.S. Navy use powdered soap?
Who's Becky, Stan?
Why don't Americans get knock knock jokes?
Why wouldn't Samus go below Brinstar?
What's harder the softer it gets?
What did the bad soccer announcer get for Christmas?
Why do white girls only go out in odd numbered groups?
Why did the fish fall off it's bike?
How does a Jew make a cup of tea?
Does anyone know where Engagement, Ohio is?
What country does fried fish swim in?
Why are people leaving the Ukraine?
How is being a pimp like being a farmer?
Where do rabbits learn to fly?
Hey have you ever tried puppy love?
What is Pinocchio's favourite kind of sex?
Why do Lannisters hate turtles?
What is a nation inhabitated and reigned by stoners called?
Did you know that New York has two capitals?
Why can't you find any painkillers in the jungle?
Did you hear about the Mexican train robber?
What would bears be without bees?
What do you call a kid with no friends!?
How do the people of northern Iraq manage to get so much done?
How many Freudians does it take to change a lightbulb?
What does the nosy pepper do?
What do you call a one-legged Asian woman?
What do you call a cassette single of The Proclaimers' hit "I'm Gonna Be (500 Miles)"?
You know what's stupider than a cow?
What is the best thing about having sex with twenty-five year olds?
What monsters are all the tools in the toolbox afraid of?
how do you catch a unique cat?
Did you hear about that Hollywood actress who got stabbed?
What did the fish say when he ran into a cement wall?
Have you heard the one about the angry mob?
Why do hens sit on eggs?
What drink did the vampire order at the bar?
What do you call Dracula when he goes swimming?
Why did the students need a ladder to get into school?
What did the kid who could see dead eskimos say?
What do jokes and penises have in common?
What did the mother say to the child who refused to eat his fossil for dinner?
What does Mortal Kombat and a church in Helsinki have in common?
How many lawyers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a farmer who's excellent at what he does?
Did you hear about the new Mike Tyson computer?
Why did the old man hate living next to the tennis courts?
Have you heard the latest Unitarian Universalist miracle?
Why did the skeleton not go to prom?
How many Kings of Spain abdicated last week?
Why do black people put their garbage in clear trash bags?
What do old people smell like?
What's the worst part about getting a lung transplant?
What is the difference between a fly and a mosquito?
What is the difference between a blonde in a church and a blonde in the bath tub?
What is long and hard that a Australian bride gets in her wedding night?
Why did Moses vote for Al Gore?
Why did hitler killed himself?
What do you call a two-headed lesbian dinosaur?
Why are so many Mathematicians vegetarians?
Why Can't you see the bacteria in milk?
Did you hear the one about premature ejaculation?
Want to hear a bird joke?
What type of meat are your calves made of?
Why is a bear brown?
What is long and hard that a Polish bride gets on her wedding night?
What is the definition of a farmer?
What's the most depressed thing in the bathroom?
How many friend-zoned guys does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a Jewish incendiary device?
What do you call it when a Cat wins a Dogshow?
Ever wondered what your nose is for?
Why does Tumblr hate symmetrical shapes?
What do you do with dead atoms?
What's the Middle East's favorite candy?
What did Iocaste say to Oedipus when he dropped his plate?
What did one architect say to the other?
What is the difference between a woman on her period and a terrorist?
What did the old chimney say to the younger chimney?
(GoT Joke) Why did the King's Justice join Run DMC?
Where is the first tennis match mentioned in the Bible?
You have a donkey and I have a rooster. Your donkey eats my roosters legs. What do you have?
Go to racist joke, what's yours?
What does the leper say to the prostitute?
Why did Simba have trouble returning to Pride Rock?
What do you call two banana peels?
What does rock music and my grandpa have in common?
What's the difference between boogers and rice pudding?
Why did Tigger get stuck in the toilet?
How do little german children tie their shoes?
1.What is Bruce Lee's favorite beverage?
Why do computer programmers spend so much time in the shower?
[OC]What do you call a shrunken walrus?
What's the difference between a toilet seat and dinner?
Did you hear about the man who proposed to his long-distance girlfriend?
Why do Marxists drink herbal tea?
What's it like having sex with a wave?
Did you hear about the penis-less man that got excited?
Why did Ernest Hemingway kill himself?
Where's Eritrea?
Why did a pile of gravel go to jail?
What do you call tree sap that won't stop running?
What's it called when two strains of a disease are identical?
How did the media know JFK was cheating on his wife?
What do you call a stomach ache you get from eating a Cuban sandwich?
Why is the universe expanding?
What do you get when you cross an elephant with a grape?
What do you get when you cross a mosquito and a mountain climber?
What's the difference between David Blaine and the NRA?
Why did the burger sit beside the telephone?
Have you heard about the gay Chinese prostitute?
Did you hear about the Kool-Aid Man?
What's Hellen Keller's favorite color?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say when he got asked to play in a film about classic composers?
What's the difference between a cock and a sausage roll?
What else do you need when you use your Batman shampoo?
What did the pulse say to the legume as he left?
What mental illness does Hank Hill have?
What do you get when you combine a penis and a potato?
What do you call a classical composer's butthole after a night of bad Mexican food?
Is the penis a muscle or a bone?
What made Tesla successful ?
How did robbers gain entry to steal from Miley Cyrus?
— Dad, what does «indifference and incompetence» mean?
What do you call Nashville's Junior Hockey League?
Where are chocolate coins made?
What does a flaky boyfriend and constipation have in common?
You know what they say about living on Navy ships?
(OC) Wanna know my secret to not catching STD's?
Why did Holden Caulfield hate his job at Sprint?
The most offensive jokes thread?
How do you catch a Polar bear?
How does the butcher introduce his wife?
What's Putin's new favorite song?
Why are the Irish so rich?
Did you hear that they are building massive oscillating blades in New York?
What is a crossbreed between an elephant and a rhinoceros called?
What are some good deli related jokes?
want to hear a dirty joke?
Where is the only place engineers are considered artistic?
What do you call it when a gangster accidentally kills a fellow gang member?
How many Dragon Ball Z characters does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did the celebrity say to the tabloid?
Why do Scots fuck sheep at the edge of a cliff?
Why dont Demons fear oxidation?
How many feminists do you need to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the most Jewish instrument?
What's Snoop Dogg's favorite time of day?
What does a chicken call its backpack?
What is the difference between a brothel and a circus?
Why do soccer announcers make terrible business executives?
How many lawyers does it take to shingle a roof?
Why do white girls walk in groups of odd numbers?
How can you tell if your buddy is gay?
Why did the boy like doing trigonometry?
Where does the president keep his armies?
Why do hockey players always make terrible birthday cakes?
Why did the Libertarian cross the road?
What did one ocean say to the other one?
Why did Skrillex lose his job at Long John Silvers?
Where did the hamburger go to dance?
What did Pythagoras say about the pyramid scheme?
Why is there cotton on top of the pills inside a pill bottle?
How many literalists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why are Jedis allowed to use negative numbers?
What do you call a middle eastern sorceress?
Whats the difference between Game of Thrones and Twitter?
what the cell say to its sister cell when she stepped on his toe?
What do German women's lingerie and Africa have in common?
What do you call a broken can-opener?
What do you call a pirate that pees on other people?
Who decides which weeds to kill in the garden?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl use the bathroom?
How do you get a 300 pound woman into bed?
Why do men like blowjobs?
What time is it when twenty dogs and one cat get together?
Is that dog poo?
What do you say if you're testing a new firearm?
Have you ever seen an elephant hiding in a tree?
How do you get an elephant across the freeway?
Why are cars in Russia so slow?
What's the hardest part of breaking up with a leper ?
Why did the blond snort NutraSweet?
How does moses make his tea?
What sound does a Hispanic pacman make?
Why do beaches not get sarcasm?
What does prison have in common with biology?
What do you do if you come across a lion in the jungle?
Did you hear about the German doing an impression at the talent show?
What's a pirate's favorite rapper?
Whats green and goes through walls?
What do you call a stingy douchebag who likes plants?
What did Mary say the first time she changed Jesus' diaper?
Why does carpet never make a sound?
What do you call a lazy fan of the old Price is Right?
What did the curtain rod say to the blinds?
What is a jewish golfer's favorite vegetable?
What does a physics cow say?
What are goosebumps used for?
What is Gordon Ramsay's least favourite subreddit?
Why did Steve Jobs decline chemotherapy?
What's a Yankee?
What do you call an overpriced circumcision?
What's brown ans sticky???
How does Mulan's boyfriend explain himself when she caught him smoking pot?
What's the difference between a taxidermist and a tax collector?
Why was the orphan so successful?
Why would Rip Van Winkle make a good janitor?
what is big data ?
Whats the hardest part eating a vegetable?
What is the difference between a terrorist hideout and a school?
What is will?
What's the difference between a tire and 365 condoms?
Why do Avon Ladies walk funny?
What did the Mother say to her son when she saw him eating cookies for breakfast?
How many friend-zoned guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do making love in a canoe and Budweiser have in common?
What company spent over $6.2 billion in buying Viagra?
What is the difference between an American rabbit and a French rabbit?
what are some funny jokes you know?
What do Micheal Jackson and caviar have in common?
Did you hear about the blind man walking past the fishmonger's?
What did the donuts do on their date?
Why couldn't the whistle blower make it home for the holidays?
What part of the body never wins?
A Sexist Joke: Why are women bad at parking?
What did Australian Jesus say after the Last Supper?
What did the Mexican firefighter call his son??
What kind of boxes do gay boxes like?
Did you hear about the new restaraunt on the moon?
What did the Mexican say after two houses fell on him?
How would the Mexican Star-Spangled Banner begin?
Why don't people from Yorkshire use deodorant?
What is half the diameter of a radish?
How is a Ska band the opposite of a rhinocerus?
What is it called when buckets of paint conspire with each other?
You know what doesn't suck?
Did you hear about the guy who took some dude's ear off with a vacuum cleaner?
Why do medicine boxes always have a little bit of cotton in them?
Why do Hippies love Didgeridoo?
Why are ska bands so clean?
What's a magician's favorite Mexican dish?
How many nice guys does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did terrorists used to call Fidel Castro?
Why did Mrs. Piggy's relationship fail?
How do you describe the facial features of a man who shaves with sculpting tools?
What do you call it when a valley girl gives blow jobs for Louis Vuitton's?
Who did Fat Albert accuse of leaving a burning cross on his lawn?
Where to stand as a teacher?
What do you call a trailer park in a tornado?
What's the difference between Mike Jones and Michael Jordan?
Why doesn't Magneto wear his old costume anymore?
What is someone doing when they are disposing of diseased radishes?
What's the difference between jam and peanut butter?
What did the Kiwi say to the Jew?
How does a barber avoid getting hair in his food?
How many communists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Can I use cash to pay for a new electric car?
Is it okay to hate a certain race?
What is the difference between 2 dicks, and a joke?
What did the diva with Alzheimer's disease say?
Waiter: How did you find your steak sir?
Have you heard the one about the roof?
What does a vegetable use to change a flat?
Why are Jews so good at making action movies?
What do you call an incestuous nephew?
Why doesn't George RR Martin use twitter?
What do Justin Timberlake and Theon Greyjoy have in common?
Why was the meeting for impotent men cancelled?
Why did the tomcat get sent to prison?
Did you hear that they exhumed the body of John Lennon?
Why do you have to take more than one Baptist with you when you go fishing?
What does Tom Cruise have in common with gay porn stars?
Why was the ground all white after Custer's last stand?
Why do Russians have so many bear fighting stories?
What do you call a baby deer's droppings?
What is the radio operator's favourite romantic story?
How do cats park their cars?
How do u castrate a priest ?
What did Tom Riddle's calculator tell Harry Potter?
Why do hippies wear pachouli??
How many ska kids does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do the Welsh call a sheep when it's tied to a lamp post?
What's the difference between a Taliban outpost and a Pakistani Elementary school?
Did you hear about the cannibal?
What's Masta P's favorite fruit?
Why do sorority girls travel in odd numbers?
What has 100 teeth and keeps Godzilla at bay?
Did you hear about the kidnapping at the school?
What do you call a Chinese lady with one leg?
Why did the pig walk into the kitchen?
How did the hillbilly find the sheep in the tall grass?
What does a sandwich filling share in common with Joffrey Lannister?
What is the only part of a vegetable you cannot eat?
What's a priest's favorite X-men?
Did you hear about the corduroy pillows?
Want to know how copper wire was invented?
Did you hear about the new emo pizza?
How many Tourette's suffers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's a pirate's favourite letter?
What is a ducks favorite snack?
What do buccaneers let off on bonfire night?
What language does a Jewish homo speak?
Did you hear about the one asian guy who failed calculus?
How many men does it take to change a lightbulb?
Knock knock. Who's there? 9/11. 9/11 who?
What do you call a burning white guy?
Have you ever heard of the ckicken plant?
What's the difference between an epileptic farmer and a prostitute with diarrhea?
What do a burnt pizza and a baby have in common?
Why is it tough to make it as a pornstar?
What do you call a well-rounded porn star?
Did you hear about Evel Knievel's cousin Klu Klux Knievel?
What is it called when a Jewish woman ovulates?
What do a mystic and a hot dog vendor have in common?
Did you hear about the plane full of anorexics that crashed?
What's the difference between a pick pocket and a peeping tom?
what is a gays least favorite fruit?
What do your mom and monkeys have in common?
What country is the most fragile?
I psych student posted this joke on Facebook and I don't get it, can someone explain?
What do you call a red headed baker?
Why did the turkey get kicked out of the football stadium?
What do Harry Potter and Kermit the Frog's penis have in common?
Did you hear about the pornstar in court that was tried by a group of his peers?
Why do cows wear bells around there neck?
What do you call a burning rocket?
Why did the redneck Father walk his kid to school?
How do you spell it?
Did you hear about that new movie about Hitler?
How manny women dose it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between a fox and a pig?
Did you hear about the kindergartener with a bad knee?
How many tutors does it take to make a wild dog literate?
What do you call a duck that likes to steal?
What did the cat say when I shut him in the refridgerator?
Why does Anders Brevik oppose gassing the Muslims?
Why are native South African Tribesman immune to lightning?
Is Monica Lewinsky good at the piano?
Did you hear the one about the Viking who was reincarnated?
Whats the difference between a hooker and a lawyer?
What do you call a German think tank?
What's a Jackhammer's Best Friend?
What do you call a turlte that flies?
What's the worst part about being a redneck?
What kind of bird does 2 Chainz own?
What's does the self reliant alcoholic Rabbi Pedophile do in his spare time?
What's the difference between having a son and having a daughter?
What do you call a greedy marsupial?
Why was Stalin literally worse than Hitler?
Have you heard there's a new disease you can get from using Linux?
How many Freudian analysts does it take to change a light bulb?
What did the cucumber say to the salad?
Why did sally fall of the swing?
Why did the sun wear sunglasses?
Did you hear about the Shaman?
What is worse than a worm in your apple?
How does a stripper find jobs?
What did the NSA agent say when the blizzard hit?
What did a piece of tofu say when it got dirty?
What's the difference between Barbara Walters and Oprah?
why did the scarecrow get a promotion?
What is a carpenters dream girl?
Why can't you tell jokes to a Nympho?
What do you call a blonde that dyed her hair brown?
Why was Oedipus against profanity?
What's the shortest Tom Cruise joke?
How do pirates know they exist?
What does a Catholic priest and a silver medalist have in common?
Why do chicken coops have only 2 doors?
What's better than winning gold in the Paralympics?
What's a redditor who makes pirate jokes' favorite letters?
What's the difference between a whore and Nickleback?
What is the main ingredient of a fractal fondue?
How do you calm down an astronaut?
What do pirates do on Saturdays?
Why is your cat at school?
Why did the nun always go to the same bar?
What did the pirate say after his first-mate stuck the wheel in his pants?
Well, I guess I'll jump on the pirate train. What's a horny pirate's worst nightmare?
Do you know what a pirate's favorite letter is?
Another pirate joke. What is a pirate's favorite letter of the alphabet...?
How is a pirate like a trumpet player?
What do you say when the Batmobile drives by?
Why to Native Americans wear Jockstraps?
Q: Why do Chinese noodles make the best lovers??
What do you call Magic Johnson in a wheel-chair?
What do a weather man and a fat penis doctor have in common?
Another Pirate joke?
Why was the composer late for work?
What is a guy who rubs bear toes called?
Since We're Doing Pirate Jokes. What Does Every Pirate Hate?
How many sorority girls does it take to change a light bulb?
What finally killed Captain Hook?
What should you never say to a brony?
Can't whistle?
What are some good 'your sister jokes'?
Why don't golf courses ever serve sandwiches?
What's a hippie's favorite animal?
What'd the leper say to the prostitute?
What do women and floor tiles have in common?
What did the Shepard say when he saw the sheep?
Why are pirates called pirates?
What do Jewish pirates wear?
How do you know when someone is a single mother?
What do you call a sentinel with three hands?
What's the difference between a stadium full of Dallas Cowboys fans, and 90,000 buckets of shit?
What do Ethiopian's and a pair of jeans have in common?
What's brightly coloured and looks good on raver kids?
Why do Irish stew recipes only call for 239 beans?
What's the difference between a gorilla and your mother ?
What do you call a guy that overeats for the sole purpose of getting stomachaches?
What do Vietnamese historians and Southern rednecks have in common?
What do you do if the lights in a Chinese food restaurant are too bright?
Why can't Jewish people view pornography??
What noise does a witch make when she's flyin around?
What is the fastest thing in the world?
What's the cheapest kind of meat?
Do you want to hear the funniest joke in the world?
Did you hear about the country adopting a "Get to it Later" policy?
What did the Giant say to the cripple?
How do Mexicans cut pizza?
Why did no one trust the dermatologist?
What do you call a waffle that's been buried in sand?
What did the hero say during the September 11 attacks?
Did you hear about the big marijiauna company scandal?
What's the policy at French morgues?
The difference between a wife and a mistress?
What do you call a group of Beavers?
What's the last thing to go through a fly's mind when it hits your windshield?
How Do You Make A Blind Man Angry?
What's the sharpest thing in the world?
Why did the condom suddenly go flying across the room?
Why do black people put their trash out in clear plastic bags?
What's the funniest joke that doesn't reference itself?
Why do white girls always stay in groups of odd numbers?
What do radical feminists and Game of Thrones have in common?
What do you call a picture of Simon Pegg's brother?
what do you call 4 mexicans in a sinking boat?
What do you say to a robot with a good looking bum?
[meta] why did the chicken cross the road?
Why did the monkey fall from the tree?
Whats the ducks favorite drug?
What should you do if your girlfriend is choking?
What do you call a red lemon?
What's green, has four legs, and will kill you if it falls out of a tree?
What do you call Chinese woman with one leg?
Are you nerd ?
Why is there no such thing as an epileptic exhibitionist?
Why does Godzilla go to temple?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl in the restroom?
You know what Popeye and Napoleon have in common?
What do you call a relative of a nap?
How are tornadoes and women alike?
What's the difference in a voyeur and a thief?
What happened to the religious idol when it was put up at auction?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs who plays the piano?
What did the stuttering Mexican say to his friend when he tried to steal his food?
What do you call a promiscuous fat woman?
Whats the best part about getting a blowjob from a baby?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Neil Armstrong?
Anal Lube?
What's the difference between a JCB and a giraffe?
Why do they have fences around cemetaries?
How might a Nazi judge something?
Why Should You Never Marry A Tennis Player?
Who wants gold?
What did Sweet Potato Yahweh say?
What do you use to compare and contrast nordic cultures?
Bar joke - What's the difference between the dog and the fox?
Which came first: the chicken or the egg?
Have you guys heard about the Indian coat check?
What's that one place in Thailand called?
Why don't you hear a pterodactyl in the bathroom?
What's the difference between a dead baby and a stick?
Have you heard the joke about the sky??
What did the viola say to her daughter before crossing the street?
Why was George Washington buried on Mount Vernon?
What do you call a pirate who is lost at sea and has to drink his own pee to survive?
Did you know there's a species of antelope that can jump higher than a two story house?
What do call a potato that knows martial arts?
Reddit, what is your best one-two line joke?
Why should you never date someone with a lazy-eye...?
What do you call a Russian with three nipples?
Whats the best thing about being a siamese twin?
Since women are shorter....are they more genetically suited to scrub the toilet?
What do you call a Yugoslavian Pimp?
How do you find Will Smith in the winter time?
What do you call a hirsute ceramicist?
If you're American outside of the bathroom, what are you inside it?
Want to hear a joke about Potassium?
How is an accordion like an artillery shell?
What do you call a belt with a clock?
Why was the baby strawberry sad?
What do you call a flesh light powered by your smartphone?
What's the difference between Mike Tyson and the iPhone 4s?
How many bricks do you need to screw in a lightbulb?
Why couldn't the bicycle stand on its own?
Whats the difference between Shaq and Koybe Bryant?
Why did the Rams give Michael Sam #96?
What's the sound of a water truck hitting a vinegar truck?
Why do you duct tape guinea pigs?
How can you tell if someone's a Vegan?
Why did the man use deodorant to fix a broken window?
Did you hear the one about the Mormon porn star?
What is the best gift you can give your girlfriend for your anniversary?
Did you know that beer contains female hormones?
Have you heard my unemployment joke?
Someone explain this joke to me?
What do you get if you cross Doc Brown and Jay-Z?
What was Jesus's least favourite exercise class?
Why do java coders wear glasses?
So why don't Southern Belles attend orgies any more?
Which part of a billiards setup can you use to clean your ears?
What's the difference between a Bald Eagle and an American?
What is the difference between pot and pussy?
What's large, gray, wrinkly, and not important?
How do pirates measure rope?
Why did Michael Sam, the first openly gay NFL player, say he doesn't shop at Sports Authority?
How much of Canada has a person from Iqaluit seen?
What do you call a man with no arms or legs playing in the leaves?
Did you know Achilles was a runway model?
Why sacrifice virgins?
What do you call a Serbian who won't clean his room?
What's the most confusing day in a Mormon home?
Why did the elephant paint his balls red?
You guys hear about the gay midget?
Did you hear about the midget fortune teller who escaped from prison?
What do you get when you win the laziest man in the world contest?
Did you hear the Russians tried to invent a new sport?
Why do they call it a pap smear?
Why did the hipster go to the gynecologist?
Have you heard about the guy who reanimated the dead?
What is a Pokemon master's favorite kind of pasta?
What do you call a bartender giving two dolphins a drink?
How do you give a lemon an orgasm?
Where does an Afghan boy go during a drone strike?
Would you tell me your street address, please?
Have you heard about the Viagra shipment that was stolen?
Why did Heisenberg have a miserable sex life?
Wheree did the king keep his armies?
Did you hear about the chemist turned stand-up comic?
What do you call a 2x4 that lost its family to a fire?
Why would a porn site that only focuses on flight attendants be really successful?
What do you call an ant that's walking in perfect form?
what did the jewish child molester say?
How many Alzheimer victims does it take to change a light bulb?
What is a shitzu?
What do you call the crazy people who always hang out with musicians?
What does a drill with a dildo attached to the end and watching golf have in common?
What would batman do if he wasn't rich?
What's Whitney Houston's favorite car?
How did the medical community come up with the term "PMS"?
Oh my gosh! Did you hear about the corderoy pillow?
What did the snake priest say to the snake groom after the marriage?
What's the similarity between 6th Sense and Titanic?
Why did the stoner put laxatives in the pot brownies?
All human females should be exterminated at menopause to reduce bitchiness?
What do you get when you cross a Jehova's Witness with a Hell's Angel?
What is the difference between an ounce of cocaine and an infant?
Flirty sex jokes, eh?
What did the chick pea say when it got a stomach ache?
What do you get when you cross the Atlantic ocean with the Titanic?
What's dark, empty and going no where fast?
Why do black people take such good care of a Chinese baby?
Why does the nurse always carry a red pen while at work?
Ever been to the Tower of Pisa?
What do a lonely astronaut and your thumbs have in common?
What do you call a baker who doesn't make bread?
Why is buying a macbook like using a high end prostitute?
what's the fastest animal in the world ?
How many feminists do you need to replace a lightbulb?
When is it okay to kick a midget in the balls?
What were people doing during the last ice age?
Why should you never mess with an angry dysentery patient?
Hey girl, are you a grape?
does anyone know a knock knock joke that's actually funny?
Did you hear about the albino fortune-teller who died in the house fire?
Gayfish?
What did the bottle of milk say to the Mexican?
What do you get when you cross Miley Cyrus with an alligator?
Why don't they have phone books in China?
What's everyone's problem with euthanasia?
Why don't they have a Phone Directory in China?
Why do white girls always hang out in odd numbers?
What do you call a threesome with two guys and a girl?
What do you call a communist pirate ship?
What are the 4 dirtiest streets in Philadelphia?
Want a screwdriver?
OC: What does a limo driver and a hairy stripper have in common?
How much sex does a sister of the church get?
Did you hear Tarantino is making a documentary about the Catholic Church?
What kind of cheese do rich people eat?
Why can't ducks tell jokes when they fly?
What gym did Socrates go to?
What's the difference between a baby and a salad?
Why did the blind kid fail geometry?
Why do Native Americans make the best strippers?
What's the most dangerous animal in Alaska?
What did Mr. Burns bring to the pot luck?
Why did the bald man paint rabbits on his head?
How does a prostitute make more than a drug dealer?
What do a gas pump nozzle and a penis have in common?
Where do you put the Duke?
What do you call a movie set during a woman's menstral cycle?
What vegetable was on the badge in the cab?
What would LMFAO's hit song be called if they were Russian?
What's honey mustards least favorite holiday?
What does Optimus Prime say on 4-20?
What can give you life, but also kill you?
What does it say on Billy Mays' s tomb stone?
Why was 5 afraid of 6?
Why are most blacks Catholic?
Why come cats purr?
What do you call a pirate having sex?
Did you hear about the terrorist who was sent to blow up a car?
Why couldn't Hellen Keller drive?
Did you hear about the fly on the toilet seat?
The shortest sentence in the English language is "go." What is the longest?
Kentucky Derby trivia - Why don't female jockeys shave their pussies?
What's the difference between a honda and a Porsche?
How can you tell if you have a high sperm count?
What's the difference between yogurt and semen?
Why did Harry Potter buy so many golden snitches?
Why did the boat know it had a leak?
How do religions reproduce?
What did the physicist have for lunch?
WHat's the worst part of being a black jew?
How did the shattering glass get everyone's attention?
What do you call an Israeli rooster?
What did JFK say after banging Marilyn Monroe?
Did you hear about the christian rapper who went missing?
Have you heard about the Rabbi who did circumcisions for free?
How do you fit 10 lbs of shit into a 5 lb sack?
Did you hear about the scientist who accidentally tripped into his cloning machine?
Why was 2 afraid of 4?
Why can't you hear a Pterodactyl going the bathroom?
Did you hear about the guy who brought a ladder to the bar?
Why doesn't Jesus buy beer?
How did the Jewish terrorist die?
What's the difference between a queer and a refrigerator?
Did you hear about the leper whose wife died in a tragic car accident?
What's the best thing about fingering a gypsy woman who's on her period?
What does the cannibal do after he dumps his girlfriend?
Why does a giraffe need such a long neck?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl taking a whiz?
What is the cheapest way to blindfold an Asian?
Why do you never have sex with someone's ear?
Why did the Mexican Army only bring 5000 soldiers to the Alamo?
You know why cannibals don't eat divorced women?
What do you call a rabbit with fleas?
What is a pirate's favorite element?
Why did Albert Einstein marry his cousin?
What does the "B" in Benoit B Mandelbrot stand for?
What is eternity?
Whats the difference between your Mom and the Pringles guy?
What do you get when you cross a horse and a donkey?
Which punchline do you like better? What do you call a nun that sleep-walks?
How did Jesus like his chicken?
How do you make a man from New Zealand fall asleep?
What is Jesus's go-to pickup line?
What did Sting say to his proctologist?
What so you call a bulldog mixed with a shih tzu?
How many surrealists does it take to screw in a fish?
What do tight jeans and a cheap hotel have in common?
[OC] Hey, do you wanna hear a joke about a condom?
Why do girls always walk around in odd numbered groups?
What do you call a cancerous growth on a clown?
What do you say to an airplane when it gets mad?
Why do Russians love pho?
How many potatoes does it take to kill am Irishman?
Whats long and green and smells like pork?
What is the difference between a gay man and a hot dog?
What do you call a policeman with a thing for MLP?
Why can't a schizophrenic kleptomaniac become President?
What did the tv say to the remote control?
What to gay men call hemorrhoids??
What do you call a shifty midget in a police line up?
Did you hear about the blonde that tried to enter a weightlifting competition?
What's the difference between a park bench and a writer?
How do u get a pool table to laugh?
What is both a fruit and a vegetable?
What's the difference between pea soup and roast beef?
Why do Native Americans hate April showers?
What do you call a guy who's rolling around in the grass early in the morning?
Did you hear about the constipated math professor?
Did you hear about the man who had his entire left side removed?
what did the man say when he couldn't get frea with his dog?
Why is the bride always sad on her wedding day?
What's an Irish seven-course meal?
What's the best thing about fingering a gypsy on her period?
Why does the noble gas always cry?
What's the difference between a buffalo and a bison?
What did the blind, deaf and dumb kid get for Christmas?
Why did little Susie fall off the swing?
What do you call Raggedy Ann, in a puddle of mud, with a stone in her mouth?
What do you call a blind Australian Crocodile?
Why did Jill fall off the swing?
Are people in wheelchairs okay with jokes being made about them?
What did the boy with no hands get for his birthday?
Why don't lawyers have sex with their clients?
What's a bear without an ear?
What did Noah do with all the poop?
What keeps running and doesn't get tired?
What do you call a vegetable who has escaped prison?
Why are knives always the funniest students at utensil school?
Why do you call an angry bear?
Did you hear about gay Santa?
What do you get when ant's parents won't let him marry his girlfriend?
Have you heard the one about the ceiling?
What's black, red, and blue all over?
Why did Oscar Pistorius shoot his girlfriend in the bathroom?
Have You Heard The One About The Sheep?
What do bulls do math with?
What's the difference between clever and stupid ?
What do you call a cheat sheet you use for a Philosophy test?
Did you hear about the scarecrow who won the Nobel Prize?
How do you say goodbye to a calculus teacher?
How did the girl end up with ninja jizz on her face?
What do you call a german who is afraid of enclosed spaces?
Have you guys heard of the new ska/dubstep band?
[OC] What is the gay community's favourite type of question?
Why did the one handed man cross the road?
What do you call a cow that's had an abortion?
What should you do when you are cold?
Why do hummingbirds hum?
Why don't old people have sex?
Why do Jews only read the Old Testament?
How do you make a little boy cry twice?
What's three times worse than OCD?
What fried food will shut your neighbor's dogs up?
Have you heard the joke about the cloud?
What was the slogan for Shakespeare's camping shop?
What did the divers find the sunken Korean ferry had hit?
Why should you not let your kids go to Korean Discos?
What's got two legs and bleeds?
What do all Amish women want?
Did you hear about the Kidnapping?
What do Will and Jaden Smith like about today?
Why does the Easter Bunny hide eggs?
What do you call it when plants bang?
What seemed to be the parrots problem?
What do you call a bunch of white guys in a burning building?
What's the difference between zombies?
What did the field say to the farmer?
Why don't Korean captains wear hats?
How do you turn a cobra into a rattlesnake?
What is it called when you mix Alcohol and Literature?
What is the most sensitive part of your body when masturbating?
Why doesn't Sherlock Holmes pay any income tax?
What do you get when you cross a hit of acid with a birth control pill?
Whats long brown and sticky?
What's the difference between a faggot and a freezer?
Why can't Irish people become lawyers?
Why was the heroin dealer arrested at the basketball game?
Moms have Mother's Day and dads have Father's Day. What do single guys have?
Why don't the Amish waterski?
Why are there a lot of problem gamblers in the Harry Potter universe?
What's your favourite priest and a rabbi joke?
What's yellow and smells like a zebra?
Where is Benedict Arnold's favorite place to shop for groceries?
What do you do when a Chemistry teacher dies ?
Whats the perfect place to hide a body on the internet?
If the sign says "don't feed the fishes" then what can you feed fishes anyway?
What is the difference between a seal and a sea lion?
How can a room full of couples be empty?
What do you call the Spanish Government?
Why'd the chicken cross the road.?
Why is Jesus terrible in bed?
What caused the civil war in Ethiopia?
My mom's favorite Easter joke: Why does the Easter bunny hide Easter eggs?
Why does a Jew moan when he has an orgasm?
What is so bad about being half black and half asian?
How many Mormons does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did Donkey Kong say when Mario asked him for help for some schoolwork?
Why does the Easter Bunny go around hiding all those eggs?
What do you call a masturbation session that ensued while doing maths?
Why is a train a bad person to go to the bar with?
How do mathematicians deal with constipation?
what happened to the cow when it jumped over the barbed wire fence?
What do you call a hooker who likes noodles?
What is it called when someone overdoses on ecstasy?
What's your favorite dirty joke?
How do you cure the hiccups?
What do a Caucasian woman's breasts have in common with clouds?
What did the Buffalo say to his son when he left for college?
Why is Santa Claus' sack so big?
What happens when Kim Jong-un gets sick?
What happened when the Eskimo teens went clubbing?
What is the difference between a teacher and a train?
Did you hear about the new show about a camel on a cow ranch?
Did you hear about the woman who used a fake name and married a renown psychologist?
What do you call a cute shortcoming?
How do you make a latte?
Why did the photographer get arrested?
How did you get your girlfriend to have sex with you while she was on her period?
What's the difference between a kid and a cat?
Why should you never shout at a pirate?
Why are there no painkillers in the jungle?
What do you get when a cow jumps in cold water?
What type of cheese can you see in a mirror?
Why couldn't Beethoven find his music teacher?
Did you hear about the blind circumciser?
Why don't black people sleep well?
Why do rapists go after fat women?
What do you call an invisible mom that got a sex change?
How are mashed potatoes similar to an online college degree?
Why Don't feminists make good botanists?
What do Little Miss Moffat and Saddam Hussein have in common?
What do you call a pony with a cough?
What do you call a brother and sister rack of ribs??
Jokes about white sugar are rare, but brown sugar?
Can February march?
April showers bring May flowers, and what do Mayflowers bring?
Which of the Knights of the Round Table actually created the round table?
What do you call a chocolate moose?
How do you know you let a hippie stay at your house?
What do good dragons read when they are pregnant?
Why can't white girls finish their sentences?
How do you tell a hypocrite from a normal person?
what do you call bees on halloween?
What do you call the Mexican KKK?
Did You Ever Stop And Think??
Did you hear about the priestess who accidentally healed the evil darklord?
Why shouldn't you play against Adolf Hitler in Madden?
What does Professor Xavier say when he wants to be tickled?
Why doesn't Oedipus curse?
Why was the legless man immortal?
Do you know what evil kisses sound like?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, agnostic and a dyslexic?
What do you get when you cross an elephant and a fish?
What's the difference between Canadians and Americans?
What do you find at the end of a double rainbow?
Why was the blonde nymphomaniac sad after she got her driver's license?
Why would two melons in love hate their parents?
What happened when the reporter fell into the water?
How do you fit 50 elephants into a subway station?
What shape is your hair in the morning?
What's the difference between a horse dick and a joke?
If April showers bring May flowers what do Mayflowers bring?
Why did the hipster burn his tongue on his cup of free-trade coffee?
What is your favorite "There are two kinds of people..." joke?
What did the doctor say to the terminally ill deaf patient?
Which part of a vegetable is the hardest to eat?
What's the difference between Walk of Life and Washington state?
When do Jews go swimming?
What is the difference between one night stand, long relationship and marriage?
Is Schrödinger's cat alive?
OC: after talking with my buddy, I thought of this. how do you know if some does crossfit?
What do you call it when an Italian has one arm shorter than the other?
What do toy trains and boobs have in common?
From my History class about elections: If a country is 80% Hindu and 20% Muslim, who wins?
Why was Jesus in such good shape when he died?
Having hearing problems?
Why did the lion always lose at poker?
Why were the sneakers so sad?
What's a musician's favourite kitchen utensil?
Why do monks wear the same clothes every day?
Why can't the average white girl pass Math?
What motivated Hercules to face off against Cerberus?
What did the sea-world trainer's friend say to him after he spilled water on his friends lap?
Why do white girls always travel in odd number packs?
What beverage does Bruce Lee like to drink?
How are pimples and a priest different?
How many ants are needed to fill an apartment?
What happened with the wooden car with wooden wheels, wooden seats, and a wooden engine?
Why did the two chicken crossed the road?
For my food service workers out there: How many servers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
why do mice have such small balls?
What do you call a nun who is outside her local calling area?
What did the flower say to the bicycle?
Why did the Xbox owner cross the road?
Do you guys have any clean ish Super Hero jokes?
How do you tell a good farmer?
How do you get a man with only one arm out of a tree?
What if earth rotates 30 times faster?
Why do French tanks have rear-view mirrors?
What sort of soup do men make most often after sex?
Why are women like parachutes?
What do you call someone with one arm and no legs?
What do you call a mentally ill person without arms and legs?
What do you call a math teacher that assigns graphs with holes and assymptotes on tests?
What do women and grammar Nazis have in common?
Why can't your wife make crispy bacon?
Why couldn't the bike stand up?
Why are there no elderly people in Africa?
Why do so many people like hanging out with Mr. Mushroom?
Where do young cantaloupes go in the summer?
Did you know Helen Keller had a swing in her backyard?
Why do Leprechauns laugh when they run?
What's the difference between a muddy bicycle and a ditzy lesbian?
Why do teenage girls travel in odd numbered groups?
First cannibal: Am I late for dinner?
What's the difference between a male and female table?
Have you heard the joke about Murphy's Law?
Did you hear about Medusa's short lived stand up career?
How did Moses make his coffee?
How often do airplanes crash?
What do you call a russian bull?
Did you hear about the movie with the Red Tractor?
What do women and KFC have in common?
What's the difference betweens jews and Santa-Claus?
Why don't skeletons get sick?
How do you know your sister is on her period?
Have you heard of the movie called "Diarrhea"?
What do you call a sauna massage?
Did you hear Kevin Trudeau is working on a new book?
Did you hear about the white supremacists chemist with a lisp?
What's the only thing better than a gold medal at the Paralympics?
What do you call someone who wears a diaper fashioned from a map?
Which four-member rock group doesn't sing or play music?
What did the statue say to the chair?
You know what I love about cafeterias?
How long does a dog's bark last?
What did the bullied microchip say?
Why wouldn't you hire bears from Australia?
What is a printer's favorite Village People song?
Did you hear about the duck with a drug problem?
What do you call a judge that doesn't have any fingers?
What did the turtle do when he ran out of gas?
How do you move a 2000 lb dinosaur?
Why don't Mexicans blow their noses?
What's the Difference Between Steve Jobs and Bill Gates?
How does an atom with bad grammar respond to an order?
Did you hear about the man in Philadelphia who had a phone stuck up his butt?
Did you know Justin Bieber has an 8 inch cock?
Hey reddit, ever hear the one about no and me neither?
what happened when the blond tried giving her boyfriend a blowjob while he was driving?
What did the redneck say to the Frenchman?
Why do teenage girls hang out in odd-numbered groups?
How many dead prostitutes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you get when you cross a lesbian with a hippopotamus?
What do you call an Ethiopian taking a shit?
What do a man and a rubix cube have in common?
Where do ants keep their armies?
What did the idiot do after seeing a joke that wasn't very funny?
Why did the man with one butt cheek get fired?
What do dumbfounded people eat for desert?
How do you say "Fuck you" in American Sign Language?
What's the difference between toilet paper and a shower curtain?
what was adam's nickname for eve?
What rhymes with freedom?
April showers bring may flowers What do may flowers bring?
Why couldn't Mewtwo move?
What do you call two gay Irish partners?
What do Pink Floyd & Dale Earnhart have in common?
What kind of tea do wealthy people own?
What do you call a guy with a rabbit up his arse?
Did you hear about the guy that got trampled by the triplets?
What's the difference between golf and sky diving?
Why do record collectors have bad sex lives?
Where does Amy go after the explosion?
What does a man with a 9 inch penis eat for breakfast?
What do Indian movie stars play at the beach?
What do 7 million Chevy's have in common?
What do call a girl that eats pastries while browsing the internet?
You know how you keep an asshole in suspense?
What does the B in Benoît B. Mandelbrot stand for?
What is the size of women in Italy?
What do you call a skinhead underwater?
What did one fish say to the other during the race?
Why does China care so much about money?
Why are all comic book readers drug addicts?
Why do asians got to the hospital after voting?
So, how do you make your truck look like Lance Armstrong?
What's the difference between a wheat thin and a lesbian?
Why do old men take Viagra?
What is a printer's favorite type of jelly?
What do you call a psychic midget that just escaped from prison?
How do you know your friend has been at the gym?
What's the most fun a monk can have?
Was your ass freed from enslavement?
What do you call it when a flight attendant gets pregnant?
What do you call a stampede of mexicans running away from a snake?
How many bottles of beer does it take to kill someone?
How do you stop a Polish battletank?
What does Mrs. Potato Head call her husband's penis?
What do the French have between the 2nd and 3rd course?
What did the photographer say when he retired?
What is your funniest joke about the French?
What kind of Dog does Homer Simpson have?
How do you confuse a retard?
What's the difference between a computer program and global warming?
Why can't you tell jokes in base 8?
What do you call it when a girl throws a tantrum during her period?
why did the cookie go to the doctors?
What did JFK say about his multiple affairs?
What's the difference between Black man, and Batman?
What steps do you take if you encounter a bear in the wild?
What's the difference between a hockey player and a French woman?
What Do You Call Giving a Dutch Guy a Gun?
What did the super smart dude say to the moron?
What do you call it when a chameleon won't change colors?
How many sound guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between a basketball player and a mexican?
What do you call a fat Chinese person?
My boyfriend didn't think the joke I made up was funny - what do Jews call Jesus?
What happened to the guy that was trimming some bushes and accidentally sliced off his left arm??
What do you call a second hand gold necklace?
What do fat chicks do in the summer time?
What's the difference between a plumber and a scientist?
What did one cell say to his sister that stepped on his toe?
What do you call a man with a seagull on his head?
What do you get when you order a JFK?
What did the chill pigeon say?
What do you call a Jew with heartburn?
Why was Edward stuck at the Russian airport?
Knock knock! Who's there? Orange. Orange who?
Why did the Hippy Drown?
(OC) What do you call Helen Keller punching someone?
Did you hear about the vintage attaché with a perfectly working clasp?
What does a sick deception eat?
What's the difference between magic and black magic?
What do you call an Eastern European cashier?
Who do you want on your basketball team in heaven?
What is springy and springy?
What's the difference between a surgeon and God?
What do you call a constipated detective?
What do you get when you are the daughter of Rodney Dangerfield and Aretha Franklin?
Who do you call to clean up foul language?
What does Tupak Shakur have in common with Lethal Weapon 4?
How do you know if a homeless man has a girlfriend?
Did you hear about the clam that could play violin?
What do you call a wannabe model?
What do alcoholics and necrophiliacs have in common?
How many Bolsheviks does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Three bloody tampons are walking down the street. Which one talks to you first?
What looks like half a sandwich?
What's the difference between Biggie Smalls and Charlie Chaplin?
Have you heard about the guy who finally overcame his coprophilia?
What's the only thing in Australia that won't kill you?
What did the businessman say to the other businessman?
What do you call a fruit that argues against the position it supports?
What did the String Theorist say when his wife caught him in bed with another woman?
What's the deal with airline food?
What is the best pickup line at a gay bar?
Why were the Middle Ages called the Dark Ages?
Whats the Slogan for every I.T. Department in America?
Why has the Malaysian Government banned Cheese Boards?
Would you go into the woods?
Is your name Malaysian Airlines?
What's the best insult you can say to someone?
What do you call an armless obese jew?
What does a brick and a fat girl have in common?
What does a butler call his employer named mr. Bates?
Have you guys heard the secret about butter?
Did you know the host of the Discovery Channel's show Dirty Jobs has 2 degrees?
What do you call a black guy whose hitch-hiking?
What can happen when a car breaks down?
How many jugglers does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call an alcoholic Mormon?
Why was the comedian with bad-ended jokes unpopular?
What is the difference between a chickpea and a lentil?
Why hasn't any lawyer ever been bitten by a shark?
Whats the difference between an Introverted Engineer and an Extroverted Engineer?
A cabbage and a carrot get into a race, who wins?
What do deer and women have in common?
What's the best thing about picking up a homeless chick?
What Did the Fish Say When He Swam into a Wall?
And how would you like that cooked?
Why didn't kids make fun of argon in high school?
What kind of environment do hobbits live in?
What do you call a group of cows robbing a Skyscraper?
What's the #1 song in Ukraine?
Why are Fiat cars named as such?
What's the difference between OP and a brick?
Did you hear about the locomotive that always did what it was told?
What do you call a pony mixed with a robot?
What do you call a homosexual in a wheelchair?
why do you put a baby in a blender feet first?
Whats the number one cause of paedofilla?
Did you hear Lorain Labbobit died in a car accident last week?
Where does bad light go?
Why do optometrists enjoy nautical jokes?
What do you call two Mexicans playing volleyball?
What do you call a midget with a dildo on backwards?
Why did Popeye beat up the Pope?
What's the difference between Mormons and non Mormons?
What's the hardest thing about eating vegetables?
What is the hardest part of twerking?
Have you ever smelled molasses?
What do you call the annual cat beauty pageant?
Working Redditors: What is your favorite joke about your own profession?
Know any good jokes about running?
A joke from Pakistan: What did the ant whisper into the elephant's ear that made the elephant faint?
What's the best part of an asynchronous dog?
Why was the blond late on her first day of work?
(not sure if repost) What do you call a black man that drives an airplane?
Why are jalapeños so annoying?
You know what they say about assumptions, right?
What did the constipated maths teacher do when he got stuck?
What's the most sensitive part on a female dinosaur?
What language do pirates speak?
Why shouldn't you enter into a contract with Wolverine?
What was Whitney Houston's favorite type of coordination?
What happens when you throw a black rock into the Red Sea?
What is the difference between a bus station filled with elderly and a crab with boobs?
What is Santa's favorite music?
What's Brown and sticky?
What kind of food do the cool fish eat when they study math?
What do you get if you squash a house?
How does Popeye lube up his dick?
Why can't you differentiate liberal arts majors?
You ever made love to a man?
What did the kidney say to the other kidney when it failed?
What is invisible and smells like carrots?
Why do black people like fried chicken?
Did you hear about the Mexican killer that owned trains?
Why did the rockstar turkey get kicked out of the concert?
When is the best time to play racquet sports?
Three really fat girls were cramped under one umbrella. Why didn't any of them get wet?
What's the greatest symbol of inequality?
Why did the blonde quit using the pill?
What would the gay guy's version of 50 shades of grey be?
Don't you just hate it when people answer their own questions?
What's the difference between an egg and a wank?
Q: Is it safe if penis is kept in the vagina when sleeping?
Why is your mother like the universe?
What do you call an Irishman who bounces off things?
Why is the number 8 the only number that goes to heaven?
What's the difference between shame and pride?
Did you guys hear about the murderer who stole a train in Mexico?
What's in an Irish 7 course meal?
Did you know that all Bicyclists are colorblind?
Why did the Crimean run across the Street?
Why couldn't the candle get any sleep?
Would you like a bag with that?
How do you enter an Egyptian's tomb?
How much penis?
What did Obama say to Congress when they vetoed Obama Care?
Do you know what they feed you at Guantanamo Bay?
Why do you never see any ancient Central American civilizations anymore?
Why do cowboys prefer wienie dogs?
Why do Russian police officers always work in groups of three?
2 potatoes standing on the side of the road. How can you tell which one is the hooker?
How many climate change deniers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Whats the difference between your mom and your dad?
How can you tell if a duck has soul?
What kind of a friar loves philosophy?
What's the difference between a male and female chocolate Easter bunny?
What do you call an orang-utan which has been in the sun for too long?
Why did Liberace like playing the piano?
What do you call an Egyptian with a gastrological disorder?
how do you make a conedian and a coke dealer hate you?
What do you call an Aztec Mayan snake god tied in a knot?
what do you call a gay drive by?
How many potatoe does it take to kill a Latvian?
What type of tree doesn't remove active torrents?
What do you call a dance party in Colorado?
How many terrorist jokes are there out there?
Why did the pig break up with her boyfriend?
What would you call Hitler if he had a child?
What's the biggest advantage of being a smoker?
How can you tell if a redditor is a pedophile?
What do you call a group of rioters attacking a music store?
Who is this Rorschach guy???
Why did the archaeologist go bankrupt?
Why do prison guards use Proactive?
What do you do when you get to the top of the world's tallest mountain?
Did you hear about the recently unemployed electrician?
What did Stephen Hawking say when his computer crashed?
Texan: So where you from?
You know who the most popular guy at a nudist colony is?
Why was "C" afraid of the rest of the alphabet?
Did you hear about the guy who used 20% of his right not to incriminate himself?
Why wasn't Jesus born in Ireland?
Why doesnt Justin Bieber shop at Modells?
How do you find the blind guy at a nudist colony?
How do you install "blackout curtains"?
What's the difference between a redditor and a dead baby?
Have you heard about the corduroy pillows?
Why did the midget get kicked out of the nudist colony?
Did you hear about the joke about the broken pencil?
What do clouds wear under their pants?
What did the clock do after the good meal?
Did ya hear about the Mexican who kept washing his dog?
How many graduate students does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why didn't the Jewish Boy Scout come home?
Why do Indians get cremated at very religious places?
Do old people wear boxers or briefs?
What do you get when you inject human DNA into a goat?
What are some good fruit jokes?
Why could the crab not find a pair of shoes in his size?
Why don't the French enjoy travelling to Northern Ireland?
Do you know what my favorite Jews are?
How do people usually feel after touching an electric fence?
What does Snoop Dogg do when he forgets to put on oven mitts?
What do you call a man without a beard?
What's gray and comes in quarts?
How many homophones does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you titilate an ocelot?
You know who's a real motherfucker?
How do you cut off a redneck's dick?
What do you call a retard who is super high?
Did you hear about the epileptic snake?
Why is the alcoholic law student sad?
What do you call a woman with a very round head?
What's brass and sounds like Tom Jones?
How do you kill an Argentinian?
What do you call a punk band that knows how to play their instruments?
Where in Eastern Europe does Justin Timberlake like to kayaking?
What did the chicken say after it's wings caught on fire?
Why are there no Motown artists from North Korea?
What do you call a parrot wearing a raincoat?
What does a moped and a fat lady have in common?
How many prostitutes does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you get the guitar player off of your porch?
Why didn't Karl Marx like Earl Grey tea?
Why is Tina Fey so good with her use of irony?
What's the difference between a jazz guitarist and a rock guitarist?
What happened when the USS Enterprise got a new toilet?
What is the opposite of Christopher Reeves?
Whats a pirates favourite kind of wood??
What do you call someone who hangs around with musicians?
Have you heard the joke about the pencil?
Why was the electrolytic solution taken to court?
What do you call two chess enthusiasts bragging in a lobby?
What's the difference between your mom and a condom?
How does Yo-Yo Ma answer the phone?
Which year is the most popular?
What do you call a black guy who can fly a plane?
Whats worse than eating 10 oysters out of your girlfriends vagina?
how do you know when a computer geek likes you?
How do hobbit flowers grow?
How do you get down from a horse?
What is the collective term for rams crossed with llamas who work as Avon representatives??
How do you get rid of an itch?
Did you hear about the hamster who died?
Why are camels referred to as "the ships of the desert" ?
What did the slut's left leg say to the slut's right leg?
What's the best way to make pants last?
What do you call cartoon duck sausage?
What does a fashionable dog do when it gets tired?
Why couldn't the baby Jesus be born in Montana?
What does IRE-1 say to XBP1 mRNA?
Where did Putin tell the protesters where to meet?
What's the difference between "ooo" and "ahhhh"?
What is tangled rope in space called?
What is the difference between a whore and a bitch?
How are Polish Girls like Hockey Players?
Prior to officially becoming a part of the United States, what was Oregon like?
What do you call a Mexican at the bottom of the ocean?
[OC] What type of music do Irish people listen to?
Did you hear about the terrorists who hijacked a plane of lawyers?
What did a confused Mexican alphabet say?
Why do sumo-wrestlers shave their legs?
What do you call a pig with no legs?
Why did the fisherman want to go fishing in Alaska?
Can we make it a rule not to put anything after the punchline?
What do you call a religious owl?
What do you call a canadian enchilada?
Did you hear that the World Hokey Pokey Champion has died?
Where animal does Russian milk come from?
What is the difference between a woman and a fridge?
Wat did the romans say when they put jesus on the cross?
Who wants to hear an awesome knock knock joke?
What's another name for the Periodic Table of elements?
Why does a chicken coop always have two doors?
What do you call a Filipino contortionist?
Why doesn't Mexico have an olympic team?
Why do we call lady parts beavers?
What do you call a Hawaiian with a cold?
Did you hear about the cannibal that only ate beans?
Why did the man quit his job at the bakery?
What do you call a fat Chinese man?
Where's the most racist place to focus one's thoughts?
How do you catch a unique horse?
Why couldn't the alcoholic become a lawyer?
Why do Eskimos wash their clothes in Tide?
How does god receive prayers?
What US State has the smallest soft drinks?
What did Naruto say at his mentor'a funeral?
What's a baker's favorite part of Manhattan?
What's the difference between ironman and ironwoman?
What has 12 breasts and 24 teeth?
What do you get when you put an idiot's brain in a female golden retriever?
What's black and white and black and white and black and white and green?
What happens when you take the tea away from your guest?
Why couldn't the American fly home from Russia after the Olympics?
What is Jesus' favorite mathematical operation?
How do you split Rome in half?
What did the mushroom say to the chef?
What's the best part about dating a homeless chick ?
What kind of bees eat brains?
What's the best part about having sex with a tranny?
What do you call it when a Sith goes to a Galleria?
[OC] What's Elton John's favorite kind of conditioner?
What's the difference between lust, love, and just plain showing off?
Why dont bicycles pedal backwards???
An Italian and a black jump out of a tree. Who lands first?
Why are all updates to Apple stuff piratical?
Why did the 2 stem cell researchers get a divorce?
Why did the Death Star hire a lot of football players from Thailand?
What goes "quick, quick"?
Did you guys hear about the man with the wooden leg named Smith?
What do you get when you drop a Hawaiian pizza?
Have you heard about the condition that causes your penis to ejaculate when submerged in water?
What do you call a homesick Asian?
How do you confuse a palaeontologist?
What do reddit and Playboy magazine have in common?
Did you hear about the boy born without eyelids?
What is better than getting a gold medal at the paralympics?
What do cannibals eat to freshen their breath?
Why was Samuel L. Jackson picking up ladies outside of the abortion clinic?
Why don't southern belles go to orgies any more?
How do you make a redditor impatient?
What starts with E, ends with E, and only has one letter in it?
How do you know you've satisfied a redhead?
What do gay horses eat??
why do black people only have nightmares?
how does rex reclaim make his music?
What is a nudist's favourite alcoholic drink?
What do rednecks call the BATF?
Which pizza shop's business is like it's name?
What do you call someone who discriminates against certain groups of rappers?
Why did the numbers 25, 36, and 49 go to the dentist?
how are high schoolers similar to women?
What do rodents with an inclination towards mathematics use for their auctioning needs?
What do you call it when Shatner takes a shit?
What's the difference between you and a bucket of shit?
Hey, which is the best/funniest stand up comedy you've ever listened to?
How many licks does it take to get to the center of a tootsie pop?
whats a similarity between colorado and saudi arabia?
What's the difference between an introverted scientist and an extroverted scientist?
Do you know what happens when you don't pay your exorcist?
What did one termite say to another in a burning building?
What's the name of NASA's launch button?
What's Fuzzy, Smokes, and Comes in Cubes?
What is green and eats nuts?
Did you hear about the blonde who tried to blow up her car?
Whats black on top but white on bottom?
What does a mexican Highlander say?
Why don't Muslims fill out online forms?
What kind of baby appears when an Eskimo and a Japanese person have sex?
What do a prison and a concentration camp have in common?
What's the difference between Det. Rust Cohle and a psychopath?
What do you call re-arranging the layout of your network?
What's the worst STD you can get from a black man?
Why does America have so many boasting Republicans?
What's the definition of a woman?
What sort of crime is it if a neckbeard commits murder?
What do hemophiliacs and virgins have in common?
Why do Gypsy's walk funny?
What's the difference between a penis and a red light?
What did the bear do to be labeled a hipster?
What do you call a high definition piss?
What do you get when you mix a joke with a rhetorical question?
What's your favorite city in Thailand?
Why'd Sally fall off the swing?
What do you call a math teacher who's really into BDSM?
How do the Chinese pick a name for their child?
What's Captain Picard's favorite game system?
What did the ambitious suicidal person say?
How much money do hookers with shallow vaginas make?
Did you here that Lorena Bobbitt got killed in a car accident?
What was the last thing that Columbus said to his sailors before getting on the ship?
What is Viagra for lesbians called?
What's the dirtiest or sexiest joke you have ever heard?
How many people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Ever heard of the band called 1023 Megabites?
Why do proctologists like Facebook?
What's the only thing better than Roses on a Piano?
What did Cinderella say when she reached the ball?
How do you make a patty melt?
What kind of dog can jump higher than a building?
Did you hear about the drummer who fell and hit his head?
What's the difference between the lavatory and the cemetery?
What's the difference between a tribe of wild hunting pygmies and a Women's roller derby team?
Why did two ferrets decide to meet?
What's the difference between Ann Coulter and shooting arrows at lovers?
What do a wedding and a funeral have in common?
What do Nagasaki and Tehran have in common???
Why shouldn't you use red, white, and blue paint in a watercolor?
How do you know a vocalist is at your door?
What's your favorite pirate joke?
What is loud and sounds like "apple"?
Why couldn't the philosopher make a living?
What’s the new French flag look like?
How do you know if someone is Puerto Rican?
Why is James Bond's favourite bartender played by Michael J Fox?
What rock group has four guys and no singers?
How do you know a drummer is at your door?
Why was the attorney kicked out of choir?
What do you call a person who delivers Indian food?
Have you seen my LSD?
What do you call a pretty lady on the arm of a drummer?
Why do woman have legs?
What happened when the orange slept with the dirty lemon?
What do you call a bat in a hurry?
What do you call it when someone comes to your house and takes all your pottery?
How are synagogues like lemons?
What's the difference between an introverted mathematician and an extroverted mathematician?
How did Einstein prove you can break the law of relativity?
Did you hear about the guy who was arrested for indecent jurisprudence?
What did little no armed Jimmy get for Christmas?
What did the black kid get on his SAT?
Did anyone see Bob Costas' double pink eye while watching the Olympics?
What's the best thing about owning a car in Liverpool?
Why does it take 2 feminists to screw in a lightbulb?
Why are divers always so nervous?
Have you heard the new Google Glass ad?
How many X does it take to lightbulb?
What is love?
What do you call a dim witted hooker?
Why didn't Edward leave his house?
How many bass players does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How many guitar players does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Whats the difference between a lawyer and a trampoline?
How many programmers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Anybody know where I can get a Game of Thrones Valentine's day card?
Q. What's pink and fluffy?
What do you get when you cross an agnostic, an insomniac, and a dyslexic?
What did the evergreen tree say to it's love interest?
What's the hardest part about nailing a baby to a tree?
What do you call a small petition?
What does an octopus have ten of?
What was the code to hitler's secret bunker?
How do you know a redneck invented the tooth brush?
What do you call a sextape with a 60 year-old man in it?
(Q)....... What do fat women & mopeds have in common?
How do you make a dog say meow?
What do you call an infinite series with a finite result that has never had sex?
Where do you get virgin wool from?
Q: What do you call a drunken Muslim?
what has 150 legs and 7 teeth?
What do riding a bike and playing basketball have in common?
What's better than winning a silver medal at the Special Olympics?
Why do Jewish men watch porno's backwards?
Birth Control?
What do you call funny laboratory equipment?
What starts with E, ends with E and has only one letter?
How does Darts Vader eat spaghetti?
Did you hear about the guy who is both a taxidermist and veterinarian?
Why are boxers never late to their fights?
What breed of dog loves to take a bath?
How did michael hutchence take his drugs?
What is the bass players preferred method of contraception?
What's worse than locking your keys in you car outside an abortion clinic?
How can you tell if a Redditor is an extrovert?
What did Jupiter say to Saturn when he found out Saturn was pregnant?
What is the Speed of Darkness?
How do you tell if someone's balls are sensitive?
What are the three worst words to hear while you are having sex?
Why do drug dealers hate prostitutes?
What sound does a fratboy make when he hits the water?
What did the Mexican detective say in England?
Why did the suicide bomber explode on the train?
What's that smell?
What has two legs and looks like a spider?
What does the rude barista say to the customer in a coffee shop?
Why don't you see any slow black people?
How do you know if a girl is dating a vampire?
what's the healthiest thing about eating a wheelchair?
What's the plural form of the word "anecdote"?
What do Coors Light and sex on the beach have in common?
What did Euler find in his toilet?
Why are their no jokes about the Jonestown Massacre?
What did the gay guy, say to the man at the bar?
What did the priest get at Toys R Us?
Have you read the book about the guy who can only ejaculate a virus?
How can you tell which Russian olympic spectators are actually KGB agents?
Why was 6 afraid of 7.938?
Why couldn't the Great Ape tell a story?
What is the most affectionate type of chicken?
What do you call the sweat between two people having sex in Arkansas?
What is a trailer park's favorite game?
How do you get money out of a piggy bank?
So, it's now officially a week after the Super Bowl, can we please stop with the Super Bowl jokes?
What did the network engineer give to his fiancée?
Got a pen?
Why was the blonde fired from the M&M factory?
What does a masturbating Latvian sound like?
What do you find between Godzilla's toes?
What do you call a sad robot?
What do you get when you throw a piano down a mine shaft?
What's the difference between a lawnmower and a hooker?
Rib jokes?
What does a sperm and a politician have in common?
(OC) What do the cops do when they get a fly infestation?
what did the doe say when she came out of the woods?
Why did the yoga pants come in last place?
What do you call a Pirate who lost his anchor?
How do we know that slaves went to college?
Ever heard of a game called Polish Roulette?
Did you hear the one about the old man at the doctor?
Why did the blonde have a red sore on her belly button?
What did the pink panther have all over his house after he fumigated for insects?
What animal brings the most boys to the yard?
Just thought this one up: What do Jay Leno and Payton Manning have in common?
How does a blond cross the road?
Why are cowboy hats curled up on the sides?
What do Abraham Lincoln and Peyton Manning have in common?
Best place to hide stuff?
What do you call a cat eating a girl out?
What's better than kiddie porno?
How do single people honor valentine's day?
What was Philip Seymour Hoffman's favorite album this year?
What do you call a man with a small penis?
What's a pirates favorite thing to knit?
Testicular cancer joke?
Grandpa, why did you have so many kids?
What did everyone do after the Super Bowl was over?
Why doesn't Mike Tyson play the Playstation?
How many SRSers does it take to change a lightbulb?
what do you call a cow with two legs?
What do you call a Russian, homophobic, golfer?
Why did the golfer take a spare pair of trousers with him?
What do you call the guy you buy your weed from?
Can you tell me a dirty joke?
what did the ranch say to the refrigerator?
Why was Bob Marley fired from being a tennis announcer?
Why do vegetarian chefs type with their feet?
What do you call a gay man milking a cow?
What do the weather man and every other man have in common?
How many heroin addicts does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many cats?
What do dwarves use to cut their pizza?
Stunt pilot?
What's black, has bite marks and isn't needed any more?
What's the first step in making Bronco cookies?
Does giving birth or getting kicked in the balls hurt more?
What did Peyton Manning do yesterday?
What did the Magician say when he took some Adderall?
Did you hear about that proctologist who became an English teacher?
What's Peyton Manning's favorite hair style?
How many pallbearers are needed at an Indian funeral?
What is a chemist's favourite restaurant?
Why did the Pepsi Half-Time Show suck so much?
What is Wilford Brimley's favorite band?
How many Broncos does it take to change a tire?
Did you hear the one about the Seahawk who wouldn't stop talking?
What is the only olympic sport that mexicans can compete in?
What did the Korean girl say about anal?
What's the difference between Jack Daniel's and General Custer?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs floating in the ocean?
What's the difference between GOP voters and polar bears?
Heard of the cannibal who had a shit taste in people?
How did the telephone propose to his girlfriend?
So how did you die?
Why doesn't Justin Bieber shop at Sport's Authority?
How does a West Virginia mother know when her daughter is on her period?
How is Halloween celebrated in Kentucky?
Why was the gunman on a diet?
Whose fault is it that California always has earthquakes?
Why is Chicago called the Windy City?
Where do Squarells live?
Why is an apple a Dalek's favourite fruit?
What do you get when you cross an owl and a bungee cord?
What type of pants do Japanese people wear?
Why do Scottish men watch porno movies backwards?
What is it called when you throw a tin can into a recycling bin?
Do you know why they can't make ice in Poland anymore?
Did you hear they finally published that book about clocks?
What did one fish say to the other?
What is the difference between paint and a midgets' underpants?
Why don't you ever eat a girl out in the morning?
What does Mr. Miyagi do while Daniel-san waxes the car?
What's a funny non-racist joke a Polish person would laugh at?
What does 80 year-old pussy taste like?
What is the term for someone that gets aroused watching Star Wars?
What is a Mexicans favorite sport?
Cop: Is that a radar detector I see?
Why do they say all minorities look the same?
What is your best lawyer joke?
Why does Marx only drink herbal tea?
How does the pope refer to his secret superhero identity?
Why did the girl bring 2 basketballs to the basketball game?
Why did Scotty check all the toilets of the Starship Enterprise?
How many psychiatrists dose it take to change a light bulb?
What is it called when a guy called Justin gets justice?
Why are there rugs in front of the stove and the sink?
Where do men have the most curly hair?
What does a doughnut have in common with a nut?
Why was the Hay Robber's prison sentence cut short?
How does a religious extremist convert an atheist into a holy man?
What's the worst aspect about Calculus teachers?
What happens to garlic sauce over time?
What did the really dumb guy name his pet giraffe?
Why the word redundancy when lawyers say cease and desist?
Why was Shakespeare always a good teammate to have?
Why are women so bad at being hockey goalies?
How many Dragonball Z characters does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is the Pope's favorite type of woman?
Why was Simba's dad killed by the pride?
What is the difference between 69 and an ambush ?
What do you call a fake enemy?
How do you Circumcise a whale?
Why do North Korean statesmen make for bad lovers?
What do you call a Viking pop band with a big gay following?
Did you hear what ubisoft rated assassins creed black flag?
How are hanging upside-down and getting a boner alike?
What happened when The Pope went to Mount Olive?
What do you call a row of 10 blondes standing ear to ear?
what kind of biscuit can fly?
Why did the Tomato blush?
What lies in a pram and wobbles?
What does your mother's face and a Pillar and have in common?
Why was the Japanese man so careful when walking in his house?
Why did the Trix bunny hand out eggs?
Have you ever had sex in the woods?
What type of Martial Arts does Jesus know?
What happens when two girl rabbits really like each other?
What happens if an elephant comes through your letterbox?
What's white, lumpy, and extremely dangerous?
Is a brain dead cow a vegetable?
What do you call a white slave?
Did you hear the one...?
How does it feel to be a famous rock-and-roll musician?
How do you get 4 gay guys to sit on 1 bar stool?
What's a similarity between obese people, and my relationships with women?
Why was the mother cow mad at father cow?
Did you hear about the girl that backed into an airplane propeller?
Did you hear about the Mexicans that robbed the train museum?
What's the difference between a vacuum and a Harley Davidson?
What do North Koreans lack that South Koreans do not?
Are there holes in your socks?
Where's the best place to apologise to someone?
Do It Yourself?
What do you get when you cross an octopus and a cow?
What does a dyslexic, agnostic, insomniac do?
How do you reply when someone on /r/askscience asks you on a date?
What did the Cannibal do after he dumped his Girlfriend?
What do you call an Englishman with no butt?
Is there a difference between men and women?
What's the difference between a cactus and a schoolbus?
Why was the cupcake so scared of the bong?
What did one sick casket say to the other sick casket?
What do you call it when the only cow on your dairy farm won't produce milk?
Why do Physicists make terrible parents?
what's the most impressive thing about tom cruise performing his own stunts?
Why did Winnie the Pooh want to become an astronaut?
What did the physicists say when he accidentally broke his resistor?
What did the chinese billionaire say after buying the deer with no eyes?
What do you call a reptile...?
What did the mailman ask his girlfriend?
Did you hear about the man who flashed three old ladies sitting on a bench in the park?
Why can't two Chinese people make a white baby?
Whats brown and sticky?
Wana hear a knock knock joke?
What did the Melon King say to the two young melons in love?
How many emo kids does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why does the New York Times hire Jews?
Why did Obama tap Merkel's phone?
Did you hear about that baby boy that was born with no eyelids?
What did the Indian woman say during sex?
Did you hear about the guy who got hit in the head with a case of beer?
What is the difference between a blonde and a blonde dude?
Why was the beach wet?
What do you call two crows on a park bench?
Why did the Seattle Seahawks and the Denver Broncos made it to the finals?
Why did the demon get arrested?
How did the Romans split up their empire?
Punk rockers are unruly, what do they like most about women though?
Why do parents send their toddlers to the army for daycare?
Why couldn't the lizard get a girlfriend?
What's worse than watching your brother do a double barrel roll over 15 cars on a motorbike?
What sound does a pinewood derby car make when you rev it?
What did the bartender ask Charles Dickens when he ordered a martini?
What did the deaf person get after having sex with a hooker?
Why did all the prisoners at the AT&T jail escape?
What did the Mexican firefighter call his two sons?
What's the most difficult instrument for a percussionist to play?
Why can't you tell pun jokes to kleptomaniacs?
How did the paramedics know Princess Diana had dandruff?
What is Zoolander's least favourite sport?
What do you say to a woman with a black eye?
What did the racist chess player say?
How can you tell a cow isn't listening to you?
How can you tell if a Finnish guy likes you?
what's the difference between a cat and compound sentence?
Why was Civil Disobedience such a good essay?
Why is it a good idea to put your money in the freezer, instead of the bank?
What is the opposite of paranoia?
What do you call a short physic that has escaped from jail?
Can antelopes get married?
What do you call a snobbish criminal going downstairs?
How does George W. Bush do well on his high school midterms?
Whats the difference between man united and a clown?
What did the pirate captain say to the sucker fish he hired to clean his ship?
Do you know what George Washington would be doing if he were alive today?
[OC] Why can't an orchestra made of OB/GYN doctors ever get good enough to perform a concert?
What did the homophobic sheep say when he saw the two female sheep making out in the field?
What's the difference between a penis and a paycheck?
What happened to the octopus in the football game?
What do you call a gnome that muffs a fairy ?
What's Beethoven up to these days?
What's the difference between a prostitute with dysentery and an epileptic oyster shucker?
What do the Globetrotters do when they're finished urinating?
Why did the hot dog vendor cry?
Why didn't anyone care about the circus?
Why don't they have sex ed and drivers ed on the same day in the middle east?
What do you call a paper crane folded by a prositute?
Why do black people call each other "son"?
Why do fire departments have dalmatians?
What's the most offensive jokes you guys have?
How did the steak chef at the courthouse like his paycheck?
What is Fido the dog's favorite part of a tree?
What kind of Lettuce do serve on the Titanic?
What the best thing about pedophiles?
What do you get when you mix an owl with a rooster?
Why do pedophiles have social anxiety?
911?
Why is studying statistics hard to do in Afghanistan?
Why can't atheists solve exponential equations?
What did the Joker say when he was at McDonalds?
Have you heard the one about Ron Jeremy's penis?
Why did my Geoligist wife divorce me?
What do you call someone who is good at fishing?
Why don't Amish people water ski?
If I was a smart thief, do you know what I would rob?
How do you get your husband to eat shit?
Whats better than roses on your piano?
Teacher: did your father help you with your homework?
What does Popeye's dick smell like?
Why is the sport of cricket called cricket?
What's the difference between Jews and Christians?
Why don't baseball players get much action?
Chris Christie's Favorite New Dessert???
What's a Pedophile's Favorite Part about Hockey?
What does Beyonce bake her cookies on?
What do you call a man without shins?
Does anyone know any good renal/kidney jokes?
What do you call a well respected slave?
What do 8 hobbits make?
Did you hear about the new bra they call the Sheepdog?
What's the Difference between NHL Players and the Jersey Shore Girls?
I don't get this joke. Can someone explain it to me?
How many gnats does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did the blind man say as he passed the fish market?
What did Courtney Love say before she shot Kurt?
Want to know how I can see 6 years into the future?
Did you hear the one about the vegan cannibal?
Where do electricians get supplies?
How do you get a fat girl into your bed?
How much is an M&M?
Can anyone explain this joke for me?
What's the difference between a praying nun and a girl taking a bath?
What happens when an American has a heart attack and survives?
Did you know that the walrus has the second largest penis of all mammals?
Wait, you're citing me for reckless driving?
What do you call sunscreen in Ireland?
Why does internet explorer ask so many questions?
What is a frog's favourite website?
What did the little mountain say to the big mountain?
I wonder what the parking situation is at the Special Olympics?
Why was the mushroom happy?
What do you call a thieving duck?
If you're looking for something fun and exciting to do, why not try anti-gravity?
Which is the smallest pub in the world?
Why does Daenerys take so long to get places?
What do you get when you have a blonde do a handstand?
What do you call a fight between a Mexican and a child molester?
Do you remember when you used to blow bubbles?
Do you want a sister or a brother?
What did the joints say to the arthritis pain?
What's fourteen inches and white?
Do you know the difference between erotic and perverted?
How do you stop an angry rhino from charging?
How do you describe a boring, Asian, black and white film?
What do ghosts use for lube?
Why did the referee blow his whistle at the leper hockey game?
What do you call a baby Matt Damon?
What happened when the man couldn't afford the mortgage on his haunted house?
Have you heard about the Polish strip club?
who is the most fun on a missing persons case?
Why does the NSA only do anal?
What happens when you cross the band "The Knack" and a bottle of Corona?
What did one wall say to the other wall?
What do grandparents smell like?
Did you hear about the psychic midget that escaped from jail?
What's long and hard and makes women cry at night?
What's worse than finding cum stains in your son's underwear?
What's the best defense against Britney Spears?
What did Charlie Bucket say when Willie Wonka peed on him?
Why did the girl get grumpy after anal sex?
What do you call a gay rhinoceros?
What type of pussy does a priest get?
How do you keep bacon from curling in the pan?
What do the Dallas Cowboys do when they win the Superbowl?
What type of wife always knows where her husband is?
What did the whistleblower say after the blizzard in Russia?
What do you call the gingerbread man's ghetto cousin?
What do you call it when a male mathematician imagines himself having an orgasm?
Did you hear that the DMV is going make all stop signs bilingual for Spanish Speakers in 2014?
Why is the Adults only store open 24hrs?
What do you call 1000 aches?
What's the difference between a white story and a black story?
What's the true meaning of a New Years resolution?
What happened to the Indian that drank too much?
How do you get garbanzo breath?
Aims at the heels, but hits the nose. What is it?
Where does Obama live?
What was Bob Marley's favourite font?
Why don't debutantes like group sex?
What did the magazine say to the comic book?
What's the difference between a Southern wedding and a Southern tornado?
How long does it take to get from Louisiana to Alabama?
What did Hugh Hefner say when he got to heaven?
What does Jeffrey Dahmer and Peewee Herman have in common?
How many Libertarian Capitalists does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call 0.33333333333 of a shit?
What do you call over the counter Viagra?
What does the NFL and Broke Back Mountain have in common?
What did the deer say when the sportsman asked if he wanted to go hunting?
What's the difference between an optimist and a pessimist?
Do you know what is heart warming?
How did the blind priest find the choir boys?
What's a philosopher's favorite toy?
What do you call a 100 year old frog?
What do a priest and an Olympic silver medalist have in common?
Why did the baker's hands smell?
Did you hear about the guy who burnt down the Chinese restaurant?
What did the banker use for birth control?
What's the best thing about living with alzheimer's?
How is a Mac like a Queen's guard?
How did the Mexican greet people in Hawaii?
Where does Skrillex like to eat lunch?
What dance moves do physicists do?
Did you hear Lorraina Babbitt died in LA?
Why should you never buy ukrainian underwear?
Do you know why the spanish letter "j" is pronounced as "h"?
What did the bartender say to the giraffe when he ordered a beer?
what is michael J. Fox's favourite beverage?
Whats the difference between a rectal and an oral thermometer?
What's common between Marriage & a Port-a-potty?
Was Johann Sebastian Bach wealthy?
What kind of STD does a blonde woman give you?
What do you call a two dentists that live on opposite sides of the world?
What's the most electronegative state?
What did the proctologist say to the guy with glued ass cheeks?
What is black & white, black & white, black & white, black & white, black & white, black & blue?
Who makes the best milkshakes ever?
Why did the squirrel swim on his back?
What do you call girls that have a chance of winning?
What's the worst part about season 1 of Lost?
What's the difference between Gene Simmons and Richard Simmons?
What is a stalkers favorite part of a hospital?
Did you hear about the bastard frog?
(x-post from /r/lotr) How many Nazgûl does it take to kill a hobbit?
Can someone please invent pantyhose that don't rip?
What does a 90 year old pussy taste like?
Why is Santa Claus so jolly?
My neighbour knocked on my door at 2:30am...Can you believe that, 2:30am!?
What do you call an Asian girl with Mexican parents?
Why did the Mexican girl get pregnant?
What is the difference between pick and choose?
Why do Jews hate sex?
What did the little cloud say about the big cloud?
What's the difference between a tea cup and pea cup?
Did you hear about the Power Plant that was bad for the environment all year?
How does Kim Kardashian like her eggs?
What should you care?
Why is [friend's name] always on the bottom?
What do you call clothes for a car?
What did the ram say as his lover lay on her deathbed?
How do you say "fuck you" in Hebrew?
What are your best family friendly Christmas jokes?
What do you call a suicidal cat?
Why do rappers repeat their names in their songs?
What says "Mark! Mark! Mark! Mark! Mark!" ?
What did the cat say after reading ""To Kill a Mockingbird"?
What's a specimen?
Why do witches not wear underwear?
You eat what (phonetic joke)?
What is the mathematician's favorite pick-up line?
Why shouldn't you wear Russian underwear?
What do you call Hitler's bachelor party?
What's the difference between an orange and a baby?
What do you call a group of Mexicans doing work?
Why is it so hard to get a comb from a bald man?
What are Tony Montana's favourite trousers?
What is the most surprised a cow can be??
Ever wonder why people pay so much for their electricity bill?
Why does Marx's toilet play a sonata when flushed?
What ethnicity is Santa?
It's yellow, lives in a tree, and is very annoying?
What's a Lawyers favourite food?
What did Adam say to Eve on the day before Christmas?
What do you call it when all the Chinese places in town start to close?
Why shouldn't you ask if someone's a Texan?
What do you call a booger that you've been squishing for awhile?
What do you call the survivors of the holocaust?
How do you make a fruit cordial?
What did Peter Pan say during the plane crash?
Why did the hipster drown, when he was iceskating?
Whats the difference between a BMW and a porcupine?
What did the Roman premature ejaculater say?
What did the physicist say when he tried to meditate?
What do Justin Bieber and Pinocchio have in common?
What's your favorite joke appropriate for a 6-8 year old?
How do you drown a polar bear?
Why is the sand so quiet?
What does Santa Claus call his more thuggish elves?
Why did the baby have such a poor time in the marathon?
Just now, from my dad: Have you heard the new Christmas carol from India?
What is all that useless flesh around a woman's vagina?
What was the crow doing up on the telephone pole?
What do you do with a sick chemist?
How many friend zoned guys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why can't Stevie Wonder see his mates?
How does the blind man know when to stop wiping his arse?
Whose point is it anyway?
How did the dentist become a brain surgeon?
What do you call A Bohemian Lumberjack?
My co-worker is going out of town for a week. What are some easy pranks I can set up in his cubicle?
What do Saudi guys and girls have in common?
What language do cats speak?
How did the hipster burn his tongue...?
Have you seen the clown that hides from ugly people?
What do you call a huge pile of cats?
What did the bird say when it flew into the window?
What does a turkey scream right before you squirt a hot load all over it?
What do a hippie-chick and a hockey player have in common?
Did you know they buried Steve Jobs in an orchard?
Whats the worst thing about being dyslexic and having ADHD?
What does a gang say on December 25th?
What did the Kiwi say to the Rabbi?
What's the difference between Pink Floyd and Princess Diana?
What do you call an Amish guy with his hand up a horse's ass?
Why did the French construct the Maginot Line?
Who was the first carpenter?
What is a Rastafarian's favorite country?
What did the monkey say when he caught his tail in the revolving door?
Why can't you trust atoms?
Why are redditors so bad at "getting" jokes?
What is the difference between a middle school boy and a high school boy?
What is worse than getting a wrong call at 3 AM in the morning?
What is black Jesus' favorite fruit?
What did the prarie dog coach say to his team?
What did the greek cow say?
What does a Gynecologist and a Pizza Boy have in common?
What do you call fake soup?
How did the Italian die?
Why do men snore when they sleep on their back?
How many cops does it take to push a hooker down the stairs?
Why does the rabbit hide Easter eggs?
Did you hear about Princess Dianas car crash?
What do you get when you combine a watch and a bottle of beer?
Why was the computer tired when it got home?
What do you call a bad circumcision?
What do you see when the Pillsbury Doughboy bend over?
What is the one thing Spiderman can't eat?
How does John Lennon get his kids to eat their vegetables?
What do you call 2 algebraists who marry?
What did Saint Patrick say when he drove all the snakes out of Ireland?
Did you hear about the guy who won the Nobel for inventing time travel to the future?
What did Chuck Norris told his father when he left home for college?
What do you say to a girl with small tits?
What is the easiest way to kill a gaggle of black men?
(Grandpa joke) If seagulls fly over the sea, what flies over the bay?
What were the Crocodile Hunters last words?
Can someone please explain this joke to me?
What did the stoner drop when he listened to dubstep?
How do you know you are in the gardening section of Home Depot?
How do terrorist surfers spend free time at Guantanamo Bay?
What did they do with the Crazy 8's?
What's the difference between love, true love, and showing off?
What is an Italian redditors favorite meal?
What did Jay-Z call Knowles before getting married?
How can you tell your room mates gay?
What do pantyhose and Brooklyn have in common?
What's a Chinese chicken's favorite vegetable?
What is a physicist's favorite cookie?
What do you call an Eskimo who's a peeping tom?
What would you name a star wars movie featuring Pluto?
Wanna hear my joke about pizza?
Want to hear about the worst blowjob I ever had?
Wanna hear a joke about a pizza?
Remember how in Lord of the Rings they slept out under the stars?
What is yellow and lives off dead Beatles?
How many kids with ADHD does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the model pee herself?
Did you hear about the sign language translator at Nelson Mandela's funeral?
What do you call Billy Mays when he says something stupid?
Why couldn't the dwarves renew their lease on the Lonely Mountain?
What's the most popular pickup line at a gay bar?
Why can't the NSA leaker leave Russia?
What did one earring say to the other?
Why did candycain go to jail?
Why couldn't they save the shipwrecked hippies?
What do you call a muslim in the 90's?
What do ducks do at Christmas time?
Which US state is friendliest toward the Japanese?
What do you call an Irish Jew?
Did you hear about the physicist who moonlighted as a romance novelist?
Did you hear about the three Mexicans who robbed a bank?
Without context, where would we be?
How did the dollar bill feel when his change started disappearing?
Why is it good for a mason to live in constant fear?
Why was the dieting Roman so thrilled?
What did the square say to the triangle?
Did you hear about the Italian documentary on suppositories?
How does Dallas Cowboys fans change a lightbulb?
Who does a dead pharaoh talk to?
How do you confuse Helen Keller?
How does a spoiled rich girl change a lightbulb?
Why did Kelly fall off the swing?
You know what we used to call vegetarians?
What did one shovel say to the other during a recurring fight?
Why didn't the skeleton cross the road?
Did you hear about the gay magician?
What do you call it when an Asian's imaginary friend dies?
What do you call a blonde in a BMW?
What did Mr. T say when he saw a fat lady at the bar?
Why do American tourists talk so loudly?
Where did Javon get his earrings?
Why are women like condoms?
What's the difference between being hungry and being horny?
How do you know a woman has had sex in every country in the world?
What does Polynomial Man say when you beat him?
What's the difference between Snowmen and Snowwomen?
Why is it easier for women to shave "downstairs" than men?
How do you make a flea circus?
Why don't the people of Pompeii like volcanoes?
What do you call 2 crackers arguing?
How come Hitler never went to the movies?
What concert can you see for 45 cents?
What do you call two gay Scotsmen?
What did the Nazi become after the war ended?
Why is it never a good idea to use a Chinese phone book?
Did you hear about the guy who was half black and half Japanese?
Did you here about the women who died after masturbating with a carrot?
Q:What did The Banana Say To the Vibrator?
Why do programmers always confuse Halloween and Christmas?
How bad is it when a nations power crisis can only be solved by a couple of hydroelectric plants?
Why don't paperclips move around a lot?
What is the difference between kinky and perverted?
Did you hear about the hispanic that's been stealing all the trains?
What's the difference between a Porsche and a KIA?
What do you get when you cross an owl and a bungee chord?
How do you say "constipated" in German?
Why did Hitler not mind being on the naughty list?
What does the cow say while having sex?
How can you tell two people are married?
How many women does it take to screw a lightbulb?
What do a 9 volt battery and a hot chick's asshole have in common?
Why did the kleptomaniac spend so much time in Bed Bath and Beyond?
Where did the salami go on holiday?
G.W.Bush - Dyslexic?
What do you call a scientific measuring instrument with degrees?
What's better than breaking the seal on a bottle?
What do LotR and Brokeback Mountain have in common?
Did you hear about the kleptomaniac with no sense of humor?
How did Jesus feel after the last supper?
What do you call a psychic midget that just escaped prison?
How do you save a Republican from drowning?
What is the worst type of sand to have in your pants?
Why does the Devil hate the holiday Season?
What do oranges, and Jews have in common?
What type of drink do gay nazis hate?
Why couldn't the dyslexic plantation owner get anything done?
Why do you always see Santa with a full sack?
What is every young lady`s ultimate Disney fantasy?
What do you call Moby Dick when he washes up on a sandbar?
What keyboard layout does Miley Cyrus use?
What do you call a boring Muslim?
How many people does it take to screw a lightbulb?
What is the difference between Jamaicans and Jewish people?
What do gay cow's eat?
What did Mike Tyson say when he saw Breaking Bad?
Q: What is Mr. T's nickname for Wednesday?
How many blind people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the internal temperature of a Ton-ton?
What were the 2 doctors who worked with Schrödinger called?
Why did the sailor ground his son?
Why does Helen Keller play the piano with only one hand?
What do you call a black man in a tree?
What's the difference between Sarah Palin's mouth and Sarah Palin's vagina?
Is your phone in your back pocket?
Have you heard about the dyslexic satanist?
What do you call a woman who sells sex for noodles?
What has ten legs and nine arms?
How do hispanics cut a pizza?
How many x does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the worst thing about catching AIDS?
What do you call a preacher with an erection?
Did you hear about the fat chick I fucked on the elevator?
What's a telemarketer's favourite element?
Have you heard about the new male contraceptive pill?
What do you have to use to check a test on Telemarketing?
Did you hear about the woman who tried to bribe the police with pennies?
Did ya hear about the guy who got his hand caught in the printing press?
How do philosophers shave off their beards?
What's the difference between a ladder and a truck?
What's the best way to make a girl weak in the knees?
How many 'friend-zoned' guys does it take to change a light bulb?
Who always wins at musical chairs?
How is pussy like veal?
What did the black kid get on his ACT?
Hey billy jokes?
What do you call a Serbian prostitute?
What do you call a red-headed ninja?
How many passive-aggressive people does it take to change a lightbulb?
How does a deaf and dumb tell a secret to another one?
How many bad joke tellers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How many lightbulbs does it take to screw in a bad joke teller?
Did you know Hellen Keller had a dollhouse?
Q:How do you circumcise a hillbilly?
Why did the man break the clock?
What kind of bellybutton did Paul Walker have?
Why was the Berlin Wall torn down?
What do you call a farting fatass?
What's Black and Yellow that makes everyone laugh?
How many physicists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's older than sand?
Did you hear about the kleptomaniac who went to the theater the other day?
What was the deaf mans favorite song?
Who is the most famous cow in France?
Have you ever seen mothballs?
You guys ever hear the one about little tyrome?
did you know it takes 3 sheep to make a wool sweater?
How do you separate the men from the boys in the Navy?
What happened to the Indian chief who drank too much tea?
Do you know what i say to people that are "butthurt"?
What's the worst part of running into your ex?
Why is it called Black Friday?
How do you greet an overweight Micronesian when you're trying to sound cool?
What is the temperature of the average coffin?
On Thanksgiving, how does Miley Cyrus stuff her bird?
How much does wood cost?
How do you seperate the men from the boys?
Why did Jesus drop out of the carpentry business?
What did the blind, deaf, and mute kid get for Christmas?
Why are farmers the best at what they do?
How did the badge get away with murder?
Did you hear about that new space mosque?
Why did the Mexican army attack the Alamo with only 2000 soldiers?
What do they say about a rapper who stole a dictionary?
You want to know what's the toughest part about Thanksgiving dinner at my house?
What do you call a reliable coke dealer?
Anyone heard of that movie "Constipation"?
Why don't fairies live under toadstools?
Why are all rabbits negro?
How do Asians name their babies?
What is a priest's favorite snack?
Why doesn't jesus play hockey?
Why was the cow scared about going into the slaughter house?
Why am I not afraid of Michelle Obama banning soda pop?
How do make a gay guy fuck a woman?
Why do migits laugh when they run?
Why did James Gandolfini die of a heart attack?
Why do owls not mate when it's raining?
Why Are Jews Considered Optimists?
What did the scat fetishist say to his wife before divorcing her?
Who is busier than a one-toothed man in a corn eating contest?
What do you call a person from South America with a walking assist?
How does the moon cut its hair?
What do you call a man who just had his back waxed?
How do you you ask your male friend to shave your body?
What did the accountant do when he was constipated?
Do you like jokes that make you think a little?
What do you call making your booty clap for likes and upvotes?
What do you call a cowboy with a case of bad gas?
Why did Barbie never get pregnant?
Why is it called xbox one?
What happens to gay horses when they die?
Why did the computer cross the road?
Why did Mike Tyson bring his calculator to church?
What's the difference between a gorilla and an Italian in the bathtub?
How do you get to Carnegie Hall?
What happened when Sean Connery bought himself a little kitten?
What European city is home to the most Indians?
What Did Delaware?
What does a blind person read in church?
What's an old woman taste like?
Why couldn't the witch get pregnant?
What's the best thing about being a meth addict?
What is the difference between a Cadillac and five dead Asian hookers?
What do you call an environmentally-conscious Mexican?
Is knowing of collapse of supermarket in Latvia?
Did you hear about the woman banned from Disney World?
What does a Nazi reach for when he has a head cold?
What is my favorite street sign?
What do you call a little person who can talk to ghosts and just escaped from prison?
What's the difference between my dick and my jokes?
How do you get a polar bear in the water?
What does a sick train say?
You know why it'd called modern jazz right?
How many Soviets does it take to change a light bulb?
How does Moses make beer?
(Q)...... What was the difference between Bill Clinton & Monica Lewinsky's dry-cleaners?
If iron man is a superhero what's iron woman?
What is your favorite knick knock joke?
What kind of lizard can run the mafia?
How many immature people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the difference between an American and a moldy piece of bread?
What do you call a jackass in the mafia?
What's the most important part of a vegetable's golf stats?
What does it take to make a squid laugh?
What do you call a deer without eyes?
What's the difference between eugenics and a charity marathon?
How do you keep a blonde busy?
What do you call a grumpy girl's desk?
Does anyone remember Gotye?
What does anal sex and broccoli have in common?
What do you call a nosy pooper?
How does an Australian clean is bum?
What does a bird say when it wants revenge?
Why do tweekers do it doggie style?
What did the lobster do at the disco?
How do you confuse a Daily Mail reader?
Why was the mathematician late for work?
Did you hear about the man who drowned in a bowl of Muesli?
What does Walter White say when someone tells him a knock-knock joke?
What brand of vodka does a Canadian drink?
What is a homophobe's favorite fruit?
Why'd the Mexican cross the road?
Why did the painting go to jail?
Why did the paleontologist measure the height of a dinosaur using a T-Rex's foot?
How Many Bit Coins Does it take to screw in a Lightbulb?
Whats The difference between Stealing Cookies from a Jar and Child Molesting?
Why do stormtroopers make good drivers?
What were Adam's first ever words to Eve?
What do bears and women from Arkansas have in common?
What do you call a 90's sitcom star's inactivated x chromosomes?
Why shouldn't you look at a cup of ranch?
What do you call that piece of flesh around the clitoris?
What do you call a cow that gets an abortion?
What do you call it when you feed a stick of dynamite to a steer?
There are three flies in the kitchen. Which one is the cowboy?
Did you hear about the guy addicted to eating salt?
How do you tell if someone is opposed to GMOs?
Did you hear about the man that submitted all those entries to the pun contest?
Why couldn't the pony speak clearly?
Why did the computer scientist die in the shower?
Who has two thumbs and looks an awful lot like Alec Baldwin?
M'lady, What is the most beautiful thing in the world?
What's the difference between Jesus and other carpenters?
What's the difference between a dead cat and a dead lawyer on the road?
What's every movie critic's favorite cooking ingredient?
What does the arabs put in their Mexican food??
What's enormous, gray, and unimportant?
Did you hear about the impoverished farmers who drove from Oklahoma to California?
What's the difference between a washing machine and your mom?
Did you hear about that new state of the art jackhammer technology?
Where does the Navy rank amongst the armed forces?
Are you a Lawyer?
What do you call the entrance to a brothel?
What is Cab Calloway's favorite type of humor?
Did you hear about the awesome new Corey Hart cover of Sunglasses at Night?
Why shouldn't happy people hang out with crustaceans?
What is the historical significance of Sir George Stokes?
Who is faster... Speedy Gonzales or Road Runner?
Did you hear about the man who went on a business trip?
Why did the black man wipe his ass?
What kind of cigarettes do California kids smoke?
Why did the blind driver have no hands?
My work colleague sees himself as the pun king... he just made up these jokes..... opinions?
What did the messed up psychologist have for dinner?
How do you fit 50 Jews in a car?
Why did God invent the yeast infection?
What has 16 legs and speaks german?
How is digging fence post holes like being the mayor of Toronto?
Has anyone ever told you what it's like to be royally screwed?
What do you call a bee in a space rocket?
beautiful?
How does the devil measure his drugs?
Why did the virus get a ticket?
What do you call glass cookware from Jamaica?
Who's Leonardo Dicaprio's least favorite Sesame Street character?
What do you call a Rapper who smokes too much?
How do you make a Snowman smile?
Why couldn't the grape help his friend move on Saturday?
Why couldn't the Dairy Queen have any kids?
Why was the tea so obstinate?
What's the difference between Limburger cheese and my friend Ted?
What do you call a king's fart?
What do you call four mexicans drowning?
What do you call a window that can rap?
Why was the blonde girl sitting on the roof?
What did the drug dealer say to his long time girlfriend?
What do you call the useless skin around the vagina?
where does a Finnish child molester go when his ship sinks?
What do ghosts wear?
Did you know that 50% of the Chinese have cataracts?
What did the mexican say when two houses fell on him?
How do u kill a blonde ?
Why is China a communist country?
What happened when the pig ran into his ex?
Want to hear a joke about sodium hypobromite?
What do you call a military base that has quadrupled in size?
What do bulimic stone masons do?
What did one Labium say to the other Labium?
What do Jewish women get when they go to the gynecologist?
How many existentialists does it take to change a light-bulb?
What's the best wood to make a golf club out of?
Why does a chicken coop has two doors?
How many political idealists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why is Bieber never late?
Welche vier Flüsse kennt jede Blondine?
What did Neil Armstrong and Michael Jackson have in common?
How many Borg does it take to change a light bulb?
What did the right crazy-saggy boob say to the left crazy-saggy boob?
What do you call it when a dj gets a blowjob while he's on the air?
What do they call the lottery in Africa?
Why didn't the bike go to the car show?
To whom do agnostics pray?
What do you call a sick bird who has crossed a national border without consent?
How do you make a clown cry?
What did one testicle say to the other testicle?
What makes the scarecrow so good at his job?
What do you call a fart from a paraplegic?
What did the little acorn say when it got planted and grew up?
Why is American Beer like making love in a canoe?
What's the difference between my dick and my paycheck?
What do you call a singing group trio of pre-op Trannies?
Why did the hippie stick his penis in the chick peas?
why do i love bananas so much?
How can you tell if a woman's picture is photoshopped?
What does a Bears fan do when his team wins the Superbowl?
How many terrorists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How does a Mexican build a house?
What's pink and wrinked and hangs out my Y-fronts?
What's so great about nihilism?
How many gorillas does it take to change a lightbulb?
What kind of bagel did the camper eat?
Why did the blind fly starve to death??
Why did the DJ get fired as a waiter?
Why does everyone hate German sausage jokes?
Why do people call their weed the Koran?
Why did the Pakistani cook get fired?
How many kids with ADD does it take to change a light bulb?
How many immature people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What kind of batteries do stuttering Canadians use?
What is gay pride?
How many babies does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the linoleum factory in France that exploded?
What's the dating scene like at MIT?
What do you call a gay light fixture?
How do you tell if somebody doesn't have a smartphone?
How many shrinks does it take to change a lightbulb?
What colour animals have the most sex?
How many Marines does it take to change a lightbulb?
Did you hear the one about the umbrella in the trench coat and sunglasses?
Did you hear about the guy that farted in church?
Why didn't Toronto's mayor tell us earlier about his drug use?
How many bodybuilders does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why couldn't Beethoven find his teacher?
Did you hear about the Vietnam veteran who became a sewage worker?
How many 9GAGers does it take to change a lightbulb?
how many redditors does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many lightbulbs does it take to change a lightbulb?
Math joke: Why do so many math majors confuse Halloween and Christmas?
What has over a hundred teeth and keeps back Godzilla?
how do you call those guys who hang around with musicians all the time?
How many light bulbs did it take to screw a human?
What does 90 year old pussy taste like?
What did the underweight onion say to the garlic?
What do old lady vaginas smell like?
[Russian Joke] What will the results of the next election be?
How many Irish does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Man goes to his son and asks 'Did you tip over the outhouse'?
Why was Karl Marx against Chinese mutes?
How many light bulbs does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Where do magical animals go to jail?
How many members of Coldplay does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a vibrating cat?
How many bassists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
how many pop punkers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How many ska kids does it take to change a light bulb?
How many sorority girls does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why aren't there more jokes based on haptics?
How many friendzoned guys does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many Arabs does it take to change a lightbulb?
What movie aspect ratio do cats prefer?
You know what's gay?
Why do Jews watch porno movies in reverse?
What's the best kind of bee?
What happens if I make a cake with washing soda, not baking soda?
What is Popeye's favorite Led Zeppelin song?
What do you call somebody after you give them a noogie?
Why do pirates take so long to learn the alphabet?
What's the definition of "trust"?
How does every black guy joke start?
What do you call a mexican protein?
What's the difference between a drummer and shoes in a dryer?
Did you hear about the cannibal in the colosseum?
Why should you bury indians 10 feet deep?
Why didn't the ghost go to the dance?
What does Nic Cage have in common with Asian fathers?
What do you find in a pumpkins pants?
Why are recycle bins optimistic?
Why did the skeleton leave the party?
Why did the ghost get kicked out of the bar?
Why did the Eskimos have to stop partying?
Why didn't ken and barbie ever have kids?
How do you make a ginger snap?
Why did the ghost go into the elevator?
What is green and has cake?
What does a dyslexic, agnostic, insomniac spend most of his time doing?
What did batman say to robin before they got in the car?
What do you call a fat cow..?
What was the victim of the car crash wearing?
How you turn a washer into a snow blower?
Why does Naruto vomit after every meal?
How often did the asian cow go to the gym?
What is 1 + 1?
how do socks reproduce?
What is Kanye West's favourite kind of omelette?
Whats black and sits at the top of the stairs after a house fire?
What do you call an Asian pornstar?
How long does it take King Zora to move out of your way?
What do you call a Russian wearing a head scarf, a balaclava and a helmet?
What happened when the joker dropped an elephant carrying a ten ton weight on Batman and Robin?
Did you hear about the serial killer who was coming out of retirement?
what do you get when you cross a donkey and an onion?
What does a virgin eat for breakfast?
What's the greatest trick the Austrians ever pulled off?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Ferrarri?
What time does Sean Connery get to Wimbledon?
How do Ghosts get Drunk?
What causes a pilot to cry after sex?
What did the 2 tampons say to each other?
The best part about being ugly?
What's the difference between a wife and a girlfriend?
Did you hear about the guy with a jurisprudence fetish?
What do liberal arts majors yell when overwhelmed?
What kind of jokes does a mute clown tell?
What do Asians do during an erection?
How many mathematician does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the boy pee say to the girl pee?
Sayings always said with sarcasm. Any examples?
Why don't mathematicians ever get blackout drunk?
It's My First Cake Day and I'm Scrambling. How Does Moses Make his Tea?
What is Michael Jackson's favorite piano chord?
Why did the paraplegic man cross the road?
Did you see that new porno for necrophiliacs?
What is the motto for the Epilepsy Research Society?
Why is North Korea so lame?
What do you call getting a movie about Norse gods from the Internet?
Did you hear about the psychic midget who is wanted by the FBI?
What does the “B” in Benoit B Mandelbrot stand for?
What has a tongue, cannot walk, but gets around a lot?
Why did the German watchmaker say to the watch that kept saying "Tick, tick, tick, tick,..."?
When is the only time you can park like a retard?
What's the difference between humor and odor?
Why was the skeleton embarrassed?
Do you know what a sex stone is?
What do you call the teacher who lost her baby?
What did the NSA agent say to the other NSA agent when he saw the German Chancellor?
What do you call a tooth in a glass?
What did one tampon say to the other when they passed each other on the street?
What happens to the cannibal who is late to the party?
Why was the airport depressed?
What did the hat say to the other hat?
Wanna hear a pun about a sausage?
What is the hardest part about eating vegetables?
Why did the lollipop cross the road?
How many mutants do you need to take over a Ship?
What is your favorite joke about women?
When does a heterosexual man leave a gay bar?
How do you know when you're REALLY drunk ?
Yo gurl is your dad in prison?
too soon?
What happened to the Greek dairy farmer who got robbed on his way to market?
What do you get when you roll weed on a dictionary?
Why shouldn't you join Alcoholics Anonymous on Thanksgiving?
Do these jeans make me look fat?
REQUEST: any Greg Giraldo jokes or is it still too soon?
Got any funny fortune cookie idea's?
What do you call a dictatorship founded on the principles of Ethos, Logos & Pathos?
Why doesn't UGA ever have a nativity scene at Christmas?
Did you hear about the Bob Marley impersonator?
Why can't ghosts make babies?
Did you hear about that party at Thor's?
What's the difference between a bad coffee in Switzerland and a bad coffee in Italy?
Did you know that Native Americans were really good strippers?
What's the best part of having sex with twenty one year olds?
Why doesn't Rihanna smoke weed anymore?
Why should you always finish telling your jokes to David Carradine?
Where does Dracula live?
Opposites?
How amphetamine addiction is called?
How do birds record their songs ?
Why did President Kennedy never get drunk?
What happened to the fly that sat on the toilet seat?
What's the difference between a rectal thermometer and an oral thermometer?
How do you know when the drummer has shown up for band practice?
What is 6 inches long 2 inches wide and makes a woman crazy?
How do you stop a nuclear bomb from squeaking...?
What did the rock say when he went metamorphic?
Why did the cannibal have an upset stomach?
What do you call a cow jumping over a barbed wire fence?
What's the best part of punching a tranny in the face?
Have you ever read "The Longest Joke in the World"?
What did the chinese guy tell the police when he was caught?
Did you hear about the Dick that graduated from Law School?
Did you hear about the clarinet player who left her clarinet in the backseat of her unlocked car?
How are teenaged boys like the enzyme helicase?
Did you know that yeast cells are incestuous?
Did you hear about the guy who mixed viagra and laxatives?
[Reguest] Can you tell me a joke that's translatable in any language?
Did you hear about corduroy pillow cases?
How do they make Holy Water?
Who is a bodybuilder's favourite painter?
Why do drummers carry transparent lunchboxes?
What do you call a person of mixed heritage from eastern Turkey/northern Iraq, and from Wisconsin?
Why should you wash your hair with counterfeit feces?
Why do Africans wear baggy pants?
What's the difference between Jesus, and a picture of Jesus?
What's brown and rhymes with "snoop"?
Do Rabbis get paid for performing circumcisions?
Why didn't the man buy Velcro shoes?
I know they're bad but ya wanna know why I love dead baby jokes?
Did you hear about the new Canadian pornographic news network?
Did you hear they're going to print the Daily Mail on A1 sheets?
What does Sean Connery call a greedy oyster?
What do you call a midget with leprosy?
What do you call a black guy in a cockpit?
What does Al-Libi use for his defense during his trial?
what's the difference between a normal consumer and a prostitute?
How do you know when your dog is a bad hot dog?
What did the cumulus cloud say to the stratus cloud?
Why did the pirate's rap song become such a hit?
what did Cindarella say when she got to the ball?
Cop Jokes?
What is the difference between a girl in church and a girl in a bathtub?
What does DMX say when he has trouble putting on a hoodie?
What do you call tension in the percussion section?
Why did the pony have such a hard time talking?
What did the Australian say when he won a game of chess?
Did you hear Miley Cyrus got a new job?
Did you hear they recently opened a bar on the moon?
Why is a dance like a bowl of cereal?
What did the picky cow say?
How are lawyers and apples similar?
What's a four letter word for intercourse ending with K?
Why did the storm trooper buy an iPhone?
What did the doe say when she came out of the woods?
Sweetie, will you buy me a cellphone?
Why didn't Tim have any friends while he was studying fishing?
What do you call a lawyer up to his neck in cement?
Matt Schaub and Eli Manning walk into a bar. What happened?
What did the wolfman say to the sentient AI?
How does Bob Marley like his doughnuts?
How far can you walk into the forest?
Why do mermaids wear seashells?
What is the difference between "ooo" and "aaa"?
What do you call the bad part of Italy?
What's the difference between Twitter and Game of Thrones?
What's the best thing about twenty-three year olds?
Did i tell you that someone hit me over the head with a power tool the other day?
What do you call someone who confuses Emma Stone and Mila Kunis in a movie?
How do old people go to the bathroom?
What did the armless warrior say to his opponent before battle?
What do you call it when a lizard has problems in the bedroom?
Why cant miss piggy count to 70?
If pro is the opposite of con, what is the opposite of progress?
Divide the circumference of a pumpkin by its diameter, and what do you get?
Why did the hipster burn his mouth on the pizza?
What would you have if all autos in the US were painted pink?
Why does green think yellow is such a slut?
What did the blind prostitute say to the guy with five dicks?
What's the difference between an accordion and an onion?
Why did the girl blush when she opened the fridge?
What does violent diarrhoea and a bar fight have in common?
What do you call a male cow wearing a pink shirt, orange shorts, and a purple backpack?
How many hippies does it take to change a light bulb?
Why could the witch never get the enchantments right?
How many Deadheads (Grateful Dead fans) does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's the definition of macho?
What's a clown's favorite thing to eat?
What did one earthquake say to the other?
Why did the melon plan a big elaborate wedding?
What did one unemployed cancer cell say to the other?
How do you fix a broken jack-o-lantern?
What do you call a women who cant draw?
What do you call a rape in the military?
Why are Apple products popular with hipsters?
A challenge for /r/jokes: What's your funniest yet least known joke?
How Do You Kill An Anorexic?
Why are there exactly two hundred and thirty nine beans in an Irish Bean Soup?
What do you get if an elephant has sex with a rabbit?
How do you know which potato is a prostitute?
What do you have in a room full of tweakers?
How do you get a black guy out of a tree?
In what month are Rabbis dishonest?
What's the difference between an Irish Catholic and a Roman Catholic?
What does Matthew Shephard hate more than being raped, having AIDS, and being pistol whipped?
Why wouldn't you ask the zebra for music advice?
What do you call a robotic priest?
How did the detective solve his cold-case?
Why was Noah a great economist?
Why don't electrical engineers get girls?
What's the difference between a black guy and a pizza?
Does your face hurt?
Are you a VIRGIN?
What do you say to a thin American?
Have you ever seen the inside of an ac compressor?
What did 50 cent say to his grandma after she crocheted him a sweater?
What do you call it when you wake up with a boner and wait till you go limp to urinate?
why do women fake orgasms?
Hey reddit, guess what's funnier than 24?
where do you send a jewish kid with ADD?
What does a sperm cell have in common with a lawyer?
When is a testicular tumor like a bingo ball?
how do you make pickle bread?
what is the difference between mosquito and prostitute?
What is the difference between a guitar player and government bonds?
So a man buying stolen goods gets caught, and is given one phone call, who does he call?
Why are Nazis such bad DJs?
How do you get a bass player off of your porch?
did you hear about the Chinese lift repairman?
Can't remember the name of that 80's song, huh?
What do cubs fans do after they win the world series?
How does Lil Wayne get inspiration for his new music?
What's the difference between the Olympic long distance race and the Paralympic long distance race?
Why did the male spider spin a web?
Did anyone see the original joke posted on this sub today?
Whats the least paying job?
What do you call a group of fundamentalist mathematicians?
Did you hear about the 6 guys and the woman that went fishing?
What´s the only white thing about a black guy?
Why is NASA having a lawsuit filed against them from animal protection?
What's the difference between a Snickers and my girlfriend?
(This one is better when spoken) Did you hear about the man with two penises?
What's the difference between GTA V Online and a non-essential government employee?
Who's the world most famous blacksmith?
How many members of Linkin Park does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you make a handkerchief dance?
How many members of Coldplay does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What don't you want to hear after performing oral sex on Willie Nelson?
What's the difference between a pregnant lady and a lightbulb?
Did you hear that the Jim Henson company is making a show about meth-cooking?
Why does riding in an elevator make ghosts happy?
Where do Pandas live?
Why aren't there any knock-knock jokes about freedom?
What's the difference between Tiger Woods and Santa Claus?
What did the farmer say after he fed his cows pot?
Why does Michael Jackson like 26 year Olds?
Do you hear about the 2 Irish gays?
What do Saddam Hussein and Little Miss Muffet have in common?
What was the console gamer's New Years Resolution?
How are bad dubstep and constipation similar?
Why did Tony the Tiger go to prison?
What's the difference between the jokes from today and next week's jokes?
What do you call an incredibly well-dressed punk?
Why did the airport luggage checker refuse to date the depressed man?
Did you hear about that guy going around stealing everybody's Flamin' Hot Cheetos?
Where did Susie go during the bombing?
Why is the letter E lazy?
Why don't gays like to play hide-and-seek?
What did the leper say to the hooker?
What's fun about having sex with twenty-one year olds?
What do you call it when a guy fucks a girl and never calls her again?
What do you call bees that make milk instead of honey?
Why do you hate a nosey pepper?
Did you hear about the new anti-depressant for lesbians?
What color are your panties, babe?
How can you tell that a black person used your computer?
Why don't churches, synagogues, mosques and temples have Wi-Fi?
Why do women prefer 77 more than 69?
What is the difference between a Greek spearman and a pale beer?
How do you get down off an elephant?
What was the last thing that went through the fly's head when he hit the windshield?
Where does biggest potato grow?
Why don't lobsters share?
What is the difference between a hormone and a enzyme ?
Why did the 14 year old Mexican girl end up pregnant?
What does seven days without exercise make?
Did you hear about the guy ducking charges of sheep rape?
Why do dwarfs always laugh when they are playing football?
Why doesn't a chicken coop have four doors?
Why is it so tough to please girls?
Why did the lights go out?
Do ya know the difference between Scots and Scotch?
Why is it so hard to explain metaphors to a kleptomaniac?
What is the last thing you want to hear after sucking Willie Nelsons dick?
Who's the most badass flower salesman?
Why should I date you?
Where did Pedobear go to college?
What jokes do you know that can only be understood if you know two (or more) languages?
How do ghosts get ghouls interested in them?
What's the difference between the French and toast?
I made a joke: What is a fruit bun's favourite subject in a Pub Quiz?
What do you call a prostitute with her hands up her own skirt?
Why can't you tell knock knock jokes about freedom?
Repost- How do you circumcise a redneck?
How were you conceived?
What's the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scottish Highlander?
Why was 6 afraid if 7?
What do call groups of the 5 most dangerous animals?
What's the difference between a lawyer and an angry rooster?
What's the difference between a Genealogist and a Gynecologist?
Have you watched the documentary about sponges?
Did ya' hear about the bear that tried to fly from British Columbia to New York?
Why does the dyslexic Spanish speaker have a poor self image?
What's the difference between a well dressed man and a tired dog?
What's the difference between fancy food and military food?
Why do comedians hate noble gasses?
What's the worst thing about sex?
What did the bad shock tell the good shock?
Have you heard what scientists are saying about Pluto?
Did you hear about the alligator who couldn't get a hard-on?
What do Roman Doctors call I.V.s?
What do you call the Mexican version of the NSA?
Why was old Bilbo's body found with a massive erection?
What is the cheapest kind of meat you can buy?
What do you call Shaka Zulu with a Fire Cracker?
Did you hear about the gangsta proctologist?
Where are PCs formed?
Why do pirates like TIG welding so much?
What does Reddit need?
What kind of online videos do fish love to watch?
What do you call Atheism?
Do you know who wants some good D?
What do a burnt pizza, a frozen beer, and a pregnant woman have in common?
Did you hear pooh bear went gangsta?
Did you hear about the time traveler who finished his plate?
What do you get if you cross a brown chicken and a brown cow?
What does a member of the British Royal Family say when they are reaching climax?
Why was it easier for the whistleblower to leave American soil earlier in the year?
What is on the Pink Panther's to-do list?
How is a computer like an air conditioner?
What do you call a stupid arachnid?
What is the worst part about breaking up with a japanese girl?
Why did the pirate update his Macbook?
Where does a psychologist keep his boat?
Wanna get laid?
What do you call the director of Kill Bill out in the sun?
What is irony?
Why did the kiddie pool have no friends?
Why can't pirates wear sunglasses?
What's the best part about showering with a 5 year-old?
What does a hungry clock do?
Why Did Hitler commit suicide?
Why were the Libyans eating money?
Why don't U2's lawyers ever make any money?
What did the redditor say when he opened his package from the UniBomber?
[Mysoginistic joke] What's the definition of the perfect woman?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger become after he resigned as Governor of California?
Why did the thief killed himself after getting caught stealing instruments from an orchestra?
What does a dyslexic, agnostic insomniac do at night?
Why should you never make fun of a fat girl with a lisp?
How do you make a fat chick orgasm?
Have you been drinking sir?
What's the opposite of irony?
what happens when you pop a cherry?
Why do fat chicks give good head?
What is the most important thing for a hungry shark?
Yeah, did you hear about the really chatty snake gynecologist?
What do you call a mathematician at the beach?
Did you know that 90% of all dog in South Korea are inbred?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say to Beethoven on the way to the fancy dress party?
Did you hear about the sale of lesbian beds at IKEA?
What did the kids say to the gay rabbit?
What do you call a pepper on a string that comes back to you?
What do you call a bear in the rain?
Why is it difficult to explain puns to kleptomaniacs?
What do you call an artist with a brown finger?
How do you catch a rabbit?
Why did the lettuce blush?
Why is a coin factory so logical?
Q: What's the shortest book ever written?
How did the hipster﻿ burn his tongue?
What is enjoyed if it is wanted and hated if its not?
What do you call potato friends?
What did the Chinese man give his daughter?
Did you hear the one about the dyslexic agnostic insomniac?
Would you like to hear a good joke about Jonestown Massacre?
Have any you ever tried to throw out a garbage can ?
What do u call two lesbians floating down a river in a canoe?
What did Kenny G say when he got off the elevator?
Why was the nerd not late for class?
How did the lesbian couple build their house?
What did the traffic light say to the car?
When does a pentagon not have 5 sides?
Why couldn't the NSA do anything after the blizzard?
What's a hard drive's favorite band?
How do you get a redneck to suck your dick?
Why did no one laugh at the hot dogs joke?
What hangs at a man's thigh, and wants to poke the hole it's often poked before?
Which city u cannot enter?
Are you fond of alternative sources for cooling technologies?
Why did the introduction and the conclusion break up?
The documentary who?
What'd the Mexican say when he was upset?
What's a word that starts with "N" that you don't want to call a black person?
What do you call a Mexican maid with no legs?
Need an ark?
What's a nymphomaniac's favorite candy bar?
What is the difference between cats and commas?
Why do hipsters love 'Raiders of the Lost Ark'?
Why are there no Walmarts in Syria?
What do you get when you suck all of the Botox out of Madonna?
Did you hear about the Texas hipster whose bicycle was broken?
Why did the Chihuahua put on a jacket?
What did the gay Mexican dentist ask his boyfriend for?
Where will Miley Cyrus go when her showbiz career is over?
What do you find in a rythmic bakery?
What do you call a Japanese boy who just got beat by his dad after getting got masterbating?
What did the writer say when he glued himself to his book?
what's the worst part for a zombie about eating a vegetable?
what’s the difference between an old greyhound bus terminal and a lobster with 36B breasts?
What is long and hard that women don't have compulsorily?
Is fashion all about clothes?
What is the difference between deer nuts and beer nuts?
OK Reddit, whats the best 9/11 Joke You've Ever Heard?
Did you know that diarrhea is genetic?
What's the difference between Preston Coach Terminal and a lobster with 34e breasts?
What's the best thing to come out of Oklahoma?
Why was the young boy crying?
Why is Oklahoma so windy?
Did you hear about the dog that's become the first to officially own pieces of art?
What do you call a wind that never gusts?
What's the best part about being African?
Why do cows never walk out of horror movies?
What's the difference between my penis and the Three Stooges?
What's the difference between Justin Bieber and a lawyer?
What kind of music does a factory worker listen to?
Where do the gays in New Mexico live?
Did you hear oxygen and magnesium started dating?
How do you send a sandwich to someone on a computer?
What do you find in the Pope's toilet?
If a person were to give a speech about Mozart, where would they be most likely to do it?
What do you call someone who LOVES Wikipedia?
Why did the squirrel swim on its back?
Know how I upset my balcony?
Why did the hipster burn his tongue on his pizza?
Why did the bacon laugh?
which city u cannot enter???????????????????????
What do you call it when a homeless wino robs a gay man in a park late at night?
Why do women wear make-up and perfume?
What was the Mathematician's Favorite Johnny Depp Movie?
What's the difference between an flautist and a Porsche?
How does a space class start a party?
Don't you hate people that answer their own questions?
Why did the coed have sex with a Mexican?
What do you milk you can't see?
guess what?
How do you re-use a condom?
What are some good conversation starter jokes you can think of?
What does the DJ do when he spills acid?
Do you want to know a good Jewish wine?
What's white and washes your socks?
How does a woman destroy a mans pride with 4 words?
What is the best way to get over a guy/girl?
How are you going to celebrate 9-11?
What do you call it when you're run over by a German?
Why don't seagulls fly over the bay?
you met the short guy who came out of the cupboard?
What is the difference between a dead baby and a water melon?
Why did the feminist get raped?
What did the metaphysicist say when he came out of the bathroom?
You guys wanna hear a construction joke?
What do you name a dog with no legs?
Have you ever been in a Schindler's Lift?
Why are manhole covers circular?
Why did Dr.Pepper blush?
What's the longest Island in New York?
What do deviant nuns have?
Why did Jimmy bring his cat to school?
Why do elephants drink?
What is black and white and red all over?
A Riddle: Where did the apple go when it's parents died?
What is Swizz Beatz's favorite breakfast meal?
Did you hear about the Scooby Doo villain who became an Olympic swimmer?
Why do vampires hate Texas Roadhouse?
do you know?
Did you hear there was a fire in George Bushes personal library?
Did you hear about the girl who was dating the guy with the wooden leg?
How do you reward a chicken journalist?
What is an ear of corn's favourite Leonardo DiCaprio movie?
Did you know Steve Irwin would still be alive if he wore sunscreen?
Why are there fences around cemeteries?
Why does the bass fart a half-tone flatter than every other fish?
What does picking your nose and masturbating have in common?
Why did I cross the road?
Why did the doctor kick his patients?
What's the difference...?
What's Moby Dick's dads name?
Why was Nancy always on top when the Reagans made love?
Why does a fat man when squeezed compliment the ladies?
Why does Mrs. Claus not have any kids?
Why is a restless man in bed like a lawyer?
Did you hear about the man who spent his whole life trying to perfect cloning technology?
did you hear about the kid who read a book about anti gravity?
What's the opposite of running away and getting married?
Did you hear about the magician who could create things out of thin air?
What do you get when hou bring a Greek and a Swede together?
Did you hear about the unreleased Western starring Bruce Lee?
What do I have in common with neutrinos?
What do you call 2 ducks who walk like, act like, and believe they are geese?
What do you call a Mexican that can't cross the border?
What did a tree say to another tree?
What do you call an asian walking a dog?
What did the time traveller do after he ate the last bite of his dinner?
What's the difference between a Mexican and an elevator?
What did the Doe say when she walked out of the bushes?
Why do flies hate the shower?
What is blonde and brown blonde and brown blonde and brown?
what do a divorce and a tornado have in common in west virginia?
Who is the most popular guy in a swingers' club?
Did you hear Gotye converted from Judaism to Catholicism?
what do eggs benedict and a blow job have in common?
What do you call a gang of tires?
What do you call a guy with no arms and legs in a hot dog bun?
What's the most indian bone in the human body?
What do you call something that only 9 or 11 can fix?
What do you call an artist in a dark alley?
What do a Tupperware designer and a horny walrus have in common?
How do you get an r/jokes redditor confused?
Why are dentists usually always male?
How many guys in the friend zone does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do a call a midget psychic that just robbed a bank?
Did you hear about the horny Asian janitor?
What's the difference between a bag of cocaine and a toddler?
What's it called when a pig kills itself?
What do a pizza guy and a gynecology have in common?
Why do Ken and Barbie never have kids?
What do you get when you cross a nymphomaniac with a kleptomaniac?
what do you call it when 3 muppets have sex together?
What entrance do prostitutes use?
How do you project confidence?
How do you start a rave in Africa?
Wanna See a perfect Relationship?
Why did god invent patchouli?
Why did Lady Gaga wear seashells to the VMAs?
What do you get when you cross a philosopher, an insomniac and a dyslexic?
How are peanut butter and jelly related?
How many Freuds does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What happens when you zip up a lion?
How does Queen Elizabeth win a game of poker?
What about the man with nobody and no nose?
What do you call a gay satanist?
What do you call a fat man in a bath ?
What's the difference between a woman and a toilet?
What Did MLK Say When Asked If He Suffered From Jock Itch?
Whats the hardest part of rollerblading?
Have you heard about the man who got cooled to absolute zero??
Why do fat white women like black guys?
Why was the woman sent to jail for 12 months, while the man got a year?
Did you hear about the famous Italian chef that recently died?
How is a lonely twig like a piece of cling wrap?
What did the two iPhones say to the two iPads?
Who discovered Victoria Falls?
What has 2 legs and bleeds......?
What's the difference between a girlfriend and a wife?
Why was the ghost on an episode of Hoaders?
What's slimy cold long and smells like pork?
What do you call a Nun that bites her nails?
What happens if you don't keep up payments to your exorcist?
What did the Canadian think of his hardwood flooring?
How did Jesus feel when He was crucified by the jews?
What do the Mafia and a pussy have in common?
What is Mike Tyson's favorite thing for a woman to wear?
What did one tree say to the other?
What does a redditor do after his picket fence is installed?
I (maybe?) came up with this joke today. What do you call a lost caveman?
How do you foil a plan?
What's the difference between a car tyre, and 365 condoms?
Whats the difference between a prostitute and a crack dealer?
What did Simba say to his dad when he was moving too slow?
What happens when Fonzie doesn't fold his clothes after doing laundry?
How do you catch a steroidal fish?
What does Subway and a Hollywood Tranny have in common?
What does a promiscuous homosexual have in common with a popular homeless person?
What's the speed limit of sex?
What's the difference between a fake orgasm and a fake Christmas tree?
Why should Steve Irwin have put on sunscreen?
why is oral sex better than cake?
What do you call a hundred women in a tree?
How do you make a dwarf taller?
You all know any good masturbation jokes?
What's a calender's favorite fruit?
How do you email a sandwich?
Did you here about the two faces being added to MT. Rushmore?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs driving a car?
How did the midget feel after sleeping all night in a coffin?
Why did the chef add extra oregano to the sauce?
Why did they stop feeding cows the round bails of Hay in Texas?
How do you feel when there's no more coffee?
What can a cup of coffee and a cow that's had an abortion have in common?
What does a rock artist say to a jazz musician?
What do brunettes and red-heads do on Friday nights?
What do you call poor pasta?
How do you fit an elephant into a safeway bag?
What's the difference between a dog?
Do you know a joke in a Foreign Language?
What do you tell a woman with black eyes?
What do you call a blonde Jew?
What do you get when you cross an orthodontist and a secret agent?
Why could Darren jump higher than Zeus?
What happened to the two zombies who went on a date?
What does Mr. Miyagi do when he gets home from a date?
Do you know why 6 is afraid of 7?
Do you need an Ark?
Oh, so you're a Shania Twain fan, eh?
Ever wonder about those people who spend $2.00 on those little bottles of Evian water?
What do you call a cheap hooker's snatch?
How do you keep your hair from blowing everywhere when you drive in a convertible?
What did Johann Sebastian Bach do when someone steam-rolled his organ?
Why are women called bitches?
What type of shoes do pedophiles wear?
Anybody heard about that new drug for lesbians?
What do you call a bald porcupine?
Did you hear about the suicidal dolphin?
Did you hear about the famous musical gay trio?
Why didn't the Chinese guy get any time off from work when he told them about his son's death?
What do you call a whore famous among pickles?
What do you get when you cross a highway with a lawnmower?
Why were the ancient Greeks considered so brave on the battlefield?
How do you stop a Mexican tank?
What do you call 2 Asians playing basketball?
Will carrying a torch save you from an attacking bear?
Why didn't Hitler drink?
What type of animals are put on envelopes?
I go in hard and come out soft You blow me hard what am I?
What do you call houses who have good behavior?
Have you seen the photo of me and REM?
Why are Jews so rich?
What's the difference between a pig and a musician?
Michael Jackson, too soon?
You know Coca Cola's newest advertising campaign in russia?
Why don't black people get sunburns?
What's a Canadian Anarchist's favorite shape?
Did it hurt when you were circumcised?
Where did you leave your legless dog?
What do you call it when two Mexicans were in a car accident and one had both legs amputated?
Why couldn't Jesus's eat m&m's?
How many jews fit in a car?
Why do so many Australian men experience premature ejeculation?
What's the difference between a golf ball and a Ford?
What's upside down and downside up at the same time ?
What was the first profession to go all digital?
How do you make endocrine?
What did the chef say to the man who wouldn't eat alphabet soup?
What gets whiter as it gets dirtier?
How many Economists does it take to change a lightbulb?
How do you make estrogen?
What time do dentists fly airplanes?
What did airport security tell the Dentist?
Anyone else want to join my all Mexican tribute band?
How did Han Solo enter the world?
What does a Transvestite do on Xmas day?
What do 9 out of 10 people love?
What did Cindarella say when she got to the ball?
If you used a keyboard with built-in speakers, you would be...?
What do you call a pompous Hobbit?
Why did Princess Di cross the road?
Why was the whale lonely after his date?
If 'Blasian' is the mix of Asian and black, what do you get when you mix white and Indian?
What does a feminist use as a contraceptive?
Did you know that a male ejaculates at 27mph?
How do you keep the Kansas City Chiefs away from your house?
How many monkeys does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did the pilot say to the co-pilot right before the UPS plane crash in Alabama?
How many MRAs does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What is the internal temperature of a Taunton?
What is the difference between Princess Diana and Tiger Woods?
What's the last thing that goes through a fly's mind when it hits a car windscreen?
How many Greeks does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How do they know that Princess Diana had dandruff?
Do you know what an Australian kiss is?
What is the fakest part of Skyrim?
What do you call a group of yogurt loving boat enthusiast?
Why was Noah a great businessman?
Are you pudgey?
Why did the blonde have bruises on her belly button?
Why did the black man walk into a bar?
What did the stormtrooper say when he was frying Luke's aunt and uncle?
Who is missing an egg?
What did batman say to robin?
How do you find a blind man at a nudist colony?
What do phone books and women have in common?
Why do people hate playing uno with Mexicans?
You know what they say about a guy with tiny arms?
What do you call it when thieves in a metal boat steal your fool's gold?
I know its slightly distasteful but, what's the best way to punish a blind kid?
What did the court jester call the balding crown prince?
Why was diarrhoea classified under hereditary diseases?
What is it called when an old priest and a nun having sex both crap in the bed?
What happens to Captain America when he dies?
What did Joss say on the last day of shooting the Avengers?
What did Thor say to the weaver fixing his cape?
Did you hear about the dyslexic devil worshipper ?
What do you call Iron Man when he is feeling sad?
Why did the pickle stop being a contortionist?
Why is a bullet like a gay man?
What is a cat's favorite tropical destination?
What's the best thing about having sex with 23 year olds?
How can you tell someone is vegan?
How ugly was she?
Did you know that Santa Claus is both an arborist and a geologist?
You know what the say about men with big shoes?
Did you hear the joke about the Hassidic jew dentist who only puts braces on every third tooth?
What do you call an attractive bee who goes to bars?
What do you call a man who has sex with his 9 year old wife?
Do you know why Jewish men are circumcised?
How do you make a Jewish girl scream twice?
Can the ninja throw his ninja stars?
Why did the excluded tree grow?
What game do enemy naval officers play in the sauna?
Why do Java Programmers wear glasses?
How do you get a white trash girl to suck your dick?
Why couldn't little Johnny get the toy he saw on TV?
What do Catholics and Baptists have in common?
What do you get when you cross the Queen of England and Prince Charles?
What's a joke that you invented?
ever have sex while camping?
do you sell wasps?
What is the last thing to go through a fly's mind when it hits a windshield?
Why is it so hard to contact comedians?
How can you tell vampirism is a disease?
Why was 9 mad at 0 after winning a game of bingo?
What does Tarzan sing at Christmas?
Why do the jews have such big noses?
[warning racist] wanna hear a dark joke?
How does a whore relieve herself?
What do you call a Russian with Tourette's syndrome?
Why did Silver have such a successful rap career?
What did the sign on the door of the whorehouse say?
Marriage to the end?
What do you call a bird with 3 wings and 3 legs?
What do you get when you cross a Drug cartel and a Mafia lord?
What kind of lotion does a bullfighter use?
What do you call an Asian prize fighter who's dad has a serious case of diarrhea?
What did the allergic say after getting stung by a bee?
Did you hear about the refuse collector in Pakistan who died after carrying too much rubbish?
[OC] What does a blind pessimist say?
Do you like Knock Knock jokes?
Why do cows have bells around their necks?
How do you know when you're staying in a hillbilly hotel?
What do you pasta with a witty comeback?
What did one bird say to another bird on New Year's?
Why are C programmers poor?
What is the difference between brown nosing and butt kissing?
How did the hour and minute hands of the clock get cancer?
What's the most useless thing ever?
Did you hear about the bassist?
What song does a dwarf pimp sing?
What is a chronic masturbator's favorite dish?
What is a guy who hangs out with musicians called?
Who came after Augustus?
What's the best joke you know that's kid-safe?
Ever blow bubbles as a kid?
Why couldn't the boy look at the Milky Way?
What do you call a psychic midget that broke out of jail?
What do you call masturbating on a plane?
How do Mexican peanuts tell time?
Whats the difference between a Polish woman and a hockey goalkeeper??
What does a greengrocer weigh?
What do you call it when a jewish submarine operator is discriminated against for being gay?
How does Luke Skywalker get through the forest?
Why did the Origami Artist never win a poker match?
Why is a wizard so good in bed?
What do you get when you cross an English bulldog and a Shih Tzu?
What percentage of germans are not nazis?
Why didn't the butterfly go to the dance?
What is a homeless man's favorite type of music?
What's the internal tempered of a Taunton?
How many bears would Bear Grylls grill if Bear Grylls could grill bears?
How do you know when a black chick is pregnant?
Q: What do you call a powerful black guy?
What did the necrophile say to his ex-girlfriend?
Why did Xmen's Cyclops go to the doctors?
Where do Russian Spy's live?
What two games does Carl Sagan play at the bar?
What is the difference between a grizzly bear and a limp dick?
Have you heard about the new Web MD zodiac?
what's about 5 inches long and hasn't been inside another man in almost 2 weeks?
Have you heard about the gay bees with allergies?
What kind of music do rabbits listen to?
How do you know you sister is on her period?
How did Steve Jobs die?
Why did the woman sky-diver wear a jock strap?
What happens when Anthony Weiner tries to shake someones hand?
Have you ever ordered a honeymoon salad?
Why is Spider-Man a bad boyfriend?
Why is Stephen Hawking going to hell?
What's innuendo?
Did you hear about the guy who was obsessed with building HOV lanes through mountains?
What do wizards call unmagical African Americans?
What do you call a frog that jumps half the distance to its destination every time?
What's the difference between a dirty Greyhound station and a lobster with big breasts?
Why did the zombie get a gym membership?
Why didn't crab and lobster like to share?
What season is it when you are on a trampoline?
What's the best thing about twenty nine year olds?
Why did the Grim Reaper go to the shoe repair shop?
What do you call a Psychic Compromise?
When a vegetarian turns into a zombie, what does it eat?
What's the Titanic's Favorite Holiday?
What does a gay cow eat?
What do you call 5 black people on a plane?
Why do people with no arms have difficulty remembering?
Why are even the best forensic teams unable to catch hillbilly criminals?
What did the pastry chef say to his apprentice?
What do you call a deer that can't see?
What do you call a boat that gives fresh breath?
How much does a Hipster weigh?
Do you know what your pimples do while you're asleep?
Why did the Irish call their currency the "Punt" ?
Why do girls prefer to drive auto cars, instead of manual?
What do you get when you cross an Indian smoothie with a rescue dog?
What did the one wall say to the other wall?
A broom and a mop have sex. What happens next?
What happened to Mr. Potato Head when he smoked weed?
Whats the difference between an onion and a hooker?
What do you call a Frenchman with eleven penises?
One did one redditor say to the other?
What did the French skeleton say before he ate?
Why couldn't anyone hear Hellen Keller scream?
What is Bill Clinton's favorite instrument?
Heard about the Polish Coyote?
What's the worst kind of tea?
You know why Dolly Parton has small feet?
What did the dwarf pimp say to his working girl?
What's the difference between Japanese people and their food?
What kind of cheese did Medusa eat?
What do you call a blonde haired skeleton in the closet?
Why doesn't a rooster wear pants?
What do you call a black man who flies a plane for a living?
Scotland or Whales?
How do you flirt with a calligraphist?
26 letters, minus the U. What do you get?
Have you heard about the gay midget?
What's the difference between a fox and a dog?
Did you hear about the injured Carpenter?
Why did the business dog chase his tail?
What does a two-headed cat say??
What's more illegal than marijuana?
How do you know when a blonde is having a bad day?
Why did the duck go to the basketball game?
Why was the chef mad?
What do you say when someone asks you to make a fat person leave?
Why was the female bank teller angry?
Have you heard the one about the mentally challenged couple making love?
Where does a pirate keep his buccaneers?
How many drugs did Charlie Sheen take?
Why did the black man buy 4 boxes of condoms?
What do you call a woman with boobs on her back?
Why did the black person cross the road?
How did Helen Keller break her hands?
Whats the technical term for a female to male sex change?
Which U.S. state abbreviation is the best?
What do you a call girl with a saggy vagina shaking her booty?
How Long Does It Take A Black Woman To Take A Dump?
What did the two tampons have in common?
Why did the restaurant on the moon fail?
How do you know when a cat's done cleaning itself?
What's worse than finding a lobster on your piano?
What do you call a girl who only likes guys with big muscles?
What do you call a Middle Eastern moving company?
Why should you never BBQ on your roof?
slight variation on an arguable classic: How do mermaids reproduce?
What's the last thing a Redneck says before he dies?
What's a pedophile's favorite part about Halloween?
What does a Jewish wife make for dinner?
Why did the blonde snort splenda?
What do you call a man that brews beer?
Q: What do you call a deer with no eyes?
What do you call a Greek intellectual that only eats kimchee?
How do you process a queue of table delete requests for an asynchronous database?
Why did the pedophile go into the cave?
How near was the boy to his dad's tobacco stash before getting busted?
Who has to always be on there toes?
Why was the stadium so cool?
What did the guy with no arms and no legs get for christmas?
What do you call a lesbian that you can't understand?
(Male-related)When I have a double stream, is there something obstructing the penis?
Did you hear about the cat that ate a ball of yarn?
What happens when Batman sees Catwoman naked?
What boxer's nickname is EEEEE?
What do you call a kid with no arms, no legs, and an eyepatch?
Whats the KKK's favorite type of cake?
Why are computers in Palestine really fast?
What's the hardest part to eat of a vegetable?
What is a Nazi baker's secret ingredient?
What are the 3 rings involved in marriage?
Why won't Malia and Sasha Obama's classmates gossip about them?
What do you call a gay T-Rex?
What was special about Three-Eyed Suzie?
What does someone do after they eat too much bacon?
What do you call Bruce Lee stuffed in a shell?
What did the Buffalo say to his son on the first day of school?
What do a gynecologist and a pizza guy have in common?
How does an abortion doctor like his eggs?
What do you get when you shove an iPhone into a blender?
Why couldn't the joke walk?
Why would I go to a high school reunion?
What do a priest and a swimmer who came in second have in common?
How do you turn a dishwasher into a snow blower?
Did you hear about Stevie Wonder getting a cheese grater for his birthday?
How do Spaniards take their coffee?
What do Polar Bears eat for lunch?
Hey baby, are you a parking ticket?
What's the difference between pizza and your opinion?
What is the definition of trust?
What did the slut's left leg say to her right leg?
Wanna hear a cat joke?
What does Delia Smith say when she wants to fight a road?
What did the man say to the bee who wanted to learn the alphabet?
Why couldn't the bee dress as a ghost for Halloween?
What's an archaeologist's favorite verb?
Any good jokes involving an Armadillo, a banana and a grandmother?
Why did the policeman wake up his son?
What do you get when you cross a fish with an elephant?
Did you ever see that movie about constipation?
How does a French person sneeze?
How do you get rid of a fat ghost?
What's the difference between George Zimmerman and Trayvon Martin?
What do you call a train that has a tobacco addiction?
What's common to the cockpit of a modern fighter aircraft and the inside of a headhunter's hut?
Did you hear about the Mexican Army's new weapons?
Q: When Do You Hurt a Midget?
Did you hear about the band Kansas getting arrested for kidnapping at the airport?
What do you call a donkey in space?
Why do gay guys like rotisserie chicken?
What does a toilet, a clitoris, and an anniversary have in common?
How can you tell if Asians have broken into your house?
Did you hear about that free-range astrophysicist buffalo?
What do animal poachers do in their spare time?
So we're doing "Roman walks into a bar" jokes?
Did you hear what they're planning for the next episode of 'Glee'?
What does a stripper do to her asshole before work?
What do you call a scary philosopher?
What does a Rubik's Cube and a penis have in common?
How did the blonde chip her teeth?
What's the best way to break in a new pair of shoes?
Why did the Little Mermaid run away with the fisherman?
Did you hear the one about the Baader-Meinhof Phenomenon?
What did the philanderer say to the gardener praying in the shed?
Why couldn't the melons run away and get married?
Why would the Higgs Boson feel unsafe in a country where the leader openly practiced genocide?
What do you call a pair of identical twins who are stewardesses?
What do you get if you cross a Fish and an Elephant?
What do you call it when you give chairs to the poor?
What mistake did the chronometer make while it was getting along well with the digital watch?
Wanna hear a joke about an unsharpened pencil?
What's another way to describe a contradicktion?
What does Justin Bieber and jam have in common?
Did you know two melons of the same sex can't marry?
What do your child and your dick have in common?
How do you get a unicorn from neighing in your front yard?
What did Santa give the blind, autistic, paraplegic kid with down syndrome for Christmas?
How many policemen does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do Queenslanders call their beer, "XXXX"?
What does the US Government use to spy on a high school student?
How to Jews travel?
If seagulls fly over the sea, what flies over the bay?
Why did the scare crow win the award?
Why do blondes have bruised belly buttons?
Why does the little mermaid wear seashells?
Why are female schoolteachers always so angry?
Why couldn't Edward leave Russia?
I don't know much about math, but what did the acorn say when it grew up?
Where did the promiscuous girl from Belgium go to plant her flowers?
How many clones of president Obama does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is a duck-billed platypus called a duck-billed platypus?
Why was the russian airforce less superior than their enemies?
Why are housing prices in Toronto falling?
What has 10 letters and starts with Gas?
How is Disneyland like Viagra?
What did the businessman wear to the thai restaurant?
What do you call a hundred black men buried up to their necks in dirt?
If seagulls fly over the sea,what flies over the bay?
What's the best way to search a linen store?
Why does Luigi bring an extra pair of overalls when he golfs?
What do snotty vegetables do when they see something they don't like ?
Why did the Green Giant get a new lid?
How do you make an archeologist blush?
What's it called when a man cums inside a woman when in Massachusetts?
How Do You Start a Flood?
How does a girl get a guy to eat shit?
How do you fit 4 gay men on one bar stool?
What song did the man who lived next door to a brothel sing on his way to work?
Did you hear about the guy they found dead at the Mediterranean restaurant?
How do you get 50 Pikachus on a bus?
What's a feminists least favorite Pokemon?
What's the hardest part about eating vegetables?
What's the difference between a Black man and a park bench?
What do you call 5 white guys sitting on a bench?
what did the cornflake say to the other cornflake?
What did the leper say to the prostitute after their session?
Whats green, three inches long and smells like bacon?
What kind of bird works on a construction site?
What's the best part about having sex with twenty-one year old's?
How many forever alone guys does it take to change a light bulb?
why don't melons run away to get married?
Why don't the French have fireworks on Bastille day?
Whats the worse part of being a pedophile?
What happened to the fireman who let the house burn?
What did one Buddhist Master give to the child for his birthday?
What do you call a happy cowboy?
What do you call women who are faster than me?
Did you know half your penis is inside you?
What do you call it when Lenin, Trotsky, and Stalin get together for a drink?
What's the quickest way to a woman's heart?
Why did the French Hen give up her job?
What do you do when a woman serves you bad sushi?
What is brown and rhymes with Snoop?
What are the two words men hate most unless used together?
What do you call a white man surrounded by black men?
Why are French guns the best to buy?
What did the molar use to cross the root canal?
What's black and brown and looks good on a lawyer?
Sushi A bumped into Sushi B on the road one day. What did Sushi A said to Sushi B?
Why was the Egyptian queen so grumpy?
Why do gay guys use ribbed condoms?
What do you call a bear that is missing all of its teeth??
What's the definition of vagina?
Why did the scarecrow get the Nobel prize?
Did you hear about Chris Brown's latest Hit?
What's the difference between looking for a lost golf ball and Lady Godiva?
What's the difference between a normal woman and a witch?
Did you hear about the cannibal who showed up late to the luncheon?
What do fat chicks do in the summer?
How can you tell if your goose is depressed?
How did a Chinese spy disguise himself as an Arab in America?
Why Americans are so bad in geography?
Why doesn't Santa Claus have any children?
How do mermaids have babies?
What do you call a man in a hole?
How can you tell if your wife left you?
What did Watson tell his friend when he was constipated?
What country uses the most foul language?
What do you call a Flaming Homosexual?
What is a mexican's favorite sport event?
What is the difference between Jelly and Jam?
Did you hear about the guy who cooled himself to absolute zero?
What's the best thing about a dead baby?
What is the objective of jewish football?
I just made this one up: What kind of Internet creep can swim the fastest?
What is best potato?
What's a New Zealander's favorite car?
Why doesn't Shirley Manson change her Facebook relationship status?
Why couldn't Edward leave the Airport?
heard about the toilet that quit his job?
You know what bothers me about arson?
What is Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg's favorite facebook game?
Did you hear about the agnostic, dyslexic, insomniac?
Do you know who has the most home runs in MLB history?
What is the difference between jam and marmalade?
What did one bag of shit say to the other bag of shit?
Where was Timmy when the bomb fell?
What's the difference between Santa and Tiger Woods?
How many points do you get if you hit a golfer?
What do you do when you stub your toe?
What's the difference between a pitbull and a social worker?
What do you call a Mexican Baptism?
Did you hear the energizer bunny was arrested?
What does an 80-year old's vagina taste like?
What do you call a donkey throwing nuts?
Where should Aaron Hernandez have hidden the evidence?
Did you hear about the one about the heart and stomach?
How can you spot the prostitute at the Miss America pageant?
What's the difference between a Jewish mother and a pit bull?
What's the difference between a Jewish mother and a terrorist?
What happened when Cinderella got to the ball?
What was Dodi Fayed's favorite state?
Why did the frat boy throw away his curtains?
Have you heard the state of [insert state] is making round hale bales illegal?
What's the difference between a catholic priest and acne?
How do dogs like their eggs cooked?
What do Oranges and Apples have in common?
How many prostitutes do you have to kill until someone notices?
What is the poor part of Italy called?
What kind of fruit tells the best jokes?
What part of Canada do the Inuit control?
Which two farm animals are the dirtiest?
Why don't people get married in North Korea?
Where does a pirate keep his buccaneer' s?
What's the difference between a goldfish and a mountain goat?
....Hey...uh...hey. Reddit. Yeah, you Reddit.....what do ducks eat?
Did you hear about Pala Deans new restaurant?
Did you hear about the guy who decided to put the S next to the D?
Why did Walter White not pay for his pizza?
Why does the Mexican Olympic team always do so badly?
What has 9 arms and still sucks?
What's a white supremacist's favorite cereal?
How will we truly reach gender equality?
What does Oedipus the king's mother wear under her dress?
Was Nicky Minaj born on a highway?
You know what's great about senility?
Why areAfrican Americans high jumpers?
Who was the first person Aaron Hernandez called after the shooting?
How come you never see a pregnant Barbie?
What is the best thing about liquid soap?
Prank Caller- Hello! is your refrigerator running??
what's the difference between a vagina and your joke?
What is the least racist animal?
Where does a powerful king keep his armies?
What's the worst part about seeing 4 black people go off a cliff in a Cadillac?
Why did Helen Keller scream?
What kind of doctor deals with pussies?
Which one of the smurfs is the only one to recycle?
What do you call Adrian Monk when he's angry?
Why didn't Edward leave Russia?
What's red and has seven dents in it?
What's the best/worst dirty joke you know?
How can you tell birds are afraid of heights?
what was the last thing that went through Jane Wicker's mind?
Will reddit let me get by with this one?
What's the worst thing about owning a dildo farm?
Why doesn't that NSA informant just come back to USA?
What kind of man was Boaz before he got married?
Why isn't there gambling in Africa?
Did you hear about the hillbilly yeast?
Have you ever wondered where they got the name "Canada"?
What is something you can use to find the pH of tree sap?
If Jesus is the Lamb of God?
How is the Torah like Kidz Bop?
Ey gurl, are you a TSA agent?
What happens when you take acid with a birth control pill?
Why doesn't George R.R. Martin have Twitter?
Where do dumb aliens go?
Whats the best place to drive to in Iowa?
Why couldn't the whistleblower leave his driveway?
What is black and white and red and brown and silver and can't turn around in an elevator?
How many white people can you fit in a can?
what's better than roses on your piano?
What do you call a white person on fire?
why are flies the biggest troll?
How do we know God is not a woman?
What happens when you put too many paintings in your car?
Why did the janitor flush the toilet?
What do you say when your mom walks in on you fapping?
How are a punchline and a dick similar?
(bad joke) What's the best vegetable for stepping on when you get out of the shower?
What do men with big dicks eat for breakfast?
What does a racist get for their birthday?
What did the grape say when it got stepped on?
Q: What's Slimy, cold, green, and smells like pork?
Ladies - how do you know if you are having a good time?
What do you get when an argument occurs on a camping trip?
Did you know that papa johns was delivering to the twin towers on nine eleven?
How do I know Kim and Kanye's daughter is going to be smart?
What do you give an octomom for mother's day?
What do you call a kid who's dad is Jamaican and mom is Chinese?
What is it called when a heavy gambler goes on vacation?
Who is Nickelback's biggest fan?
What did Pink Floyd say to Jerry Sandusky?
If jerk chicken could talk, what would it say?
Why did the band Nickelback get booed at the football halftime show?
How much does a slave cost?
Why are programmers good husbands?
What do you call it when a chickpea gets killed?
Can you believe that after all the shit they've been through, they're still together?
Did you hear about the albino clairvoyant master hypnotist from San Francisco?
What is another name for the disabled stall in a restroom?
What's the difference between Jesus and a Mexican?
Is the subscribed to r/jokes number a joke?
Why does Karl Marx only drink herbal tea?
New Knock-Knock joke?
What did the DJ order from the deli?
How many recovering alcoholics does it take to change a light bulb?
Do you know how Michael Jackson really died?
How does a baby Wookie get around?
Were a blind person to go sky diving, how would they do it?
Why do black guys like overweight white women so much?
Why can't you tell a joke in a cornfield?
What did the ocean say to the beach?
What do you call an unemployed Rastafarian??
How did the Jewish mother offer to help her son meet a nice Jewish girl?
How many indie bands does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the Chelsea team without a player?
What's the difference between a pretty girl and a bowl of soup?
What burns longer, a red or a green candle?
What do you do if you're attacked by a gang of clowns?
What is at the bottom of the sea and shakes?
What do I think about my toes?
Why do ghosts say booOoOoo?
Did you hear about the woman who got wooden implants?
How do you know if you are having a good time?
Why dont Asians go to the theaters?
What do you call a dumb nerd?
What do you call a sick bird?
Why was the baby ant confused?
Q: How Do You Tell 2 Scottsmen Apart?
What's the difference between a golfer and a climber?
Why did the smoothie get assassinated?
Why don't birds wear underwear?
What's the difference between organized crime and the government?
If a stork brings white babies, and a blackbird black babies, what bird brings no babies?
How many couples does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why was the whistleblower late for his annual winter whistleblower's convention?
What Pixar movie will Rick Astley never let you borrow?
How many married women does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How do you get your girlfriend to stop giving you blowjobs?
What did the Leper say to the hooker?
Why do melons have traditional marriages?
What is the difference between a blonde and a hen?
Why did the Dark Ages existed?
What do men do after orgasm?
What goes after foursome?
Did you hear about the constipated Jew?
What do you call a Mexican crossed with an octopus?
Why couldn't the whistleblower leave his house?
What's a Drill Sergeant's term for an erection?
What do you call a bunch of Mexican Stoners?
What did the necrophiliac have when his grandmother died?
Yo daddy jokes?
What are the 2 sexiest farm animals?
Do scooby got a booty?
What did the wick say to the wax?
Do you know what 6.9 is?
What do you call a cow...?
What is green, slimy, and smells like bacon?
What did the devil get arrested for?
What's the difference between a bull and a cow?
Why Can't you hear a Pterodactyl going to the bathroom?
What did Saddam Hussein and Little Miss Muffett have in common?
Why did the cow win a Nobel Prize?
How many kids with ADD does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the book get stitches?
Did you hear about the legless man who got his wheelchair taken away?
Why was Crassus bad at insults?
How does Megatron get away with raw-dogging it?
How can you get four suits for under $2.00?
Why doesn't Spiderman like rice?
"What is your greatest strength"?
What's better: A Parachute Jump or a BJ of a 90 year old?
What do Nazi pilots eat for breakfast?
Where do hippos go to school?
How do you suffocate a redneck?
Did anyone see the new Irish gay pornstar?
Why can't mimes finish marathons?
What's Master P's favorite fruit?
Why do tourists always take pictures in Paris?
Why is Chuck Norris still alive?
What do you call a Mexican without a car?
Why couldn't the bike stand by itself?
What 8 letter phrase means a healthy scratch?
What do you call a prostitute with her hands down her skirt?
What do you call an old person from Portugal?
Why was the blonde upset when she got her Drivers License?
What do anemic people drink?
Did you hear about the steering-wheel belt?
What do you call it when an Asian composer really needs the bathroom?
Why don't French people smile in pictures?
Why do they call them "S'mores"?
What do they call diarrhea at Hogwarts?
What's a pedophile's favorite drink?
What does a Gynecologist and Pizza Delivery guy have in common?
Did you hear the one about the JRPG character who named his daughter Dot?
How do you blindfold an Asian woman?
Did you hear the one about the man with a big procrastination problem?
Why do the French only eat one egg for breakfast?
What did the right boob say to the left boob?
Whats the difference between a prostitute with diarrhea and an epileptic corn-husker?
Difference between Port Authority and a lobster with breast implants?
What does a deaf woman say to a premature ejaculator?
What do you call a dog with short legs and steel balls?
What's the difference between cancer and a black guy?
[One to tell militant women]: how many women on their period does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a car with a broken exhaust?
Can anyone help me make a joke about running over a child?
What do you call an Irishman with no arms and no legs who's rolling down a hill?
Why did the Republican get a sunburn?
What's a buffalo's favorite activity?
Why can't girls count to 70?
What is the difference between menstrual blood and sand?
Girl, do you have 67 protons?
How many friendzoned guys does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does the Indian chef do in his spare time?
Did you hear about the eskimo couple?
What is Jeremy Clarkson's PIN number?
What will the neighbors think?
What do you call a biker on her period?
Why is it so easy to trust a hypochondriac?
Why do witches not wear panties?
Why don't the french like kiwifruit?
What do you call it when Charlie Sheen's brother has sex with him?
What did one Jewish bird say to the other?
What was the under-appreciated, often-exploited kitchen contractor's complaint?
What does a Jewish turtle say when it first meets someone?
What's the difference between an apple an a dead baby?
How many men does it take to close the toilet seat?
How do we know Andy Taylor never had grandchildren?
What do you call it when you second guess your decision to book a stay at a Native American resort?
Who Is The Real Boss?
Why do girls generally go to the bathroom in groups?
what do people call bob the builder when he's not building anything?
Why didn't the NSA request AT&T's phone records?
Where's the best place to weigh a pie?
Why was the sacajawea coin made?
Why are pedophiles terrible Blackjack players?
What's the technical term for a female to male sex change?
What do you get when you stick your hand in a blender?
Why are ducks funny?
How do you advertise a motor home?
What does grandma's crotch smell like?
What do you call the neighborhood where all the poor Italians live?
Why did the baby squirrel wear a diaper?
How does Jaden Smith keep getting roles in big movies?
What is the difference between an event at the X Games and a sorrority?
Why does Bill Clinton prefer B.J.s?
Where did Mario and Luigi go to school?
Did you know Han Solo had an employment agency?
This is one of those gems thought up at 4 am, why does nobody listen to Neo-Nazis?
How are socks like Boy Scouts?
Whats the best thing about doing twenty four year olds?
Who's the laziest doctor at the hospital?
What does a Math Professor do when he's constipated?
What's an epileptic's least favorite pizza place?
Why did Skrillex get fired from the antique shop?
What do you call shit that comes out with a fart?
Where did sally go when the bombs dropped?
What kind of juice does hitler drink?
I don't pay for prostitute, they pay me to stop ?
What did the Muslim train conductor say to the passengers as they were getting on?
What did the cell say to his sister who stepped on his toe?
How did the fruits get married?
Why do redditors have so many inside jokes?
How many rats does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Joke my kid made up when he was like 4.... What do you call an angry shopper using bad words?
What do WNBA players make?
How does Santa know if he lands on a Jewish house?
what kind of file makes a 1 inch hole into a 3 inch hole?
Why didn't the lesbians go shopping for sports equipment?
Why do peasants watch the Weather Channel?
What's the wrong way to feed the cat?
Where do burgers like to dance?
Did you hear about the dyslexic druggie lawyer who just finished rehab?
Why couldn't the Coast Guard save the hippie?
What's a hipster's favorite painkiller?
What do you call a capital lambda?
What do you call an angry wind?
What do you call a vampire whose car breaks down 3 miles from a blood bank?
What did Cesar say when the people of Rome wanted to re-empower the Tribune?
What is Tom Hanks' wireless password?
What did the black hole say to the pulsar?
So what's the best part about dead baby jokes?
What's brown and hides in the attic?
Why does Mike Tyson cry during sex?
Why did the cactus cross the road?
What did Kanye West say when he saw the Red Wedding episode of Game of Thrones?
You know what makes my blood boil?
What is the stinkiest businessman?
What's really important to a bat when they are looking for a new home?
What's the bright side of being knocked unconscious and raped?
What do you call a little Lannister when winter finally comes?
What kind of tree would Hanna Montana be?
What do you call a group of people from Portugal?
How do you know when a hiptser is a good secret agent?
Why did the interjecting, dismissive, gay Italian have so many problems?
Where do drinks go on vacation?
What do you call 10 lawyers chained to the bottom of the ocean?
Why are jokes in base 8 not funny?
What did the self-deprecating Indian say about his car?
Why does nobody like a rich stone?
Which war was the hungriest?
What do a politician and a sperm have in common?
What did the Mancunian abortion doctor say to the fetus?
Did you hear the one about the church that burned down?
What happens when you sit on a grape?
Do you know what a Canadian's favourite gun is?
What sexual position creates the ugliest kids?
What do you call a rapper who masterbates a lot?
Why do girls talk so much?
How many Americans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the gynecologist get taken in for questioning?
What's the difference between your dick and a joke?
Why are woman so happy in wedding photos?
Why does the farmer hate his mule?
Three Tampons are walking down the street, which one doesnt talk to you?
Why do they call it a third eye?
What has 341 teeth and holds back The Hulk?
What is Napoleon Dynamite's Favorite TV Dinner?
What do you call the babies born in a whorehouse?
What were the favorite Linux text editors of 8 randomly selected Monty Python fans?
Why did the lion get lost?
What do Rick Ross and a dominatrix have in common?
What's the difference between a Slut and a Bitch?
What's the difference between a soldier and a teacher?
Are you having trouble finding your kids' name's on bottles of Coca Cola?
So someone dropped a Chinese baby in a toilet?
Why does Tyler Perry put his name on everything he makes?
What is the difference between a introverted engineer and an extroverted engineer?
Why are there no Irish lawyers?
How can you tell if someone's a vegan?
Did you hear about the leper on the trampoline?
What is a Redneck virgin?
Did you hear about the photographer that got locked in his darkroom?
did you hear about this new fish?
Why aren't your buttcheeks horizontal?
How many Firefly fans does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the Redneck cross the road?
What is the best formula for leaving Auschwitz?
Wanna join my feminist group?
What did Obama mean when he called for "change"?
What's the squeakiest ride at the fair?
Why is a gay God purty cool?
Why would you wrap masking tape around a 3 day old baby?
Got this from my dad tonight...You know why they don't have CSI in Arkansas?
What happens when a Jew walks into a wall with a boner??
Chantelle has 756 friends on Facebook. She adds 122, what does she have?
Why did the elevator take antidepressants?
Shrapnel related jokes please?
How does R.Kelly end a joke?
What did Jay Z call his girlfriend before they got married?
Did you hear about the scarecrow who won a Nobel Prize?
What do you call a Jewish feline?
What do you have to know to be an auctioneer?
Why can't Michael Jackson play chess?
What does a walrus and tupperware have in common?
How do you get three old ladies to say the "F" word?
What's the difference between Stephen Harper and Rob Ford?
How many bees does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why is Kim Jung Un so upset?
What do you say to a guy with kidney stones?
What's the worst thing that could happen if you don't use a condom?
Did you know Helen Keller is on the back of the Alabama quarter?
What's the difference in Xbox One and your mother?
How many Freemasons does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why didn't the buddhist accept the Nitrous Oxide for his root canal?
What's white on bottom and black on top?
What is a KKK member's favorite board game?
Why didn't Jesus eat bacon?
A Mexican , a black guy , an arab and A Jew Jump out of a plane....who wins?
Record for the world's smallest penis?
What's Whitney Houstons's favourite type of co-ordination?
Why is unemployment rising in Jamaica?
What's the difference between acne and catholic priests?
What month was King Kong born in?
Why was the sapling such a horrible entrepreneur?
Why did the man angrily throw out his alarm clock this morning?
What do you call a gay man with a hard-on?
How do you make a 5yr old cry twice?
What did the Russian woman say to her violent husband?
What is the difference between a pregnant lady and a lightbulb?
How long does it take to tune a double bass?
What kind of peanuts get warts?
what did the cloud say to the atmosphere?
What's it called when you a kill a sapling?
How do you make a plumber cry?
Do y'all have any tips on growing Salvia officinalis?
Why did the baker have smelly fingers?
Did you here about the Jewish son who asked his father for $50?
Death Jokes for a homework assignment?
What starts with Y and ends with a D?
What did Harry Potter say when he found Dumbledore in bed with his godfather?
Do you know why they call it the Xbox One?
How do you stop an F4 tornado from destroying a town?
What's the best part of two lesbians marrying?
April showers bring May flowers. But what do May flowers bring?
What do you call a group of homosexual musicians from India who never get to play out?
What's the diffrence between a girl in a church and a girl in a bath?
What's red and green and goes 100mph?
Does size matter?
What is the biggest key when moving a piano up a flight of stairs?
Where do puppies go when they die?
Why does Saudi Arabia import so many camels from Australia?
What do you call some one with no body and no nose?
What do terrorist Weight Watchers use?
What do you call it when a group of chickens rebel against their farmers?
Did the girl ever go to the whore Olympics?
What did the depressed plankton do?
Why did the baker have so many customers?
Want to hear the one about my penis..?
Why do hipsters drink coffee so quickly?
How is a 9 Volt Battery similar to an Anus?
What do you call a prostitute after a 12 hour shift?
What does Mr. T say when he sees a fat lady at a bar?
Why does China hate Digimon Fans?
What does Mortal Kombat and a Helsinki church have in common?
What do <school name> cheerleaders and a shotgun have in common?
Whats your best "This is so bad that ____" joke?
What do people in Prague call abortions?
What do you do to an elephant with three balls?
What do you call a Mexican child?
Did you hear about the murder mystery porno?
What was the Walrus doing in the Tupperware store?
Where is the best place to have anal sex?
What's a Jehovah's Witness's favorite band?
Can a ninja bring a ninja star into the airport?
Whats the last thing you give a tickle me elmo before it leaves the factory?
What do philosophical dolphins say?
What happened to the little Dutch boy after he put his finger in the dyke?
How many bros does it take to change a light bulb?
How did the Burger King get the Dairy Queen pregnant?
What happens when you predict snow but don't get any?
What do the Enterprise and and toilet paper have in common?
Why do you let him call you that?
What do you call a gay paraplegic?
What do you call the guy that graduated last in his class at med school?
How are neutrinos and i alike?
If you had to steal a bike from someone, who would it be?
Whats a Mexicans Favorite sport?
How does a blond like her eggs in the morning?
How many NBA refs does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do Brazilian cats speak?
What kind of pants did the Japanese porn star wear to her job interview?
How man hipsters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the Mexican put under his carpet?
Ever wondered why is being gay a sin?
How many lazy people does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you give a cannibal late for Sunday lunch?
Fish sticks?
How many ADD kids does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did the prolapsed anus say to the sock?
For The Musicians: What's the difference between an orchestra and a bull?
What do you get a first dad for father's day?
What do Mexicans use to cut pizza?
What do you call someone who never farts in public?
Why doesn't Smokey the Bear have any children?
What do you get when you squeeze a synagogue?
Why did the farmer name his pig Ink?
Which country has the most millionaires?
What does a duck like to have for breakfast?
What do rabbis call the leftovers of a circumcision?
What's a Mormon's favorite sexual position?
Why do LEGO men hate going to hospital...?
How many paranoids does it take to change a lightbulb?
What kind of nuts go on your feet?
What is black, white, and red all over?
What's Scoobys birthstone?
How do you know Little Miss Muffet was a bodybuilder?
How are woman and tornadoes alike?
What's the last thing that goes through a bug's head when it hits a windshield?
What did Davy Crockett say when he showed up to the Alamo?
What did the left butt cheek say to the right one?
What college did Michael Jackson go to?
What do you call an impotent lizard?
What do you call a smart blonde?
Is there something called "Your mama so foreign..."-jokes?
Why do Little People hate the taste of alcohol?
How many emos does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do Jews like to watch porn backwards??
Why is camping so much fun?
What's a blonde with a shotgun in wheat field?
What is the worst thing about sex in a cemetery?
Wheres the library at?
What part of a vegetable is the hardest to eat?
What do you call a social studies class that got burnt down?
What did one unemployed cancer cell say to the other unemployed cancer cell?
What do you call a well-hung gay man?
How do you piss off a female archeologist?
How do you get 1000 dead babies into a phone booth?
What does an elephant use for a tampon?
What did the volcano say to the other volcano?
What's the difference between your momma and a mallard with a cold?
What do you call a weak cup of tea?
What do you call it when a homosexual asks a question?
Why do cowgirls walk bow-legged?
What do you call an ion that also raps?
Where do naughty rays of light go?
Are you russian?
What do u call 3 mexicans, 1 asian, and 4 blacks?
What is the inner temperature of a Tauntaun?
What did Ahab say when Moby Dick raised his tail?
What do you get hanging from apple trees?
What did the pervert say to the Sex Detective?
Why did the golfer wear 2 shirts when he went golfing?
What do you call a bad ass phone that doesn't work?
Why can't the Maple Leafs have any tea?
What's the Best thing about Duct Tape?
What's the difference between a magician and a psychologist?
What's the difference between a Jew and a Boy Scout?
What's the most well mannered dinosaur?
So did you guys hear that Farrah from Teen Mom has a sex video?
What's the difference between Iron Man and iron woman?
What's the clinical name for Viagra?
What's red and crawls up your leg?
Did anyone else witness that jet crashing into the ocean?
Why does the little mermaid where sea shells?
Did you hear about the ghost who got put in prison?
What do you get when you mix a rooster with peanut butter?
What did the pool cleaner say to the impatient swimmer?
How does Sean Connery's dog bark?
How did the farmer feel after he ripped his clothing?
what do you call an asian lounge singer?
Why is Shakespeare bad at hunting?
What's India's most popular dating service?
Why do you make more money?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs playing in a pile of leaves?
How much semen does a catholic priest have?
Did you hear about the new Marvel superhero movie about the guy who kills villains with bad jokes?
What did the paraplegic father say when his teenage daughter came out of the closet?
What do a hot girl and my little toe have in common?
Any jokes I can tell my teachers?
What does religion and Ikea have in common?
What do you get when you cross Jesus with a dinosaur?
Where do conspiracy theorists keep their ideas?
What's the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scottish farmer?
To a necrophiliac, what is the only thing better than a human-sized refrigerator?
How long does it take a necrophiliac to screw in a light bulb?
You are?
Whats the difference between a rooster and a prostitute?
What did the cannibal get when he arrived late for dinner?
What's the difference between a hormone and an enzyme?
What's the most disgusting, distasteful international treaty organization?
When do Catholics allow the use of condoms?
What was the former name of captain Hook?
What's the best thing about bee's?
What's a ginger's favorite drink?
Have you heard of the Jewish "Catch 22"?
What'd the man with 5 penises say..?
What's the difference between polite conversation and an erection?
Why did the period and and semicolon break up?
What does an Italian sound like walking through the rain?
What do a creationist and a dude with a dinosaur bone fetish have in common?
How do you get a guitar player to turn down his amp?
Did you hear the one where a father told his kid to quit masturbating or he'd go blind?
What do you have when you got a bag of weed and a bottle of Jack Daniel's?
What do Cerial killers drink?
What do you call an illegally parked frog?
What does it taste like to eat out an 85 year old woman?
Why can't you tell when a pterodactyl is going to the bathroom?
What would you call The Flintstones if they were black?
Did you hear Willie Nelson died?
What is Pat Sajak's favorite Christmas carol?
How can you tell if a black guy is well hung?
What do you call a mob of armed lesbians?
What do you call a prostitute with one leg shorter than the other?
What do you call a generalization made by a farmer?
What do you call a girl with a tight vagina from Hong Kong?
Did you hear about the crack addict that got trapped in a pyramid?
What instrument did the famous dog use to sign his autographs?
How do you spot a blind guy at a nudist colony?
Did you hear about the confused question mark?
Do 90-year-old men wear boxers or briefs?
Did you hear about the monkey who was a virgin and didn't care?
Why did Tigger jump down the toilet?
What's the difference between your mom and an alpaca?
What's a good source of Vietnamese renewable energy?
What is Batman's favourite porn site?
How do you break a Polacks finger?
What do you call a gay Nobel Prize Laureate in a blender?
What's the difference between a stoner and a Jew?
What did Liberace die from?
Why the Japanese kill fish?
What happened to the broken down frog?
What did the banana say to the apple?
Did I tell you the joke about my penis?
What's the only major difference between Cinco de Mayo and Saint Patrick's day?
What do you call two straight days of rain in Seattle?
What did the Banana say to the Vibrator?
What do gay cows eat?
Did you hear about the dyslexic pimp?
What happened to the frog that broke down?
One for the Mexican holiday. What do you call four Mexicans drowning?
How do you get a fat girl into bed with you?
What did the necrophiliac get after his wife died?
Two fish are in a tank, what does one fish say to the other?
Why should optometrists never tell jokes?
Why should you never play Uno with a Mexican?
What's the difference between Jews and Boy Scouts?
Where do Communists go to get burgers?
How do you organize a party in outer space?
What's Christopher Nolan's favorite song?
Why was Helen Keller such a bad driver?
What's the difference between a statesman and a politician?
What do you call a three-legged donkey?
What do robots eat?
How does a blind skydiver know when to pull the parachute?
What kind of sounds does Jaimie Foxx make in the bedroom?
Who is 50 feet tall, has a blue ox and kills co-eds?
What did they say about both the winner and the loser of the sock-pairing competition?
Why can't gay people play poker?
Why wasn't the pediatrician impressed with the new year's eve Times Square ball drop?
what do you call a fat guy telling all his friends that hes gay for the first time?
What did the cat cough up when it was sick?
What do you call a woman who fell off a cliff?
What's a dentists favorite time of day?
What concert is worth 45 cents?
How does Tony Stark keep his clothes wrinkle-free?
The other day I got a fortune cookie with no fortune in it, you know what I call that?
Why don't people hang out with the mushroom?
What do you call a mathematician who drinks too much?
Why do they call it a "waist"?
Why is Hitler a terrible wingman?
What's an alcoholic's favorite novel?
How many A.D.D kids does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call the blood that comes out when teenagers cut themselves?
Why did the thoroughbred break up with the wild horse?
Why does a seagull fly over the sea?
Have you been on /r/bigdickproblems ?
What did the deaf, dumb, and blind kid get for Christmas?
Why do lesbians prefer going to Sports Authority?
Why did Jesus leave the dance floor?
Which Vice President was the best at making beats?
What is Bear Grylls' favourite vegetable?
Why is Reggae so popular in Utah right now?
What's Dale Earnhardt's favorite Pink Floyd album?
Did you hear that Henry Ford wrote a book?
Why was 6 afraid of 9?
Did you hear about the time Pontius Pilate got really drunk?
Why was the leper hockey game canceled?
What do you call a struggling artist?
What did the chronic masturbator say to his ex-girlfriend?
Why are fruit rapists seldom found alone?
April showers bring May flowers. What do May flowers bring?
How do you sum up a cashew?
Who is the best Jewish cook?
What did Sean Connery say when a book fell on his head?
Did you hear about the Buddhist that refused Novocain during a root canal?
What do a teenage boy and a dog have in common?
How bad is it to poop your pants?
What do all Amish girls want?
What do you call a fruit that procrastinates?
Where can you find a mormon horse?
Why did the man go fishing?
What is a prostitutes favorite food?
What is Reagan's favorite vegetable?
Dog or Wife?
What has a hazelnut in every bite?
Why can't Hellen Keller Drive?
What's the difference between a pile of dead babies and a BMW?
Who's the most meta player on a Football team?
Did you hear about the temple that burnt down?
What happened when to the psychoanalyst when he went ice skating for the first time?
Want to know where to find the worst pun in Alberta?
How many people from Chernobyl does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Is it possible to be bored to death?
How do you make a pole angry?
Why couldn't the kid get into the pirate movie?
What do accidental pregnancies and locked cars both have in common?
What's black, white, and red all over and can't turn around in a narrow hallway?
what did the dildo say to the anal bead?
What's the only thing the English and French agree on?
Where do you get frog's eggs?
Why do sharks hate clowns?
What's green and sings?
Which one is the odd one out; monopoly, rape, incest?
How are the Houston Rockets just like Metapod?
What do a tornado and a redneck wedding have in common?
What's the difference between sand and period blood?
Which one is the odd one out; a Crab, a Tuna, a Chinese man run over by a bus or a Lobster?
What does an arctic wildlife photographer get from sitting around too long?
What do you call a gassy Russian?
What's the difference between a penis and a bonus?
What do you call it when two Vietnamese people meet?
What do you call 100 lesbians with assault rifles?
Whats the difference between a crab with big boobs and a bus station full of punks?
What's the definition of a masochist with necrobeastiality tendencies?
What's a Jewish dilemma?
If Trayvon Martin and George Zimmerman had a baby together, what would the kid be like?
What do you call a man on your porch?
Why does Noddy have a bell on top of his hat?
What Daft Punk song is a hit amongst the hispanic community?
Hey, Sally... what's your favorite color?
What's the worst thing about eating a vegtable?
How do you shut up a deaf person?
What happened to the baseball played who was unfaithful to his wife?
What do cats major in college?
What happens if you get human DNA in a goat?
What did Hitler say to the student that got a question wrong?
Why couldn't the boarder throw out his collection of potted ferns?
Did you hear about the amateur porn actor with the invisible dick?
Have you ever observed the depression cycle of a snail?
Did I ever tell you about the worst blowjob I ever got?
How many pushups can Chuck Norris do?
What type of bee makes milk instead of honey?
Why can you not shower with a Pokemon?
Why did the bird refuse Martin Luther's food?
What's sniggers without the s?
Why can't the penis and testicles ever be together?
How are a full count in baseball and a mutated 2 time convict the same?
What did the blond do with her asshole in the morning?
Why are there no penguins in Britain?
First day back in the office on Boylston not going so well. Feel good jokes?
Why did Pinocchio tell lies?
What does the Scottish man say after love making?
What's yellow and smells of bananas?
Why did Saddam Hussein never have sex?
Why did the man quit working at the cemetery?
Are there any recorded jokes from prehistoric times? What was the humor like back then?
Why do sharks like salt water?
What sound does a Japanese camera make?
What's the best part about having a hooker die on you?
Isn't it weird that phrases mean something totally different as an adult than when you were a kid?
Are limericks still in?
Where do white supremacists go shopping?
What did the lonely hedgehog get at the sex shop?
Thought of this joke in a dream. What did one tectonic plate say to the other tectonic plate?
What happened when the car took LSD?
How do you make a racing snail faster?
Did you hear about the Hollywood actress that got murdered...?
What would you get if you cross breed a Borg with a Ferengi?
What did the god of lightning say after working out for the first time?
What do mexicans call their erect penises?
Why are dyslexic zombies such good plumbers?
What do you call it when you meet somebody in a bathroom at a conference?
What do you call it when a DJ doesn't wear a period appropriate costume?
What do you get when you mix gangsta rap and relational aesthetics?
How do you best serve burned food?
How many blonde jokes are there?
Why did semen cross the road?
How did Luke Skywalker know what Darth Vader got him for his Birthday?
What does cheese say when you take its picture?
How many Heros does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Is elliott a lawn mower?
What's the difference between Doctor Who and Facebook?
What do you call a couch, chair, and a table made out of plants?
Why did the police officer smell?
Why did the man get fired from the orange juice factory?
What did the Olympic size swimming pool say to the kiddie pool?
Why did they bury the fireman beneath the hill?
What is the difference between a Ferrari and a boner?
Why did the obtuse triangle go to the beach?
How many alzheimer's patients does it take to change a lightbulb?
if you have 1 cricket ball in 1 hand and another cricket ball in the other, what do you have?
What's the difference between parsley and pussy?
Why did the Hobbit put his phone on silent?
Did you hear about the shortsighted circumciser?
What did the wall outlet say to the appliance?
What's the difference between a goat and a ram?
Why couldn't the bicycle stand up by itself?
Why does everyone keep saying the Boston Marathon was a tragedy?
Why are there no gays in a mental asylum?
You guys wanna hear a sushi joke? Alright... How do you make a tuna roll?
Why did the leper return to the shower?
What does the man with two left feet ask the shoe salesman?
How are men like fuses?
What is Mozart doing right now?
Did any of you hear about that pedo music teacher?
What do sexy farmers say all day?
Why did the woman divorce the grape?
(original) What hit song did Phil Collins write the after a big dinner at an Indian restaurant?
What do you do when attacked by a group if clowns?
How did the Catholic Priest finish the marathon?
How did David Copperfield get HIV?
How do Sesame Street characters reproduce?
What are all sports in Africa called?
How do you keep a black person from drowning?
Why shouldn't you shower with a Pokemon?
What happened to the Asian man that walked into a wall with an erection?
What is the definition of "indefinitely"?
What's the last thing you want to hear when you're getting a blowjob from Willie Nelson?
Why didn't the construction worker like to get wet?
what are the best sort of bees?
what did the indian chief say when his dog jumped off the cliff?
Why does Ariel wear seashells?
What is the worst part about being a black jew?
What's the difference between an Irish wake and an Irish wedding?
What do you get when you mix a donkey & a onion?
What do Michael Jackson and Jimmy Savile have in common?
Why parents don't allow their children to listen to M. Jackson songs?
What do you call low class gay women?
Racist joke,(answer this BEFORE you click) What do you call a black man flying a plane?
Why is it called a funny bone?
What does a Scottish cat say?
How many sycophants does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's long, hard and covered in blood?
Where do senior citizens often go to the restroom?
What do you call a bunch of white guys sitting on a bench?
Why are there so many trees along the Champs-Élysées?
What did the 2 oceans say to each other?
Why are people without converse shoes dangerous?
Did you hear about the castrated hipster?
Did you hear about the award winning scarecrow?
What do you do if someone's choking?
How many Nazis does it take to finish a race?
What's 72?
What do you call a virgin redneck?
What did the asian parents call their retarded son?
Why is 'dark' spelled with a k and not with c?
What is the difference between spinach and boogers?
What did the veggies say, as they sat down for supper?
Why did the crazy Mexican conductor get convicted for a crime?
What do you get when you're agnostic, dyslexic, and an insomniac?
How many dull people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Where did the farmer find his missing baby horse?
What does a girl who loves giving head eat for breakfast?
How come Smokey the Bear doesn't have any kids?
How did the puppeteer meet the President?
If killing a king is called regicide, what do you call killing a queen?
What kind of a shoe has a problem?
Why did the hippy teach the lumberjack calculus?
What do condoms and taxes have in common?
How come Django's wife never hears Django coming?
why do scuba divers go in the water backwards?
What did the Headless Horseman ask his colleague at Bad Guys Inc.?
How is a woman like KFC?
Why doesn’t Nickelback play football?
How many electricians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's black and eats banana's?
What do you call a person with memory problems telling a joke?
How many Apple users does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why do pandas have black eyes?
What do you call a lazy baby kangaroo?
What's the safest place in Dallas during a tornado?
What's the difference between a picture of Jesus and Jesus himself?
Why did they have to cancel the volleyball games in the special olympics?
Whats Lil' Waynes favorite pizza place?
Why did the French chef quit working at the haunted restaurant?
What's the best part about sex with a 5 year old?
Why did it take the computer so long to decide whether it wanted to buy an Egyptian cotton sheet?
Have you heard the one about the broken pencil?
What did the blind guy say when he walked past Red Lobster?
What do funeral home staff do if they mess up transporting a body?
What's the most intelligent breakfast?
What do you call an emotionally unstable animal who lives in alaska and vacations in antarctica?
How do you know all chickens are gold-digging size queens?
Why did the chicken of the sea cross the road?
Why did the traffic light turn red?
What happened to the Jew who ran into the wall with a boner....?
Why does Helen Keller only masterbate with one hand?
How do you circumsize a redneck?
What did Batman say when he went to the butcher?
What did the lower case "o" say to the capital "O"?
How did the Scotsman find the sheep in tall grass?
What did the Goat living in Manama say when it starting raining?
Why was Skrillex never in an orchestra?
Why did the rooster get 20 years in prison?
What do you call an Italian man without arms?
So excited to go and watch 'the Evil Dead' next week. Anyone else going to Thatcher's funeral?
Is venison deer?
How do you know Stephen Hawking has jungle fever?
Isn't everyone gettin over racist jokes?
Did I miss the Limerick fad?
How does the sun cut his hair?
What's the difference between the 3 Stooges and my penis?
What's all natural, well balanced, and comes in pints?
What did the mermaid wear to her math class?
How do know if the person that you have just met is a DJ?
What did the cannibal coach yell when his player twisted his ankle?
How many bears could Bear Grylls grill if Bear Grylls could grill bears?
If I had 5 dollars in one pocket and 5 dollars in the other what do I have?
Did you guys hear what happened to Helen Keller?
Why is the KKK a good place to find a job?
Did you hear about the gingerbread man gynaecologist?
Why was the candle mad at his friend?
Did you hear about the kid who died in the school freezer?
Why did Mr. T reject Marxism?
Do you know why banks have lollipops?
Limericks eh ?
Limericks eh?
Why was Kermit chased by nazis as a kid?
What do you call bears with no ears?
What's my favorite Jewish star wars character?
Who's bigger- Mister Bigger or Mister Bigger's baby?
Why did the guitarist get arrested?
What's the difference between a drum, a woman, and a blowjob?
wanna hear a pizza joke?
So you like limericks, huh?
Did you hear about the deformed linebacker?
What's the worst thing about being black and jewish?
Why did the soda can quit its job at the vending machine?
I'm from the southern US, is it OK to poke fun at myself?
Did you hear about the Mexican Criminal trio?
How can you make your d bigger?
A black man and a Mexican are in a car, who is driving?
How many computer programmers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
what is awesome and witty?
Did you hear about the basketball tournament in Mexico?
Why doesn't Rihanna tell her boyfriend jokes anymore?
What do you call a quadriplegic laying on the floor?
What's the difference between a whore and a mosquito?
What did the groundhog's trainer tell him before the Olympics?
What did they find in the toilet of the Starship Enterprise?
Does Snoop Dog wear and apron when he cooks?
What's the difference between a fat girl and model?
If there are three gay guys in a bath and a lump of cum floats to the surface, what do they say?
How do you cut the Roman Empire in half?
What was Hitler's last two words?
Did you know that Harper Lee invented a cocktail?
What's the main ingredient in a Jedi martini?
How would you describe Al Gore playing the drums?
Why did the cancer patient get smacked?
What do you call a man with his hand up a horses ass?
What do you call a group of politically similar crows?
How do you date a ghost?
What kind of explosive is popular with terrorist school-children?
A Mexican, a black guy, and an Asian are in a car. Who's driving?
Did you hear the joke about german sausage?
What you you call a girl you meet on Reddit?
What do you say to a grammar nazi who just got their left side cut off?
What did one hat say to another?
What did the dough say to the baker?
What does a 9 volt battery have in common with a girl's butt hole?
Why don't you eat a girl the morning after sex?
Why did the dwarf go out of business?
Do you know who Candice is??
What do you call the deaf man with no limbs?
What is the common point between spinach, and Sodomey?
What is a simile?
What do you call a male seamstress?
What do you call 10 rabbits marching backwards?
What is the heaviest surgical intervetion that can be done to women ?
[Black Joke] what's the difference between a Black guy and a pizza?
Whats pink and smells awful?
What do people who refuse to fight use as weapons?
why did Bob quit working at the toilet paper factory?
How do you make a cat go "woof"?
Who did the chickens vote for president?
Where do Bees use the bathroom?
Why did the Jew vote for Obama?
How do you turn a fox into a cow?
What are your best "If I had ____ for every time..." jokes?
What's the difference between a truck load of babies and a truck load of bowling balls?
What's the difference between CNN and Al-Jazeera?
What do you do on a date with a feminist?
Why do orphans go to church?
(Q)..... What's the difference between a lawyer and a rooster?
Why are black people afraid to fall asleep?
WHAT KIND OF BAND PLAYS SNAPPY MUSIC?
What does a blonde do when her computer freezes?
Do you know why black people are so good at basketball?
What is long and hard on a Newfie?
What do you call a black guy having sex?
Why is the Statue of Liberty a woman?
What's the difference a teckel and the United Nations?
why do woman get periods?
What did the teacher call her intelligent yet self-harming student?
What do you call a hippo that swears?
How does a black woman know that she's pregnant?
Why did God invent Yeast infections?
Why is it so expensive to divorce a woman here in California?
Have you heard about the two guys who tried to steal a calendar?
What is the difference between a blonde and a mosquito?
I need your best jokes about mammals. Can you guys help me out?
Why dont cannibals eat clowns?
What's the best dating service in India?
What is the difference between a physicist and a biologist?
Hey Guys! They brought back Angry Beavers! Isn't it great?
Why did the mermaid wear sea shells?
How many Mexicans do you need working in the kitchen?
Why was Cleopatra angry?
What's the Cuban national anthem?
What's the difference between Santa Claus and Jews?
What is the difference between a dealer and a hooker?
How would a Muslim describe Castro's gay, atheist lover?
How many women does it take to park a car?
What happened to the thick yellow liquid that committed a crime?
How do you eat a vegetable?
Why did jillian fall of the swing?
What do you call a horse with a broken leg?
How do you know when your best friend is gay?
What do you call the mythical cookie baking creatures with strong vaginal muscles?
What do you call an army of lesbians?
Why don't orphans play hide and seek?
Why did the blonde wear green lipstick?
What do Princess Diana, Kurt Cobain, and Pink Floyd all have in common?
What has more brains than Kurt Cobain?
Why does a chicken coup have two doors?
What's the difference between people in Dubai and people in Abu Dhabi?
How do people with acid reflux complain?
What did the sea say to the beach?
what do you call a priest who quits to become a lawyer?
What's a camel?
Have you heard of the Tempura House?
Did you know I'm dating a dental hygienist?
What's the difference between a leper and a tree?
What do you tell a woman with a black eye?
Do you know what the difference is between a white person and a black person that sell drugs?
Whats worse than having a lobster on yer piano?
What do you call an anorexic girl that has a yeast infection?
What is the difference between a man and a dog?
Why do blacks keep on getting stronger?
What candy do you give your wife before you get married?
Why do porn sites have a share to Google+ option?
What happens when you find bones on the moon?
If a woman with big boobs works at Hooters where does a woman with one leg work?
Want to hear a good pee joke?
What repulsive awful thing can be found in a black persons clothes?
What do you call someone with March Madness who doesn't even like basketball?
What does Salvador Dahli eat for breakfast?
What's the difference between a gay man's moustache and a straight man's moustache?
What is 168?
Do you know what the kid with no hands got for Christmas?
How much does a midget stripper with three kids get paid?
Did you hear about the overweight, alcoholic transvestite?
What is the difference between the Pope and acne?
Did you hear Rolf Harris is dyslexic?
What do you say to a gay man with plumbers butt?
What did the customer ask the prostitute when they got to the hotel?
Heard about the newest fad shoes on the market?
Can you think of something more ironic than being a gay chiropractor?
What is the last thing the host of an orgy says to his guests?
What do you call a bus on its way to Comic Con?
How do you spot the blind man at the nudist beach?
Does Lance Armstrong enjoy cycling?
Why do women wear white wedding dresses?
Did you hear about the paranoid dyslexic?
what's the easiest way to get a jewish girl's number?
What did the proctologist ask the restaurant goer?
What kind of pizza does Lil Wayne like?
What's the difference between a strawberry and a pencil?
What did the woman say to the vampire when she woke up with her period?
Why did Sodium Chloride get arrested?
Hear the one about the deaf man who went fishing?
Why did the lobster blush?
Why do hurricanes have girl names?
Why did the minus sign run for office?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, a dyslexic, and an agnostic?
What's the most useless thing on a woman?
You all like dinosaurs...right?
How can you tell if a fat chick is pregnant?
How does Jennifer Lopez like her cheese?
Who really appreciates a good fisting?
Why did the cop pull over the U-Haul truck?
What did the Nazi Police Officer Give to the Schoolchildren?
What did the Bra say to the Hat?
What's the best way to grease a Ferrari?
What do you call a black brick with three holes in it?
What do you call a droid that always takes the longest route?
Whats the difference between love, ture love, and showing off?
What part of the vegetable is hardest to eat?
What's big and brown and rhymes with snoop?
What did the Philosophy Ph.D say to the fat black woman?
What do you call a broken vibrator?
At what time does Sean Connery go to Wimbledon?
Why is 6 scared of 7?
What's more fun than nailing dead babies to a wall?
What do you do in 5 minutes that you then suffer for for 9 months?
What's the difference between beekeeping and falconry?
What did the father buffalo say to his son going off to college?
What kind of chicken is circumcised and suffers from E.D.?
Did you hear about the guy that made a terrible joke?
What's Irish and stays on your back porch all year?
Why was the 40 degree angle so nice to the 50 degree angle?
What would it be like to have world with out women??
Why's it a good idea to have a threesome with 2 Vietnamese girls?
What kind of sex do boring people have?
Why was lil' Wayne tired after programming?
What's the difference between an attorney and a herd of buffalo?
Why don't the zebra and the lion like to play cards in the prairie?
why couldn't the rabbi eat out during passover?
How many protesters does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a lesbian octopus?
What happened to the brain eating zombie that went to Washington?
What advice did Tiger Woods' dad have for Tiger during training?
What's green, white, and orange and only appears once a year?
What's lil Wayne's favorite pizza?
What's long and green and has an asshole at each end?
How many potatoes does it take to kill and Irishman?
(Q)..... What Do You Call A Brunette Standing Between Two Blondes?
How does a Jew make tea?
How much hummus did the anorexic girl order?
What happens to a politician when he takes a Viagra?
WHY WAS THE BROOM LATE FOR WORK?
What does it sound like when a Pterodactyl urinates?
Why was the peanut rushed to the hospital?
What did the man say when he saw the Jewish man stealing his water?
WHAT DO YOU CALL A FAKE NOODLE?
What kind of cigarettes do hippies smoke?
Why do they call a bird that lives by the sea, a seagul?
Did you hear about the psychic midget who escaped from prison?
Why did the condom fly around the room?
What's the similarity between smoking a cigarette and eating pussy?
What did the Buddhist get for Christmas?
What kind of sex do you have with twenty seven year olds?
What is the most painful cereal known to man kind?
Why do golfers wear two pairs of pants?
How did the blond chip her tooth?
What do American beers and Sex in a Canoe have in common?
Why arent There Many jewish gardeners?
What happened after an explosion at a French cheese factory?
What do you call a pile of frog dung?
How do you know if your roommate is gay?
What do you call a Black-Asian?
what's the strongest part of a vegetable?
Why did the flight from Warsaw to Moscow crash?
What's green with a brown tip?
What do a Jewish mother-in-law and 60 Minutes have in common?
Wanna hear a potassium joke?
Whats the difference between a woman in church and a woman in the bathtub?
When does an astronaut eat his favourite meal?
Why don't bats sleep outside?
How many cancer patients does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a midget with Down Syndrome?
What was wrong with the wooden car?
What's so bad about being a virgin, anyway?
What's the difference between a hippie chick and a hockey player?
Why can't T-rex's clap?
How many Latvian to eat potato?
Why is it called the sistine chapel?
What's the difference between a Greyhound bus depot and a lobster with big boobs?
What's the worst thing you can hear while giving Willie Nelson a blowjob?
Did you hear about the new tractor movie?
What do all North Korean's say when you ask them how their day was?
What do you call a 200 year old Buffalo?
Difference between Memory and RAM?
Why did the motorcycle fall asleep?
Have y'all heard that new hot rapper with Muscular Dystrophy?
What did the homeless guy get for Christmas?
How do truckers contact each other in Wisconsin?
Why are dogs always thirsty?
Why did Dairy Queen get pregnant?
Why did the trout leave the cult?
How is American Beer similar to making love in a canoe?
Where can you find tetraplegics?
Why are black people so bad at walking up stairs?
What did Dracula say to the teacher?
What is the difference between a church and a cult?
Why is North Korea so cruel?
What did the redneck girl say to her father?
What did the male Dragonborn say to the female dragon?
Why do Asian females have small boobs?
Hey, Can I take you to Hogwarts?
What's the last thing to go through a bug's mind when it hits a car's windshield?
Why do lesbians go to Sports Authority?
How much does a cockney spend on shampoo?
What do you call a girl that raps about women rights?
What's black and screams like fuck?
Why did the Russians lose the space race?
Did you hear that the Energizer Bunny got arrested?
What do you call bovine masturbation?
What do you get when you take the circumference of a jack'olantern?
What do planets read?
How did Canada pick its name?
What lives in a tree and is dangerous?
Why do Jews like to watch porn backwards?
What did people say after two satellite dishes got married?
Why shouldn't you take the Fourier transform of a square pulse while on a boat?
How did the greeks separate the men from the boys?
Why aren't jokes in base 8 funny?
What's the difference between a thug and a pirate's dad?
What type of writing is the most profitable?
What's the worst thing when being told you have Alzheimer's?
Who is Thor?
Did you hear about the guy with the invisible penis?
How did Moses make his tea?
Why did the boy throw the butter out the window?
What does PETA stand for?
How did the blind skydiver know he was about to hit the ground?
Whats the difference between a South African tourist and a racist?
How do you know if hippies have been in your house?
Why do French people only ever have one egg for breakfast?
What did Thomas Jefferson grow?
Why did the moth go into the dentist's office?
Why doesn't democracy work in china?
[OC] Did you hear about the two fruits who weren't allowed to get married?
What do you call a pig that votes?
How many LA cops does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a dog with brass balls and no hind legs?
How does an octopus go to war?
What do you get when you mix acids and bases together?
What did the scarecrow say when the farmer asked him in for dinner?
How does Michael J Fox take his martinis?
How do you discuss cheese with a Welshman?
What's the difference between hardware and software?
Casey Anthony is still unemployed...?
If you're paddling a canoe up a river and a wheel falls off, how many pancakes fit in a doghouse?
Why was the fruit/vegetable hybrid upset?
Why did the Mexican try to wear his taco?
How many surreal artists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does a strawberry and a blueberry have in common?
Why is today John Philip Sousa Day?
What's black, white, red, and has trouble going through a revolving door?
What is a Freudian slip?
What's a Catholic's favorite way to send money?
What do you call a high security U.S. prison in China?
Whats the difference between a tornado and a divorce in the south?
What do Swimming and Masturbation have in common?
What's the difference between a Greyhound terminal in New Jersey and a voluptuous lobster?
What did one slave-owning waffle say to the other slave-owning waffle?
Why does the USA use °F?
What do you call a musician's erection?
How is Rihanna's boyfriend and power tools the same?
What is the difference between a gay man and a freezer?
What do you call a gangster Hobbit?
Are you the fourth derivative of a position function?
What kind of fish is funny, beautiful and a good role model for young women?
When a farmer fucks a sheep, do you know why he does so at the edge of a cliff?
Why can't Buddhists vacuum under the couch?
What was Justin Timberlake called when he was a kid?
What's better than a rose on a piano?
What do you call a poor Italian community?
How did the zebra get its stripes?
What do you get when you cross an Italian with a gorilla?
What do Cooperstown and Woodstock have in common?
Why was the prostitute so good at her job?
What`s the definition of frustration?
Did you hear about the guy who watched that new Bruce Willis film five times in a row?
What do you get when you pour boiling water down a rabbit hole?
Did you hear about the weather report from the ski resort in Lake Tahoe?
What do you mean by being loud?
Did you hear about the midget psychic that escaped from jail?
Where is the lost city of Atlantis?
What did one bean say to the other?
What should vegetarians eat for protein?
What do you call it when a midget realizes he's gay?
What did the pope give up for lent?
How many cops does it tale to change a light bulb?
How does a Scotsman find a sheep in the tall grass?
Did you hear about the guy who's been pickpocketing midget charity workers?
What do you call a Roman with hair in his teeth?
What was so great about being a black jew?
What happened to Jesus when he went to Mount Olive?
What's Han Solo's favorite type of video game?
What kind of STD does a bird get?
Why did 7 8 9?
Why didn't the lifeguard save the drowning hippie?
Why was the mentally challenged midget crying?
What's it called when Hobbits build houses for other Hobbits?
Why is Bon Jovi's bed always messy?
How many skateboarders does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why didn't the dog want to go into outer space?
What do you called a piano someone pissed in?
How is college like a woman?
What's the difference between a woman in church and a woman in the bath?
What did the timid porn star say to the talking cat?
Dude can you make the stitches spell out ___?
What did the hat say to the hat rack?
What's the difference between an apple?
Whats the difference between your mom and a washing machine?
Why is it so hard to play cards in the jungle?
A joke about pi?
Looking for Sympathy?
What do you call a potato wearing glasses?
What's one thing Lance Armstrong can still make money from?
What do trees take when they have a headache?
Whats the difference between a lawyer and a teenage boy?
What did the debater say after getting stabbed during an argument?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's new house?
Which whale makes the best sexual partner?
What do you call the Pope after he's resigned?
How does Bob Marley like his biscuits?
Where do OB/GYNs go to school?
Why did the computer programmer put up his Christmas lights on Halloween?
Why was 10 scared?
Why did Ibuprofen miss his friends?
What do fat chicks and brick walls have in common?
What changes faster than technology?
What do a gang member and a redneck have in common?
What is a rock's favorite band?
What is the difference between michael jackson and a grocery bag?
What did the termite say to the chair?
What did the little boy say to the priest?
What did Batman say to Robin before getting in the car?
Why does the baker bake?
Did you hear Justin Timberlake is making a new song based on Oscar Pistorious?
What do an alcoholic and a necrophile have in common?
Why can't you see a transgender who's a dad?
What is Oscar Pistorius's new favourite band?
What's the difference between a hockey player and a hippy chick?
What do chicks and jobs have in common?
What do you call a herd of masturbating cattle?
How did the pirate fix the hole in his pants?
What do you call a cow that has abortion?
What is the Jolly Green Giant most afraid of?
Bad news or good news?
Why was the Lego boxer unmatched in the ring?
What do Kermit the Frog and Henry the VIII have in common?
A black man and a mexican are in a car. Who is driving?
What's a pirate's favorite workout program?
Anyone else experiencing bad weather?
What did the native american say the first time he saw a bicycle?
Gaming: What's the difference between a train and SONY?
What does a pirate with back spasms say?
What does Bob Marley wear to sleep?
What is the coolest food on the planet?
Why does a dirvorce cost so much?
What's Goku's favorite subject?
How does every Romanian recipe start?
Mr Sugarbrown's daughter?
Did you hear the one about Philip Glass?
What do you call it when you cover your penis in postage stamps?
What does a pizza boy and a gynecologist in have common?
What type of car does a Loch ness monster Drive?
Why did the forgetful Mexican cross the road?
An oldie but a goodie: What do Pink Floyd & Dale Earnhardt Sr. have in common?
Why is it hard to sell bibles in Germany?
What state makes exclusively swiss cheese?
Who is the coolest guy in the hospital?
What did the buffalo say to his son when he dropped him off at college?
Mom mom are farts heavy?
If a hipster falls on the forest, does it make a sound?
Why did the chicken coop have two doors?
How do you know that your wife is dead?
What did the Eskimo say about the interface on his new iphone?
How many music majors does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a stampede that runs in circles?
why didn't the clothing drive at the homeless shelter not work out?
What's the internal temperature of a Ton-Ton?
Why should you never laugh at thieves in a car-accident?
Whats the square root of 69?
What did the plate say to the mug?
Have you guys heard about the drastic effects of erosion on the Great Pyramids?
Have you heard that Magnesium is dating Oxygen?
Hey guys, have you heard about the new corduroy pillow?
What kind of bike does hipster Jesus ride?
Why can't you hear Django coming?
What do you call a woman with one leg longer than the other?
Want to hear a joke about Alzheimer's?
Why can't a hand be 12 inches long?
How do you refer to a necessary bear?
Why did the blonde starve to death?
What do lawyers use for birth control?
Did you hear about the new German microwave?
Why cant a woman be the goalie for hockey?
What do you call a bunch of Jews in a concert?
When is the best time to have diarrhea?
What did the koalas say after getting in a fender bender?
What do you get when you cross a bell with a piece of shit?
Why did the elk cry at the funeral?
What do you call a Massachusite who cuts down trees?
What do you call a dinosaur with an English degree?
You know what's the ultimate form of rejection?
What do vegetables watch when they're feeling frisky?
A peeping tom fell out if a tree, where did he end up?
Why can't bears get jobs in Australia?
What do you call a Hispanic woman with no legs?
What do you call an online encyclopedia for DJs?
Why can't you hear the bass on Metallica's And Justice For All album?
Why do chemists call helium, curium, and barium 'the medical elements'?
Did you hear about the guy from Prague wearing armor?
What is The Fonz's blood type?
What did the bolt say to the nut?
Whats black and always in the back of a cop car?
What did Star Trek teach millions of kids?
How do you get a male cat "fixed"?
Anyone ever seen Stevie Wonders house?
What is it called when a large piece of foliage is the same on both sides?
What's better than having sex with an 8 year old boy against a barbed wire fence?
What separates the men from the boys in the Navy?
Why didn't Peter Jackson cast any black actors in The Lord Of The Rings?
how does Justin Bieber remove a condom?
What do you call someone who raises the dead by giving them hickeys?
What did the blonde say when her doctor told her that she was pregnant?
What do you call a Rhinoceros in heat?
How many Freudian slips does it take to change a light bulb?
When does a boy scout become a man?
What did tarzan say when he saw a herd of elephants in the distance?
What would you name someone who can predict when people sneeze?
What is the difference between 'Ignorance' and 'Apathy'?
What do you get when you put a live rabbit in the oven?
What does a gamer say when he get married?
What is the difference between an epileptic oyster farmer and a prostitute with diarrhea?
How come the leader of the USSR from the 1920's to 1951 never got anything done?
Is this her first child?
Did you hear about the two peanuts that got lost in the bad neighborhood last night?
Why should you never date a French Horn player?
What happens when you throw a laptop into the ocean?
Guess what my Valentine gave me?
How do circumcision doctors get paid?
What's The Difference Between a Redditor and a Calender?
How do you kill a walrus?
What happens when a mean girl dies?
What does an illustrator say to his girlfriend on Valentine ?
What happens when the Pope dies?
Did you hear about the man who got hit in the head with a can of soda?
What did the thirsty Spanish pirate say?
how do you know you're at a gay picnic?
How much liquid can Monica Lewinskys mouth hold?
What did the Mexican say when a gust of wind blew his homework out the window?
How do you sink the Polish navy?
Wanna hear a pizza joke?
What does the H. in Jesus H. Christ stand for?
Why doesn't Jesus like M&M's?
What's an Apple Scottish self-aware computer called?
How many Dragonball Z characters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What is the difference between a calendar and you?
What STD is found most commonly among lesbians?
How's it like living in a totalitarian regime?
What did Optimus Prime say to Arcee?
What doesn't belong in this list : Meat, Eggs, Wife, Blowjob?
Why can't you bring valve oil to the airport?
What did Jesus say to the Roman guy that pissed him off?
How did the polish terrorist burn his lips?
How do people in Nor Cal get around?
Why does the new French navy have glass bottom ships?
Did you hear about the guy who took his suppositories orally?
How do you make tear-free soap?
What do you call a woman that tries to force you into commitment?
You guys hear that Bono fell off the stage at the big U2 concert last night?
What did Pat Benatar say to the kid throwing cereal at her?
What did Snoop Dogg say upon graduation as a EE major?
What do Bill Gates and the Pope have in common?
What is the best part of a blowjob?
Where do taxi drivers with bad skin go for treatment?
What is the Catholic Church giving up for Lent?
Why should you distrust atoms?
Why doesn't the pope like the Higgs Boson?
What do they do at a prom for a school of the mentally disabled?
Did you hear what the Pope was giving up for lent?
How do you castrate the pope?
How do you make an English Muffin blush?
Whats best joke aboot canada?
Did you hear about the band the hipster liked?
What do you find with 4 Catholics?
what does a nosey peper do?
What do you get when you run over a goose?
How many homeless people does it take to screw a light bulb?
Why is it so hard for women to find men that are sensitive, caring, and good-looking?
What does a fat person and hitler have in common?
What's green and fuzzy and if it falls out of a tree it will kill you?
What's a dragon's favorite snack?
What is the difference between joghurt and America?
How do deaf people meet online?
What do you call a rich Chinese person ?
What did the carrot say to the DJ?
(6-year old brother gave me this one) Why do farts smell?
who many Freudians does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Was Nor'easter Nemo an omeN?
What's the internal temperature of a tauntaun?
What's the difference between hematologists and urologists?
What do you call a shop that sells aquatic vessels?
What makes you think that Minnie Mouse is insane?
Why did the liontamer stop using WinZip?
Why didn't Mr. Clean's wife ever get pregnant?
What is the longest sentence that a man can make?
Why did Chris Brown stop having long-term relationships?
If Bob Marley were alive today, what would he listen to music on?
Why does it take more than one squirrel to change a light bulb?
What do you do if your video card driver keeps crashing?
Why don't cannibals eat ex-wives?
What did the poker dealer say to LMFAO?
What kind of computer can sing?
How did the midget feel when he found out he was retarded?
What do you call the line at a Vietnamese restaurant?
What do fat women get for Valentine's day?
What do you get if you put four economists in a white room and ask them what colour the walls are?
What should you do if you get an erection on the subway?
What do gay horses like?
Why wasn't the Canadian scared at the movie theater?
Who's the biggest slut ever?
What do you call a Black Abortion clinic?
Why do we call the office printer Bob Marley?
What has two thumbs and got laid last night?
Why do hippies like corduroy?
This one is pretty offensive... Whats the difference between Jesus and a whore?
What do you call an all Sikh band?
Why do they wear skirts in New Zealand?
How do you know that your girlfriend has been cheating on you with a black guy?
Why was hans crying at dinner?
What's the difference between Ann Coulter and a bucket of shit?
This will be my first valentines with a girlfriend. Anyone have any ideas to help make it great?
What do you call a socialite stripper?
Which of the following words does not belong: meat, eggs, wife, blowjob?
What do you call a cinema in Jamiaca?
What did the vampire say to the werewolf after discovering its blood is inedible?
How do skeletons greet each other?
How much money do terrible movies make?
Why shouldn't you argue with a 90 degree angle?
Hello? 911?
Do you wanna play the rape game?
Why do you never buy a woman a watch?
What did one gay sperm say to the other???
What happens when the Sun and the Moon get together?
What famous actor is like a jail cell full of white guys?
What do (does?) Rihanna and Onion Rings have in common?
Did you hear about player safety in the super bowl?
What do you call a cold homie?
Why do Mexicans cross the border alone?
What's the first place Dora explored?
What's the difference between Roast Beef and Pea Soup?
What do you call a walrus that's been hit by a bus?
What is the best anti-joke you know?
Why don't you hear Django's penis talk during the movie?
What do you call a fat skeleton?
What do you call a chicken with a piece of lettuce on its face?
If you're Canadian before you enter the bathroom, and American when you leave, what are you inside?
Why can't T-Rexes clap?
How did the Canadian win the hockey game?
What did the constipated math teacher do?
Why did the snail paint an S on the back of his car?
Why was the nun hooked up to an IV of holy water?
Why do bald guys have holes in their pockets?
hello, hello ! 911 ? 911 ?
What were Jesus' final words?
What's a Jewish Catch 22?
How did Michael Jackson get food poisoning?
How many women with PMS does it take to change a light bulb?
How many Biebers does it take to change a light bulb?
What is the difference between a blimp and 365 blowjobs?
Have you heard about the music stores percussion sale?
How is the porn industry different from every other career?
Why were there 600 Mexicans at the Alamo?
Why is called a Pap Smear?
What does it taste like to go down on a little old lady?
Which computer is the best at singing?
Why are Mexicans bad at UNO?
Why did the Soviets decide to be Russian?
What kind of file makes a hole bigger??
What's the most popular sport in Mexico?
What is the difference between a Catholic and a Baptist?
What did the man say when he couldn't get the gun to fire?
Did you hear about that celebrity who committed suicide? Reese whatsername?
What's the best time of the day?
D'ya hear about the guy that drowned in a bowl of muesli?
What is the difference between a creep and a kid?
Which sex position produces the most ugly babies?
What happens when you bring beer to a BYU party?
What do you call an Italian who has sex with kids?
How do you turn lead into gold?
what did the kiwi statue said to the other kiwi statue?
Why did the vampire feel tired after dinner?
What Did The Chinese Man Say When Asked What He Wanted For Dinner?
What's brownish and runs on oil?
What did the judge order in his whiskey?
Why can't you keep a secret from cattle?
[OC] What did the imprisoned locksmith say after he told the inmates a bunch of bad jokes?
What kinds of boobs are popular in the workplace?
Did you know what 6.9 is?
Why were Mary and Joseph considered such good businessmen?
What do you call an underwater restaurant that serves cured meats to sharks?
Anyone have any jokes about Rats?
Did you hear about the gay guy who quit?
Why are farmers so afraid of aliens?
What do you call playing chess against yourself?
What do you call the object Attila the Hun uses to brush his leg hair?
What happened to the indian who drank too much tea?
What do you get when you cross and elephant and a rhino?
What do you call an X-Games athlete who placed dead last?
Why don't you want to eat pussy in the morning?
Where is the best place to hide a body?
Have you heard the joke about the three rats?
Why don't they have gambling in Africa?
Why did people hate going on road trips with Kurt Cobain?
What's the first thing Michael Jackson did when he walked into a Chuck 'E' Cheese?
Why was the little Martian sad?
Hear about the cross-eyed teacher?
What do you call a nun in a wheel-chair?
Where do dogs shop for groceries?
How many dragon Ball z characters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
what do you call a black man flying a plane?
How did the pharmacist know his drink was spiked?
What is the difference between a porcupine and a BMW?
Why was Epsilon afraid of Zeta?
How do you know someone is a vegan?
Russia's most prolific musician?
Did you hear about the kidnapping on the bus?
How did the farmer figure out how much milk he had?
What did the hookers hang on the christmas tree?
What do you call a dog in the library?
Why did Mozart get rid of his chickens?
How did the math teacher solve her constipation problem?
Where does a legged waitress work?
Why couldn't the fruit get married?
What's the difference between a baby and an ounce of Coke?
What does the south call friends with benefits?
What's the difference between a leprechaun and a hooker with 5 STD's?
Did you hear about the Italian chef?
what does a Nazi turkey say?
What's green, slimey and smells like pork?
Why do priests cry during sex?
What do you call a Reddit Psychic?
Canadian Joke: How was Terry Fox like Hitler?
What is the difference between a Pickpocket and a Peeping Tom?
What's your opinion on the mobius strip debate?
What are the sickest rock layers?
What do chickens say?
What do you call a midget psychic on the run from the Feds?
How come Miss Piggy couldn't talk?
What's Irish and sits on a deck?
How do drown a hipster?
Where does a vampire go to buy his sheets and towels?
What do you call an obese psychic?
How can you tell if you accidentally wandered into a gay bar?
Why do men float?
What did the Arab land his 747?
What technique does a prisoner use when coloring a picture?
What did the spice say during climax?
Why does Stephen Hawking have a boring sex life?
Do you know how they came up with the name for a shark?
How do you know Jesus loves Japanese food?
What's the difference between a Philosophy major and a cashier at KFC?
How do you make a female chemist feel self conscious?
What do you call a room full of men watching the Super Bowl on a big screen TV?
Why can't chickens pee?
Why did the woman's visit to wall street land her in the hospital?
what's better than roses on the piano?
Why did the algae end up at school?
How do you say goodbye to German cheese?
Do penises and testicles have much in common?
What type of lights were on Noah's Ark?
What questioned started the Holocaust?
What did the pedophile say when he got out of jail ?
What do you call a nun that walks in her sleep?
What goes "Pop-pop-pop-pop-pop-pop click-click-click-click-click-click pop-click"?
Why didnt the shrimp let anyone else eat?
How do you get ready for a trip around the Sun?
What's the difference between a straight man's moustache and a gay man's moustache?
What's big, green, fuzzy, has four legs, and if it fell from a tree it would kill you?
What's the best thing about being the 'third-wheel' for your friends in relationships?
Do you have 11 protons?
Why do ostriches have long necks?
How can you tell if someone lifts?
How many guys in the friendzone does it take to change a lightbulb?
What is the dairy farmer's favorite exercise?
What's the difference between a thief and a peeping Tom?
You know what's the only difference between Martin Luther King day and St. Patrick's day?
What did Little Miss Muffet and Saddam Hussein have in common?
what's the worst part about having sex with your pets?
What kind of bear likes the rain?
What do you say to a handicapped dog?
What does Batman like in his lemonade?
What do you call a group of JD Salingers?
What's better than being up to your knees in beer?
Why was the London sperm bank so unsuccessful?
Why do so many black people believe in God?
What do you call a german that can't see?
Anyone got any good Elvis jokes?
My Dad's Maths Joke: Why do programmers confuse Christmas and Halloween?
What do I get when I raise up a platform to play Mozart?
What does a mathematics professor do when he is constipated?
What's worse than finding Astroglide on your Mom's shopping list?
What does toilet paper and the Star Trek Enterprise have in common?
What do you call an Indonesian shoe factory that just had air conditioning installed?
Is this a little too proper for r/jokes?
Why did I divide sin by tan?
what's the square root of 69?
What did the grape say when an elephant stepped on him?
What do you call presents after you've opened them?
Why did the python return his pants?
What do you call a muslim crocodile?
What's a necrophilic pirate's favorite activity?
What happens when you provoke an angry redhead?
What did Bob Ross do after eating a fair of fickled feffers?
Where do people in Detroit get their groceries?
What do you call a homosexual in Iran after he's been outed?
What do you call a person that constantly hunts for karma?
What's the difference between a Soap Opera and a Trailer Park?
Why are all Blackberry workers so bad at basketball?
What do you call a bus driver who helps old people and parents with children on and off the bus?
Why did they stop the leper hockey game?
What is the greatest dilemma for a Jewish mother?
What's the difference between Jesus and a bunch of Mexicans?
Why did the Chinese almost lose in Mulan?
Lance Armstrong...Optimist or Pessimist?
Did you hear about the gay broom?
Why did the blonde crawl over the glass wall?
How does a streetwalker sing and give bj-s at the same time?
How many Carpathians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Did you hear about the football player who went to jail?
Why was William Henry Harrison's inaugural address so memorable?
What do you call fake spaghetti?
Why was the Polaroid fanfiction ignored by the photography community?
What do you call a potato with one oar?
Why did the scarecrow earn a promotion?
Where did Jessica go after the explosion?
What are the two biggest lies when working for a large corporation?
Why did the mathematician get pulled over?
What comes in pints?
How many PETA member does it take to change a lightbulb?
What was James Bond after he slept through an earthquake?
What do you call a baby born feet first?
What does a suicidal teenager do on the weekends?
How are black people similar to tornadoes?
Why does a tiger make such a good girlfriend?
Did you hear that the sine function left home?
did you hear about the psychic midget who escaped from prison?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's house?
Why doesn't Marty McFly drink wine?
What did the shirt say to the pants zipper?
So did you hear about the Angry composer?
Student: Teacher, can I ask you a question?
How do you call playing games while it snows heavily?
What do you call the electronic process of making a sandwich?
How good are Tesco's meatballs?
Where was France's military strategy developed?
Why does Helen Keller play piano one-handed?
What do you call a horny Egyptian king that ate at White Castle?
How do you get an elephant on a train?
How do you always keep your shoes tied?
What do you get when you mix alcohol with literature?
Ever listen to the radio station WPMS?
Have you heard the me neither joke?
What are the effects of biggest brainwashing book in human history?
What do you do?
What happened to the chinese man who walked into a wall with a boner?
What is Brown and rhymes with Snoop?
The difference between a prostitute and drug dealer?
What's the difference between a Jew and a Muslim?
What did the jew say when he reached the concentration camp?
Why did the Walrus go to the Tupperware store?
Why couldn't the bicycle stand up on it's own?
Whats the difference between a park bench and an artist?
What happens when the lights go out in a Chinese restaurant?
DAE ever wonder if Andy would be disappointed in OP for not delivering?
What do you call someone who only gives back rubs to men?
(accidentally invented when heard words out of context) What kind of food did Hitler eat?
How do you pick up a smokin' hot Jewish girl?
What happens when you cross the Atlantic Ocean with the Titanic?
what did the doctor say to the midget?
What did the blanket say when it fell off the bed?
What did the gang-banger say when two houses fell on him?
What's the difference between your child and your husband?
What did the Triceratops sit on?
How do make a woman blind?
How do you kill a whole Circus at once?
What do you call ten sets of bagpipes at the bottom of the sea?
How do you win a small fortune in Las Vegas?
What's a Scientologist's favourite piece of furniture in Rivendell?
What's yellow and black that makes you laugh?
What's the worst part about locking your keys in your car outside of an abortion clinic?
Dad can I?
How many Im not saying she's a slut But jokes are there?
What do you call it when a guy pees into a bowl after sex?
Why are pedophiles so annoying?
Why don't Jewish cannibals like eating Germans?
What do you call a planned organised rebellion gone wrong?
What do nine out of ten people agree on?
Have you ever heard a pterodactyl go to the bathroom?
A Jew wakes up with morning wood and runs right into a wall. What does he say?
What do you call a fat kid with 3 teeth and a lazy eye?
Why can't you trust a snowman?
Did you hear about the dinner on the moon?
Did you hear the one about the agnostic dyslexic insomniac?
How does a guy prove he's tough?
Why did the snowman take his pants off?
How are your step mother and a 17 in the card game 21 similar?
Why should you never let a panda into a chemistry lab?
If you're an American in the living room what are you in the bathroom?
What's the difference between 6 inches and 12 inches?
What animal has two gray feet and two brown feet?
Did you hear about the women who got wooden breast implants?
How do you steal a coat?
Did you know there is a town in Pennsylvania with the same same as one of the Great Lakes?
Why do most men like women with big boobs and tight pussies?
Do you know how to make Notre Dame style eggs?
Whats the difference between in-laws and outlaws?
Why didn't the pirate get into the movie?
Do you speak sign language?
Why does it take 100 mink to make a fur coat?
Why don't the blind bungee jump?
What Bird?
What's the difference between a bag of dead babies and a mercedes?
What do you call a cheese that isn't yours?
What did one leper say to another?
Whats that smell?
What do you call a bunch of rabbits walking backwards?
What is the difference between British beer and a pussy?
Why couldn't the blonde make icecubes?
If today's weather were a fashion line, which would it be?
Why did the student do their multiplication problems on the floor?
What did the racist ask Santa for?
What's long, brown, and sticky?
What starts with e, ends with e, and has one letter in it?
what is it called when a redditor has a threesome?
Excuse me, do you like graves?
Who gets the most ass in college?
What do you call a vietnamese turkey?
Ever made love under a mirrored ceiling?
How do you separate the Greek men from the Greek boys?
Spoof three way call???
Why is imgur down?
what does an italian eat when he's mad at his boss ?
Why didn't the coffee and the tea get along?
What did Jesus say to the Mexicans?
What is the needless meat to a vagina?
What do you call a special needs kid who is late for class?
What is a mexicans favourite tv show?
What happened to the blind circumsizer?
What does Monsieur Homer say after spilling water on himself?
Was Hitler's favorite number 8?
What's the most positive thing in Harlem?
Did you hear the one about the mother who called all her 10 sons Anthony?
What do you call the hair between grandma's breasts?
Why are gay guys with big dicks the first ones picked at the bar?
What do you tell a jew to shut up?
Hey grandson, what's the name of that german man who makes me go crazy?
What is black & blue and definitely not up for sex?
Why did the african child die while choking on rice?
Did you hear about the shoe factory that was destroyed?
What do you call a red-head that works at a bakery?
How do you tell if someone is vegan or not?
Why do Redditors pay with exact change?
How many Polish people does it take to be pallbearers at a funeral?
What do yu get when you cross a Jew?
How did Christopher Columbus find India?
What kind of pants do Mario and Luigi wear?
What's the shortest book ever written?
What comes after the third car?
What's the difference between a nun and a woman in the bathtub?
What do you call a really, really quiet piece of meat?
What is a math teacher's favorite kind of toilet paper?
What's the worst thing for a cannibal to say to a friend?
Why did the guy kick the broom out of his house?
Why do dogs lick themselves?
Wondering when Oceans 14 is coming out?
What do Scrooge McDuck and dragons have in common?
What happens to Nitrogen when the sun rises?
Did you hear they're planting in a million trees throughout Harlem?
Hey, want to hear a Top Gear joke?
Why was most of Jesus' walk downtown very awkward?
What's better than having sex with a 9 year old Vietnamese boy?
Have you seen the clown at Walmart that hides from gay people?
What is WILL.I.AM going to be called after he dies?
What's the worst thing that could happen to an r/joke/ subscriber?
How much do Rabbi's charge for their circumcisions?
Why did Susie fall of the swing set?
Why don't Africans go on cruises?
In a lesbian relationship who makes the sandwich?
What's the difference between a chicken and a pussy?
What do you call a dark wizard that loves to give hickeys?
How do you confuse an asian?
Why would Koreans make great jazz musicians?
Why do they call it GOLF?
When does Eminem leave school?
What do you call a mail order bride from Thailand?
What is a downies favourite song?
How do you make a woman blind?
What do you call a bear that's not drunk?
How many mice does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
Did you hear about the guy who was caught hiding illegal immigrants in Prague?
What's the difference between a steampunk bike and a regular bike?
Why do you never tease a fat girl with lisp?
How do you say Tony Romo in Spanish?
What's the difference between a church bell & a church?
What happened when a whore house caught on fire?
Can you take a bath if you have diarrhea?
what kind of bees make milk?
Why did Princess Leia cry at the end of Return of the Jedi?
What did Santa get the day after Christmas?
How are a 9-volt battery and a girl's asshole similar?
How do you make a woman orgasm?
What do you call a worthless priest?
What's the difference between a church bell & a politician?
What's the best thing about having sex with Twenty Five year olds?
How can you tell if you have a high sperm count ?
How did the Pianist play without fingers?
What's the difference between broccoli and a booger ?
What did the gay cow say just before sex?
Why did the teacher put the Butcher in time-out?
What do you get when you mix a Native American and an Irishman?
Why do the French make omelettes with only one egg?
Why did Moby Dick join a heavy metal band?
What does a near sighted gynecologist and a puppy have in common?
what part of the alphabet is the wettest?
Have you heard about Gandhi?
What did the left bum check say to the right bum check?
Did you hear the one about the baby with AIDS?
Why don't any pirates live in Kansas?
What is it called when an Ethiopian takes a shit?
Why does a woman smile when walking down the aisle?
What is Santa's favorite band?
What do you call a plane on a secret mission?
What gets better with age?
Did you hear about the sexually promiscuous deaf person?
Want to hear the one about potassium?
Who seduces all the ladies at the swimming pool?
Do you know the difference between pink and purple?
Why are a German vegetarians pessimists?
Did you hear about the Aggie that moved to Oklahoma?
how did the gamete get rich?
Why was the hipster wearing a sweater in July?
How can you tell when a woman has an orgasm?
Why did the computer overheat?
What does the Pope dip his chips in?
Why did the cowboy sleep with his saddle?
What did the candle say when it couldn't sleep due to his own candlelight?
Why do kangaroos hate rainy days?
What's the best part about dating 26 year olds?
What do you call a blonde that dyes her hair brown?
Why do cowgirls have bow-legs?
What's blue and not heavy?
What do a baby and a pancake have in common?
What did the watch say when the necklace, earrings, purse and ring killed the shoes?
Who's the most famous chair tester?
What did the termite eat for dinner?
Why are Russians such bad pilots?
What does a female preacher feed her newborn child?
What did the mushroom put in his bio for the online dating service?
Did you hear about the 80 year old man who ran naked through the flower show?
What did the Frenchman yell on the roller coaster?
Why does Martin Luther King like jam?
Do you know what makes darks better than whites?
How do you tell a chemist no?
What do monkeys drink in space?
How do you kill 100 flies?
How many reindeers does Santa Claus have?
How many sperm cells do virgins have at any given time?
What's the difference between a line of naked women and a magician?
What's the difference between 100 dead babies and a Lamborghini?
Can you name all of Santa's reindeer?
What do bees use to do their hair?
Why is a day at the office the same as Christmas?
Two potatoes are standing on the street corner, which one is the prostitute?
Why do computer programmers confuse Christmas and Halloween?
Why did the bicycle fall over??
What do Michael Jackson and Santa have in common?
Why did the snowman have a smile on his face?
Where does Crazy Horse live?
Why did Sally fall off the swings?
My favorite Christmas joke: Why do Mexicans have tamale making parties on Christmas Eve?
Why do Mexicans re-fry beans?
Wanna hear a joke about the eleventh letter of the alphabet?
How do you spot Will Smith on a snowy Christmas morning?
Who's the best person to invite over for Christmas?
What should you do if your girlfriend starts smoking?
What do you call a Chinese man with a pet cat?
What part of a vegetable is the most difficult to eat?
What did Santa say to the three prostitutes?
Why are there school shootings?
Why are Microsoft circuit boards so bad?
How many members of the NRA does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did the ant crawl up Princess Kate's stocking?
What's the difference between you and Bear Grylls?
What do 9 volt batteries and butt holes have in common?
What's the worst part about watching porn?
why didn't Maria go to prom?
Why do you put a baby into a blender feet-first?
Why do the French stink?
How many NRA members does it take to change a light bulb?
Why does a jew watch pornography backwards?
What does a duck call a tractor?
What's angry, fluffy and destructive and gathers inside stringed instruments?
What did the Jewish child molester say to the kid?
What's black, wears a bandana and ends the world?
Did your world end today?
Has anyone else's world ended yet?
Why didn't Santa's father get a ticket for speeding in the sleigh?
Why do midgets not wear tampons?
Why are Mickey Mouse and Minnie Mouse having a divorce?
Why did the rancher get out of the hemp-fed beef market?
Have you heard about the corduroy pillow?
Did you hear about the cannibal who passed his brother in the woods one day?
What's the hardest part to eat on a vegetable?
How do epileptics greet people?
What is Snoopy's favorite Japanese dish?
Cheesy Christmas Jokes?
Have you heard the one about the butter?
Why don't midgets ever get accepted into nudist colonies?
What do a walrus and a ziploc bag have in common?
Why does the French Army install Rear-view mirrors in their Tanks?
What sound does a racist machine gun make?
Student: What is the chance we are alone in the universe?
Have you heard about the record-setting farmer...?
Are you from Iraq?
Hear about the 2 Mexican firemen?
What do you call a gay Jewish and Chinese couple?
What did Helen Keller say after being handed a cheese grater?
Why are trains so energetic?
what sex position produces the ugliest babies?
What do you call a sheep with no legs?
How do you eat an Indian taco?
What did the Catholic baker say after baking the Easter Eucharist?
What does an angry pepper do?
What is a mexican's favorite sport?
What did the mobster call it when he couldn't move his dead friend's body?
What is Bruce Lee's beverage of choice?
What did Eminem say when 50cent gave him a sweater?
Can I borrow ten dollars?
What do you call a stock market crash in Japan?
What did batman say to Robin before they got in the Batmobile?
What does a 9-Volt battery and an asshole have in common?
What did the polite gay man say to the other man when he left the bar?
whats the difference between me and the bible?
What does Batman put in his beverages?
what does a man with a 9" cock eat for breakfast?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster shucker and a hooker with dysentery?
What's green slimy and smells like bacon?
Whats the difference between me and a calendar?
What's a narcoleptics favorite game?
What did the water say to the boat?
what's the difference between an oral and a rectal thermometer?
Which country has the cheapest prostitutes?
How do you kill a thousand flies at once?
Why are bachelors thin, and married men fat?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Hummer?
What do you call it when a brunette dyes her hair blonde?
Why are there no mexican in the olympics?
Why did you cut me down, lumberjack?
What happened when the shoe factory burned down?
Did you know unicorns exist?
What did the dolphin say when he got in trouble?
What body of water is used for writing?
Did you guys hear about the circus fire?
What do you call a white girl with a yeast infection?
How do you stop an Italian from talking?
What did the salt say to the pepper?
Why shouldn't white people swim?
What do men and public toilets have in common?
What's a Mexican's favorite candy bar?
What's the difference between The Rolling Stones and a scottish shepard?
Why do lesbians shop at Sports Authority?
Why do Mexicans walk around school like they own the place?
What's the difference between a cunt punch and fisting?
What do you get when you cross an iPad with a Christmas Tree?
What did the Jewish boy get for Christmas?
How did they get John McAfee out of Guatemala?
What did O say to Q?
what do you call a black man that flies an airplane?
Why does the can crusher hate his job?
What did the melon tell her boyfriend when he proposed?
Why did Tim Tebow's mom protest against the Russian soup truck?
What do women and parking spots have in common?
Why did the hipster burn his mustache on his coffee?
What did the sergeant say to the corporal?
What is the difference between a horse and a cabbage?
Why don't Mexicans cross the border in groups?
What do frogs do when they are depressed?
What do you get when you kiss a bird?
How many cops does it take to change a lightbulb??
Why did Florence Welch sing 'Sweet Nothing'?
What's Snoop Dogg's favourite chocolate bar?
What machine should I use at the gym to impress girls?
What time did Sean Connery arrive at Wimbledon?
What's the difference between a blowjob and pizza?
What job did the farmer give to his learning-disabled child?
Why do hippies have sex at music festivals?
Did you hear about the atom that was caught stealing electrons?
Whats the difference between pink and purple???
Do you give head to strangers?
Why can Owls turn there head 270 degrees?
What do you get when you mix a penis and a potato?
Do they have rehabilitation services for people who are addicted to Kaopectate?
What do pennies and fat chicks have in common?
How do deaf people tell each other secrets ?
What do you call a black guy who flies a plain?
What was the weather like at the rap concert?
Did you hear about new product out from Tampax?
What do all dogs get with their phones?
What gets harder as you beat it?
How much do pirates pay for earrings?
Why couldn't the skeleton add 1 + 1?
How long does it take to for Mexicans to do a job?
why are black people fast?
Q. What did the banana say to the vibrator?
What do you get when you cross an insomniac, dyslexic, and an agnostic?
Whats yellow and lives off dead beatles?
Did you hear about the baby born with no eyelids?
What's yellow and flys through walls?
What do you call an aligator in a vest?
What's the difference between Ice Age 4 and Batman The Dark Knight?
Where do people from Laos like to swim?
Why was Mohamed Ali born a fighter?
How do you know you're not logged into reddit?
did you hear about the cannibal in school?
How do you fix a broken Tuba?
Why do terds taper at the end?
How do you say doormat in Spanish?
Why did the bishop love Walmart?
What does a doctor say to the new father of a stillborn child?
Why do breasts have nipples?
Whats faster than a speeding bullet?
What is the meanest practical joke one can pull on a blind person?
What's the difference between a woman and a video game?
Remember the guy who lost his left side?
What did Chris Brown say to Rihanna the first time he saw her?
What was it called when the dragon from The Hobbit was thrown out a window?
What does a bully say to someone with severe depression?
Why was the cell phone wearing glasses?
Why is a pizza delivery guy like a gynecologist?
Why don't girls have beards?
Have you ever wondered whether it is your dog or your wife who is your real friend?
Sexxist much?
What type of shoes to pedophiles wear?
How do you get a baby to stop choking?
How did hitler tie his shoes?
How many programmers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's the difference between Jesus and a prostitute?
How can you get 20 jews into a VW Beetle?
How did Timmy dodge the oncoming car?
What did Ryu say to Ken?
Why did the priest dislike geometry?
Have you heard about Henry the brown-nosed reindeer?
What do you call a mexican baptism?
If Spooning leads to Forking, what does Knifing lead to?
Ever see the movie human centipede?
What's the iPhone's favorite football team?
What do you call a magnet that can go both ways?
What do the Post Office and a shoe store have in common?
You know how dolphins rape a lot?
Why do dinosaurs use Christian dating sites?
What do you call a missing psychic midget?
What's the #1 cause of pedophilia?
How can you tell your sister is on her period?
What sits at the bottom of the ocean and shakes?
What do you call a "to-go" dish ordered from German-Italian restaurant?
Why have all the immigrants left?
What is 34.5?
What kind of amphibian is in charge of the salad bar?
Why did the belt get arrested?
What do you call a turtle with an erection?
How many children with ADHD does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What does a whore call a bus load of men?
What do you call an organised rebellion with twice as many people as usual?
Want to hear two short jokes and a long joke?
What is it called when the gynecologist slanders your grandfather?
Do you know why I stopped playing Uno with my Mexican friends?
Why did the monkey put a bone in his mouth?
What happened to the Asian man who walked into a wall with a boner?
Why do chicken coops have 2 doors?
Why did Jesus lose his Halo?
What's the difference between your mother and a Mallard with a cold?
What's the difference between a baseball and a fat girls pussy?
What is long, hard, and has cum in it?
What does the zero say to the eight?
What did the Middle Eastern dictator say after he had lunch?
What happens when you put the energizer bunny's battery's in backwards?
How did Jesus feel when they crucified him?
What do you get when you cross a mountain and a desert?
How do you get to Shepherds Bush?
What do you call a German dust storm?
Why couldn't the Lesbian Jew hook up during passover?
What was the oak's favorite subject?
Why were there only 3,000 Mexicans at The Alamo?
What defies the law of gravity?
Why did the scarecrow win a Nobel prize?
Why did the lesbian go to Sports Authority?
What do you call a cow who has just had an abortion?
What do you call an Irish snake in Lord of the Rings?
What's the difference between a meteor and a meteorite?
What do you call a gay guy in a sleeping bag?
What do you call a guy with a big orange nose?
How does Professor Charles Xavier Apologise?
Whats the difference between Caesar and Casanova?
Which chord do pedophiles like the most?
What did the architect say about the rack?
What's faster than a black guy running down the street with your T.V?
What's the difference between water falling from the sky and hamburgers falling from the sky?
What do you call a stoned pig?
How do you throw a party in Nigeria?
Why did the bald guy cut a hole in his pocket?
How do you know if your girlfriend is getting fat?
What do you call a depressed clementine on a late night walk?
Why do people smile in Africa?
Why'd the kid drop his ice cream cone?
What does a british man say when he's about to climax?
Want to hear the shortest joke in the world?
Why are waiters terrible pornstars?
What's white, plastic, and not suitable for ages 5 and under?
What did the Jew say at the Football game?
What's sad about three black guys driving over a cliff in a Cadillac?
What does Batman like in his drinks?
How do you turn a dishwasher into a snow plow?
What do you call a Muslim cowboy?
What do you get when combine a penis and a potato???
What do you call a midget psychic who just escaped from prison?
Have you heard the one about the midget fortune teller that robbed a McDonalds?
Did you hear about the robot that was angrier than half of the other robots?
What do you get when you mix a broccoli and a melon?
Who's Angry in Japan?
What size clothes do fortune tellers wear?
What's got 40 balls and fucks ducks?
What did the late arriving cannibal receive at the dinner party?
Why did Mary and Joseph's WIFI get hacked?
What has 5 balls and rapes the poor?
What do physics majors do when they hit the club?
What did the cannibal who was late to the dinner party get?
What are some funny offensive jokes?
How do you make a cat sounds like a dog?
Best time to watch German rape porn?
What is the best tool for getting a handle on your gambling addiction?
Why are Catholics the worst drivers?
What's the difference between a politician and an actor?
What's a Ninja Turtle's favorite equation?
How many Frenchmen does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why was the snake soft?
What did the lizard get at home depot?
What does Santa and his elves listen to in their Christmas workshop?
Why was the electron mad?
What's the difference between Hitler and Ronald McDonald?
Why the java programmer wear glasses?
How can you tell if your girlfriend is getting fat?
Did you hear about the two peanuts walking down the street?
Why can't R2D2 walk?
How do you make a woman drive in a circle?
Why do black people have white hands?
What do you say when you fart on an elevator?
Why did the man with 5 dicks take his pants to the tailor?
What does a dyslexic agnostic insomniac do?
What was Confucius' favorite comfort food?
Need to write some current event jokes for a show, need help! Whatcha got, reddit?
what did the zero say to the eight?
What does a death row inmate get after their last meal?
What's a Sikh's favourite kind of joke?
Did you hear about the man who was born without any ears?
What do you call James Bond in the bathtub?
What's the difference between an alpaca and your Mom?
What's a Rabbi's favourite drink?
What grows when you squeeze it, explodes if you rub it too hard, and children love it?
Why was the baby Honeydew sad?
Stupid joke I made up, 101: Where does a sandwich go when it gets good grades?
What is 007's fetish?
What does every "Tickle Me Elmo" get before they leave the factory?
What did the rock say when he had to leave his girlfriend for a long time?
What diapers should you put on a dead baby?
What is Call of Duty called in Afghanistan?
Why aren't there any Walmarts in Afganistan?
What's the other word for a pedophile with a large hat?
What should you never give to a Jewish person as a present?
What is your most favorite vagina joke?
What's the difference between a black man and a park bench?
How do you see fish semen?
Whats the difference between a watermelon and a baby?
What do you get when you cut a hooker in half with a chainsaw?
What's green and flies over Germany ?
What's the difference between my porn stash and Call of Duty?
Did you hear about the Jewish pedophile?
Why'd the apple jump in the grinder?
Why shouldn't white people go swimming?
What does Jerry Jones do after winning the Super Bowl?
What do you get when you cross a seal and a polar bear?
What do you call a baby girl who died of alcohol poisoning?
What kind of triangle jokes can never be made right?
What do Beethoven's 9th and a dead baby have in common?
Whats the difference between a woman and a dog?
How many guitar players does it take to change a light bulb?
What is the worst place to go on Black Friday?
Why can't two Asians make a Caucasian?
How did the swordsman keep annoying r/jokes?
What does a woman say after three consecutive orgasms?
Why the dwarves surf in the kitchen?
What's the difference between the Rockettes and a troop of acrobats?
What did Santa say when he went to a brothel?
How did the swordsman annoy r/jokes?
What's a cokeheads favorite TV show?
How do you keep a Turkey in suspense?
what do you get when you mix 9th grade literature with alcohol?
What breaks when u give it to a toddler?
How do you mail an egg?
What's harder than nailing a dead baby to a tree?
Why didn't the other viruses hang out with The Common Cold?
How do you know if you have a high sperm count?
What did Mary give her cheating husband for Christmas?
What is the worst way to find out you just came into money?
Why was Lisa not able to ride a bike?
Do you know why Dead Baby jokes never get old?
What do you call a Mexican that won't get on a scale?
What's a dead baby's favorite holiday beverage?
Did you hear about the Buddhist that refused Novocaine during his root canal?
What two things should people stop shaking because shaking hurts these things development?
What do you call Jewish folk from New Jersey?
Who would you save first?
What did the baker say when he saw the beautiful woman?
Why does nobody like the element Bi?
Did you hear about the frog that wasn't good at parking?
How do you get a redneck to give a dog a blowjob?
What do you call a dog with no legs and metal balls?
When two gay men get married, whose parents pay for the wedding?
What's the best thing about 23 year olds?
What did the black kid get on his SATs?
What is the difference between an Eskimo and a eunuch?
Did you hear about the man with no arms or legs that swam the English channel?
When is a single gay man's favorite time of the day?
What do you call a man, with no arms or legs, in the middle of the ocean?
How do you turn a Fox into an Elephant?
Did you hear about the condom that flew across the bedroom?
What's the difference between a racist joke and a sexist joke?
Why doesnt justin bieber shop at Sports Authority?
What did the redneck say after his girlfriend swallowed?
What do you call it when many people drown in Berlin?
Who was the fattest Renaissance painter?
What did the hamburger name his daughter?
What does a sick ninja practice?
What's long and hard?
How do you get 50 Canadians out of the swimming pool?
What does a dyslexic tiger and a bus driver have in common?
What's good on pie, but not on pussy?
What happened to the clock that was still hungry?
Who granted the fish's wish?
Why shouldn't you put a baby in the microwave?
What do you call an exploding ape?
What's the difference between sex and conversation?
Did you hear what happened after an Iranian mullah walked head-first into an airplane propeller?
Whats the difference between Batman and a Blackman?
What is Hitler's least favorite beverage?
Why do you take toilet paper to the twilight zone?
What do you call a table with dots all over it?
What do transvestites do at Christmas?
What's the difference between a school teacher and a train?
Why is Light Beer like sex in a canoe?
What is the saddest thing in you're life?
What does spinach and butt sex have in common?
What is the worlds wettest animal?
Did you hear that the BBC have sacked Bob the Builder?
What's the difference between a feminist and a doormat?
What's the hardest part about eating your vegetables?
How can you tell if a Mexican is feeling sad?
How did the mathmatician become unconstipated?
Why was 11 afraid of 12?
My favorite joke: How many Americans does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you get when you cross a Jew with two planks of wood?
How did the hipster burn their lips?
What do Alan Turing and a well-mixed solution have in common?
What's the difference between three dicks, and the truth?
My girlfriend just asked me.. What's an English geologist's favourite fruit?
What did one volcano say to the other?
whats black on top and white on the bottom?
why was the computer late to work?
What kind of underwear does a math-obsessed mermaid wear?
What kind of computer sings?
What kind of underwear do the GI Joes wear?
What happened when the turkey got into a fight?
Did you guys see that documentary about the voice of Elmo?
What's black and white, and red all over. And cant fit through a revolving door?
Why was ε afraid of ζ?
Why is Michael J. Fox better than a vibrator?
Reddit, will you share your favorite inside joke with me?
What do you call a nun on a bicycle?
What do you call a Jew with the pH level of 1?
Want to hear a joke about paper pizza?
What do you call a bunch of high Mexicans?
Why do mushmelons always have traditional marriages?
How do farmers find their sheep in tall grass?
Did you know drinking beer makes you smart?
why dont women drive?
What's the difference between a crab with boobs and a bus filled with old people?
What do you call assistants that help citrus fruit?
How do you get Lady Gaga attention?
Have you heard about the Italian chef?
What did the tailor say after a job well done?
Why do women have sex?
Why does the Coast Guard have a 6 foot height requirement?
What's a simile?
Did you hear about the man who survived mustard gas and pepper spray?
What's the best part about dating a homeless girl?
What's the difference between a hooker and a lawer?
What's the worst punchline on /r/jokes?
What do you get when you mix Nyquil and MiraLAX?
What do you call a skinny Pakistani cow?
What do you call a Female Clown?
What do you call someone who pushes people down stairs?
How come Justin Bieber doesn't like to shop at Sports Authority?
What is the difference between christianity and national socialism?
What does a 9 volt battery, and a pretty girls bumhole have in common?
Where do the Baltimore Ravens sit?
What happened when the black man went to night school?
Why is being in the military like having sex?
What do you get when you cross a Jew?
How many beans are in Irish bean soup?
What do you call a ghost in the Outback?
Whats Fred Flintstones favorite drug?
What game do you play in a room full of Indians?
What is the best thing about dating a homeless girl?
What do you call a black man who flies airplanes?
What's the definition of a 68?
Why cant obama ever be on a dollar bill?
What does a frenchman call a lesiban threesome?
What's the similarity between eating a girl out and talking to the mafia?
What do hippies say when you tell them to get off your couch?
Why do you never hear a Pterodactyl go to the bathroom?
What's the difference between a politician and a catfish?
Read out loud jokes?
What's the grossest number?
What do you with a crazy girl knocking on your door?
Why do gay barbecues suck?
Why didn't the racist eat the middle of his sunny-side up egg?
Why did the hooker get a vagina implanted on her hip?
Why did the little mermaid wear seashells?
What's red and black and screaming all over?
Why did the hipster burn his mouth when he was eating a slice of pizza?
Can I have some orange juice?
What kind of pants do the Mario Brothers wear?
Why did the creator of 9gag call it that?
Did you know our brains are 75% fat?
Whats the difference between a shower and a toilet?
What do tight pants and a cheap hotel have in common?
What's the difference between anal and a refrigerator?
What did Sandy say when she came to New York?
How is Mitt Romney like a failed sperm?
What's cooler than Obama?
What do you call an Inbred cow?
What does a perverted frog say ?
What's green and lays in a ditch while covered in cookie crumbs?
What did the Ghost say to the Bee?
Have you heard men get hit by lightning 6x more often than women?
Why did God create men ?
What's the lightest thing in the world?
Why is the sea so strong?
Topical! What does a Japanese man do when there's an erection?
What did the tomato say to the cheese in court?
Joke from my childhood: What do you call a pig that losses its voice?
Cake day post: What's orange and sounds like a parrot?
What do you call a blind buck?
What do you call 3 Irish tree surgeons?
What do you say when a virgin sneezes?
Did you hear that Castro's body double retired?
Why are there so few female politicians?
What do four out of five guys love to do?
What did one triangle say to the other triangle?
New subreddit r/oneliners?
What do cats eat on a hot summer day?
what does a frozen beer, burnt pizza, and pregnant girl all have in common?
Did you hear they are still going to run the New York Marathon?
What is a sorority girl's favorite type of cheese?
What is the difference between a BMW and a baby carriage?
What did the hot dog say on the toilet?
What's more fun than swinging a dead baby by a string?
What's the best part about a hooker dying on you?
Why did the storm trooper get an iPhone?
What do you call a room full of Amish prostitutes?
What do you call a Pakistani man who's been everywhere and done everything??
Did you hear about this year's newest fad diet coming out of New York and New Jersey?
What am I?
How do you find a blind man at a nudist beach?
Reddit, what's a joke you ABSOLUTELY HATE but everyone else seems to love?
What did the ground say to the earthquake?
What do you get when you cross a killerwhale and a cow?
This one came to me this morning - How do you spot a necrophiliac at a funeral?
what is a calculators favorite food?
Why was the motorcycle going so slow?
What does Bob Marley put on his toast?
What did the lesbian lumberjill say to her girlfriend?
What did the terminally-ill dock worker say about his health care?
What's the first thing a Navy wife does when she wakes up in the morning?
Did you hear about the competition for the world's best Tie?
What cheese do hunters use to goad a bear out from its cave in the winter?
What is a pirate's favorite class in school?
Why did the toast drop his ice-cream?
Why does snoop dog need an umbrella?
Where does the army keep fish?
Did you hear what sandy did to New Jersey?
Have you heard the new drink called Sandy?
How do chickens connect online?
What do you call a fake pasta?
Didja hear the joke about the piece of paper ripped in half?
Hear About the Restaurant on the Moon?
What is the boogiemans favorite dance move?
What's it called when Batman ditches church?
What is a drug addicts favorite snack?
Why did the Russian man get food poisoning?
Why do gangsters hold their pistols sideways?
What do you get when you cross a rooster with a telephone pole?
How did Charles Darwin die?
What's the difference between a hockey team and a New Jersey hooker?
Hey, Reddit! Here's one about cats: why did the mother cat move her kittens?
Guess what New york is going as for Halloween?
How do you organise a space party?
What's the difference between a Genealogist and a Gynocologist?
What do you call 5 lesbians and 5 state workers?
Why do redneck men enjoy Halloween so much?
Why do French people eat no more than 1 egg per meal?
How do you know if air fresheners have gotten too smart?
Do you know why the government is important?
What do you get if you cross Bambi and a ghost?
What do you say when you wake in the middle of the night and see your TV floating in the air?
Why are peppers irritating?
What do you call a small bull?
Why was the cotton candy singing?
What's the Difference between Beer Nuts and Deer Nuts?
Why do melons always have traditional weddings?
How many dubstep fans does it take to wash a car?
how many hipsters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's made of leather and sounds like a sneeze?
How do you know an engineer is an extrovert?
Why does Peter Parker have a shower in his apartment?
What does a church shooting sound like?
What animal has an asshole on its back?
What was Hitler's favourite song?
Why are a lot of Italians named Tony?
What do dyslexic sysadmins eat for breakfast?
What do mathematicians do when they are constipated?
What do you get when you move 32 Texans into the same room?
What time does an Asian go to the dentist?
How did the pollock die raking leaves?
Why did the hipster fail chemistry?
What do you get when you divide the circumference of a jack-o-lantern by its diameter?
Why are there no joke about Jonestown?
Why does the hipster make crappy coffee?
How many vampires does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why is sorority row the safest place to be during a zombie invasion?
Why don't witches have babies?
How do you fit 4 gays on one barstool?
What do Jimmy Saville's victims and Aston Villa fans have in common?
Q: How do you make a woman angry and sick at the same time?
What does a 72 year old snatch taste like?
What do you call a horny skeleton?
What did the booger say to the finger?
What did A and B look for at the beach?
How do black people make fruit salad?
Did you hear about the Native American who drank 1000 glasses of tea?
(really fucked up joke) How do you say happiness in German?
Figured this is an appropriate time to tell this. What is an Undertaker's favorite element?
Want to hear a joke about a jump rope?
What is Irish and sits on the porch?
Did you hear about the fish that married the duck?
Nerd Joke: What's the difference between UDP and an epileptic?
What are a redneck's last words?
What's the darkest joke you know?
How do you know when a guy is really in love with his girlfriend?
What's the worst place to run in to your ex girlfriend?
How do lesbians keep things interesting in the bedroom?
What's the best time of this month for vampires?
Want To Hear A Knock Knock Joke?
Why are ET's eyes so big?
What do you call a food that turns black people on?
What's green and hangs from trees?
Why is it called PMS'ing?
how did the hipster burn his tongue?
What do you call a camel with no humps?
What did the black kid get for christmas?
How did the prof get the latin college girl pregnant?
Why did the duck cross the playground?
Are you an elixir?
Do you know what would happen if the Pope showed up randomly to a Catholic service?
What has two thumbs and doesn't understand jokes that require a visual component?
What Are The Two Most Important Orifices' On A Woman?
What are Mitt Romney's favorite shoes?
What did the DNA say to the RNA?
How do you make a blind moan?
Why does Barack Obama eat bananas?
Why does it suck to be a black Jew?
What do you make with an Avogadro?
127 MILLION?
Want to hear a clean joke? How about a dirty one as well?
So can we do something together?
Reddit is down?
Want to hear a sports joke?
How does a mom in West Virginia know her daughter is on her period?
What do you call a pall-bearer in Oklahoma?
How many PMSing women does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why is it a bad idea to wear tiny shorts on a Ukranian holiday?
Why don't blind people go sky diving?
Who cooks in a lesbian relationship?
What did the dad buffalo say to his son when he dropped him off at school?
How do you find Will Smith when he's lost in the snow?
What did one condom say to the other at a gay bar?
Are there any 6 foot penguins round here?
Why do Canadians call alcohol anonymous triple A?
Did you hear about the new Obama Healthcare Burrito?
What's the difference between anal sex and regular sex?
What's the definition of Embarrassing?
What's a wolf's favorite breakfast food?
What's a gangsta say when a house falls on him?
Why do indie kids suck at karate?
What are the most racist jokes you know?
How many paranoids does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Reddit, what is your favorite Limerick?
Why was the little ink blot so unhappy?
Why do witches go commando when riding around on their brooms?
What did the mommy broom say to the baby broom?
How can you make seven even?
What's strong enough for a man but made for a woman?
What would a world without women feel like?
Why do Asians have such small tits?
What did the man in the "Race for a Cure" say to the three people beside him?
why do pedophiles make good employers?
What do you call a dinosaur who joins the band The Clash?
What kind of bear dissolves in water?
What is grosser that gross?
Why can't you put the punchline in the title?
What's the best part about living in Indiana?
Working title for the new Tyler Perry movie?
When did Anakin's Jedi Master know he was turning to the dark side?
What do you call a very nosy spice?
Why Did The One Handed Man Cross The Road?
Why aren't there any walmarts in Afghanistan?
Who here likes pickles?
If you drop a brown bear and a white bear into a lake, which one dissolves first?
Why did the Dollar note become 4 Quarters?
what do you call a bunch of white people running down a hill?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and Casper?
What did the lawyer name his daughter?
What was the name of the time traveler with good timing?
What do you call a jewish bodybuilder?
How do you know when the king of Egypt is horny?
How can you tell when a lawyer is lying?
Where can you find baby dwarfs?
Why did the Jew cross the road?
What did the beaver say when his house burned down?
Why did the blonde girl get fired from the M&M factory?
What do you call a stoned, dyslexic crow?
How many non-compliant Germans does it take to change a light bulb?
what's the difference between a my girlfriend and a voice activated sink?
What do you call a puppy on its period in the peak of summer?
What does a redneck and yeast have in common?
How many Syrians does it take to launch a missle?
How do you catch defish?
What's a programmer's least favorite wind instrument?
At what point does a Lamb become a Sheep?
How do you keep an idiot busy for 3500 years?
Hey Southpaw, going to lunch?
What's the difference between Swine flu and Avian flu?
Do you know why only half of the women on earth will experience a real orgasm during their lifetime?
Have you heard the one about the baby with AIDS?
What does marriage have in common with a deck of cards?
Why does the easter bunny hide all the eggs?
What is it called when a duck kills another duck?
What do ping pong players and my dominatrix have in common?
Did you all hear Jerry Sandusky is getting a custom ipod touch?
What did the CIA dogs say when they supsected they were being followed?
Whats the difference between Jesus and Mexicans?
What is a polygon?
You know what makes me smile?
What do you call the child of two parents with downs syndrome?
What did the dinosaur say after the car crash?
Did you hear about the testicular cancer survivor who won the lottery?
Why do the ladies love Jesus?
Did you hear about the tight end who went to prison?
how often do i beat my wife?
What do you call it when a statistician secretly gives out clothes?
Where's the best place to explore?
Why has Santa Claus such a big sack?
What are you going to do for a face?
Why is it called the "funny bone" when you hit your elbow on something and it tingles?
What happens when you put the batteries in backwards in an Energizer Bunny?
How can you tell when Mitt Romney is lying?
What are you if you aren't European?
Whats the difference between a pun, and a fart?
What kind of fish would you want to go to bed with?
Why couldn't the two testes be friends?
Did you hear about the nurse who swallowed razor blade?
Why don't Barbie and Ken have kids?
Why do black people where baggy pants?
Did you hear about the guy who blew his entire lottery winnings on a limousine?
How do you tell if you're at a gay barbecue?
What do you call a Sailor's hitch in the arctic?
Why does LeVar Burton not like to travel by airplane?
What do you call someone who has one parent that is a Jew?
Why couldn't the Meteor marry the Ice Comet?
How often do Chinese people have elections?
what do you call a black guy that flies airplanes?
Did you hear about the guy who needed to snort a line of baking soda every day?
What's dark, and usually involved in crime?
how do you catch a unique bunny?
Why did the stoplight turn red?
What do Margaret Thatcher and Jimmy Saville have in common ?
What did the egg say to the water?
What do you call a pig making cookies?
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster-shucker and a hooker with diarrhea?
What do you call a well rounded, very intelligent gay man?
What do Hutterites do on Halloween?
How can you tell if a person's a vegan?
Has anyone heard this one? I think I came up with it in a dream?
What do you call a bee in the garage?
What do you call it when a crow throws a party and no one shows up?
Do you know why WWII got the world out of The Great Depression?
Did you hear about the wooden horse?
Have you seen Stevie Wonder's new piano?
What's yellow and lies in a pond?
What do you call a asian and a black guy??
Why can you not play UNO with mexicans?
What do fat white chicks and bricks have in common?
What's the difference between an outlaw and an in- law?
When is it time to bury the baby that you killed?
What do blind people think of a basketball?
Wanna hear two short jokes and a long joke?
What kind of line gets thicker and thinner at the same time?
How does Justin Bieber remove a condom?
Who Loves Debates?
How you compliment an Italian cheese maker?
Whats the difference between a woman and a computer?
Why did the molecular biologist want to make a porno film of gametes?
What did Helen Keller say when she jumped off a cliff?
What did Helen Keller say when she won the lottery?
How is liver like anal sex?
Why did the chef take a job at a soup kitchen?
Is the bakery hiring?
What's brown and rhymes with 'Snoop'?
How many art directors does it take to change a lightbulb?
What kind of dance does your mother do?
Why can't you hear a pterodactyl when it goes to the toilet?
What does the dentist of the year get?
What's similar between a racehorse and a leaky faucet?
How is your first car like anal?
[WARNING: RACIST JOKE] What do you call a jew with a gasmask?
What did the recent KKK hit-and-run victim order at Starbucks?
Why do they call them 'jews'?
What do a fag and a parrot have in common?
Whats the most racist thing to buy at target?
What do they tell people who flunk out of astronaut academy?
What do you call a symphony of whales?
What did the straight edge ghost say to the bartender?
You know what I love about being bipolar?
What did the army of starving cannibals say when they walked into an abortion clinic in mexico?
What does Snoop Lion do when he forgets to wear oven mitts?
What are the bumps around a girls nipples?
Why do Java developers wear glasses?
What did the router say to the doctor?
What do you call a semi truck with it's load half empty?
What's a crackhead with no drugs?
How many sociologists does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call a cow that has given birth?
What do they leave on your pillow at a bordello in Dijon, France?
Did you know Helen Keller had a dollhouse?
What bounces and makes little children cry?
What do you call a fruit that makes fun of someone?
How many surrealist painters does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did Helen Keller masturbate with one hand?
How many ants does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call twin policemen?
what do you call a racist tampon?
What did the cannibal ask for at the cruiseline buffet?
What's the difference between a Women's cross country team and midget geniuses?
What is the difference between a football player and a new pimp?
How many Police officers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a slutty camera?
You know what they say about people with big brains, right?
What's the difference between Obama supporters and Romney supporters?
What do you get when you give a head of lettuce to an epileptic?
What sport are Mexicans best at?
Did you guys hear about the gay truckers?
What is Tony Romo's favorite lottery game?
What do you call a large bread disco?
Why isn't energy made of atoms?
How do you get your wife to listen to every word without interrupting?
What do you call a cow's mate?
What's Brown and rhymes with "snoop"?
Why do southern girls get pregnant so much more than northern girls?
What does a Seal drink at a bar?
What do you call a blonde on a college campus?
How do you know when sex with a blonde is over?
How do you make a cat sound like a dog?
What's the second fastest thing in the world?
How does Romney only claim a 14% tax rate?
How do you know if a guy has an asian wife?
George, are you high?
What do you call a cow that plays with itself?
Did you guys hear that the hadron accelerator exploded?
Have you guys heard the story about the butter?
What is the president's favorite vegetable?
Have you guys heard about the new restaurant on the moon?
Why did Princess Dianna cross the road?
What came first?
What do you get when you breed a rabbit with an elephant?
What does a dog do that you step in?
What do you call a leper in a hot tub?
How do you figure out if Will Smith committed a crime?
How do you tell a real Ferrari from a fake one?
Whats the best thing you get out of a penis?
What's Resurrection?
What did the music thief do in college?
why does everyone want the new white iphone?
Best joke you came up with yourself?
What do Super Mario Brothers, and relationships have in common?
How many NYPD officers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why are gay guys the first to check out of a hotel in the morning?
What is Aladdin's favorite Pokemon?
What do you call a blonde standing on her hands?
Where did the Gingerbread man lose his leg?
What's the difference between a pussy and a cunt?
What's the worlds strongest animal?
what do elephants use as a tampons?
What Do You Get From A Pampered Cow?
Why can't two Asians make their own Caucasian babes?
What kind of shoes do they wear in Holland?
Hey, are you Jewish?
Did you know that there is an elephant at Bush Gardens?
what do you call gay paramedics?
You know what's grosser than gross?
Why did OJ Simpson want to move to Alabama?
Why did the mouse whisper into the elephant's ear?
Why do businesses move to India?
How do you make apple jelly?
Why was no at the Premature Ejaculaters' support group when I arrived?
What's the best way to milk a sheep?
What is the name of the Asian pointing out everyones mistakes?
What's the difference between Jam and Jelly?
Which medical specialty is dedicated to fingering your bum?
What's a vampire bat's favorite fruit?
What does one strawberry say to the other?
What happened to the butterfly that ate too much marble?
So why is it called the "funny bone"?
what did the fish say when he ran into the wall?
What did one passive aggressive republican say to the passive aggressive democrat?
How do you fit three gay guys on a bar stool?
What color were Hitler's shits?
(Very blue/dirty) What's the difference between regular blood and period blood?
What kind of pennies come from Japan?
What kinds of guns do T-Rex's prefer?
What's black and married to my daughter?
How do you circumcise a priest?
Why do black people have red eyes after sexual intercourse?
So, its blasphemy you want? Why was 6 afraid of 7?
What do you get when you mix a Jehovah's Witness with an Atheist?
Why did Jesus die on the cross?
Did you hear about the Muslim Party?
Did you hear about the Irish man who tried to blow up a bus?
What do you call two Filipino pilots?
Joke: Where did AT&T get their 2007 slogan?
What did the baby corn say?
Why did the Pollock cross the road?
What does a news anchor say during sex?
What is the most common death among square dancers?
Did you hear about the old chameleon that couldn't change color?
What do you call the process of becoming an honorary Asian?
Why is light beer like having sex in a canoe?
Why doesn't Mexico have a team in the summer Olympics?
What thought can you easily share with someone else without using words?
What song do they play at a Jehovah's witness funeral?
Why Does Jesus suck at hockey?
What do you call an Asian lady with a Mixmaster on her head?
Have you guys heard about the new internet milk?
Have you heard that Eskimos eat whale meat and blubber?
Where do you find a no-legged dog?
What martial art do cows practice?
Did you year about the chinese male prostitute?
What do you call a Chinese man with one foot?
What do you call a dog with no legs in the ocean?
What's the most dangerous place in an Excel file?
What do you call a gay Mexican?
Why was the sand wet?
Why do all the little boys in Crete have golden penis's?
Why is it bad for blind people to skydive?
How do you know if someone went to Harvard?
What's the difference in the KKK and the Supreme Court?
How does an Irishman's future look like?
Did you hear about the plane that crashed on the way to the ginger convention?
How many hamsters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What has four legs and two assholes?
Why was Helen Keller such a bad driver??
Did you hear about the Indian who drank 4 gallons of tea?
I have a dollar bill pressed between my chin and my chest.....who am i?
why do the ladies love jesus?
Why are divorces so damn expensive?
How did the 5-year old girl fall off of the tire swing?
Why did little Sally fall off the swing?
What's the main cause for pedophilia?
Euphemism?
where did alice go during the explosion?
What is the best gift to give a gay geneticist?
What language does gay Jesus speak?
What's the easiest way to pay a musician?
What do you call innocent women and children dying in the middle east?
Did ye hear about the movie that the pirate went to see?
What did the kid with no arms and legs get for christmas?
Why is sperm white?
Why are Australians never late for work?
How many downies does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about the rivalry between the ice cream shops in Texas and Mexico?
what's the difference between a pitbull and a jewish broad?
Why did the condom cross the road?
What do you call a fish with two knees?
What's the best thing about a poet in a prison?
how does every racist joke start?
What's worse than finding a worm in your apple..?
What is a wock?
What is the summit of trust?
TOO LATE?
What did the wind turbine say to Al Gore?
what did the egg say to the boiling water?
What do michael jackson and Mcdonald's have in common?
Free RV?
What does having sex with a hooker and bungee jumping have in common?
Why don't sea-gulls fly over bays?
How about some old phone pranks?
Did you hear about the psychic midget who escaped police custody?
What do you call a lesbian with 1,000 semi-automatic guns?
What happens if you play a country song backward?
What kind of tea does a house drink?
What is the difference between homeless and vodka?
How many monastic women does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
how many apples does it take to make a pie?
What's the worlds most forceful fig?
What does the highest paid WNBA player make?
What's the fastest game in the world?
Q: How do you get an elephant in the refrigerator?
What's the best way to make your wife scream when you're having sex?
What did Jeffrey Dahmer sing as he went to the refrigerator?
How can you tell when you're in a ring of fire?
What do you call two lesbians floating down a river in a canoe?
What's mostly red and has 2 legs?
What does a Polish woman and a hockey team have in common?
Why did the Mexican school girl get pregnant?
When is it acceptable to not tip your server?
Why couldn't the blind man go skydiving?
Anyone know how long you can keep a chicken in the freezer?
why did the toilet paper roll down the hill?
What did the mathematician do at the baseball game?
Have you heard about the Tempura Shelter they are opening downtown?
Why do scuba-divers go in backwards?
Did you hear the one about the gay man on the patch?
What does FUN stand for?
What is the similarity between tornadoes and divorces in Kentucky?
What do 9 out of 10 people agree on?
What did the hobo get for Christmas?
What do you call a cow with one udder?
What did the body builder say when he saw he was out of protein powder?
How do u tell the population of a small native village?
Who was Bin Laden's favorite rapper?
What did the field say to the farmer with no crops?
Whats blue and doesn't weigh much?
Laughter is the Best Medicine. OK Reddit, whats the best 9/11 Joke You've Ever Heard?
Where can you find a scientist that's into bestiality?
Did you hear about the polar bear on the news last night?
What does a hairstylist call their resumé?
How can you tell you're at a gay cookout?
Why didn't the bunny get the job as a marsupial?
Why can't the blonde get her drivers license?
why did the ghost crash his ghost car?
A Tiger ?
What did the poor ghetto dweller get for Christmas?
What do you get when you cross a mexican, a queer, and an eskimo?
What do you call it when you build a second portal on minecraft?
Does anyone know any jokes about buttons?
Why doesn't Sean Connery have any grown up children?
What did the letter " O " say to the letter " Q " ?
In honor of September 19th, what are your best pirate jokes?
Why should a midget not attempt to slaughter a cow?
Why do married men love golf so much?
Why did the robot get the electric chair?
What's the difference between a BMW and a pair of Dockers?
Why do they allow people in wheelchairs to bring carry-ons onto a plane?
What is the difference between a Mercedes and a Lexus?
What do the Iron Man suit and Sarah Palin have in common?
Have you heard the joke about the girl with Progeria?
What's the difference between iron-man and iron woman?
What did little Hitler get for his birthday?
Anyone have any Russian and/or Joesph Stalin jokes?
Did you hear about the butterfly that ate too many stones?
Did you hear the one about the pilot who backed into the propeller?
Why is Robert Pattison so pale?
How long does it take a tweaker to go shopping?
How could I ever live without you?
How many crackheads does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Whats the best thing about being a meth addict?
How do you know if there's an athiest on a reddit thread?
Which way do 5 gay guys move?
How many cops does it take to beat up a light bulb?
What do you call a female cop that shaves her vag?
Why is it so cheap to buy 12 rhombuses?
Did you hear about the community pool they built in the bronx?
Did you guys hear about the award winning farmer?
Why did the marine park worker feel aimless?
What do you call a pig that murders baseball players?
You know who loves to get fisted?
Did you guys hear about the gay midget?
Did you hear about the war between the blondes and the brunettes?
What do Dracula's girlfriend and Mike Tyson have in common?
Why Make Your Bed?
What do you call a half gay man?
Guys, what are your favorite "I'm going to hell for this" jokes?
What's the difference between Futurama and One Direction?
What's the most positive thing about Harlem?
How do al-Qaeda like their toast?
Why do the Scots wear kilts?
What do you call 1 black guy being stalked by 200 white guys?
What's the core body temperature of a Tauntaun?
Since we're talking about Michael Jackson--- What did the guy say to MJ at the beach?
What happened to the two ants who got into a fight on a toilet seat?
did you hear what the little boy found when he opened his toy box?
Is it true there is an 'underground' organization supporting Mitt Romney?
Why is it important to have plenty of help when changing a light bulb?
How can you tell the Indians were here in America first?
What did one tampon say to another tampon?
When does a Cub Scout become a Boy Scout?
Why is CoD like women?
What do you get if you cross a kangaroo and an elephant?
What's another name for a Dentists?
What is the speed limit of sex?
my moms birth sign is cancer the crab..want to know how she passed?
What to do?
What helps put a Jew to sleep?
What do cops and mushrooms have in common?
What is the main attraction at a Nazi Theme park?
What's the first thing a 16 yr old, from Arkansas, says after sex?
How do you know you're getting old?
Why don't blondes wear mini skirts in San Francisco?
How do you remember your wife's birthday?
How do you tell the difference between a terrorist and a tenured professor?
What's the difference between PMS and a terrorist?
Heard this on NPR- Did you hear about the guy who got the left side of his body cut off?
What do you get when you cross a duck and a cat?
What do you call a Nazi who survived the war?
What's a Christian's favourite chord progression?
What do you say to a woman with one black eye?
Have you heard about the new viagra eye drops?
What are some jokes along the lines of "the elevator business has its ups and downs"?
What's the difference between a computer and a woman?
What do you call a greedy lesbian?
What do you call a black guy that flies a plane?
What is the difference between an anal thermometer and an oral thermometer?
Why are brides so happy on their wedding days?
What's the difference between a bowling ball and a big, smelly vagina?
What does a Jewish Princess think about during sex?
What do a dog and a near-sighted gynecologist have in common?
Whats invisible and smells like carrots?
How many Swedes does it take to clean a men's bathroom?
What do you call a Mexican who has his Mondeo stolen?
How does Lady Gaga like her meat?
What's 13 inches long, stiff, and makes a woman scream all night long?
How do you get a gay man to fuck a woman?
What do you call an Irish J-Pop singer?
what do you call an italian whore?
What do sea monsters like to eat?
What's the bet part about having sex with twenty two year olds?
How many grammar mistakes does it take to piss off your English teacher?
What do Lewinsky, Monroe, and Reddit have in common?
What do American beer and sex on a boat have in common?
What did the hipster say when a starbucks opened in his neighborhood?
How many lead guitarists does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did Berlusconi go to the Costa Concordia?
Whats the difference between a wank and an egg?
What do blacks and bikes have in common?
What Does A Redneck Call It When He Visits His Cousin Outside His Town?
What do you call two gay guys in a sleeping bag?
What did one stoplight say to the other stoplight?
Why do elephants paint their balls red?
What does the Chicago Cubs's name stand for?
What is brown and sits in a toilet in a dutch attic?
Why does Reddit hate Fencing?
What do a tampon and a redsox season ticket holder have in common?
You know what my favorite type of cupholder is?
what did one tampon say to the other?
What’s the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scottish farmer?
What do you call a battle of wordplay?
What do you call a woman in the living room?
Did you hear about the guitarist that got arrested?
Did you hear about the gay Irish couple?
Why should honeymoons only last six days?
What's the difference between my job and a dead hooker?
Why are Rhinoceroses so wrinkly?
why does it take so long for a pirate to learn the alphabet?
What's harder than nailing a baby to a tree?
Why are the mountains in Switzerland called "the Alps"?
why did the pervert cross the road?
What did the Mexican say with one sleeve rolled up and one sleeve not?
What did the lesbian vampire say to her girlfriend?
What did the retarded kid get on his IQ test?
Why shouldn't you laugh when a black man falls off his bike?
What type of lettuce do they serve on the titanic?
What happens when the President dies?
What did the detective say when he tripped over a pretzel left by the perp?
What's the most annoying thing in the internet?
What did the food say to the other food, while inside a stomach?
Why are women dressed white on their wedding day?
Why did Skrillex's girlfriend dump him?
How can you tell if a Redditor is a female?
What do you call a warm glass of piss in the forest?
What do you call a rabbit with a bent dick?
Three tampons walk into a bar, a kotex, a playtex, and a tampax. Which one says hello first?
Did you hear about the butcher who backed up into a meat grinder?
What is the most popular breakfast at the World Trade Center?
Why does the Catholic Church protect paedophiles?
How can transportation be improved in Harlem??
Why did the man get excited when he had sex with a pregnant woman?
What did the Seven Dwarfs say when the prince woke up Snow White?
What did Dodi Fayed say to his driver?
What do you call Nazis undergoing decomposition?
Did you hear about the guy who spilled beer on the stove?
What does Batman's mum shout when it's time for dinner?
What did the necktie say to the hat?
You know that amazing feeling you get after kissing a woman?
When do you stop on green and go on red?
Why don't Junior League debutantes like group sex?
Son :How much does it cost to get married, Dad?
Who is the biggest slut in America?
What do you call oral sex with a paraplegic girl?
how can you tell you whenyou're in a ring of fire?
What is a horse's favourite wine?
Why can't accountants get library cards?
How do you make a whore moan?
What's the difference between the bird flu and the the swine flu?
Did you hear about the slow chef at the speed bake off?
What's the difference between Justin Bieber and a birth certificate?
What do you call 40 mexicans standing in your yard holding hands?
What do you get when you cross a dyslexic, an atheist, an insomniac?
Why was the Jedi so good at the synthesizer?
what's the worst part about eating vegetables?
Why did the broken window not go to the doctor?
Whats grosser then gross?
What did the blind man say when he passed the fish market?
Why did the baker go to work?
What's a 68 to a blonde?
What type of bees produce milk?
Four gay men walk into a bar and there's only one available stool. What do they do?
Anyone else hear the new Whitney Houston song they just released?
What is the fastest way to exit a car on the highway?
Did you hear about the gay football coach?
How do you say "bra" in german?
where does a one legged waitress work?
What do you call the girls who outrun me?
What's the difference between Stanley Yelnats and the rest of the kids in Holes?
How did Pinocchio realize he was made of wood?
What did the gay deer say after leaving the club?
What's meaner than a pitbull with herpes?
What do you call a cow that gives no milk?
how many Frenchmen does it take to properly defend Frances borders?
What did the chinese pirate say?
what do you do with someone that is having a seizure in a bathtub?
Did you hear about the blind guy who got in a car accident?
First man: what is the most commonly used French expression?
What do you call an epileptic cow?
How do you make an archaeologist mad?
What can you make and break at the same time?
How many dubstep fans does it take to change a lightbulb?
How can you lose around 10 pounds of ugly fat?
Why did the Mexican man push his wife off the cliff?
Why do blind people not skydive?
What to you call epileptic lettuce?
What does Pink Floyd and Dale Earnhardt Sr. have in common?
What was the pig doing in the kitchen?
Whats a Porn Stars Favorite Drink?
Why aren't there any mexicans in the Olympics?
(OC) what did dispatch say to the dog catcher when he asked if he was done for the day?
What did 1 lesbian bullfrog say to the other lesbian bullfrog?
What goes "Clippity Clop Bang Bang, Clippity Clop Bang Bang"?
what does cellphone reception and princess diana have in common?
What does a radical, democrat and republican have in common?
Who makes more money - a drug dealer or a prostitute?
What's the difference between anal sex and an oven?
How does a boy dog rape a girl dog?
What's the difference between a sin and a shame?
What does a 80 yr old woman taste like?
How many people does it take to circumcise a Whale?
What did Orion receive when he won second place in the archery contest?
Why does Bane and a monk get along well in the morning?
How many rednecks does it take to eat a possum?
what was Stevie Wonders first words when he got his eyesight back?
Why wouldn't you teach a woman how to ski?
What's the difference between Boy Scouts and Jews?
How does it change many dyslexics to take a lightbulb?
How many feminists does it take to screw in lightbulb?
What do you call a Mexican guy with one rubber toe?
Did you hear the joke about the deaf guy?
What do mermaids wear to math class?
What do you call a gaping hole in your chest that smells like fish?
So did you guys hear that princess Diana was on the radio last week?
r/Jokes Do you know any jokes told in the first person?
What's the best part about fucking 28 year olds?
What happens once a minute, twice a moment, but never in an eternity?
Q: What's the good part about having alzheimer's?
Blind jokes?
What do the pizza delivery guy and the gynecologist have in common?
what do you call a jamaican proctologist?
Why do mermaids wear seashells for bras?
How did Jennifer Aniston find her fiancee?
A young boy asks his Dad :"What is the difference between confident and confidential?
What's the difference between a microwave and butt fucking?
Why don't you hire a violinist as your babysitter?
Why do java developers always wear eyeglasses?
Wanna hear a joke about cats?
What does a farsighted gynecologist have in common with a puppy dog?
What do you call a one legged woman?
What do you call a belt made of paper?
Do you know what they say about guys who have big feet?
Warning, offensive. Why was Hitler so concerned about getting into heaven?
How do you congratulate the guy who won the best tie contest?
Wanna hear a joke about a broken pencil?
What did one muffin say to the other muffin?
Why do redditors hate the robot NASA sent to Mars?
How do you make a cat woof?
What should you take for stomach pain?
Have you heard about that new movie Constipation?
How does the Apothecary make his wife orgasm?
How do make a car top?
What's the difference between Sarah Palin's mouth and vagina?
What do you call a nut?
Why do Chicken Coops have two doors?
Why don't many Greek men move to other countries?
What do you call a Frenchman shoving a baguette up your butt?
What class does everyone remember fondly from Highschool?
Why did black people pick so much cotton?
What does a gay women look for in a man?
What is the saddest Olympic sport to watch?
What is your favorite dumb joke?
Why don't you transport onions by boat?
What do you get when you eat all the potatoes?
what do you call a rodent that smokes weed?
How was copper wire invented???
What's the difference between a kitten and your wife?
Did you hear the one they don't tell retards?
What's the worst part about Tupac's new sitcom?
Did you hear about the Million Dollar Dutch Lottery?
What did the hat say to the belt?
Whats the easiest way to drown a blonde?
What does a lonely pepper do?
What kind of skin lotion do acrobats use?
What can be found in a Judge's freezer?
Where would you find an Egyptian psychopathic swimmer?
What did the farmer say when the townspeople told him all of his cows were in town..?
What do you call a man who is attracted to black guys?
How does a rice burner start a street race?
How many frat guys does it take to change a light bulb?
What is Green...and Smells Like Pork?
What did the suspenders say to the trousers?
Why can't Skrillex go fishing?
What's the difference between a tease, a love, and a lust?
what is green and has wheels?
You hear what happened to the frog's car?
Ever heard the one about the dyslexic agnostic insomniac?
Anyone there?
Did you here the one about the midget that finally admitted he was gay?
Why did the guy have Ben Franklin tattooed on his dick?
What's the difference between a violin and a viola?
How many surrealists does it take to change a lightbult?
What do you call a dog who digs up ancient artifacts?
What, according to Freud, comes between fear and sex?
Hey, have you heard about the new Micheal Bay film?
Why did the paedophilic bestialist not answer his name?
Why does the number 288 not come up in polite conversation?
Why don't Nazi's like strip clubs?
What denomination are the coins in Super Mario Bros?
What did the deaf Canadian say to the American that was talking?
What is Black, White and Red all over?
Why couldn't the tampon twins get dates?
What do you call a nun that works for your company?
Why do slovaks don't like Czechs?
What's the biggest advantage of living in Switzerland?
How is a vagina like a cigarette?
What does Jerry Sandusky and a Silver Medalist have in common?
How do you sink a polish ship?
How many Jewish mothers does it take to change a light-bulb?
What do you call the Flintstones if they're black?
How many SEO experts does it take to change a lightbulb?
How come ambassadors never get sick?
Why did the cookie visit the doctor?
Why should you be sure to pay your exorcist on time?
What did Goku want to be when he was growing up?
How many Sand People does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the difference between a four year old and a baggie of cocaine?
What's the difference between a midget and a venereal disease?
Why did Sally fall off the swingset?
What does a pretentious owl say?
What do you get when you cross a gay man and a Jew?
Offensive jokes?
Why should you wrap your hamster in duct tape?
Did you hear about the hippy that drowned at the beach?
What's 12 inches long and makes women scream at night?
What do you call an Anorexic with a yeast infection?
How can you tell that a shrimp with a big dick was walking down the beach?
Did you hear about the new Playboy magazine for married men?
why don't robot chickens play basketball?
What's the difference between going into a sewer system and the government buildings?
Why do astronomers put beef in their shampoo?
How do you know which bear to talk to in a bar?
What's the difference between New Jersey girls and trash?
You know what's fucked up?
What's the difference between peanut-butter and jam ?
Did you hear about the fly on the toilet?
whats the difference between an Irish wedding and an Irish wake?
Why did Moses lead the Jews around the desert for 40 years?
OMG Hiccups are so annoying! You know what you should do if you have them?
What did the princess say when she got to the ball?
Why doesn't Fleetwood Mac shave?
Why didn't the hipster want to see the Saint John River and the Penobscot River?
Why did the researcher take his paper to the harbour?
How can you tell the difference between a Fleshlight and the porn star it was modeled after?
whats the diffrence between a tornado and a divorce in the south?
Whats th first joke you remember hearing or that you told as a kid?
What's a Jewish pedophiles favorite pick up line?
What would you call The Flinstones if they were black?
Why do rapists make such great salesmen?
Why do white men shop at black yard sales?
What did the plate say to the other plate?
What do zombie vegans eat?
why aren't there Olympics in Mexico?
What do you do if you see your stepmother hobbling around in the backyard?
What did the black guy get on his SATs?
How do you set a woman's watch?
Why don't Mexicans have BBQs?
What do you do when you see a bloody Mexican in your garbage can?
How do you make a gay fuck a woman?
Spoken jokes anyone?
Did you hear the joke about the ageless baby?
What did Donald Duck say to the prostitute?
What do Kodak film and John Lennon have in common?
What do you call 5 black guys and a white guy?
Why do black people cry during sex?
How many times does 1 go into 0?
What do you see when you drop a piano down a mineshaft?
if seagulls fly over the sea, what flies over the bay?
How do color blind people see porn?
What do you call a Russian man with three testicles?
What is the worst part of a prostitute and the best part of a pie?
Did you hear about the 80 pound midget with 40 pound balls?
what's your best joke involving or being about germans?
What do you call a masturbating bull?
How does a tractor break up with its boyfriend?
How is Chick-Fil-A like a black hole?
Why couldn't JFK be a boxer?
Why do dwarves laugh when they run?
From my 4 year old: What do you call a penguin that can't win?
How many black men does it take to screw in a light-bulb?
Did you hear that the French President is getting divorced?
How would you try to sleep with a fat girl?
Why do women have periods?
Why did the Tour de France get raided?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say when he saw a dolphin caught in a net?
What's the difference between very large building and pigeon?
Did you know that truth serum us derived from an animal?
What is the difference between a peeping tom and a pickpocket?
How can a woman avoid cleaning, cooking and oral sex for the rest of her life?
What's the difference between a prostitute on the street and a prostitute on the pavement?
Why do Gorillas have big nostrils?
What did Miss Muffet and Saddam Hussein have in common?
What do you call 2 Mexicans playing Basketball?
What do Harvard and a virgin have in common?
How does a chef relax?
what do you call a cow that's recently given birth?
What do you call a relaxed redneck?
Why do blondes like blonde jokes?
Why does Fred Williard keep Kleenex in his pocket?
What's a shark's favorite illegal substance?
What did the cow say when she jumped off a cliff?
What's Irish and sits by the pool?
Why do inquisitive peppers annoy people?
How many teenagers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the scientist take off his doorbell?
What did the redditor say to the repost?
How many pedants does it take to replace a burnt light bulb?
Did you hear about the new farmers dating site?
Did you guys hear about the dyslexic man who went to the toga party?
How do you get a one-armed monkey out of a tree?
how many cops does it take to change a lightbulb?
Why did the H blow itself up?
Why is the bat-boy the luckiest guy on the baseball team?
What do you call two lesbian dinosaurs?
Jessica fell out of a tree and broke both her arms. Knock knock. Who's there?
Have you seen The Dark Knight Rises yet?
What do you call coffee on the floor?
Have you heard of the corduroy pillow?
Why was Chic-Fil-A founded?
How many Vietnam vets does it take to change a lightbulb?
what's the longest word in a black man's dictionary?
How are Bungee jumping and visiting a prostitute a like?
Why did Lindsay Lohan walk into a movie theater?
Did you hear the one about the batman midnight showing?
What is six inches long, has a bald head, and drives blondes crazy?
How do you call a man with a rabbit up his bum?
what's a political campaign we can all get behind?
What kind of fish does Google have in their lobby?
Did you hear about the Polak who won a Gold medal in the Olympics?
When did the Chinese man know it was time to go to the dentist?
What's a pedophile's favorite pair of shoes?
What did the heatsink say to the CPU?
Why do cannabis smokers call that tiny device that holds the butt of a cigarette a roach-clip?
What's the difference between an old Greyhound terminal and a lobster with really big boobs?
What do you call an epileptic in a vegetable garden?
Is this where Frank lives ?
Why are batman and black man different?
What's big, bounces, and makes little kids cry?
What kind of pants does Mario wear to work?
What do women and condoms have in common?
Why did Sara fall out of the swing?
What does Johnny Depp yell when a tree falls in the forest?
What's your favorite rape joke?
What was Carl Sagan really trying to say about the brain?
How do you say constipated in German?
Anybody heard the joke about the wall?
What's the difference between Heath Ledger and Heath Ledger jokes?
What's the worlds longest sentence?
What do they call a Polish astronomer?
Did you hear about the masochist who like cold showers?
Need a good PG rated joke for a class...anybody have one?
What are Canadians favorite board game?
What’s the worst thing you can hear when your giving Willie Nelson a blowjob?
Know why New Yorkers are so cynical?
What's the difference between Jesus and a picture of Jesus???
Why is the Camel so hard to see in the desert?
Why don't they allow lesbians to play baseball?
Why don't chicken coops have Four doors?
Why did the black kid wish for a white Christmas?
Q: How can u drop an egg onto a concrete floor without breaking it?
What's the difference between 365 used condoms and a tire?
What is long and black?
Did you hear about the singing laptop?
Why do cannibals never go hungry?
What did the deaf, dumb, blind, amputee kid get for Christmas?
what do you get when one rapper eats another?
Did you hear about the guy who lost his left arm and leg?
How did the love seat get pregnant?
did you know there are people who hate jews who are not nazis?
What is a Pirate's favorite letter?
How do you fit an elephant in a Safeway bag ?
What is the name of an Irish girl who hangs out on your lawn?
Why didnt the melons get married?
How can you tell there are two elephants in your fridge?
Why do asians have such squinty eyes?
What did the bread maker say to the wheat?
What's the difference between a bag of coke and a baby?
What is brown and screams?
Do you guys wanna jear a hoke about dyslexics?
Why do black people keep the brims of their hats flat?
Why is a rat when it spins?
fovorite irish jokes?
What goes "Clip clop, clip clop, clip clop, clip clop, BANG, clip clop, clip clop"?
What do you call 20 niggers in the emergency room?
Did you hear that David Copperfield has aids now?
What's brown & rhymes with Snoop?
What did the windmill say to Lady Gaga?
What's the difference between an epileptic corn husker and a nymphomaniac with diarrhea?
Can anyone answer why they've kept the name Lynchburg?
how do you know you're in an elevator with the people of reddit?
Why does a one legged man make a terrible therapist?
How do we know the toothbrush was invented in Alabama?
What do you tell a hitchhiker with one leg?
What does a shopping cart and a wheelchair have in common?
What's a good comeback for a women when she's asked to get her husband a sandwich?
Are you African?
What happens when you stick your hand in a jar of jelly beans?
Did you hear about the new Vietnamese cookbook?
Who told the gorilla that he couldn’t go to the ballet performance?
How many gay guys can you fit on a stool?
Who laughs the last?
Did you hear they came out with a drink called the Osama Bin Laden?
How does a Scotsman find a sheep in tall grass?
What is important in relationships?
Whats an African-American's favorite fare?
Why do jewish men get circumcised?
What has 7 arms and sucks?
how to you get a one armed blonde out of a tree?
Why is a viola solo like a bomb?
Why was the baseball team hot?
How many Borg does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why did the condom go flying through the air?
What did one condom say to the other while passing a gay bar?
Why can't Sluts Count to 70?
What's the difference between George W. Bush and Hitler?
Why did Shakespeare break up with his girlfriend?
Does England have a fourth of July?
What do you call an Ewok who just ate pancakes?
What do you call two women in a canoe?
What's red and has two legs?
What does it sound like when two old people have sex?
How many Atheists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a Greek virgins anus?
What's the difference between girls of our generation and peanut butter?
Whats red, 10 inches long, and makes your girlfriend cry when you put it in her mouth?
Did you know that trampolines used to actually be called jumpolines?
What where Adam's first words to Eve?
What is a dog covered in poo called?
What do you call a Poor Stripper?
What do you call Catholics who marry Jews?
Where do cats go on vacation?
Why do the 3rd Italian Navy use glass-bottomed battleships?
Why don't nuns fear getting raped?
When geese fly in a "V" formation, do you know why one side is longer than the other?
Who is that only black guy at the family reunion?
Did you know that Chuck Norris was born in a log cabin?
What happened to the wooden car with the wooden wheels and the wooden engine?
If I was your alarm clock, how would I wake you up every morning?
What do you call a bunch of stereotypical Americans running?
Why was the wife worried that her husband was a light drinker?
What is Drake's favorite type of alcohol?
what did the grape say when it got stepped on?
What did the Pilipino orphan boy say to the linguist who wanted to adopt him?
How are getting popular in high school and getting a college woman pregnant similar?
What's green and can eat 50 hot dogs in a minute?
Why do gay people like math?
How do you tell the difference between a chemistry professor and a politician ?
What's the most dishonest place on earth?
How much do you love kids?
What's green and spiky and retrieves information at the click of a button?
Why do Republicans oppose Gay Marriage AND Obamacare?
What do you call your last girlfriend's vagina?
How much sperm do gay guys have?
How do we know cats are communists?
What kind of fabric does Mario use?
How do you get a faggot to fuck a bitch?
What should you do if you're attacked by a gang of clowns?
What is the difference between a BMW and a porcupine?
What do you call it when a bison borrows money from you?
How the does man give his dead batteries away?
Whats the difference between a Priest and Acne?
What does a priest and McDonalds have in common?
Why did the dyslexic Italian prisoner of war never get rescued?
How do you find a naked man in a nudist colony?
What do you call a drunk muslim?
what do anal sex and vegetables have in common?
What do vegan zombies crave?
What is the difference between a pregnant woman and a supermodel?
Will a rabbi charge a lot for circumcisions?
Why did sally fall of the swing ?
Why don't North Koreans go to heaven?
What did Tarzan say when he saw the elephants coming over the hill?
How do you kill a hippie?
Which famous celebrity has had the most children over the last 20 years?
What do you call a 1 ton toilet?
What should you do if you see an epileptic having a seizure in a bathtub?
Why isn't Mexico in the Summer Olympics?
Why shouldn't you let your kids run more than a mile?
Why don't you say grace when eating Chinese food?
what do you call a mexican with a rubber toe?
Have you heard about the South Korean subreddit?
What's the roughest part about being a 7-year-old in Liberia?
Did you know that Justin Bieber has a 12 inch cock?
Did you hear about the guy who stole a dictionary from the library?
What's the difference between Reddit and 4chan?
What do you call a prepubescent rapist?
What's black on the outside but yellow on the inside?
What do you call someone who has to pay for sex?
You know how Brussels sprouts and anal sex are kinda the same??
why are dubstep artists so bad at fishing?
What do you call a cow that got hit by a car?
What kind of secretary is the best secretary?
Where do you weigh pies?
Iguanas feel love but don't marry ..know why?
Why should you never let a non-metal drive a train?
What do you call a musician's best friend?
What did Kermit the Frog say when Jim Henson died?
What's the only thing better than roses on a piano?
What's a Canadian's favorite board game?
How did Kim Jong-Il begin his audio autobiography?
What's Rectangle, red and bad for your teeth?
How many people with alzheimer's does it take to change a lightbulb?
What are the two biggest lies in Wyoming?
How much semen does a gay guy have?
What does bungee jumping and hookers have in common?
What did the prostitutes left leg say to the other leg?
What do bricks and Latinas have in common?
What's worse than a pile of dead babies?
What is the difference between a circus side show and a Las Vegas floor show?
What do you call it when the lead singer of U2 fights with himself?
What does a gift and a black man have in common?
What would be your reply?
Did you hear, there's no more ice in Poland?
Why did Napoleon's soldiers wear red buttons on their blue jackets during the battle of Waterloo?
There are 4 gay guys in a bar and only one bar stool, how do they all sit down?
What do you call a laptop in the ocean?
Why did the movie critic give the movie he received on a burned disc a 3.14/5?
How many non-humorous people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a penis shaped wand?
How many countries does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why can’t a lesbian diet and wear make up at the same time?
Why don't Rooster's wear underwear?
Why do fluorescent lights hum?
Why do airplanes manufactured in Spain have windshield wipers on the inside?
Why are Native Americans the most successfull strippers?
Why did the hippie drown?
How do you find a vegan at your dinner party?
What do you get when you cross a border collie with a pit bull?
What's white and covers the road in the early morning?
How did the hipster break his neck?
What's the Difference Between Being Hungry and Horny?
Did you hear about the man with a cold who went to a miniature petting zoo?
Did you hear the AIDS joke?
What did the Mexican say when I pushed him on the lawn?
Why doesn't Smokey the Bear have any kids?
How did they name Canada?
Why couldn't they find the cheesemaker after the accident?
What do you call a person who loved tractors but doesn't any more?
Ever heard of the blind hooker?
Why can't two Asians have a white baby?
What do you call a Native American girl that is really good with directions?
Did you hear about the guy who was frozen to absolute zero?
What did the Nazi boy say to his sweetheart?
How does a Jewish mother change a lightbulb?
What has 12 hands, 12 legs, and 12 eyes?
How is a woman like an Electrical Fuse?
What do frogs say that surf the internet?
Did anyone see the transit of Venus?
What do you call a guy with 15 rabbits up his arse?
What's the best day of the week to marry your gaming console?
Why do jews get so little annuity?
What's the difference between LinkedIn and McDonald's?
What's the worst part about looking at internet porn?
What's the Difference Between A Condom and Your Mother?
what do you call water that bounces?
What's the best thing about dating a homeless chick?
Q: Why did the Wisconsin democrat cry?
Why did the Dalai Lama go to Mexico?
What would be a great name for a Mexican Boy Band?
Why don't undertakers provide free services?
Why do lawyer's suits never have pants pockets?
If storks bring white babies and crows bring black babies, then what brings no babies?
Have you heard about those new corduroy pillows?
What's the difference between toilet paper and shower curtains?
What is the difference between a sociopath and a buddhist?
What's the difference between a DVD player and a cow's anus?
Have you heard the one about the successful black man?
How can you tell when an Italian car has a flat tire?
Q: How can you tell if it's a trombone player you're kissing?
What's worse than locking your keys in your car in front of an abortion clinic?
What do you call a dirty atheist?
How do you spell "candy" with only 2 letters?
What's the best part of being an abortion doctor?
Why do you never see Mexicans with acne?
How do you get an iraqi woman pregnant?
What's the difference between a refrigerator and a gay guy?
What shape does a muppet follow when throw through the air?
What did the man say to his big breasted ex-wife?
What do you call it when one lesbian "Cock Blocks" andother lesbian?
Why does the Pope shower with his briefs on?
Why can't the Tyrannosaurus Rex clap?
What does a National Geographic magazine or a JC Penney catalog have in common?
A black woman named Latisha has three boys all named LeSean. How does she tell them apart?
What do a dead fish and dog shit have in common?
How much does the average Hipster weigh?
What did the collage artist say to her assistant?
Who do you sell second hand bikes to?
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say when someone told him to upgrade to Windows 7?
What happened when Justin Bieber went to Michael Jackson's house?
How do clams communicate?
Did you hear about the fierce competition between the Texan and Mexican ice cream shops?
What's the most famous line at a gay bar?
What's a lesbian's favorite meal to cook?
What's the best joke you ever heard?
2 Mexicans and a white man are in a car, who's driving?
Whats black, white, red and rolls around in a KFC parking lot?
Did you hear about the two guys who stole a calendar?
What's the difference between a blimp and 365 used condoms?
What's long, green and smells like bacon?
Anybody hear about what happened when Nietzche died?
What do you call a Mexican on a bridge?
What does Spock sing in the shower?
Why can't Abraham Lincoln remember the Gettysburg Address?
What invisible and smells like carrots?
What's the difference between a four year old and a bag of cocaine?
What's the difference between a Greyhound terminal and a lobster with a boob job?
What is the best animal related joke you know?
What did the mexican boy say to his mom after he mopped the floors and found his brother?
What's the hardest number to say?
What's in common between Batman and a black guy?
What does a tight-rope walker eat for breakfast?
How do we know that Batman is black?
What do you get if you put 5 lesbians and 5 politicians in the same room?
What's the worst thing a woman can hear after giving Willie Nelson a blow job?
What happens when a nun becomes pregnant?
Did r/jokes hear about the new Taco Bell Express yet?
Why do we call it politics?
What's batmans favourite fruit?
What do you call a Gay dinosaur?
What happens when a necrophiliac goes to a funeral?
What did the scarf say to the hat?
The dirtiest joke I know: What is the difference between a baby and a freezer?
What do you get when you put semen in a bat?
What does Lebron James do after winning the NBA Championship?
How can you tell if a Redditor is European?
What do you call a female deer that's pickled?
What were you thinking?
How do you confuse a drummer?
Did you hear about the new virtual reality fellatio program?
What do locking the keys in your car and getting your girlfriend pregnant have in common?
What did the Italian say when the eel swam by?
What ever happened to the Energizer Bunny?
You know my grandfather died in a Nazi prison camp?
what did the buffalo say when his son left for college?
What do you call a dog riding in a submarine?
Why do women have babies?
Why do short people laugh when they run?
How do five gay guys walk?
why do dolphin jokes always make you laugh?
What did Mr.T say when he saw a fat lady at the bar?
Did you hear that Björk covered a Lady Gaga song?
How did So-Cal celebrate the double anniversary of the LA Riots and Cinco de Mayo?
Did you hear about the short-sighted circumsiser?
How many members of an identifiable group does it take to perform a common task?
How do you catch a fish with peas?
How does a chef get to work?
What cheese is not yours?
What happened when Red-Beard's ship and Blue-Beard's ship crashed into each other?
How did the hamburger introduce his girlfriend to his parents?
What's the difference between a tribe of pygmies and a girls cross country team?
Why did god give women yeast infections?
What do you call someone that will only have sex with homeless people?
What did the buffalo say to his son who was going off to college?
How is the Quran like weed?
What's the difference between an arts student and a table?
Why did little Timmy fall off his bike?
Did you hear about how the Police were called to a daycare yesterday?
Why can't Barbie get pregnant?
Need a cure joke... Anyone?
What do an elephant and an apricot have in common?
Did you hear about the red tarmac that went around murdering people?
What's the difference between an Arts student and a large pizza?
What is a red haired persons favorite alcohol?
Why aren't there any asprins in the jungle?
What is the name of the bear capitol?
Why isn't Spiderman in the Avengers?
What's the difference between an Engineering student and an Arts student when tying their shoes?
What does the new socialist leader of France mean for the country, Europe, and the world?
Have you heard about the recent abnormal growth in cancer clinics?
What kind of mint is the hardest to swallow?
What's the penalty for bigamy?
Whats the difference between a pick-pocket and a peeping tom?
How do you stop millions of children from going to bed hungry every night?
Why was christopher never in the same place?
Which is your favorite Monty Python Joke?
Have you guys seen this? Have you heard about this?
why did the native family starve?
what do you call a fake noodle?
Where does He-Man keep his towel?
How do Ghosts lay foundations?
Have you heard about the first restaurant on the moon?
Did you hear about the detective who failed geometry?
Whats the difference between the FAA and a jet engine?
What kind of cake is even worse than fruitcake?
What is the most effective form of birth control?
Could you please tell your mother to stop wearing so many different lip sticks?
What is the worst thing you can hear while blowing Willie Nelson?
Why did simba's father die in a stampede???
(Very) dirty joke time: How does a mother in West Virginia know when her daughter is on her period?
How do you know your wife's dead?
Why is a woman unlike a washing machine?
What do you do if you come across an elephant in the jungle?
Girl with small feet?
This one's not racist... It's nationalist. That makes it better, right?
Did you hear about the abstinent lenses?
Whats the stupidest animal in the Jungle?
Where in the world can you find the highest concentration of Jews?
Why do hipsters prefer to drink their PBR warm?
What is the difference between a trampoline and a baby?
Did you hear about the thin guy who went to Alaska for six months?
What country can't be hacked?
What is the opposite of Christopher reeves?
Did I ever tell you about the worst blowjob I ever had?
Is it whisky?
What's Snoop Dogs favorite type of weather?
What separates Humans from Animals?
why do blacks like the doctor's office?
What do you get when you cross a zebra with a flamingo?
how many black people does it take to change a light bulb?
What's the difference between a pile of dead babies and a corvette?
What's black, blue and hates sex?
(My favourite joke when I was a kid) Did you hear about the constipated mathematician?
What kind of bird always sticks together?
What do you call the rapping triplet mind readers on the starship Enterprise?
Have you ever eaten Ethiopian food?
Why couldn't the melon couple run off and get married?
Why do Seagulls Fly over the Sea?
What happens when you give a politician viagra?
What do you get when you take a needle to a balloon filled with yogurt?
Did you hear about the constipated composer?
What is woman spelled backwards?
Do zombies eat popcorn with their fingers?
Whats the worst part about having a lesbian for a roommate?
Whats the difference between a prostitute and a dead baby?
If you took the tartness out of a lime and later put it back would the lime be retarted?
Do you know why Moon rocks taste better than Earth rocks?
What is the frequency of a broken tailbone?
Why doesn't the United States have to worry about a North Korean nuclear missile attack?
What do you call an international criminal waffle that you dropped at the beach?
What do California zombies eat?
What's a white racist's favorite food?
What is the difference between my grandma and a newborn baby?
What happens when you give Viagra to a politician?
Why can't Africa have Volkswagen beetles?
What's Kermit the Frog's favorite song?
Why did the airplane crash?
Why Can't Michael J. Fox draw a perfect circle?
On a scale of 1 to 10, how immature am I?
Did you guys hear about the midget that admitted he was gay?
What did the black man get on his SAT's?
When do you know that you are getting old?
If a lobsters come in on lobster boats, and clams come in on clam boats, what do crabs come in on?
Are we going the right way, Yoda?
Did you hear that Willy Nelson died?
If Jesus were alive today...what type of car would he drive?
What is the most positive thing in Africa?
What's all brown and sounds like a bell?
What do you call a mentally handicapped System of a Down cover band?
What did one crab say to the other?
Have you heard about Marx's tomb?
What is the only part of a vegetable you cant eat?
Why does Mexico never wins any medals at the Olympic Games?
If John has 50 candy bars and eats 45, how many does he have?
Q: Why did the suspenders get arrested?
What do you call the stupidest fish in the sea?
Why does vegan cheese taste bad?
Why did the lead singer of Drowning Pool lose his job at Starbucks?
Why did the baker get smelly fingers?
Why is it impossible to starve in a desert?
What does the titanic and the canucks have in common?
why do girls wear makeup and perfume?
What do Chinos say when you take them off?
You see those cows over there?
How do camels have sex in the desert?
What's your best racist joke?
What's green then turns red really quickly?
Did you hear about the rabbi performing circumcisions for free?
What is the hardest part about playing soccer?
Where do Jewish kids with ADHD go for summer?
What do most people wear to court?
What do you call a black lady having an abortion?
What's a gay couples least favorite fruit?
You hear about the two guys that stole a calendar?
What do you call a teenage girl that doesn't masturbate?
What instant coffee and Sasha Grey have in common?
Did you hear about the airplane that crashed into a cemetery?
How many PETA memebers does it take to change a light bulb?
What's a gay-bar pickup line?
Do you know why black people have large nostrils?
what's the main difference between r.kelly and your average redditor?
What do the NFL and Jail have in common?
Whats brown and sounds like a bell?
Why is it always a good idea to pack asparagus when you go camping?
What's the difference between Yogurt and L.A.?
What do compassion and sex have in common?
How do you spell women backwards?
What does a Cuban do when he gets a flat tire?
Did you hear about that guy who put 19 toy horses up his butt?
What do you call the sweat between two rednecks having sex?
What's the difference between Beer Nuts and Deer Nuts?
How's banging a fat chick like riding a scooter?
Are you Jewish?
What happens to Eminem when he dies?
A jew just won the nobel prize. what do you say to him?
what's wrong if everything is all right?
How do you get a girl from the Midwest to "s" your "d"?
What does a Polish man give to his bride on their wedding day that's both long and hard?
What problem afflicts 40% of all pedophiles?
What was Ol' Dirty Bastard's favorite vegetable?
How do Italian Jews like their bread?
What's red, white, and black all over?
Why did the rancher vivisect his daughter?
So these lepers are playing ice hockey and he gets kicked off the team. Why?
What is the difference between Hitler and Seabiscuit?
What do you call a psychic little person on the lam?
why aren't mexicans and blacks suppose to have kids?
What is Chuck Norris' only weakness?
What goes well with country music?
Why did the farmer vivisect his daughter?
Did you hear about that guy who had his whole left side amputated?
Why doesn't Smokey the bear have any kids?
Whats so great about twenty-five year olds?
What's the opposite to Christopher Reeve?
What comes after 69 ?
What did the buffalo say to his son when he left for college ?
What is the similarity between women and square roots?
What did the programmer say to the architect chick?
Why do so many American kids die in school shootings?
How does a farmer find a sheep in the long grass?
Why don't catholic priest believe in condoms?
what do you get when you cross a penis with a potato?
What does it mean to be an Agnostic with insomnia and dyslexia?
What do a pulse and an orgasm have in common?
What did the cliff say to the landslide?
What gets louder as it gets smaller?
Who's Kony's favorite rapper?
What do you get if you cross a black man with an octopus?
Did you hear about the farmer who tried to be a stand up comedian?
What is the preferred coffee drink of people with alzheimer's?
What's orange, and sounds like a parrot?
What did the conspiracy theorist use as his breakup line?
How many Freudian analysts does it take to change a lightbulb?
Heard of The Gay Martini?
What's Hitler's favorite game?
What the beat part about having sex with twenty-one year olds?
What's the best way to kill a one-legged fox?
What's the difference between an incontinent person and a 1980's Renault?
What do you call a communist who's good with a rifle?
So, did you hear what Lateesha get on her SATs?
What's the hardest part about eating a vegtable?
What do you call Charlie Sheen having sex with his brother?
Heard about the baby seal who walked into a club?
What holiday do Jewish bridges celebrate?
What's the best time to go to a dentist?
What to hear a joke?
Why couldn't the hipster get off?
Facepalm?
Why hasn't there been a woman on the moon yet?
How many telemarketers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Who Killed Cap'n Crunch ?
What do you call a stick that's good at algebra..?
Did you hear the one about the streaker who ran naked through a church?
What's the difference between a muslim sex-doll & a christian sex-doll?
What do you feed a gay horse?
Why don't you play UNO with a Mexican?
How do you turn a link on r/jokes purple?
Have you heard the joke about the 13-inch ruler?
What has 4 legs and 1 arm?
Why did the USAS with frag rounds fall over?
How does a sea urchin search the internet?
What do you call a gang of Country musicians jamming the shit out of some good ol' music?
What do you call a midget psychic running from the law?
Why are Paris's streets lined with trees?
Did you hear about the cannibal who tried eating his clone?
Buddy: Why don't women want to have sex in the morning?
Why do people wash their clothes in Tide?
Shortest joke ever?
Where do epileptic midgets go for pizza?
What's the difference between menstrual blood and sand?
What's the difference between menstrual fluid and sand?
What's the difference between a Volvo and a Mercedes?
What do you call that useless skin around the penis?
What do you call a former lacrosse player?
What sport is played in Spanish churches?
How do you make a cat go 'woof'?
What do you call an Optomitrist who is very highly thought of in his community?
What is written on Ronald McDonald's gravestone?
Hear about the first Polish athlete to win an Olympic gold medal?
What's the difference between you and Dick Clark?
What's the difference between toilet paper and the shower curtain?
What's good on pizza, but not on pussy?
Jason Russel's been caught masturbating in public?
Why does everyone hate Harkonnen web-devs?
How do you make a space party?
My pick-up line used to be "Hey babe, I'm a hotspot. Wanna log-on"?
What's the difference between a blonde and a washing machine?
Q: how can you tell it is almost St. Patrick's day?
What's Irish and never comes inside?
Why does Reddit hate Pilipinos?
Did you hear about the agnostic dyslexic?
Why won't men perform oral on women the morning after sex?
Donkey kong, king kong, and a smart blonde fight on top of the empire state building. Who wins?
Who is Joseph Kony's favorite rapper?
What did the midget say in the crowded elevator?
What did the samurai do...?
what's the difference between a condom and your mother?
What do you call a guy with no legs at your front door?
What do you get when you watch 'Cinderella' backwards?
Did you hear about the married Amish woman having an affair?
what did one lesbian vampire say to the other?
Why do Irishmen hate Kia?
Why do Apple computer users always tell sexist jokes?
what do bad sex and the heimlich maneuver have in common?
What does watching golf and a giant spinning dildo have in common?
Why are the buses in London red?
Why don't women need to go to college?
Did you guys hear the one about the mascara and the lipstick?
What do 9 out of 10 people call a good time?
What do you call a helicopter with no radar and no windows?
what do you call a sleep-walking nun?
What do you call people who rely on the "safe period" for contraception?
What do you call it when Kony drinks too much?
what was Hitler's favourite drink?
Did you guys hear about the C++ developer that wanted to become a famous actor?
Why did email come easy to the lumberjack?
Why did the accountant go crazy?
What do you call a group of African superheroes?
How did the 3 legged frog get across the 4 lane freeway?
Why did the former porn actor get fired from his job as a gas station attendant?
what do hookers and guns have in common?
What's the difference between Santa Claus & Michael Jackson?
How do dinosaurs smell?
What's the difference between an Irish Funeral and an Irish Wedding?
What does David Bowie do after he gets out of the swimming pool?
What did the Earth say to the Earthquake?
How can you tell when a mechanic just had sex?
Did you hear about the farmer's daughter who was sent home from the county fair?
What is Pedobear's favorite time of the day?
What do you call a black neurosurgeon?
What did the tampon say to the other?
have i ever told you your smile reminds me of a song?
What do you call when a female physicist decides to try dating women for a change?
Why do black people have such big dicks?
How many Tourette's syndrome sufferers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do black coffee and Ginger Baker have in common?
What do you call a musician who breaks up with his girlfriend?
What did the doctor call his new metal band?
How do you make a gay guy fuck a woman?
What do Michael Jackson and Santa Claus have in common?
What happens when you give a politician Viagra?
What's the best thing about getting Reddit at a young age?
What did the hippie say when I asked him to leave my house?
What's the hottest thing in China right now?
How do you get a musician off of your porch?
What's the difference between heroin and the cast of the jersey shore?
What did the Buddhist say to the Hot-Dog vendor?
What's the difference between a musician and a large pizza?
Guess who I bumped into today at the opticians?
What do you have when there's balls on your chest?
Where do sperm go to die when you jack off?
How do you know when spring is here?
What do you call a Honry Micheal J Fox?
What is the difference between Coors Light and a lake?
Why was the detective excited when he found a thimble sized crown?
What Is Difference Between Bomb And Condom.?
What do bees who are allergic to honey get?
Why do women get periods?
What's the difference between a tornado and a divorce in the south?
Why can't you hear my grandma when she's taking a piss?
What do Jews call a lone rabbit?
What's the worst thing about eating vegetables?
How do you define necrophilia?
How is giving oral sex similar to smoking a cigarette?
Whats the worst part about a threesome?
Anyone know any good Batman and Robbin jokes?
Did you hear Helen Keller was an atheist?
What do princess Diana and pink Floyd have in common?
Why did the hipster die?
Whats up r/jokes?
What do you call piss from the continent?
Why do women get yeast infections?
Q: Why did the easter egg hide?
What kind of bird is the best pornstar?
What's brown, and rhymes with snoop?
What do you call a Mexican Miget?
Do you know why there are no jokes about the Jonestown Massacre?
Whats the difference between a tribe of pygmies and a women's track team?
What are children generally better at then adults?
How do rabbits fly?
How do you make a 4 year old girl cry twice?
What do you call a black guy who fly's a plane for a living?
Why did the man snort Dr. Pepper?
Why do we need to go to college?
Subreddit for cleanjokes?
Q: What happens when you eat bullets?
Why did the boy drop his ice cream cone?
What's Ja Rule's favorite type of bread?
What did Michael Jackson say at the bank?
Did you hear about the man who got his entire left side of his body mauled off by a bear?
What did constipated Yoda say to his fecal impaction?
Why are Women like buses?
How many skateboarders does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
You know what they say about prostitution?
What is orange and hangs in my backyard?
What did the baby seal order for lunch?
What's your favourite colour?
What's the ratio of an igloo's circumference to its diameter?
Why did the pedophile cross the road?
How does a mermaid give a man head?
What's Mitt Romney's favorite make of vehicle?
What is the difference between a Ritz cracker and a lesbian?
Did you hear about the eagle that performed a piano concerto?
Why did the male feminist take a cold shower?
What is a ginger author doing when they plant a misleading clue in their book?
Favourite one-liner?
What's the difference between 10 dead hookers and a Porsche?
What kind of file do you need to turn a 8mm hole into a 40mm hole?
Did you hear the Energizer bunny got arrested?
What's the difference between a feminist and a dentist's drill?
What does a nine-volt battery and a woman's asshole have in common?
Why did the worker at the M&M factory get fired?
Why is money green?
When did you stop beating your wife?
What's the difference between a job and a wife?
What's white, big and could kill you if it fell out of a tree?
Did you hear about the pathological liar who went to see the doctor for constipation?
Why is a divorce so expensive?
Why did Farmer John let his grapes go dry?
What concert only costs 45 cents?
Whats the difference between a prostitute and a bowling ball?
What does an airplane and a female have in common?
What do Whitney Houston and Michael Jackson have in common?
Why did Hitler have a vitamin C deficiency?
Why did hitler get an A in chemistry?
Where did William Tell take his garbage?
What's smokey the bear's middle name?
How are women and cigarettes similar?
What did Whitney Houston's coroner say as he unbuckled his belt?
What's the worst thing about challenging an unjust law?
What did the couch say to the armchair?
What's a bicyclists favorite letter?
Why do blonde girls have bruises on their belly buttons?
Why does it take so long for a pro-lifer to screw in a lightbulb?
What's your favorite blonde joke?
Why did Mozart hate chickens?
What do you call a guy with no arms and no legs in a pool?
What's the difference between Whitney Houston and Amy Winehouse?
What's the difference between Whitney Houston and Houston, TX?
What was Whitney Houston's biggest hit?
Why was the girl stuck in the revolving door for two weeks?
Did you hear about the jewish guy?
What do Whitney Houston and Antarctica have in common?
What do you call a grammatically incorrect horse?
What is the difference between my car and Whitney Houston?
What the difference between Jelly and Jam?
What is 6" long and not getting sucked this Valentine's day?
Where does Charlie Sheen shop?
What is a bear after it is 10 years old?
What's something a kangaroo has that no other animal has?
What's the difference between Whitney houston and my car?
What do a slinky and your mother in law have in common?
What should you do if you're in the jungle and come upon a tiger?
What is the leading cause of pedophilia in America?
what do you call a communist in a hurry?
What do you call a large predatory bird with poor social skills?
What's a control freaks favorite macro?
What do you call a square peg that wonders if it could plug a round hole?
Did you hear about the circus fire in your area recently?
What's the difference between Ozzy Osborne and Whitney Houston?
What is Pink and lies on the doormat?
What's the difference between Whitney Houston and my car?
What do you call the person that cleans the Mafia's hotel rooms?
What happens when you mix roofies and Viagra?
What do you get when you cross a squirrel with a Hummer?
Is syphilis forever?
What's the difference between a woman with PMS and a terrorist?
How many black guys does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call rich Mexicans?
What's the difference between a horse?
What would Kim Jong-Il be doing if he was still alive today?
What do sperm and politicians have in common?
why should you never sleep with a female beekeper?
Why is Yoda Programming full of exceptions ?
What does being questioned by interpol have in common with cunnilingus?
How many musos does it take to change a lightbulb?
Are you going to buy something this time? Or are you "just curious"?
What is the name of a bag pipe band that likes to play while jumping on squares?
What do you get when you cross an elephant and a rhinoceros?
Did you hear about the man with the five penises?
What does a cyborg order at a diner?
What's the difference between Saddam Hussein and Sperm?
Know how much a pirate pays for corn?
What did the father buffalo say when his son went off to college?
What do you call a fish with diarrhea?
Why aren't there any Mexican astronauts?
What is Green and Oblong?
What's worse than a bee sting?
How did the pig get to the hospital?
How can you tell if the kid that stole your bike is half black and half polish?
What's worse than eating out your grandmother?
Did you hear about the bear that fell into water and disappeared?
Q: Why are the citizens of Damascus so solemn when talking about oil?
How many Potatoes does it take to kill an Irishman?
How do you call it when a girl kicks a boy in the groin during the first date?
Did you hear about the hipster who burnt his tongue?
What are the four fastest hands in the world?
Why is crack a "Rock"?
What's it called when an Asian man gives his best friend head?
Why did the farmer sit on a cock ?
What do organic mathematicians throw into their fireplaces?
How do I know we are going to have sex tonight?
So, did you hear the one about the constipated mathematician?
What do you call a guy with a toe growing out of his knee?
What's grey, has one leg, sits at the end of your bed and takes the piss out of you?
Why did the Sheikh cross the road?
What's the difference between a Greyhound station & a Crab with boobs?
What do you call a girl who's sitting in the middle of a tennis court?
What happened to the horse that ate a duracell battery?
New subreddit. Anyone interested in humour in French/French humour?
What's worse than a lobster on your piano?
What is the sound of a homophobic magician?
How can you tell the toothbrush was invented in West Virginia?
Whats the best part of fuckin a pregnant woman?
What kind of concert costs 45cents?
Why did the girl fall out of the swing?
What do you call a all female flight crew?
What did the Pope say when he first saw the Shroud of Turin?
What did Kim Jong Il call his Kindle?
How many Alzheimer's patients does it take to screw in a lightbulb...?
How can you tell if someone uses Apple products?
What do you call a Rastafarian Police Officer?
Why did the prostitute had a second vagina transplanted on her hip?
Why don't lobsters share their dinner?
So Twilight jokes - What does a vampire call a used tampon?
Why did Princess Diana Cross the Road?
How many dubstep fans does it take to clean a shower?
What's the difference between Tiger Woods and Princess Diana?
What does Canadian Fonzie say?
How do you stop a small dog from humping your leg?
Why doesn't Jesus eat M&M's?
Why does Lebron James drive automatic?
What do sea mammals say when something happens against their kind?
Hear about the farmer that stepped on a rake?
Why do fat girls give great head?
How did the white girl get pregnant?
[One liner] How do you make an archaeolgist mad?
What noise does a ceiling fan make?
What did the guy Zebra say to the girl Zebra?
How many performance artists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call pasta sex?
how do you tell the difference between an extroverted engineer and an introverted engineer?
Why do Germans make such good cars?
Where do people with one leg work at?
What's your best limerick?
What is French Super Mario's favorite board game?
Why did a scarecrow win a Nobel prize?
What did the guy with 6 children say to the guy with six felonies?
Whats the opposite of progress?
How can you tell if you're in Detroit or across the river in Windsor Ontario Canada?
What did the pirate say after he pulled a steering wheel out of his pants?
Why was Hitler so obsessed about getting into heaven?
How do you know a black woman is pregnant?
What's the difference between Bud Light and piss?
What do you call a pissed-off Founding Father?
What is gray, has a trunk, and big ears?
What do Nascar and a Kinko's dumpster have in common?
What concert can you get in with just 45 cents?
What's an otaku's favorite transition metal?
How is Bud Light like sex on the beach?
How can you tell baseball players are smarter than football players?
What's the difference between a lawyer and whore?
What do you call an Indian dating service?
Why are so many Germans into scat?
Why did God kick Joe Paterno out of Heaven?
What's white and crawls up your leg?
What's the difference between a hockey team and a Russian woman?
How do you get an 80 year-old woman to swear?
How many Russians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Hey, what's the difference between reddit and LOTR?
What is the most exciting sport in the world?
what did mick jagger say when he caught hugh hefner and dennis weaver in the bedroom together?
How come NASCAR drivers don't get along with each other?
How do you get an elephant out of a Safeway?
Whats 10 inches?
Did you hear about the giant that threw up?
Have you heard the watermelon joke?
Hear about the oriental tailor that got arrested for being too arrogant with his customers?
What do you call a urinary tract infection caused in a virgin?
Which French novelist looked like a scrotum?
What do you call an Irishman with no arms and no legs on a pool table?
Why was the hipster sweating?
What did Helen Keller name her dog?
What did Picard say to Riker when the knitting machine wouldn't print single digits?
Did you hear about the Chinese-German restaurant?
Why are Jew's noses so big?
What's the difference between soap and SOPA?
What did the Mexican Firefighter name his two children?
How many irish men does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a dead baby floating in the middle of the ocean?
Do you know why they put cotton balls in the top of prescription bottles?
How do you catch a polar bear?
Did you hear the one about the deaf kid?
How do you upset a plumber?
What do you call white grand parents?
What's pink, bubbling and tapping on glass?
What is made of wood and sticky?
What to Australian Trains use as fuel?
When does the narwhal bacon?
What has wheels and is green?
What was the aardvark's favorite Lady Gaga song?
How do you stop a baby from crawling in a circle?
Why do bicycles fall over?
What was the smoking bee full of?
What do Shakespearian Buddhists eat for breakfast?
Whats big and green and if it falls out of a tree it will kill you?
How do you find Will Smith after a snowstorm?
What did the left nut say to the right nut?
Who was Michael Jackson?
How do you fit an elephant in a thimble?
What does GOP mean?
Vintage Joke: What's yellow and writes?
Want to hear a joke about the Nazis?
What's a thesaurus's favorite cereal?
What did the Vietnamese architect say to the Chinese post man?
What did the sushi say to the bee?
What's the difference between a bad archer, and a constipated owl?
what did the ocean say to the other ocean ?
Did you hear about the wooden car with the wooden engine and wooden wheels?
How does an engineer screw a light-bulb?
If two wrongs do not make a right, What do two rights make?
What is Santa Claus' favorite metal band?
How can you tell if a potato is baked?
How do you make Holy water?
What was left in the bathroom on the starship Enterprise?
What do a frozen beer, a burnt pizza, and a pregnant girl have in common?
Why was the young strawberry crying?
What do you call a stork that doesn't bring babies?
What is the difference between an oil painting and Jesus?
Did you hear about the agnostic insomniac with tourettes?
What's the difference between James Dean and Jimmy Dean?
What's the difference between a lesbian and a sperm whale?
What's the most common blood type in Canada?
Why was Aron Ralston arrested by the FBI?
What is ET short for?
What did the tree say to the math teacher?
What's the difference between a Genealogist and a gynecologist?
Is it okay to kiss a nun?
What's the worst part of locking your keys in your car at an abortion clinic?
How many Tourette's sufferers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why don't Junior League debutantes engage in group sex?
What is the hardeast part about eating vegetables?
Have you heard the new hipster joke?
What's the difference between a toddler and a handgun?
What did one train track say to the opposite track?
Anybody wanna play Pearl Harbour?
What's the difference between Andrew Dice Clay and a nintendo cartridge?
Did you hear about the hipster compound?
What do worms and girls have in common?
Why should you never trust a whale with your secrets?
What did the midget get when he ran under the strippers legs?
Are you fu*** crazy?
Anybody Home?
What's harder than beating Alabama twice?
What did the male elephant say to his buddy when a female elephant passed by?
How many teamsters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What did the Egyptian boy say to the Egyptian girl?
Why did the newspaper cross the street?
What do a 14 year old and an open bucket of bleach have in common?
Why does Michael J Fox make the best milkshakes?
What do you call it when a cow goes on holiday?
How do you know when your at a gay barbecue?
What do yeast and a redneck have in common?
What's the similarity between free healthcare and good jokes?
How much coke can Charlie Sheen do?
How many aspiring actresses does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What's the temperature inside a tauntaun?
What do a pizza guy and a gynecologist have in common?
Why do little girls carry goldfish in their pockets?
What did the dope dealer say after he got a colonic?
What should you do with a burning Kotex?
What kind of soda did Moses drink?
What do you call it when you think deeply about something you just saw on reddit?
[SKYRIM JOKE] Why didn't the Nords win the theater audition?
Why did the hipster decide to drown himself in the tributary?
Did you guys hear about the butcher who backed up into his meat grinder?
How do you make antifreeze?
Can a cigar box?
Why was the lifeguard unable to save the hippie from drowning in the ocean?
What is a ninja's favorite beverage?
what do you call a closet full of lesbians?
Can someone give me an arrow?
What time do Lumberjacks take their tea-break?
What did the first lesbian vampire say to the second lesbian vampire?
How many Chuck Norris' does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do you call a big trash can?
What do prisoners use to call each other?
What's the best thing about fucking a transvestite?
What do you call a same-sex lion orgy?
What happened to the dwarf who walked between a lady's legs?
Just made this up. What did one cannibal-rapist say to the other?
Did you hear about the procrastinating dictator?
What's the difference between a porcupine and a Mercedes?
What does a redneck say for foreplay?
What's the difference between Michael Jackson and a newspaper bag?
Q: What's the difference between a lawyer and a bucket of dirt?
What's your new years resolution?
What's a priests least favorite thing about New Years?
What do you need to teach a blonde who never had an accident in 20 years?
What do you say to a woman with no arms or legs?
What did the blind paraplegic child get for Christmas?
why did Princess Diana cross the road?
Whhat do jellybeans and the world have in common?
Why do black people like the NBA?
What did the mexican say to the Highlander?
What do you call someone who stands on the left side of an escalator?
What did they call Fireman Sam after he retired?
What did they call Postman Pat after he retired?
What's Sad About Lunch in Ethiopia?
What's Beethoven's favourite fruit?
How do you know when a black woman is pregnant?
What do you call a gigolo donkey?
Why do blondes prefer the pill instead the condom?
Q. What's brown and sticky?
What is the difference between an ornithologist and a stutterer?
Did you hear about the elephant that orgasmed?
What is today's best punch line?
What is the painless frequency?
Where's the red light district in Toronto?
What would the Reddit political party be called?
How does loose leaf watch TV?
How do you circumsize a blue whale?
Why is Dublin the capital of Ireland?
What has got two legs and bleeds?
A woman gets hit by a truck. Who's fault is it?
What is the hardest part in coming out of the closet?
what's the difference between peanut butter and jam?
Whats the difference between a Jewish and a Black person?
Whats the difference between Santa and Tiger Woods?
Why is Christmas just like a day at the office ?
The difference between a greyhound station and a lobster with a boob job?
What's the difference between an epileptic clamshell-shucker and a prostitute with diarrhea?
The difference between a girl in church and a girl in the bathtub?
The difference between an epileptic oyster sucker and a hooker with diarrhea?
What did Adam say on the day before Christmas?
I asked my wife what she wanted for Christmas?
What's Helen Keller's favorite color?
How do you know a black guy's been at your computer?
What's the difference between a snow-man and a snow-woman?
What did the fat cat go to prison for?
What goes “Vroom!..screech..Vroom!..screech”?
Why does Snoop Dogg carry an umbrella with him everywhere?
how is Duct Tape like The Force?
What is the best way to circumcize a redneck?
What is the first thing a woman should do when she gets out of the Battered Women's Shelter?
What's the only type of seafood that Sean Connery won't share?
What's the latest pick-up line at gay bays?
How did the mathematician treat his constipation?
What's the darkest joke you know? No limits who can disgust me the most?
What was Ghandi?
What do you call a group of physicians with erectile dysfunction?
What is a pedophile's favorite part of Christmas?
how can you make a blonde laugh on a Sunday?
What do you call an irritated nerd?
How many letters are in the alphabet during the Christmas Season?
Why are programmers so consumeristic?
What kind of car does a rich shepherd drive?
What is the difference between a pub and an elephant fart?
Why did Kim Jong-il die a week before December 25th?
-What do you think I should buy, a cow or a bike?
How many alternative school kids does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What's long and hard and screws people?
How do you LOL in N. Korea?
Does anybody here own a five-foot penguin?
Kim Jong il is dead?
Osama, Ghaddafi, and Kim Jong Il?
Why is a violin difficult to play?
Why was Yoda afraid of the number Seven ... ?
What is the best day to wear an asshat?
What's the difference between a French kiss and an Australian kiss?
What's big, green and if it falls out of a tree it will kill you?
Why can't you take a pig out on a date?
What is green and sings?
What do you get when you cross a Jehovah's Witness with a Unitarian?
Can little girls have babies?
What do you get when you cross a rooster with a jar of peanut butter?
Whats the best thing about being addicted to speed?
Why does Barbie never get pregnant?
Best thing about being a hermit?
Whats the difference between an Irish Party and an Irish Funeral?
What's the definition of relative humidity?
What did the newsletter say to the other newsletter when he asked for help?
Anyone else think Mexican and African jokes are pretty much all the same?
Why couldn't Frodo drop the Ring into Mt. Doom?
Why was the pedophile so excited by 23 year olds?
Why Doesn't Santa Have Any Kids?
Who is Ed McMahon's favorite Japanese Filmmaker?
Which president was famous for his long pauses?
What's the definition of mixed emotions?
What's the motto of the Greek army?
Have you heard about the Occupy - Treasury movement?
What do you get when you put a bunch of roosters into a compactor?
What do you call an intoxicated midget?
How does constipation work?
If Mississippi gave Missouri her New Jersey, what would Delaware?
What's the difference between karate and judo?
Why can't Polack women use vibrators?
What do you call a woman who knows where her husband is every night?
Why did Abe Lincoln and Stephen Douglas get thrown out of the church?
what's big, black and looks good on a lawyer's neck?
Did you here about the guy who turned to Scientologists to escape his past?
What do you call a cross between a turducken and a tofurkey?
Anybody know some white people jokes?
What did the mexican say when a development fell on him?
What do you call fapping to dubstep?
What was the top item on Hitler's grocery list?
How Does Moses Make His Tea?
What do Japanese men do when they have an erection?
How can you tell when it's time to go to bed at Michael Jacksons house?
Why did the tomato turn red?
What did the blondes left leg say to her right?
What do you call a pedophile with a thesaurus?
The Week Off?
Where do you find a dog with no arms or legs?
What's the difference between normal sex and anal sex?
What do you call an airplane's cockpit if it's staffed by female pilots?
What's the difference between the 7 dwarfs and a girl's high school track team?
How can you tell if a woman's had an orgasm?
Dead Baby Jokes?
Did you hear about the single-engine plane that crashed into a Polish cemetary?
What is Green, Slimy, and smells like Bacon?
What do call you someone who feeds on comatose patients and pizza?
How's your sex life?
What do shingles and fat white women have in common?
What do you call a paedophile with no legs?
Why does Snoop Dogg carry an umbrella everywhere he goes?
Why couldn't the penguin turn around in the phone booth?
Is this how you reddit ?
Why do you call these girls broads?
What was the name of the pharao that screwed everything up?
Who's the founder of the Japanese Wikipedia?
Did anyone lose a roll of twenties wrapped in a rubberband?
What did one TCP packet say to the other TCP packet?
Where do you find a one legged cow?
Why did Clemson choose orange as its team color?
What does a horse and kryptonite have in common?
Did you hear the one about the sprinkler that tried to spray a man in the eye?
why did the lion win the race?
What does an eighty year old woman have in between her boobs that a twenty year old woman doesn't?
Why do seagulls only fly over the sea?
What do gays and melons have in common?
Q:What is the only NFL team whose players have undergone a sex change operation?
Whats a Plumber's favorite vegetable?
Why did the Frenchman not want two eggs?
What is love? The energy of life. What is marriage?
Heard about the girl who took a contraceptive pill with pond water?
What do two sushi say after one tells a lame joke?
what's the height of trust?
Whats Irish and stays out all night?
Wanna hear a joke about my cawk?
What do you called being pepper sprayed at UC Davis?
Why do Irish women have small nipples?
Q: What do you call a country bumpkin from Michigan's Upper Peninsula?
What's a 6.9?
Did you hear about the Native American chief who drank 50 gallons of Earl Grey?
What's the difference between a boomerang and my father?
What did the thunder say when it understood the joke?
What do you call a sober Irishman?
Why are lawyers always buried 15 feet deep?
What's red and white and red, red and white and red and white?
Why did I buy a bolt?
Why do waitresses hate mohels?
What do you call a cow woth a twitch?
What has a million legs but can't walk?
Q: What's the best language to describe the hectic holiday shopping season?
What's the proper procedure when witnessing someone having a seizure in a bathtub?
Did you hear about the new HBO series that investigates gambling in sports?
Q: What's the best sport to learn when you are moving?
What is the difference between dog shit and black people?
What's the difference between the Rolling Stones and a Scottsman?
What does the last man on earth watch on tv?
A Greek, an Irishman and a Portuguese spend the evening drinking in a bar. Who picks up the tab?
What did the cake say to the Pie?
what did one snowman say to the other?
Why are fat people like relationships?
What did the mathematician say while golfing?
What did one hat say to the other?
What is a rude way of referring to a young homosexual fly?
What do i have in Common with neutrinos?
Do you know any martial arts?
What do you call a short psychic who hasn't yet been apprehended?
Why do meth heads love Halloween?
What did the mexican get on his SAT's?
Guys can we please stop making jokes about obesity?
What do you call a Polish airplane?
What does a Scotsman wear under his kilt?
Why did F'' (F double prime) have to go to the dentist?
Why do chicken coops only have 2 doors?
Did you hear about the new Jewish Sports Car?
Why did the duck get arrested?
Whats the difference between a black guy and a snow tire?
What is your favorite "My dick is so big.." joke?
Why can't women ski?
How many Nickelback fans does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Did you hear about that mad cow disease?
Where do Eggs keep their holidays pictures?
Did you hear about the hippie who got lost at sea?
How's Terry Fox like Jack Layton?
Why did the protester cross the road?
How many women does it take to bring down Herman Cain?
Why couldn't the kid get in to see the pirate movie?
What do they call helium, neon, argon,krypton on the REALLY COLD planet?
Did u hear about the leper poker game?
what's invisible and smells like carrots?
Seriously though, why can't you put the punchline in the title?
What does a redditer say when he reads a joke on r/jokes?
What does Sigmund Freud say comes between fear and sex?
What is this compound?
Why don't women wear watches?
What is the punishment for bigamy?
Why do women parachutists wear cups?
What's warm, white, and I drink almost every night?
What do you call a Mexican Buddhist?
How many men does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Why did Michael Jackson love Beethoven's 3rd symphony?
Why was Steve Jobbs funeral an open casket?
What do you call a woman with her tongue out?
How do you turn a washing machine into a snowblower?
How do you hit 20 flies in one shot?
What is the worst part of being both black and jewish?
Need a Polygon ?
What's the difference between Jews and Pizzas?
What’s the worst part of locking your keys in your car at an abortion clinic parking lot?
How many dub-step artists does it take to clean a bathtub?
What do Jews in Nazi Germany and children at Penn State have in common?
What do you call a prostitute with her hands down her pants?
What do you call a teenage cheese cracker?
What does NNNNNSSSSSAAAAA stand for?
What 20th century composer would make the best bartender?
Did you hear about the mexican that went to college?
How do you know if a Muslim is laughing online?
What did the Chinese man say when Winter came around?
What does Chris Brown tell his friends when he sees Rihanna at a party?
John's mother in-law comes for a visit. So, how long will you stay,mom?
What is the difference between a gay man and a refrigerator?
What's the difference between a dwarf and an STD?
Hey, you know that Outback Steakhouse down the road?
What do Sarah Palin and Iron Man have in common?
What do you call a black pilot ?
Why didn't Natalie Wood take a shower on the boat?
Why did only 2 Mexicans cross the border?
What is a Mexican's favorite bookstore?
Why was the pig in the kitchen?
Daisy who?
How many people does it take to screw in a light?
Why was Jimmy Glasscock bad at hide and seek?
Did you pay the VISA bill?
Jew or Gipsy?
What do canola oil and some abortions have in common?
What do you call a lesbian with long fingers?
How can you tell if your roommate is gay?
Why do nice guys make good lovers?
Why did Kanye West blow up the bakery?
Did you know Hitler didn't like to eat meat?
What did the egg say to the boiler water?
What is the difference between a Mother and Wife?
What's the best thing about kids?
Why Does Paris Hilton Have a Chihuahua?
What do you get for stealing a slut's vegetables?
What do you call a crappy business man?
What would you call the mailman if he got fired?
How is Sandusky like a tortoise?
You ate some space food?
Q: What do you get Devin Hester for Christmas??
Why is Santa Claus always so happy?
How can you make a small fortune?
What do you call a man with no arms and no legs, lying in a ditch?
Similarities between Scruff McGruff's police force and Michael Vick?
How do you know when there's a lead singer on your porch?
What's the difference between a sliced up body and a new BMW?
What do you call a cow that has had an abortion?
How many members of an ethnicity does it take to perform a specified task?
What do you have to bring if you visit r/nsfw_gifs?
What do you call a girl with anorexia and a yeast infection?
What do you get when you plant a loaf of bread?
What's the most common owl in Britain?
Why buy an invisible knife?
How many pirates does it take to screw in a lightbulb in China?
What's the hardest part about riding a scooter?
What is Jesus' favorite workout?
What do you call a group of environmentalists in jail?
What do you get when you cross an ape with a calculator?
What do you call an older man who goes after young boys?
What did the inn keeper say to the Big Dipper when he asked if he could rent a room?
What kind of pants does mario wear?
What do you call 100,000 Frenchmen with their hands up?
How many defensive coordinators does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How can you tell if you're on a Starcraft diet?
What do Alexander Skarsgard and Ikea have in common?
How is toilet paper and the Starship Enterprise alike?
Why are leggings and sand the same?
What do you get when you combine human DNA with a goats?
Sarah Jessica Parker?
Why does Japan love Obama?
Hey Jerry Sandusky! What's the best thing about sex with twenty nine year olds?
What did the cannibal get when he showed up late to the luncheon?
At what time does Sean Connery like to watch the Williams sisters play?
What do you call a black hipster?
What does Sean Connery surf on the Internet?
Why didn't anyone drive stick in Soviet Russia?
Q: What do you get when you cross a Wurlitzer and a photocopier?
How did cancer order it's fries?
Why have they created sweet tampons?
What's the difference between Shea Stadium and Sloan-Kettering?
What's the difference between Toddlers & Tiaras and a scat fetish?
What does a nerd and a bad baseball player have in common?
Why shouldn't you take rimjob jokes seriously?
How do you make your wife cry when you're having sex?
What do you call a mexican hitchhiker?
What do you call a family of redheads?
Why do you like little kids...?
Who is the coolest person in the hospital?
What do you call five blondes in a pool?
Who takes over when the Ultrasound man is on leave?
Heard about the seafood diet?
What the opposite of progress?
What's grosser than gross?
What kind of bees can you get milk from?
Why did the parrot fall out of the tree?
What do you do if you find a trumpet growing in your scottish garden?
How do you torture Hellen Keller?
Q: What is the last thing a tossed salad says to itself before being devoured by a human?
How many ADD kids does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What does the study of magnetism and self abuse have in common?
How do you call blue cow?
What's the best nation in the world?
What's the most dangerous animal in Africa?
Did you guys hear about the fire at the circus?
How many Apes does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Why does a dog lick his balls?
How many members of a certain demographic group does it take to perform a specified task?
Whats white and salty?
What's long, hard, and full of semen?
What do you do when you see an enemy with half a face?
Why are jack-o-lanterns inbred?
Why don't ghosts have kids?
Why do demons and ghouls hang out together?
There were 100 crows sitting on a wire and a farmer shot 1, how many were left?
Do cats like Deadmau5?
Did you hear they're making a holistic version of Star Wars?
What did the Titanic say to the iceberg?
Did you hear about the farmer who fell in love with his cows milk?
Why did the hipster burn his mouth on his coffee?
What's the difference between an Onion and a Whore?
What did the otter say to his girlfriend?
Why do tachyons program in assembly?
Doctor, doctor, what did you say I had?
what is the height of trust?
Why was Fibonacci afraid of 5?
Did you know that Erwin Schrodinger's funeral was closed casket?
Which popstar cuts down trees?
Whats got wrinkles and hangs out your undies?
What do you call a guy with diarrhea who just had his father committed to the insane asylum?
Did you hear about Michael Vicks new shoe contract?
What did the donut say to the loaf of bread?
Did you know Brian Welch, the former drummer of Korn opened up an Orphanage in India?
why was X afraid of Y?
Why are black men afraid of chainsaw's?
What is black and has two broken arms?
It took us ages to get this joke... Want to have a go?
What do you call it when Hitler pees?
Which kind of shark is also the saddest dog?
Q: Why do rugby fans eat up the sport?
What's an archaeologist?
When does 1+1=3?
Why did the Siamese twins move to England?
Have you heard about these new Oak woord, gold-finished coffins?
What was the score of the lobster soccer game?
Why don't women sleep on the left side of the bed?
What do you call a woodland elf without any connecting plastic bricks to play with?
What's the proper way to pronounce Mormon?
Did you hear about the Bausch & Lomb tech who fell into a giant lens grinder?
whats the difference between cancer and black people?
What do you get if 2 black men sleep in a sleeping bag?
Why is Halloween one of the most popular holidays in West Virginia?
Why was the baby strawberry crying?
What do women and Slinkies have in common?
Whats the difference between Jelly and Jam?
What do you call a deer that has no eyes?
What's the worst thing about your girlfriend having a miscarriage?
You know what's fun to do in Ohio?
No Job ??
What do you call a silent kebab?
How do they play basketball in Mexico?
What's the difference between a toddler and a bag of cocaine?
What is a shoe made out of a Banana called?
Why are Atheists so resistant to video game cheats?
Why does beer go faster through you than milk?
Did you hear about the Wall Street bankers that won the Nobel Peace Prize in Chemistry?
Why do girls wear makeup and perfume ?
Why was the shirt smelly?
What did the otter say to the guy whose ankle he pooped on?
what does a family dentist and a pedophile have in common?
Why do girls wear make up and perfume?
Why does the "forever alone" keep a beehive next to his bed?
Knock Knock. Who's there? Dragon Ball Z. Dragon Ball Z Who?
Whats easier than stealing candy from a baby?
Whats the smartest thing to come out of a womans mouth?
How do you fit an elephant into a subway?
Q: What do you call a group of people who share bathroom facilities?
You hear about the agnostic, dyslexic insomniac?
What kind of jean's do Mario prefer?
How did the set react when it heard about the Russell Paradox?
Why do redditors make such good fencers?
What's the difference between a guitar and an elevator?
Why was the garbage man afraid of the staff at the sex-change clinic?
What did the snail say as she was riding on the back of a turtle?
What's the difference between 9/11 and your birth?
Why did the Time Traveler give Julius Caeser a BJ?
How do you blend in at a bald convention?
Why can't you make fun of Steve Jobs' death?
A man driving a car hits a woman. Who's fault is it?
What is the difference between michael jackson and pimples?
How do black people die from a drive by?
How do you stop an Armenian tank?
TOO SOON?
Did you heard Steve Jobs died?
What did Picasso and Smurfette have in common?
You know the difference between 2 dicks and a joke is?
What do you call a ghost's fart?
What did Hamlet say to his cat?
Mary, did he have any last requests?
What is Ke$ha's favorite candy?
What did the abortionist have for breakfast?
What do you call a baby born in a whorehouse?
How do crazy people get through the forrest?
What do you call a Mesoamerican unicorn?
Did you hear about the duck that got thrown away?
Q: What is worse than finding a worm in your apple?
How does Sean Connery find his way to the toilet?
What do Hillbillies do on Halloween?
How do you get the drummer off your front porch?
Why did the trio of Mexicans get arrested?
What's green, slimy and smells like pork?
How come you never see elephants hiding up trees?
how do you confuse a masterbator?
I lost a pop quiz last night. The question was: where do women mostly have curly hair?
Where does Sean Connery put his beard clippings?
What did Keanu Reeves say to slow down his horse?
Why won't Goldilocks drink a glass of water with eight pieces of ice in it?
Q. How many black people does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
what do you get when you call a subreddit "jokes" and have more than 21 000 readers?
How do you get two elephants into a refrigerator?
What's the latest big thing to sweep across Japan?
Why did the women's studies major go to college?
How do you spell 'way' with an 'f'?
What did the man order at the Indian restaurant?
Why did the boy jump off the dock?
How do aliens stay warm?
What do you do when a Chemist dies?
I think this is a repost. Why did Lady Diana cross the road?
What does a blender full of dead babies sound like?
What would you tell someone who is attempting to steal your cheese (hint: not "nacho cheese")?
What do you call a seven course Irish meal?
What do you call an Irish guy with no arms and no legs hanging out on your front porch?
Why do they call them "roach clips"?
What is the worst joke in philosophy?
Why was the animal unhappy?
What's pun plus pun?
What happened when the lepers played poker?
What do you call a stoner dinosaur?
What do anal sex and vegetables have in common?
How do you call two guys on a motocycle?
Did you hear about the guy who thought his dishwasher was talking to him?
What's a pirate's favorite letter in the alphabet?
If you could eliminate one entire race off of the face of the planet, which would you choose?
Why can't a bike stand on it's own?
What's the pirate movie rated?
What do you call a Woman who can balance 3 pints of Lager on her head?
What kind of workout does Bob the electrician do?
How do you make five pounds of fat look sexy?
What's a French egg's favourite airforce?
What do you call a row of boxers?
What kind of Bee is full of milk?
Why did the blond climb over the glass wall?
How many libertarians?
How come Jesus could never play for the Blackhawks?
Jimmy has 36 candy bars, and he eats 28. What does Jimmy have?
What happened to the gay wizard?
What do I call my pasta friend?
USDA steak inspector?
Look, a reindeer. Santa, is that you?
What music do girls on their periods listen to?
What do you call a dog with no legs and balls of steal?
What is the difference between a sandwich and a baby?
What do you call a condom within a condom?
What did the Leper say to the Prostitute?
What do you get if you cross an elephant with a rhino?
Why Do Republican Couples Keep A Copy Of Ronald Reagan's Biography Next To Their Bed?
Why couldn't the pig run?
What did Reddit say to his elderly mother when he tried to take her to a home?
What's pink and hard?
Is sex without obligations possible after getting married?
Knock-Knock, Whose There?
What's six feet tall , silver and stands at the end of kids beds?
Reddit, what is your best cheesy joke?
What can you tell your dog but not your girlfriend?
What do you do when you find Michael J. Fox in your hot tub?
did you hear about the circus fire?
How did hipster kid hurt himself?
You hear about the fishing prostitute ?
Did you hear about the latest thing affected by recession?
Do You have a book called, Husband, the master of Wife ?
What do you call a bear that likes men when it's happy and women when it's sad?
Why did the pedophile get a job at the bakery?
What do you give and take at the same time?
What did a lesbian frog tell another lesbian frog?
What do Mike Piazza, and an altar boy have in common?
5 Dicks!?
Have you ever tried to peel apart a grilled cheese sandwich?
What's the Islamist term for acceptable internet humor?
do you know why its called pms?
What do you say when only the egg remains?
Have you heard about the masochist who likes taking a cold shower every morning?
Do you know what's réally tiring../?
Did you guys hear the one about the circus fire?
What's the difference between the 9/11 attack and a dairy cow?
Who was the chicken's favorite composer?
Why did the man with acute bronchitis go on holiday?
What did the llama said to the other llama?
Doctor: I have some bad news. You HAVE to stop masturbating. Man: OMG Doc, WHY?
What's green and has 4 wheels?
What do many Asian guys have that's hairy, got two balls, and is smaller than average?
What's the difference between a blonde and an Airbus A380?
How did the hipster burn his hand?
Whats the most insensitive spot on a man's penis?
How many feminist does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What do they call mosquitoes in Pakistan?
What do going down on a girl and talking to the mafia have in common?
Where do you find a zebra?
What's the difference between sex and golf?
How many dragon ball Z characters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you call a T-Rex with tourettes?
Q: How many apples grow on a tree?
Want to hear a joke about sodium?
Whats the difference between a watermelon and baby?
What does a fish say when it hits a brick wall?
Why wouldn't the two tampons speak to each other?
What's the second hardest thing in the morning?
What is the medical name for the operation that changes a person's sex from female to male?
What do you call an exploding monkey?
What is the difference between a dog thermometer and a human thermometer?
What do nine out of ten people like?
What did T-Rex say after doing yoga for the first time?
Why don't blind people like to go skydiving?
What is a Nuclear Physicist's favourite meal?
What's the difference between a Friend and a Punjabi Friend?
why did princess Diana cross the road?
Why do girls get so moody when they're on their periods?
What do Michael Jackson and caviar have in common?
What does a gynecologist and a pizza boy have in common?
Why don't black people listen to country music?
What did Zach De La Rocha bring home from the beach?
What do you call a kid with one arm and three legs?
What did the Zero say to the Eight?
What is a male porn actor's favorite one hit wonder song?
Why did the pregnant girl struggle so much with grammar?
What do Apple and the US economy have in common now?
What do a coffee pot, Irene, and the reigning Stanley Cup champions have in common?
What do Hurricane Irene and Kim Kardashian have in common?
What do you use to clear the air of stupid?
How long can a frog hold its breath underwater?
What was Beethoven's favorite food?
What did one guy at a gay bar say to the other guy?
For the english - What do you call a girl with 2 cunts?
Why was the horse happy to come home after being released from the hospital?
Why can't moccasins play the blues?
Which nation doesn't do what it's supposed to do until it's too late?
Which real-life dictator was the most fun?
What's more impressive than the talking dragon?
How is masturbation and brain damage similar?
Anyone here know of Gaddafi?
What do you call a group of Japanese people running up a hill?
Why couldn't the hipsters save the hippies?
Why do Christian bands only record with Pro Tools?
Why did the U.S. invade Panama?
How does a one armed man row a boat?
Did you hear about the earthquake?
What do pirates use to copy files?
What do you call a cow with 2 legs?
What do you call a monkey in a suit?
What's a composer's favourite childhood game?
Why is chili so annoying?
Did you hear about the soldier who had the entire left side of his body blown off?
How do you make a nun pregnant?
How do you get a blonde pregnant?
Did you hear the one about the blind prostitute?
How do you know a chinese thief has broken into your house?
What will a blind, deaf child with no arms get for Christmas?
What did the tomato say to the peach?
What do you call a cow without legs?
English joke - What's another name for Santa's elves?
Did you hear about the bedbug?
What do you get if you squeeze a synagogue?
How did the hipster burn his fingertips?
Did you hear about the bloke who poisoned his wife with a razor blade?
Q: Why did Hitler cry when he got to heaven?
What's big, green, fuzzy, has four legs, and will kill you if it falls out of a tree?
What do you call a black woman with 8 abortions?
Has the airplane joke been posted yet?
What do you call a black man who fly's a plane?
What do you call more than two English blokes masturbating?
Who's Irish and lives in your back yard?
Why did the tiger get lost in the jungle?
What's the difference between batman and a blackman?
(OL) What's the difference between a bucket of poop and a lawyer?
What's hard and hairy and sticks out of your pajamas at night?
What's the best thing about having sex with forty two year olds?
What did the little boy with no arms and legs get for Christmas?
What Is The Best Boxing A Mexican Does?
What do you call a group of Vigilante Aussie Nuns?
What were the Virgin Islands called, after Chuck Norris visited them?
How many ears does Captain Kirk have?
What is the difference between a computer and a woman?
Q: How many Orthodox Rabbis does it take to change a light bulb?
What type of shoes does a ninja wear?
What do a plum and an elephant have in common?
What do chemists say when they smell something that they don't like?
What is the common enemy of frostbite victims and dairy products?
What did the river say when it saw the beavers?
What's black, blue, and hates sex?
What's long, dark, and stinks?
What's better than a tall woman wrapping her legs around you?
What's Brown and Sticky?
What's 18 inches long and makes women scream all night?
Whats the difference between Sarah Palins mouth and her vagina?
What do you get if you cross a pitbull and a hooker?
Q: How many Vietnam Vets does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What are the first 3 words in every authentic Mexican recipe?
What suicidal space creature did Kirk find on the Enterprise?
What does Batman say when he goes down on a woman?
Did you know that the Queen of England is a casual gamer?
What do a sprinkler and an unemployment line have in common?
Why did jay z cross the road?
Did you hear about the prostitute with an MBA?
How do you get the walls of your house as bright as they can possibly be?
Want to hear the worst self-referential joke in the world?
What does a dog become after it 6 years old?
Why was the car naked?
What do you call a bunch of blondes waiting in line for meat?
why didn't the young bald eagle need a chaperone?
What do you call a girl that can suck a lemon through a garden hose?
Who would win in a fight...your mom or your dad?
How do you find a black person?
Did you hear about the girl who went fishing with five guys ?
3 doctors joke?
What do you call the person who sleeps on the wet spot?
Where should you go if you lost a corner?
What's better than double-fisting a newborn?
Two tampons are walking down the street towards you, which one says hello?
Want to hear a joke about Sodium Hypobromite?
What do you call a chinese woman with a food processor on her head?
Why did the programmer get a job at the photographers?
What's a Pirates favorite letter?
What's big and yellow and can't swim?
What eye cannot see, cannot blink and is bleeding?
What do you call a Vagina's Poem?
What's the difference between Australia and yogurt?
What's pasty, white, and bounces up and down in a crib?
What appears when you ask a genie for a classical composer?
why don't women wear watches?
What's big, gray, and doesn't matter?
What did the farmers daughter say when she lost her virginity?
What do a bucket and a woman have in common?
Did you hear about the fire on the Indian reservation?
Did you hear about the girl who gave out handjobs to electricians, plumbers, mechanic, you name it?
Q: What's the highest form of praise you can receive from a pimp?
what gets wet when it dries??
How many mothers-in-law does it take to change a light bulb?
Why did the hipster's mouth hurt?
Why did the kidnapped clock always read 12:00?
Did you hear that Elton John is singing at Amy Winehouse's funeral reception?
Why do some birds fly south for the winter?
Do you think all Asians look alike?
Why can't animals take tests?
What did one drug dealer tell another on the street corner after hearing of Amy Winehouse's death?
Person one: Do you know that joke about the no and the me neither?
Are you sure?
Do you want to see the birthmark on my arse?
How could they tell Amy Winehouse was dead?
What is the difference between San Francisco and Larkspur?
Did you hear the one about Facebook's wedding?
Whats green and has wheels?
There has been a bomb explode in Scandanavia?
Did you hear about the gay (native American) indian?
Why are hula dancers so pretentious?
*For Harry Potter fans* What language do UPS men at Hogwarts speak?
Did you hear Aerosmith's new song about chocolate milk?
What do Jewish pitbulls say to each other when they get home?
What car does Woody drive?
Why are all female moths lesbians?
Why don't most fans like the first 39 episodes of DBZ?
What do you get if you cross a rooster with a disobedient dog?
Hey, did you hear about that man who flew so close to the sun he touched it in exactly one spot?
What's the worst possible thing to hear while you're blowing Willie Nelson?
How many Murdochs does it take to change a lightbulb?
What's worse than ten dead babies nailed to a tree?
What do you call a black bastard who never grew up?
What's a holocaust denier's favorite month?
What did the blind and deaf girl get for Christmas?
What gets louder as its gets smaller?
What kind of breath freshener does George Clinton use?
How can you tell if there's a mosquito in your bed?
Why did the spud lover set his alarm for 8:00?
What does the pussy of an 80 year old woman taste like?
What's the worst part about fucking your grandma?
What do you call an upside down blonde?
What did the elephant say when he was pulled out of the quicksand by the balls?
Whats the V in DVD stand for?
Do I know any jokes about Sodium?
Why does the sad crab walk side ways?
Why do people consistently make bad chemistry jokes?
How do you make a duck sing?
How do you know shes the one?
Where do bacteria go when they die?
What do you call social networking for magical creatures?
Why do Transformers always have their heads in the clouds?
What do you call a Sasquatch that is never on time?
How do you know when someone smokes weed?
What did the Jewish Pedophile say to the boy?
What did the cab driver say when the black man got into his cab?
What happens when your favorite team wins the World Cup?
Why shouldn't you wear a watch on your belt?
Where will the Womens World Cup final be held?
Why does everybody like the mushroom?
What did the Gay techie say?
Why are linux geeks very introvertish ?
Why can't you play hide and go seek with a Pokémon?
'Dad, how do you feel about abortions?' Why don't you ask your sister?
What's small, black and full of cobwebs?
Did you hear about the tap dancer?
Did you hear about the dancing girl?
What is that white thing in my pork&beans?
Did you hear the one about the gay cleptomaniac magician?
What do a mole and an eagle have in common?
Why did the bird go to the restaurant?
What do a pizza and this joke have in common?
Does a one legged duck swim in circles?
What did the Grateful Dead fans say when they stopped smoking pot?
what do you get when you cross copper and zinc?
What is the first sign of AIDS?
What did the dentist witness after he gassed the rabbi?
Why can't Ganondorf go on the internet?
Did you hear about Dr. Stephen Hawking?
What kind of cheese do you use to hide a small horse?
What did the wind turbine say to Justin Beiber?
Why did the letter arrive wet?
What kind of cheese do you use to entice a bear?
What has one hundred balls and screws old ladies?
What’s the last thing Tickle Me Elmo receives before he leaves the factory?
Why did Tiger Woods stop winning golf tournaments?
what do you get when you drop a piano down a mineshaft?
You know what really makes me smile?
What do you call a tree that does not believe Jesus was the messiah?
Why are dragons so tired?
Have anyone heard that band The Prevention?
What do a cue ball and a Mexican have in common?
Do you know what the 14th and 15th letters of the alphabet spell?
Know what they call the useless skin around a vagina?
What do mad cow disease and PMS have in common?
Do you remember that barbeque you had?
How many members of a particular ethnic minority does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call a Mexican with a vasectomy?
What do gynecologists and pizza delivery guys have in common?
What does a cat say when you tread on its tail?
How do you say 'The Torah' in German?
What is Fonzi's favorite letter of the alphabet?
Did you hear about the cannibal who came home late for dinner?
What do you call a gay anemic?
What do the janitors clean the Reddit office with?
Why did the plant cross the road?
How do Eskimo fleas stay warm?
I came up with this joke myself. One person laughed. What do you think?
Why should you avoid sexual encounters with The Fonz?
What did the Momma buffalo say to the baby buffalo on his first day of school?
How are pirates like pimps?
Why didn't Lebron go to college?
How can you instantly blind an Asian person?
What's the difference between a new anal plug and a used one?
Have you heard of OS X Def Leppard?
what did the sea say to the sand?
You guys hear about the new Lebron James phone?
What has four legs, and if it fell out of a tree it'd kill you?
If smart guys like dumb girls, and dumb guys like dumb girls, who likes smart girls?
You know the 4 quarters Lebron joke, how about the Dirk one?
How many Hipsters does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What did Larry McMurtry say when his neighbor asked to borrow a bar of soap?
What do you call a nerd girl with big boobs?
So I'm fucking this guy in the ass, right?
How many Obama-voters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What do you call it when a ruminating philosopher decides to commit suicide via high explosives?
How is a vagina like a grapefruit?
What is the difference between a dollar and Lebron James?
what do Little Miss Muffet and Saddam Hussein have in common?
How do you fix a broken tuba?
What did the pineapple say to the coconut?
Why did the cowboy adopt the weiner dog?
Daddy, what does a vagina look like?
How many Environmentalists does it take to change a light bulb?
How do sharks like their steak?
How many Psychoanalysts does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the Meat Packing CEO?
Properly offensive mum jokes?
What did one potatoe say to another?
Where do girls have the curliest hair?
What do you call an elf made of lego?
What's your best Pirate Joke?
why do gorillas have big nostrils?
Why should you always take two Mormon's fishing?
Did you know Hitler's father was a cobbler?
Math/music joke: What do you get when you subtract original blues from modern blues?
Why do they call it a cheese grater?
Which sport is more lame: frisbee, or curling?
what's a pirate comedian's favorite reddit?
What does walking on a broken suspension bridge and getting head by a gay-guy have in common?
How do you spot a terrorist?
How many chicken does it take to screw in a light bulb?
What kind of tree would have the best bark?
What's easier to load into a garbage truck, babies or bowling balls?
What do you call someone who gets Praise and Merit on Reddit?
What do a burnt pizza, frozen beer, and a pregnant girl have in common?
What do Ryan Giggs and Imogen Thomas have in common?
What do Peacocks mate with?
What did the boy with no legs and arms get for Christmas?
Why doesn't anyone tell jokes about Jonestown?
How do you get dragon pee?
what do a nun and a public defender have in common?
What's Lil Wayne's Favorite French Movie?
Have you heard the myth about how the internet was created?
Did you hear about the scarecrow who won an Oscar?
Whats the difference between a blond and a mosquito?
How are black people like Christmas lights?
Why can't Indians drive cars?
What's the hardest thing about roller-blading?
You hear about these Islamic balloons?
What do Buddhists eat to help keep themselves balanced both physically and spiritually?
Why did the podiatrist want to change careers?
What would the Pilsbury Doughboy be if photos of him were constantly being put on magazine covers?
Why did the farmer name his pig ink?
Wanna hear a minimalist joke?
What do monkeys sleep on?
Mother's have mother's day and father's have father's day. What do male redditors have?
Why aren't there any Walmarts in the middle east?
Why is flour retarded?
Remember the undies with the days of the week on them, Monday, Tuesday....?
Why is everyone always late to Auto-Erotic Asphyxiation Anonymous meetings?
What sucks about being black and jewish?
Why do black people think about sex so much?
What do you call Christopher Reeve before the accident?
What's your favourite out of date joke?
What is gray and comes in pints?
How many muscles does a chicken have in its neck?
What's the difference between Obama and Osama?
Why is the space between a women's tits and hips called a waist?
What did David Crockett say when he looked over the Alamo wall and saw 3000 Mexicans?
What do Reddit and Pedophiles have in common?
How do we know God's not a woman?
what are some of your favorite play-on-name jokes?
Good Anatomy or Digestive System Joke?
My First reddit Joke: Why did the walrus go to the Tupperware store?
What's your crappiest Pick-up attemp?
You know why I hate Cancer?
What's big, black and steals you credit card?
What did you hear about the man who fell into the upholstery machine...?
Q: What's the best pickup line to use in a gay bar?
Hey Reddit, what are your favorite lame jokes?
You hear about the guy who had his whole left side amputated?
What do Atilla the Hun and John the Baptist have in common?
Why did the LAPD leave the Dodger game early?
Do you know the difference between camping and molestation?
Have you heard about the new corduroy pillowcases?
Why does Bob Marley like jpegs, gifs and pngs but hate svg?
What is the best thing about kids?
why does dr. pepper come in a bottle?
Did you hear about the constipated mathmatician?
What's the best thing about an extremely drunk, angry girlfriend?
Whats long black and stinky?
What did the boy vampire say to the girl vampire?
What'd the fish say when he ran into a wall?
¿What do you do if a purple elephant and a multicolored horse are following you?
What do you call mexicans who are stoned?
Anyone have a good birthday joke?
MY boss has been telling this one all week. Which bird symbolizes great wisdom?
Why do Kenyans always win marathons?
What do you call the men I kidnap and jerk off against their will?
What did the hippie say when his girlfriend told him to move out?
What do you call an underdeveloped chicken fetus in a frat house?
Why was the Windows PC broke?
Speaking of corny jokes: how do you win a race against vegetables?
How do you get a Nun pregnant?
Why does Snoop Dogg always carry an umbrella?
what do you call a guy in love with a foreign girl?
You know what'd be an AMAZING prank for April Fool's Day, Reddit?
Whats a baby's favourite temperature?
What does Geronimo say when he jumps out of planes?
What are the 2 biggest lies men tell?
What is big, yellow and eats rocks?
What did they call Hitler's limo driver?
My Favorite Lightbulb Joke is: How many Iranians does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many vowels are in the word 'vowel'?
What do a washing machine and a one night stand have in common?
Reddit, may a I please have a Elizabeth Taylor / Michael Jackson joke?
What's the longest sentence in the English language?
What's the best part about having sex with 22 year olds?
What's red and white?
What do hockey goaltenders and Alaskan prostitutes have in common?
How many Apple Geniuses does it take to change a lightbulb?
what did cinderella say when she got to the ball?
What do you have when you just used the toilet and realized there's no toilet paper?
What do you call a delicacy made by stripping the skin off of a Native American and cooking it?
What's the difference between a tsunami and a bear?
Aren't boner jokes funny?
What did Kermit the Frog say after Jim Henson died?
Why should you not visit the Ukraine with your fly unzipped?
What do you call Wolverine post-op?
How do you know when it's midnight at Neverland Ranch?
Who was the largest knight at the Round Table?
What do troll mathematicians like to solve?
What did the penguin say to the polar bear?
Why did the worm want to learn kung-fu?
Why do Japanese people love mechs so much?
Are these my brains?
Why don't shrimp give anything to charity?
What did King Arthur have for breakfast?
(First Post) I have an 8-year-old stepson. Can we get a child appropriate, CLEAN joke thread?
How do you turn a dishwasher into a snowblower?
What does a trumpet player use as contraception?
How much coke did Charlie Sheen snort?
So I met a terrorist the other day and asked him about his ethnicity. You wanna know what he said?
How can you tell that the stage is level?
How much coke DID Charlie Sheen do?
How do you make a guitar player's car more aerodynamic?
What's the difference between a blowjob and a ham sandwich?
Why are turds tapered on the ends?
How do you get a pool player off your porch?
What do you call a drummer without a girlfriend?
Q: What do you call a drummer in a three piece suit?
Why is it unjust to blame taxi drivers for cheating us?
Where do kids with ADHD go for the summer?
How do you confuse a Daily Mail reader..?
What did one pedophile say to the other?
You know what they say about a guy with big feet?
What's the difference between a baby and a tree?
Want to hear a funny joke?
What kind of monkey can fly?
What's the difference between a woman and bacon....?
What's the difference between a carpenter and a construction worker?
Why shouldn't you have sex with Linux users?
What's white and ten inches long?
What's green and falls up?
What do you call a blonde geek with cancer?
How do you get someone to pay child support?
why shouldn't you fart in church?
What's the difference between a fridge and a vagina?
What's blue and yellow and sits at the bottom of the pool?
How do you stop a dog who's humping your leg?
What do you call a female to male sex change?
Why did they start using liquid soaps in prisons?
What did the captain say to the men before they got on the boat?
What's the difference between a Rottweiler and a Poodle?
What's the difference between a woman kneeling in prayer and a woman kneeling in a bathtub?
What's the difference between a tribe of pygmies and an all-girl track team?
What do you have when you have two small, green balls in your hand?
How many PETA members does it take to change light bulb?
Whos the coolest guy in hospital?
What's better than a dozen roses on a piano?
Whats the difference between a rooster and a whore?
What do you do to a chemist after they're dead?
What's blue and doesn't fit any more?
What do JFK and Obama have in common?
What do you call a bovine that won't leave Egypt?
What does a tornado and a red-neck divorce have in common?
What are Mario's overalls made of?
What time do you go to the dentist?
Why did the French chef kill himself?
Why is being a politician more difficult than being a ventriloquist?
What do you call a slippery book?
What do you call a dog with no limbs?
What happens if the protesters in Egypt win?
What did Oprah say when she visited Harlem?
Ask me what the secret to comedy is?
AskJokes: Do you have any classy "yo mamma" jokes?
Do you know what the difference is between a Scotsman and a Rolling Stones song?
What's the worst part about getting AIDS?
How is being married like puttin' on a tin roof?
Formulae for finding the stopping time of a musical object?
Can you make me some good real estate jokes?
What do you get with a woman majoring in woman's studies?
Did you hear that Zsa Zsa Gabor was suing the doctor who amputated her leg?
What's the best part about taking a shower with an 11 year old girl?
Email to my boss: What is the difference between your daughter and this morning?
Whats the difference between Peanut butter and Jam?
Number jokes, anyone?
What do you call a male camel toe?
How do you make a cat go "meow"?
How many Hispanics does it take to change a light bulb..?
What is the TSA's favorite movie?
Why do programmers always get Christmas and Halloween confused?
What does oral sex in a nursing home taste like?
What's long and hard and fucks old people?
Why was the dolphin so upset with the attendance of his drunken kegger?
why google is a she?
Why is sex like Tetris?
What is smaller than a teeny weenie fly?
You know how I know it's lunch time?
What do you call a computer that farts?
Why did the cellphone go to court?
Where do epileptics love to eat?
Are you at stupid situation? Press Whyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy!?
Where are smells made?
Why are giraffes so tall?
what did the gay sperm say to his compatriot?
Why did the broom take a nap?
Why can't a bicycle stand on it's own?
Did you hear about the guy who went to the convention of legless women?
What's the opposite of Stephen Hawking?
What's 9 and a half inches long and satisfies all c*nts?
How many skaters does it take to change a lightbulb?
What did justin beiber say to his mom?
How many punks does it take to change a light bulb?
How many Norwegians does it take to change a light bulb?
What do you call the first Irish woman ever created?
Why do turkeys always gobble?
Why doesn't San Antonio have a pro football team?
Why does Saturn have rings?
Why do hippies wear patchouli?
What was the best time in history for the Italians?
What snooker and women have in common?
Why does SnoopDogg carry an umbrella?
How many Irish folk singers does it take to change a light bulb?
Did you hear about the guy who lost his left arm and left leg in a car accident?
Did you hear about the man who had sex with a parrot?
What is an Arkansas virgin?
Why does Snoop Dawg need an umbrella??
How do you clear out a veterans bingo hall?
My 5 year old told me this joke: What do you call a puppy in the desert?
What do Americans do immediately after winning the World Cup (Soccer)?
Where do you find a turtle with no legs?
What do the Texas Rangers & Brett Favre's wife have in common?
Wanna hear a rape joke?
What happens when you fingerbang a gypsy on her period?
Why do aspirins work?
Why didn't the gunpowder plot work?
Why is there such a shortage of teachers in Africa?
Why did the pregnant Chinese chicken cross the road?
Do you know the difference between a mailbox and an elephant's asshole?
Why do rednecks like Halloween?
Know who loves to get fisted?
Why did the serial killer become a chef?
In a Catholic boarding school, how do you know when to go to bed?
What's big, grey and makes you jump?
What's the difference between you and a naked ringneck?
Q: How can you tell when your girlfriend is getting too fat?
What is Irish and sits on your deck?
Did you hear about the logical skunk?
Did you hear about the Florida pastor's Quran burning?
Why did Gateway computers go out of business?
Why does Helen Keller masturbate with only 1 hand?
What's easier to load into a garbage truck? Bowling balls or babies?
What do you call a fat kid with red hair and a eye patch?
What's the temperature in Motown right now?
If the answer is 'cockrobin', what's the question?
What's the difference between a musician and a large cheese pizza?
What do you call a guy who likes to hang out with musicians?
What do a pizza delivery man and a gynecologist have in common?
Why was Tigger's head in the toilet?
Why can't bikes stand up without leaning on something?
You hear about the gay guy who has a job in construction?
You hear about the blind guy on Wheel of Fortune?
Why does Al Gore hate Oil Spills?
If the opposite of pro is con, what's the opposite of progress?
What did the cheese maker say after his factory was hit by lightning?
How many pregnant women does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
How Many Hipsters Does it Take to Screw in a Lightbulb?
Who is the biggest prostitute alive?
Why do lesbians shop at the Sports Authority?
Q: How many surrealists does it take to change a lightbulb?
you hear they're making a movie about constipation?
Why did Mary Poppins break both her legs?
Did you hear they just passed a law making round hay bales illegal?
What is the difference between love and lust?
Quand a eu lieu le dernier gagnant d'un jeu d'instant gagnant ?
What do a short-sighted gynaecologist and a puppy have in common?
Here's a joke just for reddit: How many narwhals does it take to screw in a light bulb?
How many musos does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
What do you get when you combine a Comedian and a Whorehouse?
What is hard and six inches long?
How do you get two rednecks to play Banjo in unison?
2 Scottish cows in a field: which one is on holiday?
What is 4,000 lawyers at the bottom of the ocean?
New Daily Joke WTF??
What's Forrest Gump's favorite diner?
What is the difference between your Mum and a sack of green apples?
What do you call a bug on the moon?
Q: Why did the pacifist /b/tard try to calm everyone down?
Q: Why can't Obama poke fun at himself?
Why is gambling not allowed in Africa?
What do you call three witches in a hot tub?
What do scientists use to measure a chicken's gestation period?
He nearly drown in his own tea pee.
Mycheexarphlexin
Matt
Jean-Luc Pickacard
A bullet doesn't miss Harambe
He was having a mid-life crisis
One shucks between fits...
Kevin Durant or Bernie Sanders?
Because the shark burped. 
A bachelor will go to the fridge, sees nothing he wants, and go to bed A married man will go the bed, sees nothing he wants, and go the fridge!
Because the sentences usually end with periods.
Dimitree
Egg zactly!
A retail store.
One shucks between fits
He pulled a muscle 
They eat whatever bugs them.
Press the red button. 
I'd better not. You might get carried away.
Well then, you're a gay fish. 
Let's just be cousins. 
The Pizza doesn't scream when I put it in the oven.
Q: Why does Santa have three gardens? A: So he can "hoe, hoe, hoe."
Because he drank his coffee before it was cool.
They were yelling "Bach Bach Bach Bach"
A sunken chest with no booty.
Because attachments are forbidden.
I don't know either. It must be out-of-this-world.
The Rooster
They're both ready to eat you
I don't know. That's just the way it's spelled.
Slow down and apply lube
Never mind. you won't get it, and I won't care
Person 2:They're doctors, what do your parents do? 1: They beat me with pool sticks. 2: Oh, they must be really good at billiards. 
Dragons, because they're always spittin' fire.
Leave my presents
Three wars
A receding  line.
It isn't going cheep.
Black Lives Matter Edit1: No Im not targeting black people, or people with actual Down syndrome, just that group
Because he was outstanding in his field
5 1 to hold the bulb and 4 to spin the ladder.
If you are stuck at a red light, its the time that it takes for the occupant of the car behind you to honk his horn when the light turns green.
The Cis-Teen Chapel
A: That one in the middle thinks he's hard.
Your Guns N' Toeses I'll see myself out.
A: Sexually B: Sexually C: Sexually
Nun chucks. 
He uses the finest ingredients.
The Orange has thick skin and people actually like it.
He heard it was a great line of work.
Its hard
She's a transparent. 
Goes to a retail store to find another one.
They have to give the donkey a break. 
Sure, we've sold it to royalty Princesses? Mate, it prints ALL the letters!
It had connections.
Huge Jackman
No hard feelings.
They're making headlines everywhere.
Well, it's hard to even count, I will just give you a range of about how many. The range is <1.
Christopher Walken
If it doesn't make you look smart, it's blunt.
They always take things literally.
Cancer evolves, a Brazilian doesn't.
Eggs actually get laid. 
An Aflacco
Too Mennonite 
Nothing
No Beef Stew at all
Thanks for the gold!
They both said they were just going to the store
Can't we just let Argonne's be Argonne's?
They don't.  They just beat the room for being black.
A wet nose
Slippers
I don't even like pegging.
Where's my tractor?
Redditors can’t take a joke.
Finding a place to put the wheelchairs.
Fart
Kia Kia Kia
Deer Nuts. Beer Nuts are $1.49, while Deer nuts are under a Buck!
The swallow. 
A Hippo is heavy and a Zippo is a little lighter.
But Kuwait, there's more!
Tony
He got AIIIIIDS.
Give him a tampon and ask what period its from. 
The airline didn't allow carrion luggage.
They don't like getting sand in their crack.
I hear it's the prequel to Maroon 5.
The drunk driver goes through the stop sign, while the high driver waits for it to turn green.
Troll husband : It kinda is, ill adjust the AC.
Dave promptly burst into tears as not everyone in the world knew Dave.
Makkah-roni and cheese!
G- Pretty well, Do you want me to walk you back? B- walk me back? G- to the friendzone you just tried to escape.
Their ankles
Because it has a little Seoul in it.
Boba Fat
Damn it.
So the can finally have a good Olympic team.
Easy! Just add Root beer and Ice Cream!
No harem, no fowl.
It took the bus.
He got caught by the organ
Copper Nitrate.
Cause Jewish women won't touch anything that's not 10% off.
To beat the crowd
Nothing, he's Snowden. 
Because boob jobs are cheaper down under.
"YUUUUUGEE"
Hay,I thought you knew horses couldn't speak!
Pay attention! I'm only going to show this once.
To get to the other side.
We gotta hold this shit together. 
The answer may shock you.
It's because it has chickpea in it.
Synthia Lmao
Driver pulls out his mirror and says: "Yes, it's me".
The Cowboys
A Quebrolet.
A frothel
poop.
A runner in scoring position.
He joins AARP
no one knows it was too dark to see them.
They found him dead the next day in his teepee 
Bare Grylls
It's like butter, baby.
To get to your house... Knock, knock. Who's there? The chicken.
I drew drew
A snowfake I thought it was appropriate for this time of year. Merry Christmas reddit! You have my permission to tell this at any Xmas parties you attend
A snailor
He took a forrest dump.
a play on warts
One, or two? One, or two? 
Mick: I wish I were Incredibly wealthy!   Genie: You were incredibly wealthy. Mick: No you imbecile, I wish I WAS RICH   Genie: You are Rich Rich: Well that backfired but... Genie: ...but a deal is a deal and you promised to use your third wish to set me fre.. Rich: I WISH GENIE WAS HUMAN!
A school bus full of black people driving off a cliff
Patty
Business acumen
Earth wind and fire
An algo-rhythm 
Oartism
Plagiarism
ME: There isn’t a drive through in town  WIFE: There is now
Snotzis.
Two. One guy to screw in the light bulb, and the other guy to shoot him if he doesn't do it right.
He was having a midlife crisis.
It's okay, he woke up.
Ghandi Floss!
mitosis.
When it turns into a driveway.
The outside.
When you see really nice ones, you have to ask if they are real or fake 
Burning rubber
There is no cod
A philosophy student asks you   you want fries with that
Everywhere. 
Its a part Tide
Quack cocaine
With a Sandy Hook
They're blowing up everyone's newsfeed
It was a Thai.
A thot.
Neither. I have a friend who works in computers.
Because guitars make music.
The dog has the mental fortitude to realize he's just gotten owned by a Russian.
Let's see those Naboobies.
Jupiter
Beef jerky What do you call a cow with no legs? Ground beef
FeO
He felt his presents.
Namastè (nah-ima-stay)
Which side of the gas chamber they're on.
A pine clone
Lucas gets indicted after video surfaces of him tampering with previous decisions he made.
One goes "ribbit ribbit", the other goes "rub it rub it".
I wouldn't pay £50 to have a lentil on my face... 
Children don't throw tantrums when there's a rerun of some content.
Two. One to take out the bulb and drop it, and the other to try and sell it before it crashes.
None. That's a hardware problem.
Wipe it off and apologise
An astronaut.
Pay for the pizza!
It doesn't want anyone to find The Cure. 
Square Root.  Anything it is applied to becomes radicalized. 
Because after the first kill, they have to tell someone.
With dental floss.
Give it ten tickles
Because they can't make a fist.
They're all Renaissance Italian artists. 
A stick.
A bicyclist
Wing it. 
Whenever you go out to eat they always have the bill. 
I don't know Anne Frankly I don't care.
Your research funding suspended and a severe reprimand from the ethics committee.
How they process things.
They are always taking off.
Because Jewish women won't touch anything that isn't 10% off.
An air mattress.
m'ladium
The buuttt-lerrr!
Nark Nark
See if she'll perform black magic.
On the range
Because they were super horny.
(Interrupting the whos there) Penny!
He was lucky it was a soft drink
Its called the greyscale
It only takes one nail to hang up the picture.  
He uses the best ingredients. 
You have to chew before you swallow!
Because he can't even get arrested in Hollywood.
Everyone can roast beef, but no one can pea soup.
I would tell you.... But I don't compare apples to oranges.
Where you left it
Christian Bale. 
Clickbait.
Pregame.
As mushroom as possible
Black lives matter.
The winner gets $3 a year for a million years."
"Carmen. Well, actually, my name is Laura, but since I like cars and men so much...Car-men. What is yours?" "Beerpussy"
Because their knee grows.
Is it because it's a joke by itself or what.
He flushed. 
You don't??? We should have lunch sometime!
"You're dead to me"
A meaty whore.
Patient: Yes doctor, how do you know? Doctor: Because you came in through the window instead of the door.
Because....there is no spoon.
It was counter productive.
An impeach.
Put a scratch and sniff at the bottom of a swimming pool.
Ex-Benedict. 
A flat.
Coke addicts.
They're always rebooting. 
Because of the tele-ban.
What did the elephant say when it was pulled out of a pit by the Balls?  Thank you Mr. and Mrs. Ball!
A brick.
Two Girls were sitting at a club. One was ugly and the another one was beautiful. Dave walked straight to the ugly girl. Dave: Hello! Ugly girl: Hi!! Dave: Wanna dance? Ugly Girl: Yes (excited) Dave: OK, Go and dance. I wanna talk to your friend.
They both come out of little boys rooms with empty sacks.
Mustard in a rollerskate
Because it's Lit!
Linoleum Blownapart
Neither did she.
Copypasta
One leg is both the same.
It's time consuming. 
Because the land never waves back 
if You had 100 periods a second you would vibrate too.
Then you better go catch it!
I wasn't talking to you.
Pasture bedtime.
Look, we can change the lightbulb. That I will tell you. We're changing it, ok? And I understand what you're saying, I hear it all the time. People call me and say "Is the lightbulb really dead?". Thats what they are asking me, its unbelievable. The lightbulb is in big trouble, that I can tell you. But we are going to change it. 
"Nice belt."
Absolute zero, because it's impossible to reach 
"Yoda, are we still going the right way?" "Off course we are"
Jew-ish.
A raceist 
A paraplegic
Because there's no L. 
We're unsure, but he has a nose for it. 
They both literally can't even
The only improvement you can make is getting undressed. 
Because Dec 25 = Oct 31
A trifle!
The Holocaust.
Thanks for the gold, kind stranger!
Well if he paints one of his bedroom walls red with some yellow stars or a hammer and sickle, that's a huge red flag.
Autobots Roll Out!
It's white and it's on their land.
She forgot to wear a seatbelt. 
"The real joke is always in the comments!"
He was far out man. -_-
onejina
Always tip your server.
They've only gotta invite one family
A drone
Because: Camilla Parker Bowles.
The remaining 4 letters are still waiting for their turn. 
They couldn't find three wise men and a virgin.
Because they are all Targets.
None 'cause it's already lit, fam. 
Mr.President
Because I've "reddit" before
Its easy to break the little light inside them.
Nails in their hands and feet
One if nobody's looking.
Answer is 2. One to change the lightbulb while the other screams "REPOST"
Neither can finish a race.
Two pigs playing in the mud
A Dell
A bird watcher.
He was stuffed.
Because the they have an excuse to buy hose
A messed up system of karma
I've never had a garbanzo pea on my face.
Never mind, it’s tearable.
A FEline.
Qui-Gon Gin.
Why are you shaking? She's gonna eat me.
Ray Lewis
He de-deuces.
Snoop Dogg.
Biden: I hid them from Trump because he won't need them. He already has his own Obama: Oh really? How do you know? Biden: Seriously, I'm not lying. Trust me, he has his own Pence
"Nurse, let me take a Pikachu."
It's really nummy.
Because Christ Brown always beats her
Spartify
A Microwave.
They are always bringing up old shit
I asked him and he said, "I still love vista, baby!"
They keep Lenin to the left, and Stalin.
A thief in the knight
Don't be silly, feminists can't change anything!
A whole chuck-load. 
Because there was a glass ceiling.
Pyfagoras
Have your mom sit down on a golf course.
Getting hit on by an ugly stranger.
-Because they cast Amy Schumer and Ken couldn't get the job done.
Because she had no arms 
CryptoN Only few will get this
Because he was a fungi
To render the other side.
Philately will get you no where.
He becomes disoriental
Ash
"Top notch".
"Honesty." "I don't think honesty is a weakness." "Well I don't give a damn about what   think."
Cause I want to lay some pipe in you. 
Ones really heavy, and the other's a little lighter!
The 7th German Panzer Division
Because Jesus Christ (Cries)
Not enough. 
Because they use the Theory of Relativity to find a partner.
Israeli good.. 
A pot roast
There used to be exactly two, and now it's too offensive to talk about. 
Much like that one book, Old Yeller, it's pretty damn hard to put down.
And why does he paint so many pictures of my parents fighting?
aww-tistic 
Because he was Legolas.
Because its high jacking. 
Because they can only mandate.
Because he's dead.
we will bury him. 
Claustrophobic
No cocks allowed.
I don't know, they would probably die anyways.
Why did the detective go to the apartment complex? So he could solve the staircase. 
To get some quack
You ask him politely. 
He could not pass
Well now you have.
They prevented hispanic attacks
Because he doesn't like being followed.
On the left side there's nothing right and on the right side there's nothing left...
It's very time consuming. 
It's called divorced barbie. Comes with all of Kens stuff.
An asshole, for marrying the hot sister
Nun. 
Him: Is your dad a gardner? Her: (sarcastically) - Why, because you've never seen a flower like me? Him: No, I wondered if you trim your bush. 
Myth-conception
Why did the animal shelter relocate to Nebraska? So they could make corn dogs. 
Where’s pop corn? 
"Keep the tip."
He had Gaul stones.
Hebrews it.
A constipatient
Malnourished.
Karma & Greg
Santa goes down the chimney.
... Because they got big fingers.  
They don't C#.
None, he lets the knives do the work 
they were looking for Klingons
A lion. Get it guys lol? Lion ~ Lying   I'll pounce myself out now...
He wanted to transcend dental medication
Parma Jean 
Times Niurou Mian  (Niurou Mian = beef noodles in Chinese)
Nah, it's just a phase. Credit to   for the entire premise, I just reworded it.
Because he's  .
Washed up.
They get free two-day shipping.
Doctor: Yes you can, but there are more comfortable places.
None. They just beat the room, because it's black.
Because every time they get to 69, Miss Piggy gets a frog in her throat.
It would've just been "mas".
Like that.
A Catholitic Converter 
When Islam begins.
Pardon me
They can't. There's a wall.
They're both made of plastic, and little kids turn them on.
Put it through the Wash.
Talibanter
Tickle the goat under it's chin.
An ambulance. 
Chips, one byte at a time
I came, I upvoted, I reposted.
Give her a testicle.
When the joke is fully groan.
A: To get to the second hand shop.
"You're alt right, You're alt right, You're alt right"
My name is Paul.
Because Seven was a registered six offender.
They have a hard time opening up
Q: What do computers eat for a snack?  A: Microchips!
JOKEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
Disabled. 
Nobody died...
∫F dt bich
Natural selection.
Beat it. We’re closed.
I ship them
To stop getting confused as feminists
No lye?
Because of their bills
A: Yes. And she's Black.  —-------—-------—------— imo: best joke ever 
Yeah! I'm hoping I either get Kappa Kappa Gamma or Alpha Phi!
He is alright, but one sided!
A civil serpent 
well it wanted to get away from the vegetarians.
Lickalatapus
"Will the defendant please rise."
In a pear-less whisper. I'll see myself out.
None, they prefer to live in the dark. 
It was a terminal illness.
If not, you will soon!
Dear Sir/Ma'am,  We are cutting your internet connection due to the following reasons:
Edward Snowed-in
The T.H. sea
Throw some Titanium Chloride at him/her (TiCl) (Tickle)
Carbon, Oxygen, Nitrogen, Iron and Titanium (C,O,N,Fe,Ti)
Punchlines that got married and settled down.
A Belaruse!
a sourkraut
Someone pushed her 
He was impeached
Duh.  Cause he's da foe.
Place a penny between two Jews.
The prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.
If it's pasturize
His life improved after he met the rock.
Their wheelchairs
Pilot.
Brazilian soccer players.
My ass.
Because she didn't want to wake the sleeping pills!
Because by the time women found a condom in their purses, kid would be 3 years old
You do all the work and the fat guy in the suit gets all the credit
Putin end to my life.
Because I would like to manage my mischief with you
Because Y so serious
Make up the other half of this pickup line in the comments. Edit Totally goofed it up in the title. Oh well, I had a few drinks last night and things happened. *Are your legs broken?
Now I've got to cut you.
SPEEEED!
Ask them what a 3Ds is.
Because Jesus couldn't find any wise men then  Edit: Made more clear
Stroganoff 
Someone doing a half-assed job.
His punches Neverland.
He got hit by a car. He was playing On The Road Again.
Noels 
It's only whites.
A stick.
Telling your parents that you're gay.
A Coke-o-nut.
A jeweler sells watches and a jailer watches cells
An elephant with a wet boot 
Where you put the cucumber.
A shopping bag can carry a child.
Because their ring doesn't leave a tan line when they take it off!
A ripoff 
because his wife died.
Christina Ricci.
Quidditching
The thoooperintendent.
They easily get bent out of shape...
A joke. 
They are both bad at pulling out.
They both need to check the table periodically...
A rip off
Give the criminals badges.
The police came and took statements but ultimately Mrs. Claus declined to press charges. [OC]
To get to the other side
Woman: Yeah, sure! . Man: Great, go and dance, I want your Chair.
Morning wood.
How did you get his tiny little legs open?
Lincoln, because he is in a cent. 
No-Shit Sherlock
Because they are really good at it
Because seven "ate" nine.
He had a Yeez-ynfection.
Just take some steps to avoid them!
Rando Calrissians
A bellybutton!
Because it's the scenter!
Close the door! I'm dressing!
They'll always have dry wood on hand to start a fire
Rrrrrrrr? You think it be R but it be sea
flip it upside down
His voice line becomes "It's high mooooon" 
Bison
"Fuck Starbucks! Amirite?!"
Because they are always a little behind
[THIS IS NOT A JOKE] I'm sure you all have heard the joke where   has a number for each joke and that everyone just remembers the numbers instead for typing out the jokes. This always made me think "What would joke #1 be?" What do you think it'd be?
Some one who likes Cold Play
One benefits from laughs and the other laughs at benefits
Pain specialists
A Kaiju.
Urethra Franklin 
Tea tea
Never 21
Because it was too chicken!
Timber
Boo's.
Aretha Franklins
I'll actually look for the Jack Daniels.
"Olive or twist?"
Liquor in the front, poker in the back.
It was just the two of them.
He likes to keep it Handy. * * * 'Stand' by for more body part puns.
Steel armour
The Roman Umpire.
If you were forced to have it as a kid, you'll hate it as an adult.
Don't be depressed
You get in the car and they already know your name and where you live.
Pout-ry farm.. 
"Jewish." But then you said, "Yes I do wish for that."  The salesman realizing how wrong he's been all his life replied, "Wow Jews can be funny." But then you said, "No, I take 'shoes' seriously. That's why I want those Crocs." The conversation went on for another 5 minutes because you had nothing better to do. Eventually you held up one of the shoes and asked the salesman, "Is this really authentic?"  The salesman went onto Reddit, read this joke, and said, "Yes, this is a real crock alright."
A grumpa. 
You have to go to bed early.
Undoing the straps on your roller blades 
"We're Finnished."
When he found out, Santa shouldn't have gotten mad, he only had his elf to blame. Now Santa won't forgive him until elf freezes over.
A blue slipper 
"I think we should see other peepholes."
Because it was stationary. 
"He did gnat see that coming"
A chicken
After 30 minutes of trying to decipher the text he gave up and exclaimed, "Man I am not good at this". Then someone shouted back "Huh, I thought black people were good at basketball."
Cause the seaweed
Because the prick's behind the wheel
Eyyyy, Garry, didn't know you turned into a hotdog stand too! Eyyyy!
They are sweeping the nation with it!
M'alady
Because he's got a lot of melon-in.
Jewbs
Ah Jew!
"Get in the car"
Because they can.
A fruitkike!
He stays awake at night wondering if there really is a dog.
Partners in crime
You don't, because cows don't have phones.
They always got him to raise the roof.
The Big Foreplay.
Toni
It helps you hide and Sikh.
He comes but once a year.
Adobe-wan Kenobi
The one smoking the cigarette.
The bikings.
Skinning the vegan.
This morning I used a discount card from my wallet, but it was no good. I only got 20% off.
"Don't worry, son; we Katz always land on our feet."
A rebell
Canadians like them both a lot eh?
lettuce turnip the beet
Depending what you're charged with can really effect how easily you're getting across.
Olive. EDIT: Please don't explain and let those suffer who don't understand
Hitler was elected.
See you next month.
Because everytime theres a Hoedown, they think one of their sisters got shot.
The Significant Others just want babies.
A stick!
It bit the end off a submarine and sucked out all the seamen 
A VegitAryan This has nothing to with the current political climate. I work with several vegetarians and we were talking about food today and it the joke just hit me.
A Chinese phone. Wing wing, hallo? 
Honestly, I think they're pretty tight!
My jokes go right over most people's head.
Throw it in water  If it sinks = girl ant  If it floats = buoyant 
Tsunami
konnichihuahua!
A dictator.
Because he takes it for granite.
Because it's white and settles on their land
There's a snape in the grass.
4 if you have a dog.
there's a clock on the stove
Arfson
It's a dead giveaway. 
Satisfaction
They were afraid of Stalin'
They keep making 6-pointers.
Because your face looks flushed.
Denim-denim-denim...         denim-denim-denim.
Gobi yourself
Last I heard, they were really taking off.
I named him Justin... Justin Case
They are both controlled by little green men.
A plane bagel. 
They shut down because they had a toxic atmosphere 
He had a reptile dysfunction.
One has standards.
With a  culator
I'm one in a million. ;D
Because they always take a fence
It drove up a lane and turned into a field!
Sharts. 
Cause all I heard from your Hospital Room was "HO HO HO"
She takes contraceptives.
He was outstanding in his field.
Avengers Assemble.
There are no experienced ones
Incorrectly. I'll see myself out.
He had to go to the dentist for serious plaque buildup!
Meow Zedong
A cold wall banker.
Peaking duck!
It said: two eggs I said: Oh strange! It said: what's strange? the fact that I lay two eggs? I said: no, the fact that you talk
Terrible!
The drummer is drooling equally out of both sides of his mouth.
The bond market crashed.
They ribbit
Hebrews it
Sparky
A Veteran Aryan Veterinarian!
Fern-iture
Because you're on fire right now.
Om-lit
They're making headlines.
Because without them, they'd just be cauc.
He was more of an Ubermensch.
In the L Ron cupboard.
HAmAr + SiCl
Ground beef
That's right, a black eye and my hatred.
by Willie Makit, illustrated by Betty Wont and published by Andy Dint
Because a wizard is never late, nor is he early, he arrives precisely when he means to.
Saggitaurus.
The wheel chair 
He fingered a minor.
The alpha ale.
It was occupied.
Because I'd like to show you menards.
because she couldn't control her pupils 
They use a sea lion.
A cruise
So... Can I come inside?
Osteoferocious!
A Timbyte
Through sine language.
Funny how nature do dat
TZZZZAT, TZZZZZZZAT! 
Paper tits.
Both are great things ruined by periods
Because he's a pervert that likes showing people his snowballs.
Having tits, and no girlfriend.
A ripoff.
I mean... what part of Chief Editing Officer don't these people understand?
he did nazi that well
AI (Artificial Intelligence)
You get some Kurds in the way.
Shake n bake
You give the pen to michel j fox
Open your bible to Psalm BODY ONCE TOLD ME
Cumin Beans
Everyone misses Harambe. 
because Ken always came in another box. 
Decalfeinated
Torque
Their age.
My girlfriend
Dans un bon-apartement.
High Five
Timing
A WWI soldier has a reason for shooting himself in the foot.
My dad didn't meet my mom at a circus or take me their when I turned 5
A baked potato
Their job is to make things whiter.
When one appears. 
SKU me
The democrats just left a bad taste in her mouth
Upvote pictures 
Jesus died on the cross
Breasts don't have eyes.
It over swept
He can't drive 55.
The Imperial March
Coma, Coma, Coma, Coma, Coma, Chameleon
Because it lasts forever. 
Lukewarm.
A neck-romancer
Won ton
One wears pants and a collar while the other wears a collar and pants.
Yes, Harry, he is. 
You get repercussions 
Amble in (Anne Boyeyn) I made this joke up and am very proud of it :)
No, he just whips it out.
They Munch on some Flesh Mint!
Nothing, they were both stuck up cunts.
Toulouse
Because they bred.
Yes, I'm adamant
The pro bono ones 
"Any-cock'll-doooooo!"
Subwhey.
A redditor
Because he played with fire before it was cool.
An oxymoron.
It was pretty  !
I wouldn't pay $300 to have a garbanzo bean in my mouth
That they are full of poo-tential. 
Tennish
Clouds, because once they are gone it's a beautiful day.
Q: How come legacy programmers get Halloween and Christmas confused?  A: Because Oct 31 = Dec 25 (Octal 31 = Decimal 25)
He couldn't HEIL a cab.
Naomi Watts.
Neither did I.
His heart wasn't in it.
Because he khan.
"I still find you dashing"
They pump kin.
"Take me to your lieder!"
None. There are no fish under my new gazebo
Torque
The marathon runner can successfully finish a race 
Heairs.
Both have panties half-off. 
Well, the flag's a big plus
He told them he would be "fourthreich" and they misheard.
I just want to belong
They both hate globalists.
Not counting the bombs strapped to their chests, I have no clue.
Lucky
Gotham City.
You get milk.
Angus McCoatup 
A field of corn.
Because they lactose.
"See you next month"
Overtime.
Sooner or later they find a potent cousin.
It's sweeping the nation
6  3 to change the bulb, 2 to explain why men have always done it wrong and 1 on her period.
sqwerty
virgin
Thirdperson.
I'm asking for an imaginary friend.
Harambe tried to save the kids. 
To get his quarterback. 
In a communest (pls     
He didn't even finish grad school.
The bludgeoned face of a bi racial man in 2017 america.
Scientist2: NaBrO
A chip monk. 
Because he has wee legs
I've heard it's pretty lit.
A little over 6 books.
Nothing. They're both crustacians.
The pickpocket snatches watches...
It goes back four seconds.
After five years, your job will still suck.
9/11 victims. They got through over 40 stories in seconds. 
A small medium at large.
A voice.
. . . . He saw his gas bill.
The Brains of Castamere. 
He had a blast.
When it's circumcised
"Fuck you" (They were arch enemies)
With Frodough.
In the big inning. Eve stole first, Adam stole second. Cain struck out Abel. The Giants and the Angels were rained out.
They're always plotting against it. 
An excavator. And why? Because it only got one arm.
She was a nein out of ten
You take the 'F' out of free and the 'F' out of way. Hint: say everything out loud.
Pollygone
The higher they are, the more spaced out they get
His wheelchair.
He has  .
A+ because it's the highes you can get in a blood test.
A treaty.
The rasit!
To run their hands through their hair
For planning high trees, son.
A lot. There were 3 movies. 
Cause ketchup accidentally broke the condiment.
A wheezing angle.
Darth Deciduous
Jack Daniels is still killing American Indians
Not being retarded
Ash
A pizza joint
Call 911, it doesn't matter who answers
Because the government cuts corners.
Because 7 ate 9
The refrigerator does not fart when Joe pulls his meat out.
Me. I'm pretty clumsy so I get paper cuts pretty regularly.
Because she was too small for D shells. 
A YAAAARRRRGGGG!!  Oh look a door.
Depresso.
The husband.
Hungry.
His cousin with the DVD player
Daisy me rollin. They hatin. Patrollin and tryna catch me ridin dirty. 
A woman
Eliphino
[deleted]
Sitcoms
Circumcision.
Ten-ticles!!!
A copy of everything Michelle Obama had on her list
Anything you like, what are they going to do about it?
"You gotta Mufasa"
Minnesota.
Because it keeps Peein' n peein' 
It wears an aqua-fur.
Hulk ash!
There, their, they're...
I have sex daily 
The black man is black from the beginning.
Two, and often from the same person.
Martin. We all know Martin Luther King.
A Communist
Nothing.  They haven't met yet.
A shitty-sore-ass.
They're alt-right, alt-right, alt-right.
Green paint. Haha
White people actually go to school. Black people stay home and shoot people in their own neighborhood.
Smashed potatoes. 
A peacunt
One has a pause at the end of it's clause, the other has claws at the end of it's paws.
CucumBARS. 
A small child paralyzed from the waist up.
Only 1 in 52 Fridays are black.
I turned the TV off 4 hours into it and I'd really like to watch the start of the Lions game before I goto bed.
Vladimir Puttin'
One can shoot but can't hit and the other one can hoot but can't shit.
The taste.
Steven Hawking with a brake failure!
A deport-a-potty.
A receding hareline.
A gobblin. I'll see myself out...
A plain bagel.
When she clearly loves fucking a whole country at once with the world watching. 
Command Alt Right.
Hubble, hubble, hubble [shamelessly stolen joke from the Facebook page of "Grammarly"]
One shucks between fits...
Their only hit was Don't Stop Bereaving.
No, not "breathe, you idiot!". It said nothing. It just let out a little   grape juice
A-social media
Isfaek.
Because they don't like Turkey
If so, chances are you haven't had Mexican food before. 
I've never been inside a Porsche. Nor do I have 12 Porsches in my garage. 
A Rolls-Royce.
Tell her about how much better at sex her fit friends are! 
You can't fire me! I snappopcrackleaaaaaargh!!!!
They always punch up the fuckline.
One is a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean!
Because you're a jerk. 
With a mop.
You stick a piece of bread on the ceiling.
He's getting really fed up with it.
Purples
God save the kin Happy Thanksgiving!
Nothing they are both Thor.
The golfer goes   "Shit!" The Sky-diver goes "Shit!" 
Friend: 9 Me: 9? I'll give her one.. 
Keeping a straight face
Because nine ate seven
Treason
Alkaline
One baby nailed to 10 trees...
A prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.
Gender fluid.
God dogs
A Pokémon.
Pitt Sweat
Harpoon
I don't know, I don't have 2020 vision.
The wheelchair...
They're mostly Dum Dums. 
Trump is. 
There used to be two of them, but now it's too offensive to talk about.
Danksgiving.
A Yambourghini!
BOObees! 
Neither. France surrenders and Italy switches sides.
Synonym rolls. 
Motherzucker
Gonna take a while to get me hard, I just got laid by a chick. 
None of them. Historians suggest that most pirates would have been illiterate. 
Because I want to put my dirty load in you
Vaginasaurass 
No? That's because it hadn't come out yet.
Because blacks always get a longer sentence 
It had new windows Putin
About the cannibal that dumped his girlfriend?...
Bi  den! 
Sia , Later!
Middle school. 
A blackmailer.  I'll show myself out :(.
I'm really sodie pop. 
Windows
When your toothbrush stops working mid brushing
Konichihuahua
I'll tell you tomorrow.
Because they'll just tell the crowd that the real joke's in the comments.
A M'alady.
Blonds will split hairs over this. Imagine that.. vibrating hair. 
They found her Head & Shoulders under the steering wheel!
In hiney-sight.
Velcro
They haven't any gigs yet!
SUPPLIES!
Not sure, but that is definitely the smell of burning flesh. 
In little knotsies....
I don't know, but I wanna try eating ass!
They both make pop tarts.
Bummer, I was trying to give that booty a call... ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
He asks his dad, "Pop, why can't I go out in the street and play football and baseball like the other kids?" And his father says, "Keep dealing."
Ra'men.
Sex interrupted with a period! 
Because they're paid to.
chess nuts boasting in an open foyer
I'm ok with a 5km but really don't like 10km.
Duck tape!
God doesn't walk around thinking he's a doctor.
Because they've always got a stiff in the trunk.
Their hips.
Rare.
Tri-tip.
She starts to fit into your wife's clothes.
A synonym roll 
For drizzle.
Trick question.  Nobody invites feminists to a cookout.
Pink eye
Hey guys so since couple of weeks I think that my girlfriend is cheating on me. So last night I followed her. She took a cab I took my car and followed her till the cab stopped in front of one nice house. I went beside my car and crouched. She went out and there was this sport dressed bastard which hugged her and they started to kiss... While crouching I saw oil leaking from my car. Do you think this is coming from the filter or from the engine? Thanks 
A condescending con descending.
All white, all white, all white.
Persona non grotto
Deer balls,  They're under a buck!
Maybe he wouldn’t have been so grumpy if people hadn’t left him hanging for high-fives all the time
Because   it would 
Forget it once.
At the meat ball.
He got the sack
Heh, disguised toast. 
A marine biologist.
A: No, you should just have the turkey!
Plymouth Rock
They think on a whole different dimension.
Because someone's always on the deck!
"Yes, no, yes, no, yes..."
Buckle Buckle
Kicked out of the petting zoo.
The p is silent.
"He's a fun guy."
Whore-moans!
Student - Well, I don't know. I guess one is a bit too high?
1forrest1
It's too square.
SIDS
They wrestled over it. Neil had the stronger arm.
Because if someone hit your peter with a pan, you'd fly too!!
A piece of ass that will bring a tear to your eye
Its missing a fatherboard.
Maple flakes From my well intentioned girlfriend
I heard it can seat 10
cuz i knead you
Gloves. Just kidding he couldn't open it to find out 
Put a little boogie in it.
Legs.  Spread the word.
When I rant as much as that people boo me too.
Because asteroids was already taken.
They're all girls on fire. 
15511210043330985984000000.
By craic-ing his knuckles.
Nobody can   a jolly-good fellow!
You're getting on my wick.
Because it was the Finnish line.
Because OJ will kill you!
The electoral college in 2016.
It's sure as hell not a bar-mitzvah, those things are expensive.
Because m = AIt
The Juan that got away. 
Because the steaks had never been higher. 
All the cotton on her tampon has been picked off.
Boil the hell out of it.
To switch sides
Damn.
Mountains peak.
The other side, of the fence
It's not hard
A philosopher. Cuz he's a deep thinker.
Because the grass tickles their balls when they run EDIT: I don't know why I decided to post this..
Shedding season
He touched the beaker before it was cool.
Don't Look Now But Something Between Us Smells
a tournament
Artificial Intelligence.
A Radish
Lemonworth
1st he gets nice and wet, then he dies of drowning
Flip it over
2:  One to screw in the bulb, and one to hold the penis... LADDER, I MEAN LADDER!
Hang ten.
A brick.
None. It's already lit fam.
It got stuck in a crack.
gynecologist - because in the hole that the whole world is looking for pleasure, he's looking for problems. 
Every scene was really in tents.
Because they break glasses and protect their pockets
A: Pretty hot
He got ​Every Juan praying!
Because he Neverlands
Mount Rushmore.
Because it didn't concentrate.
Chicken poodle soup...I know, I know booooo
He was kneading a poo.
D-Bone steak
He seems alt-right!
Yeah, me neither...
They gave him the cold shoulder.
There used to be two, now it's offensive to talk about.
[removed]
Hilter didn't make unoriginal jokes about finishing races.
Leaf me alone.
It depends
Thera-peas
Neither have they.
He doesnt like carrying around trump change.
He bombed.
Window.
Cross Country.
It’s got two banks.
Your job still sucks.
They're very anal about it.
2:flirty
A natural log.
first i bang the drums then i bang ur mom
You slay me!
I'm lactose intolerant.
A Synonym Roll.
Wow, this blew up!
The left ear, the right ear and the Final Front-ear.
Her tits aren't nice
You boil the hell out of it.
Because it was deep space . (the joke is how the outer space was very deep)
Because they've got the same color trunks.
Toad
With his Parceltongue. (...I'll see myself out)
Scallops!
Megasaurass
Have the 51st scream BINGO!
808s & Taxbreaks
She was nun the wiser 
Smoke.
It comes in handy.
I didn't come, she didn't come, baby come. How come? 
Because there is too much snow to wear shoes.
One of its legs is both the same.
Gas Who?
On the second page of google.
They both moust go down in emergency.
Roberto 
It might take me a while to get hard, I just got laid this morning. 
The Somali chicken! 
Sir cumference
Them: No. You: It's a really good hiding spot isn't it.....
Female, because it doesn't let you finish a sentence before making a suggestion.
Hello, bud.
Because he's a Fe male
Because the banker starts with all the money and never gives it away.
Because they can't stop shooting themselves in the foot.
You're my breast friend! Badum-Tits!
his-panic room.
A leaf blower 
Elon Musk
An amputea
He was told it was a shingles club.
Prime Rib
Discus.
Authorities believe it had a loco motive.
When your toothbrush stops working mid toothbrushing
There are too many Links. 
One's in a cult, the other seeks to summon a terrible god to Earth and be eaten.
Because I'm going to tape my penis to your head so you can CDs nuts.
Watching them break down on the witness stand.
The wheelchair
Put them in a circular room and tell them to find the corner
Alt-right, alt-right, alt-right
The phrase “I went through a whole box of tissues watching that film.” is a good place to start.
Spare ribs.
Their last greatest hits were "the wall".
It's Morphine Time!
They rake them into big piles, put them into plastic yard bags, and then toss them over the Mexican border for being brown.
Making Internal Organs Great Again.
What did the computer Engineer say when he saw his favorite drink? ICT
Humans' ability to classify living organisms.
In the mainstream
Gherkin off
Because I wore the wrong socks today   
Thumpthumper
Cross dressing.
Alt-right  alt-right  alt-right. 
HOLY SH*T A TALKING COW!
It used to be cross country but now it's rock climbing.
It already had 10 thousand degrees. 
One was always left behind causing the other to half-ass everything 
Getting the news from your dentist
None. They'll just beat the room for being black
"dad,  why do the sharks swim in circles like that before they eat someone?" "it makes them taste better, son." "taste better? How? " "it scares the shit out of them."
They can't guard their towers.
Justified. (NB Sincerely hoping that this is actually original)
The white guy might actually be guilty.   (Stolen from a comment by  )
A Beef
Hi Jack!
Because Rome wasn't built in a bay.
Yeah! He had a 4-stroke!
Vacuums 
Asbestos they can. 
In an orgy, you fuck and then get tested. In a final exam, you get tested and then you're fucked.
Cuatro Sinko 
He was always declining cards
A Dimitree.
Once it's wet, it's time to go inside!
To get to the other side.
Man: Yes, and how did you know my name was Phones?
It was happy hour.
A non-prophet organization.
He was kinda flakey 
White Vans.
Sneakers.
How do you know if a blonde has been using your computer? When there's white-out all over the screen
Because the air is full of car-bone. 
Babycorn
Because they can turn any animal into a vegetable!
It changes your blood type.
You don't live in Mississippi.
None, they enlighten themselves.
I have no ideer.
A grandmartial artist.  I apologise for any lost brain cells. 
It was a work of friction.
A cucumber.
Poopies.
It's tough to drink, but will go down with a bit of force.
A Cat-illac
He had an antonym.
Because he has no proper tea! Hehehhehahahahhhehveahhs
Getting past the wheelchair.
Don't blow it 
Use a blender to get it in, use tortilla chips to get it out!
They both tend to suck more the more strung-out they get.
No one else wanted to be in a "shit in"
It's called "Nothin' Like A Good Nut!"
On second thought, I can't tell it. It's too edgy
Where she puts the cucumber..
They both lose efficiency as soon as you open windows.
They both blew it.
With a broom and a dustpan.
Wrap music
Because they have little anty-bodies.
You only need one nail to hang up the picture.
Or is it just me?
Nothing, he isn't even in voice chat
Juan v Juan
He force quit. 
NaHBrO  Man I was hoping that would get a good reaction ONaNA, what's my name? HeHe, that joke was terrible.
Genocider
"It's like with a woman - No means Yes."
Because it doesn't make a whole lot of difference if you're sitting at the back of the oven.   Edit: Grammar
Below knee
It would make for a good punchline, wooden tit?
Gas pipes.
When the Mexicans get car insurance.
Nah, it's just this one euro peein' that's getting me down...
When I shift into third without using the clutch. 
Reaching around the front and pretending your dick went all the way through.
Last one they threw into the cooking pot ate all of the potatoes.
Conundrums! 
Bed Bath and the Great Beyond
He wants to grab them by Debussy.
It was an explosive success
I can clearly see ur nuts.
Because she was in the shower and didn't hear him because the elephant stump was on full blast.
They both have problems with delivery.
The trumpet...
Biden...
Veni Vidi Veni
-So he could roll down the window when it gets too hot. How we joke in Kurdistan 
Turns out she was a quack whore.
One's a Swedish Phish and the other's a fetus swish
They're fucking assholes. 
Hello, what a day. How are you feeling today? What does the serial killer doctor say?  Hello, what a day! How are you feeling today?
America.
So her knuckles don't drag.
I just need to get fundead.
Because they all wore mittens.
A spud muffin.
One? Or two?
A filosopher. 
1 for 2008, 1 for 2016
You must seize her by her means of reproduction! 
It is when the blind try to read your face
c.f.   #789
It was his own Strange Brew.  You would be Moranic not to like it.
A fridge doesn't fart when you pull your meat out.
A rolling cock-block
Stephen Hawkings after a house fire.  
Don't bother. That shit's worth 29 points. 
Those were two separate measurements.
#relationshipgulls
He drowned them in the morning.
An RPG
I say-I say, you get cum in your mouth
If she can give you oral with a dip in and know which to swallow and which to spit.
"Your holiness"
Fucking hypocrites!
On a survey for 'which conditioner you use?' 99% of the womens said 'aaahhhhhh.....get out of my shower!!!!'
Kick his sister in the jaw.
Sometimes one side of the V is longer than the other - do you know why? -"No, why's that? " -More geese.
Brownian Motion
Kill his family.
E.I. G.I Joe.
Sofa.
Swedish
a Tippihedron
9 months
Al-redi-reddi-tt.
Why, wouldn't the winter be over by the time they reach, if they walk all the way along? So they fly.
Science flies you to the moon. Religion flies you into buildings 
Ohio.
I don't need a lightbulb when I have the furnace ready.
Trump change
They say it was force of habit.
A double Manhattan on the rocks.
Jack Daniels is still killing Indians.
Do you even Lyft, bro?
I'm not coming into work today
Donald Tr- WRONG!
They exchanged loads 
Because, time will always tell.
Gee, u knit?
He wasn't a charitable guy
Paradise.
She's only wearing one sock.
He had carpool tunnel
J-lo Cloths
Because the land does not wave back. 
I don't know nobody has ever made it across.
He was just as fast as the others in the flock, but he couldn't stop.
"It's a phenomena (do doo do doodoo)"
Because it's easier than running from Law Enforcement.
They don't know where home is. 
Triggernometry.
Donald Trump or Hillary Clinton? Does Donald Trump get the media? No. He still wins. When reading thing about the SNL skit, about Chicago super fans and Mike Ditka
Because chickens didn't exist yet.
Because figuratively breaking the country apart isn't enough. 
There was a face off in the corner
Beats me
Tequila
An R key.
You can't play football with the remote.
Son : No, what happened ? Dad : It is ok he woke up.
Excuse me, can I push in your stool?
A: Conservation of momentum.
Because they made The Wall.
With a pair of Caesars...
Two clean fingers.
Skip it.
When its ajar
Twerky
Bristoles!
I asked him and he said, "I still love Vista baby".
To get to the front page
Because he had a crack addiction.
"Ouch, that Hertz!"
They both sleep all night and whack all day!
We're coming for you next...Snow Mexicans.  -America 
They're never trigger happy.
50 cent feat. Nickelback. 
Don't worry, the dinner's on me.
Because they can reach.
He wanted advice on how a wall is built and how it works.
His name was Sergei.
El Diablow
They both have small hands/fins and aren't afraid of touching the butt or grabbing something else for that matter  ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Crackers.
Ewe. Sorry, that was baaaaad.
Peanut Butter.
Because he can't give two cents 
Snowballs.
Because they can't think straight.
You Hooker on Phonics ;)
Nacho average guy
Cuz he knew Trump would bring his own Pence
Are you grabbing it yet??
She only puckers up for her pacifier. 
I hear the food is good but there's no atmosphere. 
because he was kneaded.
16, 32, 64, and 128
The one that has a Trump up his sleeve
Orange
A zip. 
They call him the air con.
I'll meet you at the corner!
Just two, how did they get in there anyway?
Because he lives at the navel observatory
Don't pay her. 
They are better shaken, not stirred.  I usually have one in my hand.  One is too few and three are two many. 
"Girl, I'm lycan your style."
Because no black guy stays to see his kid grow up.  Be gentle with me, it's my first time.
99 6dip74545cheese
Pardon me.
Nein-Tales.
He likes to keep things white and straight.
The Pirates always lose.
Dreadful.
Diagon alley
Because there's nothing to care-aboot. (caribou)
The thin comedian does stand up comedy While the fat comedian does sit down comedy  BADUMTSS
How can you breath through that thing.
It is the perfect country to Putin your pocket.
Me neither 
Shopping never causes heart attacks, but paying the bill does!
Sean Murray and PS4 users 
If I want to fill all 3 of the prostitute's holes, it's extra.
Yo can I crash at your place? 
Because they have durian...
Get Smart
His mail order bride has to stay with him now. 
Because it's 13:37! I came up with this last night and have been waiting to post it until 1:37pm my time.
You won't go to prison for blowing up a beach ball.
Canada and Mexico.
I ain't still born yet! 
Kill Bill
With the help of a Trumpoline.
Both got screwed out of office
yes,if you are a billionaire! 
9/11 and 11/9 - darkest days in American history
You planet.
Because he hit a bump in the road. What was the bump in the road? Little Timmy. 
In Barbie, Ken doesn't beat the hell out of women.
I put on the wrong socks this morning.
An Asthma attack.
He dies in his LA home at 82.
Because they don't like to mooooooooooooove.
Son: Well, would you be friends with someone who was stupid, took drugs and was drunk all the time? Mom: No, Never! Son: Well neither would he!
Muhahahammed
A hot diggity dog.
Lukewarm.
Because trumps bringing his own pence.
A transpestite.
They both abandoned the EU
Because she was illegal. 
By having 25 million people move to Canada.
Not bad.
Donald J. Trump.
Play the national anthem. They'll all sit down
Homo-Sectionals
A campaign promise.
A URLologist
Walking....J.K . Rowling
Have him stand against a wall.
Finding out it's curable.
The answer's irrelevant as they all suck at it anyway.
God doesn't think he is Donald Trump.
America.
it took Jesus   to respawn. 
Choosing between a cunt and an asshole is fun for sex.
Orange is the new black. 
One is shitting ice cubes and the other is Ice Cube shitting.
They charge too much !
multi .
You're fired!
88 jokes per hour.
Donald trump.
The Wall-eye.
Luftwaffles 
Because they're short-sighted.
DJ Trump.
Whatever it is, its heading straight for the World Trade Center.
An Air-port
Otherwise, we'll all have hell toupee.
Because they don't have anybody to go with.
Through the Electoral College.
Swishnu
1600 Pennsylvania Ave.
A hooker can wash her crack and resell it.
Last I heard, they're all headed to Portland 
Ten tacos
"Can we still be cousins?"
Well, they're pretty fly if you ask me. 
Absolute Filf!
Their journey went south.
"Ta, lads."
Asparaghiss!
No lollygagging.
TRUMP
Small medium at large.
Ironic
He patted his hair and said "See America now that you are the Presidential Hair you are the great again."
Thanks, Michelle! 
Americans who voted for Hillary 
Sorry-o  And his brother: Luig-eh?
D, M, C, and A.
Nobody knows.
A: Put your head through a window and the pane will just disappear!
Besides that's what she said and yo mama.
A: Because he was sitting on the deck !
Cuz they know how to make a great wall
He is a good breast-stroker. 
Because you're 11/10.
In Greece.  
American evangelicals At least the 80% majority of them.
Seems like the tables have turned.
A little fish that smells like fingers. 
Because with swim times like his, he might be president some day.
"So much pussy!"
Good support in-game, bad in giving child support. gg no re
Dunno, I just fly the drone.
Canada and Mexico both are.
Christopher Reeve...
They are both run by red-headed clowns.
'you're just white trash'
They blocked streets with a human wall
It goes chew chew.
Wha suh b?
It was caught Red Panded
A start.
He only promised to be gone until November
Little meinsteins.
Because he was low crab of course.
Gerrymandarin.
She struggled to control her pupils.  
Illumi-naughty
They'll have no one to sell it to.
Bill's staff waited until after the election to suck.
It's because of all the crude oil they keep ingesting.
Stop paying the bill. 
Because Hillary took the L.
I have a huge boner.  Get it boehner, boner? hahaha fuck man I should do a comedy special.﻿
I think it was off by 4 years. 
Because every black man gets a longer sentence 
Orange is the new Black
Between Mexico and the US. 
A hot dog
Republicans weren't off of work yet.
A loser
tell a woman you love her and she says "i think we're just friends..."
I mean, what did you expect from those savages that still use the Imperial System and eat pure deep fried butter?
A Pho queue
One achusetts.
The trumpet.
Thermal cameras mean I can't save anyone by hiding them in my roof.
Lourdes. Mother Theresa always goes there. 
Because all the white people are already supporting him
Trudeau likes to stokes pussies where as Trump likes to grab em
I'm a liberal democrat representing 32 recently deceased voters in Michigan. /s\
Nothing, it's already a joke.
neither have they
take a load off
He went to DFS and they're wasn't a sale on.
A big ol' Allepper
Because they're so good at it.
Because that would be 
Because I would rather fucking vote for it than these candidates
Regina George, because she got hit by that bus.
Cuz i wanna get roiiggghhhtttt into you.
You can unscrew a lightbulb.
Because, similar to leaves fallen from a tree, black people are dead inside.
'I'm in light urn.'
You can't hear an enzyme.
At No-Pulse Nightclub.
Someone is losing their trailer..
He wanted arrays.  It had to be reiterated several times before it was sorted out.
One of them is a racist carrot
If you don't pull out in time, it will cost you a lot of money.  My boss said he made this up on the spot yesterday. Never heard it before so I figured I'd post it. 
Imagination
It seems odd but it wanted to get even.
I couldn't eat another mortal.
Light blue.
The truck can only take the load from behind where as the whore can take it from anywhere.
Only one more day left until the start of the 2020 Presidential Election Season!!
Friends. 
He kept leaving ball marks on the greens.
Well, I haven't come up with the punchline yet, but you can probably see where I'm going with it.
trigonometry. (trigger-ometry)
Because they have 4 lips.
The Voyager Probe, speeding away from Earth at 38,000 mph.
DJ Trump! Donald John Trump
Malnutrition.
He can't run away from his responsibilities. 
Five sailors died digging his grave.
The whip
The vending machine.
Because 9/11.
It can't buy you money.
Because he thought it was another mole, due to his poor eyesight.
It's a small world after all.
I'm still looking for the right bridge, any suggestions?
They keep the tips.
Well he was handed everything in life. Have you seen his hands? Most of what he was gifted slipped right through.
They're both full of trans fats
Hah, gulag with that.
Europ'en Uranus and get ready for my Ursa Major directed towards your Bootes.﻿
Because there's too many cheetahs!
At the "meet and eat"
Cell phones
Let it ring.
Just Juan 
He got married. 
Tacos
They both cantaloupe.
'cause I wanna unzip you and open you up.
None. They can't climb the ladder. 
The wheelchair. 
Orange
Discrimination
Oh, I got confused; after all, they are both painful on the anus!
The Mediterranean Sea
Because it said concentrate.
Mice crispies.
Because they're afraid of the Trump suit.
We better get some support, or people will think we're nuts!
A cow's cunt is on the outside.
Eh, it's a bit of a stretch. 
Because the muslim ones are on the no-fry list.
Amèlie Amèlie Amèlie Amèlie Amèlie
One is made of plastic and is very dangerous for little kids to play with. The other carries groceries.
Jokemon.
You're killing me Smalls. 
It would be a fowl proceeding.
To screw in the lightbulb.
A creature that sucks blood from your knees.
Wall-E.
They remove all attachments.
Brasshole
. . . mitosis
Because he was driving her buggy.
A gene-ius
A little hoarse!
You look for the fresh prints!
Because seven's odd.
So that men can think for a solution in silence.
Global Worming.
Providing child support.
The knocking is out of time and they don't know when to come in.
Q: Why can't a blonde dial 911? A: She can't find the eleven.
Because in 3 days, he would be a raisin
A margarita hits the spot every time.
Upper Tears
We found his Heads & Shoulders in the glove box.
A Cadillac.
To get to the other side. 
Because he wanted a PRIME-MATE!  sorry ...sorry twice if this is an old joke
He rarely kneeded the dough.
If a black man asks you to hold his beer, you can be sure that he'll come back for it.
Well..it's not hard
snow balls.  I love this joke because it's innocent enough to be acceptable in most circumstances, yet dirty enough to be interesting. 
They suffer from m'ladies
She couldn't see that well.
A nervous wreck...
Because they're all in de Nile.
Chewsday
It doesn't
Succubi
All their supporters are home with sick kids 
Trigger Treat.
You really have to nail it
He didn't understand the gravity of the situation.
He worked it out with a pencil.
Because he left a residue at every pole.
Walking (punchline in comments)
walking. JK ROLLING
They both suck, but only she swallows. .... Yes this joke suck hard. I apologise. 
It was assaulted.
Planck walkers
Round of 16
A roamin Catholic
Ohio
The end has no Jack. 
They both end on a Sundee
She won't admit that she's 35
Because they have nothing to fret about!
Wow.  I can't believe you don't know this.  There is a Vas Deferens between the two. 
Walking. ... JK Rolling. 
It doesn't have windows.
A bench can support a family of four.
Ten-tickles
on a knead the dough basis.
A reflex of course.
Chinko De Mayo
You're in treble mister!
Crime stopper
"Hey! Ewe!"
AAAA
A rednnnnnneeeeeeeccccccccckkkkkk.
You can't use a pitchfork on the bowling balls.
One is the art of the fold, the other, the fart of the old.
Never mind, it just flew over your head. 
"I'm going to suck.."
He didn't wrap his Whopper
The bible. Please don't kill me for this.
Because analogy was already taken.
An obliga-tree.
AYE MATEY
Who cares. 
Udder destruction!
Virgin mobile.
A pair. 
There are twenty of them..
French army.
None, he fell.
I am baroque, can you lend me some money?
An astronaut, you racist. 
They gefilter fish.
-Finnished
Hey, wanna get blazed?
Its the 5/7 day of the week
It was actually sham-poo.
Histogram 
A: Police horse
They'll both try their best to suck the life out of you...
He had to work it out with a pencil...
A schoolbus full of children.
Ba-dum-tss
When you tell them that you want to see proof, all they can do is tell you about it!
A zit will wait until you’re twelve before it comes on your face.
One has soul full of hope & one has a hole full of soap... I'll walk myself out, sorry first post here 
Her dog is also blind 
A Klondike.
Goatmeal.
Because he saw the salad dressing.
The Antichrist
She has a tampon behind her ear and can't find her cigarette 
Did you just assume my tender??
Nap-kin
Harry can escape the chamber.
A brick. 
Fifty shades of G'Day
It's Erection Day
To get to the other side of Chris Christie. From the book: Donald Trump Is F**king Goofy: Jokes and Limericks
Because you're flat and fertile
She takes Sadderall. 
The second letter.
It's pasteurized before you can even see it.
[removed]
To get back to Mexico
Depends on how hard you throw them. 
Hitler had a reason to kill himself.
Sthaftey scthissors!
A whine cellar. 
All the ones I have met have been Jew-ish
[removed]
A solmate 
Han Solo. Because he took a shot first.
None, they'll just make the Mexicans do it. 
They prefer radians.
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
A person with a masturbation problem. 
It's beer pressure.
Wet. 
They aren't gonna fall for that one again.
Test post please respond
Lupus
"Number one, I crashed my bike yesterday morning, and number two           " edit: grammar fix
Getting head at the same time.
A not-see
He pasta way
Weddit
Because I want to shoot kids inside you. 
Ancient grease
A Warehouse.
They write themselves a doctor note  (some shitty oc for ya'll) edit: okay not oc but not repost, i need dat karma to feed kids
For hispanic attacks.
Six Million.
You only get laid once, and that's by your mother!
G'night mate
As a mother, I choose not to screw it in. Light bulbs are dangerous weapons created by the Soviet Union, and I will not screw it in; it could severely hurt my child. As everyone knows, light bulbs are the principle source of autism in this world, and I have to take a stand on it.
dood
There were many knights.
"Cancer stole our jobs!"
my life. 
Outlaws are wanted people 
Retarded.
It's tiring.  
A cheap pansy
They're on Thor.
One drove all the snakes from Ireland, the other drove away all of the Native Americans.
One blows a 3' 1" lead and the other blows a 3-1 lead
HAND SOLO  hahaha fuck you
Well, one's a spineless, gutless, heartless, brainless, venomous, slimy, nasty creature whose mouth and anus are the same orifice. The other is a form of sea life.
"If you cross me it will be the last thing you do!"
Guns don't move out when you bring a new one home.
Because his pecker is on his head
Keep the tip.
The NaaaaayyyVY
The list off ways is to long too fit hear.
"I came, I saw, and I came again".
Because butter fly. 
Yeah but only by a couple inches. I think I killed a parrot...
Xavier
50$
Because you should never drink and derive.
I don't know, ask Dave.
"You sick fuck, I'm calling the cops."
Rev
Uppsala
Hillary Clinton
He had to swallow his pride
Nothing.
Are you having a crisis?
An Or-phone.
The Cleveland Indians.  
The Almost Windians.
...They Leave a Trail of Tears
Seriously, you didn't hear? He was screaming from the pain for four hours straight at 2 a.m.
Boeing boeing boeing
Apple juice
[removed]
Because it is two tired. 
With a cell phone.
They objectify everything.
I glove you. 
No Wanna go camping?
Nun-chucks.
The Bern Pile 
Apparently not 29
Because, it wasn't very Pharoah-dynamic.
Because there were too many damn inequalities.
FEMA representative: During the last storm did you receive any damage to your property? Homeowner: Hail, yes.
Ill call you tomorow
Both come in waves...
3 ants saw an elephant coming.  Ant 1: We will kill him.  Ant 2:  We will break his legs.  Ant 3:  Forgive him guys,  he is alone and we are 3...
"Voulez-vous brûler avec moi ce soir?"
It makes them rather sheepish. 
Because they lasted a minute in battle
A pedantry. 
One is a veterinarian, and the other is a Veteran Aryan.
Women.
An unpolished one.
Women: Both, you go to yours and I’ll go to mine.
Tell Jamal to drop it
Dead
[deleted]
wouaaa wouaaa wu wu welcome refugees
Fibonacci
These Boots Are Made For Walken.....
Hockey players shower after 3 periods.
Dress her up as a choir boy!
Piranhahahahaha Don't lynch me
She has cancer
An under cover cop. 
Chicken sees a salad.
because it overswept
Really fucking confused. 
Greggs don’t look down on you when you eat their creampie
Racism has many faces. EDIT: Read "asians" as "people from Japan, China and both of the Koreas". Because some redditors are pissed at me for being racist, while telling a racist joke. 
The ashes reminds them of their parents.
Apparently that's all they spent.
My watch hasn't got a strap on.
They both have motherboards, but no fatherboards
Captain Morgan comes alive when you add coke.
It's the time he'd barge in on beauty contestants changing to try to see them naked.
RIP post
Erotic is when you use a feather; kinky is when you use a whole chicken.
Deer testicles, it's under a buck. 
...cause dam!
Nun.
They are looking at your shoes, rather than their own.
Rock and Heavy Metal
A screensaver.
They both feel really good but when you look down you know you're gay.
Honey, I'm home!
Give me a ring sometime.
Aruuuuuugula
Yeah, its some kind of Meme. Well in my peoples Tongue, Ayy lmao means: "I am in great Pain, please help me."
Hello.. Hello..? Lama sabachthani?! 
Rogue Juan
With a Lucille Ball.
He glue up.
Licka de split!
Ironman, he's a Fe male.
Weiners got them both in trouble but in the end nobody really cared. 
Everywhere
It's Minute Made
Because anywhere else it would've been called the teethbrush
MOO! Bitch, get out the way... Get out the way... Get out the way. 
An Aunt-eater.
they go to the moovies
Cut a hole in the ice, place a bunch of peas in that hole, and when a polar bear comes to take a pea, kick him right in the ice hole.
If they're good ones, they'll both blow really well.
With a tuna.
A Heilstone
Because the land never waves back.
Because there is no oxygen and they'd die from UV radiation, you idiot.
It's shocking. 
Over my dead body...
Candidate: I fall in love easily.  Interviewer: What's your weakness?  Candidate: Those blue eyes of yours.
He had a problem with boos.
Joint custardy
I thought the title was the start of a joke. You OWW me one joke!
A:  Ooga booga baby!
Mom: Well son, it all started when I asked the wrong man for directions.
As many as will fit.
An orphan. 
A Tutsi roll!
Pixie-lated
M'lady 
A pearrot
It's not about strategy, but endurance.
One's a rugrat, the other's a regret.
9/11 jumpers they went 79 stories in 10 seconds.
Because it was A Minor. If anyone posted this before me, all credit is to be given to them.
Ugh, Ugh Ugh? Uggh!
A Dead End.
Because they can't take it seriousry.
Because it was covered in sheet
What did the ghost give his girlfriend on Halloween? A "booquet" of flower.
It's OK, he woke up
One is a cheesy sack of toxic crap that is pumped with orange dye and hot air and is sold to ignorant masses with no taste. The other is a corn-based snack food.
Cremate 
Because it's always flat.
tamagotchi 
Because her boyfriend was going in  .
Galaxy Note 7 (Exploding Variant)  Just kidding it's an iPhone, you racist fuck.  This joke has probably already been said before, so please up-vote.
In his sleevies! 
Oh, wait, nevermind. You've probably never heard of them.
Wife : would you please call our children by their real names? 
Junk mail
Why does it have to be a group activity?
This place is totally radical!
Because she was fucking blind. 
Because he kneaded a poo.
a mathacre
You wouldn't pay to have a potato on you.
We're not falling for that one again!
Two: one to shoot and one to sell him to shoot back.
He didn’t have a leg to stand on
Idk, ask your mother.
A theocracy.
Na
He eats shoots and leaves
M'laria.
The more you play with it, the harder it gets.
I'd tell you happy birthday, but to me, you've been dead for centuries ⚡️
America.
'WE NEED TO BUILD A RAMP!'
For fingering a minor.
They both only work with a chain on.
The Final Solution
Mourning wood!
They go Triggertreating.
Cuatro sinko 
A lunchador.
I got my ion you. 
He looks at your shoes instead of his
A llama-fall.
A knife has a point 
A mist conception. 
They both get laid by Mexicans. 
Because ultimately it was Hillary who ended up showing her the Huma door.
"Make me one with everything" (assuming he would be able to talk in the first place)
A high-jacker.
Because that would be the crappiest job ever. 
Because they are a Joke!
They have a mole on their body.
A Labragoogle.
With 30 pieces of silver
Can you smell carrot?
Francium.
So they can see the battle.
Their Seoul Mate. 
You can make soldiers out of toast!
Aye matey
You Sioux them.
Au.
Snowballs.
Suicide Bombers. They are used to blowing themselves.
A Ghost Pepper.
Because it was the hottest pepper.
"Awaken, my pump- "
A pool table
He didn't want any beef. 
Half of the grass gets eaten and the other half gets smoked
Libyated
The Carpet store 
Are you joking? They can't even change a dirty diaper!
"Can I have a private server?"
Amadeus Vult!
They were looking for Mein Kampf and got misdirected.
They both spend all their money on payphones.
Bitch.
Vote!
Conceived at a family reunion and crawling with criminals.
Its his name.
Sick, he definitely has fever.
American women get stoned before they commit adultery..
Because of hispanic attacks..
Because the suspense is killing them. 
Coma-toes.
a STRAWberry. ...I'll go...
Because I'm the only "G" you need 
The strokes
Ovary Enthusiastic
Strawberry Filled forever!
He didn't look in both directions before crossing.
Bruised Lee
She found another woman's lipstick on his knuckles.
The steaks have never been higher
They want to look like their mothers.
Who should have played Bilbo Baggins in Lord of the Rings? Bruce Willis. Because old hobbits die hard.
BOOB
Mike Meowser 
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
He had some time to kill.
Because Oct31 = Dec25
Takes a laxative.
Their supply list told them to "jackboots."
Later. 
A skeleTON.
A flying saucer.
He heard it was finger licking good.
So she can moan with the other.
Dork chocolate
A Freudian slip
Wheat intolerant.
I don't know but I heard it cost him an arm and a leg.
The parents would love to know.
Ten-ants !
"Ummmmmmmmmm...."
They have poorly developed motor skills. 
Cuatro sinko
I keep asking people, but they don't know either.
He drinks it just like he drinks every other kind of spirit.
No Escape
I will hit you so hard that it will leave a Marx. 
He's a whole two feet shorter.
That's when he became a not-see
                       
Germany. 
Canadian club on the rocks.
Shitty posts 
They like horsin' around.
Because he only comes once a year and that's down a chimney.
Mississippi
Because he wanted to create a new front-ear!
You oscillate its tit a lot.
Out of sequins! 
How much damage can their Weiner make...
He goes back 4 seconds.
A receding hareline.
A miner infraction!  From  , posted by 
Because 7 is a Six offender Edit: should say "But why is 5 afraid of 7?" Sorry
Salman Rush B
Cause I'm not finding a spot to attach my cover letter. 
A Bald Kegel. 
Because she couldn't see that well.
He went data way.
An impasta.
Because he figured that would be a bad hobbit to get in to. 
Your Oklahomie.
It's just what we tend to do
They did unspeakable things to him.
He didn't make the cut 
Edit: Sorry about the repost, heard this joke from a friend, who, in turn, saw it on Twitter. :):
He has a history of having a history about history 
The way that the punchline of the joke is delivered.
He joined the que que que 
"IS SOMEONE OUT ON THE VEST? THE VEST? THE VEST? THE VESTIBULE?"
Sexually frustrated
With a broken magic wand.
No? Neither have they.
Old age
Grinder (Thanks, Ellen)
Because they cantaloupe...
Turd.
It has a crack in it. 
Hebrews it.
Because it was in the middle of 9 11
They're mostly really nice people, but they have the French living there too.
Dad jokes.
Because they're going via Agra!
Because they die in them.
Blue Sonnet
Because you need a soul for that.
They were in airplane mode. (I'm so sorry)
I folded it in half.
People say it's cause he has the tightest wraps
Academia nut 
Chelsea.
full.
Paranorman
They don't come with trigger warnings.
The government
A stray table. 
Voldemort
I was told they were sick of being subordinates. 
Shroom, shroom. shroom
Before they titrate, they need to get buffer!
A Weea-Jew
He only broke into the watergate hotel once. He should have done it everyday. Then it would have been normal. Yes, you got it, jokes on you. 
In Transylvania
Maybe I should just liquify it.
Godfrey
One. No, two! No, four! No, eight! No, sixteen! No, thirty-two! ...
They ketchup.
They only have one I.
Because they never speak up.
Cealls
All are equally oxymoronic.
In river banks
Well, you want them to work, don't you?
The Bucket!
A fur-nace
Because they do nothing except making themselves cross.
"Konnichihuahua"
Because Sheeran
An Orlando     sheet party...
Yakuztics
Khakistan!
Carpool tunnels
"Hi, why don't you have a seat right over there please.."
Gigahurts. (Came up with this in the car on my way to school hopefully its original)
Because if it had four it'd be a chicken sedan.
Ones a cunning array of stunts. . .
A pickpocket snatches watches
He’s back on tour.
Immigration.
My sister.
Actibia.
Canadian knows the difference between a school and a shooting range.
Hot because you can actually "catch a cold".
A pickpocket snatches watches
The baby grows up and learns to stop crying.
It was a lawn-distance relationship.
Not as many as it takes to point out that they did Nazi it coming.
Dung
A tip
Because they have to go by the book.
Their assets are already frozen!
BRRR BRRR
Isaac Newton died a virgin
Me: I've been playing poker with some blokes. Wife: Playing poker with some blokes? You can pack your bags and fucking leave. Me: So can you sweetheart; this ain't our fucking house anymore!
Because he's got a hollow-weenie.
2 1/2
Graaaaaaiiiiiinnns
Yes you say?! Well consider yourself mentally challenged.
Popeyes
Well well well...
"Sorry, I http"
Dracula. Frankenstein went down for the count.
"I charge five dollars if it’s a boy and five dollars if it’s a girl. Let’s just say this one’s on the house.”
Neither one will rape a Mexican.
They're both leg ends.
To see how high the mexicans pole vaulters can jump﻿
This morning I had pancakes.
Because Mad Cow Disease was already taken.
"Hold onto your nuts, this ain't no ordinary blow job."
She deserves affair trial. 
A pizza doesn't shoot up a school.
You don't let him eat. . What, did you think I was going to say something about work boots? Racist dick.
Lmao Zedong
Elephino
A hollowpeno
You have to drop the bomb twice.
They ran out of juice!
No Juan has more respect for women than I do.
God supports everything.
[removed]
Did you just assume my wattage??? FLICKERED
I'd say it's fifty fifty
They've both been f***** by a rapist
Because 7 is a registered six offender.
Irrelevant. 
I've seen a lot of shit!
I'll keep an eye out for you!
"Wham, bam, thank you fam"
"Here, try this, Israeli refreshing!" 
He had nowhere else to turn
The grip. 
You break them at the middle and load them from behind
Of course, a house doesn’t jump at all
Alarmed.
West Virginia, anywhere else it would be called the teethbrush
A flat minor
When stoners are smoking, they don't explode.
Permutations.
Who knows, they never get the house. 
Poor, Old, Niagga, Thinks, It's, A, Cadillac.  Ba dum tssss 
He's trying to save the reefs, because he wants to protect coral.
When it's intercepted by a separate plane.
She had two pounds of crack in her knickers.
Pilot error
R-E-D-D-I-T
Take your combat boot off his head. 
A bouldering. (Sorry guys ive been indoor rock climbing lately)
BOO BEE!!  <insert titty-twister here>
Jew kill all the people who'd be offended :L
Walking. Jk. Rolling
They use a cow-culator!  Ba-dum-tsss!
A Sandy Hook survivor 
The quick E
Wrinkly. 
To sharpen the knife 
From their mother's computerus.
It's formula won.
It was in-tents.
A S C E T I C
So his wife won't get pregnant
It goes back four seconds
Because they benefit from grape culture.
British sign says " Maximum 6 People/500kg" Ethiopian sign says "Maximum 500 People/6kg"
.. you can't hear an enzyme 
They wear a rolex watch around their waist. 
Suet
Kanye asada.
He brews it.
An asphalt
It runs in your genes.
Thyme management
Because he wants to make America grate again 
Remains to be seen.
He was trying to save Krypton
"You, you and you. Get out."
Hand them a mechanical pencil with the lead out and see how the use it. Child A: look mom I'm a doctor! - expect them to live to 80+ years. Child B: look mom I'm a heroin user! - expect them to live to about 27.
You have to repost the joke twice before she realizes that it isn't funny anymore
Kawaii
Decom-pose. 
And Abori-genie.
There's so many wings it's easy to wing the wong number.
They weren't born yesterday.
1 sleep until Christmas.
She doesn't want to move into a smaller house in a black neighborhood. 
Attire.
Because Stalin in standing on Lennins shoulders. From a Russian friend.
they wanted to restore the CNNomies
Tostitos.
Because in Japan they're rocksmiths. 🤘
A Moo - nwalker
Too many spooks.
10 lbs of pressure on the back of the head. 
The Third Write 
So they can sneak across pool tables. Have you ever seen an elephant sneaking across a pool table? Works, doesn't it?
Leftovers
Spoopify
It better get thrown out by November 8 or else I'm going to get violently sick.
Because nothing gets under their skin.
He was a snow call, snow show. 
A deviled egg. Hmath out.
Incestry.com
Pothead plants.
'I charge you with battery'
The best ones are consistently sub-par.
"Hey kid, you wanna buy a candy?" 
She gagged.
He was feeling a bit Sikh
Because they always draw a cardigan. 
It never worked out because they never met
Because he is PM not AM
Mourning breath!
A parallelogram.
Na, it's too cheesy!
A SoCal Justice Warrior.
He works it out with a pencil.
Because it's pretty basic stuff.
A Trup vote.
Because they make up literally everything
Police are looking for a gang of hardened criminals.
My nose
A political uprising.
To remind black people that they were cotton pickers before drug dealers.
One's an overblown Nazi gasbag  and the other's a dirigible. 
A small medium at large! 
Boko Harambe
He doesn't, they are both Aryans.
Because the are always metal-ing.
He was always oncol
That explains the meatier showers.
Triple Hay 
Is this the man I want my kids to spend every second weekend with?
Stick with me man... We'll go places. Peace. Hmath out.
Green Arrow
Vampires aren't real
Nothing
Internal bleeding
They have the right to bear arms
He was outstanding in his field!
A phil-officer. 
Anyway my dad just caught me browsing 
Octopus Prime!
Because he was fat and ugly and no one liked him
Alot of young men went over it. And they would cowardly get shot from the back. Credits to Jeroom.
I can't jelly my dick down your throat. 
The great ones are always white.
Because it was in morning.
A frog in a blender.
They caught her sitting on Pinocchio's Face yelling "Lie you little fucker 
Wipe it off and apologise.
I always cry when I cut an onion
Udderly useless.
The Search Bar.
He was all right.
Because other alphabets were 
Danke Kong
BUMBLEGUM. Five year olds think it's hilarious. I do not. 
Potheads get stoned by choice.
None. They like to live in the darkness.
Staff infection
Because he was outstanding in his field!
The cake comes out of the girl.
lay floss over their eyes
The Czech engine light is always on.
If I wanted to see her blood id look at her face after the Eagles lose.
A skinnytar.
Hermione went alone and was attacked by a troll 
The all up in yo business.
They were in tents 
They have two heads.
They can't find eleven on the keypad.  
Because he was AAAAAYYYYYYY-Sexual
They both barely cover the asshole.
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna!
Oh that's right, it hasn't come out yet..
An Amish drive-by shooting
It runs in your jeans!
He pasta away!
It Hertz.
A Christler.
Very little.
Elixir!!!!!
A: Just look at that young person with the short hair and blue jeans. Is it a boy or a girl? B: It's a girl. She's my daughter. A: Oh, I'm sorry, sir. I didn't know that you were her father. B: I'm not. I'm her mother.
European!
A Chicken Caesar salad
When there's a tampon behind her ear and she's looking for her pencil. 
I dunno, but I bet it mega-hurts!
Because it's a gas planet.
Why did Sally fall off the swing? Because she didn't have any arms. Knock Knock. Who's there? Definitely not Sally. Why did Jimmy drop his ice cream? He was hit by a truck Why didn't the truck turn out of the way? Sally Was driving
.... she uses her own servers
Pump Kin 
I'm not a fan.
The last black man to have a dream got shot.
I heard that it's a little Chewy
The mare, of course
Mary J O'Blige
Vote
Toilet trees.
Because he had no attachments
Helium Neon Argon Krypton Xenon Radon
Dear Sir, We are writing to you because you have violated copyright ...
Too soon?
Because his skeleton was in the closet
Job - he tied his ass to a tree and walked all the way to Jerusalem
Freedom.
They both get toe food
[Filled]
It gives them butterflies in their stomach 
They both like to throw a ho-down.
On crotches...
Trumpeteers.  Because he sure can toot his own horn.  ...before anyone freaks out. Hillary is also a deplorable person. It's a wonderful election season, ain't it folks?
Sunni side up. I know this is a Shiite joke.
Sticky notes. What did he get from his publisher? A hard copy.
They tend to be shells of their former selves
Lamborghini 😆
Rabinowitz:  Whatcha reading? Topper:  Great Expectations. Rabinowitz:  Is it any good? Topper: Its not all I hoped for. Hot Shots Part Deux. Best joke in the movie. 
You don't call it dumbass, you go get it.
They saw it as a sign to pare.
Ann Schluss.  Her books had a way of taking over Czechoslovakia and Austria in particular. edit: Czechoslovakia & Austria
They're more of a kids meal.
It was a little daisy
A salt with deadly weapon
The customer always comes first.
You park your car, man. 
A mosquito stops sucking when you slap it
Water-logged.
Pulled pork.
One has claws at the end of its paws and one is a pause at the end of a clause.
Irradiated cats have 18 half-lives
A baby excavator.
Lukewarm
Exspearamint. inspired by the presidential gum joke.
It's fucking intents
He burnt all the franks.
Blue. One blue one way and one blue the other way.
He could put his foot in his mouth with his head up his ass.
Equatinos
The Canadian Mint
The both leave your crotch on fire
My bike
F5.
A guy will actually search for a golf ball.
Because at the end of they day they don't want any strings attached! 
A roamin' Catholic.
A flamethrower
With a dustpan and broom.
To contact those on the other side. 
Maggie   
He stopped making cents.
The headline read, "Psychic midget escapes from jail"
Because it was Stalin! edit: Sorry! Communist jokes aren't funny unless every gets them.
Wrong, hops.
Some people are against shooting guns.
You put it in a blender.
My voters pamphlet.
Bo nose
Garbage gets picked up!
The execution.
They run for president.
A law-suit
There are twenty of them.
Quarkiplier
Knee-deep! Knee-deep! Knee-deep!
they sure know their way down.
Her miscarriage.
We're so baked. What did the stoner say to his friend? I'm so high,I can hear the brownies talking to each other.
That place is one giant pyramid scheme!
It was Wei Tu Long.
Because it reminded him of Richard Clock, the man accused of viciously knife-raping his wife.
Ten. (Shame this one doesn't work too well for reddit - the funniest part of this joke is the third punchline; enjoying people struggle to understand what the hell you're talking about.)
Carlos.
Steam post-punk
A: A rectangular bear after a coordinate transformation. 
Ebae
Vel-crows. You're welcome.
..Jew Jitsu
Seen it. Seen it. Don't care for either.
Cause I've been watching you... bae.. More of a creepy line.
Sorry, I'm still working on it.
When you arrive at the international airport you are American. There is a room that changes your nationality. When you enter this room you are Russian, when you leave this room you are Finnish, and while inside European. What room is it? 
His brother with your DVD player.
Snow balls. Ha
I'Moth
He pasta away Please send olive your condolences to his family
An alligatorus
He has lots of antibodies.
Triggerednometry
Then I pretend to be dead and disappear for three days.
Consent
He's in stable condition. 
Because he never pays his debts.
So they can hide in cherry trees. You've never seen an elephant in a cherry tree? They're pretty good at it.
With his bear hands. Thank the Chive for that one.
Tyrone
The Clinton's leave a bad taste in her mouth 
Refrigerator doesn't have a 'd' in it.
Because they were Russian!
Orange, Orange you glad I didn't say banana.
BA NA NA NA!
The y-hat.
1) Electile Dysfunction  and  2)  Premature Congratulations.
More heroin. 
Def Leppard
"Stop telling me what to do! You're not the balls of me!" I'll see myself out...
Fruit Jews  .  .  .  Kill me
At headquarters!
When something's bent on top of U
Tri-weekly Try Weekly and Try Weakly
Swalloween!
A silly-yak.
Well for starters the flag is a big plus. 
Behind a badge
He came out of the cupboard. 
A Cocker Manual.
I can't bear it! You axolotl of me this time!
Ones a large, heavy mammal the other's a little lighter.
Repost
A rehearsal. 
Triggered Treating *Its ok i already found the door.
Meshuggah. 
One slip of the tongue, and you’re in deep shit.
Because classical conditioning!
"Suddenly....I'm not half the man I used to be....."
It goes back for seconds
They lowered his coffin, took it out, flipped it the other way round, then lowered it again. 
The purchaser.
Go chuck itself of course. 
Because the P is silent
In space, no one can hear the ice cream truck.
because he always came in another box. 
Your whale cum isn't welcome.
I'll be home in 20 minutes.
Duderonomy! They also like Leviticus.
It must be heredditory.
Inverse
An aspberry!
Edgar Allan Po-Po
Juan by Juan
In the Pro Bowl, they give ten percent.
It was pissed off.
"Rigged, for her pleasure."
A garbage truck.  I'm sorry. 
Cause he's not straight
Losing both your arms.
At tooth hurty.
In iraq
When you run in front of a car you get tired. When you run behind a car you get exhausted.
He could NAZI 
Aloha ackbar
To keep their nuts dry.
They throw one cigarette overboard and the whole boat becomes a cigarette lighter.
He encrypted it
Four blondes waiting at a four way stop.
Sucks to your ASMR, piggy!
Because he was  .
They don't like fast food. 
It's a long line of midgets!
Nothing... 
no shit, Sherlock 
Unicorny
No, you are all all .
An unaware wolf.
Usually they're lying
A cantelope.
Because he was nailed by guys.
So far they've recovered 324 bodies. 
Answer: If You walk in on two roaches fucking on your kitchen counter, you unzip your pants and enjoy the free show.  (The great thing about these is, you can all add your own)
They both took 3 days to respawn 
We stopped Germany.
To get to the shell station.
When you're buying salt.
Me neither.
A Shatbook. 
Shemail.
Pump Kin
culosis.
He couldnt Mufasa enough.
They were aghast.
Michonne-ary
Because they are pretty and hurt you.
A Hans free device
A Colt following
Every box had, in huge letters, "0mg cholesterol!"
The best joke I've ever heard!
A Trump stamp.
A she shell.
None, they just shoot the room for being black
You planet
Walking. JK ROLLING
He went back four seconds.
The police found it easier than arresting her.
Triplets.
I asked for Pizza #KingOfjokes
" an ice cube .. you know what would NOT be cool ? molesting children .. cause that would be really hot " -an ice cream van driver .
To beat the crowd.
The Galaxy note 7
HISSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSTERICAL          
America
She committed soya-cide.
End your text with "this message will self destruct in 10 seconds"
Both are yellow and can't drive.
A whorde.
Refractions
Because he's black.
None. He  ....
He was a mole 
To get to the other slide.
Because there horns don't work
Because they always get stoned
He saw the gas bill.
Mikey Yoda.
Because his dad was killed by armed rubbers.
ALLAH KAZAM!
A 
... One has the Blue Jays in it, the other has the Jews blazin' it.
Stop laughing and reload. (Sorry)
Because everything but the kitchen sinks. =D
Grass...I lied about the wheels.
Because I want to give you kids.
"Mowgli. Now there's a man-child who can take on a Khan and win (makes 'you're fired' motion).
It just makes cents.
By walking...... JK Rowling 
Uncles
You might step on the Lagos.
Because Freedom Rings.
"Check Mate Mate!"
Carrs.
Lack toes and tall or rent
Pet store fired me
Everywhere..
A hockey player showers after 3 periods.
Dank god 
He eats them both. Eats the high horse first, though.
Pa's cow.  I'll show myself out...
It's going to put about 12 cashiers out of work.
For the halibut
IT'S FUCKING FROZEN
They start with Juan
DenimDenimDenim
Then I realised - First she   on one side, then she   on the other.
White vans.
Because they don't wanna look at themselves, when they have sex.
I'm not sure, but they can suck a mean dick.
BAO BAO BAO BAO
Blowjob: You can beat your meat, eggs, or wife, but you can't beat a blowjob.
Cooked Hillary
He builds a wall around it.
One's a crusty bus station and the other's a busty crustacean. 
"Cooking: The Books"
(gotta love the classics) You can unscrew a light bulb
Sorry if that was not likeable and miserable,  Okay, I am going to stop before it gets too dark and too empty,
Discrimination
Vidi, Vici, Veni.
Fi-Dell
The Beavers are leaving DamNation by the hundreds.
Because the cops are Dublin the fines! (It took me a three hour car ride to come up with this... I am not a clever person)
It doesn't matter what you call him, he isn't coming.
Two up front, two in the back, and six million in the ash tray.
Shartnado.
Hand Solo
A rookie.
A horde.
The GOP is pro-life.
Meat Patty
So that he didn't fall in the hot cocoa.
You're  !
The blonde, because she's 18.
The plot was a bit scattered.
I spy.
The bucket
Summer, they like it before it's cool
Because of the implication.
Its sweeping the nation
Because he kept on rubbing the wrong lamp.
Because it was "bleat"ing... 
Because they knee grows.. 
Just kitten
They couldn't find three wise men or a virgin.
Because he was Haydn
I want my Nickleback....
The human one.
It's called tender 
Pilot. You racist fuck.
Hillary Clinton is so bad, she has a pantsuit made out of Ed Gein.
The ceremony wasn't much, but the reception was excellent. 
A problem. What do you call when 3 terrorists are on the moon? A problem. What do you call when all the terrorists are on the moon? A solution.
A spear has a point!
Because she had a cavity that needs filling!
Dat bout
"I'm not Willie Nelson."
A baked potato
Tchaikovsky's  .
Just one, but first the tire really has to want to change. 
It is the language of Wales.
He did it single-handedly.
They didn't have any chemistry. 
Christian Bale
Make him run a lap then do 10 push-ups and sit-ups
Probably
Nothing. They both manage to stay popular despite a whole load of crap.
Two cannibals giving each other blowjobs. 
It keeps getting agitated
¡Diez mio!
Have you seen Finding Dory?
The-Odor-e Roosevelt.
He had no guts!
They have no idea where home is.
They don't fucking listen!!
During sex it's fun to choose between asshole and cunt.
Oedipal Arrangements
To render the Building on the other Side
I think it would still be a dog...
They both look good until they hit the ice.
...Au revoir poo poo
He sure as shit wasn't gonna get it for singing.
A co-operating system.
The other half
When you reach around it feels like you went all the way through. 
I don't know but it's not rhelephant. 
You let the pit bull finish.
It was a little chile!!
A cannibull..ha..ha..?
It cost an arm and a leg
Aboot
Shit floats.
I dont know but it would be Hillary Us.
Because he's a clown!  Buh bum tis
Donald J. Trump
Higher than you would think, the structural integrity of a well laid concrete floor renders it virtually indestructible towards an incoming egg, even at terminal velocity.
He fell into a korma
To bring it back to samsung, you racist.
SpARGHetti
You have to hold on to something, when the shit hits the fan. ;->
Because if they didn't they'd fall over.
Burnt nose hair.
French flys
Jesus can make them both wine.
Because he overcame the dark side
Because you get   ate more
He got off on a technicality.
A choker.
Because it is aLOAN
Let's bond!
. Everything there is recycled, including this post.
Because he loved Dogs and he had two sons named Plato and Socrates
Bet on it.
"Hard R! HARD R!" 
Owens can finish a race.
the snowBALLS﻿
The rice will then attract Asians who can repair it for you.
Guurrhggrgrh
You're screwed if the rubber breaks.
Yogi
4, but 2 have bomb straps.
Just... the person responsible for making those decisions...
HARAM BAE
What you do to one side, you must also do to your mother
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a kilo fall out of a window 
Blitz it and quit it.
They both exaggerate the length.
Yes, I know it's Yom Kippur. But McDonalds is fast food.
Grape!
A presi  debate.
The shit-flinging monkey has better hair.
PATIENT: I wanted to surprise the bacteria by Surgical Attack.
I guess you can say that they are in short supply these days.
The tainted presidential election.
"Screw is such a harsh word, M'Lightbulb. I have too much respect for lamps to use it." <Tips fedora>
It was a trend a while back to promote awareness for breast cancer. I'm just glad a similar stunt wasn't pulled for prostate cancer.
One is a crusty bus station, and the other is a busty crustacean.
No idea :)
None. Its already lit, fam.
His Reich hand man
Leader.
The chain is too long.
Triggernometry.
A row bot.
Charm-ander
Homeless 
America.
College tuition 
With any luck, right after it finishes college.
Ouch
Hard eh.
Because they were set in stone.
He Freudian slipped.
Because Jericho wants to break the walls down
They went down the drain. 
A sunchoke.
He was too far out, man.
Their personality.
The soviet Onion
Stick it in microwave and turn it on until it's Bill Withers. 
Achilles:   
Beat it. We're closed.
For Hispanic attacks.
One of the clouds in the background is blowing another one. 
Osama Bin Liftin 
A chicken sedan.
They both have to smell it, but neither of them can eat it
One of them is a rape apologist who'd sell out the country for a cheap buck, the other one is Donald Trump. 
Put a scratch n' sniff sticker at the bottom of a pool.
After taking Notes, they realized their was no way they could sell the Fire.
Donald Trump thinks a clean personal server is a showered Mexican.
'Cause I heard that you can't have any pudding unless you eat your meat.
Chuz
Because it's easier than running from Law Enforcement. 
Please weight a second.
One of you is a sick duck, and I forget the rest, but your mother's a whore!
You hit rock bottom!
Because it's dead.
the tyranno-sorest rex
729271
Because her pee is silent. 
You gotta catch Jamal
Nobody knows.
Thought of this one on my own while playing WoW a couple days ago and I'm pretty sure it hasn't been told before. I  like corny jokes. I Googled it and didn't find anything (:
..... Tempermint
There's twenty of them
Literally dozens.
It's very refreshing
A metronome!
Polo
It depends on how thinly you slice them. 
Cheesus
I'll beheading out now. 
Cuz you're a 10/10
Sue-per Man
Tequila.
Half of London 
Dead kittens.  Can't get a pitchfork into the bricks.
So am I. It was kinda funny the first time but now they're just annoying.
Because amazon and chill has 1 day delivery.
Cause you're 10/10. 
Because you're 10/10
A nuclear family
A dandy lion.
How many "friend zoned" guys does it take to change a light bulb? None. They just compliment it and get mad when it won't screw.
Synthia 
Your Holiness.
They are both dead...
Menace-Soda.
Im here for the boos. 
All of them
Pregnant 
America
Decomposing
Gulag to you too.
A New Yorker takes the A train; a Canadian takes the train, eh.
His Samsung Galaxy had a premature detonation.
None. They just compliment it and get mad when it won't screw.
I beat both of them for fun.
Because they are already covered.
Because God planned on giving him his first tablets then.  The mistake? They were Samsung Galaxy Note tablets.
American dyslexia association.
With shear willpower
Alien vs. Predator 
Keemstar
Kevin still doesn't know.
Let's get sheet-faced!
Apparently more than 40, because my basement's still dark
She counts the legs, and divides by 4. 
You skip the punchline.
The doctor had to heal-ium.
A butthurtfly 
A crustasian
A feminist 
All the Mexicans have car insurance.
His ears.
I just haven't come across a well paying spermbank yet.
Its both not that bad, you just shouldnt look down.
One snatches your watch the other watches your snatch.
Weed out only the best suppliers
My ass! (For all you Kung pow lovers out there)
Two cannibals giving each other a blow job.
Polish remover
Boy: A push
Because you're super annoying and wont shut the fuck up.
Crash Bandicoot God I miss this guy.
Because I want to know why you are so racist for clicking on this.
Totake partinthe second debate.
Some poor sap's gonna lose a trailer.
Supergirl has good fundamentals and great passes but she can't dunk.
A veteran-aryan
A major difference. 
The hooker, because she can wash her crack and sell it again
I drink because I am.
he burned his lips on the exhaust pipe
Q: Does an elephant ever forget? A: Only if you loan him money.
A meowntain.
Being in many states and seen on all types of media is how they run for president. 
So do I, guy was Sketchy as hell. 
Practicing
The current choices America has for the job of president. 
In 2015 humans consumed 65 million tons of bananas and only 8 monkeys.
The current US presidential election
A she, no doubt, because it won‘t let you finish your sentence without suggesting other ideas. (no offence to ladies) 
Either Saturday or Sunday, because all others are week days.
Because it's the only way she'll ever get near a medium.
Look a bit to the right.
Because they don't like Dick's.
Because they're 96% water
My boys drive me to drink, but women drive me to drink.
The grip.
Write in The Pussy
Because he wanted to wake up oily.
Get under another one
I noticed that on a couple of posts nearly every single comment was below threshold. Was that a thing that just... happened? Or are people from 4chan or something brigading us?
They're afraid of drowning in a Fjord.
Illiterate Edit: like il-lit-erate
They always have a big bill!
Duck doesn't deny the Armenian Genocide.
Neither of them has anything going on below the waist.
[Removed]
A Dell
Because it wanted to be a little boulder.
Because he didn't habanero.
She kept popping out of bed
You don't have electricians that are colour blind! 
Well... Fuck.
Because Russia was Stalin
He had too much thyme on his hands.
You put it in your shoe and it makes you limp.
It wasn't born yesterday. 
Kingdom come
Two fellows are catching up over a pint.  Neither one of them are in the best of shape.  The older fellow says, "Well now that you've been married a few years, how is the sex life?" The younger fellow says, "The wife calls me Vin Diesel when we are in the sack." The older fellow looks him up and down, thinks for a minute, scratches his chin, and replies, "I'm not seeing the connection." The younger one sits straight with pride, "Because when we are getting busy, she says I'm fast and furious!"
Because its Na.
In the unconscious state
A half-ton pickup.
Ronald McDonald
Botswana kill you
With an ithberg
Oral will make your whole day, Anal will make your hole weak
Cha Ching
Someone who knocks on your door and tells YOU to fuck off.
It's called: "To Catch a President".
To see how high Mexicans can jump
Pro-shooto
By having sex...  First come first serve
Make me one with everything
Thor
Nobody knows!
It slit.
It's too time consuming.
You get chased if you have a star
It turned into a field
New York Jets
About halfway
You use a cow-culator. Or you round them up. Or any other method the commenters want.
Because in the interview they answered every question with "sea senor"
Blizzards. 
Oh, what a relief! 
A Sasha Fierce!
A Fit!!!!!!!!!!
Financial Ayyyyyyd I'll
A sass-squatch.
Litmus
He was feeling ruff.
One makes your whole week, the other makes your hole weak.
It lost its porpoise. 
Redneck: 'That's nascar ye got there."
Since they run away from lions , but he nearest village is 10km away.....
Hebrews coffee
Ubisoft.
It was tired of working in a dead end field.
You take your boots off before you jump on a trampoline. 
Because hijab his wife, but nobody cared.
They're knee grows.
They're calling it the Great Drain Robbery
Because it wasn't the droid he was looking for!
They're straight fire Wanna hear s'more? I deal crackers by the graham
Well plaid.
It was the knight time
(Paste unoriginal joke here)
I'm working on it.
Romeow
Allah Be Back. 
Forget about it.
Prostate
No? Would you like to buy some?
He fell from the guard tower.
Q: Why do accountants make good lovers?  A: They're great with figures.
Because she didn't want to wake the sleeping pills.
They get arrested when they make something disappear.
A camera has photos and a foot has five toes. (Told to me by a 9 year old child I work with)
Americas already got two running for president.
Dind Dong
You come home to find your math homework was done, your computer was upgraded, and they're still trying to back down the driveway.
It's totally legal and not creepy you sick weirdos. 
"Don't worry, I'm just amounting.
Christian Bale Hah
Getting locked inside a walk-in freezer
Because they don't like random people knocking on their doors
Ct-hulu
12 inches
Go over to the corner, it's 90 degress
'cause he had shit to do.
Sam played in the mud. Want to hear a clean joke? Sam took a bath with Bubbles. Want to hear another dirty joke? Bubbles is the girl next door. Enjoy this middle school level joke I suddenly remembered for some reason. 
Medicine ... runs off ...
Because black laughs matter
Ardunno
It's a hot new trend.
A cat has claws at the end of its paws. A complex sentence has a pause at the end of its clause.
A.... GYROScope
.... I used to love tractors 
You'd be red too if you had 8 periods a day.
The dishes!
Because you only comes one a year and its down a chimney!
cuz air is free
Because oxygen is free
What’s the last thing that goes thru a bug’s mind as he hits the windshield? His butt.
Oh dear, it seems I'm shirt on clothes.
Why did the policeman smell bad? He was on duty.
The Nintendo Wii-Tard 
They both have the same middle name.
Fred Astaire's finger.
Mediogre.
Because they are ugly and they stink.
Gets jalapeno business!
Free pork.
Kick his sister in the chin.
Crib death.
No gain no pain.
hiSPAMic
Because he had Green Acres!
Chicken Caesar salad.
A rare medium well done. 
Because Oct31 = Dec25
He was up all night to Get Loki.
Because the spider spied'er. (SFW)
They both have handlebars! Well.. Except for the grapes..
Yeah. And?
He had  -ity!
Walking. 
He worked it out with a pencil.
They're making headlines...
They can never have Cubs! 
A suicide vest will blow you
Their Chopin Liszt 
The gun gets triggered.
Because there's more birds in it.
Because BB8
Ask if they want to-mate-O.
Their victims never see them coming.
None because feminist can't change anything.
Through the chest plate.
They don't get better with age 
banana is yellow,dynamite is red
Stark industries has actually turned a profit
Sexual harassment. What is it when a woman talks nasty to a man?  $3.99 a minute
Unique up on it. How do you catch a tame bunny? The tame way.
They can only get up to two humps
They Pump Kin.
He kisses his mother with that mouth.
Timing
It was from all the cross-training...
Message me, and we can beat it together
Barackoli (I'm sorry I'll leave now...)
Salut!
You can negotiate with a terrorist.
Had makeup sex
They turn it over.
"Yes, thanks, but I'm still a little horse."
Because their knee grows.
Cher nob'll fall out.
Well, the flag is a big plus.
Lawrence Elk
If you throw a boomerang correctly, it will come back...
Owlnderwater
They are always going the Wong way.
There's plenty of Mexicans to shoot too. Yeah I'm going to hell for that one.
Nothing, you already told 'em twice.
A cow with a cold.
Excuse the question mark, "How Long" is in fact a china man.
Both are intended for children, but it's the Dads who end up playing with them most.
Iran
With an unlocked kitchen door
an Astronaut you Racist
My name is Paul.
"Hey little kid!  Want to buy some candy?"
The Mediterranean Sea 
In HD.
Because he took the stairs.
Zero
"Son, it's better to knock her out than to knock her up!"
With clickbait, of course!
They ones that go viral. I'll see my self out. 
yea-mon
A graduated cylinder.
He didn't habanero
Aye Matey
You don't look a gift horse in the mouth.
Sugar is on the lips. :-)
Because it was soda-pressing
Two, too
Polly want a Cracker. 
Aleppo suction.
Cover me, I'm going in
One's a digit divisible by two, the other is a prime number.
Santa Clown
Because he didn't habanero
They both get stitches 
Because the postal service assumes items being shipped are male.
Because in the animal kingdom 6 inches just wont do
They baguette.
Pokemon Went.
A cat has claws at the end of its paws and a comma is a pause at the end of a clause.
I told her that drinks were on the house
Tyrannosaurus Ex
You go for the juggler.
Directions on toilet paper. What’s dumber than that? Reading them. Even dumber? Reading them and learning something. Dumbest of all? Reading them and having to correct something you’ve been doing wrong.
No whey José.
the LIVING room
Wasist das! (Dass; an outhouse)
Mark 
It was Lufthansa plane
Have you ever pulled apart a grilled cheese sandwich?
Never mind. I shouldn't spread it.
Six, Six Spaces
An investigator!
Because they can't see.
A castle
There's no jack 
Nothing, you already told her twice.
It's cumming tortoise 
Oral tradition
For being out standing in his field.
David Buoy
Welp. You dim sum, you lose some
"Sir" from a distance.
He really made a spectacle of himself.
Sorry mates Im out of babes (its a linguistic joke)
A Doctor.
Fapjacks!
Periodic acid.
He got down on one knee and said, "I don't wanna be Obama self."
Justice isn't always black and white
The police are looking into it.
At noon because they take LAUNCH.
He wiped his bum.
Time to get a watch😂😂😂😂😂
"It's never to late to get an abortion."
Because if in Spanish, "Santo" or "San" is used for male saints... (San Francisco, San Diego) And "Santa" is used for female saints... (Santa Monica, Santa Barbara) Wouldn't that make Santa Claus transsexual?
Said Kim's robber.
Neither makes noise when pulling out.
WOULD YOU LIKE TO BUY SOME CHOCOLATE?!
A chauvinistic pig.
He went back to square one....
They stole her diamonds and gold but left her with a pearl necklace.
Excellent service. 
Because they're cyan.
There is correction fluid on screen.
We wanted her booty!
P and O.
That's your common sense leaving your body.
Moby is just named Dick but Trump is an actual dick. 
You don't have to look far to find something to beat the user of one in the head. 
By his name
Beez Nuts!
They say he was milking it.
It will crack you up I'll just go now
They'll get stoned. (Ba-dum tss)
Moo!
TL;DR
A sumo wrestler shaves his legs.
Because it's bipolar
Depends on how hard you throw them 
A Homo-sectional
I'd best be leafing. 
Because his wife left him.
Tenants. 
Reddiquette
Because she's a woman
A Durantula. 
Because it was soda pressing.
...  when it's ajar.
"Pair o' Dice Lost"
They blow themselves up!
The white ones are usually pretty pointless
Paint it, black!
Ovary-Z
What a shame. He had so much potential.
Because 7 was a registered six offender... that's not a laughing matter... 
the holocaust
Molasses
A Pair!
Go to Auschwitz with a dust pan
They each got 6 months.
An omniwhore
one guest
Throw a tin of beans in there ..... How do you get them back out of it? Run past with the tin opener .....
...because she didn't have any arms. Knock knock. (Who's there?) ...not Sarah.
Buy high sell higher.
It is: sitting in d exam hall, holding d question paper in hand n tellin ur self “dude, dntg worry. Exams wilg get postponed!
AMERICA!
Race car noises. When do we want them? Neoooooooooooooooooooooow
Disoriented. 
To beat the crowd.
Question: What's the difference between Joan of Arc and a canoe? Answer: One is Maid of Orleans and the other is made of wood.
They both make bad hunters. 
Because everything that stays there just ends up dying. 
Dam!
"They remember"
"Hey there's 20 letters in the alphabet right?" "Umm, actually there's 26." "Oh, I forgot U R A Q T." "That's sweet, but you're missing a letter." "Oh don't worry, you'll get the D later."
Lettuce alone and no dressing. Picked from the Stephen Colbert show.
He needed to work on his delivery.
He waited
Because his pythons were sick
A lot of good you are . (the joke is that the paint can is empty)
Because he couldn't Bear children. 
Tough getting by these days .
He woks.
Challah!
Thank god I am not an African kid.
Leave it out in the sun until its Bill Withers 
All Apologies 
Seizure salad. 
It's hard to say.
If you have a star, you are getting chased.
Nacho chips
One plays with an electric guitar, the other a-cue-stick.
In a factory.
Probably Earth, but if he's into colonizing other planets, maybe Mars.
Shoot to spill.
A Baked Potato.
Jew jitsu
Because he saw the gas bill (Thanks nofx)
Because there is no Jack in iPhone 7.
They're both myths.  EDIT: spelling
They love trouter space!
There was a frog in her throat. 
Neil Armstrong walked ON the moon, and Michael Jackson had sex with kids. 
They both barely cover the asshole.
The Hight-T department
A skeleton masturbating in a biscuit tin 
The cop
The runway
NOT MOVIES
Snow tires don't sing when you put their chains on.
When the color of the license plates start to change. 
7, after I destroy Uranus. 
Shit questions.
“Do these genes make me look fat?”
BA-NA-NA-NAAAAAA!
All they said was, “Bach, Bach, Bach …”
Americans.
They can't croco-dial the phones.
Hick-fil-a
Strawberries. 
A receding hairline 
Amanda Tory
A Minor.
Some blame it on the conductor.
So they can do math
Egypt 8 ..  Ethiopia didn't
I'm not feline too good. 
It is collapsible 
A Boom Boom mic
Poke him in the eye 
Because she prefers to drive stick!
The meal would fallout of flavor.
To render the other side.
Dark humor... I hate it when black people tell jokes.
I was just asking if you'd heard it.  I'm not gonna tell it, I want to live.
To L'Hopital. 
Hilarious Trumpet
Not cancer, but my relationship that just ended today!
Darude Sandstorm.
Furnancial Aid
A flat miner
Ubermensch
The wheelchair...
You can't jelly someone into a wood chipper.  
A drummer!!!!!
It's not the end of the world 
Where deleting history has become more important than making it.
Gluteny
A palindromedary.
A substantial amount, you fucking morons. 
There's 20 of them!
Threw his baby out the window.
Gang Rape. 
I don't have a milion dollars. 
Because it might lead to dancing.
It stars Harrison Fjord.
Mosquitoes
Crimea a river
Turn signals 
The drummer.
Because, Master Wayne, some men just want to watch the world burn.
Zackrebleu!
Jewet  :D 
They're making headlines
A pizza can feed a family of four
A Deli. 
Haram-bae
Eagle
Porn.
A beverage.
The Pope-tato
Dam.
A dead baby doesn't harm the atmosphere when you burn it.
Because we turn them on.  / /
It kept going.  No brakes.  :(
None, because they can't climb the ladder.
Because they are dead. 
I think they are Sofishticated. I'll show myself out.
Ballhalla
A doctor you racist.
His reflection.
It's 8:00 somewhere!
 elephino.
Because they're curious and want to learn. And that's why you don't see many black scientists.
A Jew drops a coin onto the floor
Tacos.
Because they're not garbage collectors.
You are the wurst. 
Because she had no arms. Knock Knock  Who's there? Not Sally :)
Q: What does the Bermuda Triangle and blondes have in common? A: They’ve both swallowed a lot of semen.
Lukewarm
They have nerves of steal.
Because he was hydra-phobic.
One's covered in soap bubbles, while the other's covered in Pope stubbles.
Santa
Because he doesn't have toupeé. 
Roll up her sleeve...
Because she's an upgrade to that hoe you had earlier. 
Pregnant
bach bach bach time to return to 
It's pretty time consuming. I'll escort myself out now.
Triggered Treat
He kept pushing her around.
Because he didn't Mufasta..
One steppe at a time.
Gazpacho
Jean-Luc Picardio
BOOOOOZE
So he could mufasa.
Hebrews it. I'm serious! That Israeli how he does it!
Charlotte, NC
Because I might vote for it.
Man: Can I Have SEX with my Pregnant Wife? Doc: Yes 3 Mnths Normal Next 3 Like Dog Last 3 Like Wolf? Man: How Does Wolf Do? Doc: Sleep near the Hole & Cry.
You're just going to have to be a little patient.
Because 7 kneeled during the National Anthem.
NO MATTER WHERE YOU GO...there you are
He would continue to be a state-sponsored terrorist whose actions disgrace us all. 
Because they’re really, really good at it.
69.
The stairs.
At some point in it’s life, a baby will grow up and stop crying.
The chicken crossed it.
Because they get a kick out of it
Mourning Sickness.
Because the land didn't wave back. 
Because of all the Cheetahs!
HEY YOU TRYIN' TO PISS ME OFF?
Because they push back nicely 
He got off at every stop.
Because they're playing on console.
They both used to have Les (less) Miles!
Waiting for him to show up.
A pair of ankles
I don't know, I just fly the drones
I thought they only drive automatic
A neck romancer.  
Vienerslidein 
Homogeneous. Heeeeeey math jokes!
Haram Bae
Hose.
Ukraine: I don't know Russia why? Russia: To rescue oppressed Russian minority 
Wife: I'd take half and leave. Husband: Well here's $6 and you can start packing anytime now.
Youd think itd be rrrrr but tis the sea.
A snail boat
It got hit by a truck
"Oh get a womb"
Because she had a frog in her throat. 
A bum fuck.
Jailbreak
One. He holds it up and the world revolves around him.
Beer nuts are a dollar fifty. Deer nuts are always under a buck...  I'll see myself out now.
Yeah...  Nobody else did either...
Why did Hitler commit suicide? Because he saw his gas bill.
"a small loan of a million dollars"
She had two mennonite that drove her buggy
American.
Tiger Woods hasn't hit as many balls.
HAEY, obviously.
We Americans
One, he holds up the bulb and the world revolves around him 
Nah... I won't tell you. It's too a-maize-ing.
Kathmandu.
A miscarriage! This joke never gets old, just like the baby!
One said " can you smell gas?" "Very funny" said the other, "You know I can't even smell my own  name!"
The USA
Because there is no end to that prick.
Piece of cake
The Salsa
A labracadabrador
Where's my tractor?
He's forever Russian around, Czeching that everything gets Polished
America.
Cancer. 
My 10 year old son is very good with computers. --Donald trump 
"yeah, i bettar cach it" "Okay sir, I want you to step out of the car and walk a straight line."
They both hate been stabbed
Turns out it   possible to have a worse moderator than the team over  at  !
Toastyyy!
A knife has a point.
About 3 million. But they would all have to be Trump supporters.
Kid: Mom's last name must be "Darling" because that's what Daddy calls her every time.... Teacher: That's so sweet. What's her first name then? Kid: I think it's "Sorry"....
Battery
I never had a dad to tell me any.
Two.
Mr. Bigger's baby, because he's just a little Bigger.
Because it had no porpoise in life. 
A Scott tis a lad that can play the pipes. The Scotch is what makes it so that he canna.
One's a crazy heron, the other's a hairy Craisin.      
None. cmon , they'd much rather be kept in the dark.
Strap a steak to the ceiling
The game where players make enough money to risk getting brain damage, or the debate where the players already have brain damage?
A real pain in the ass.
Shit, i don't know. 
Police say they're looking for a small medium at large.
HAAAAAAAAAAAND EYEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
Because he's always horny.
Icy Dead People.
Because he broke the "No Eating In The Rooms" rule.
Finding a stack of dads playboys in the basement
So that they can get closer to the sink.
it's non of your bussniess()!
He got 6 under
You tell your Wife, "I saw a lady, looked exactly like you" Wife asks, "WAS SHE BEAUTIFUL?" You cant say 'NO' You cant say 'YES' That is Checkmate!
With a dustpan in Auschwitz.
It was all over the tabloids
If he ate one more, it would be too farty!
Watts the difference!
it was repossessed 
It's not all it's cracked up to be. 
Because he could.
He wanted to be with his family.
I couldn't raise them
Nobody knows.It's a well kept seacret.
decomposing
Carlos
To say Hello from the other side. I called you a million times.
Brown recluse.
Nothing to see here
Because at one point, she was infidel. Ok ill leave now
"Hola Amoebas!"
At least with a 69'er you see the cunt coming.
Misdirection.
A kangaroupie.
Read the top comments....
An Edison
Borderlands.
"I literally can't even."
One wants to eat filthy american pigs, and the other wants to kill the filthy american pigs.
They don't believe in higher power.
They go off onto different tangents.
sniffum
Oops. Wrong name...
In a church you see pew, pew pew. In a mosque you hear pew pew pew.
They ran out of pitchers.
Indentured servitude.
1forrest1 
Jew-jitsu
They both like dick.
Not sure if either of them came once, but I know they haven't come a second time.
Bye Felucia
"Gosh, I could have had a V-8!
Marque
It had a bad driver
Mother: “How was school today, Daniel?” Daniel: “It was really great mum! Today we made explosives!” Mother: “Ooh, they do very fancy stuff with you these days. And what will you do at school tomorrow?” Daniel: “What school?”
The sequels are never as good as the originals.
You'd think it'd be the arr.  But it be the sea. 
God
karma chameleon
P in front of it
To see how high Mexicans can jump
They didnt have any Jose to spray the water.
He became Sir Loin
In his sleevies.
America
Xanax, for Hispanic attacks.
Zombie.
Aesop story.
chloroform
Because they don't like change...
From a well, actually
her natalie 
Because women love digging up the past.
In the punchlines.
They're offal.
A 
You've got male.
You can eat strawberry jam.
Attempted murder.
Eggs get laid and you don't.
Is that you coffin?
Word of mouth.
Sexually Frustrated 
Because her mom gave her money for lunch.  8 year old sister told me this joke, gave me a good laugh.
There are twenty of them
Play the national anthem 
Sonic the Swift Taylor
50 Shades of Earl Grey 
They wanted to go to the mooo....vies
Notice me 7pi!
Porcupines have pricks on the outside
CGI Friday's
Fritatas
FLASH... AAAHHHHHHHH. Its the language of the universe...
You kill his family 
Because he loves miso!
He sat in his own pew.
Madagascar
The Periodic Table of Elements.
In a mirror.
One is of them has a great leader! 
Q. How can you tell if a car is German? A. when a jew gets in it the doors lock and the heat turns on.
Offswitch.
I haven't had hard wood in 15 years.
My erection.
They both go off again two minutes later to remind me of the same thing. 
They both have 6 letters and can hold screaming children for 9 months!
Underwear. It just sits on its butt all day. 
No, whey man! (My first dad joke, im so proud!)
because Mace Windu nuffin
They're so cute together; apparently, it was love at first shite.
In the mainstream 
Because the g is silent
A club sandwich.
A riposte.
Try being in marching band.
Apparently the salt shaker was arrested and charged with aggravated as-
RAM crackers
Sing the nation anthem they will sit down
To suck dick for crack money.
They always quack the case
They only have sex with people who look up to them.
After all, Adam was ribbed for his own pleasure
He lost his patients
Because an apple a day keeps the doctor away.
Two friends meet together and one asks: What would you do if you won the lottery? -I would build a brothel! Oh, and if it went wrong and you loose money? -I'd open it to the public
A sturgeon.
A crip
Because they always use Explosion or Self Destruct on the first turn.
Dinner
Watermelon juice.
I'm a Ghana!
I'm Nacho Daddy.
Disaster Edit:  I'm just a poor meme farmer
Because AT&T has the best coverage
That's the spirit.
an impasta
In a lmaosine
It's In-tents
One... I mean, they aren't fucking retarded. 
"Uh-oh, spaghetti hoes!"
Anal sex with hemorrhoids.
Its car got toad away.
You're a fungi to be with
Santa goes down the chimney 
A: A tortilla ship!
They used to, but they all dried up.
A submarine
His lips are moving. But how do you know when a cop is lying? His pen is moving.
well too bad! If you liked it, you should have put a RING on it.
Java -jar jar.jar
Haram bae
WALLnuts
Because every time i talk dirty to my wife she tells me to go to hell.
So they can hide in cherry trees.  Ever seen an elephant in a cherry tree?  Shows you it works then.  What's the loudest noise in the jungle?  Monkeys picking cherries.
You don't have to beg your wife to blow your paycheck. 
Society.
Queef Stroganoff
Because he kneaded a poo.
A polar bear
Human trafficking 
The steer. 
When he spots a tourist.
Therapists.
A bu-rock-ke
Skip to my loo.
Cinq. 
Because they never have any sandwiches. 
LMAO ZEDONG!
Wife : had ur lunch.? Husband : had ur lunch.? . Wife : i m asking you Husband : i m asking you . Wife : u copying me.? Husband : u copying me? . Wife : lets go shopping Husband : i had my lunch
A porcupine has the pricks on the outside!
They can't say no.
Juan (This probably has been posted earlier but is still funny 😂😂)
Make them suck dick
Indecent exposure. 
Lo Mein. See you all in hell.
Yoga Bear.
Tracy
[Removed]
Because it's inefficient!
Umami
The guy overpacked, and the photon is traveling light.
Because they transmit it after lunch.
He quit running. 
Because when you see it, you turn 360 degrees and walk away.
When you have to say, "Here comes the airplane!" when you want her to give you a bj.
"What do you mean what do I mean?" replied the man. He went on to explain "My son has half my genes, that makes him my half-son."  The woman he was talking to decided he was crazy and without replying walked past him. She looked back and noticed his neck was red, after all it was a sunny day.
They are both trying to find their X and they don't know Y.
He worked it out with a pencil 
They have no  .
Sauerkraut.
Radical Islam
Cancer 
They both circle Uranus looking for Klingons
Because they're not used to getting Snowden. (I'll see myself out)
To be a little Bolder.
About half way
Because he only comes once a year and it's down a chimney.
Free Ballin - Foo Fighters
Craven-dale
Designated Drivers.
Chunky Monkies
You cant, the mountain climber is a scalar!
It needed to get it's fill o' mint.
The taste
Halloumi! 
If you're reading this, you don't.
"I'm afraid we don't know, but make my stipend tax-free, give my advisor $30k in taxpayer's money, and I'm sure he can tell me how to do the gruntwork for him so he can take the credit for answering this incredibly vital question." (I did not come up with this, I got it from  .)
You only need one nail to hang the picture
A Sandy Hook Survivor
One stood for something
I promise it's not a pyramid scheme. 
They can't find the key and don't know when to come in. 
Well, it's not Z. 
Mother, “How was school today, Patrick?” Patrick, “It was really great mum! Today we made explosives!” Mother, “Ooh, they do very fancy stuff with you these days. And what will you do at school tomorrow?” Patrick, “What school?”
now.
It becomes a cigarette lighter!
Because they're rated 
Don't worry. He's all right now. 
Well, turns out one is not enough, but if you pair it, two can.
They're huge metal fans.
Triggered
Neither have I.
The baby, because she's a little bigger.
Three older couples were having afternoon tea.   The first husband turns to his wife and says, "Can you pass the honey, Honey?"   Not to be outdone, the second husband turns to his wife and says, "Can you pass the sugar, Sugar?" Feeling rather amorous, the third wife turns to her husband and asks, "George, why don't we call each other cute names?"   George turns to her and says, "Can you pass the tea, bag?"
YOUR MOM!!!
Asuh dude
Just the tip.
One is still dicking bimbos while the other was dicking still bimbos. 
De-Oder-Ant 
In case they run out of bullets.
One says, "Spit out your gum!" The other goes, "Choo Choo Choo"
Cuz they take all the green cards
By scissoring.
Throw your dirty laundry in there with some detergent. 
They fired him because he didn't believe in labels. 
Well done.
An astronaut, you racist fuck.
consolidating
Because it's literally made of hide. *Ba Dum Tsss 
I hear he just comes outta nowhere!
She was also on the dashboard, the windscreen, the roadside...
The sex is the same, but the dishes start piling up.
Because they drink to much coughee.
Billy's Mom asked him, "Well, why aren't you studying, Billy? You have an exam tomorrow!" Billy said, "Because I've already Reddit thrice."
Banana cake!
Male fraud
Dad: "Can I see your report card, son?"  Son: "I don't have it."  Dad: "Why?"  Son: "I gave it to my friend. He wanted to scare his parents."
Wife: Do you want to tap us? Husband: Absolutely. Husband: Phew!, Nothing like a threesome.
Because if they were small, white, and smooth they'd be Asprin.
he forgot the safe word
They're called MOOOOse for a reason! 
I'll let my friend answer that one:
I reddit. 
The Nutty Professor
The back of my hand...
I don't know, i just fly the drone
An illumi-hotty!
"Get in the car."
A leperd
I can't pick, but their flag is a huge plus.
An El Niño
Me too, I like the saltyness
Zippos are heavy. A Bic is just a little lighter.
Inuit.
"I'm sorry baby, we just cantaloupe."
Double the prophet.
Fruit of the Womb
Captain D's Nutz
Nothing, they're both fowl play
She needed more concentration.
Because they needed too much concentration in camps.
With his bear hands!
the road kill has skid marks before it
The Prophet Muhammad.
You don't know cause you weren't there
A Buccaneer
All that hard Bork and nothing to show for it .
OCDC
Christian Bale.﻿
Nobody would name their band Pearl Jelly.
Hi dad!
Because I saw your mom on the corner yelling "Humphrey! Humphrey!"
Names.
Carry OK
Whittle by whittle.
Because her teacher told her to do an essay
Because he isn't real. 
Well, chiropodists like   jokes.  But opticians like them  .  
It depends. Are you inside or outside?
It was feeling  .
Boobs! Ok wait never mind they are the same.
Because it was making him moody.
three.  one to actually do it, one to complain that it has been done before, and another one to repost the said repost 
Harambait.
PooptyPong.
The close thing I came to having “ friends with benefits” was .......... convincing my friend to bring food for me daily.
Tequila Mockingbird
Target
Antique farm equipment. 
Its my nigger, I can paint him whatever color I want.
Fatty fatty boom boom
Shes so easy a cave man could do her. 
Because they're so white the can't dance.
He only got nailed by guys ;) 
Just be Jewish , live in 1940s Europe , and be willing to live a ghetto.
Get off me homes!
It scares their dogs too much
A prostitoot
Shit my time machine is broken again.
You would pay to have a potato on you...
When comcast puts them on hold and they don't hang up
A cup of decaf 
Husband.
A coniference. 
Aye Matey
If you’ve lost one and haven’t found it in a couple days, chances are it’s probably dead.
Because they're bad conductors.
I ran.
WRONG! They don't make it, they steal it...
Because It wasn't born yesterday.
It had a SPOILER on it.
A Hummusexual. 
Girl you sure are sweet.
aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh -  SMACK SMACK - aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh
A suicide bomber.
A cuck has a girlfriend.
She was fishing for Steelhead Trout
A salad shooter.
A cocoon! 
They make a Daily Prophet.
That's why some people appear bright (until you hear them talk).
Drop him a line.
Because eventually, its cover would be blown.
Stolen from other subreddit.
A minor
An Elephant.
His name was Jack
Twerkey!
They vote. 
Genders
Just one buck. 
She can't make America great again.
Silicone valley
Neigh-bours.
There's 20 of them. don't get triggered, just a joke! Paedophilia is not funny
The toilet only has to take shit from one asshole at a time. . .
A dentist
They're both extra virgin.
He didn't want to get carpool tunnel syndrome.  
Because it has the Block Button.
What do you call a former member of ISIS? WASWAS
A midget's ego.
It's a rare medium well done.
They jacket
They did a colonoscopy and found out she had a brain tumor.
Nice ass.
Made out of bread was taken.
Toolsie!
Just kidding, feminists don't change shit.
Because Papyrus drinks plenty of milk.
Cellery.
Because they all have trans-sisters
None, they just beat up the room for being black.
Because you'd never be able to convince him to help the massive drug smuggling conspiracy that's shipping cocaine into his family's neighborhood.
Because God couldn't find three wise men and a virgin.
[OC]
Racist
Seoul searching
Son: At school. The robot slaps the son. Son: Okay I was watching KungFu Panda! The robot slaps his son again.  Son: Okay I was watching violent movies!  Dad: What?! When I was your age I never watched those kinds of movies! The robot slaps the dad.  Mom: Haha, after all, he is your son. The robot slaps the mom...
Hebrews 
Because the servers are always steaming hot
It was a Naan issue
C P Arrr!
"No idea, your Honor". 
A group of jellyfish is commonly referred to as "a group of jellyfish." 
When she’s on her period.
Applicant: Well that depends, what's the complaint? Interviewer: He's complaining that his burger had onions on it, even though he specifically asked they were to be removed. Applicant: Well I'd start by telling him he's in the retail section.
They're small arms dealers. 
Da cow
Jesus. He went for the cross
She's trans-parent.
Reserection 
By seizing the means of reproduction. 
Yea they took the jack off
Every time you try to take inventory, you fall asleep.  
Indy-gestion  I'm sorry I'm a little drunk
A Minor
Nothing. She's fine.
Cancer.
It's the only way they can bring Trump steaks back. 
About ten minutes.
PIKA PIKA PIKA (Credit to my 5 year old son)
Their making headlines! (Thanks  )
She strips.
Broom Broom
The "L deuterino", if he wasn't into the whole brevity thing.
The store guard.
To buy another pair of AirPods. 
What do women and computers have in common?  You don't appreciate them until they go down on you.  
They both lost Jack.
Because when they come, they are wet and wild and when they leave they take your house and car with them. 
They both love clubbin'
Because they find him very down to earth. 
Shoepremacy.
Mitosis.
A pedo-file.
Cause they say awoman.
The Antagonist
Mount Rushmore
A boolean cube!
The prostitute can wash her crack and then use it again!
Call of Duty: Economic Warfare
CookEZ.
A labracadabrador
Cause there was a billion fucking chickens on the other side.
Just one to tell the three illegal immigrants he hired to do it.
They must be watch dogs. That's how they unwind.
Hillary Clinton's vagina.
You get kicked out of the petting zoo.
Urine for a treat!
Relative humidity
... Butthole blast.
The hookers have real orgasms and fake diamonds.
The blood shed.
They push buttons when they work the deck. Gf told me this one this morning, wants to know what you think
A northern fairytale begins "Once upon a time ..." A southern fairytale begins "Y'all ain't gonna believe this shit ..."
Hugh Bris
No eye deer
Row vs. Wade
Dwayne Johnson
Because he couldn't C#
Ding Dong
A curtain call. 
They both can smell it, but can't eat it
Congress.... Thank you George Carlin :)
She didn't see that well
Alzheimer and diarrhea. You run but you don't remember where.
Yo tengo Harambe.
Deportation.
Her name was Cindy she had a husband and 2 children 
I cut it in half 
A subwoofer.
Because he was always lost at C! [ I'm  ]
cause they never get old
because it was stuck in a crack
"Are you ticklish?"
I DONT FUCKING KNOW THEY ARE TVS!
Because 11/9 just doesn't have the same ring to it.
Because he was a paw bearer.
Flip it upside down.
I've never had a lentil on my chest.
"I set WHO free?"
Cos the sine said so!
Guess
Because they tend to be inside jokes.
They're not fussed, as long as it's full bodied.
Do you kids want to BUY some candy?  Hyuk hyuk hyuk. Credit to a very special lady. If the delivery was bad that's all me.
Krill Bream. 
A walk.
So they could beat the crowd. 
A Mississippi cup.
There's no point.
I want hue.
Patels. 
A Sweeping Generalization.
You
High Ho! High Ho! It's home from work I go!
They can't eat meat, but they can just destroy a fish's home for a glass of water? 
Because it's intense
General Wellbeing
Peach.
They're both cheap, fast, and if the rubber breaks, you're dead.
he checked meme out at 4:20. Said I have dope. Currently blazing it down the highway in his gr8 van. creddit 2 my m80
He was caught red handed. 
Tequila Mockingbird. 
Linoleum blownapart.
He woke up on a snow tire in Michigan.
Google, like everybody does.
Tally Hoes
Scooby-Doo doesn't have a dog.
I put the wrong socks on today. 
Squash
no? well then...
The screwing you get for the screwing you got!
Whoppaaah
"There are some who call me...Tim"
An ATM machine 
Because he had a Taipei personality.
Because people are dying to get in.
Little Seizures.
You can tuna piano but you can't piano tuna!
Between you and me, something smells.
Cuz i quarter-pounded her last night
It's a little bazaar.
Because it's more than a ceiling
She remembers them by their last names.
There's 2 grains of rice in the sink
It's a large fog in Italy
The Pilot.... you racist fucks
You can't! You don't know which witch is which!
Riposte.
Because they dont get assholes until they are married.  (Of course depending on what sex you are just change it accordingly)
He thlides into your DMth.
It's called "Sheepless on Cialis".
The grass tickles their balls as they run. 
When a balloon pops - there's one less. When a condom pops - there's one more. Or more.
Because whenever She gets hot, he hits her with a shovel.
At least more than eight, the light in my basement still doesn't work...
Sweet Pee
...she goes to hell
You don't have to meet her father.
Two jews found the same penny.
Because they were force fed.
Because they have a fortune (four-chin)
They have so many Wing's and Wong's, they are afraid someone will Wing the Wong number. Heard this on the disney channel a long time ago will never forget it for that reason. Sorry if its a re post.
Because he kept getting nailed to the boards.
When she starts winning arguments with you inner-voice.
Life 
Little Seizures
Her algae bra.
They're calling it Schindler's Missed.
Schindler's lisp.
because im about to pick you up!
because he was out-standing in his field
No whip.
Bay-Con
only cat's can
She couldn't see that well
Do you even algae-bruh?
People say he was half-nuts!
Not Apple Jacks
Apart from the Spelling?
Anonymoose
Because Jack was bean stalked
handsfree
You planet!
Me: Baby, I was thinking about you so sending you  She: Thanks for Thinking
They're both cold upon delivery.
Little Caesars
"Congratulations! Your parents survived the genocide!"
Weeding
Bobby
It's Victreebel if you go to a gym you will always get a victory with it.
Jack off
There is no room for Jack
A redneck's trigger actually does something
You burn some fagots Look up the definition before commenting/down voting...
Miss.Steak
Dr. Pokemon.
1080p
No tomatoes.
Cillary!
B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T V W Y Z Because Apple removed the AUX
I've never had a garbanzo bean on my face.
Stay in school and keep up with current affairs.
Farhfrumpoopin'.
A pouch potato. 
Foreskin. Budam tss 
Lots of practice laps.
It got flagged.
His dad responds, "realistically you've heard this joke before, potentially, you will hear it again".
Because he doesn't have arms. Knock knock. Who's there? Not Joey.
Congratulations to Sir Mon
A fruit roll up.
Nail a piece of meat to the ceiling
That's why I cant be a gynecologist.
The "P" is silent
Extra Innings!
She's Got The Jack
If so, then I am unemployed.
I'd rather spend that £2 on a condom to prevent a kid's life.
Patrick Fitzmichael and Michael Fitzpatrick
She was let down by a weak Constitution.
The New York Jets.
Nice log rhythms 
Not much. It just gave a little whine.
Because otherwise they'd be lizards.
Where you put the cucumber in
I'd say it's a little bit of both.
Sunni in the North Shiite in the South﻿.
Gingerbread. Edit: Here comes the downvote brigade, haha!
The commander said, "fire at will"...
Because it was haulin' oats.
Fort knockers!
Nothing, he was knocked out  .
Because they are bad at defending tower!
Whenever he had the energy, he didn't have the time.
A drummer.
Woops, thought this was 
Because either Project Hillary or Project Donald will become a success.
The headless whore's man
You weren't there, man!
She had a weast infection.
Two large plains. 
Because he left the school. 
Geordi La Forage
Because they don't believe in higher powers.
It was retarded
Muahahahamed Note: I don't have any prejudices against Islamic people.
Because they can't protect their towers.
Coz they really blow me away
Hillary Clinton's campaign. 
Dead baby in clowns costume.
Both collapsed on 9/11 after becoming overheated. 
It didn't hit the car's windshield.
Because there used to be 2 of them, but it's offensive to joke about that now.
1.6 billion people call him Muhammad.
Stand back! I don't know how big it's going to get!
"It's straight ahead, just   my finger".
Usain Bolti.
You can write on both of them with a No. 2
A child born in Chernobyl, duh.
Tienanmen squared
Osama Being Laden
Tony. :)
Their ankles. 
They get erekt.
You stop milking a cow after 10 years
They can go through 94 stories in seconds!
Pod people.
Because a vibrator can't mow the lawn.
Everyone misses Harambe.
Because he couldn't find the Droid he was looking for.
Anyway, I lost my job as a gynaecologist today.
Reddit already. Downvote. 
Cardinal arrest!
I enjoy dark humour. Yes, this was both a rapist and racial joke.
They go to the polls and vote.
I don’t know and I don’t care.
Dolphinately 
"Hands up"
"Hit the Road Jack"
Ten ants (Tenants)
Because these taste pretty fucking great. EDIT: I'm getting downvoted but figure this is the reddit algorithm! cheeky cunts
A tourist.
Because the best you can get is bronze.
His plates.  -Jude; My five-year-old son
They were overreacting.
Applicant: Well I often perform at local hubs doing stand up comedy. Interviewer: Really? Do you write your own material? Applicant: Not really, I just copy quotes from the US elections.
It drove the audience bananas!
ESPÑOL
Add a nipple.
Nuuks.
I don't care! I'm fuckin' rich!
I heard he was hammered
I can see your Knob Simple yet effective 
Because they always take things, literally.
In case one dozen come out right.
You can't milk a cow for 15 years.
A wedding cake 
They are both going to rob you but the Junkie is going to help you look for what they took.
One is a sex-obsessed wild animal ...  and the other is the former President of the United States!
Because Rudolph intentionally grounded the team...
Pilau Fights.
But they go the other way likes this 3..2..1..BOOM!
The one with a dream was shot.
The Dead Kennedys.
Knock Knock Who's there? 9/11 9/11 Who? I thought you said you would never forget!
suckin off other dudes...
They're not black, and they're not people!
The Mercedes can easily reach 40.
He took his wife for granite. 
It was a hare meticulous.
Because he was framed!
A walkie talkie.
My erection
What does snowman say to the other snowman?  - It smells of carrots!
The SWAT team
CLEARED TIMES ON OUR MICROWAVES! WHEN DO WE WANT IT? 0:00!
JACK OFF
With closed eyes.
they both make black guys run faster
Instagram.
Her balance was outstanding. 
He's all right now
That was radical!
Being carafe-ful.
Crypts. BLOODS FOR LIFE.
He's a grower, not a shower.
Because there are no windows!
Skratchov
A four chin teller
Jack off
Zero.  Apple doesn't accept EBT.
One is a troubleshooter, while the other is a troubled shooter.
He didn't have any ligaments 
Battered shrimp.
Batman can go inside a store without Robin
The Samsung Note 7
URINE!
Both start off as eggs.
Because they're made exclusively for cunts.
You owe them an anthrapology
to get to the other side.
because they never drink alone.
Only women get a "SUBMIT" button.
They lost two towers
They both have a lot of seamen
It's growing on me.
They become sour krauts.
Half a cheetah.
None, they'll just compliment it and get pissed when it won't screw.
They both killed Jack.
Because the grass tickles their balls when they run.
By jacking off.
Girls don't play with either of them.
To get to the other side.
Snowballs
You didn't hold the pillow down long enough.
By jumping off her heels.
Because women love digging up old shit.  
Four guys watching a football game.
Because Oklahoma sucks. 
The corn farmer shucks between fits, whilst the prostitute fucks between shits.
Spudnik 
You don't no jack!
A Man of many Cultures
A cockophony.
Nope, unless there's drug test
The people miss Harambe.
who wants 2 try?
Whale huntings legal 
The United States
Headphone jacks are obsolete.
Dogma
He can't. His hands are too small.
So sex wouldn't be such a pain in the arse.
E.T actually learned English and wanted to go home.
Not, she is not man enough to do it.
One..... Or two...
To match their hipster owners' jeans. 
Because they always bring boos.
As many as it takes   submitters to write an original joke. (by accident)
"You conduit!"
No? Really? Weird, it was all over the news.
They're a pain in the ass to deal with.
None. Hillary Clinton fans prefer to stay in the dark.
America.
Pox Romana
Two in the front, three in the back and 15 in the ashtray.
Easy just show him his gas bill.
One Shucks between Fits.  
It's not hard
I'll tell you later
*Note: This actually happened in my classroom just now Professor: What do you call bonds issued by a foreign entity in the canadian market, in canadian currency? Students: ... Professor: Maple Bonds. What do you call bonds issued by a foreign entity in the japanese market, in japanese currency? Students: ... Professor: Samurai Bonds. What do you call bonds issued by a foreign entity in the US market, in US currency? Obesity Bonds?
Omega!!  Note: surely it already exists but I thought of it independently and am proud of my terrible joke!
Because he was hunting Solo.
Please excuse my dairy air 
A Mexican.
Islams it!
They explode when triggered.
Na na na na na na na na na na na na na na na na BATMAN!!
Cause Paracetamol 
When you realize that you can't spell country without UN. 
Tinyrone.
Humans miss Harambe.
Discumbobulated
"No" "Well, well, well...."
A masochrist. 
it has a creamy milk filling
She started missing periods
You have to sit at the back of the oven
"Melancalorie"
An Investigator
Because the inventor of the donut wanted to give us a whole experience.
They both suffered the loss of one very important port.
On a beach near Boston.
Throw one cigarette away and the boat becomes one cigarette lighter.
Short tempers.
Sorry, they can only change the floor essence. 
To get a filling!
Cha Ching
Two women neighbors are talking. 'Mary, what's wrong with you? Are you ill? I saw the doctor coming out of your house twice last week.' 'So what? I saw an officer coming out of your house five times last week but I'm not saying that a war has broken out.'
Put a dildo under a glass table. 
Both of their eggs have sell-by dates.
Have you tried turning it off and back on? 
You run. You run so far away.
I give a fuck when my computer crashes.
A cunttainer
a sexually transmitted disease
A man will spend 20 minutes looking for a golf ball. 
Uncles.
The answer might surprise you!
What did Cinderella do when she got to the ball? She choked...
Because women love digging up the past.
There's a piece of you here, a piece of you over here, another piece over there..
Put them in the back of a truck and run a red light. 
The bogey monster
Grill the steak or cook it in a skillet.  Bring the steak up to room temperature before cooking. Season both sides of the steak with salt and pepper.  Sear both sides.  Bard the meat with butter.  Cook the steak to rare-medium.  Rest the steak for 5-7 minutes.
"Nice scarf! Must be cold where you came from! Do you guys want coffee?"
You haven't seen the blast of me!!!
Don't take her out again.
It was in A-minor
None, even if you win, you're still retarded.
I do , I'm a Leo , I loved Titantic. Ironically,my grandmother was a cancer and she was killed by a giant crab .  EDIT : Yes this is a Bo Burnham joke , I just want people to enjoy it before people call me out.
He had bad joints.
Roll up her sleeve.
One bursts into flames in the sunlight, and the other is a vampire.
Ash
They had to wake him up...
Me: Missouri. I: What state are you in now? M: Apathy. I: That's not what I meant. M: I don't care.
A crime fighter.
You get Les Miles and zero points
-Left. -Well, that doesn't sound right.
Trigger.
Metal fans.
Brexit has actually affected society.
"Hey, your dick is hanging out"
The sound of silence 
I prefer British Bac-on
None.  They just stand around complimenting it, and then get pissed when another guy screws it.
If they are black, you've got nothing to eat.
Islams It.
Teacher: Of course not.  Student: Good, because I didn't do my homework. 
Supperman. Or his kid Soup-erman. One just gets to dinner on time and the other is really good and making soup. E: I thought of it in it in a dream so thats why its not so good
To convince women sweeping was a sport.
10-0 for America 
Because he always burns the franks.
Disoriental.
I always feel like I'm talking in circles.
He has DIABETES!
Black and blue of course. ... The girl, not the car. (Courtesy of my son, the sicko).
Give me the gif of it.
They've never been fired and only dropped once.
None. They can't change anything.
Because black people don't have rights.
Reddit Reddit
Rock, I hear his brother hates it though. 
Tai-Wan-Shu
The freezer doesn't fart when you take out the sausage. 
A Pillow Fight
Kevin bacon
So he can sing a song of six Pence, with a pocket full of rye, and four and twenty blackbirds baked in a pie. 
None. They just hold it in the socket and expect the world to revolve around them.
Alt-F4
You shoot it.
A Whorse
EnRICHed gas.
M'tropolis
They made him branch manager 
I don't have a dead politician in my basement.
One has Microsoft and the other is Micro and Soft
Because he never sleeps in much!
Eli5
Because Missouri loves company 
Meta-Knight
Who wants to hear a joke about potassium? K
Yeah apparently
A buck an ear!
"I teach you the goober quench!"
Switching Users
Fission chips. 
People miss Harambe
Future
What does AIDS stand for? Anally Injected Death Sentence. What does GAY stand for? Got Aids Yet?
A German Shep·herd
I'm forum. 
Crimestoppers.
Unemployed.
A: Society. 
It's not hard. 
Phelps  can finish a race.
Genetics, I guess
They're married.
Salad
Might Haswell! Credit:   in 
Blow up their car.
"OOh, that's perfect right there. Just stay right there... Dude?..Alright, whatever... This side of the moons a dick."
They were both around for a short time in the '90s only to be unheard of from then on.
Once more into the breech, dear friends
It de-Pence on who you ask.
'Cause I can't seem to forget about you!
What's the difference between a baby and a sandwich? I don't fuck my sandwich before i eat it.
Google Fiber Note: Randomly came up with this joke today
Ash Ketchum.
Work over time
A food fight.
Give him test tickles. 
Omelette
An Errorist!
This is due to its powerful hind legs and the fact that the average house cannot jump.
Nevermind It's to cheesy.
"You shake em' we take em!"
His and Hearse towels
"hey guys be here at 8:15 pm, max 8:30"
Iron Man is a superhero, Iron Woman is a command.
They didn't spend all that time in the closet doing nothing.
He gets stoned.. Badum tsss
Sorry, it still isn't finished yet.
The Avengers Ensemble.
So she could moan with the other.
Because attachments are not allowed. 
He lay awake in bed all night, wondering if there was really a dog.
Depressing.  What's life like without alchohol? Depressing.  I need friends. 
Stakes 
Racism has many faces.
Mayonneighs 
Unfortunately Reddit has stopped working, would you like to report the issue?
Assault and pepper
He couldn't make ends meet.
One is a Goodyear and one is a great year
I sink therefore I am.
So my neighbor's kid died from sucking my son's dick. We watched.
Because you C4 of them exploding every day 
They storm the baaaastille.
A pizza can feed a family
You can drop her off anywhere. 
A shotgun mic!
Hoo-dini!
Are you vegan?
Feedom.
He woke up.
MosCow
I don't know and I don't care.
Because he was very gassy.
She hated objectification.
Microsoft Office 36543
A premature evacuation.
clickbait -_-
Neither.  France Surrenders, and Italy Changes Sides.
acidic juice
uh...
Cliffhangers 
Because   loves digging up the past.
to the other side.
Stands by her fan.
Not being 
Masterbathe.
Guardians of the Galaxy, or firefighters. 
Instead of saying "I'm an existentialist, eh."  They will say "I'm an existentialist, ... be."
Arya Stark?
It's somewhere between Dayton and Marion. 
Eminem.
He took out his dentures!
Idaho.
It's a pilot's life for me! 
2 in the front, 2 in the back, 1 in the trunk, and 6 000 000 in the ashtray
Parcelona
The Panzer SS 1st Division 
Leave me alone! I'm trying to 
Well, they're vegetarians so probably not what you're thinking...
I dunno, but he's the only one in my tribe...
After you drink one you can't shut up or drive.
the obituary read "Please send donations in luau flowers."
Bill and Monica, ooops I mean Melania!
SMILES because there is a mile between the first and last letters!
Holy crap.
A Dell.
The Bush
The guy who has a new Mercedes is rich. The guy who has an old Mercedes has been rich for a longer time.
I don't think he understood the gravity of his situation.
Because he was trying to detonate a Samsung Note 7.
He has nun.
Samsung Not Explode
Kill his family
Note 7
Sorry if that's a probing question.
I don't know and I don't care.
A mosquito stops sucking when you slap it
They’re both slipping in the polls.
There won't be any World War 3. #gaben2k16
Because everybody who can run, jump and swim are already in the U.S.
A huge mess.
Hula the dogs out?
I figured you wouldn't know 
Hand them a used tampon and ask what period it's from.
Hugh Mungus
Their kids haven't .
None. It's too dark.
They're both impregnable 
Civilwar!
He was too far out.
Both full of energy and momentum, both lacking substance.
"I guess I didn't plan it very well!"
Apart Mints
No, you cantaloupe.
With a skynet
An Armadealer
Because its too much toupée for one.
Boo-kkake
JSON
You'll find out next week when this joke get reposted.
2016 republican nominee Donald Trump
When they got more first bloods than a middle school bathroom.
Holland.
The day the kid learns what Hitler had done in history class.
Her boyfriend was blonde too.
Executed. 
You can't unload a truck full of marbles with a pitchfork.
One is weasily recognised and the other is stoatally different 
Dick.
Hormones.
She got hit by a bus. Why did Sally fall off the swing? She lost her arms when she was hit by a bus. Why did Sally not get back on the swing? She also lost her legs. Knock knock Who's there? Not Sally. What did Sally get for Christmas? I don't know, she couldn't open it.
A pile of shit doesn't have an ugly ass hair
Because people are dying to get in there.
Grrraaaaiiinnns...
Because in the games, Bug-types are effective against Dark-types. Just like malaria in Africa.
A girl with a sunken chest and no booty
A key.
Cus they love to count YAAAARds.
Orgasm.
It's ass.
Because she is a woman
Semi-retired.
You can't; they're nomads.
Deep Thought
Because they erupt to no good. 
Who's "me", kemosabe?
A lil smokey
It was rated out of five.
To get to the second-hand shop.
I don't know, she hasn't opened it
A pitbull returning from a playground.
he would always go all Id. 
Frogs in a blender
A movie. Told to me by Siri. Pissed myself. 
"Daddy help I'm melting!"
You get upset when your dog tears up either of them because they are period pieces.
Nothing.
Harambe.
If we don't get some support, people are going to think we're nuts!
Why did they kill Harambe? Coz Adam and Eve took the apple.
A child asked his father, "How were people born?" So his father said, "Adam and Eve made babies, then their babies became adults and made babies, and so on." The child then went to his mother, asked her the same question and she told him, "We were monkeys then we evolved to become like we are now." The child ran back to his father and said, "You lied to me!" His father replied, "No, your mom was talking about her side of the family." - 
Hugh Mungus
An elephant hiding in your fridge
Because they can't move fast enough to flick a booger
No, I ain't never been to that place. Must be new or something.
Petal to the nettle!
You would too if your name was bblamdiffergmunmnumblldpbdb.
DIR
"How are you doing toupee?" When he gets mad just say: "come on man don't wig out on me like that!"
A grassy-ass...
Smoke on the Water, because they are always getting roasted. :3
He didn't do it on porpoise.
Punch
The execution.
0 cause they'll compliment it then get pissed off when it won't screw
1 natural log cabin.  I'll show myself out. 
Impersonating a police officer.
One's a meteorologist and the other's a meaty urologist.
Because I'm about to pass a fist through your face!
a paraplegic
Being 0K.
Never mind, I figured it out.
DID YOU JUST ASSUME MY LIGHTBULB?
Lukewarm.
Chicken butt! xd
They cluck each other.
Not everyone gets them
There used to be two and now it's too offensive to talk about.
A Senor Discount
He was arrested for battery charges. Some say he's bi-polar.
0:- " Dude your dick is hanging out "
Honestly, it's black and white. 
Winning means he'd need to live in a smaller house in a black neighborhood
Cause otherwise they'd be going to pound town.
She fucked a prince, is completely lifeless and some people still think she's relevant.
There's a mistake in my womb.
You fly a plane into the WTC
To get to the other slide.
Your stove. Edit: word choice
He was lucky it was a soft drink.
Britney Spears
He got his dick out for his Haram bae's.
1 dead baby in 10 trashcans.
Give him a used tampon and ask which period it's from.
One is a free throw, and the other is a flea 'fro.
One evening he was solving a trigonometric equation and then he saw a sine. 
A neigh-sayer
A wake-tress
I wouldn't pay $500 for a garbanzo bean on my face!!!!
Barackoli
Rainy Day Women #12 & 35. 
The Codfather. (⌐■_■)–︻╦╤─
He came into a lot of socks. 
"I told you to lick my erection, not wreck my election".
She told people to stop patronizing her.
They ain't private ears. (I don't care if a six year old came to this first thirty years ago, it just came to me.)
Because then they'd have nothing to do in the afternoon.
Artificial Intelligence.
Reuse and Recycle
Because his dad built it and his mom cleans it
The Three Mosqueteers.
Boko Harambe. (dicks out)
I can't make a vitamin
The wall.
Pull the pin and throw it back.
Because she loves sheep thrills!   *shows self out
The get all you '90s references.
Six: Up, Down, Strange, Charm, Top and Bottom.
Pirates.
Because in charge of scheduling, Yoda was.
A charlatan!
Twix 
neither, it's a fairy tail.
In the mainstream.
Ask Jeeves
Allah-lcohol
....because tear shed is better than blood shed
Crib death.
Runnnnnnnnnnnnigganigganigganigaanigga
There's no road from the kitchen to the bedroom.
Nothing, they've never been together!
One’s a Goodyear. The other’s a great year.
"Isee cold."
The terrorist needs a trigger to blow things up.
Because his wife wouldn't stop bleating all over the place. 
You park, man.
When asked to comment, President Obama responded "Yes, ICANN"
Because they keep their eyes peeled!
Battleship Potemkin.
too many cheetahs
Your girlfriend
They both died when they were really popular. 
Bonus Trekkie Joke:  ... because it keeps searching Uranus for Klingons.
Alive
His eggo death 
Chrysanthemum's the word. 
Their stuff is always cut.
Anything that requires chopsticks. Ba-Dum-Tss
Neither did I.
A snuggle with a struggle
Nobody knows!
Birth control. 
Acne doesn't come on your face until you're 12
Unidentified Floating Object
It was multithreaded.
Pink Freud
Wherever it wants to. R.I.P. Harambe
Whine.
Betty White.
Well, they're huge targets...
Mein Karmph
The Earth's crust is on the outside.
PokeMom
Patient: Only after sex Doctor: Ok, patient has never smoked in his life
Michael Phelps actually finished the race.
Cincinnati Zoo keeps trying to shoot them down. Edit: Spelling
"Man, this guy just keeps shooting himself in the foot".
He got snowed in.
Because when he asked them who the greatest composer was all they would say is "mmmmmm... Bach Bach Bach"!
He burned his lips on the exhaust pipe.
Shake your bag of coins
The police officer. 
Toys Arrrrrrrrrrr Us
Black and black movies. 
Sinbad
An Oreo
Me: Answering the semantics of a question but ignoring the pragmatics Interviewer: Could you give me an example?  Me: Yes I could
Because one had a dream and died
Anne Frank's 
A nut for a jar of tuna.
The poop deck.
[removed]
Kinky you use a feather; perverted you use the whole chicken !
"Stop out-sulting me."
Adolf HitHer
I'm Biden my time.
Jail
Because cars takes you from A to B
Because he doesn't want to be spotted
Because he was baroque. 
When he's standing next to your girlfriend saying her hair smells nice
He really held his own.
The Mandela Effect.
She was on fire.
[removed]
Marrow-Juan-a.
Two test tickles
Any-cock'll-do
Elton John's chin. 
He was sewericidal. 
Because it was two tired. 
What's green and has wheels? Grass.. I was lying about the wheels
Astronomy is about things too big to wrap your head around, while gastronomy is about things small enough to wrap your head around.
In the Quran-tine room!
Because it ends with A-men
Because she enjoyed being Ms-quoted
Because he was spaced out.
With a plunger.
Nobody has ever seen them directly, but everyone says they exist.
I missed you
Michael Phelps can finish a race.
Viola.
You can un-screw a lightbulb.
Goldman Sach's
Sadly, he did knot.
A refund.  credit to   (saw it on another post as comment, thought it deserved own post)
Give it a blowjob.
Crosses killed him. 
Why is women’s soccer so rare? It’s quite hard to find enough women willing to wear the same outfit.
An improvement.
She wanted a high paying missionary position.
He was having his mid life crisis!
Reintarnation.
Butterflies
Aerial
Geodorant.
Virgin Mobile 
Chicken sees-a salad
I'm probably gonna die surrounded by both. 
HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAND EEEEEEEEEEEEEEYEEEEEEEEE
His Korea is over!
Cuz everyone was dying to get in.
It has six commandments and four suggestions 
A baptist will run into a liquor store, buy their alcohol and run out. A Methodist will walk into a liquor store and say high to everyone, then buy their alcohol and walk out. A catholic will show up to the store completely hammered, hug everyone, get their alcohol and stumble their way out of the store. 
Everyone called him Beethmicrowave
College textbook prices.
With a dust pan and brush.
A kleptomaniac!
An Arab riding a bicycle down Collins Avenue in Miami Beach.
Because they're into some funny business
He couldn't see that well.
So they know where to stop shaving.
I avoid everyone
It's already run out of battery.
It was the pot calling the cattle back.
Mick Jagger says, "Hey you, get offa' my cloud." A Scotsman says, "Hey McCloud, get offa' my ewe."
A naughty bus
Pi * z * z * a
S'fear.
Pull the pin and throw it back
TruTV
To the Bathroom
Burning Man.
You don't have to pay for the glue to sniff...
Pregnant
A Brussian. I'll see myself out.
Snorting the left over ashes from Ash Wednesday... 
He ended up giving his wife a black eye
1Forest1
Both of them died.
The bucket.
Where you left it
Double D-Mons
Her daddy says he wants her in bed by ten.
They put a bottle of vodka 100 meters away from them.
Your mailbox is missing!
Walls Vanilla Carte D'or - It's not Mexican! (*I am going to hell for this!)
They Argon...
There were no jokes in the Post.
Fencing! 
Bean dip!
When hunger strikes. 
Phil: A philboard Bill: I have a better idea
Everybody misses Harambe.
Quit being nosey.
Three, two to die and one to never get over it.
They both tell the audience what they are glad to hear.  But at the end, the audience laughs at the comic, and the politician laughs at the audience.
Sank you. 
They know Jewish women can't resist anything with 10% off.
A Prontosaur. 
He was caught drinking on the job.
Because he was black.
A LexiCon
Shout out to my bitches...and dogs
The rest of your life.
None cuz it's already lit af
A tweet. 
So the dishwasher matches the appliances
Christian Bail
Thai-Won Shu.
Antimatter.
He was addicted to quack.
Couches
It's a really obscure number and you've probably never heard of it.
Vladimir Putin  ~ You can thank my 65 year old grandfather for this
For making false acc sations.
They keep beating the same dead horse.
Through the process of cross-examination.
A dude farting cum on your floor.
Can't be done, it's a hardware problem.
Tequilher 
Usain Bolt can finish a race.
A can't elope. Or better yet None of them because of the lgbt movement.
Obviously more than four because my basement's still dark.
The Holocaust.
"This job isn't for everyone, but hay...it's in my jeans"
A walk.
By reposting it every week!
Theyre the only things Donald Trump is currently wearing.
[deleted]
Pit-bull in kids sandpit
15 years to life.
There are too many wongs and wings and someone could wing the wong number.
Thriller
Half a dog.
FedEx drivers tend to come early.
By becoming a ventriloquist!
because the sea weed.
Chop sticks!
A hole in it.
Dad : Judging by the size of that horse's dick, Yes she is
80
So they can be driven while handcuffed.
No Man's Sky.
Well, we had to do something with the ovens.
'cause household appliances always come in white.
In Iraq.
Because shopping never causes heart attacks, but paying bills does.
In the Amazon jungle there's the Toucan, a bird with tiny legs and a big beak. In Africa you can find the Flamingo, a big bird with a small beak but very long legs. Recently scientists discovered a new species of birds in a forest near Tchernobyl : the Onono. It's a bird with a small beak, tiny legs, and very big balls. Whenever he has to land you can hear him squeak : "Oh no no! Oh no no!".
Because they all manifest the sry gene
I'm not beating up a black person.
Sufficient amount of youth in Asia.
"Aboot this big"
Because she couldn't do the evening
Faux paw.  
Quicksilver
Flip-Flops
Leave a plunger in the toilet!
Only one, but the light bulb really has to want to change.
Tumblr
If it's their lightbulb, none of your damn business.
A syntax error.
He was proven guilty of providing arms to Iraq
"I'm kinda busy, I won't be able to stay any longer, smell ya later" PS: the addict died that day from severe delusions that his coke was talking blanket, lot of coke....
A trumPET *Edit Also why is this Marked Politics?
It was in the middle of 9 / 11.
A small medium at large.
Boisex, Idaho
Your addicted. 
Only one, if you cut him thin enough.
You have to get in the back of the oven.
He made a Freudian slip
You really have a smart uniform. 
They both have Sandy Claws.
He could Nazi.
They have their own bees knees.
A BoVine
a piece of you here, a piece of you there, just a lot of pieces of your body flying
The tooth fairy.
An egg in a duck.
All he wants is Just Ice
Everytime he tried, he was told that she was young and that they tried not to sectionalise her.
Piiig 
Because it was 'two-tyred'.
Dr. Dre
Nothing you idiot, bananas don't talk!
One's a disgusting cesspool full of paranoid, bigoted, anti-American sadists, and the other is really cold.
GAINZZZZZZ
For Hispanic attacks
An arm and a leg.
Leave the glass of milk alone long enough and it'll develop a culture.
A concert that costs 45 cents.
You can actually punch information into a computer.
Muhammad Achoo
Glad-he-ate-her? 
Horses
Peking duck. (it came to mind over dinner... I thought I would share the pain with everyone)
Brailleant ones. Sauce: Am blind.
Well sir we have three options red, blue, and yellow. Our red colors are inspired by the rose fields of Sweden. "Got the color orange?" No, the blue colors were crafted from finest of silk from Japan and represent the waves of the ocean. "What about brown?" Our LAST option is Yellow, it shines as if it came from the sun itself. "Got Indigo?" Just indigo f*ck yourself.
Sugar-tits.
A dog with pawlitical experience.
I haven't touched mine in years.
An H2Ho.
How many data wranglers does it take to change a lightbulb? Just one, but they need a backup.
Astro-knots.
A washing machine doesn't follow you around after you dump a load in it.
Because he was Snowden.
Society
because they lactose   I don't know why I found this so funny!   ready for the down vote to begin <3
SPD Gonzales.
Fucking with the german snipers
What’s black and screams?  Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
Shartonnay
A Khalculator
Yeah, apparently it went viral. I know this is awful, but my coworkers laughed... so I got that going for me.
He had locomotives.
You PO PO PO POKE HER FACE PO PO POKE HER FACE!
Go for the juggler.  This is my favorite joke that I have read on here. 
There is no contradiction club 
A Corpseman. Painfully obvious, yet a terrible play on the English language, I know. It was something I came up with a few years ago, for some unknown reason.
They commeownicate. 
A cam-el. Get it, because a camera records things and a camel is a animal.
He turned into a driveway. 
Would you pull that crap with a net?
Big Red, dawg.
Because it's Lit.
there's no Walker in Fast and Furious .......RIP Paul
A little chili
You should go to the corner, its ninety degrees over there.
They're always very sorey.
Neither have they
A pizza can feed a family.
joseph schooling 
It was pissed off 
When you twist the doorknob it doesn't scream.
Most of the jokes in this subreddit.
I'd be OP.
It gets toad away
A spider
A tear jerker
Because two Wongs don't make a white
Canoes tip.
They were both originally made for kids, but daddies end up playing with them.
a tear-jerker
Because he was sick of chainmail.
They both recycle. 
Because seven is a six offender.
Thanks for the tip.
With jammin 
A speech impediment.
Lettuce alone without dressing. 
Because they can't elope!
neither have they
Because you make sound judgement.
Because I don't joke about jokes.
It never gets old
How did you get your head in between those teeny legs?
I have a bream.
A rotten banana.
PYONG! YANG!
Not being in the Paralympics
When is the baby Jew?
They'll turn it into a bombardeer
HIGH-SIS
A multi-porpoise tool!
Because 7 8 10.
Prom
A refrigerator doesn't fart when you pull your meat out of it
Inspectacles
Because he has no limbs  Kinda dark, I know. It's just for those out there who would chuckle at this. ;D
Good buy.
One's a slimy scum-sucking bottom-dwelling scavenger; the other is a fish.
Voat manipulation.
Broke
They're both full of shit.
A cuntry.
Depth perception 
My penis.  It's running for president of my homeowners association. I can't control that guy.
They can lure you in and pikachu
It was having a mid-life crisis.
They both try to suck you dry, try to have babies with your DNA, and then you find them sucking off someone else.
None, that's a hardware issue.
Remorse code
Kick his sister in the Jaw. 
Smoked buddha.
It's the most basic drink there is.
Circumference.
The windshield.
A keybored
"Bone Apple Tea"
They both nailed a 2x4.
An elephant.
Well shit.
A pedophile.
Hey dad, how do you feel about abortion? "Ask your sister" I don't have a...
There's no charge.
They're both perverts. One is horny and the other keeps having wet dreams.
Because he's full of preservatives.
He wrote, "i is the square root of negative 1."
Because they are always multiplying.
To finger A-Minor.
Aftermath
A space engineer!
Because its two tired.
A: uh, me so sorry.  
Til infinity.
Because if they fell forward, they would land in the boat! 
You fuck one of them.
Ryan Locht-up
"I think we should start seeing other sheeple."
It's called Hide and Go Sikh.
They found him the next morning lying in his tea pee. 
He wants to make America "grate" again. 
"Oh, God I'm so nervous. If I mess up, I'm gonna kill myself."
Nun of your business.
My teacher was so unsanitary. I got pinkeye, whoopingcough, and strep throat. 
Because of their tiny little anty bodies. 
Every time he got close to filling the tank, he'd pull the nozzle out and spray gasoline all over the car. 
A: An Ohioan who can read. Q: What's an Ohioan? A: A Kentuckian who can count. Q: What's a Kentuckian? A: A West Virginian with a branching family tree. Q: And who the hell are you to be making all these rude judgments? A: Trauma counselor for tour guides.
People laughed, because it was a good joke.
Ones a pranked Redditor, the other is a ranked predator.
Because you're basic...
I can still turn your mom on.
The both are great at down-loading 
Because i might vote for it!! Fridge 2016
He was afraid that he would swallow his words.
Every other number
A Trillbilly! 
He had a great interView. 
A welfare Czech.
Back in Black.
A Moooooslim!!
An investigator. 
Because it had nobody to go with.
"Resistance is futile."
The answer is the feathers. 200 pounds of bricks is just a bunch of bricks, but if you try to carry 200 pounds of feathers, you also have to carry the weight of what you did to those poor birds. (Found this on Tumblr @sirobvious and just want to share it with you guys!)
A Labrador Deceiver.
The dinner bell.
It soiled itself.   
Because they have to pass through in doors. 
A bi-eulogy
According to my ex wife my career and penis should be here
The real question is... why the hell was there a tree in your kitchen?
Kermit's fingers 
When she can fit into your wife's clothes.
She got off on a technicality.
Because it was a mooooooslim.
It's near-humerus.
The pet store
A mis-carriage
Because Trump wants to build a wall, and a wall is what killed Dale Earnhardt. 
At least he didn't oui in them too. 
Trigger-nometry.
Because leather is made of hide. 
Sorry old friend... You just won't cut it
There is no F in way.
Roll up her sleeve.
A menorahty! 
That don't impreza me much.
A wooly jumper!
There was nothing   to do
A milkshake
A crowd.
Netflix and  dren
Kike
"Flabracadabra, Allakillman!"
Marry it.
Don't be alfredo. 
He needs to be very careful, because he may be getting screwed.  
Plot Holders.
Czechs Mix
Full-figured! 
Toiletries
"...and I would have gotten away with it if it weren't for you medaling kids!"
Tricky question 
No chance of blocking an uppercut.
Herpevores
endorphins
If the shutter makes a "crick" noise.
People think you're shit unless you're number 1.
So they can get a better grip of the broom. :)
He enjoys the taste of Doctors Without Borders.
Because he was 9/11.
It's not, numbers don't have emotions.
Attempted murder
They don't give a flying fuck.
A Rubik's cube, you dirty minded individuals!
Fungal Bloomingdale's.
She kept objectifying people. 
Al Gore's the stiff one.
He keeps delivering to the wrong fuching address! 
Because they don't like dicks.
Flush 
Was it Usain Bolt or Ryan Lochte's ride to the airport?
HellifIknow!
Shitty
None. It's a hardware problem.
A mushroom.
Just one if its lochte'd
To remind them why there's no money in it 
Piiig 
The oyster shucks between fits...
Dick Tater.
Because they're easy to push around and never stand up for themselves
Use zodiac signs
Cuz it's all rye, it's all rye, it's all rye.
Because her boyfriend was blond too.
A peg leg.
A start.
, because 99% of its products are made from recycled material.
The one with the lowest mew.
They have no class
No you didn't. You haven't heard anything. Long Live the Democratic People's Republic of Korea.
American. EDIT: My first post on Reddit and I get 1000+ up votes, thanks so much!!!
Because they can't C#.
One live baby nailed to ten trees. 
A boy asks his mom, Why am I black and you're white? She says, Don't even go there. The way that party went, you're lucky you don't bark
Because he was badly abused by his uncle when he was 5
You hang around. I'll go on a head.
It's alimentary, Watson.
Neal
... Don't ask me man, I just fly the drones. 
I'm gonna Pokemon.
It was too mainstream :) 
Oh.l
Divorce proceedings, most likely
It turns out, it's not very hard at all
In car, serrated
It was fucking intense.
A knife to the throat
Wasted time!
He was high whisk.
Dung!
TWO CHURNZ!
Cmon you won't feel a zing!
Yeah I wouldn't admit it either...
He was startin' to feel like a rap dog, rap dog. 
The Cloud. 
An Allarma
He's got like a Brazilian Medals.
Because he wasn't paid the money he deserved.
It's 'rent free!
68,  Because when you hit 69, you flip over and eat it...
Finding his blacklight.
“Well I’m not”, the other replies, “...because I’m a squirrel!”
Free shots for everyone!
Because he had fowl languange.
My Zipper.
Poor Old Nincompoop Thinks It's A Cadillac
I'm in pane
Papa-wheelie! 
Hold On, Not Done Accelerating.
It's not hard.
None. She should have opened it as she brought it to you.
Californians don't screw in lightbulbs, they screw in hot tubs.  (I remember this from the 1970s when I was in middle school.  It's one of my first dirty jokes)
A rip off
Mosquito: So we can enjoy different flavors. 
It needed a tuna-up.
He pasta way. His legacy will become a pizza history.
Don't be silly, Black Lives Matters protesters can't change anything.
America
Going in to ask for a coat hanger
Apparently more than 5, because my basement is still dark.
I need to use the word hotdog or mustard in an acronym  They both don't have to be in the same acronym they can be 2 completely different abbreviations.  Its like one or the other. like "Hotdog association of America" HAA, but actually funny. 
It was ridickulous.
You can unscrew a lightbulb
Because I always get weird stairs
Victorian's Secret
They couldn't function together.
Because AIDS gets the girl
he was a bad conductor.
It's from North Carolina. There were a bunch of dudes standing around a car, and one of them said, "That's a nas' car."
They both come while you're sleeping
Denuvo.
It's relatively funny.
She has a pumpkin for a coach and runs away from the ball.
They're masters in Arielle combat
Because running is past tents.
Because they hang around the fungi.
A gnatural disaster. 
A meowtain
Harambe
Assault and bananaery.
Triggernometry
One. Men can be Feminists, too.
Sneakers.
 An American full of himself.
Because you never get a goodbuy from them 
You are fucking stupid if you don't know 
An exorcist.
Answer: Because it was given a good fruit punch! zing
wo ai ni
He finds his dog, his truck gets fixed, and his woman comes home.  
A Slipper. :D
The splits
One
A Dell.
A reprimand from the Scientific Ethics and Integrity Committee and an immediate withdrawal of your grant funding.
22. One to screw the bulb in, two to hold the glass cover, three to hold the three ladders which each of these men are standing on, four out on a boat trying to use light signals to communicate that the light isn't on yet, and 12 celtic band players singing to convince the three men that a fall down 20 flights of stairs would be painful.
Paul: I have good news and bad news. Which do you want to hear first? Michael: The good news. Paul: The good news is that I have no bad news.
When there is a problem they just turn them off and back on 
The snack machine.
/Jokes reposts
Staying up all night wondering if there really is a dog.
Because it's always a Sun day
Try necromancy, it's sure to... raise your spirits.
They're always rushin.
Because he doesn't want to be SPOTTED!!!
Shot.
Lusain Belt
Go Outside
Micro Phelps.
Denim Denim. Denim
There is one too many of them.
Double jointed. What do you call someone who can smoke three at once? Dead. Don't do drugs.
He is finnished. Ha ha ha. God I am so depressed. :(
What?  You expected more than that? 
Boko Harambe
"Jewish I'd give you money."
Because he doesn't want to get involved with a cockworker.
Sodomite
They strike from the shadows.
BooOOOooobs.
You'd think it would be "T", but it is "U".   *Favourite, btw.
Voltorb
"I hung out with Future." "So what." "Young Metro doesn't trust me." "Right this way sir!"
They become Emotional ship-wrecks!! :)
Let's get this sober with.
She gave 25 Gallons of water!
Lemon-ade 
Because it's always a THAI game.
Being able to walk. 
He didn't want no scrubs
Un phrarmachien!
Never mind, I'll find someone like you
cause engineers havent been able to make one that's right.
Who knows? Who cares?
Harry Potter escaped the chamber
Penguini
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick. 
Because they pikachu 
You have Vladmir Putin a word for you. 
Czar Wars
A tribal tattoo makes you laugh.
Spastics!
Here you go: 
Cuz I wanna splatter all over you until you start screaming.
.RAR
It was made from reclaimed wood.
They always say "Put me in coach!"
They don't tell you
The Chinese tourist.
They're both fine assets!
Wai Tu Yung
You
"Your shortness."
Oh well that's just uber, isn't it
I don't know...just fitting in I guess.
The fun guy
A Comedian actually has funny jokes that doesn't repeat. 
Icy dead people
Phelps. 
They both spend more time in your wallet than on your dick 
Every picture of me is a Dick pic. Which is to say my own mother hangs Dick pics on her walls.
She was searching for her udder half.
If you have bird flu you need tweetment.  If you have swine flu you need oinkment.
Food buyer: No, but can I get a bowl a soup?  Read out loud. 
Because one of them dropped a nickel.
See you next "fall".
BAD COMMAND OR FILENAME
Nothing. They were stuck up bitches. 
Rock enroll.
It was two tired.
Thirty.
'No idea.....' 'What do you call a deer with no eyes and no legs?' 'Still no idea.......' My all time favourites :)
Whatever you want, he can't hear you..
Chavocado
I stopped butchering goats.
I never took a skinny on a girl's chest.
Poultry
To get to the bigger crowd
Imagi'nation'
Sizzle-r
All of them, but Nazi.
14, maybe 15, but only if the plates ...  'run around a lot!'
An emoji...  Emo g, get it?  From my 13 year old son
To get to the other side!
Molly Poppins.
Because everybody who can run, jump, or swim is already in America.
clan chowder
Colorizebot
One. They're efficient and don't have humour.
He wanted to harm monica. 
Hebrewses
Just one. He holds up the bulb and waits for the world to revolve around him.
With little knotsies.
You get Halo-tosis. :-/
There is none; Southerners both hang them from trees.
"Aloha Ackbar" doesn't go over well at the airport 
No raisin
Ones a scum sucking bottom feeder and the other ones a fish.
No you lazy little shit, do it yourself!
His dick tastes like shit.
A Hasidic Jew. (Thank you.. Thank you.. I'll be here all week..)
He got a puncture now he lives in a Flat.     OK bye.
Icy dead people
No it doesn't...
River banks
He found Hillary's emails
Because they like to pick and chew
Sparky.
Turns out he was too big to snail.
Who gives a shit, he's finally done ruining the sport. 
Retreat that way!
Da bess bayball playa who eva live!
An oathmeal
One thousand instagrams
They're calling it iRan.
Because he only comes once a year.
It never gets old
He was well arrested!
Two Thirty.
Because their condoms were Made in China.
The Captains log
He's trying to watch his sodium intake.
Dig a hole and put Ash Ketchum in it. Then when a Pokemon comes by, run up and kick it in the Ash-hole.
Because they have no right.
The pencil is better. It has a point.
Ripostes them
His dog died.
Cut out all that blubber and you can be more like me.
The sound you make  10th floor " AHHHHHHHHH   " 1st floor "   AHHHHHHHHHH "
They're both green, smell like farts, and will stay that way for 47 years.
Getting that good D
he's now a seasoned veteran 
Keep it in the cow.
Getting off early
 h-hooo   h-hooo
Because he had no compaDREs.
It smells like carrots. 
Pokémon Go!
They like the part where the prostitute pays them
Ans: PASAL, OBOL and BASI
A Magic Johnson.
Because it was a mail dominated industry
Enough to kill two and half a man.
A Suicide Squat
"I've got a shituation"
Put it in rice.
Then don't look at  . 
Because it has a carpool tunnel. 
Wow, that ass sure took a pounding
Stealhead!
You can't ippon a Nippon.
It was poor execution.
The Little Mermaid on her period.
Russian roulette, except with a full chamber.
Soo-Duhh!
Ese's(Essays)
Black man working
LeBronze James
Summer...Her name's summer. 
Only one of them is organized.
He was nuts over her.
Because they strongly dislike vacuums.
So they can prevent breakouts.
Tennish
The fruits of her labor.
Why is a giraffe's neck so long? Because his neck is way up here! (Dad Joke)
They couldnt find any leads! 
LMAO
I can't go on. 
A Tea-bone
Ain't no merci
Salt
They'd rather fuck an asshole than a pussy!
To keep his nuts dry.
When Bernie quits everyone is fucked. When Trump quits, everyone is saved.
Caribou can't fly. 
With a small loan of a million dollars.
They both change your ring tone
Urethra Franklin 
Wrong, the word is wrong
Give him a used tampon and ask him to determine which period it came from. 
In other news, a dentist has recently been found dead in his apartment.
2 in the front, 3 in the back, 6 million in the ashtray...
eggs get laid!
His brother with the laptop.
Not being retarded.
A cheetah.
The Nun has hope in her soul and the lady taking a bath has soap in her hole.
You Pokémon!
Fur traders....
<message deleted>
To get his quarterback. 
How should I know?
Toot tonic 
He had a 2-2.
Dr. Dre
Run. He still has the grenade in his teeth.
A vacuum cleaner.
Rolaids.
A dedipus complex.
Haramblebee
They are calling their group the Black Guy Pees.
"Hey... wanna go steady?" (There's 7 billion people in the world, so 9 billion on Reddit. If this has been done before, I apologize. TBfuckingH I'm drunk and hope it hasn't.)
MOOOOOO!!!!
He won the Nobel prize.  (Sorry if this has been posted before, I heard it today for the first time and it made my day)
Because it was FAT.
What do you call a Jewish Pokemon Go Player? Ash...
He heils a taxi!
With a corporate ladder.
Nobody can judge you on your age difference.
There's no such thing as a lightbulb.  How could such a thing appear fully formed.  It was put there by Satan to trick everyone.
They should rename it to "No Man Should Buy"...
Trick question! You need brain cells to get into college.
Very Quackly
None, that's what students are for.
apparently, he loved the taste of seamen.
Mr. Do Ping
A condescending con descending. 
Hearing AIDS
Because it's all done one handed.
If you leave Yogurt alone for 200 years, it develops a culture.
"Shtanzas"
It was a no brainer. 
A crowbar.
A 100 dollar bill you pervert!
Hold onto your nuts, this is no   blow job!
No IT guys change light bulbs, they just keep flicking the switch on and off again until something happens.
A hatchback. 
A prius
A virgin
Because all the ones that can run, jump and swim are already in America.
Congratulations, you have a healthy new baby!
Pantene
Nighttime, you racist bastard.
It de-Pence on who you ask.
Seating for four!
John Linen
Human beans 
Because Steele Johnson always comes second.
He was fingering a minor
Oh God, not the B's!
the bucket
Somebody who stays up all night torturing himself mentally over the question whether or not there’s a dog. EDIT: I just started reading Infinite Jest and thought this was a good one to share.
They're both Peter Sellers
Beat the dead horse. 
Cop: "Did you kill this man?" Me: "No, a bullet killed him. Bullets are made of lead, which comes from the ground. The ground is part of nature. He died of natural causes. Case closed."
Just Juan you racist bastard. The other twelve are sleeping on the floor.
Zikachu.
How do you get a witch pregnant?
One composes, the other decomposes...
he walk in and screams victor and victor screams aaryan.
One is a crusty bus station, the other is a busty crustacean.
They have the best schools for it. 
A: Yeah, of course! Reply: Right on, now fuck off.
Slicking her hair back and making her look like a six year old boy.
Every time they get a corner they put a dairy on it.
I would've gotten second if it weren't for you medaling kids.
idk theres just something about it that drives me crazy
Nothing. You already told him twice.
Girl: You mean 69? Guy: No, 68. Girl: What's 68?! Guy: You go down on me and I'll owe you one. 
Because Steele Johnson always comes second.
Rage Upon the Latrine
Look ma, no hands! 
Have a eggsellent day.
People are sad that the state of syria failed.
You can tuna piano but you can't piano a tuna
A repost.
I don't know, I close my eyes when I masturbate.  
Sure Thanks?
Just had a Seizure. (too those who dont get it read it out loud quickly) 
Lunch and dinner.
Sir Cumference, he ate too much pi 
To see the front
Because they can get their whole grains. 
To escape the Orangutan Sanctuary!
At least a zit waits until you're a teenager before it cums on your face! 
He only Phelps himself.
He found the apple was a surprisingly down-to-Earth kinda guy.
The U.S. potato can still compete in the Special Olympics.
Son: "nice try, a chair!" Dad: "Nope. Our dog just died."
The sails were going through the roof.
They throw a boat at it.
Depends how hard you can throw them.
I can't remember.
It's too busy.
NASCAR, because it's always heading to the left. 
No one wants to be comic sans. 
Cream of SumYungGai
Dope!
Dicks out for her  amb!
Cuz i feel a connection
A Scottish Guy is suing an American Quiz show. He was denied the $50000 top prize when he was told he had answered the final question incorrectly. He however insists he was correct in his answer. Here is what he was asked: Question - Where is Santa Fe? Scottish guy's answer - North Pole
Tell my wifi won't be home for dinner. 
because im a black man you racist
My crippling debt.
Cheer-Rios
A despair-agus
Not too well considering they can't finish a race.
Because it's pointless.
Because he treats women like objects. EDIT: phrasing
haRAMbe
Just a little before Eve 
Weathered. 
What's the difference between a rapist and a pope?
You can't tuna fish!
Because victoria has secrets . 
Mo' lasses
No? Well, they must be hiding pretty good
Page two of Google
Walking
Because it's hard to put out a Greece fire. 
Getting out of bed. You never feel like it making hard to get up and you usually take a long time to.
A woman doesn't accept 3 1/2 inch floppies.
Because they literally can't even.
Michael J Fox
He was Robin.
A jet engine stops whining after it lands
Because they can dress foreless.
"Well, I'll deal with this asbestos I can!" 
None, it's already lit fam.
Because Allah likes digimon
Two, and a really big lightbulb.
Because it was rated R.
One waits till you're 14 before coming on your face.
The quality of the sandwich.
Allah snack bar. They say its the bomb!
Katy Perry
Post.
Game of Cones If it was about sword sharpening: Game of Hones If it was just everyone playing Go: Game of Stones If everyone was single: Game of Alones If it was about balls: Game of Throwns If it was about spooky scary skeletons: Game of Bones If everyone used UAVs to fight: Game of Drones If everyone was a banker: Game of Loans If it was about breakfast foods: Game of Scones
Neither has him.
I ( ) can't ( ) understand ( ) your accent ( ).
Because they are the Facist animals within existence.
The black market.
Because they take a steroid.
Bisexual.
Polska Kielbasa.
You ask.
The freezer doesn't fart when you pull the meat out.
Her wedding cake.
It's fresh ground.
Sargento
I'm the one, you zero!
One is made of plastic and dangerous for children to play with... And the other carries groceries.
They use 2-in-1 shampoo
Nothing, it just waved.
The wheelchair
If you open the windows in a submarine, your problems will begin.
i made a grave mistake
More like Pizza Butt
'Hugh Hefner right to do this!'
A-lou-AK-bar.
Obe-city
an ill eagle
Don't worry. Some asshole will tell you.
Back my Smitch Up!
Because they're ex-perts
The white amount.
It sucked a lot. 
A New Jersey
Mt. Erebus
A zombie.
Ralveoli.
Sir Cumference
Because the Earth is always tilted.
Hitler!
Her dad.
Everything is 12 or under.
Anything, just don't call him late for dinner. 
With a shotgun suicide.
Cruise control.  LOL fuck everyone hahahaha 666SATAN666
Call a big toe truck.
Nothing. God is a fictitious construct and deviled eggs are chicken embryos filled with condiments. Find something better to do with your time.  
AL- qaeda
"Define intervention." Came up with this today at work. 
First we steal two Eggs
It was a period piece.
The Trumpet.
A polar bear.
The plot thickens.
Michael Jackson's ghost's hand.
Because jokes don't make people laugh, people make people laugh.
A Luter.
When it was Jew.
Someone who doesn't have any expewience
Your under a vest
Because they ate all the lox. 
A doctor
Canadian
Abra Cadaver. 
Buds before suds, bro.
Having half a screaming child on your hands.
My mother-in-law.
That I will open the door
Vladimir Gluten
By investing in a shavings account. 
Yello?
You would too if the guy in front of you at the Theatre was wearing a Top Hat!
The extroverted mathematician looks at YOUR shoes when he's speaking to you.
Mean.
Awkward.
Both should be changed regularly, and both for the same reason.
An quittance of Joe said: "Have you ever been to a party" Joe responded: "yes" The Acquaintance replied: "Yeah but like one where you were randomly invited and didn't know anyone there" Joe quickly replied: "Yeah, I have actually" The Acquaintance said surprised: "Really? which one?" Joe: "My schools' after prom party".
shitpost
They both spit fire
Hit.
It's the one that always sinks....
Pink Fluff! What is blue and fluffy? Pink fluff holding it's breath!
They both steal your bike.
The longer you play with it, the harder it gets. 
Happiness... you dirty bastards
Men. credit: 
High finance.
The titanic
A pepperonly pizza!
REDDIT BE
A prestidigitator tot!
My point is old people shouldn't get to vote 
He used the Cross Walk. 
A skimpy.
The Delete Key
.....change??
His personality. 
Put his coupons under his charity pamphlet.
Decaf coffee.
They were all petrified. 
You want flies with that?
The children always end up with lice in their hair.
Beef Stroganoff. 
A PeaCUNT
Christian Bales
nothing 
America
Mutated
Because you are CuTe Credits to Life is Strange video game. 
He was ill.
"Don't you think you're selling yourself short?"
A cheetah 
A hundred sows and bucks.
With dental floss
This clique bait will shock you!
Everywhere.
Picasso
Say No To This.
The pencil has a point
Harlem Shake.
They use sea bras.
A Zikachu
Super-Pac man.
"Allahu Akhbarrrr"
E.T learned English and wanted to go home.
Shampoo
Jim.
You tell them a bad joke.
"Man, if we don't get some support, people will think we're nuts."
Wonderwall Mexican cover
Pay $100 for 30 minutes
RPM ( Revolutions Per Minute )
Suicide squat.
Put 30 crates of vodka near the pool
Buckaneer 
[removed]
One, but you can be sure a whole Reddit community will appear to expand the joke, make it funnier and eventually run it into the ground.
A Pander.
Uranium gets to its half-life on time.
He was too far out man.
Whig
Hippies don't screw in lightbulbs they screw in dirty sleeping bags. 
"Aisle,altar,hymn.”
"Please Get Out The Pool"
Have it Yahweh
A LEOtard.
FOR JUST ICE
A Megasoreass
Tit tea.
One's a meteorologist and the other's a meaty urologist.
"I falafel."
Usain Bolt can actually finish a race.
Because they lost an I.
 
You're gonna need a hell of a big wok to fit a wheelchair.
Baby elephants.
Make people study for 18 years and dont give them a job. 
Dinner
A wife will blow a bonus.
Cranium.
A harumble.
... I forgot it.
Respond to this post or else your mother will die in her sleep tonight
They take their prison population and school population to Rio.
I heard they're called Juan Direction
Because he was a urologist.
The US elections. 
Of course! She said it was a gas!
'One two three' cat, because 'Un deux trois' cat sank.
A homeless epileptic.
Rape. 
Step up: transformers :v
A headache.
Ukraine.
Kermit the Frog's Finger.
Because he's allergic to glutes
Hitler never raped a 13 year old.
A seizure salad.
One blows up kids, the other gets blown  by them.
Are ya?
Because its cheaper than chemo.
Because dinosaurs went extinct 65 million years ago.
Batman can go out at night without Robin
Arnold Schwarzenegger said, "I'll be Bach."
One is in a coma, and the other is gay.
To get to the other side.
Meowterspace
A pimple only comes on your face after puberty. 
A cusstomer
The Suicide Squad
Hitler's lesser known, second, book about his love of knitting.
A spuddy in the nuddy! 
Disguise!
It wasn't born yesterday.
Or just mine?
Oedipal panties. 
A wok on.
Ask your parents.
Ow, mitosis!
You might think it's II, but his true love be the C.
They split up.
Shitpost.
now give me a second hand job
Who cares
A small loan of a million dollars. 
Because they can
Chloroform SHHHH..
They both wiggle when you eat them.
A threesome
If the creator were to forget to rig it!
Omelette!!
A Labracadabrador.
You switch the 'n' with 'q'.
An astronaut you fucking racist
Hebrew
Just an electron that goes around looking for a fuse to blow!
I don't know, but my Dad said it was a mistake.
NOTHING....!!!
Nothing, sooner or later they will both be laid by a Mexican
Coconuts have hair
A buccaneer! 
A-corny joke.
I don't know, but their flag is a huge plus.
Post on Sundays.
Back to school ads
He's looking over his shoulder
North West
Antique farm equipment
Oranges have thick skin. Let the downvotes fly, people! You've only got one! Edit: Did not expect this joke to get this good of a reception. Thanks, guys!
A steam sale
Rubbit
I don't know but my dad said it was a mistake :D
An artist. My 11 year son just came up with this one.
The box the penis comes in!
... but Abu Dhabi do!
How come it only sounds judgy and sarcastic after I've finished jacking off?
Homo erectus.
Boko Harambe
They were documented to have sold Coke. 
Nothing. They weren't mulch for conversation.
Californians don't screw in light bulbs, they screw in hot tubs and infinity pools.
Coming out of the closet.
You get a cobbler! 
Address! 
Baghdad!
Because they need to grip the broom! 
"Is this a tumblr meetup?"
You swimming pull
Julying!
Because praying for a bug fix is guaranteed to fail.
A hippocratic hypocrite.
The pricks are on the outside of a porcupine
asked a son to his father. "It means 'happy,'" replied the father. "Oh," contested the son, "so are you gay, then?" "No, son, I have a wife."
You have to drop the bomb on her twice before she gets it.
He overslept.
There is a lot of blowing and sucking at first, but in the end you lose your home!
I heard he is all right now
Chasing pokemons... 
Kim Kardashian's face.
When you're a billionaire.
Stevie Wonder
They both can't reach really far.
"You owe me five billion million gajillion bucks coz I turned into a human and run for a president. The other half doesn’t have the money to pay, and that he would kill himself soon.
It hangs itself
Offer him a free train ticket
Darth Mall.
Passive-Aggression
Donald Trump. I lied about the wheels.
Because they can't even!
A guy will actually spend time searching for a Golf Ball. 
Arapahoe
Gropetemis Prime.
To get to the school yard.
To be put out.
7-Eleven on the dot.
Your spine Edit: Thanks guys, made it to the front page. Was my first joke and   spine joke on Reddit. 
blue one blew this way, one blew that way
Minisoda
They steal all the green cards!
You can't fix shit with all that screaming and crying. (  Check #2 here:  )
He was in dah Nile.
Because he left the Windows open.
YEEEEAAAAH! GO CEILING! YOU NUMBER ONE BABY! WOOOOOOHOOOOOO!
You take the s out of safe and the f out of way!
White Vans
It's okay, we're Bi-son.
He puts it in the Wash﻿.
A cripple. 
It tears your apart.
They're shellfish in bed.
Masterbaiter
A bad anti-joke
Tinder
Try sticking a pineapple in your ass, then tell me
Walk up to the nearest police officer and you're in.
People from Dubai don't watch The Flintstones, but people from Abu Dhabi do
Because you remove them.
Donald Trump. 
Unemployed. 
Wheeeeeee!
Seven.
allahpeno
Because every time she reaches 69 she gets a frog in her throat. 
Abra-cadaver
Christopher Walken
The vampire hunter made a miss-stake.
a maggot
They both used to be on top gear.
Its arsehole.
Because instead of "Oh Joseph! Cum in me!", Mary said "Oh God! Cum in me!"
Blood sausage.
Pokemon Go! 
An incorporation.
She wanted open borders.
Bison
Santa stops after three "hoes"
They prefer fur mats.
One fine morning in Eden, God was looking for Eve, but couldn't find them. God saw Adam and asked where Eve was? Adam replied, "She's down at the Ocean, taking a bath."  "Damn," says God, "now all the fish will smell."
Q: What does a waiter ask a group of Jewish ladies? A: "Is ANYTHING all right?"
He was gonna hijack a plane but he didn't want to use his miles Credit: Hesh from The Sopranos Note: I'm Jewish, not sure if that makes it better or worse ;-)
LGBTQ+
Jaques straps
Your mom can't take a joke.
I'm stronger than you.
It came in the mail.
Dill or No Dill
It's a pain in the ass.
Because he has a woodpecker!
He plays the TRUMPet.
Gay
A vegetarian doesn't like meat and a virgin doesn't know yet if she likes meat or not.
He had a plane to catch. 
To the Moooovies 
No idea man, im just flying the drone. 
Because they get undie find errors.
You would be too if someone was pulling on your hose all day.
They both have a collection of CP
She : I just left my job. I couldn't work for that man after what he said to me. Me : What did he say ? She : You're fired.
Not funny. Except in that you know, "heh, meta" kinda way. Heh, meta.
"Age is just a number"
A book has papers.
Hilary's dick.
Because they offer a good celery.
Make up sex.
No, you are all left
84% of their dna 
[deleted]
Nothing! They just WAVED. SEA what I did there? I'm SHORE you did. Let MINNOW if you are not getting it. SHELL I continue?? No?.. I guess I'll stop WHALE I'm ahead. Thanks ladies and gentlefish
Because he wants to send them back to Poland
None, the beer should be open by the time she has brought it to you.
Admit it, your mind said 
Ass pair I guess... EDIT: Wow! Reddit Gold and Front Page! Thank you everyone, I will continue my new dream career of writing jokes on my commute to work! I love you all!
They both fiddle with a rod
[removed]
Two kilomockingbirds  (credit goes to my old physics book)
Instagran
gundy
Tea. It's an ant tea joke.
About 20 beers!!
Because fuck you,  that's why!
A midwife crisis.
Poepurry
They   insist that the fit could be better.
Cancer always wins.
It chips their teeth.
It got caught in a trap chewed off three legs and was still trapped.
Vladimir Poutine.
He will have to move in a smaller house in a black neighbourhood
EVERYDAY !!
Because he felt like BACON!
Answer: pseudo-coup (say it out loud)
Two in the front, three in the back and the rest in the ashtray.
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
Weeaboo
Light green
The Tuna, since all of the others are crushedasians.
They both give kids a little head.
To watch the butterfly
Shoot before he hits the water.
Elephino...
"You're fired." 
Space.
Because he doesn't like looking down on the unemployed. First to ever post this joke here, yay!
Racism has many faces...
Edam.
A really strong gust of wind.
"I'm not really Willie Nelson"
Because that's the only Father they know.
No one told him life was gonna be this way.
"Bulbasaur!!"
They're calling it "Make America Gyrate Again" - it's all about putting people back to twerk.
A skinned baby in a bag of salt. *squeals
Oh God I'm cumming!
A ro-tater.
... A nail gun
They planet.
Hey that's mycoat Jackson!
Jack of all Spades
Energy!
Roll-aids. 
Because he wanted twenty good Meng.
They both like to crack open a cold one
It's a once in a lifetime experience 
He was alive before he died.
Hyrule.
Sir
One's a crusty bus station and the other's a busty crustacean.
A dogwood
It just lepton.
To get to the other side 
In the can-can can can.
America
Grow up. 
You're peein'
One connects to all your devices and access your data, one connects to all your devices and access your data.
An increase in battery cases.
It comes in the mail.
...they all fell off a truck.
X. Because he (or she) is a salty little bitch
He was hammered.
A space bar. 
Three. One to pay a Mexican to do it, two to deport him afterwards.
OOPS! GOT YOUR NOSE!
Because Seven Ate Nine!! Holy shit lmfao.
A nail gun.
"friends"
HE PULLED THE BONESAPART! Lol and a rock for yuhhhhh!
He saw the phone bill.
Holdzemfromfloppen
Daniel Boone WAS a man . . .
I would tell it, but I don't get it.
And where the hell is my butt-plug?
None. It's already lit fam. 
HUBBLE HUBBLE!
White because his father returned.
You'll never catch 'em all! 
Because they just can't even 
They're all living under Iraq
Come again?
Because they can
Nothing, they are both stuck up cunts.
...gnocchi
Neighbor
They both pull out of Roslyn every morning at 8:15.
Woopsie Poopsie :) 
Darude - Sandstorm
I sing in the shower.
They wouldn't have a sole. 
Flop-Flops :)
When there is a change in weather  Forgive me
Because he got the cold shoulder.
Because they Lac-Tose.
Albert Einstein.
None Edit: Repost
Harambe. 
Tie food
You pull down its genes! 
Cos sin tan (Because suntan)
Ghastly.
Snowballs!
Because everyone's making a racket.
Paddy O'Furniture.
To cover up Bill's jizz
Black kid: because you got ears you dumb ass b*tch.
One goes   "Shit!" and the other goes "Shit!" 
Stoned.
Depends
Because he's our father, and still hasn't come back yet....
It was in tents. 
Hail.. seizure
"Lettuce prey"
They'll both lie and tell you it's a footlong to get paid.
Darude - Sandstorm
Stevie Wonder and Ray Charles playing tennis.
Cha Ching
It's tough to stand on your own when you have no spine.
America
The slow swimmer.
Arrrrpg's
Leukemia Skywalker.
He spent his day cutting up vegetables 
Because it messes with their hops
A Brazilian.
Because it's just another Jew Lie (The Holocaust is real and this is just a joke)
White Vans 
When the Reddit servers are ready to go down on me anytime?
Watching your mother-in-law backing up towards the edge of a cliff in your new BMW.
Homer-sexual
One ton soup.
I am good with money like Jews are. I have squinty eyes like asians have. I love fried chicken like black people does.
Out of all of your friends you have the biggest dick. 
Because he can't finish a race.
Because it's pretty depressing to have a Tamagotchi that'll out-live you.
Borderlands.
They cant find their home
Because it has four A's and one B. 
"Topical meme." 
She wants to be the first lady.
Two Chainz.
He sipped his drink before it was cool
He was sleeping with the fishes.
Because they're constant in a pool.
A parent, Lee.
I was a food truck before it was cool.
Weights
Because they're pretty hard drugs to come by
Cause when he asked her why she shot it, she replied: "I asked it what it was before I shot. But that cow wasn't gonna fool me!"
An engineer makes a lot of fucking money, whereas a prostitute could make a lot of money fucking.
His horse Marengo
Fush
I start with a “v” and every woman has one. She can even use me to get what she wants. What am I? I'll post the answer in 10 minutes.
A: Elephants never forget.
Easy.  More traffic is going to hell.
Fencing.
Haram Bae
God speed.
A wet vet vet.
An autumn-mobile.
To get to the other side.
Because he doesn't exist.
A baby combing its hair with an apple peeler
They're afraid of change.
He suffered an elegiac reaction.
Because William Shatner.
One's protein, the other's anti-teen.
Because he had the right of way.
Because everyone is dying to get in
It was Pirated.
A Wunch
He used conditioner on them. 
Dead.
The first one is the engagement ring...the second one is the wedding ring...and the third one is the suffering.
They're both looking for a tight seal
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
Because he couldn't concentrate 
A Fjord Fjesta
Because his fiancee is a cantaloupe!
Thanks, sis.
Neighbor! 
An epileptic cornhusker shucks between fits. 
Fish
Tony.
Anytiiiiiiiiiime
Shots for everyone!
Personally, i want to go out as my grandpa. Peacefully in his sleep. Unlike his passengers, screaming and crying.
none because There is A Light That Never Goes Out.
More like Pokemon GO to the poll.
Because he wanted the worst cellphone service in the world.
Tsarbucks
Sonic the eggnog.
Horses
Your Mother. 
Because he has down syndrome
They all Suck
I just call that semen
Party fowl.
Captain Cook.
The archeologists convention is a nerdy bunch of diggers.
"For hispanic and for herspanic"
Have Vladimir Putin take laxatives.
20 hot 9 year olds.
They always shoot the black 
Do I point at my crotch when I ask where the toilet is?
They can't stand seeing a man have a good time.
A sneaker.
A MISTAKE!!!
Turn it upside down!
The stu-stu-studio.
Donald Trump sneezes.
mathgic
Joe mama
Now you're just Stallin.
If they go to college, they'll probably get stoned.
Reddit Old
A Fungi!
PSYtama.
He was not an archdevil.
Execution is everything. 
Escargot.
Both give you a good chance of catching something 
Short legged cows
Adolphin
Bingo!
Because his dick was still in the chicken.
It's because it works!
He just comes out of nowhere.
Just read her name backwards!
Make them think about Donald Trump
Take away its internet access.
Find out next time, on Dragon Ball Z!
A moon-tain. 
Give it a badge. 
You end up with 100 people who don't do dick
Get off me, homes. 
He said "This time I am going to kill 6 million Jews and two clowns!" "Two Clowns? Why are you going to kill two clowns?" "See? Nobody cares about zee Jews."
Antique machinery
A toad says rib-it, rib-it. A horny toad says rub-it, rub-it.
A Chinese telephone.   Wing wing.  Arrow? 
Because they'll get sand in their schlitz. 
Because I don't really understand your terms and you keep saying you have no interest.
Hey look, we have the same IPhone case
Nothing. So he doesn't come...
Find out in the next episode of Dragon! Ball! Z!
He was bacon in the heat.
May I push your stool in.
Yoko Ono
Tennish
Many people saw his Van Gogh from the scene of the crime.
Because they're jalapeño business.
She couldn't see that well.
Do these genes make me look fat?
Fortunes.
PokéMongoDB
They would be eraticated
Someone who goes down a lot.
Go for the juggler.
Pokemon go always goes down on me
I can pull out of my driveway.
Infideli-tea.
UBantu
A Dairy Queen
Because the ice always Thors.
Enter, backspace, enter, backspace, enter, backspace...
This joke will be back someday
Euros!
Dad: Because your mother put her heart and soul into it.
A firm believer.
It just  escaped from a coop.
You got a day off school to go to his funeral so why wouldn't you happy about it.
Because he has little legs.
He's flat Baroque...
A communion wafer
Hoodini I made this one up
Cuz you'd be snowed-in 
He was mind-blown 
because we can't eat it :/ Have a good night/day everyone.
Knock! Knock! Who’s there? Mary and Abbey. Mary and Abbey who? Mary Christmas and Abbey New Year!
He rectum.
A small medium at large
To keep the cheerleaders from grazing at halftime.
Because millions of them already got roasted
The hot dogs taste like shit.
Hello from the other side.
Pier Pressure
For Drizzle.
Too many cheetahs.
Virgin mobile 
Donald Trump, President of the United States of America
Because its Fry-day.
There wasn't enough evidence to find out for sure. 
A wet nose.
The punchlines were too long.
Chris Vroom
Alan Rickman and David Bowie have both died recently.
Kay-so-deal-a?
Apparently they myst some deadlines.
8 mile
1 dead baby stapled to 10 trees.
I can't either, but I'm sure there's a vas deferens.
The delivery.
Only one as the rest of the world simply MUST revolve around them...
Nice. 
He has cancer.
Allahu Mybad
They always bomb the punchline!
When it's a riposte.
Whatever you like, what's he going to do about it anyway?
When it is a riposte
He bombed.
Ginger ale.  
I'm more of a L'Oreal fan
It was a cardinal sinner.
Uncle Ben's rice
Get off me Daddy! You're crushing my cigarettes!
Santa goes   the chimney. 
Using an easy-bake oven. 
They only like to use "creative outlets"
Everywhere
I am sure they will find the answer, sum-where.
To render buildings on the other side
Pummus.
Because they have jobs.
Don't get smart with me.
Usually they prefer to be called "officer"
Pontius Pilate, he once crossed a guy up so bad he died
Some will know this some won't  It's a towel xD 
If most people leave before shooting starts.
My asshole after a night with Caitlyn Jenner
Bert Chrysler.
Because he was chicken.   Alright.
Nacho cheese!!!
This is Onixceptable. 
Turns out it was race related.
It saves so much time.
WATAAA
OKC.
Ovaries-Ey!
With Sement
Nice belt.
About 8 pints
To get a sixpac! (Thank you 7th grade me)
Because not all Pokemon know selfdestruct.
Air condijoned. I'll see myself out.
Labracadabrador.
M'alaydy
With their bills!
the panoptijohn
A: They wanna peek-a-chu.
So he could Nazi. 
A water sprinkler. Chink chink chink chink chink spic shiiiiiiit.
Mer-cury
because of the holes in his hands 
Because when your salty you melt down in tears.
Your mom hasn't had sex with your mom.
A midget. 
A hypocrite.
Snow balls
Jew jitsu
Lachry-moose
Thanks, Obama.
Driver:   Cop: Sir, did you just throw a hamster at my head?
It depends how hard you throw.
Ash
I see the sea...
The wheelchair
He had to stop when he got depressed
One has a foot fetish and the other has a foot binding fetish.
Two Wongs don't make a white
A backseat driver
Because it looks black
The back of my hand.
Well, this blew up! I just wanted a laugh while having to work on a Sunday and you guys sure delivered! Damn you guys are funny. I'm gonna steal every damn one of these jokes. Edit: Some website posted your jokes and it's being circulated all over the facebooks and what-not
A few letters.
You would be too if you were running down the road with your hose hanging out!
"I'm not Willie Nelson."
A black man runs the electronics store you bought your new TV from. A nigger runs with the TV you just bought from that electronics store. Edit: Wow! this post blew up!
Obama issues an eggsecutive order.
Incorrectly is the only word spelled  I n c o r r e c t l y
Mount Rushmore.    
They don't exist!
Kick his Daughter in the jaw.
A gangbang.
Throw in your laundry.
Mom: "Because his belly has become fat recently, and I need to help him lose weight." Boy: "But that won't work." Mom: "Why not?" Boy: "Because the babysitter keeps blowing him back again."
Trigger-Nometry
Well one to screw in the bulb and other to holds the cock... father! LADDER!
They've always enjoyed rounding up Japanese monsters.
Space Jam.
To get their stuff back. 
A bad golfer goes   "Damn!" A bad skydiver goes "Damn!" 
It is that they have both recently become deceased. 
Cleavage.
Laundry.
They are both good at removing the Polish!
Depends on how hard you can throw them.
Wrinkly. 
You put tu and tu together.
A passerby saw a man laid flat on the sidewalk in front of the local beauty shop and ran to offer assistance. As the man came blinking into consciousness, the passerby asked, “What happened?” The man rubbed the back of his head and said, “I don’t know! Last thing I remember, my wife was coming out of the salon there and I said, “Well, at least they tried.”
Anchor babes.
Juan in a million.
They're both gold-diggers
ABCs
a Basilian.
Because she can't be denied coverage for pre-existing speeches
Because he'd never have been able to find 3 wise men and a virgin.
I think, women will be beaten men, hehe
I prefer Skips to Quavers. You can't dump a body in a Quaver.
Entendre and....Entendre!
Because it reminds them of home.
A subwoofer 
Because there are too many zinfandel's.
He is always high on himself.
Porto-MONET
To be taller!
FeLine
Does it have to be a light bulb? 'Cause I had this other idea...
Squackhili
 them nicely.
The Musket - ears
He joked to death.
Pinos.
It Varys.
because they type with another...
Depends on how you throw (idk if this is a repost)
Brovines.
Leonardo Da Itchy 
Pelosi helped little boys. Hastert banged little boys.
A night-mare.
His hands are too small to hold a comb
Pastatution.
An applause....
An ex or cist?
With bar tender.
Because if she can't afford a washer and dryer, she will never be able to support your broke ass...
She was in the wrong cast.
Noose Noose
It's always sunni in Philadelphia 
None, they just compliment it and get mad when it won't screw.
Here in the U.S. we just ask them how many grams are in an ounce.
Bigotree
Their "Senor"ity!
A Tourist!
None, they're already butthurt.
Mosqui-toes
They both have cockpits. 
Extra virgin oil.
One. Just because she's dead doesn't mean she can't still screw.
One is a bunch of cunning runts and the other is...
No hero
Because she had no arms
You might get a hole in one.
Because the prices are so steep
John Cougar Mellencamp
Too many homophobos.
Because he could Nazi very well.
The ring bearer had an erection.
None, they just watch it burn out and follow it around for 30 years.
the boy scouts return home from the camp
Three. One to screw it in and the second to take credit for it. And the other to repeat it.
[removed]
Obviously more than 72, or all those suicide bomber would have seen the light.
So that only 90 kids will remember.
There will be grim reaper cushions
You don't cry when chopping your mother-in-law.
Park-istan!
Allah-bama
Because it's easy to inject the seed of religion in  them.  Be gentle pls
Q2: what is a pornstar's favorite spice? A: cumin, obviously 
Na
Southwesteros
Q - Why did the chicken cross the road? A - To see the idiot across the street. Q - Knock knock. (Who's there?) A - The chicken.
Lead injections. 
Palm Sunday.  First time posting, please be gentle. 
The Bridge. It connects his courage to his ideas.
Beaucoup.
He's really good at swatting.
Because the thread has been locked by a moderator
I may be blind, but I can see why kids love the taste of Cinnamon Toast Crunch.
Pokemon Go players are only wasting their own time ;)
Someone gave some to a cajun and he said "whus dis here sauce"
It's not complex at all, right?
Because he keeps giving them the Five-Knuckle Shuffle.
He couldn't handle the boos.
The sound of fucking silence!  Now shut the fuck up! My show is on.
There's 20 of em
A kid can joke but a joke cannot kid.
The reason why their father doesn't come home
Racist
they call her... Amazon Prime
They're called the Special K
No, I only take tips
A sleepover at Michael Jacksons house
Elopping shears
It takes the piss out of your knickers.
Being 5 foot 6
He plays golf.
Nevermind.
Because anyone who can run, jump, or swim already left.
Slow swimmers
A blues musician plays 3 chords to audiences of thousands.      A jazz musician plays thousands of chords to audiences of 3
In   size pieces
 with a deadly weapon.
Two. One to screw it in and one to take credit for it. 
None, there are no fish under my new gazebo.
No Shit Sherlock
A moreman. 
They say he had loco motives. 
The bond matures.
For the Sallad
Kielbasa (Often Pronounced Ca-Ba-Sa.)
Tulips on your organ. 
Because it's a hoe sale.
Because pepper makes them sneeze!
Razer.
Llamanated
A blind man... I'll show myself out... TO SEE YOU BACK NEXT WEEK!!
Misty: It's not Staryu, it's Starmie
What's Red but smells like blue paint?  Red Paint
A pounding sensation in the ass.
Little kids don't eat broccoli 
An elasstickle
A-neigh
The Coup Clucks Clan. 
I still haven't caught any Pokemon.
My theory is that it is a Protozoa Plankton
In his sleevies. 
Jesus. Jesus saves. 
Sir Cumference 
Cuatro cinco
They all dress like Dobby.
A woman.  
If you're Eveready, I'm Frito Lay.
You don't, you get down off of a duck.
You know they're in tents.
Someone who lies awake at night if there really is a dog.
A small medium at large
I don't know but it can pick the shit out of some lettuce.
Snow White's cherry.
For the quak 
The Elfabet!
Eric Clapton never would have let his bag of coke fall out of a 49th-story window!
A coup.
Air Conditioning
You poke 'em on. 
Cache in hand. 
A Lorry with Nice breaks doesn't stop until after a mile.
The Catcher in the Rye.
Nice.
I can't marmalade my cock in your ass
Erdogan's suit wasn't back from the cleaners.
Cause they're stupid. 
Red paint.
I ran.
It saw a pikachu across the street.
Then why are all your teeth wearing little yellow sweaters?
Chemotherapy
Def Leppard
One has a coo, the other has a coup
"Let's knot."
Hobo Erectus
A carrot.  :
It staged a coup
There's twenty of them.
They aint ever got any papers
They always punch up the fuckline
Want some Turkey?
Because they're usually found on trucks.
You have to sit at the back of the furnace. 
Tuppence.
He pokémon!
The gay guys because they packed their shit the night before.
Oh bee !
A little suspect
Because according the Book of Revelations, the arrival of the apocalypse will first be signaled by Trump-Pence.
The Chinese built one over 2,000 years ago and they still don’t have any Mexicans. 
Is it really 2016? I mean Tarzan is playing in theaters, Pokemon is a craze, and a Clinton is running for President of the United States. 
Unfertillized
No? I guess it didn't spread then
Crust
They common people. 
Olive oil.
What do mathematicians and dancers have in common? They both have algorhythm.
Apparently, 84 isn't enough. 
Idaho.
It wasn't very Nice of them.
Have a NICE day!
Hedgy.
You know, because of the position of the penis.
Because he was on a break. 
He got a borderline pass.
In the library of course. They're for shelf-defense.
Virgin Mobile I'm not sorry (PS, if this is a repost, I'm sorry that I didn't see the first time it got posted 2 years ago. Please don't accuse me of reposting)
I was very confused reading headlines saying, "Nice attack, 78 dead".
udder destruction
OP's mom
Because they don't like Nice people.
....A dromedary with dairy drama
To pull it out.
He answered the iron.
Halal?
how else could we stop this? 
πrated movies.
With a knife!
Mass-debaters.
Eeeee eeee eeeee ieeeee eeee eee. Dolphins don't talk dummy. 
They say it was Nice
Nailed it
A minor.
Edward asked. "No, why?" Timothy asks back
Weeaboobs. 
Slow Africans.
Sheep. Why do elephants have trunks? Sheep don't have strings.
His horse kept casting too many neigh votes.
This has been a debate over the ages: which hurts worse, getting a swift kick to the nuts or birthing a child. It's kind of hard to say since men and women are quite different creatures, but I have noticed something. If a woman goes through childbirth, sometimes a year or so later, she'll ask to have another baby. However, a man who has taken a kick to the jewels...
Because it teaches them how to shoot, run and steal.
A re-postman. Or a re-post person if you feel triggered.
A Riceotope
Summitery.
Mr. T-Bone
"Technologically backward" What do you call a county that lacks a fully integrated banking system? "Economically underdeveloped." What do you call a country that lacks a well-connected public transportation system? "America"
Because they have bad genes.
They got tired of people pretending to be Ash.  Edit: Wow thank you for the gold mates! Hopefully none of you Jews will try to steal it from me... kidding. For those of you who were offended... please try to take it easy. It's a joke. You should find humor in everything. Life's more fun that way. 
A harpooned seal
Oh. Sorry.
In loving memory of all the faces that were buried in them.
She uses a perfect son.
Nobody takes him for granite. 
Nanking Donuts
A swallow that kept eating after 6pm.
Because the censor erased the letter "s".
I always thought he was Korean.
Gastly
They had a falling out...
Theresa may.
A nervous wreck.
A nun with a javelin through her neck.
A weapon to surpass Richard Gere
They thought she was micromanaging them!
Because he was outstanding in his field
an innocent bystumbler 
Because the editors know that they gotta catch 'em all!
What do you call a psychic midget who escaped from prison to go to Death Valley to shoot up? A high low small medium at large.
I don't think you understand the gravity of the situation.
Cuz it has another 1
One is filled with hookers, and the other is my basement!
The polar bear. 
He can't go left
Fried, scrambled, or fertilized?
One's a crusty bus station, the others a busty crustacean.
Criminal intent 
So they can run their fingers through their hair.
Very satisfying. 
Because they cantaloupe.
As fast as it can bear.
This club can't even handle me right now
Malnourished 
A hot dog
Coughing up someone else's phlegm
"Don't worry.  I'm right behind U."
the refrigerator doesn't fart when you take the meat out.
A dad joke has to reach father for a pun.
Crock o'Dial.
History repeating itself.
"Hey guys, watch this!"
Not the next redditor to post a fucking 'America' version of the disaster set up.
Most of them are General-Lee stupid.
You take the pizza delivery sign off
Two men a night.
Because he might peek at chu.
Having to admit you have autism :,P
Kermit's Finger.
I guess they didn't want a bunch of Ash running around.
What's the temperature inside of a ton-ton? Lukewarm.
a PAW-se
Of course the $ bill!
One's an ass blackhole, and the other's a - [removed]
Because his professor told his class they were going to spend the entire next day at a bacteria conference.
One's crack is in a junkie and the other's junk is in a crack.
Because her parents told her to do her essay.
Your main squeeze.
Fetishini Alfredo 
Jizzert
A milkshake.
The same middle name. (Shamelessly stolen from Cortana.)
A police shooting range.
Usain Bolt can finish a race
Because she already had cancer.
Do you even have a permit for this survey?! 
The same way British people pronounce beer can.
Small medium at large
Take a pitcher, it'll last longer!
You can't take a joke.
Because he was constantly nursing a semi.
Mourning wood
Fuck
It was an udder disaster.
No meat...
Your Czech mate
Anything you want they're not going to hear you.
Life eventually ends. 
The Ultra Sound guy. Who is it when he's not there? The Hip Replacement guy.
BBC
Both work better with the lights off.
Chic hen
They planet.
The eyes, cause they di-late.
In the Ark-Hives.
Because it neighns!
Bicycles.
An Ex-Man.
They couldn't close his coffin
an L.L.Beaner
All they found were its chard romaines
A taxi driver
Nearly a total loss... All that was left was de-brie.
Sinjit
2 in the back, 2 in the front, ad six million in the ashtray.
They both fall down when you hit them with an axe.
All P
He worked it out with a pencil.
Destruction of government property.
They're making headlines everywhere!
Everyone just needs 1 more line.
Arak of lamb
Everywhere.
All your chips and candy bars are family sized. 
It was the Teddy Bear's picnic. 
They’re always on the lookout for a tight seal.
Because curiousity was on the other side
It was totally cubular.
Because she wasn't wearing a seatbelt
"I just booked a cook for cooking the books."
The Moo York Times
I haven't given up on my memes yet 
Fat fingers
In the `!
I'll BC-ing you later.
"You da bomb" "No, you da bomb!"
Oven mitts.
Fish.
Chop off their feet.
Flacido Domingo.
Mickey Mouse  
He wipes
A facist planter's Plantar Fasciitis.
The period: it marks the end of his sentence.
The slow clap
I need two hands to remove training wheels.
To bring down the Wicked Witch of the West.
On one app you search your area and find strange creatures, on the other you only find pokèmon.
An auto-topsy 
How their name's spelt.
"About two-hundred dollars." - Johnny Carson
Ant Man
Conductor
You can Sleep with a light on 
Turn 19
Interviewer:what is skeleton? Sardar:Sir, skeleton is a person who started dieting but forgot to stop it..!!!
The Allahu ak-Bar 
Dix.
Nein.
Two Mennonite
Oui.
A hockey player showers after 3 periods.
A stick
A: You add a bed, subtract the clothes, divide the legs, and pray there's no multiplying.
Tracer
What's blue, orange and lying at the bottom of a swimming pool? A baby with popped floaties.
You poke 'em on.
More than one mother-in-law.
He does crossfit. 
Put it in box of Ding Dongs.  What is it afterwards?  A HoHo
Just one, but they have to steal it first.
Acne usually comes on a boy's face after he turns 12.
Out of the Blue.
Arrrrrrby's 
Spacex 
Because the teacher said it was a piece of cake.  -My 6 year old Nephew 
I've never paid to have a lima bean on my chest.
Heinz-enburg.
It told it a Nak-Nak joke! (In my language Urdu, Nak means nose.)
Thats nuts
Budweiser
A potential suspect.
Because Intel Inside.
Because: a) Dammmm  b) I blame you for me being broke  c) You can suck real well d) You should be cleaning my house top to bottom 
At the pissed office.
It was a sting operation.
How do Jews shower? The same as you idiot. First we get nice and we.. Wait, it's a trap! The gas its too mu... faint scream﻿
You can un-screw the light-bulb
"Fred Goldman, because he's got mine!" - OJ Simpson
Seeing your ex. 
Because they don't like Dick's
The Ozone layer doesn't benefit from having holes in them.
Find the guy wearing a rebel flag.
...Beeological Warfare
Hoover, his administration really sucked.
Beef Jerky. 
Crispy Pata
More like OBYEo.  (If you're from Michigan you'll understand)
The same number it takes to screw public confidence in law enforcement
Cold Flay
The RE-tardis
Because they shoot, steal, and run. 
GESTAPO
Because it sucked ass.
Bay Aryans
He was disbarred. 
Rosalind Franklin's notes. 
Lake Eerie. Note: This joke has probably been made before.
Why can't you trust an atom? Because I gave the cheat $100,000,000 AND ALL I GOT BACK WAS A MEATBALL FROM IKEA 
A buttload. 
"My dad got burnt" said Johnny "Nothing serious I hope" exclaimed the teacher To which Johnny replied "They don't fuck around down the crematorium Miss"
go fuck yourself
Mardi grass.
Skeletones.
Suicidal.
Cause it doesn't want to be latte.  Sorry. I just came up with this lame joke. Downvotes ahoy! 
Pump kin.
None, they just shoot the room for being black.
Because their reasoning is circular.
A bagel
Guacamole.
Definitely not a toddler, I can tell you that now.
Caracas.
Me : yes
Lefty.
Blackrobatics. 
Sorry, my fault.
"I'm better without U."
Oh shit a cop!
Because it was in the middle of 9/11
Nothing, it simply waved.
A tic tac
"No, how does it work?"  "Right before you climax it comes, goes limp, farts, and turns itself off."
Was that a critic or an order?
Not sure, gotta catch them all first!
Because console gamers go outside.  (Title should say gamer not games)
A small medium at large.
-Tyrannosaurus.  -But that's not even a real sign.  -None of the zodiac signs are real.  
I don't know, I just fly the drone.
Badoom TSSSSssT! (Say it out loud)
Because she deleted the emale.
Because the photon was incoherent.
America
Knawledge!
Nippletism 
I was watching cops
Is-Lamb!
They bio-D-grade.
Hebrew
By definithion, thomething that represenths or thtands for thomething elth. Thymbolithm, y'know.
Ashley
They turn it upside down.
Drew Brees 
Post good stuff. Please up vote To FP! 
Cold chili.
Ilene   What do you call an Asian woman with one leg?   Irene
A red-eye
A coop.
A midwife crisis
Because he was transitioning. 
sqrt(-16)
Mycoxafloppin.
Check out my DSL-Arrrgh.
This joke being reposted.
I've yet to find someone who knows.
Oh just for the Halibut!
I can ride my bike indoors and professor oak can't do anything to stop me.
Unarmed Americans.
Let's be Avenue 
Because they're too cagey. 
Because they understand that losing weight doesn't make you thinner, you have to lose mass.
Cobra!!!
Liam Malone.
Nick McGuinness.
A sheep 
[Just thought of this earlier in the shower... Had gas ever since.]
You have to un-rap them before you can get to their delicious Kareem filling.
Because it’s really time consuming.
Because he kept locking up.
Amhere.  What do you call the second Afghan off the boat?  Amhere Azwel.  What do you call the third Afghan off the boat?  Amhere Azwell Azhim. :)
Rick O'Shea.
Because he doesn't carry any matches!
Horrifying.
She thought a traditional burial would be too bio-degrading.
Boobies
Hebrewing up a storm!
6 foot of snot
The lesser of two weevils.
Because they can't even
My keys
ShakiRA
I don't put my salads in the microwave before I eat them 
Roberto
So Catholics could do this [makes the sign of the cross], instead of this [bangs self in head with fists].
Because they MINE as a job.
Ale-Man
A GIbronie!
A letter from an ISP saying they've been downloading illegally.
His girlfriend certainly ain't Morpheus.
Fools gold
He's a small medium at large.
Running into wall with a boner and breaking your nose.
Aye, Aye!  Arrrr!  & the Seven Seas!
Hearing AIDS.
I'm a-lookin'... And I'm a lycan.
Quarter pounder with cheese😂
Iran there.
None, it's already lit fam haha suh dude.
Both are without visible means of support. (My son found that in a children's joke book)
Hello from the other slIIIIiiiIIIIide
With shot glasses.
Put them in front of a red light in the middle of the desert.
The steaks are high
They have to justify killings blacks somehow.
A copyright infringement notice. Edit: Alright you, cunts, I get it. This joke has been told earlier. It popped into my mind after reading the "What is a pirate's favorite letter?" joke in this sub earlier. Obviously more than one person is not allowed to come up with the same joke. Sorry I tried.
Because he was counting sheep!
Thank you, Karma gain
Because ken came in a different box
Because tea leaves.
They eat it, If they eat too much, they will get Diabeetis.
Someone who lies awake at night wondering if there's a dog
Aloha Akbar.
Personal Trainer: By putting down that Pizza slice!
We don't have enough evidence to say for sure.
Boobies I'm so sorry, it's late and my friend just told this joke to me.
It was a Fiesta
Hey Kid... you wanna buy a piece of candy?
He had sex with Opie's mom. 
Cheez It!
He had a bad experience with windows.
Brian Setzer
Because they were in treble. 
Because 8 nined 10.
Wohahaha! That was funny! XD
Underwear Replenishment
W.C. Handy
Because people are dying to get in. 
The apple because the black man was stopped by a noose.
The Boy Scout came back from camp.
Cross Country
Coz I wanna drop a baby into you. 
Cantaloupe.
A goldfish! I am not sorry.
You can't unload a truck full of bowling balls with a pitchfork.
Guns 'n Roses
Because he was ready to come out.
Because 7 is a registered 6 offender...
A pilot, you racist. 
Because it's a cum-median!
July
A girl has no name. 
A PUNnisher. 
Catholics acknowledge each other in the liquor aisle. Extra: What's the difference between Catholics and Lutherans?  Catholics just acknowledge each other in the liquor aisle, Lutherans have a 15 minute conversation about booze.
Hillary got off Scott-free.
Your mother can't take 3 jokes at the same time.
His car.
Too many people came.
Keep it in church, guys.
A free ham.
The beat can't drop in outer space.
From his bing bing bong
They don't care who gets in
An E-Reptile dysfunction
An Otto-mobile
Wife. 
Freeze your dog and then take an angle grinder and use it on your dog and it Will say meeeeeow.  Dunk your cat in gasoline and light it on fire and it Will say woof
The police are looking for a hardened criminal. 
Because he was hooked on worms.
They both want to pull 1 over on you.
The police reported a small medium at large.
Between a large pizza and a black father.  A large pizza can feed a family of four.
What did one flag say to another? Nothing! They just waved.
A knife has a point.
The United States of America
Comatoast
A free radical.
They're both jokes. 
Don't do anything till I come back. 
Wohahaha! That was funny! XD
Their knee grows!
Ragnarock
Little Caesars.
Because it was cooler on the other side.
At the bottom. 
Julying.
Fingernails. XD
There's only two candidates, and nobody wants either of them to win!
Nothing, they are free of charge.
One is a group of cunning little runts.... the other is a group of running little  C
Neither want me coming inside them.
A spec-tator!
You had one job.
Because if he does, he better make sure he doesn't break bad...
Because freedom rings. 
A son burn! Son: I'm thirsty Dad: hi thirsty, I'm friday Son: ugh, at least I have mom's genes. Dad: She was looking for jeans earlier today Son: you're wearing mom jeans right now, which gives you two reasons to feel embarrassed, Mr. Unemployed Dad: 
[removed]
Of course it comes after the third and before the fifth of July
When you can burp and taste it. 
A woolly jumper.
They're rebranding as "Luber: For when you need to come fast!" 
LaQueefa
Because they’re really, really good at it.
In a Clown Hall.
Because Democrat left a bad taste in her mouth!
Nailed it
When one votes, it changes something, making things worse.  When another votes, it doesn't change anything, making things worse.
Because he wanted to play chicken.
Two. One to hold the ladder and one to screw your mother - I mean light bulb!
[removed]
Because freedom rings. Happy 4th of July  !
Wright yells, "Objection!' Rong is your typical Chinese man.
Promoted.
Because his wife died.
Gramma Rays
The carp-ark.
It's called Law and Hors D'oeuvres.
He was taking a look around
A K-9 unit on MLK Boulevard
Cuatro cinco
Because it was drunk.
Quackamole
Snoop Log
Rotini!
No seriously, I just wanna know 
Turn the barstool upside down.
Professor +
The bullet makes it out of the chamber
Because he was Snowden!  (Snowed in)
Because it's a loaded question!
None because it's already lit fam  
Because people marvel at what's holding it up. And they wish it would fall.
"It's Gonna be Pee"
He didn't want to wake up the sleeping pills.
JUST ICE RAINS FROM ABOVE!
I don't want to put a repost in my mouth
none, it's already lit fam!
He thought they were revolting!
We don't know, he hasn't opened the present yet
How you get into an Ecua
Because the time they spend parking doesn’t count.
Rice Paddy. Edit: Credit goes to my nickname from some clever fucker classmate when I was a kid.
The bullet gets out of the chamber.
Pasta La Vista, baby!
Weirdo.
Because the state abolished plant parenthood
Because he's a cunt.
Because the beach never waved back.
They're not there. 
"Please pass the salt."
They don't make it rain, they make it Heil!
"I say, Mind the gap"
"I told you not to call me mom in front of people"
Chivalry-Timbers!
A-pasta-ate.
Amen.
Stop being so closed off.
The function of u to the n
The mathematician says "2" The Physicist says "2, plus or minus 0.1" The engineer says "Probably around 2, but let's say 3 to be on the safe side".
Nothing, you already told her twice.
Microwaves!
NeinIcant
Monicker
Hillary.
Neither! Everyone knows they prefer hot pockets
Nothing, it waved.
A dead bird. 
Because everyone is related and there are no dental records.
He lost his apatite. I know that joke has its faults, so I'll just accept my pumicement and go back to looking at cleavage.
They learn the ins and outs
Because they always take his statements out of Kampftext.
A Hebrewdasher
You know that dude that will never ever pay you back, but you're fine with it because he's your buddy. ... Add surprise, fear, adrenaline and a little pee in your pants to that.  See, doesn't that feel nicer than calling me a robber, shouting for the police saying I have a gun and whatnot? 
ten-tickles
Hormones
NaClmore
Your hair comes out in bangs.
To find out his phos-fate!
He needs two jacket.
By the ears...
Well, first Demascus, then they Baghdad!
They gotta be see-through
the wheelchair 
A chim-PANSY
When tongue is involved. 
Anyone can roast beef.
Thanks Omomma
A soviet seamen
Islams it.
The taste
He ate it before it was cool.
I've fattened and I can't get out.
Lets make salat
TVs are getting lighter.
Meow Mix
Dems!
Those on Team Great Britain, because they'll leave.
Well you call him porkchop
The side that gets eaten because the other side is left.
because they've been to concentration camp.
Cut that shit out!
A black rushing
They can't even. 
micro chips
A Mortician waits until after you're dead to fuck you.
Progressive
Free.
I've never had a lentil on my face before!
On top 
Manuel Trans Mission
"The defendant."
Have fun drowning in our two rivers Euphrate Cats!!!
She doesn't
He was too far out maaaaan.
They both swallow seamen.
You put it in the microwave until its bill withers.
They start eating vegetables.
Vader-hosen!
Jesus doesn't think he's Bono 
He Brexit!
"A "brother" one."
One ran in short bursts, the other ran in burst shorts!
Remove an electron.
No one cries when you chop up the baby.
Juan on Juan. 
Let's count. One to try to turn it on. When that fails, another to go look for a replacement lying around the house. One to do the screwing. And then at least a couple more to watch and snap photos while it's happening.   The light bulb joke is a metaphor for campus rape. It relies on a common and vicious stereotype of fraternities, who we all know are the true victims here.
Li Yung
MEN
It was a dead heat
The spare one! :P
They both moan like hell when they come, and take the house when they leave.
Drown him in the mainstream.
Half a dog
Consent.
Milk sheikh
Wow you looked shocked.
Just one sun
Because he wanted to see his flat mate.
"Get in the tank!"
Nazi. 
Because he doesn't believe in using quantum
A lazy panda.
A boyfriend.
He would've found it hard to digest.
Off-pudding.
If you run in front of a car, you get tired.   If you run behind one, you get exhausted. 
The mosquito stops sucking when you smack it. 
A tourist.
Hola.
They're sensitive to everything
Better question would be: Why were they in the tree in the first place?
a word that I made up?
At it's baahmitzveh fuck yall i thought this was funny
not enough
So noone told you knife was gonna be this way?
Ten.
All they talk about is the presidential erection
because they're both stuck up cunts
Because the heavier they get, the easier they are to pick up.
Made in China.
They held the telephone wires off the ground.
BoozZzZzZzZzZzZ
Because he is North Korea's great reader.
A: Boris Johnson  B: Jar Jar Binks C: All of the above One for the uk
Yeah, he loves Tibet
A father was nervously waiting for the risky surgery of his son to end. When he saw the doctor come out of the operating room he asked him: Doctor, could I talk to my son? So the doctor reassuringly responds: Of course. Nurse! Bring this man a ouija board! 
Meh-nthol
The pharmacy.
A brick.
Str8
He thinks my toilet paper is defective because it rolls from the top instead of the bottom. What's worst? He blames it on Obamar!
Walk this way
Whoooolio.
Because it's too soon. 
Lemonlaid.
An active shooter! 
I don't know either, but it would be great at picking cotton.
Because he liked to meddle. 
A Snack Pack...... I'm sorry
Because it was a prop.
Milky Eh.... Get it? 
Wallhacks
He was always turning up his nose!
It's full of millions of years of dead semen
A Piano.
Spaghetti and meatbolsheviks
Seriously, I don't know. Maybe 50?
Burning
It speaks a pidgin language.
Plagiarism 
That she would be sitting at the desk that Monica once kneeled under!
One.  Denial.
One is against the law, the other is a sick bird.
With the porcupine, the pricks are on the outside.
She's a robot and the instructions are in Chinese.
they both wont achieve great heights
Dead Sirius
Turn off all the lights.
He became a quack head
Have you ever seen the size of mothballs?
A Marsupial 
postage stamp 
A stable economy
hit by a car.
Hop to it you lazy MOFO.
How would Rhino?
Puerto-RECON
An ant's teenie weenie!
Neither did they.
Cruisin' for a bruisin'
Dad: Have you ever smelled Moth balls?  Me: yes... Dad: How did you get there tiny little legs apart?!
Classical
America Survives. 
He re-tires
A tea bag last longer in the cup
Raisin Bran.
because his career was in ruins
Alexander Fang 
An Iced Cap
You start off excited over your lofty heights and slowly slide down into something soft.
Green Day.
GOTTA GO FAST
Well, it's a deep subject. 
One
His Aunt Arctica
a pizza can feed a family of four
For stealing the booty
This new vitamin packed kale , gives you the energy and strength needed to burn down your house and move to a spider-free home!
A small price toupée.
Calvin DeKlein. 
Ollah!
She's always eating out
1 GB.
A slantelope.
Hose B
Too many to document.
Vote
Half of your dog...I hit it with my car.
Most times you get an onion with a tail. But every once in a while you get a piece of ass that brings a tear to your eye.
Everyone's a replicant!!! Everything is cool when nobody's real!
Because he can eat the sand which is there. But what brought the sandwiches there? Why, Noah sent Ham, and his descendants mustered and bred.
Brexit
Turkey! Its the bomb!
A firetruck. 
If we stick together, we can stop this crap!
Monterey, Jack!
She came back with a Red Snapper.
He made it to kings landing
They'll get their hands on anything that's 10% off.
King's Landing
Potato dribbles  one defender. Potato dribbles another defender. Potato is one on one with the goalkeeper. What does Potato do? Potato Chips
Irresistible 
A magi nation
He was having a midlife crisis 
They dont like any witnesses.
Flew.
A man matures with time.
Neither can achieve an election
He was having a mid-life crisis.
Dont fret about it. 
How do you count a herd of cattle? Q: How do you count a herd of cattle? A: With a cowculator.
Arsephalt
Show him what you're made of!
It was only allowed one piece of carrion.
BREICH
He's legendairy
In a football match, the best team wins.
A boob.
Vagdickina
"And I'll tell you all about it when I EU again"
Bush did 9/11 and Jackson did 9 11 year-olds.
Throw it in the water.  If it sinks, it's a girl ant.  If it floats, it's buoyant
Because they are fucking assholes.
No? Neither have they.
A brief case.
Why yes, I have!
The word "free"
Because their mothers are
Or as I like to call it, "Baby's first election."
A broken nose.
Bird Species - woodcock - blue tit - cock of the woods (Pileated woodpecker) - blue footed booby bird - titmouse
Nope, the Brits left.
Enough to buy a computer that can play League of Legends.
Turkey and grease
What do you call a file that is a petabyte in size? A peta-file.
Because he is forever a loan. 
Because it's made out of vibranium.
Raisin Bran
Aaaarrrrrrrr Kelly.
Because if someone hit your peter with a pan, you'd have a high voice too!
Hey, pho queue, dude
Get Atul to do it. 
A chicken Caesar salad.
Au jus is boiled but a jew is baked.
Mein Cramps
Alamode
Because they all joined 
For kicks and giggles.
Blood Lite Thanks Jim Butcher...
A lager!
Lays, because they are full of air.
Yes. I happened, incidentally, and quite unfortunately, to turn a corner in a local forest to see a guy shitting in the woods. And I did not turn the soft bend to see his face as he was squeezing, no, I turned and saw his ass. This was public lands no more than 100 yards from a cafe and beaches where families swim. HILARIOUS!
Because they're all rasta graphics.
It had freed up one GB of space.
She ran away from the ball.
One is still in the EU.
The graduate never passed the bar
Britain's international trade now that they've left the EU
I am going to make the bedrock. 
A liquor cabinet.
[removed]
A doyouthinkhe-saurus
I don't fucking know you tell me
Circle jerky.
Poutina.
It was a heated debate.
Smirnoff ISIS
Irresistible.
Because sex cells.
Cow-caine
They are missing 2 towers
Goodentight
No son, I got all of 'em cut
Jimmy pushed her... Which is a shame because she was getting used to swinging without arms.
The mailman doesn't come on Sunday.
Nice to meet you. Wanna make a baby?
He can't face the Crips tonight.
Take away the G.
Nice tits. 
They're both nicknamed the king and they both are overrated. 
He brings the duck How can you tell if there's a Sicilian at the cockfight? He bets on the duck How can you tell if the Mafia is at the cockfight? The duck wins
One child in ten buckets.
Because of the towel ban.
quatro cinco
I don't know any hipsters that try to dress like pilsners.
Because they lactose.
Oh look, they're done. 
A sbigot.
Because puns are the lowest form of comedy.
A pride flag found at Orlando.
Full
Because his nutritionist said he had too many minerals in his system!
Because tea leaves.
holy shit
They don't like the taste of being the minority!
One Direction.
A paraplegic after a house fire.
A subwoofer! Now again:  What do you call a dog in a sub?  Chinese food! 
Why father cheats mom?
Awkward is finding your mom on Tinder, awful is matching with her
Because the air is free.
Santa Claus comes DOWN the chimney...
They cut off their heads using a Gweilotine.
YOUR CHRONO TRIGGERER ME...FUCK YOU THIS IS A FUNNY JOKEFUCKYOUIJUSTWANTYOUTOLOVEMEFUCKYOU
One Direction
In MaFarm
Comic Sans
It had to buy a herring aid
Because it broke every branch of the law.
Self-Destruct
A Garbage Truck.
A dictator
I'm stronger than you!
Wonderwoman : No Batman : ugh.. You forgot to take the pill again didn't you?? 
Because it got stuck in a crack
They each got six months
Infantry. 
Waattaaah!
Insert coin
I hear he's the wurst.
Let me know your guesses in the comment section below
Donuts
A chic sheik
TO GET TO THE OTHER SIDE!!!! HahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHSHAHSHSGG OH....ohh...ha haha HAHAHAHHA HAHAHAHAHAHABHAA
He's born with Diss-lexia
Usain Bolt can finish a race.
None. They just grab it and the world to revolve around them.
Praise the Load
The Chimney.
A subwoofer.
Citroen C4
Because of the grass ceiling
The bench can support a family of four.
Ones a crusty bus station and ones a busty crustacean!
Don't look! I'm changing!
An allahu akbar. 
Nothing, he was against violence.
Because we did nazi it coming
Because all of his hose had kinks.
They didn't know you could get Britain to leave by voting.
Canada deserves to be plan eh.
It lost a few pounds this summer.
Accidentally hit submit before you
It's not hard.
See ewwww later!
Prepasteurous!
Arrrrgentina
Because they're extinct 
This is baaaad. 
Not until he graduates from medical school.  Heard this one from a Jewish patient I had once. 
Nick's fury.
You do something incredibly stupid and you lose pounds fast.
He farts
1 GB
Cloning.
When it's snot.
Brexit.
More than the capital of the UK.
He's ben affleckted.
Carloss 
It's not EU, it's me
[removed]
Cherpies.
Boy scouts come home from camp
His nose breaks
He only comes once a year
Because they were too Phar-ah way. I'm not sorry.
With rude eyes.
Tooth Hurty!
When asked if they want to be economically joined with Greece, all they can say is "eeeeuuuuuuu"
Bye Clown!!
An alcoholic.
50 cent featuring Nickelback
So the Marine have something to hold on to.
Deuces wild. 
Santa Claus goes down the chimney.
Obviously not the Family Doctor
"Hang on a minute."
Capitalism
Yew
Fucked.
A last name 
An upper crust.
Women don't laugh at my jokes.  :(
Bloodbath & Beyond
Cross country
They both circle Uranus searching for Klingon's
I can Nazi!
Dye a blonde's hair.
The living room.
To render the other side.
"Ouch. I'm Dino-sore!" 
His name wasn't Paul Driver.
No, it's the C.
"You know you want it, Honey"
"Ow-schwitz!"
Genuflection and supplication
He couldn't Mufasa 
because seven ate nine.
her doctor told her cumin in ger water would help her lose weight.
Cereal Boast Crunch
Neither work.
This music sucks!
The Alaskan Bull Worm. 
To get to ×10³.
Tortilla chips.
Rubbin' Hood
A day before bush ruins America.
None. Bush did it.
Necrophilia.
Yargh! "Love Me Tender," matey!
Buy the DLC to find out
She's probably just pulling your leg!
Because he uses the best ingredients.
For special occasions, their cocktails are on the house.
They are always party fowls.
A plain bagel!
Because you know he's guilty 
One is a bum nut and the other is a numb butt
Da Nile
Doesn't matter, they both taste the same.
He nuts and bolts
He shot it.
The picky fuckers on this website. 
Type-O
B: Yes, everytime     A: How are you going to fix that?     B: More frequent target practice
By posting it over and over on the same subreddit
Unreali-stick
Unlimited fresh naans!
Luftwaffles
Superman's powers are all natural .
Blow jobs. 
Danke memes
That the man that falls from the 2nd floor does:   AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHH; While the man falling from the 8th floor does: AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHH 
Allahu snackbar!
Cause he was batshit crazy
Three. One in the living room, 2 chained in the basement.
The Gay-Raj!
I'll tell you tomorrow...
Don't have source, but now that I think about it, it may have been a rap
OSAMA ! xDD LOL
Wheat.
A Northern fairy tale begins with," Once upon a time." A Southern fairy tale begins with, " Y'all ain't gonna believe this shit."
The Holocaust.
a human-dog xDDD
Put them inside a woman's body.
Perronoid
"First things first, I'm a realist."
Because they cantaloupe.
Knowing it was traced 
I'm not sure, I hallways forget
A clementine
Shredder.
The polar bear.
Blue - One blew this way and one blew that way
A mocking bird!
Universal cereal bus
Just turn on the sprinkler.
He moses lawn.
Sir Cumference
A jew doesn't have to lie to have a big nose.
They bone 
The porn industry, if you know what I mean.
Going to camp. 
Because they drink it before it's cool.
If you were forced to have it as a kid, you probably don't like it as an adult. 
Euca-lipton
Guil-tea!
A Dell.
A circus has a cunning array of stunts
His personality
The unemployment line
A: A baseball team
Drunk men.  Little children.  Yoga pants. 
In the Dwyer.
They both look like overcooked potatos
The New York Jets.
5:38 PM. 
A blowjob.
aSpaceBar
James bondage 
Han Solo dies
A HI-V (high five)
Operator: Just dial 739 Guy: I did but there's no Ring
, from the Greek  , meaning "Many".  And  , from English, meaning "little bloodsucking creatures."
The bananus
Iraq the dishes in the dish rack and Iran the dishwasher
Because they are missing two towers.
They egg-cersize.
A chopstick! 
A brick to the back of his head should do it.
i mean its really good when robbing someone when you get caught 'surprise, heres the cake now bye' and he just walk out the house with the tv
Because he had nothing to chauffeur.
A: Can't complain ...
me-OW!
Its not that bad or particularly good. Its 82% that's a low "B".
Gesticular
One of them is a cucumber and the other is a cumcuber.
"Robin, get in the Batmobile."
A: Miscarriage  This joke never gets old, just like the baby.
Them: I think it's Lit Me: I mean I like the song but I wouldn't call it lit...
Jihadhd warrior.
SINammon (Sorry)
The forty mile bike ride I finished.
Donald Trump
It was ground a few minutes ago.
have a successful dentistry practise.
He said never mind we'll walk.
They are all #2s.
They just became Silver State
An archaeologist. The older she gets the more interested he becomes.
with a microwave 
To find Pooh!
Seymour.
After the last dog they just ate. 
Vocabulary
Riding Solo
Boot Camp
Abortion
No seat belt.
It's too wet to woo.
Merci backup.
Solo
Cheat, cheat, cheat.
Vlad The Inhaler. 
Because they got Chewbacca 
They don't know where home is.
Because he was a sauerkraut.
Fathers day in Detroit. 
My psychologist.
Father's Day.
Sharron.
Camembert
Cross country
Depends™
Anne Frankly, I did Nazi that Juan coming.
Three - One to screw it in, one to say we don't need to screw it in, and one to say we do need to screw it in.
"No, I'm dead serious."
"Tits man or arse man?" I was asked. I really should have got in there earlier when they were giving out super hero names.
Nemonade
She choked. 
Ice is
To get some tots!
I am fine with 5km races but marathons just do my head in.
You can't gargle sand!
He called it "Cheeses of Nazareth".
Because red shirts die easily.
Thanks!
There,Their,They're
It makes me sick. 
Pair of medics.
Court is adjourned
The game.
Because his name is on them.
Because if it did, we'd have sent foreign aid by now.
Telling your parents that you're gay.
By smoking a lot of fags.
If he didn't, he would fall.
It's "popcorn"! What were you thinking?!
Yoko Ono.
It's a common idiom, meaning that a small action results in a much larger reaction due to the cumulated effect of previous small actions. It's really common, you should know this...
They call it iBone 
A-hem!
So he can kick out at 2.
Washing your whites on a rinsed cycle.
Phyto.
Nein...
Barbiecue.
They don't work in the future either.
Because the hamburger is in the ground state.
Press "C : ENTER : ###"
Sweden is HOMOgenous
All right all right all right.
He got a hole in one
You Barium.
There's a nap for that.
They prove men can concentrate on two things at once. 
Handicaps
Because none of their readers believe them when they receive a warning that it's their final issue.
The macrophone
Watt?!
Start with a large fortune and open a restaurant.
Java and JavaScript are similar in the same way car and carpet are.
Because the previous day, the teacher told her students; "Don't worry guys, it's gonna be a piece of cake". 
A churro.
They both died before finishing a race.
Turns out two Wongs don't make a Reich.
"Curses! Foil again!"
​He realizes that it has to be a one-way wall! All Mexicans should be able to get out but no one should be coming in. Technology to build a one-way wall is not there yet.
Geometry 
With a body bag.
A ROADMAP!!!
Neither did he
Check the Pulse
A. Shesus B. Godess C. Nun of the above (Im new so this is probably pretty bad)
Test tickles
I noe
Well the first noticeable difference is that the watermelon tastes better. 
It's because he isn't unique. There's always amumu here and amumu there, here a mu, there a mu, everywhere amumu. 
It's a wildly successful game that only has straight, white main characters (I stole this joke from somewhere but am not allowed to say where)
Nein
Loose stools
An AE I.O.U.  P.S. Im proud of this one :3
Take away it's credit cards.
Yes.
She used an analogy
Cowlin Mockery 
Ereptile disfunction
Mute
A cow-culator. haha haha ha ... ok, I'll leave.
The phrase “I went through a whole box of tissues watching that film.” usually has a completely different meaning.
Because only he could pull it off.
A non-prophet religion Edit: Replace the word "religion" with "set of beliefs" if you're picky about that sort of thing 
Salmon
Alive
He managed to get out of the beast, but he looked like shit.
Clown poo!
Someone told me but I forgot.
Because he wanted to make $50K per day from ad revenue.
2π 
Dad jokes
A man rushes into a bar and screams at the bartender, "How tall is a penguin?" The bartender looks at him weirdly and says, "Excuse me?" The man repeats, "How tall is a penguin?" The bartender motions with his hands. "Uh, about this high." The color drains from the man's face as he says, "Oh shit I just ran over a nun."
he kept mountain goats.....
any
This joke is answered by the Wiki or by Searching.
congress.
Because you can't rub two sticks together you get fire.
A tortoise.
A cantaloupe. The spelling is completely different... 
Cause he always plays with Pooh.
She was an udder disappointment.
Because you seem OK.  I'm not sorry
(warning this is an old ass joke I either found or made up, can't remember, but my friend did post this on his instagram after our conversation over it) "I'm cummin' for ya!"
Me-How do you view gays? person- ehh, whatever they don't affect me Me- Same here Me- How do you view Lesbians? Person-Samething, they dont affect me Me- I view them in HD!
it's malarious.
Adobe Wan Kenobi
It will make fleeing to Mexico more difficult when he ruins our country.
Nobody does your job for you when you're out
Disabulled.
The Amazing Racist.
You have to drop the bomb twice so they get the message
Just put it on my bill
The Joker only killed people in Gotham City.
I never had a garbanzo bean in my mouth!
Hey, get off me homes !
Because New Jersey drivers are terrible
German Shepherd pie.
Caesar salad
A Spaghetto. 
Because they cant find dates﻿
Finger puppet 
Sketchers
To cover up their Ariel-as.
He drank his coffe before it was cool.
By swimming in the main stream.
"Soy cheapo."
She couldn't see sharp.
Wow, this really blew up, thanks guys!
A Fartist
Not a single person died.
Because he can't take a shot to the head.
Why not,  I've already got two degrees that could be less useful.
Set yourself on fire.. (Please nobody actually do this)
He was nailed by a bunch of guys.
He wanted to speak in tungsten.
Just follow his coke mules.
He was intent on sleeping in. 
They walk on the sins of their ancestors. 
Law suits!
You slow down and use lube ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
About 5 inches.
It's agave tequila, honey.
To the re-tail store. :D
One snatches watches, and the other watches snatches!
Depressed.
Drunk people are found   bars. Black people are found   them.
A chimp-pansy. This is my go to primatology joke. 
Hello?
Because he was Russian.
MetalliCAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAW 
Diaz Nuts
Even dry farts feel like wet farts.
Boom. 
A shower
With a blues scale 
Shots for Everyone!!!
Kroger
Because then he'd be a Thai!
'Good day, m'hogany'
Hey kid, want to buy some candy?
Wait
Finding out that your son was gay.
One is a phagocyte and the other is a fag-o-cide...
Yeah I'm surprised more of them didn't get out, most of them would have already had their shit packed.
Faux. 
Apparently, it's not for kids.
He pulled himself apart
Were both empty inside and weigh a tonne
Because he ate too much of them.
Slap an African child.
One is a cartoon character with a hot temper and the other is a duck.
She ate a big meal then went to the bathroom and stuck her thumb up her ass.
A good start. P.S: N*ggers=Naggers. I hate those guys. What did you think?? ;)
It's immiscible.
In Cairns. 
Telling your parents your gay.
You put a little boogie in it.
¡No más te! 
I'm just wondering because I'm having trouble getting their little legs open.
Because it's soda pressing 
Give him a knife and say "who's special?"
A church tree  (birch tree)
Well neither did she. 
The Post Office
A fruit rollup.
Put it in the oven until it's Bill Withers.
It was a total mascara.
Welcome to Louisiana
Who else invents things?
It's common practice for parents to choose the name for their children.
A good joke.
JC Penny
They bee hive
nothing, melons can't talk
A Master of Fine Farts
Motherfucker
One, plus or minus one.
because he's retarded
Homophones.
cancer
When 90% of your search history is ASMR videos.
The microwave doesn't brown my meat.
The Nile
Ten-ish.
One Direction
A ban from the petting zoo.
Fish and ships.
"Bonjour, je m'apelle Guy aussi!" ("Hello, I am called Guy as well!")
None. He 'fell'.
You don't pull out
One to hold the lightbulb, and the rest of the world to revolve around them
Me: Not unless it's named Ted Cruz
let's go ride bikes.
I would love to tell you, but I am afraid the answer is a little bit lacist.
Statue bro?
Chemtrails.
A buccaneer.
Run like hell, she's got a grenade in her mouth
The_Donald
They're both made for kids, but dad ends up playing with them.
THAT'S NOT FUNNY!
My zipper.
You conduit!
I heard he's all right. 
A transit
on top
á la Mode
Because they're very good at it.
Because everyone was a goblin
Nobody. They're too angry at the mods at   to care. 
A tutor.
A bun in the oven.
That's not my side work! How many cooks does it take to screw in a lightbulb? Fuck that, 86 light bulbs!
Yeasty I'll show myself out
Intergalactose
Nevermind, it's too cheesy...
They weren't thinking straight.
Get in the truck bitch.
They are all about delivery.
You dose their drink with 250 micrograms DMT
Because he was always 
A numbskull
Because Jurassic times call for Jurassic measures
Oops, wrong sub
Wii W.
You don't need to change your bulb. Light or heavy, you are beautiful and worthy of acceptance. 
A labracadabrador! I am not sorry.
free ham
Pull the pin and throw it back.
Creamstar.
Sorry, repost
They have big fans.
I cry when I cut onions
They're both old.
An exor- .
A harmacist
Whipped cream.
Because they rain supreme.
The more you bang them, the looser they get.
None. They like to keep their subscribers in the dark.
A rockodile.
Jokes on 
The   sub count.
My record is 21 years.
Check pulse
Outlaws are wanted
Getting new shoes every week.
Just check for fresh prince 
It was da-press-in.
with a low "ha"
They insist your safe word has an upper case letter, a lower case letter, and at least one number.
When you're done with the breast and thighs,  the only thing left is a greasy box to put your bone in
This thread has been locked.  You will unable to vote or comment.
A wonky.
Neither have they
Because Olive Oyl was saving herself for marriage.
It didn't make much of a splash.
Ones full of dead semen and the other one is the Titanic 
Eel-ectronic music. 
Profit Muhammad.
He wants to make America grate again. 
Because everyone that can run, jump or swim is already here in the US.
a pickpocket snatches watches
She went down on the Titanic.
It drives me crazy. I feel like I am missing out on important information. They should put the whole thing in one language.
Undocumented Democrats
Being in-genious 
Wheeeeeeeee!!!!!
He parks his car, man. 
NO.  "That's the spirit!" ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Dunno. I'm pretty shit at both. 
Because their sheep can hear zippers.
Pilates
Yeah, he got the cold shoulder.
Because you make bad hamburgers!
A djinn and Jews. 
In the sidebar it shows something about  , wtf is this
Because they already fell for that shit once.
No one knows.
When he's quacked.
If you are not in bed by 12, come home.
He sent out a message in remorse code. 
A guy walks into a bar and hears two women speaking in a British accent.  He asks, "Are you ladies from England?"  One says to him "No, it's Wales, you idiot!"  So, then the guy says, "Okay, sorry.   So, are you two whales from England?"
Nothing.
A tissue
When you see he has no hands.
Stew.
They both want to get there before the hare.
I give a shit when my PC crashes.
Cars.
Six Fags
Because you know he is actually guilty. Credit to   for the joke!
Consent.
He tractor down
It takes only one nail to hold the picture up
Once you Hava Nagila, you'll want another! 
FaZebook.
Whoops, wrong sub
A sunken chest and no booty
FINNISH HYMN!
A kid watches Lord of the Rings, and asks his cousin. "Where are goblins from?" The cousin says they are mischievous English spirits that go around harassing people. Thinking about it, the boy says, "So where do trolls come from?" The cousin says, "Reddit."
Three stripes, you rout.
His wife and kids
Because if it were called the K-10, they would be police cats
They are the Buildawall group now.
Because you start with a bigger piece of wood, and you make it whittler.
An awl don't have teeth, but ASSAAAA DUUUUU
Seaweed
Logic.
Fe Male
Doubloons.
Free ham.
Orange is the New Black
They climate
Yea, a little kid fell into his ring so they shot him.
Pulling the plug.
Gotta go fast!
Sue
One is a cunning bunch of runts and the the is a running bunch of.....nevermind. 
The prison bars.
Yard stick.
They install at night, while you are asleep, without consent.
There was no outlet
At least your ex wife only wanted half your stuff. Hillary wants all of it.
carne asuuuuhhduuh
It's ram a dam
Rape.
Because they heard there were no jobs there.
Nepal
wake up my wife and kids and watch the show. Realistically, any action would be futile anyway :D
Because I want to drop a baby in you. 
Auschwistic
ghost buzzards
It won't be there
A. Because everyone keep recycling the same jokes
No whey mate
He was the biggest dick in the race.
They wine.
a Baghdad
Put a tampon in her, take it out and see if the cottons picked off. 
Because it's a stereo type
It's a valid question. I'm sleeping with one and really hope the other brother is doing better
They thought it was spelled "facts."
Getting your palms red at the same time.
Why did the brothel run out of money? Because all of the investors pulled out. 
I've never seen any femail boxes.
A yardstick.
Brand warged into him while he was at a whore house. "Fuck them all"
With a broom and a dustpan.
Under a-rest.
Tranquilized.
It had rigor-tortoise
I can't believe I blew 50 bucks!
THAT SON OF A BEACH ROBBED ME!
Dishes Sean Connery.
deez nuts. 
-Do you know the difference between curtain and toilet paper? -No... -GUYS, HE DID IT!
They both put organs in people.
A misogynist.
The skilled ones don't.
A whistle blower 
A Shih Tzu. 
The mycollege.
Because they look for contributors to open sores.
Nothing. Kim Jong Un's engineering is perfect, just like my life.
Hebrews it.
I would actually care if I lost 6 million dollars. Creds to Khai
Because if I was your dad, I'd be in jail too.
Bran He is Hodorless
Your mum
I give a Fuck when my computer crashes
Three. One to hold the light bulb do and two to spin the chair
What did one ovary say to the other one? "Did you order any furniture?" "No. Why?" asked the other. "Cause there's two nuts out there trying to deliver an organ."
Every time there's a student protest, you take 100 shots.
Mohammed Dali
To get to the bottom 
They both abhor a vacuum.
Business was dead.
A diseased beaver on your organ.
Ctrl+esh
Because he was drunk Why did the second monkey fall out of the tree? He was tied to the first one Why did the third monkey fall out of the tree? Peer Pressure 
Beer.
They both cover up for pedophiles. 
It's only a weem away.
In sainsburys   
Nothing, he's been told twice already.  (And be cool, if you get the reference keep quiet and let em wonder.)
Cats have claws at the end of their paws, and a comma is a pause at the end of a clause.
A toy-
Crispin Glover.
A priest's hands stop at 10.
Colby Jack's. 
He got a little behind in his work
A lie
Ba-Na-Na-NAAAAAAAAAAAA
Miss Direction.
Gotta go fasting! LOL
One spends 400 dollars on a console that will play games for years, the other pays 400 dollars for a graphics card that will be outdated in a week
Your gullibility.
North of the Wal-Mart
Resistance if feudal
Islam.
A guy comes up to his friend with an offer.  - I am organizing a group sex event. Do you want to participate?  - Who is on the list?  - Four people: I, my wife, you and your wife.  - Hell no! I don't agree!  - OK, then I remove you from the list...
Because it has 'ac'. 
Because they're two tired
Isn't it annoying when the first line of a post is the same as the title?
They are fascinating to watch, though they typically only ever clean each other's genitals. 
Because my wife says she wants to dance on my grave.
WHAT IS ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE?
Wife: "How would you describe me?"  Husband: "ABCDEFGHIJK."  Wife: "What does that mean?"  Husband: "Adorable, beautiful, cute, delightful, elegant, fashionable, gorgeous, and hot."  Wife: "Aw, thank you, but what about IJK?"  Husband: "I'm just kidding!"
I dunno, I'm just waiting to hear white people ask how come there's no White Friday.
That's an oxy, moron!
Asif (As-if)
Dug
Ramen! Before you judge harshly, I would like to state that this was invented by a six year old, all on his own, no coaching. 
"Kill me." The cop didn't kill him.
because When they come they’re wild and wet like hurricanes, but when they go they take your house and car
They bring flowers to his grave. 
They're making headlines everywhere!
The Wheelchair
A hammer and pop-sickle
They both don't work and always take your money 
Because I ran over it with my car.
Farm gold in China.
he Kermit suicide!
Van Dyke
Feminem
Your sexuality.
LeBrown James
You only need one nail to hang the painting.
[REDACTED]
Mobil Juan 
Sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away
The ultrasound guy
Graaaaaaaaaaaaaains...
Russell.
Defendant: Not quilty.
They're pretty, so men will like them.  They're dumb, so they will like men.  Courtesy of the great movie Ip Man 3 which I watched yesterday.
The prawn.
Crystal Methodists
Serious question not a joke
A Ham-di man! :D
When he's a billionaire. 
Baking Bad
An astronut.
That shi* was intense. 
Spoiled milk!
Rubbit 
A four-chin teller 
Ask him/her to pronounce unionized Edit: Gets 3000+ upvotes, Karma remains at 20...
America.
Alien Vs Predator
They don't like to look down on the unemployed
Don't pay her
A zebra, you bastard.
Both force themselves on you without consent. 
Not enough.
A gun has one trigger.
Ooops, typo. Have you seen where my pen is?
It's a pain in the ass to retrieve the wheelchairs. 
He was shaken, not stirred.
The one is a   (three cornered curry cake) and the other is a   (three cornered cake/vagina cloth).
Logic.
It was quite a meel
Because they can't even.
His dick tastes like shit.
He serves no porpoise.
You can see the definition.
Because it's lit
Put a child in its enclosure.
He only comes once a year.
Because it was two-tiered.
I wouldn't pay $200 to have a lentil on my face.
Demi Moore 
Don't go back to those two places. 
DAD : Well son that depends weather you are HORNY or HUNGRY .
You only get laid once.
"Well, I fucked that one up."
Nothing. Trust me.
None.
Massless chaps
Despairagus.
The priest doesn't wait for you to hit puberty to come on your face.
Put a Rubik's Cube in the vagina for exactly one minute and see if it comes out solved.
A bit neurotic. 
B9
A Sandy Hook
Tennish.
To get to the Otherside.
None!  Cats can't sew!
A pick pocket only snatches people's watches. Credit Sanford and Son Edit: Statches
Ate something.
A lot, apparently.  Have you seen their new building?
The bullet comes out of the chamber.
Because he had hives Badum tsh
He was trying to find Winnie the Pooh.
Parents 
you neek up on it.
Dildos come in more than one color.
It takes three to five years before anyone will hire them.
We found her head and shoulders in the glove box. 
Hire a hitman
Society 
Nothing. If you've heard Juan you've heard Jamal.
A: Because he's married.
The bucket.
Ark-n-Saw.
He saw the salad dressing!   Thank you thank you..
A: Because he uses quality ingredients. What did you think, asshole?
A knock-knocktopus. 
Shut up!
Put sheet music in front of him
Cook the shit out of it. 
you get a VHS tape.
Safe.
I'm stuck. 
Your mother, that is who i call a stupid whore
No man can handle that many periods. 
A salsarer
A Nordic Track.
Herpes.
Coffee.
A thin layer of crust
Blade Runner 2: Do Androids Dream of Electric Boogaloo?
You chastise the fuck out of them
I thought Australia already had enough black widows
With a New York steak. Edit: I want to say this is OC because I thought of it myself but I feel like someone else may have also thought of it at some point in time.
So in the end they didn't even splatter. 
Citric Flaccid 
You pay them with Dong.
Because they don't appreciate random people knocking on their door.
The Mastur Race.
He's only worth 1 Dinero.
To get to the other side
Their knees
Flip through the folds until you smell poop, then go back one.
Lit matches.
A pop-sickle
They're bread inside.
Diddly squat
So they can both look out the window.
Suck his dick.        
"Meeeeee!" I wrote this.  I'm now a comedy writer.  You are welcome. 
Humphrey.
How about the ability to go invisible, but it only works while you're playing a trumpet.
Because their peckers are on their faces.
They watch moving picktures.
I'll take your money!
The epileptic
You lose interest once you make a withdrawal.
cause she's a two-timin' four. 
Chickpeas
Christian Bale.
A ham-brrr-ger. my 7yo claims she made it up herself.
Little Seizures...
You can't get pregnant during '69.
No! I'm busy. Ask your grandmother. Actually I'd rather ask Grandad. His hand shakes more.
I made mine when I stopped giving a shit
An investigator. 
None, he can pay someone to do it for him.
A BLACK&DECKER PECKER WRECKER..
A Border Collie
Jew-ish
Just 'Canadian'.
....a burrrrrito! Obviously, it's almost 2am, and I'm tired and punchy!
He never got up by the time he counted to 10 Edit: Phrasing
A:With both of them you go sniff sniff hooray!
Ass-fix-iation
Kanagaroos. While they both do great with the hops, Kangaroos just have a little more kick!
Sniff-illis 
Not Ali....
Because you're a real CAT and I dig you
King Kong
They're always man-spreading on their sandwiches.
Too soon
Elephino. 
By separating the good Juans from the bad Juans!
It doesn't matter. Kill two birds with one stone and just stop both by putting the toddler in front of the train.  EDIT:  I shoulda made the train speed 250 and the toddler run slower but the discussion I had involved the relevance of mass as opposed to velocity to get a point across and then I realized what a stellar opportunity it was to make this joke.  
Yeah, basically the concept of friendship is so foreign to them that they created a new word for it.
Because he couldn't get his dick out the chicken
Because you already read-it.
Enough to kill two and a half men. 
It's called Malaysian Airline, one hit of that shit and you are GONE.
Skin, it says in the scripture that Moses tied his ass to a tree and walked 3 miles to the next town.
A pill can achieve an erection.
They call themselves Hummas.
Because he has 3 dead parents and Bruce only has 2
Cause they're dead!
Because they make up everything..
That's a peng ting.
They won't stop to ask for directions.
A klipklopse
In a blow up pool
Dr. Dre
COOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOAL!
you're low key loki
ITS FUCKING FROZEN!
A cucumber, you pervert!
I'd do it for free, bitch. 
Cop – How high are you? Me – No, you are wrong. Its Hi, how are you?
Robin Williams dies
It's not hard.
Loads
The physicist gives theories about how shit works. An engineer takes the theories, unfortunately finds 1000 other ways of how that shit doesn't work and eventually creates something that transforms the theoretical shit into some real shit. 
Hau Ling.
They stayed away from the mainstream.
A Baboom!
Cause they would look like dicks.
Because they're all out of cervix
Can a kangaroo jump higher than a house? Of course, a house doesn’t jump at all.
Trump builds towers and Bush knocks them down.
They chalk it out
Cover your ears with your hands
Kick her in the ass.
When you're having sex a hooker says "are you done yet?" Your girlfriend says "you're done already?" And your wife says "beige, we should definitely paint the ceiling beige."
They were scared of sparks flying. 
The Titanic sinks.
Professional Assholes.
Because prisons don't have chimneys.
One....Two...One, Two...
Danke
Elbow.
"Put it down, Tyrone!"
Teacher: Why are you late?  Student: There was a man who lost a hundred dollar bill.  Teacher: That's nice. Were you helping him look for it?  Student: No. I was standing on it.
Son: Dad, what is an idiot?  Dad: An idiot is a person who tries to explain his ideas in such a strange and long way that another person who is listening to him can't understand him. Do you understand me?  Son: No.
Lady Gaga's Vagina
racism has many faces
His pants fit like a glove.
Yeah. They all have trans-sisters...
Keep at it, inmate! 
I mean, come on, a little gas never killed anyone
A gorilla with a child in the enclosure.
A: Historically insignificant.
By passing the bar exam.
Because he was just tired of being an escape goat.
They send them through the Wash.
The Police
Virgin Mobile
I asked my 26 brothers and sisters and they don't know either.
A Kami-kaze
French Fries 
You get the picture. 
I've heard she's a ho.
Unix
Because the quark had a strange flavour
A cash register. 
My wife thinks it's pronounced Nice but I think it's Nice. 
His K'Nex!
ninja art.. CAMEL CRUSH!
A woman wants a man who can satisfy all her needs.  A man wants all women who can satisfy his needs. 
Nothing if you're a gorilla.
DogMa
Rice-ist!
Because theyre really good at it!
If I find a job in the classifieds...does that mean I can't tell anyone!?
With a square Dance!
With a monkey wrench.
A Reddit card
WASWAS!
The Diarrhea of Anne Frank
Wait, Nevermind 
a girl from Jersey.
America.
Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-Cl-
I don't know and I don't care.
The last Clinton presidency left a bad taste in her mouth.
Whoretal Kombat.
A Forgoat.
Lucky... I know it sucks...
Nothing. She had a frog in her throat.
Oculus Prime.
Pound cake
Too many thank-you notes.
Cause gangsters always catch the snitch!
Dead
Cacao! Cacao!
You can sleep with a light on. 
Bite bite, suck suck, they do the deep dick combo mombo!
Alien vs. Predator
So they fit in the box.
Tree turdy.
With the fishes. 
they cowmmute.
Q: Where do ballerinas go to get their torrents? A: The Pirouette Bay
Everywhere.
Unfunny.
The returner can catch a punt...
Because they could have easily fitted in another pair of tits there...
A dead bird.
damn girl, i just wanna TAP dat ass
ALLAHUUUUUU AKBARRRR
Because a sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away.
Pilgrims.
311
It got pissed off. 
They live in Cameltoe.
By opening the door.
Orange chicken.
No it isn't.
The jokes are ok but you need to work on your delivery. 
Because they are   behind
HERE COMES THAT BOI OH SHIT WADDUP!
Put it in the freezer.
A nail gun
Because they push 2 twins together to make a king.
A punchline.
Take the 's' out of "sub" and the 'f' out of "way"
Nobody expected that late run from Gonzalez, did they?
They hate plaque buildup.
.wav
Tommy Tookalook
Well, half of it is my mother's fault.
fruit punch
Tom Marvolo 
Booootyfull
One is a busty crustacean, and the other is a crusty bus station.
He was hit by an omnibus.
A burglar snatches watches.
It's a beta blocker
She's a deaf son of a bitch
A mandate
Now, that was one politi-cat debate!
3 Lannisters.
Because OCT 31 is the same as DEC 25. 
After 5 years, your work still sucks.
The leaf.  The emo is stopped by the rope.
It was a no cows eviction.
Because Mad Cow Disease was already taken.
It's just a real cluster fuck
Mount Rushmore
The hooker will stop screwing you after you're dead. 
Because he found his honey.
What jokes have you got on anzacs?
They both live off dead beetles
European kids actually come home from school.
Pork chops at half price
None, its already lit fam!
TB
They're both eliminated and finished second in their conference.
She needed more concentration.
They hang around after the man leaves and talk to the woman.
He stepped down.
Philadelphia, the city of brotherly love.
A brief case
In little nazis
6,000,000
They haven't got anti-aliasing.
They don't get the concept of classes​​!
4:04
Honey, I nut. Cheerio! (I think I'm funny)
The shit's in a bucket !   
Kermit's finger
Parah Salin.
There was a hare in his bed.
He couldn't prove shit.
A boy scout comes back from his camp.
Roll up her sleeve.
Because chickens tend to run from people with a last name of Sanders.
She was Arapaho 
Pants
Intercoarse
An oopsy daisy.
Because they don't "come from the hood"
When you are both stiff
Because that ass could take over the world. Haha don't know if this is used or not yet but I dreamt up this joke so enjoy.
The second (right to bare arms)
Rice Fields Forever.
Clown Poo
It is an airport. 
Because the Parrots-eat-em-all. Thank you, I'm here all night.
You will lose every hand.
None it's already lit fam suh
Call out "B-52"
Cause Jews only have ten fingers.
For-Skin
A poodull
Attire.
Stymied Coppers
With his ribs
Hairy Potter.
Because it was provOLONE
ABCD   (A B Cd.....) as in obesity.... Will show myself to hell now. 
He forgot to cover his tracks! im
First, you get a great big zipper...
The on-dick circle of course.
Tindergarden
Because the extra bean would be too farty.
"Etude, Brute?"
He sucks a cockortwo! 
little cis
Cottage cheese.
Because they cantaloupe
Ed...ward.
I'm going in cover me !
No it doesn't I'm asking for a friend because I've never got one
Or was Snoop Lion ?
A cellar :)
So they both can watch Nascar.
The sound of the dog screaming at 8000 feet gets to you after a while.
Lewdicrous
Because a wall was blocking his way
In your dogs asshole. Should there be border control frisking, it will be perceived as two dogs plain wolfing
Vans
Because they're in continents.
To get the quarter back.
They have a chip on both shoulders.
Because they're trying asbestos they can.
About 3 weeks.
2 because 1 of them have to narrate.
Because they like to play with each other's  oui oui.
A COKe bottle.
The Salivation Army.
he is not coming till judgement day. so sorry am i going to hell for this?
Add 24 carrots
What did the SJW say to the person who had just been blackmailed? At least you didn't get white maled.
Bernie Sanders!!
A hermaphrodike
A recyclist. 
Transylvania.
2:30
Because it's no big deal unless you're not getting any.
Why don't pastry chefs buy taylor made cigarettes? Because they profiterole their own 
Because he always gets stuck in Chapter 11.
It drives me nuts.
She was moo-ving
100 dollars
Hopefully less than a handjob. now i die of syphilis  bye veronica
Miss Tammy: Yes I are.
Infidel.
In instagrams
A Smeagull! :D
One.. ..Or two?
Haloumi!
the bunny's eyes
The Atlantic Ocean.
I don't know you tell me. 
Premature Edraculation
Its bang out of order!
They can't handle the trigger!
A trombone!
What do you call a hooker with diarrhea? Prosti-tootin
The vagina gets new,   content injected into it regularly.
He becomes hydrated.
Understandabull
A Facilitater  
Some say he had a foot in the door... and the window... and the wall.
"Can't Touch This"
Pikajew!
A spanking
A closet closet. 
Because they cantaloupe.  This joke was brought to you by Dads inc. 
To prevent Hispanic attacks.
The Spanish Inquisition.
The French Press Secretary!
A returd
People didn't freak out for no reason when I started eating an apple in public.
Just to imagine yourself as Wolverine
Finding a pot big enough for the wheelchair.
nail the other hand to the floor.
Genocide.
9/11 victims. They went through 85 stories in 10 minutes.
The 12th floor.
When the frostbite is worse then the frostbark.
Bob.
OMG!
The Wall
I always thought they were gunna hit me, not that they were going to destroy the housing market 20 years later.
Teacher: "Kids, what does the chicken give you?" Student: "Meat!" Teacher: "Very good! Now what does the pig give you?" Student: "Bacon!" Teacher: "Great! And what does the fat cow give you?" Student: "Homework!"
A flip-flop. 
He did a cover of The Wall by Pink Floyd 
Boom
Their horns don't work.
They steal the green cards.
I'm running Windows XP.
Now please post weed related jokes
He was a cheetah. 
Because they never get a reaction.
I can't jelly my dick up your arse.
A high five...
Mis O'Gyny
Because devils are horny.
On top of three children.
[removed]
Senator.
EROTIC is when you use a feather. KINKY is when you use the whole chicken.
Hitler had a plan. 
No, John!   can't see 
A musician wears his heart on his sleeve. A suicide bomber wears his spleen on your shoes.
Eventually, they're both getting laid by a Mexican.
Try to find the fresh prints
No, you are all left
Pulled pork
Hodor.
Nothing. He was dead.
Finn Laden.
Barns and no-bulls. (This joke was made up by my 7 year-old cousin.)
He doesn't work well with Vision
YOU'LL NEVER KNOW!! YOU WEREN'T THERE, MAN!!
The people in Dubai don't watch the Flintstones but the people in Abu Dhabidoooo!
He took a big whisk and stole some pot.
Hearing aids. 
An acronym stands for something
Three Reichs and you're out
I just came!
"That's right, and I'm not finished yet."
Everywhere
The tale of a rat. 
Keep your chins up.
An answering cervix
The Dildo in the highway,the short penis books,all from top-all time in  ,Seriously,this is a shit way to repost you fucking karmawhore
Because it was Low key
Boo-bees 
"I Have Read and Agree to the Terms of Service."
In m'field
The cat can 't kill itself because it 's a pussy.
So that if they break, water doesn't hit you square in the face. 
a broken nose.
because they can't stand up for themselves!
Just trying to fit in.
All the hot dogs taste like shit.
Liquor in the front poker in the back.
They say he died in denial.
putting her back in the wheelchair when you're done.
Hoe Mow
Lay down three shovels and tell him to take his pick.
Cause you're looking DE_licious tonight.
Mary Jane was climbing the flagpole at recess. Her teacher was yelling at her, saying, "Mary Jane! You get down right now! If you don't get down, everyone will see your underwear!" And Mary Jane just laughed and laughed......... ......because she knew she wasn't wearing any underwear!
A boobie. 
The gay guy eventually comes out
Shakitori!
Anakin Skywalker. (Happy Geek Pride Day!)
Carefully
Beauty. Beauty is in the eye of the beholder. ITT: People who want to kill me, people who think I am their dad, more puns about bees, puns about beer, "oh I get it", and "this joke is more like a riddle"
What's the difference between Jello and a Dead Hooker?  Jello wiggles when you eat it out
Floppy Giussepe
"Gouda, gouda..."
Weight for it...
Donald Trump
Camouflaged
A metro-gnome
The X-Men
Down With The Thickness.
In the Spaghetto. (I 've seen this on reddit before, one of my all time favorites though!)
A jew
Publicly traded stock will mature and make money. 
Jesus
What do you do with Jews (or any other group of people) that have ADHD?  Send them to a concentration camp!
A Bird. 
Gingers
Holding cows together Edit: It doesn't work if you apply too much logic. Just enjoy the joke
With the bare-bones approach. 
Towels. 
virgin mobile
Booze 
Sergei.
Cause the grass tickles his balls...
There's no definitive proof that 6 million Jews were forced into concentration camps.
The housewife thinks about doing her taxes while having sex. The politician thinks about having sex while spending your taxes.
What difference, at this point, does it make?
Apparently he ate an 11 year old weiner. 
Because they don't trust ovens. You know, I don't blame them. They've been burned before. *Sorry for this one, I already know I'm probably going to hell. I thought of this after I heard Seth Rogan's "Jew in the oven" pregnancy joke in Neighbors 2.
No? Thats because it never came out...
Where did that list of dark jokes posted this morning go? Iv looked everywhere. 
Because this joke is poorly executed. 
They take the psychopath.
Everywhere.
When you ask them "2+2 is ?":
Claude.
It's me Mario!
Relative humidity.
In a KFC bucket. 
Putting them back in the wheel chair.
Sparky. 
I've never paid a garbanzo to bean on my face.
With two knotzies.
A roasted baby with an apple in its mouth.
More than we have now. This sub is still shit.
Cause I'd tap that I didn't make this, but I don't remember where I heard it.
The only people who aren't afraid of a Trump presidency are on Mexico's Pole Vault team. 
Snatches
Tequila
Apparently not three.  It's still dark in my basement.  
He was the White Power ranger
Jesus didn't have tattoos of Mexicans all over   body
Sadly, no... She never  .
They keep yelling 'oh God yes!' all the time.
About 10kg (22 lbs).
To meter you.
Because he didn't do it the   way
Because all proper tea is theft.
Disney movies can still touch little kids.
from a well, actually.
my life
Pu! Pu! Pu!
For throwing out all the w's.
Smallpox
Money.
Women. Get off the internet, nerd.
Bear claaaaaarrrrrwwwwwwss!!!
"Hold the door! I'm a leaf on the wind!"
Just ice
A Trump-et
Rub the blood off your dick on his teddy bear 
I pity the full!
Cher-No-Bill
Zat is a qvestion for a philosopher, not a comedian!
She pasta way.
Remorse code
Why do Marxists only drink herbal tea? Because proper tea is theft.
They become victims of youth-in-asia!
Weight on it.
Because he was dying to do so. 
They both have an alge-bra.
Because when their opponent makes a point, they always respond with a valid counterpoint.
You don't fuck pencil sharpeners.
Because they just won't open their eyes!
Just Juan
a wannabe American
FALL OUT
He keeps missing his train
Use the fork, Luke.
Usually, something went wrong with the delivery.
A Trumpet.
Because it's unbelievable. 
Bye bye bipolar polar bear
An amber alert was issued
Keep off the grass.
The swallow
They have to take ACE inhibitors.
Duck!!!
Because there's no karma involved.
There, Their, They're
They were Stalin for time.
Because he didn't have the guts to fart.
Sinko De Mayo.
He had a reptile dysfunction!
I was in in the public restroom  I was barely sitting down when I heard a voice in the other stall:  "Hi, how are you?"  Me: (embarrassed) "Doin' fine!"  Stall: "So what are you up to?"  Me: "Uhhh, I'm like you, just sitting here."  Stall: "Can I come over?"  Me: (attitude) "No, I'm a little busy right now!!"  Stall: "Listen, I'll have to call you back. There's an idiot in the other stall who keeps answering all my questions! :D :D
They have a built in suicide switch.
Hodor? 
It was a cantaloupe.
Moi?
An ambulance
I don't know..can you guys tell me?
He was trying to hold the door
Rohypnol
"Hodor! Hodor!" 
It wanted to get off its ash. 
An Instagram account.
The baconator
A spaniel.
The FBI hasn't announced her indictment yet, but hopefully it will lead to at least one
No? It doesn't ring a bell?
Having to sit in the back of the oven.
Cause all they know to do is steal, run, and shoot
The age
Because they're both roasted
Because it is a contact sport!
Poky mon. Gotta catch em all.
A pool table
They become Mu-fat
No-trump!
Cousins
Because the dog let the cat out of the bag! Haha!
Because it was delivered via Ceasarion section
After a few hours the Taco stops repeating on you...
I don't jam after drinking a gallon of nut butter.
You're hired
A: A Catholic wife has real orgasms and fake jewelry.
Cheap cheap cheap
He couldn't keep his face straight. ;)
If you got your balls kicked around, I think you would be green too.
I hear he's still reeling. 
Will you raise me?
There's already handicapped stalls.
A "Build your own Jesus" kit.
"Don't be gentile."
None, it's perfectly happy being broken, it's the fitting that has to change.
42.
I am trying to remember it but I can't. It was something about a taxi driver and he didn't speak the language, and the kick was" tell your boss to fix the loose but behind the wheel".  If you remember can you please post it for me here?
Every time you say to him "I'm horny" he always replies "Hi, horny, I'm dad".
Because the grass tickles there balls
Both mature in a cellar.
All their luggage is carrion.
Because they're both in bread
He lost his pride in a bet
Suh Dude
It's OK. He's all right now.
He who smelt it, dealt it.
This might really stupid and wierd but I have never heard of someone who has had Aids and Cancer. First of all the level of unlucky would be really high. Secondly a thought came to my mind what if aids was the cure for cancer and vice versa ? I mean if we follow a logical and mathetical based theory it could be completly and indisputably correct. In math "-" + "-"= +. Therefore, Aids (-) + Cancer (-) should equal to something positive.
Neither did he. 
The Antelopes.
Because nobody there is much of a drinker.
Trap 
Soviet
He's weeping the nation.
A signtist!
Because he was a little shellfish.
A couple of seconds.
17, 1 to hold the lightbulb, 1 to hold the ladder and the other 15 to drink whiskey until the roof spins
Because we killed the only one who had a dream.
Dank
Air to the bone
Because no one on earth wants to buy it.
The fridge doesn't fart when you pull the meat out of it.
The Zika virus.
 Because he was hung like this
Èamon
Fold it in half. ʅ(◔౪◔ ) ʃ
Mourning Sex. 
Me.
Isaac Newton died a virgin.
So they would end up with seasoned veterans.
To the foobar.
Pussy only tastes like piss in the beginning.
US Army Drone
No?  Well, that's okay.  It had a shitty punch line.
So he could cut down to only two butts a day.
Syphilis
Earotic
Nobody knows!
A husband and wife were golfing when suddenly the wife asked, "Honey, if I died would you get married again?"   The husband said, "No sweetie."  The woman said, "I'm sure you would."  So the man said, "Okay, I would"  Then the woman asked, "Would you let her sleep in our bed?"  And the man replied, "Ya, I guess so."  Then the wife asked, "Would you let her use my golf clubs?"   And the husband replied, "No, she's left handed."
It's a charming story.
Take me to your litter. 
"Well... If it's any constellation..."
He felt dinosore.
Not Egyptian Air
The pilot who jumped out with a parachute.
Wall-E
I suppose it's pastable.
High Street, of course.
10% off, 20% off, 30% off
Because it'll keep you up Pasta you bedtime. 
...because the heart attack got him first.
Tell him the lightbulb is his mother.
One is a Goodyear and one is a great year
He's only got little legs
A philosophy major
Hey man urine
If God were a woman, she would have made semen taste like chocolate! 
Because I hear that in space there is no ice-cream.
Because it had a bad driver.
Jesus in a submarine.
Saturday and Sunday, because the rest are weak days.
Pom
The trombone
A farmer
It's on the front page 
One of them is a flimsy thing that refuses to stand up on it's own. The other is a medical condition.
A construction site
Neither did she 
Because my life is a joke. Dont worry Im not scuicidal
A Chibok school girl 
You unplug it!
You've Got a Friend in Me
I guess I'll give it a shot
I regret nutting!!!
Republicans have them thrown out.
I don't like eating cereal every morning
Because I wanna slam you on my desk and do you all night. 
None, it's already lit.
A Freudian Sleep.
A comedium.
Everything is fine as long as they are white, it is when they turn black it starts to be a problem.
The elf-abet.
An extra-cholesterol. ...I'm so sorry.
neither has he
A steak through their heart.
If you leave a pot of yogurt alone for 200 years it develops a culture.
Becuase they're working in the mine.
Because he needed a stool sample.
Throw her a bread loaf and her natural instinct will take over resulting in her making you a sandwich
A bartender 
You eat the mars bars.
Because they are feeling the Bern.
​They both make up everything!
Because the sheep have gotten used to the sound of zippers
Jesus!
Everywhere
A bread-stick-em-up!
Because seven is black.
Nacho problem.
You would run away too if your name was MUWWAAAUY
Sweet Ohm Alabama. 
Gsus
A mariguana.
One's a Fe-Male, and the other's a woman in a power suit.
They both like to crack open a cold one
CumDrop Buttons
Pray-list.
Their personality.
I've never...   META ... group of people so obsessed with puns before..      Fine, I'll leave :(:(
Buck-teeth!
They both like a tight seal
The airplane.
She has a hispanic attack
The welfare line.
Hyruleglyphics.
Automatic Neuer
A sudden surge of seamen.
When your wife's clothes start to fit her.
He dumped his girlfriend.
A weapon of mass disruption!
A white bodybuilder has 6 packs whereas a black bodybuilder has 2 pac
Donald Trump & Hillary Clinton
They were graduated
Aye E, I owe you...
You planet! (It won't turn out well though because it has no atmosphere.)
One is a super hero and the other is a simple command. 
Gang, 'Nam Style.
The Deviated Septon.
"You herd me!"
A baby stapled to ten trees.
Cantilever? (can't I leave her) 
snowballs
Abort - Bort - Bort!
You know he did it.
A Manila Folder.
Pizza's don't scream when you put them in the oven.
They'll never work.
Your mom didn't give me a corvette
Do you have 10 minutes ?
They don't play the beta.
Tripod, because they have an extra leg..
So your asshole don't slam shut.
Holy shit.
Def Leppard
Because there's a vas deference.
Faint music.
Sure was a turnip for the books
Have a dog fight.
Defiled.
His wife and kids.
Because they are always streaming in!
Leave the plunger in the toilet! 
They were in a   relationship!
A minor
Semtex. 
Porsche-tchesire sauce 
He's out standing in his field
Just one, but it takes him 20 episodes.
The hell out of there.
Organic Vegetables.
Because he's married.
Untie the rope...
Dick knows.
Vote for Bernie in a primary. 
They both have been destroyed by a black man.
Nothing, he's happy and content with life.
From the pepper spray.
Beef stroganoff 
Because I've been seeing people behind your back.
anonymoose.
No. -How
A swallow
.
A wooden slipper
15 to life
"I'm sorry, but I'm afraid I cannot do that"
Whats Orange and sounds like a Parrot? A Carrot!
They both went up in flames.
Because german soldiers like to march in the shade
Qweerty
Their celery! 
The man asked "Why did you attack me?" The bush replied "I am bush."
Not caring about spelling and chocolate milf
The Breakfast Club.
A frog in the blender
You can get the fuck out.
Tell them it can probably wait 'til tomorrow.
Life.
Satisfied
You weed out the rest
Let that sink in...
Jews only have ten fingers.
Wheres pop corn?
insurance scam 
Because he comes in a box.
Righteous. 
Neighour
xD
Your mom can't take a joke.
Because he had good genes.
Mr. Jokes doesn't get mistaken for my dick.
"I farted...want a spoon?" "Why?" "SO YOU CAN EAT MY ASS!"
the wall behind him
D minor!
A Ranged Marriage 
Because all proper tea is theft.
A: Because she was a woman.
Because they ARRRRRRR retarded 
They both get busted up when I run over the gay 
Neapolitan.
Alone
A fish
Lincoln. He was in a cent.
With a funeral.
to go to a better place.
Every time she gets to 69 she has a frog in her throat.
Scisr.
It never gets old.
Because they're too stupid to learn how to make them.
Hot, because you can catch a cold.
If they had four doors they would be chicken sedans.
Trump: "Well, he's like me in a lot of ways.  He has to clear a bar that people think he can't go beyond,  he stays up in the poles, and no matter if he does good or bad he always lands on his back on a cushy bed.  He's wonderful.  Or I should say, "Juan-derful." I really should." 
Algorithm.
It varies from person to person.
Chicken sees a salad 
One sec, cunt.
It doesn't matter, it can't hear you anyway.
Carefully!
Because he had too many shots.
Cause he's a dog.
Did you hear about the comedian who was arrested for domestic violence? He was a real niece slapper.
Because she was seeing somebody on the side.   
Crossfit
Names!
The heroin gets abused.
Let’s go play on our bikes.
Because they were fighting Juan on Juan.
Brown chicken brown cow!  
Neither have I.
Because he doesn't want to hire illegal immigrants.
A dead centipede. 
By adding some beets
I don't have a watermelon in my garage.
Ping Lo.
Bleach.
Michael Phelps can finish a race.
Both's greatest hit was The Wall
A white horse fell in the mud
Because they can't carry themselves
Come on, this is reddit. What's your nickname? 
A woman will buy something on sale even if she doesn't need it. A man will buy something he needs at full price. Then, what is the difference between a black woman and a black man? The black woman will steal something she doesn't need. The black man goes to jail because you can't hide diapers under a shirt.
I'd say he's fairly incapa .
Natalie Wood.
Two. One to get up on his high horse and another to chastise the first about oppressing horses.
This joke sucks.
Ask him to go to a football game. If he can't go, because he's busy sucking his boyfriend's dick, he might be gay.
Wife: Shall We Try Different Position Tonight? Husband: “Excellent idea!” Wife: OK YOU Stand at Sink and Wash Dishes AND  I Will Lie On Sofa And Watch TV..;-p
Go stand in front of a mirror
Idk, but they sure are hot.
You slap an Ethiopian in the face.  
Whoremonal. 
A hole in Juan
God Is-real!!!!!!!!!
Vegeta-bles
Because it's too hard...
They can't afford to pay respects.
It did a great job of breaking the fourth wall.
A wind tunnel.
Existence is futile. 
A cancelled Czech.  
They keep falling through his hands.
So they can both watch the hockey game!
A personal space man
Squirrels; they're the best at getting nuts out of their shells. 
Grandson: for the thousandth time grandad, it's Alzheimer 
Your products are fruity.
...It's butter this way
They'll stare at your shoes instead of theirs.
Because they are greatly satisfied by seeing Tucans.
Lady: I forgot the name, but is starts with 'T'. Sardar: Oh, what a strange car, starts with Tea. All cars that I know start with petrol.
Meinkraft.
a porcupine
Not z!
cos' sin tans
Because is a raeli good country
Walnuts. What do you call nuts on your chest? Chestnuts. What do you call nuts on your chin? A dick in your mouth.
Great lox
Trump-ets I'll see myself out
You can only fit one dick in a condom.
1000 One to change it and 999 to walk into the same room and change the same light bulb without checking to see if it needed changing first.
Jalapeno business 
There's no dental records and all the DNA matches
A paragraph, because he is not a full essay.
It wouldn't stand up in court
She thought it was a little drafty.
In a Mau5oleum!
The flag is a big plus.
With a steak to the heart.
Yeah, he came out of the cupbard.
Liquor in the front, poker in the back. 
To get to the other side, but he was very spiritually uncertain add he did so. 
He killed Hitler.
They wipe, flush, and wash their hands
Leave the plunger in the toilet
The Admiral Snackbar.
Because he did Nazi it coming.
Negrophelia.
Omelette
A crumb dumpster
Crimea river
Woof.
You get to meet new people everyday!
Ohmmmm, Ohmmmm
A good start.
Cum on her feet and let the flies to the rest.
Nothing. You already told her.
his dick tastes like shit
You hit them right between the thighs
Sexual cervixes.
Laughing stock.  What do you call a grumpy cow? A Feminist
Fish and ships. 
Because they're always pussyfooting! 
They have to sit at the back of the oven.
Darth-tagnan 
It's bill fits more than its belly can
What you see is what's left
So they could Starmie.
He did NAZI it coming
I don't know, I've never tri
Vaseline.
Racism has many faces.
So they can pikachu 
Nothing, you've already told her twice...
An argument
none of it.
Dick in a box.
Someone who sprays graffiti on chain link fences.
He didn't run, ewok-ed.
Because their knee grows.
The Blacks get car insurance.
None because no juan will be left to change it
Avril Labean
Well it's very time consuming.
: How do you put an elephant in a safeway bag? : I don't know, how? : Take the S away from "safe" and the F out of "way." : But there's no F in way. :
Paint one of them black; the others will move away.
Not being disabled. 
About 500 calories.
What did the bra say to the hat? You go on ahead and I'll give these two a lift.
The taste.
He was charged for murder within tents.
High
A hobosexual.
A golfer goes "Whack, crap!", and a skydiver goes " Crap, whack!".
Fawaffle!
One is a snack cracker and the other a crack snacker. 
He spent his Junior year a broad. 
They all seem to get a bit weird around showers.
Wastewater Bill- because he only comes once a month!
Guess.
The BMW I8.
Because if they were smart, they'd be theists!
Kurt and Rod
It was really ruff on his family
They're plane to sea
"I find your lack of Faith disturbing."
Ares.
Paragraph. Because he's not even a full ese. 
I would care if I lost 6 million dollars
He had locomotives.
Trans fats.
Shocking!
Me: My greatest weakness? I'm a bad listener.
There is no afterlife. 
a failure!
They both know how to use an oven.
None. TSA agents only know how to remove clothes; putting them on is different matter completely.
Row row row your boat Over to Key West Scarily scarily scarily scarily Avoid the INS
Egypt 8 - Ethiopia didn't....
In the spaghetto
He gets taller
GOUDA!
Because he's got little legs
Raisin Bran
I get to watch him die twice.
You put a little boogie in it.
An elephant
With little Knotsies!
None, it's already lit fam
So you can floss after you eat. Alt ending:  So the crabs can bungee jump.
They always find its an anticlimax. 
Because he fell down a stairs and his dad definitely didn't break his legs.
They were really Chewie!
A vampire
Can I push in your stool?
They always go to the hanger.
About six and a half books.
Seize their memes of production.
I've been framed.
One, but the lightbulb has to WANT to change.
Thay can smell the goods, but they can't taste them.
None. They just compliment it and get mad when it won't screw.
Reddit
A bowl of surreal.
To get to an other site, before it gets more than 3 hits and becomes. 'mainstream'
Encyclopedophile
Because they're both cauldron
Tulips on your organ.
A. Blew. 
Papagei
A: To get to the other Ride
Q: What size of sweaters do seagulls like? A: Egg-stra Barge
Absolutely nothing.
Because it's the little things that count.
Blow a little boogie into it!
Offshore investment gains a better return. 
You pour some gasoline on it, light it on fire and it will go 
Metamucil
Just stop going to plays!
a bus shelter
At the Bo Buffet
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano tuna.
The Pew Pew Research Center
Beat it. We're closed
He takes 2 Ds at the same time
A cairopractor.
She lost her mammaries
A: Lonely
It was a buccaneer.
Are you surebert?
Probably not because I'm a guy, but the mystery is still there..
Jewjitsu
Because he wanted to...  "Get along little doggy" 
He's got a gangsta's pair a dice.
He was always Stalin in his manual!
Air is free
Nun.
"Don't worry I won't Bide'n"
I guess they'll issue a... Maya culpa. 
He felt like everyone was just laughing at him. 
A swannanbe.
Jewjitsu
Six girls ;)
... I pull out of my driveway
He stays up all night wondering if there is a dog.
Aim to the sky, maybe you'll shoot a plane.
Because he was always spotted.
Christian Bale.
Because if it had 4 doors it'd be called a chicken sedan.  (better if saying it out loud because of the spelling of coop/coupe) ;-;
A Chu Chu train
Stink.  
Urine for a treat. 
Its colon was showing
Pillow fight
They get embarrassed.
It doesn't like Cats.
With Easter Eggs!
A palm tree
Infidel Castro
Its one direction of course.
Because he can go through walls.
Muzzle 'em
Linoleum Blownapart
Ramsay Bolton.
Ben Dover and Phil Mcavity!
He didn't give a sh...
she fell off the tree.
Most girls don't want them. BAAAAAAAMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMM! Some OC right hur!
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ate one.
One has to shuck in between fits... the other has to fuck in between shits.
After 200 years, the Yoghurt develops a culture.
To make them happy before they die.
A dandelion.
"You are fine, how am I?"
A prostitute because she can wash and resell her crack. 
They didn't want their rooms covered with seamen.
Because it's re-fined!
Hangman and lacrosse 
A: To sing, "Hello from the other side!" 
A seafenenemi. **slaps knee
Homie alone 
By tying a knot on its tail.
he lost his huile d'olive
He slipped
Highlarious
The right to remain silent. 
a dupe.
Because you don't put the "D" in the big ones.
Because he who did the rhyme did the crime
It was worth a shot.
Because he refused to rent someone a copy of the Pixar flick "Up".
They go swimming in Laotian
Shucks
Because he couldn't handle a few shots
Who would stoop that low?
He was hoisted by his own sitar.
Because they're not made in ovens.
He was a condescending con, descending. 
He was going through mid life crisis.
They've reported him as a small medium at large.
You'rrre fired!
An argument.
They sue Kabul Yacht.
Because it's Syria's business.
Cantaloupe
Because Bill Gates has a 3.5 inch floppy
Bro sure!
One part Seagrams gin, one part cotton gin.
He liked his rhinos sunny side up. 
Because happy people usually leave cults.
No strings attached.
Avocado. 
Because they think men care.
If your kid has down syndrome.
A memeoir.
The Inter-Quartile Range (a.k.a. the IQRrrrrgh!)
A BMW i8
A submarine, you dirty fuck.
Most complex life forms are a tube within a tube, and the internet is more like a series of tubes.
1FORREST1
Thats the spirit.
Three pirates 
A Woman 
When you are hitting it from the back and go for the reach around, it feels like it went all the way through
A snailor
apache
B: The seed of doubt. A: Dude, that's the worst joke I've ever heard! A: Or is it the best???
An Extramolestrial 
Just another reason to moan really.
Little Ceasars
I hold mine by the ears.
The 4Skins 
Orange Is The New Black. 
Both are fun to ride but you'd never want your friend to catch you on one. 
It takes one nail to hang a picture. 
We don't talk about it...
At KFC, you can only get breasts, legs, and thighs.
There's twenty of them. 
A so-be-it union. 
HEIL FUCKING HITLER
Whats up M8?
Man, I'd kill 5 million Jews for some soap right about now. 
Hebrew. 
because there's no Americans sitting in them.
Fried cache-ews.
Post-us
It's called Trycoxagin.
What's the difference between a snowwoman and a snowman?  Snowballs.
Duck.
Holy Shit
Kurt n Rod.
Santa goes   the chimney.
Nunja.
irate.
He's still there when you get home. What's he say when you tell him to leave? "Na, 'ma stay"
Lawn mooers! My 12 year old sister made this up... She out dad joked me..and I'm a dad!
Hold all and howdoor
No because it hasn't come out yet. Huehuehuehuehue
They didn't like the public displays of abstraction.
Because I've never been inside you and probably never will unless I'm rich one day.
One is used to remove the polish, and the other is used to remove the Polish.
Ear bud
Because it's bread. 
None. People who glow in the dark don't need lightbulbs.
Because the Rabbis got to choose first. 
Because a Rolling Stone gathers no Moss.
Whodyanik Abolokof
Lots of bad pickup lines. 
A Christler.
A conundrum.
Because he likes assault to much
Bad for moral Cutting in line Organizing hunger strikes
Nothing 
Hate male.
Joke was supposed to be this: Why do you need to take notes during church? because the peoples of noah's day, "took no note".
During a game of charades
Tulips on your organ.
Hey, Watch This!
She sucks, blows, and gets laid in the closet. Not to mention she also gets turned on by your dad
if so, how do I know it's real ?
The unemployment line.
He was a square. 
For tree-son. Ha-ha. Ha. 
Because they're DEAD!
Denim, denim, denim.
They were fired..
Society.
Because the grass tickles their balls.
It wasn't mainstream.
They are ugly and they smell bad.
Because of the Hyperinflation.
6 1/2 books...
"Son, if at first you don't succeed, Try Hard.  If that doesn't work, Try Hard 2.  If that still doesn't work, Try Hard with a Vengeance.  Remember, you can't pick between the choice to Live Free or Try Hard.  They go together.  Everyday's A Good Day to Try Hard."
No one intentionally steps on bird shit.
Screw it. EDIT:   has a better answer lol 
Names 
He's never Reddit.
A Sandy Hook survivor.
They never survive the 1000ft fall to earth.  (Thanks Drawn Together) 
About 45 degrees
Because upvotes are to the left
A refrigerator doesn't fart when you pull your meat out.
You add 24 carrots.
Lighting fires.
Don Rickles is dead.
By having people believe that you've won an election.
You were adopted. Best told to siblings :D
They make rotten friends
Why does she need a watch? There is a clock on the oven!
Chevalry
He didn't, he was distributed evenly on both sides. Bernie supporters, please don't downvote me to hell, it's just a joke
Cancer.
Their wheelchair floats to the top.
Because it's high in fiber! haha, I'll show myself out...
Ginger-bred
Dr. Dre......
All the conservatives are out working.
Cause fuck you you toxic, wood piece of shit!
Because it doesn't rain in the kitchen.
Ash. 
Because they are planted in the spring!
You make a private phone call to anyone else, and submit your application.
to the L'Hospital...
The more you play with it, the harder it gets
He killed all 140 characters.
a wet melon.
A woman with the morals of a man
Walmart, they're the world's biggest retailer. Thank you.  I'll be here all week.
About 8000
trainner: No Me: Thank you for the answer. that is just what i need. trainner: Did you get my point? 1 question per person only. Me: I want to prove a point that you are a jerk and never truely want to help us. And you just gave the answer.
DOOOOUUUUCCCCHHHEEEEEE!
May I have Eurasian plate?
Because their balls would show. 
For hispanic attacks Edit: Happy Cinco de Mayo
Usain Bolt
I throw mine away. -Dean Martin
The one with the smallest mew.
A bad person
In both cases it is strongly advisable to not look down
Life support system for pussy.
What is the hardest part of rollerblading? Telling your parents that you are gay. (I'm a terrible person.)
"Dude, I don't think it worked."
They're short 2 towers.
A flat major.
Kermit the Frog's fingers.
Food for thought
Cuz he's Biden his time.
She doesn't want to feel the Bern
Bed
They couldn't close his coffin.
Olive Oyle!
They both feel good until you look down and realize you're gay. TAKE THAT CROC LOBBY #againstbigcroc  I understand if I get downvoted. 
A commentator 
"Sink-o de Mayo"
Arrr make tea
Wow, I didn't know you could yodel!
In the end they both get burned...
Put the gun down!
He heard the film had dogfighting scenes
They Both Shall Rise Again!
Slow swimmers.
With two bullets.
Neither one knows how to whistle!
You can't gargle with the sand.
Nunavut.
The captains log.
Fucking close to water
Movers and Achers  
It's a great thing ruined by a period. 
To show his friends he had guts. And boy, did he have guts.
Java the Hutt
I'll lay down and you can blow the hell out of me!
​They're angry since Froogle was discontinued years ago!
There's a good chance you'll get hearing AIDS
The knife has a point
Because he was in-tents
He never learned to mix the colors
She has experience chained to heaps of fatty rolls.
About a day.
Because for most of his life, he's Ben Solo.
He's Force fed
They pulled out too late.
Depends
They both waited too long to pull out.
Circumference. Because he ate too much pi.
Alone.
He became enlightened.
It smelled 'fishy.'
The lips are moving
Cause not now
No problem! He'll just make Mexico pay for it!
Because he saw the mess that snails left behind!
A Ted Bruz
I have 2020 vision
Go to Coles new world.
The piPhone
Better get this right, I only have 2 worms.
One slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit.
Reddit
It Hertz 
Not the joke.
The sly pygmies are a bunch of cunning runts .....  (it'll come to you )
Tom Cotton. Having to tell black people to "Pick Cotton!" in 2020.
Right there (points). -Can't be, right there they told me it was here.
Gsus
America.
Must be friends, cause they are coming together.
Oh wait, there is. 
They're dead
So he could say he listened to them when they were underground.
To lay off his campaign staff.
Harry escaped the chambers﻿.
Fo drizzle
Vietnom
His hand.
There's none, both live for the hits.
Violins
Difference: One is an African lion.  The other is a lyin' African! Similarity: They both ran after a murder was committed.
With fade out and to credits.
A vegetable..
Small medium at large
They stink because they grow right out from your ass!
Because it could see the weather changing.
The first shucks between fits....
Skidward
He had no patients 
A baked potato.
Me: Why am I still single? Brain: you're, Weird Body: And...you're fat Face: plus, you're ugly Food: umm, but i'm here for you
tickle his armpits
Boyfriend: Dear do you know that exams are like girlfriend? Girlfriend: How funny? Boyfriend: Yes, they are tough to understand, complicated, lots of questions and the result is always doubtful..
A Fetality.
The boy scout comes home from camp.
Draught Punk. 
An excavator.
Vegetta balls
Meals on Wheels
Nine Wun Wun
Neither they have.
The Zebra I just shot dead.
So he wouldn't talk in his sleep
Didn't want a brisket
Because they had to adjust for inflation. 
A: When the big hand touches the little hand.
The Pilot,  you racist.
Because he hates crosswalks
A eunuchorn.
They just ARRRRRRRRRRR!!! 
Because it's so salty.
Tennish.
He didn't.
He resisted a rest. 
Decaf. 
A Cantelope.
A roast 
Ugly sheep.
Having to go inside to ask for a coat hanger. 
Because they always get a little hoarse
Three, one to climb the ladder,  one to shake it, and one to sue the ladder company.
Cantaloupe
Of course, a house doesn't jump at all. 
Carol.
He resisted a rest.
None whatsoever.   Also, it could be that the guy who can't get laid is usually a teenager that later in life is still a loser with girls and as an adult turns into a misogynist anti feminist or a homosexual male. Good one right?
A quack head 
Sticky Buns! ;D
Automobile.
Because they're lazy, and they hate U.
An amputater
Decompose
Allows any vehicle equipped with it to stop on a dime.
He was soulful
Because their aims are white up my street
Every corner they get, they open a shop on it
They specialise in blow up dolls
Bricks get laid. 
Because Chernobyl fallout.
Guns generally don't sit uselessly in your Mom's Basement. Guns have hard barrels.
Santa stops at 3 ho's.
Out of bounce.
Good idea. Hint: Good eye-deeeeah
Wizz Air
I'm sorry, but the video you filmed is imaginary. Please rotate your phone 90 degrees and try again.
About a day
The cow never made it.
Rubbit.
The porcupine has the pricks on the outside.
He was glad he ate her.
Both think the shorter the better. 
Pillow fight!
because 7 8 10
Always smile and replace "fuck you" with "OK great"
Damn!  (This is my go-to joke that someone told me in highschool like 7 years ago. Felt like sharing it.)
Antidickstablishmentarianism.
Don't you Leia finger on her
Jesus
Because they work.
To cover up his bald spot.
Tell them ISIS are Red Sox fans.
Nutin special. Credit to my 8 year old daughter who made that one up.
Optimist Prime
Because they don't have to pay for them.
A wind tunnel.
Lesbiyinz.
No soap, radio.
roommates
He was stoned to death.
It gets toad away.
Cosecant. 
Zoos
Did you hear about the Mexican terrorist who planted a bomb on the train? He had loco motives. 
Cause Allies don't like axis powers
Getting diagnosed with cancer.
Oh, it's over your head. 
A vibrator.
Open it, if there's a 'd' in it, it's a fridge.
To blow of a little steam
Skin & Bone Thugs-N-Harmony
I remember hearing this around a few times, are there any other situational coincidence jokes like this?
You may think it's "Arrr", but nay, his first love be the "C".
Arrrrrr Kelly
I mean he's just been hangin' around for the last 2000 years. 
My Chemical Romance
It has to change for itself.
The blonde sure doesn't know.
Because he was Abel to.
He only got up to get a drink.
Dam!
They both protect the property but they don't spoil the view.
Pubic Zirconia.
Because it has pp in it.
Well, well, well.
None, because they can't change anything.
Dungalow.
Catholic 
*Interbreed. A meter of barbed wire. It's funnier in Russian
He made the World Trade Center disappear.
Qualitea.
One group has a purpose and lots of support and the other is full of nagging women.
Ash
A con-fession.
"I have no Hans"
The Gasp Chamber
He insisted it wasn't a riposte.
He was so hungry, he ate himself
One who can read, one who can write, and one to keep an eye on the other two "elitist intellectuals."
Ones a busty crustacean the other is a crusty bus station
Because he kneaded a poo.
On a Gir-raft.
Because it's fucking close to water
Scientists have now discovered how women keep their secrets. They do so within groups of 40.
A hammer.
A corn has ears.
Misandry
They throw silverware down the stairs.
Flourine Uranium Carbon Potassium.
Because it didn't see that well.
None of your Damn Business. Am I being detained?
The ambulance comes lights and sirens, "WII-U WII-U WII-U" I'm sorry, I'll leave now ._.
"Let Meowt!!!!"
Because it's extinct. 
You can assign tasks to the first kind!
Build a wall
because they all refused to make sandwiches.
no???   Awww Shucks
She starts to fit in your wife's clothes 
both are easy to pick up but hard to put down
The faster they work, the more tips they get!
Never mind, it's too long.
He touched a lot of people.
Everyone there.
Because they quickly lose interest
Nowhere, slaughterhouses have concrete floors.
Nobody would know
Crossfit
snowballs
Because they work with parts for cars, not carts for pars.
So he could BLOW it up. Please don't hurt meh.
You would think male tears, but it's actually Brigadorade.
One of them makes crack while the other just markets it.
Asian People
To keep their nuts dry. 
Because he didn't have any patients.
A stocker. 
Prawn crackers.
I want my quarter back!
Because I wanna be the very best, like no one ever was.
The Aylmao.
You ask them to pronounce unionize.
Money-gga.
Meme
A ton.
I don't have a Ferrari in my garage.
At the end of her sentence.
Harry came back to life
He'll stop at nothing to avoid them
He was following the Tsar.
John
Tell them Mexico is paying for it
My Zipper
From a well, actually.
Ask them to say the word 'unionized'.
The Captain's Log.
Cold.
About six and a half books.
Goats
Shellom. 
Because he was a little behind.
Well hell-if-i-know!
Because the Chinese know how to build a wall.
Crack rock
Family bondage time. 
The variables aren't necessarily related.
"I underscored."
"A jew!"
Artificial Intelligence
A massage-nist
Me either.
A sweet buzz!
Because Chernobyl fallout.
Cumin
Boss: Damn, I asked her to debrief all the interns before the meeting. 
Room 52E, at the downtown hopsital
Cancer reproduces itself.
You can say she has a bad habit.
The Holocaust  Worse*
A leotard.
Nothing bananas can't talk. 
By being a cat.
A hammer and cream-sickle
When asked for his name by the coffee shop clerk, my brother-in-law answered, “Marc, with a C.” Minutes later, he was handed his coffee with his name written on the side: Cark.
she couldn't see that well
One is a dirty whore and the other is Kim Kardashian. 
Never mind it's too cheesy.
An info-maniac.
Well, if you can't helium and you can't curium, all you can do is barium!
The Daily Express.
Dead ant. Dead ant. Dead ant, dead ant, dead ant, dead ant, dead annnnnnnnttt.
so deaf people can enjoy them too.
Illegal aliens. LOL
She kept running away from the ball
Antagony
One is a Goodyear. The other is a great year. 
A vag-etarian.
Because you can't get to the fridge if there's a dragon guarding it.
Pope corn!
The dick.
He wanted more exposure.
Ramadamadan.
The wedding was lousy, but the reception was great!
Say "Shoo".
Ass:Ass. Jack:Ass? Ass:Yes. Jack:Yes? Ass:No. Jack:No? Ass:JackAss.
Beets.
Hepatitis Eh.
No? Oh.....
San Fran Crisco
transparent
"Robin, let's get in the Batmobile." Bonus joke: What did one orphan say to the other orphan as they got into their car? "Robin, let's get in the Batmobile."
An impasta
Because he fell asleep on duty.
I'll start:  I was at -273.15°C one time. It was OK. What do you do with a dead chemist? Barium I'm sorry guys there really are no good chemistry jokes: all the good ones argon. 
"It's all in the execution."
Fool proof!
It took a while to sink in.
Put it out man!
The investiGATOR
Information Technology by Stephen King
Because all the Mexicans who can run fast, swim fast and jump high are in the states.
I don't know, I'm just flying the drone
He felt his presents.
Celine Dijon
He was snowden
She gives you the eye.
Cumin!
Nun. I'll EDIT: Formatting
Teacher: Why are you Late Today? Student: Because of sign down the road. Teacher: What does a sign have to do with your being late? Student: The sign said, "School Ahead, Go Slow!"
Depends on your definition of a tranny 
We use a really strong sunblock when we go to the beach with the kids. It’s SPF 80: You squeeze the tube, and a sweater comes out.
Just trying to fit in...
He ordered some NaCl.
A waist of paper.
Cuatro sinko
Wii Fit
because, being rich,  Bruce Wayne can ride a horse properly.
Shit, I can do that.. What about the last thing? Look, I'm doing it!!!
The New York Jets. 
The first man in space!
Because it's normal to undergo a midlife crisis.
It's a giraffe, walking in the savannah. All of a sudden, an helicopter comes by and..... flip flap the giraffe!
Because he was outstanding in his field.
A Klondyke bar.
A GoProbe.
Barium
It doesn't matter, they're never coming back.
Tequila Mockingbird!
Mic Jagger says "Hey you, get off of my cloud". A Scotsman says "Hey, McLeod! Get off of my ewe!"
An attack dog in a preschool.
A ginger-inbred!
Alcohole.
PETA Pan
I'm a married man, I hear no at least two times a week. 
Askanazi Jews
That's lacist.
So deaf people can enjoy them too.
Because Ken came in a different box.
Are you seeding?
A Oui-Tard
Johnny: 50 pairs of pants? Jimmy: No, A centipede. Jhonny: What? why? Jimmy: Because I squished it
Steve's Job.
The SwasTikka
Only one of them made it to the moon.
machetes
An e-cigger.  I'm going to hell for thinking of this.
A sideways seven. 
He was conducting.
Because if they fell forwards, they'd land in the boat.
Mud flaps.
Straight out of Mein Kampf-ton.
They don't grasp the gravity of the situation...
They give me the EBGBs.
An acrobat.
She can taste the blood on her son's cock
He had a shitty job.
None, Change has to come from WITHIN!
The last Clinton left a bad taste in her mouth
"Paw"m Bay
a xbox.
Because they always end up arguing over how to split the check. 
A dia-beetle
Apparently not 8
Well, if you hated it as a kid, you're probably not gonna like it as an adult.
Hose B
Lift up her sleeve...
I'm bi curious.
None. They prefer to be left in the dark.
Their last big hit was the wall.
It was so beautiful even the cake was in teirs.
Because if they fell forward, they'd still be on the boat.
About three fifths. 
Rolling Stones
Quantum Mechanix.
In their trunk!
It disappears with a poof.
One's a shooter that can't hit, the other is a hooter who can't shit. 
The polar bear.. I'll see myself out...
They push two twins together to make a king.
less than twelve parsecs.
Well it really seems like you two are squaring off. At least to tell us the long side of the story according to the Pythagorean Theorem.
He's a smooooth alligatorrrrrr
By thinking outside the box
A circus is full of cunning stunts.
A Brazilian.
Whiskers on the rocks
Oat couture
The worst case of suicide he ever saw 
To make them happy before they die
Trump is winning!
Ba-Na-Na-Na
He spiked the drinks.
Serious business
He got all z's.
A coffin.
None of your abyss-ness 
A pizza doesn't scream in the oven
A microwave won't brown your meat!!!
The circus has a cunning array of stunts. 
Break her fingers so she can't tell anybody.
A Standing Blow-vation.
It is all about the in tents action.
He wanted to get Yoda off his back.
He fell on his ash.
With Twitter you only get 140 characters.
Acne waits till you are 13 to come on your face.
It's because we are all over here in England, walking on your grass.
He says "take the Third Reich".
black people, they go to the pool by walking, then they swim at the pool and come back with a bike
A Toyoda
Dad: No son, of course not Son: The nanny said they are Dad: Okay, pack your stuff... We don't have a nanny
Poopiter. This joke courtesy of my 7 year old son. He was very proud of it.
Obamaself
A dead centipede.
What do you call it when you photograph childbirth?  Child bornography.
Because their too hopped up on crack and politics to have an appetite. 
Giraffic Park!!!!!!! HAHHHAHAAHHAHAA
They like to see the hookers give the money back''''
Cell Phones.
Their Pimp
[Le]mon
They don't want people to think they're dancing. Not my joke cheech marins I'm high as Fuck and thought you guys might like it too.
Sewercide
Dubai-bye!
Depends.
Most of them run away after being called father once or twice
Two! But don't ask me how they got inside there.
Prince died from the flu ... Theraflu?
He got hit by a bus. 
Everywhere.
A Pastafarian.
If they lived by the bay they'd be bagels.
He got caught giving alcohol to minors.
The Walking Dread
A πthon
Ones a cunning runt...
With beans? Or not with beans? That is the question.
A fjord escort.
Hide his paycheck with his kids.
Terrorists blow them selves up at camp on accident
Criminal intent
ASCII/DSCII
Cause they're gay (happy).
He had a Freudian slip.
Baking soda.
Barge into your neighbor's home and claim it as yours.
One? Or two? One? .... Or two? 
I don't know I just fly the drone.
Because we want to!
Acne doesn't come on a boys face until he's 13.
none, its a hardware issue.
Shoot her again.
They're repulsive!
Songs In the Key Of Death
Around the ankles and wrists :D
Kermit the frog
Because a lot of it is Pro-ton
Kike-boxing!
A PANDAwan learner.
With a little doe
One. They'll screw anything
After they were caught, they finished each other's sentences.
5-Year-Old: Empathy! I don't even know what it means! Me- I know how you feel.
They can both strip a Vietnamese orphan in under a minute.
While hiding in an attic.
... They're making headlines. 
It's fucking Frozen!!!!!﻿
No, but Tiger Woods
An uncle that has to build a bigger shoe closet...
Nothing... Just one inch of a slip with your finger and you're in deep shit in both cases.
Consent
Pegging each other's booty
Stone Cold Steve Irwin.
Because their shit is already packed.
To get away from all the assholes making Prince jokes.
Progressive 
Tomorrow
Carpe diem.
Male-ficient.
As careful as she tried to be, she could never have seen him coming
They had no Qin
You right a Czech.
One goes from black to white, the other goes from white to black.
He sure is taking a long while preparing for his new Thriller video. What gives?
But we'll never know, because he can't stand up?
Orphan shaped ones.
Because it's a little hoarse.
Necro-Ophelia
Well I mean the artist formerly known as Prince.
Getting Waisted
Prism
chewing gum, you sicko...
The US might invade it. 
Use shepherds pi
 Because they hate it.
THE MILFY WAY!
Collared people's time
Sorry comments are unavailable on this joke.
All they do is describe things and look like idiots.
Bottom of the fifth, of course.
Penicillin
He was awesome at cleaning the bar, but he wouldn't stop jerking it.
Because air is free
It's a white cross on top of a white background.
He stays up wondering if there really is a dog.
When God forgets to pay the electricity bill.
A lukeworm.
Christopher Walken
National Dyslexics Association
Doubtful, he sounds Kennedyan!
I don't know, I just set the bulb down somewhere, now I can't find it. Where the hell did the bulb go?
In his nutsack...
Because of the lutte
I'll be home in 20 minutes
National surprise drug test day! Happy 4/20 everyone! :)
They have white mail privilege.
Bach.
Rats!
It was only a matter of time!
Because he could 
They can both smell it, but they can't taste it. 
When looking at bacteria you can actually find some culture.
Because they must be able to "dust for Prince" I'll see myself out now
Fel-osophy
America. 
It lasts for hours and they are 18 different holes. 
He got the gas bill
Realizing that your being intently watched for your reaction to their sic clouds - BEST RECOGNIZE!
Because she won't pull out until she's done.
America.
It hasn't come out yet.
They're good at planting evidence.
A snickerdoodle. 
Donald Trump's tie.
Step 1: Buy a can of black spray paint Step 2: Stir up each ant mound with a stick. The ants will emerge by the hundreds to defend their mound.  Step 3: Spray each mound and the surrounding area, make sure you get plenty of paint on the ants as well.  Once the ants realize they live in a black neighborhood, they  quit working and start killing each other.  Problem solved. 
The Price. Own creation if anyone asks.
A well educated Barista
In the areeeeeiiiiiiiiina
Naan
Because they find their work gives their lives a great deal of porpoise.
arggg! thar she blows
Because they're afraid of the trump card.
A pile of poop is naturally brown.
I'll tell you tomorrow.
On Redtube.
All white, all white, all white
A son of a hitch!
Q: "What school did you go to?" A: "Oral."
A redneck virgin
Because its good Christian values to invade the Middle East.
He looks into his lover's 'I's.
Cellulite.
Matteo
"This is not a drill!"
Seaworld
In his sleevies
Because it's non binary
It saw the salad dressing
A patchy..
Obscuri-tea.
An adult Hitler.
I don't know, but it's not five, because my basement is still dark. 
Cause it was snowed-in.
A tourist.
Update 1: Punchline removed.
Two.  One two scre—   I said   in the bulb and one to hold the peni—   it's a 
Pimples wait until puberty to come on your face.
Cause they run faster than white.
A Hodor
Because kurt called shotgun.
He came to his senses.
One connects to all your devices & accesses your data, and the other is a hardware standard
He had a problem with boos.
Chick Fillet
So he could save his stool.
We need to build a Fire Wall!
Because he's a real dawg.
I literally cant even write now 
The difference is what people you hate
The NecroNomNomNom!
Potatoes don't scream when you peel their skin and toss them in boiling water.
Kardashians 
Thoracic Park
Howdy Neigh - Brr Made up by my 4 year old son. 
Hi sugar
Your dad's dick tastes weird.
"What the fuck was tha . . ."
It's all played in the high C's.
White noise 
Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
Because the grass tickled his balls.
Because he can't be trusted with the razor.
cause he was Putin his shoes on XD
Rebel without a menopause.  
Drinking, bathing, watering etc etc.
Kermits suicide.
Not everyone gets it.
Because stealing is the only thing they can do. 
With a fork
Hit the Juan
Gym.Tan.Laundry.
a force of habit
a 2 cycle engine 
A genie. 
umm, dude this is a voting booth.
A crocodile!
No, but i like   10s
Because he crossed the line
The Kindle Fire has a lithium battery.
Circus is full of cunning stunts. 
"THERE IS ONE GOD, HE IS THE SUN GOD! RA! RA! RA!"
Their last big hits were The Wall.
Q: What food diminishes a woman's sex drive by 90%? A: Her wedding cake.
Cummins.
You lift their kilts, and whichever one of them has a Quarter Pounder is a McDonald!
A lunartick.
"chill" with friends
"Guess where this finger's going."
​Because they do curry so well
because they're always putting sales out on ken-dolls.
the fam copter 
Si-MOO-taniously
Why did Sally fall of the swing set? Because she had no arms.  Knock knock. Who's there? Not Sally. 
About 3 weeks.
If it floats, it's a boy-ant. 
he was fucking nuts
Her name was Ella.... Ella Vader.
A judge charged him with battery.
By sea-section!
His mom said : one night i put little sugar under my pillow and in the morning you were by my side; The kid grabbed some sugar and put it under his pillow, he woke up in the morning and found an ant in his bed, "If you weren't my son, I swear i would've squashed you!" 
Because killing him after the second film wasn't good enough.
They're both easily spread.
Tennis-ee Williams
he started undressing and yelled 'I will shave you'
I dont have a ferrari in my garage.
I don't have a Ferarri.
Because he is the Supreme Reader.
homogeneous
An announcer said, "Ladies and gentlemen, we have a wiener!"
Retweet.
The unemployment line.
He'll get the money from   street
One of them left the chamber alive.
The elephants found out that they were being paid peanuts compared to the rest of the troupe and the ringleader was taking the lions share.
Hole Foods.
None, they would just beat the room for being dark.
Being normal.
He said he couldn't complain..
Nine months.
Jose can you see.....
Ein stein.
because Mark Chapman was a terrible shot, and kept missing Yoko.
Elevennessee. 
Italians.
The sound an erection makes when it hits a cymbal. 
You never can tell. The Sandpeople always ride in single file to hide their numbers.
Be the change you want to see in the world.
"Looks like bro's mix tape finally dropped..."
Steppenwolf
A Woky Talky
Guardians of the Galaxy
Angus Khan
In case you hadn't noticed, the color of the wind is 'blew.'  Water always looks 'wet' to me. Dirt is oviously 'dirty.' Soup seems 'soupy.' If you can't find those Crayons in your box, contact CRAYOLA.
They put two twins together to make a king.
Both do penetration testing.
The holocaust.
No whey Jose.
Morning Ham
Rust-in-peace.
A-Dhal 
So the banks know which ones to take back! Ha cha cha!!
I mean think about it, One for Charmander One for Squirtle and one for your second charmander. (found that but it's against rules to post links lol so I'll just leave that here for a good laugh)
They'll both off themselves eventually.
they were in the luftwaffle!
Gamers
Asking for a friend.
A bunch of butchered jokes
Ten tickles.
Nothing.
A stern rebuke from the ethics committee and an immediate withdrawal of funds. 
because AIR IS FREE
Deceit.
Her name is Areola Grande.
One is devoted to following to rules laid down by those who consider their will that of the divine. The other is a type of christian.
Two in the front, two in the back, and 6 million in the ashtray. 
You gonna eat that?
Just kidding about the white part. 
a dump trump 
Max
Because they always give you a straight answer.
Finding shoes to go with it. 
The  -bladder. 
Normal
The Fray
The hypotenuse.
A moss-cow
Dick-Fil-A
Because they cantaloupe.
You would too if you had to change in the middle of the street!
R and Brie
No, but April May.
Antique farm equipment.
Prism
A frying Pan
Postbox.
A little head
One made a killer microwave.
Karl Barx
He was into inflation.
A Neigh-bor. Sorry for my horrible dad joke. 
Boo-bees ( . ) ( . )
Like now the tank meta is out of control before that it was ADC then devourer/cinderhulk. Will the game ever be balanced or just classes take turns at being op?
Break her fingers so she can't tell anyone.
Because he saw real hope for an Aryan nation.
So he could make America grate again.
Panickin' Skywalker.
Chopin
None. Blacks belong in the fields, woman belong in the kitchen.
They are just trying to avoid the whole cost. I feel terrible for making this up........ But ill get over it.
Because Seven is a SIX offender!!!
A good start.
Eh. Sew-sew.
Society  
Sudden Infant Death Syndrome. 
My feet are killin' me!
A Labracadabrador.
The Terminator
Super Barrio Mothers
Bernie Sanders.
Pro-state cancer.
By judge and jew-ry.
What about a date?
Everyone has the same DNA and no one has any teeth.
Elephino!
"Nevermind, Nevermind"
...The boo-bees!
Only problem is, he's gonna make them pay for every brick in the wall.
Ask her if she is a Bernie Sanders supporter.
Bernie Sanders.
It's because they're always drunk as hell. 
Because it was used in World War One to kill people.
Bernie Sanders.
Money - Pink Floyd
Because he was salty Edit: im so sorry.
One bursts into tears. The other bursts out of tears
Euler butter.
Ayy lMao
Jewelry.
He flew off the Handel
If they're AA, at least batteries have something positive
Stained glass.
Bent Hen.
So they don't get mistaken for feminists.
"Your man is open!"
Because Habeas Porpoise. 
Because he couldn't bark
One slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit.  (Thanks to   for pointing out the mistake last time
Urine trouble.
Rolaids
He saw her penis
Bach
Cuz I'll finger blast you harder than Jason Pierre Paul
So she always has a happy little bush!
Nepallinates flowers.
A final solution
Bron-choitus 
Nothing, you sick pervert!
They gotta wear big shoes.
"Quit Stalin and get on the ride!"
Because it's the only time 'rich' and 'dark' are used to describe the same thing. 
He discovered the resistance
Dr.
Minimeme wage
And why is he always arguing with people?
An acne doesn't come on boy's face until he's 13.
Nothing.
carlos
She got the sack
Pink
Everywhere.
He said it was kampfy and that he reiched it a lot, but that it could have used fuhrer stitches.
It takes me longer to eat the pizza
An ouroboris
Reprimand from the university ethics board and immediate withdrawal of all research grants. 
Termigator (jesus christ this one's even worse than the last)
To the doc(k)!
Because it had great circadian rhythms.
A sixth sense 
Now   is Padre sin!
Because he was running on CP time.
Give him a fake leg and make him run across Canada.
Sherlock, homes
Make up sex.
IHOP
They come across more things. 
It's not unusual
I’m stumped.
He was on a Nipissing reserve. 
On charges of impersonating a police officer.
They believe in a single-pair system.
A   with e  dysfunction!
Because nukes are so bright
Everywhere 
Caucasian
A mating call LoL
Black people can't swim. -.-
Leninade
With a pair of caesars Edit: fixed
When it turns into a driveway
Cuz he could never paint dat mouth right
You're just gonna have to be a little patient.
Cells are found inside plants.
A corgi with a boner.
Protein Sheikh
Dustin Johnson sneezed.
Her computer had a bug...
He was barred.
Tell him to think of the children.
'Amburgers & Woot Beer! Edit: Thanks to my dad for this one.
America
It hertz when IP.
Girls don't like football.
He Jar Jar Blinked.
A rectangular bear after a coördinate transform.
MC Escher 
Society. 
Answer: the Fraser River (which separates Richmond and Surrey)
Because my PC is a Dell. (please don't hurt me it's my first post on   omg)
Because he wasn't polar
To keep Donald trump out of mexico
The Princess and the Frog
Because everyone that can run, swim or jump is in USA.
There's a nap for that
One has demonstrated the scarcity of intelligent life in the universe, and the other is a scientific study of extra terrestrials.
The 4/10 cookie
Vin Diesel 
A banana in the washing machine.
A: I wouldn't pay $200 to have a lentil on my face.
We don't know, they've never tried it.
not funny
A falsalami
Telling the difference between Chinese people with down syndrome.
Data not avalible.
A macular degenerate.
Because if it didn't it would be Li-ion. 
Find the nearest skyscraper.
A BMDubya!
I mean that canal fucking sucks, so who cares.
He's an e-NAMBLA.
Quark ! Quark !
Geometrees and trigonometrees
A cat has claws at the end of its paws, and a period is a pause at the end of a clause.
Attempted Murder
There will be reapercushions. 
...on his shellphone
The steaks were getting too damn high.
Allah AkbARRR
Pillowsquawk
All I could taste was horse semen... So I thought to myself, "this must be how she died!"
Cervical cancer.
Bobby Fillet
Because he goes to Pizza Hutt a lot. Edit: Best flair 2016
The Wall.
By forcing every Juan to work on it.
Na.
I don't have an alcohol collection.
Over 9000.
Quackamole.
A crossfire.
Crazy cows. They have to be nuts. 
A convertible. 
pop
Big Bank Theory
Women's rights.
Alaska
It's been nice gnawing you. 
A lurkey turkey.
A swallow 
Nazis
It swags its tail.
A racist
Netflix and Chilldren
Where's pop corn?
Dat ass
He only spoke gaelic
GERMANY!!!!
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna.
How I bought your mother
Augusta wind.  
Sometimes the homeless get change.
Unique up on it. How do you catch a tame bird ? Tame way unique up on it.
A bingo machine you sick fuck
Because it's a rogue film - a Star Wars prequel that won't be complete shit.
A TRANSport
Don't worry they'll tell you. 
Because more alcohol is the solution to all problems. 
Because it was a sewer side mission!
Because they got a bad wrap. 
It's fucking crazy.
They were both on Top Gear. 
Because they'll reach 420 before anyone else. Explanation: 80 is quatre-vingt in french and quatre=4 and vingt= 20.
A beanerschnitzel 
Cold War Russia. 
A fetaphile 
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick
You buy it per-tater 
Just one more putsch. 
TLDR
Hard wood.
Dogtor
Cosby Cosby Cosby Cosby cos, because of the wonderful things he drugs
Or...I 'run' through the campground? Oh right, I ran, because its past tents.
Also how many credit hours does it count as?
Revolver Camelot!
Relief
None. The light bulb shall never burn out. (OK. It's more cathartic than funny...)
It was bloodcurdling.
"Nut juice" wasnt very popular.
They took everything but the sunscreen and Father's Day cards.
Your keyboard.
Because two Wongs don't make a white.
In the name of the Vader, the Luke, and the Obi-Wan Kenobi
We're not sure, they've yet to see the light.
That's not funny.
Because they are constantly lied to about what 8" is.
Reddit.
Because he burns all the franks but leaves one undercooked.
Neither take your 3.5 inch floppy anymore.. unless you pay extra.
your mother
He got tired. The man running behind the car -- he got exhausted.
because nobody made sandwiches
Knock, knock.
Women.
Santa Claws
Because he then becomes filthy Rich.
The Circuits! (this is a joke i made up when i was like 10, i don't think it ever caught on)
One's a follower of Islam and the other is a person who blows themselves up in the hope of causing collateral damage.
Because she no longer has a dollar to her name.
Favourite because  piter is the biggest planet in the solar system Hated because it's a gas planet
Woman 2 - I've simply told him sex will start exactly at 9 PM, with or without him.
He was always ham-mocking.
Both are in the way if you are in a hurry
Banana-nana
Christian 
清... 崇... 常... 丁... 董~~~
Because they're tight fisted wankers.
There is no difference. The joke is you just learned math.
Harry escaped the chamber.
Because if they flew over the bay, then they'd be called bagels!
The designated driver.
The cheese and crust. 
He holds the lightbulb and the world revolves around him.
Come together Right now Over me
Holy Matrimony, Batman!
On their RRRRRRR drive.
He always delivers.
Elephino!
Because it's traveling light!
Because he was outstanding in his field
The second telephone.
( sex ) Dungeons and Dragons
To suck my fucking cock.
Because he saw the gas bill
When they came to Ellis Island, not one of them could speak a lick of English, but they all had "To NY" on their hats.
Re-arranged marriage
A key.
A Pizza can feed a family of four
The Bullet leaves the chamber. Courtesy of my comrade Ivo
Their lips are moving.
Because Oklahoma sucks.
Urine for a surprise. 
An ENTmoot.
Five Guys
They like 50% off everything
bakLAVA
The test subject is the only one you'd willingly ask to "tell us about yourself."
Kelp!
Juan-inch wonder.
Elephant grape sine theta
A buccaneer
You can do this twice. One time with you right eye and one with your left!
Guten free.
An astronaut you fuckin racist 
He felt his presents.
In potholes.
Broccoli
M'chop M'choke M'champ
post-upload skepticism
With a phone.
Because it's kawaii.
"Wait… I freed  ?!?!?"
Because he's nobody's fool!
"Get out of my son!"
Seizure later
Nanda Parbeets.
int[][] abs = new int[2][3]
Because if you take only one he will drink all your beer.  
A paper jam sandwhich
Disorientaled.
The Hash Slinging Slasher.
Because they're nobody's fool
Jokes about Batman's parents can get old.
A cock and a couples of hares! Source: I was told this in a bar tonight and felt the need to share it!
So they can draw blood
My Name Is URL
FUCKING RAAAWWW!!!
Attempted Crepe
For public transportation.
He shreds.
A roll model
Ma a
Not exactly sure why, myself, it's just Shiite
Grounds for termination.
Drug addict: No officer, it's Hi how are you? 
Tooth hurty
New Delhi
Mossack Fonseca.
When their lips move
Carlos
To spruce things up a bit. 
TLOPia
Because she had a pun in the oven!
Audi drivers have pricks on the inside
Leonitis
Czechmate
None of them, since everybody is already dead.
ICandy
"That rotten asshole split on me again!"
Chickenstocks
The loading times are out of this world.
Heil-acopter
Pork is haram
Criminal intent.
Just don't chew. 
Donald Trump
Little Caesars
Antique farm equipment.
"You're drunk ET, go home!"
He didn't see the ewe turn.
Hip-Hop!
Because walking wouldn't burn enough calories.
Tsar Napoleon.
A flat minor
Her lips are moving.    Yeah, it's an old joke but then again, so is she.
Give them a "test tickle."
because he had a dying light
its "rådyr" - its funny because in Denmark rådyr means two things - "very expensive" and "doe"
Because they're a bunch of suckers.
Legendairy [From my young daughter]
A human being you fucking sexist.
They keep the mailman away from his wife
It was making him Moody Edit: Guys, its a Harry Potter Joke for those who don't get it.
Michael Phelps could finish a race.
Nostrildamus
Who gives a fuck?
An Igloominati
Serf's up!
You call him "sir".
A sneeze.
Enough to lower your standards, I'm moonsout_goonsout
Itstumbled.
Strippers don't rig their polls. 
Acne waits until you're 13 to come on your face
Moooo!
You hang around here while I go on ahead.
Son, if this is another tie, I'm gonna kill you.
Nyetflix
BoogeyNAN!
"Even though my existence is meaningless I want to spend the rest of it with you."
He drank coffee before it was cool
"Man, it feels like a weight has been lifted off my shoulders!"
Put it on my bill.
Because they're calculating.
the Crystal Methodists
None fam it's already lit! Sah duude!
With cool beans.
Well, do you have 2 minutes ?
Either your mum, your wife or you. 
They Bangkok
You go Soul-searching. 
Don't sittin' bullshit me. 
A Yutopia
They're calling it Jesus fucking Christ
A Skele-Ton.  Thanks, I'll see my way out.
Extra testicle 
The losers got precipitation trophies.
Mahatma Gone-D
A pigment of your imagination.
A sicka blyat
He forgot his safe word.
Aisle B - Back.
About 1 thousand Iraqis.
Let's go PAL.
He grows taller.
None, they're the powerhouse of the cell. 
Because it's bipolar.
Women bitch about jokes, men joke about bitches
Fuck you!
The feet.
A m80.
He tribe of pygmies is a cunning bunch of runts.
Christmas, Carl 
The South Will Rise Again
Idk!
Give and let live
He used a krypton-currency.
None, cause its already lit as fuck fam.  
I haven't done anything to warrant a rest.
Obi Juan Shinobi
April Fools ya dumbitches!! There's no difference at all. 
she asked for sex and got S3X instead.
Always have to smell it, never get to eat it.
Alley-oop Akbar
1Forest1
Because sixty-seconds=minute.
North of the equator.
Title: What's the difference between TheFineBros and  ? Answer: One made a stupid mistake that rightly lost them subscribers and the other...oh wait.
April, fools
Did you hear about the house the two lesbians made? It was all tongue and groove.
Title: Why is   like Donald Trump? Text: Because now I look at them both and say  .
Long time no sea.
Chicken sees a salad.
You use test tickles 
Because it's Russki. 
"If we don’t get some support, people will think we’re nuts!"
A micro-transaction.
One turns young people into horrible human beings and the other is jail.
Both just got hacked
Apparently Donald Trump is a cuck.
The herpsichord.
Quadraplegic, terrible car crash ...but she still suck dick for money!
The sweat that forms on your nuts when you're banging your sister.
Pig Latin
a Eunuch-horn! :D
A call-em
A sweet potato.
Alam Shookup.
Baked beans
Khal Pacino.
Yeah, they're not a natural-born citizen.
A direction
Christianity
Unlike him it doesn't have battery charge.
Because he couldn't pay the gas bill
The DEA just passed a new controversial drug to help treat lesbians with depression. It's called Tricoxagan.
A. How can you tell if someone has Alzheimers?
You're my breast friend 
He drowned in his Tea Pee. 
A Faygo Diego
The only black KKK member. 
Because she couldn't keep her hands to herself.
Oh don't worry, they'll let you know.
One of them starts a religion after it gets nailed.
It's making headlines.
Disoriental.
Your wife back, your dog back, your house back...
A gambler might lose.
A midwife crisis. 
Roy Jeep Biv
It's not hard. Edit 1: Why was my title and username changed?
Jew Maple
Well, he save on groceries.
Poor ​Juliet! Did not know Apple stores don't have Windows​​!
Sunni side up.
Paid off.
A Freudian slip.
They are both very pedantic
Those were dark times.
A journalist.﻿
A cock that sticks to the roof of your mouth
There age
Gods
Because they always klingon!
An UnFair.
They were looking in Oldowan places
One and not one.
Ever opened a grilled-cheese sandwich?
Because his dick was stuck in the chicken. 
Donald Dump
Homeless
A slow cooker
The battle of the buldge.
Force of habit.
Both are charged with battery.
Croakaine
The obituaries
When his dick tastes like your husband's ass
The taste.
They both had a mandate from heaven.
Dear Sir, We are writing to you because you have violated copyright ...
The somnambulance.
America.
Hebrews and Shebrews.
Now a day, everybody is just so butthurt when you do...
A nostaljar.
Because coat hangers are cheaper than condoms.
Ten-tickles
They both know how to throw a hoedown.  Not my joke, just passing it on.
A maze. 
​​No, I don't want anybody to see my browser's history​​!
A cross-threader 
Good Vibrations
A Pedofile
I've never paid $200 to have a kidney bean in my mouth.
Recoil 
Because their horns don't work 8 year old brother just told me this joke, thought it belonged here
Beer nuts are $1.99 deer nuts are under a buck
So the dishwasher matches the rest of the appliances.
If they're black, they can't feed a family.
Diabetes.
Because he was picking up good vibrations.
I apollogize.
"Well you don't look very familiar..."
Turn it inside out and shake the fuck out of it.
Shit in her cunt.
Flaccid
Acne usually comes on a boy's face after he turns 12.
Forget it.
His shoulder. 
7-Up 'n cider.
It stinks! 
Tsk Tsk Tsk Tsk
Twitter has a character limit
Her name, you asshole.
HI Jack!
None.  There are no   there.
Just-ice
It's because his Lily died.
A Trojan horse.
Def Leppard
Snakes on a plane.
Crack it before they hack it.
Piston
A submarine. 
But then it moved to Japan.
Because they got nun to love them
Because 12 year olds can't vote. Edit: I'm actually somewhat of a Bernie supporter, I'm just joking about how he has a lot of youth backing him.
I bet it's really nice to be Enya.
Because they measure 5.5 to 6 inches as 8 to 13 inches.
Boo Bees
It means urine business. 
Just 1...blondes will screw anything.
A George Costanza. 
It's gonna be YUGE!!!
Depends, what is yours?
Everest. Any time he is bored I see him Mount Everest. 
White Christmas 
Puppymonkeybaby
Answer: Annette
Because my interest in you keeps growing.
Boss
He had a cardiac arrest
Because it's three against two.
You don't hear a law student call themselves a lawyer, or a gender studies student call themselves a barista.
They look at YOUR shoes when they talk to you.
A native Texan saying, "Sheeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiittttttttttttttttt."
a plain bagel.
Trump supporters vote
Fingerpaint!
The Khajiit. 
Slip not.
Mum? Mum??? MUUUUM!!!!!!!!
Bill Gates: "Internet Explorer" Sundar Pichai: "Google Chrome" Tim Cook: "Safari" Jared Fogle: "Tor"
Past tense.
Mount Rushmore
Because it means urine trouble
For some sick, strange reason, men enjoy smashing pussy.
Sudden infant death syndrome.
It stops on a dime, then picks it up!
I heard it was a blast.
Molar bears!
A broken heart.
Schizofriendic
Osmoses
One.
Because they are such Kling-ons.
Every time your girlfriend goes to the bathroom, take two shots
Winner gets to be V.P.
Man with a uterus somewhere 
Nothing.
Because he always fucks up the delegates.
Because he's such a fungi.
Halluminati 
That's why some people seem bright until they start speaking.
Jew by Jew
Goes without saying
Because Mary Magdalene was his Horcrux.
Probably not, the   mods deleted it before anyone saw.
He's got a funny yolk.
The Hollow Crust.
Popcorn, because you have to blow it up before you eat it. 
Because it might be your bike.
A piece of gum, you pervert!
HAND-EYYYYEEEEE-EEEE-IIIII!!!
He was Sikh.
America
It's a real pain in the ass.
A cock pit.
Dead. Another anti-joke by the fabulous me. Surprisingly, nobody has down voted the first one yet.
The color. Yes, this is an anti-joke. Downvote please.
Your mom can't take a joke. 
OGG
Because they cant finish a race.
Ugh.... Pho queue...
It leaves.
"I find your lack of steak disturbing."
Busting a newt
I heard it was top notch
Don't worry, I shot him.
The Should Ant and the Could Ant.
Mohammed responded "Pedophile is a pretty big word for a 9 year old!"
Gent Lee (Gently)
"A" cup
The Battle of the Bulge.
Au
We know that eating fish is supposed to make us "smarter", but the only fishes we eat, are the ones "dumb" enough to get caught. It doesn't make sense.
He just rubbed her the wrong way
Hot cross bunnies Happy Easter
John Dough
Ukraine your neck.
A clam bake edit: You guys are ridiculous, thanks for the steady stream of laughs
Does this taste funny to you?
Because they learned what happens when you touch a little boy. 
yesallwomen
To remind him of the cunt that has his DVD player.
His treasures.
They're both back at it with the white vans.
An Audi
Mom: Son, your dad has not grown up as much yet. 
When the wordplay becomes wordwork. 
She couldn't solve inequalities.
He wasn't concentrated. 
Because I just heard dad tell our neighbour to turn it off so he could shove it down her throat
they both escape through the chimney.
Joey Fatone
Juan by Juan
A comic relief.
I don't sweatshirt 3 times a day.
Icy Dead People
Stick? BARK!
Nun. 
Because B-shells are too small, and D-shells are too big.
5,999,997
A menstrual bicycle.
Submitting a stool sample.
Check it's ants-history.
Mountain Dew. 
Civil War
J. Robert Moppenheimer 
There's Ruble everywhere.
Elevator music
Toss some salad.
If you find the right woman, you're complete.
I don't know, I just click "submit"
You need three years experience to even apply!
So it won't explode when you fuck it. 
Because of their great buy one, get one free of charge deals.
A solar ellipses...
Curt Nobrain....
Sore arms.
He thinks he's real hot shit.
Haulin' Oates
Two fingers of whiskey.
Done right, it doesn't linger.
They're making head lines!
"You sound just like me!"
Have you seen the mess snails make?
He's all right now.
Two buy four.
Explaining to your dad that you're gay
Stonedface killer.
pay him for the pizza.
The X-Men
A spider!
I want you to seize my means of reproduction.
No touching!
a meme.
One dumbass who never pulls out in time
Zero.
because New Mexico blows and Oklahoma sucks
An out-of-tuna!
Jalapenetration.
" "
Because he was low-key
Neurotic: the one who builds cloud-castles Psychotic: the one who lives in a cloud-castle Psychotherapist: the one who collects the rents
'Cuz I heard you got that ass mah. 
Because I would like to fill you with my dirty load in the evening, turn you on, and fall asleep before you finish
He fiddled up a little kid.
"It's psychosemitic"
He topped himself.
They're both convertables.
you have to drop the bomb twice before she gets it
Atrophy
They did shove a long nosed witch into an oven.
Delivery.
Your mom still sucks my dad's dick 
Em-OGs
Don't stop ble-eding (The pause is necessary)
Your dad still sucks dick.
Uncle Ben's perverted rice.
We sleep better when the room is moving 
One is not enough and three is to many
Because even Magic can't pay your college Loan
A: The Little Mermaid on her period.
That's nice. Mine's a light shade of brown.
A nibble.
"You always think you're right!"
Meowi
A 13 year old girl who runs faster than her older brothers
Mooove the fuck out my way 
Don't do anything, just place a mirror in front of them and see as they squirm.
Open the door. Put in the elephant.  Close the door. 
An eagle
in formation
Because she couldn't take her husbands bullshit.
Cause you're always guardin' your wallet, guardin' your car, and guardin' your house. 
Because if they had four they'd be called chicken sedans!  
It's ass
Because they can't have land sections
Put him on fire.
Very syrias
Once your stack of Ottomans gets to a certain height it will fall over.
Because there are more birds on that side.
The leaf, the Emo is too depressed to go outside. I saw this joke reposted so many times. I figured I'd mix it up a bit.
They wear Whoreshoes 
The radical left.
Azif
Tommy Hilfigeritout
An eskemo.....
Roommates
A condescending condescending
I'll tell you yesterday. 
Brusselsprouts 
America
Just Juan.
Because they are a-door-able.
Depends.
Looks like we'll be short on sprouts this year...
A vote for Trump.
"Jaaaam,this is good"
A Toy-Yoda
It doesn't make sense, he and all his friends are always stuck in second gear
The Wii hours of the morning.
They needed better anchor management.
Idk I'm voting trump
A boat.
They always take things the wrong way.
Because it was framed
I've never had a Garbanzo bean on my face before.
America
I heard he was diploid. (I'll show myself out...)
On the dotted line. *Revised from an earlier attempt.
She kept running away from the ball
Commutators
They never get old.
TUH KEELLUHHH!!!
Bock Goodale
The leaf, the rope stops the emo.
Don’t worry, he woke up 
It scares the shit out of the dogs.
The Ex-Men.
One second mom, I'm coming!
A "two-weeker"
Order a Cosbypolitan cocktail 
Because B-shells are too small and D-shells are too big!
Their sextant!
Oh shit, some arsehole has got my pen.
Because of all the time they spent in the closet 
Because he looks like one.
ex-spearmints
Because America is never wrong.
Prov alone.
The divorced barbie is $399 because it comes with Ken's house, Ken's car, Ken's furniture, etc.
The truth may shock you.
Nun
No really. What is it?
A Paririst
You never have to meet her father.
They understand coralations!
So the other one would also drive
On the dotted line.
Take away the "S"
Because he needed his space.
Just say neaux. 
He kneaded the dough.
Bombs
Eggs Benediction.
I'd tell you the rest, but I don't want to spoil the meat of the joke.
Because the cow has the udder
Two, exactly. One to hold your penis and one to turn the lightbulb. I mean,  .  I meant, one to hold the ladder and the other to turn your mother. The lightbulb. You know what I meant.
Because their mother was in a jam!
He's on a roll!
He's known for his deadpan delivery.
Auschwitz! That was close!
They changed the title to 'The Art of the Deal'
He moans, shakes, and spits on your back.
Saturday and Sundays. The others are weakdays
Hen shot first.
The remote falls out of his hand. 
Because I'd like to grind on you until you groan loudly and I have to replace you.
I wouldn't pay $200 to have a green lentil on my face.
He wax off everyday
So he'll only be the second worst president ever.
He only sold left wings.
Because yo mammas ass so fat it couldn't fit in 3D.
You only have to punch the information into a computer once.
They have a sad history of not finishing off races.
 Credit to 
The border.
They couldn't see eye to eye
Because it's always spotted.
He wants to make America grate again.
Because 7 8 9 A
A dapper crapper
The girl who puts it there.
That was the most violent book I've ever read.
One is a good year, the other is a GREAT year
He got kilt.
A Giggloo.
It really just depends on how much cents it makes. 
That is   ultimate question.
One will help you and the other will help you be an asshole
Because it takes more than 35 patients to make a full set of teeth.
America.
You rub them the wrong way
Cancer
Because he is dead.
Via the psycho path.
Fruity pebbles 
He nuts and bolts.
The ghost of Christmas Pasteurisation.
The great Hootini
Occasionally (OK Asian Lee). 
Their parents.
A chicken sedan.
If it had 4 it would be a chicken sedan
B Negative.
a fanta sea
They're both looking for a tight seal. 
It was mayhem.
That explains the sacrifices my parents had to make to pay my tuition
Nelson Candela
It can only go to the fuchsia.
A massagynist
As much people as is needed to screw that lightbulb.
A: A cello burns longer.
"Wall Mart workers of the world, unite!!"
"Because jokes are the white man's burden."
G-sus
The wheelchair.
Alien vs. Predator
Knock there who's knock?
you planet.
They always have pecans! (Read aloud)
Pull a fast one.
"Mitosis !"
Cause no matter what you do, there always seems to be a Clinton claiming to be "on your side" . . . 
Because he was getting chased by two assholes still drunk from St. Patrick's Day.
Not Oscar Pistorius.
They all have white vans
NCIS
Turnip
The more you twist them the harder they get.
Because they're nuts
They couldn't find 3 wise men or a virgin
Because X Marx the spot.
A garbage truck
A jew found a dollar in a hole.
It only takes one nail to hang the picture.
£30 a week poorer.
Because someone said there was a "murder".  
It was a no buena My girlfriend is Mexican so I love Mexican jokes. Let me know if you have one!
"Because," he said, "the bun is the lowest form of pastry."
Laminated 
Smirnoff ISIS
With a steak to the heart.
They both crustaceans
If they are thick, they have a hard time to rise
Like a glove.
There's one less drunk.
How do you want your wontons cooked?
Arabs
Not enough leg room!
Well, I guess it would be marshmadness
A orange tree.
When he stands next to your girlfriend and says her hair smells nice.
"Make it Tso's Number One."
Because you have to put Male or Female on the college application
Are you ready for the next episode?
I have no fucking eye deer.
Hide their money in their bible.
Everyone WANTS to be irish on st Patrick's day.
Batvirus ( stolen joke xD )
On the latest episode of "Celebrity Apprentice", Donald Trump fired himself! 
Johnny Braavos
They never have positive reviews.
Hey, watt's up ?
…One is a crusty bus station, and the other is a busty crustacean! (My husband groaned loudly when I told him this one, so I knew it was pretty good.)
A salted pretzel
None, that's what students are for.
Because he thought it wood look better!
Juan by Juan
Two. One to change it and one to yell "Ta-daa!" when he's done.
Man: How did you compromise with your wife? Husband: She came to me on her feet. Man: and what she said? Husband: i was down to bad and she said come out, i will not say you anything...
Because he's the Blade Runner.
When you run over a dog you don't have to go back and get the GoPro.
Because it was soda pressing.
The boyscout comes home from camp
My newt.
The steering wheel.
By giving each other a taste of their own venison
The Shuffle ... pack of wolves.
Lean 3 shovels against the wall and tell him to take his pick.
He didn't work well with udders. 
Because they only wanted a little drama.
Two-forty (use an Irish accent)...  It's two-farty
With a Cobang
None.  Happy saint Patricks Day!
Paddy O'Furniture
Because if there was one more, it'd be too farty.
Fucked Up
So they look like their mothers
My Alchemical Romance
Because one more would be "two-fahrty" 
Sham rock. 
Inbred
A tea-shirt. Please don't hurt me. 
Schooner than later.
We are trying to make America grate again!
The St. Patrick's Day Parade.
A Sandy Hook survivor.
To give him a chance to say something. 
A lepercon. (In honor of Saint Patrick's day.)
Michael Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzmichael
239, because if there was 1 more it would be "Too Farty".
Because if it had 4 it would be a chicken sedan
In his prostatoe. 
Because his hose was in a different area code. 
So his friends could stop by and crack open a cold one.
A: Hitting your head on the lid of the coffin.
A Leper-Chaun
Answer coming Fall 2017.
Aloha Snackbar!
Because all the slow ones are in jail.
A: The unemployment line
The Oral-Borealis
He got the shakes instead. 
Because she was a woman.
Dino-mate!
Gets jalapeno business
You would too if your name was WARRGELBLAFFENGAR!!!!!
... Well I want to start a beef jerky brand that mentions "Please jerk responsibly"
To say "hello from the otter side"
A πρ
Double jointed.
It's for foul balls!
Acne waits until you're 13.
A fat stripper actually gets to the polls.
Because not very many of them can dance.
They're both Veteran-Arians (wah wah)
A camera.
I'm anything but.
A rice queen!
Because they're all dead
Because Americans value the freedom to exercise our rights. AMERICA, FUCK YEAH!!!
Ferrous Bueller's Day Off
Because he is low energy.
"Make me one with everything." 
Because sex sells!
Gorilla Warfare.
The country!
Because they lactose.
Kilometery Cyrus
Because I already reddit
Because the marketing department cuts itself.
Bill has had sex in the White House.
America
Adolf-in
KIWIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII!
Remove only the top 1% please.
Crossfit
Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
They both have an equal chance of winning the Democratic nomination.
Downton Syndrome
Bear with me...
They're an anti de-present.
It's revolutionary
They`re both dead and black. 
the Trumpet
Mozarts' Flute in A minor
A killer whale.
Because they like it under-aged.
Love.
The digestive system
He was ex-cargo.
You have to drop the bomb twice before they get the message.
Because he forgot to check his blind side.
How can they do that?! They haven't released a fourth!
By going underground
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out a window.
A 'fucking' nightmare.
Because he's run more buildings into the ground than Al-Qaeda.
ground beef
The vacuum cleaner has the dirtbag on the inside.
Fryday.
Meat again soon. Nice buns by the way (Lettuce keep that between us).
cause he could nazi
"Nin, ten,  " ....I'll leave now.
Your PUN-unciation
Egypt me!
flip-flops
On Whose Line is it Anyway,   is made up.
Whaaat __ You don't know Lee? Pleasant chap, though he doesn't fancy being compared to a butt.
Go ask your mother Courtesy of a hot dog vendor in Atlanta
Slipnoot.
I spy.
The leaf. The rope stopped the emo.
Because they're fucking assholes ! 
An elaborate fantasy in which she is in prison and tries to escape by chewing through the bars of her cell.
Uncle Ben's
A husband and a wife sit at the table, having dinner. The woman drops a bit of tomato sauce on her white top. "Och, I look like a pig!" The man nods, "And you dropped tomato sauce on your top!" hAHAHAHAHA
FULL!!
Mao
Because they hate black, people!!!
It sounds like you have a reptile dysfunction.
A: Because 36 would be too many.
Sandals in the Bin
They take the buzz
Muffin 
Sperm have a 1 in 3,000,000 chance to become a human being.
Pi(e)
Fromage
A meowntain.
Not-sees
They're both back at it again with the white vans.
Diet Coke.
On charges of "impersonating a police officer".
The condom broke
Bison.
The moon
Trump-et
The kind with the fruit on the bottom.
God demi
With a vaccuum, the dirtbag's on the inside!
The Spanish Inquisition.
Tear gas! (Written by my 9 yr old son)
Not enough cement 
Depends on what tune the Devil happens to be playing. Ha. Ha ha. Ha ha ha.
K9P
A Dairy Queen
The leaf. The rope stopped the emo. 
"You're Cruz'n for a bruising".
I don't think it'll fit in that ass.
[removed]
My dick.
Krav MAGA
A religion drinks wine and a cult drinks Kool-Aid.
It was on paws
You see, firetrucks have 4 wheels,  can carry 8 men and 4+ 8 = 12. There are 12 inches in a ruler and Queen Elizabeth was a ruler. There was once a ship named Elizabeth that sailed the seas. Fish live in the seas and fish have fins. People from Finland are called Fins. Finland and Russia had a war a long time ago. Russia has red on its flag and that's why they're red. Cause they're always russian around.
Because the punchline kills.
Pies are round
A Mosqueato.
[removed]
They're old, promise you free shit and are red! 
"The kinky guy uses the feather but the pervert uses the whole chicken" As told to me by the old guy who sat next to me on the plane
I heard the   were great!
She had no arms. Knock Knock. Who's there? Not Sally
The front row of a Trump rally.
He was a dicktater.
They know how to tuck away junk.
Me neither.
"How did I get these simple questions wrong! I am so irrational!"
Cause she was a cunt. (Courtesy of my little brother.)
The tricera-hops
They're both X-Men.
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out a window.
Because it borrows the one and never gives it back.
The Protocols of Zion, apparently.
He came in when it started to rain.
Lime.
Pop Quiz
They got 6 months each.
It wasn't his type.
It Hertz
By his coffin!
Dust Bunny
Because the condition was untweetable.
Your mom can't take a joke.
They both say insert Bill here
Prova I just came up with that and feel pretty proud (:
Juan.
Children who died at a young age. 
Back on crack
Because he doesn't do cardio.
The passengers and crew were marooned.
Cops
Bing, bing, bing... (Source: The Daily Show, by Trevor Noah)
LSD doesn't need to be drunk to hit me.
Kids.
B-52...F-16...B-1.. 
A doctor.
Rape.
Flatbush. 
He TANKED his campaign!
Organized crime!
Pay her and she'll speak to you about it.
Because the signs all say "No TRESpassing"
Its what you get when you put water on my mixtape
No they'll just go to pop!
They have a large following!
Peter parkour.
Sorry
Beef Jerky
A beggar has retained his integrity.
It's full of trans fats.
They need all the preservatives they can get.
A French press
because they get lost at C!
The chewy center.
A rug hooker. 
it's full of shit
He's too cocky.
He could NOT SEE.
It's their knees that go first.
We know where   live, your family too!
Because he Toots Uncommon. 
Nun
Urine trouble!
A Buddha Pest. 
"You're two shellfish."
K9P
He wants to put the Dick back in Tater. 
They would have discovered Penicil(e )
He finishes her drink EDIT: Apparently this is Conan's joke, so all credit goes to him. I just heard it from a friend of mine and I had no idea.
Forwards
Three Fifths
He was inSOLEvent
Run Berry, run!
So they can look like their mother.
No, but lemon curd.
Poland
Chairnobyl.
Coles.
Piece of cake.
Wrap it around a tree
You just gotta apply yourself.
Fruit of the tomb
One, but only if the lightbulb really   to change.
I hear he ate her pussy.
I give a shit when my computer crashes
It wastes your time and you walk away with either tears or a slight chuckle.
Wave
Not Zealand.
Because she...let it go!
Look a squirrel!
A computer will accept a 3 1/2 inch floppy. 
Ned Flanders
Rick Grimes has two I's....
He looked a little blue
Have you ever tried pulling a grilled cheese apart?
jahbless
Because she said so and that's final.
Paul Walker only crashed once.
He saw his gas bill!
He couldn't get the saddest fraction.
Only juan.
The unbearable lengths one man will go to get his revenge and win an Oscar.
A Golden Retriever can sing better.
A no-see-doe
Toby or not Toby
To the moooovie night.
Pho fo' fo' at fo'
[deleted]
They might give you Hi-V back!
In the cunt-tree.
Piss Perfect.
At the Nelson Mandeli.
An outlet
Because with one sense gone they taste really good.  Sorry, that was wrong... they taste really well.
It's great!  It's called "YOU SHALL NOT PASS"
Artificial intelligence.
It was falafel.
"Leeeeeetttttssss get rrrrrrrrrready to Buuuuuuummmmmmmmmmbbbbbbllllllleeeeeeeee!!!!!!!!!"
One of them is a swift tailor.
A webdesigner
-No. -They haven't tried it either.
You must not bring either to the movies.
It's too mainstream
Please help. There are ten so far and they have invited their gross friends to our home. They are using the broken lightbulb to smoke crack off of.
a sweater
Because he got there before the hare.
"Hey,  watch how far I can kick this bucket!"
Because you take it off and wonder where their tits went.
Because he didn't get arrays.
An Invader.
Because he's Baroque.
Dance moves.
Call her next week. 
Decaffeinated coffee.
You brown it on one side
Land Ho!
Me neither.
'Cause #FeelTheBern would be bad for business.
Arrows con Pollo
Sean Bean
Apocalypse Later
A man will spend half an hour looking for a golf ball.
M'old.
one day a farmer who can talk to animals walked up to a cow, he said to the cow"Give me your milk", but the cow did not answer he repeated multiple times but the cow still didn't answer finally he gave up and said"why am i talking to you cows are stupid." He siad and walked away and the cow kicked him and said"You ain't getting none of my milk" and laughed at the farmer, the farmer went to hide and cry.the next day he gave the cow to the butcher who the cow also kicked and laughed at.
A smoothbore.
Because he had bad pickups
The Fluffernutter.
A Pedrophile
He said to his friend, "Jay, R, R you Tolkein to me?"
Because she had no arms!  . . . . . . . . Knock Knock Who's there? Not Sarah. 
Because he got an award for revvin' it.
One's a busty crustacean and the others a crusty bus station.. 
Nurse.
Plane English. 
Because he was outstanding in his field.
Because he's in a cent.
One, you asshole.
Eric Clapton would never let an 8-ball fall out the window!
They aren'tt tolerated on thsi subredit
The older they get the easier they are to pick up. 
I had one of those, except I didn't wake up after I hit the ground.
A Zimmer frame
DMV.
Because he finally got it﻿
Super Cyan
By dropping out now.
Jeeper creeper!
It's near Uranus..
A Web Designer
They spread for the bread
A pilot, you racist piece of shit.
My wife and I had differing opinions on this. (One dad joke style and one completely non-pc) Looking forward to hearing from the masses. Edit: because apparently everyone wants the answer to the joke and nobody can think for themselves.  I said : "coffee gets a bad rep because it's black" She said : "it gets mud everywhere" Yes it's a bad joke. I'm sorry 
I'm bacon.
Because it has little legs. 
Pro biotics and a healthy amount of fiber.
Hudyaget Dat-Bollocov
Because it is worth it.. 
For shits n' giggles.
One no-Trump. Literally a Dad joke. From my literal Dad.
Because so did Satan.
"You're likeable"
Justin Case
Cuz Winterfell and it can't get up! :P
A moment of silence...
So the deaf can enjoy them too.
Fistfully conservative!
Cause they lactose.
Probably.
N-Gauge.
The watery stools
On foot, how else?  JK Rowling
Smiles Edgeworth
Himshey's chocolate...
With Al-Gore-rithims
West wing
It's been censored there.
A wet nose
Exactly...
I heard it was an assacre 
Well, there is a vas deferens. 
He had to disband the group because he couldn't raise enough members.
Juan by Jaun
None, they're all screwed.
Not much, but in Flint they are both regular and unleaded
Twinkies can cause a national upset.
Because they've already been roasted. 
I call it the British open. 
There was too much seamen.
BOOM!
Find out next time on DRAGON BALL Z KAI!
Because her head and shoulders were on the dashboard.
Web design.
Look at her arm.
As if she's going to lay there and be swayed by some new buck.
Half a cat.
Right where you left him
Black
The hooker can wash their crack and sell it again
PIece of cake.
Society.
Tiger Woods has a better driver.
Word of mouse.
A pleasant erection
Viet-nom nom nom nom nom.
Make a Wish Foundation
Because he is dead
We don't know; she hasn't opened her presents yet.
Everything's gonna be all white.
Because they work on so many levels
It becomes a bitfit
Thief: They steal your money then run Politician: They run and then steal your money
Because of the lethal gas bill.
When they put both their hands on your shoulders but keep searching
Fullest House. Then, Get Out of My House
Vladimir Lenin dab
The flag is a big plus.
It's because their knee grows.
Tell him drinks are on the house.
I'll be Bach.
Face muscles.
Gmail
. . . . . . . .. . . . . good timing
There was a small medium at large!
Leave it alone with a horny Beagle for 5 minutes.
Because it has periods
A four-chin teller.
White Nudes Matter!
Because he had no  .
Carpet bombing.
Nothing. Cats don't freaking talk.
Just one. He holds it up and the world revolves around him
Every time you see one, it's already been broken in half.
A ewe-nicycle
no less than 2. some one has to drive the pink cadilac
Over 20, as my basement is still dark.
They've both got a little ass
He's always nailed to the boards....
Because Michael Douglas starred in "Double Jeopardy" in 1999.
His teeth, his eyes, his nails, his palms and...his owner!
A vast matey.
O'LAMACARE!!!!!
Fucking pedophiles.
No matter how hard God looked, he could not find three wise men or a virgin anywhere in Mexico
He was a cereal rapist
So men can remember them!
He is short handed
To get the aids.
Half Calf
"I never bereaved her anyways."
Juice.  
I'm PC2!
Addadictomy
There was no bikini atoll
They are both at the bottom of the ocean full of seamen.
Because he really kneaded the dough. (please forgive me for that awful pun)
Trump
Watching the soft spot move.
Adobe Wan Kenobi.
In BATteries
In his buccaneer.
Cause he doesn't like Cruz...
A triathlete doesn't go both ways.
Fingerprints.
Donald Trump can make God great again. However, God has no such power!
Having a democratic debate in a city that was destroyed by over 50 years of democratic rule.
Who dies first? No one cares. :/
A HORNY TOAD!
He was having a midlife crisis.
Your mum.
"I'm having a movement"
Because his home was a maze thing.
Dr. Dre
A condescending con descending.
The Ethiopian chicken
A nun working in a condom factory thinking she's making sleeping bags for mice.
The abortion.
A gingerbreadmon.
What was Jehova accused of?
because he's a transparent.
Are you serious? I could give you a mouthful.
One is a cunning array of stunts!
All that salt must make them thirsty.
A Meanderthal.
JOHN CENA!! I'm sorry.
-No. *But why? -Four reasons: -Number one you are drunk. -Number two this is a funeral. -Number three you don't dance the Ave Maria. -And number four I'm no sugar tits, I'm the priest.
Nigeria
A crush crush
Answer: thedust
A fine case of herpes.
Dora the EXPLODER
Because he wanted to get-a-long-little-doggy
First Lady's man (;
More like "these-are-hard-to-openios"
America.
Because if he was bad he'd be a CANTdidate.
They will both ruin your meat. 
It's intents
His pants fit him like a glove.
Backstreets BAC
Telling your parents you're gay.
 He had a Caesar.
Tobaccio
Jeffrey Epstein.
Extroversion
Because a lot of them are in schools.
Because they don't swim in pairs. Are there two of those fish? Nahhh.
Because i bomb the pussy
... it's the one that's jalapeño business!!!
Just two, but they'd have to be really small.
Muscle tone deaf.
By how often he ripostes.
Strait
You got six cookies and five of them is gluten free.
The bull has the horns in the front and the asshole in the back.
Objects may appear larger when being held.
He was petrified.
None, let the bitch cook in the dark.
One to screw it in and nine to write on their blogs about how enlightening the experiment was.
It was a bone-chilling story. 
It's in the tank.
I love you so much, my head could explode!
Whenever they get upset, they cry their eyes out. 
Le meow
He broke his nose.
Because you make my hotdog stand
Psychic-delic.
When I find you, well, you'll be sorry!
A barista. Because they're only good for making coffee. 
How long IS a chinaman
By conducting a   meeting with every Juan of them.
I guess we're just on different ends of the spectrum.
Hyperpretentious
Welcome
They don't.
They all want either pees, peace or peas in the middle east. 
   Because there's mighty phat loot and booty ta be pillagin' and plunderin', matey.
She was feelin' the Bern!
All of them. One to hold the bulb and the rest to screw the world.
HDMI
Twitzerland.
A rental car can drive anywhere.
Beets me.
An Ash-hole.
A $100 bill makes change
According to Lewinsky... Happy Employee Appreciation Day!
How, are you?
Aushwitz
Nothing Really Mattress. They only sell queen size. 
Orange is the new Black
Yaba-daba-doooo me in the butt (Sorry this is god awful)
Just leave it...ill be back tomorrow.
Uzbekistan!
No  room
Poverty
Boogers.  This isn't a joke. Ted Cruz eats his boogers. 
They're big enough to run around in.
Show off his erection.
CCTV
A midwife crisis.
They end up in a custardy battle.
Sunny Corleone!
Because love means nothing to them.
A car can finish a race
A dell
concentrated jews
Progress
When I'm low on transmission fluid.
Because he was cremated
You have perfect eyesight.
0mg
The Holocaust
Yet another great time interrupted by a period.
By completely ignoring, these are only campaign promises.
To shitpost "DAE hate Trump and Hillary?"
He's a party pooper!
An emo-g 🙇
I was going to google it, but I was worried it wouldn't account for inflation.
No more 
Undy-terd.
One that smells like a snow man.
A condescending con descending
A word of truth.
Well, they both suck and have trouble moving forward, but at least the vacuum has a handle on it.
He signed a naan-compete.
Keep the change
A nun doing squats in a cucumber field. 
I mean, he IS quite the ass..
Bye Bye Bernie!
Vodka
It's a game the whole family can enjoy!
They both have Kurds in their way.
I've never had a garbanzo on my chest
America.
Orange Jews
It was homophonic.
Pullover
A Cruz missile. 
11 Because it has another 1
Another Juan
Nothing. They are both just waiting for the first period to be over.
suckerberg
Head to head race 
"This isn't just a campaign, this is a political  "
Jack Daniels 
He was at Rubio's house and was worried he'd get Cruzed.
Donald Trump's shoes
Acumen.
I dunno but it's probably the reason for their low birth rates.
They can't fit their butts in the ashtray
It was coffin
Crude Oil.
Peter Parkinsons
"Are you going to be staying for dinner or eating out?"
Aye Matey!
You can keep the tip
Crippling debt! It's funny because he can't walk anymore!
A black guy
Wat-heirlooms.
Wasabi 
Because it was Na HA! Get it? Because Na=sodium and N/A=not available. Seriously, this is good clean fun. 
So the white flag can be visible from Berlin. Sorry :P .
Rubio Tuesdays
Netflix and Krill
The library, because it has the most stories. 
Wee paws for station identification.
"Let's make Germany great again"
MY LEGS! OH GOD, HE'S EATING MY LEGS! AAAAARGGHH!
"Mother fucker."
It's two tired.
Anybody who creates an account to post has to be lurking long enough to see the same jokes posted before. How come so many jokes are repeated? Is that a running inside joke itself?
Teacher: I don't know can you? Student: Well, let's check... 
Because they can't reach the high notes. Bonus: how does dwarves communicate?  Smalltalk. 
Reaching around and pretending it went all the way through. 
Apparently he was a great pitcher-taker. (Credit goes to my husband.)
Well I can tell you its Not C... and Not Z for sure Just thought of this lol (the not C part)   .... thought of not z...
You can't top a good pizza joke.
Blue paint.
America.
Dear Sir/Ma'am We are cutting your internet connection due to the following reasons:
We wouldn't have to pay her as much.
He doesn't. He hires people with long fingers to do it for him.
He lies awake all night wondering if there's a Dog.
Math Salts.
They always travel and their stealing attempts end up failing.
Logger-rhythms.
Poe: Nah, BB-8.
Nancy from New York.
Because they were 50% off!
He was lack toes and toddler ant
Straight Outta Carton.
Ctrl+P
Fingerprints
Dress up like my professors, they barely cover anything important. 
No matter who wins, the city will be destroyed.
He sure made a mint.
It's given him a great cult following 
Preparation H!
Obviously more than 6 million...
Simon 16
RIP in box
It's the only race that he hasn't offended yet.
1 or 2 ? 1... or 2...
Difficult
He was worried about the euthanasia...
Nasshole.
Someone is loosing a trailer.
I guess he was shot through the heart
With an iethberg.
MICHAEL BAY LEAF
So they can stand closer to the kitchen counter.
vegetables.
Bilingual.
Herr Kutz (This was funnier when I was half asleep this morning)
Julio
The first one saves people from criminals, while the latter saves criminals from the people.
He's Snowden. 
Wife: Would you please call our children by their real names.
They say he fears the wurst
I've never had a garbanzo bean on my face.
A Carabiner
An irrelephant.
Because his first name is Morgan and his last name is Freeman
A groaner.
Dried red paint
Quornography.
I sided with cancer on the "Kids VS Cancer" page.
Repeatedly.
Fight for your right to padre
An Erectangle
Because they don't have attachments!
None because only beavers give a dam.
Because it was baked. 
Berni Sanders seems to have been like a bad gift: it's the thought that counts.  80% voted against him in SC, he will be destroyed tomorrow, and estimates show he won't even get half of the delegates Hillary will. Furthermore, even if he were to magically win, the House, Senate and Supreme Court would block his most drastic ideas, making it them simply "food for thought" but not actual thoughts for implementation. Thank you very much.
Boyfriend: How is my guitar skill? Girlfriend: You should be on TV for your talent. Boyfriend: Am I so good? Girlfriend: If you were on TV, I can at least switch it off. Mystic Castle will come soon，come to play and explore!
It always comes with the bill.
A decomposer.
Gross
Missouri 
Because they're meteor
Because he is a Toupéer
A demominator.  What do you call his fellow classmate who gets rid of the bodies? A mathmortician. Credit goes to my sister who came up with these today.
Whale-Kin
One that gets you an oscar
February... because it has the least number of days
Because they were secretly saying "Heil Wichser!"
"You better amphi-BE-ON your best behavior."
It's a polarizing topic.
Because they always steal the show.
Becuase atomic bombs are bright.
Bowling
Blackpeoplemeat.com
Because he was inuit to win it
Check his spirit level. 
He was assaulted.
One is against the law and the other is a sick bird
A lot of people think three bushes is one bush too many.
He finally got it!﻿
Both are all mouth and no balls.
A neurosturgeon 
Cause he just got it!
Less than a Birdie Bundle, I assure you!
You rub its cituris.
Two, but you have to get them in there first.
Anywhere else it would've been the "teethbrush"
Give them a dirty tampon and ask them what period is this from.
Not Titanic
A Jew and a Pollock are in a rainstorm... That's all I know and I've been dying to find out the rest. Anybody have any ideas?
PG-13
None! The room's been dark ever since José got deported!
Acne doesn't come on your face until you're twelve
Edifice Rex
Reddit
They both barely cover an asshole. 
Pizza doesn't scream when it goes into the oven.
Jose and Hose "B."
Fortran
Yeah, if he's a billionaire to begin with..
Because you can't stump the Trump.
A woman born on February 29th 1996.
Rolaids!
A lox-smith
They love people who can't see straight!
You're a peon.
Your two favorite flavors plus strawberry
Because they discuss tings.
Both say Please insert Bill.
Flank
Because her teeth are too fake and big
Only one, but the light bulb should be willing to change.
Denim Denim Denim
Wipe it off.
When the coast is queer.
I'm 
Pan Nick at the Disc Co.
Overcooked
maybe never but Bernie sanders lost big time in the primary today. 
They are the wurst.
Because they are always streaming.
The cemetery; people are just dying to get in
Zero.
Do you even Lyft bro? (I'll see myself out)
A jewish girl and a man walks into a bar. They hit it off and the man asks for the girls number. She lifts her sleeve.
On Death's drawer. 
The Cheetahs!
It hasn't come out yet.
Dark humor
When they're still running pieces on Hillary Clinton.
His dick tastes like shit.
Because he hates capitalism.
It turned into a hexagon.
It's an accident if a boat full of refugees starts to take in water.  A catastrophe is if they know how to swim
Swiping and wiping.
The balls are for decoration!!! :) <3 Source:Αρκάς
....Dr Dre.
a Latter-day taint!
M'lasia
After the incident, he could only tres.
A-sians
The Tyler Creator
Because you never know when you're going to need some boiling water.
 
Because communists believe all proper tea is theft.
Whose Rhine Is It Anyway?
Possesion.
Raymond
A worm hole
Spotafly.
You put a guitar in his hands.
Unknown
The Spanish Inquisition.
He's all right now.
It's because two Wongs don't make a white.
Because he's black.
abalonely
A Cucumber...
Current events
"Seacrest out!" "Seacrest in!" "Seacrest out!" "Seacrest in!"
Pachydermatologists
The braille left her lips numb.
Coming...ready or not.
A misteak.
They both have white vans
Or was Snoop Lyin'? Edit: Just in case the king sees this, I got mad respect for you Dogg. Smoke weed everyday.  (His grandmother passed away recently, I'm just trying to be nice people.)
Christie wants the highest cabinet position possible because he knows - the higher cabinet is where they keep all the cookies!
A Charitard.
chlamydia
I'm looking for food for my human centipede...
... It's hard to see.
Apos-trophies
"Bad Habits Die Hard."
Her saying "I drink it black, like my men"
Depends on how hard you throw them
A Wurst-Käse Scenario
A Mechanical Engineer makes weapons, a Civil Engineer makes targets. 
Salontro
Because he stays low key
It's period is a little LATTE.
Rave at the party.
Nice belt. 
My credit card bill.
A first order reaction
L. Which stands for "Lots of Money".
Fermenting yeast!
Because during sex they're plugged into a fucking know-it-all!
Personally I'd rather have parkinsons, cos I'd rather have half a pint than forget where I've put it!
Because he didn't get it.
A Trump stump!
In case they didn't want to come back.
A: Some asshole brings 'em in.
A small medium at large. 
unplucked
I'm dreamin' of a white Christmas 
It's really making waves.
Convincing the sound to get into your van.
It's a rough crowd  ...Ba da bum chssh
Because it was first cum first serve.
They can't even
You tell her that her smile is contagious.
You lookin to get whacked?
Because they'll get sand in their Schlitz.
He found a hair in one.
A scarfish
You have to drop the bomb twice before she gets the message. 
Satan herself
Vir-jeans
They all have tur-rets
Little Seizers
He's all round.
Their goldman sacks
Spent too much time figuring out the Engels, so he didnt get the Marx.... thats what he gets for Stalin
A topical rainforest.
Cha Ching
The bricks will get laid.
Because I want to go through your backdoor
Crate and Barrel. 
El Vetica.
Because it was too tired.  :)
The harder you hit them, the more English you get out of them.
A hotdog
(Repost)
ALOHA SNACKBAR
Husband: Darling, what did you cook today? Wife: goat tongue Husband: Yuck, I can't eat anything that came out of an animal's mouth Wife: Don't be angry honey, I'll make you an egg
I've got no idea, but sure as hell would be useful at a cotton farm. 
When your dad's dick tastes like blood..
Because he was in Sidious.
Because they're gassy
He used a cheek magnet.
repost
Worcestershire 
Step 1. Submit a false claim Step 2. Collect that money Step 3. ???? Step 4. Massive profit for doing nothing
Because there's a JC Penny at every corner.
If they jumped forwards, they would still be on the boat!  Sorry.
A degree in law.
A protein sheikh
He made a gross prophet!
Doo-bees... I'm so sorry for that
It's worth a listen. The talk is called "Autism Speaks" for anyone interested.
A dill doe.
Because it ran out of contacts.
I'm not sure, but he must have had a loco motive. edit: grammar
A Klandike bar.
Pasta continuous.
He bribed The Broadway League to give an award to his show "Rigatoni".
Fuck all.
A dire rhetoric.
Because the parrots eat em' all.
Supreme Liter Coke
Datatertots
A Dicktaker 
Adobe.
They already approached Arnold Schwarzenegger about playing fellow Austrian Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, but he said "no, I'll be Bach!"
If you play with it, it gets harder...
Male. Cause they get ready in a couple of minutes.
B: I masturbated yesterday, So I had to clean up afterwards.  And one thing lead to another.  Hair trimming included. 
Because he's a fucking liar.
I bought him one of the best tubas money can buy!
I can only hold one beer when I'm driving.
Because they all pull out.
Because she wasn't wearing her seatbelt.
One will kill your dog, the other's a chocolate bar.
Cheap cheap!
It was the herd shot round the world.
Having a chickpea on your face.
A twice baked potato
He had to pay the altamate price.
He has a four chin.
They're heading separate ways.
You spend a large fortune
Cause they have smaller PPs lol
I am bread.
Because slavery is over
A Chrysler
Everyone finds it a-peeling.
Trying to fit in
He got hurt from harmful rays
The Spanish Inquisition.
When I dump a load in the washing machine it doesn't follow me around after 
They both take people before their time.
A phone charger charges batteries, but a thug has battery charges
Kelvin Klein
A: Let's just name it the first thing that comes to mind, think you can handle that? B: Sure I can.
Bullshit. Works better if you say it out loud.
He was in a deep depression.
His name is Anchovio Banderas
You can play double dutch.
It's just another great thing ruined by a period.
Because it's the currant year.
I won't pay $200 to have a lentil on my face.
Cheez Waz.
His seminal work. 
They both get into things before it's cool.
[removed]
π-rate!!!
They both take my money then go down on me
Arrest-aurant Say it out loud.
It doesn't matter, he ain't coming anyways.
There would have been, but the punch line was too long...
TEACHER: Sarah, go to the map and find North America. SARAH: Here it is. TEACHER: Correct. Now class, who discovered America?CLASS: Sarah!
I will be back, rec time is over. 
Ask Subban from the Hans to find out
They're both experts at placing temporary crowns.
America doesn't want Bush.
They're both made up.
a 2nd born. 
"You're fat!"
Hasbrah.
Too Mennonite
Mark is black.
It was cockamamie
Because he is afraid tidal wave will take her away from him. 
Because at night, he's always sleepwalken 
A woman.
Because he had no body to go with
He Felt the Bern
Hillary Clinton knocked four minutes ago, but come on guys, no one expected Bernie to come second by so close!! This is a win for him!!! Now's not the time to give up hope!!!! We have to keep fighting!!!!!! Don't get discouraged!!!!!!! Political revolution isn't going to be easy!!!!!!!! I'm donating $4:00 to Bernie's campaign!!!!!!!! Match me, bro!!!!!!!!!
An algae-bra.
F5 (sorry Imgoingtohellforthis)
Like a Bloody Mary, but with a stab of OJ...
For fingering a minor.
Ten Roofies.
Look, I am your Fuhrer.
In cents 
Cause you're making me a foot long.
Some believed that there was a cheetah among them.
Dig a hole in the ice, and line the edge with peas.  Then, when the polar bear comes along to take a pea, kick him in the ice hole.
Dishes a bad joke.
A fat lip, a black eye, and a job.
Because he nuts and bolts.
They tend to be mean.
Pounce...
A kid ask his dad to explain politics to him. Dad says "Your mom runs the house so she is like the government. I make the money so I am the Economy. Our maid is the working class. Consider yourself the public. Your little brother is the future." The kid says now I get what politics is. "Last night Economy was fucking the working class. Government was sleeping. No one cared for the public. And the future was crying."
To get to the Otherside!
Finishing first   third in a circlejerk. 
Well, that's the edamame.
Because they're versatile,  a good value, and contain lots of protein you racist fuck. 
None.  They both should have pull out sooner. 
No bad dad jokes.
Because they use extra hops
Granny Smith 
Because he Neverlands.
All he did was take a day off.
Because they pick their nose with their gloves on.
There is a period in the middle.
That Old Thai Moroccan Roll.
A re-lotion-ship.
because they like the taste of defeat. i'm not even sorry.
The Ground
Because they can't decide what exactly should break there.
A frog in a food blender.
The seat
A bigger Parish
News of the elections is getting old. 
Old whites on their deathbeds saw "the light" people so often experience when they approach death, and accidentally voted for it.
Because she's Hadid.
The homeless man has $7 to his name.
Cantaloupe
I hear he's pretty hung.
He heard it had de y flavor.
Yep. The cows weren't getting a square meal.  *  
Because He's worried that he would win with a minority government.
Houdini.
They have 3 long strong legs. 
He had a staff infection...
Well then what is the opposite of congress?
Prison Food Source: 8 out of 10 Cats does Countdown
Four skin divers.
Vinigger.
Because I put on the wrong sock this morning
All these new ones are so derivative...
He always gets Toad.
You need a knife to get in the box.
A can't opener
It collapsed into a black hole.
Because it had its in-de-pen-dance. I'm posting lots of really bad jokes tonight that just appear in my head, if just one person enjoys just one joke is worth it, good evening. 
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless it's 10% off
Press pray.
Because their mothers told them to eat their vegetables.
MORE TIME TRAVEL JOKES!! when do we want them? RIGH
Instead of k2, they call it k9.
To tell the chicken he could do it better.
Good morning ladies.
The teachers tend to Babylon
To show the raccoon it's possible.
A guy trying to get a little head.
Because he couldn't see the point in forks.
Cause everyone wanted'a "boo" tea!
He Double Gloucester.
A two liner.
I was only following hors d'oeuvres.
It's not hard...
Cha-chink!
A flying carpet muncher. I'm so sorry.  
She doesn't, she just holds it in the socket and waits for the world to revolve around her.
A jew blowing their presidency 
Air Hostess to passenger:  "Sir would you like to have dinner?" Passenger: "What are the options?" Air Hostess: "Yes and No."
​​It already has at least hundred degrees​​
"nice watch"
Your job still sucks
Chicken ceaser salad.
So people don't confuse them for feminists.
To get to the other side!   
Incorrectly. 
Double jointed.
Because if they had pulled them by their feet they would have filled up with mud
Because they were cutting corners.  
Take it drag racing
A transplant.
Scarabic
A brownie.
Back in the colonial days, the people of the Canadian capital decided the whole of the northern land needed a name- but no one could agree what it should be. So the mayor had all the letters of the alphabet, from A to Zed, put on little pieces of paper and shuffled in a top hat. Then the mayor said "Whatever letters I draw, that's the name of our new country. Here goes..."  He drew the first letter: "It's a "C", eh". Then the next letter: "It's an "N", eh."...﻿
Papal.
A giraffe with a sore throat.
At best they're ASICS.
A CADillac.
Yoda-ling 
EuSINE
"Yeah, but it didn't taste very good."  She smiled and nodded, "I know, it taste like dog food."
They work on so many levels
Move seats.
You're probably Australian. EDIT: I mean venomous, not poisonous. I am sorry
Tony
Because they have so many Wing's and Wong's  That they might Wing the Wong Numba!!!
A POPstar. HAHAHAHA. Living is pain. Unbearable. End me.
Because its a bit too sow...
A condescending con descending.
Pee Air
..........YOUUUUUUUUUU!!!!!!!!!!
Chloroform. >:D
By the ears
Ears, listening if anyone is coming...
A condescending con descending.
To get to the dark side.
A pedo-file.
That was time consuming but I still want seconds. 
There Himmel ist blau.
Kermit's Finger
Scrub-a-dub-dub.
It was a Regal
Even if it is cold it's still good.
A battery has a positive side.
Races 'em.
A porcupine has the pricks on the outside. 
Virgin mobile.
Headmaster: I've had complaints about you, Johnny, from all your teachers. What have you been doing?  Johnny: Nothing, sir.  Headmaster: Exactly. 
Utterly useless 
Give him a small $1 million loan
"Holy Sheet!"
A carrot.
The website required him to prove that he is not a robot.
A school shooting
“We are the 2016 presidential candidate frontrunners.” This is a joke – take it that way
My ass.
Nun
Baked Alaska
They kept summoning demons in random conversations.
He lives on a street with no name. 
Get off me homes.
A groan up!
"We used to be really tight until you let that dick come between us."
A Pimp
¿Quien?
You pay them for the pizza. 
Meat.
Old Spyce.
Tutankhamon
Flip it over.
Tulips on an organ. 
360 hoscope
Two more bullets.
Syrup.
An abortion hook.
i can't vegetable my dick so far in your ass whoever could pull it out would be crowned king arthur  
It involves Siamese twins that go to a Tom Jones concert and have intercourse with him, they then have the chance to go again, a year later, but one of them says he won't remember us. I feel as though it should be really funny but I don't get it.
With a noose.
Because doing so would be incense-itive!
A footlong.
A failure
Podcasts.
His was Stalin.
The silence of the lambs
His shoulder.
Whoops, wrong subreddit
Because there's a BartEnder there.
Nahweh.
He has an Asgard ...I'll see myself out
Corsair. (works better in a pirate accent)
An Avagadro.
They are both always surrounded by sea - men! I made up this one.
Jamba Jews 
He wrote "1 + 0 = 0" and then spent the rest of the lesson trying to rub one out...
ALLAHPOO AKBAR!
With a Pb & J sandwich
17/38
Because they're tight-fisted wankers. 
Cause endorphins make me feel good.
There's a great view, but no atmosphere.
I've never paid 50 bucks to have a garbanzo on my face.
Because he walked in. 
Because it is next to the AC
Bison
MayoNEIGHS
A no-Nguyen scenario.
Can the popes di*k fit through a donut.
Because it's always black and white.
because it did.
One is demonized by the actions and beliefs of a small minority. The other believes in the wage gap myth.
China has one and they don't have many Mexicans
Iran. 
He's not sure if he did it on porpoise. 
She broke it trying to read the road signs. 
A heroine addict.
21st floor person goes: AHHHHHHHHHH  1st floor goes:   AHHHHHHHHHH
A Pearl Harbor
NINE!
To draw blood.
Just wait 5 minutes. They'll post about it. 
Iv never had a garbanzo bean on my face.
when you realize that you have had 2 strepsils within one hour.
Two men a night.
The fourth wall 
Beacuse he was to "far out man".
Bloodborne
I'll be home in 20 minutes 
Unstable.
He was handling his wood in public.
You belong.
Weekend at Bernie's.
Nothing. They were both stuck up bitches.
Let's dispel once and for all with this fiction that Barack Obama doesn't know what he's doing. He knows EXACTLY what he's doing! Barack Obama is undertaking a systematic effort to change this country, to make America more like the rest of the world...
Only one. They just hold it still and wait for the world to revolve around them.
Leaded gasoline is pretty cheep!
He was outstanding in his field.
It was his First Order!
They've never had any gigs.
an om-nom-nomnivore
the egg, of course. Isn't that what I just said?
Carl gets shot in the face.
PbR
Chicken Caesar Salad
Because they always try to maximize the degrees of freedom.
Too much work.
Because you've had a lot of Jews inside of you.
A Juan-a-be
Monkeys still throw their poop underhanded 
Pounding Sensation 
Because they knead dough to make a living. 
Croatia!
Response: In programming course.
Rain Quotes
Manstruation
To the ethereal startrek convention.
Budweiser
All he wants to do is build a wall.
Because everyone would just think it's a quinceañera
That way they know what it's like to live with an irritating cunt.
You roll up herr sleeve. 
Release it on TIDAL
Getting fingered by Captain Hook.  
Everywhere.
You matter.
A bongoloid.
Because they're flam-able. Ba-da Bum tsss.
They found her head & shoulders in the glovebox. 
He wanted tequila.
Petrified wood.
An impasta
A nagger.
Snowballs
It sticks around for more than 1 Season, and doesn't want to go.
Yeah. It looks like me. 
A guy goes to his doctor and says, "Doc, something weird is happening to me. When I drive to work, if I'm going past a large pasture I begin to sing 'The Green Green Grass of Home' and if I happen to drive past a cat I burst into 'What's New Pussycat'!" The doctor says, "You have Tom Jones Syndrome". The guy says, "Is that a common disorder?" The doctor says, "It's Not Unusual".
Because they're having a sipping contest.
Dig a really deep hole and throw a penny in it. 
Plaqueface
Green Lantern. His least favorite? Deadpool.
They got tired of all the minotaurs.
They both love The Wall
OP delivers.
fun!
He sudo bashed someone.
He underestimated the speed of the python.
Equationally.
I got Kniiiiiives on it!  that inspired the joke.
Disoriental 
She is allergic to nuts.
The Bloody Mary
They throw silverware on the ground!
Black people can't swim.
General Average
bunny farts
Because he was "in  "ing ahahahahahahaahahaahanaha holy shit
It was a folding chair.
To eat the dead chicken on the other side.
"Lunch is on me."
Bi, son.          
One wants you to put their chocolatey nutty goodness in your mouth, and the other is a child rapist. 
One takes a roofy, the other takes a groundy.
Because they hunt whales.
She was the sweetest mistake he ever made.
Donald J. Trump State Park in Yorktown Heights, NY
Marry a net maker
He was a salted. Sexually. He was a salted sexually. . . .there's nothing funny about that.
Wasa-B! Let's roll.
A good idear...
It's Fucking Frozen!
To liquidate their bills.
That the CEO of a company does no work for 10 years and everybody hates them, but the moment they go on 'Undercover Boss' and give away a small sum of their yearly earnings to save face, the same people who hated them with a passion now love them so much. Either those employees are suck-up brown-noses or money really changed their minds that much!
You came OUT of your mom's vagina.
Christian Bale
A hole in Juan!
A Dell
They both work in gastronomy
It hasn't come out yet.
The rooster did.
The 2016 Olympics.
Farty.
SLAP!
a peasantfeeling
Because they always come up short.
12:34! 
A Flamongo.
Chicken sees a salad 
Mary Jane dumped him.
​Of course every Juan!
Hide in the living room.
Karma, Whores.
Predator missile
...he was driving his tractor down the road, and suddenly, he turned into a field.
Choco-late.
​Who can give a small donation of one million dollars?
The noble gases, because they can't form bonds
The funnel cake line at the Arkansas state fair.
He was stuck on paws.  Forgive me reddit senpai
A lip reader
You post an anti-joke
Type this in on your search bar. LOSER.COM
A bamboozler
In his sleevies
It might take a while for me to get hard, I was just laid by a chick.
He activated his  bo... LOL
attempted murder
A: Tired Bonus Follow-up Joke!  Q: What do you get when you run behind a car? A: Exhausted
Graham Cracker
A quiché
Two men are having a drink in a bar. One says: "You know, I've never really understood what a dilemma is.." "Let me tell you a story" says the other man. "Imagine you wake up in a bed with two people next to you. To your left is a incredibly beautiful woman willing to have sex with you and to your right is a very horny gay man". "So where's the dilemma ?" replies the first man. "To whom do you turn your back ?"
Here you go.
Because there's a Target on every corner
Because all the DNA matches and there are no dental records.
I'm gonna level with you.
Lesbian sex addicts. 
There can only be one goo gull
Up his sleevies.
Up his sleevies.
Because he just isn't a mourning person.
BARRY
...vegetarian. For the record, I'm Korean and have a dog haha.
Master Better
The short bus.
The truck doesn't scream when you pump gas into it.
Outlaws are wanted.
They are all running for president
A jail.
Cancer got Jobs
Decided to smoke only after sex
a TRESpasser im sorry
Because he was trying to make both ends meet.
Christopher Walken
A police officer was sitting in his car with his K9 partner in the back seat. A man walked over and asked, “Is that a dog in the back seat?” The officer said, “It sure is.” The man responded, “Wow, what did he do?”
A boy asked a girl: "Do you believe in love at first site?". The Girl replied, "No". The boy phewed and said: "We should meet again then". Ultimate Thug Life.
They both like a tight seal
Their balls are just for decoration
You're always meeting new people.
I was gonna say a joke about it but it would be too cheesy.
To the dock.
Because it comes from PEEople. 
Daughter: "Where's the olive oil?" Father: "I drank it." Daughter: "You drank an entire bottle of olive oil?" Father: Without so much as a grin, "Yes, olive it."
You always end up going off onto tangents.
It's just a picture of him.
You take it from the back. 
It was a black one.
He sai'd
It's the only way to buy a nigger legally.
In the bedroom, it doesn't take much effort to make your lover's jaw drop.
His homemade Bris-kit.
Scissors beats paper.
Bayesian.
American Psycho 3: Pleading the Fifth
Earmuff
Raw men
Because they're trans-parent
Olive it. 
A simple game of hopscotch: Me v. Yo Mama
Because he's always deep in the Bikini Bottom
Because she threw out all the bent ones.
Get cancer
Wataaaah!
To get to the other slide! 
Throw in the laundry.
He came in first   third. (Ngaio Bealum)
About eighty years
omelette
You pa- pa- poker face, pa- pa- poker face!
Because can you leave me a loan?
The   of the Beast.
It sucked.
A chiral-practor. BONUS What do you call a regular, normal, non-amputee masseuse? achiral-practor.
Euripides, Eumenides
Because the Disc was cracked
With a monkey.        
Someone from Flint puts a glass between your legs
...I don't pay 100$ to have a garbanzo bean on my face.
I just need some bread
Berrrnie Sanders  H/T: wife 
The US Presidential Campaign!
Tom ( ). Explanation: Bears are made up of atoms. Plug: 
Someone cut him off.
To get his quarter back!
ICEis
Souperb.
dead walkers
They woke him up.
Oshio des neighhhhh
"Don't stop! Be leaving!" Just a joke I thought up the other day.
Gorgonzola.
Because they can't even.
Because they wore them before it was cool.
Oral-É
"So where are you from?" "I'm a Liberian" "Oh sorry" *whispers*       
Anal fissures. 
I want you inside of me. 
Because he broke a G string while fingering a minor
When you dump your load in a washer, it doesn't follow you around for a week.
Last years hide and seek champion
Wimbledon and nicely served.
A bendy ruler.
Before the First Period.
Because he was sur  to requirements.
A slice of Pi.
Because it was beneath his station. :P
You keep hearing about them, but you never see one
Chicken Caesar Salad
Because it was wearing underwear.
Paddle Pop!
I'll column later.
A self-awarewolf.
TL;DR
A Dell
He was against separating the whites from the coloreds.
Rent.
A guacamole.
Hey there little boy, you wanna BUY some candy?
Feel around for the dough nuts
Divorce! 
Off-Putin.
Addiction
when the directions for use say take one pill twice a day
Sprint.
dx/dc
Cause his assets were frozen.
He saw the snowblower coming
Fuck if I know, I just fly the drone.
GUACK
Marco Rubio
Because he's always standing by The Edge.
He was afraid of ending up like Hillary.
Because the woodpecker.
Some guy named Robert facing the wrong direction.  (I understand this is a lame joke, but it always goes over well at parties, so you're welcome).
They both crumble under pressure
I cry when I cut up onions.
He was running on fumes.
That it could be a little bolder!
He got a fool scholarship.
Supreme Leader.
Its Racist!
Flipper coin. Again, I shall take my leave.
Buffa lo
it can neither fly
Dirty bollocks
Wurst orgy ever.
Stick his bill up his ass. 
1 to 8
They get the best blow jobs in town.
They try to stick their hand up your butt.
Sex cells!
A bulldozer
Gum. 
It's long and hard...unless you're asian.
Obese is when you can't see your own genitals, morbidly obese is when you can't see your own genitals in the mirror.
Kurt Fossil
[Removed]
Because he clearly owed the win to Miller. 
Cause you'd be mad too if someone kept pulling your hose. 
'Her' real name is Victor!
Because it was too Win+D
I am leg end.
If you're busted, run.
Because it's hard to catch a white bronco in California.
Marriage, you wanna?
The brunette, the Blonde stop it midway to ask for directions.
What did the male computer say to the female computer? He said: "Ay gurl, I'd like to put my twisted-pair cable into your RJ45 jack so I can fill you up with my sweet, sweet data frames".
To get to the other genocide.
Chicken sees-a salad
You hide daddies credit card under a bar of soap. 
With no legs.
Depends on who wrote the script.
Because he's black.
Boss: Where were you born? Santa : India. Boss: which part? Santa : What 'which part'? Whole body was born in India.
Because they drown at their own wealth Edit: I got down voted :( I thought of that in my head and just wanted to share it
You shouldn't go, I heard they don't like joggers there.
K-Cups
Where'd mofongo?
Because the definition of arthritis is inflammation of the joints
If you find a rare Pepe drawn the disk.
May I please push in your stool?
You will be mist.
the olebitchuary
He was talking on his shellphone.
Only one, but they have to turn it on and off 50 times before they're sure it's fixed.
French with benefits.
It ran out of juice. I shall take my leave now.
No Self Esteem!
Of course you don't. 
They are both soft and crumble under pressure. 
Because they never have to pay for super bowl tickets!
Illegal.
Combrade
Because when she gets to 69 she ends up with a frog in her throat.
Yo, duh.
You fed-a-genie! 
Super Bowl Babies.
Hit him in the face with an axe.
Nothing.
Nine Inch Nails
System of a Downs  My Chemical Imbalance.  Youth In Asia  
They have to eat a dessert after each meal.
Chicken sees a salad
Willem DaFriend.
To Make America Great Again
With a small million dollar loan from his father. 
Your mom can't take a joke. 
One is really heavy, and the other is a little lighter. 
It's morphine time!
Italian ISIS'
The blonde, because she's the only one who's 18.
Because I turned on airplane mode, and thought it would turn my Iphone into a plane...
Because they are in bread.
His career was in ruins.
An erection
To forget
I hope I'm okay to post a request - I'm in a hospital with my mother-in-law who continues to have small strokes as a result of her cancer. She can understand what we are saying but can only say yes and no. Most important she can laugh when she hears a good joke. This is where you can help. I need some semi-clean jokes or puns that don't involve pervy behavior or death. Scrolling through   is hit and miss so I'm hopeful you could help with a special request. 
An angry wopper. 
I heard it's pretty Hoth
He needed some time to himself to decompose. 
Being able to pay her 33% less
There are twenty of them.
How many tickles does it take to tickle an   octopus? Ten tickles.  How many tickles does it take to tickle an octopus? Ten tickles.
Someone who points out the obvious.
He's been getting the Kurds out of the whey                             (credit to Sambo85 - Sikipedia)
URINE.  I'll let myself out.
...because you can't trust something that bleeds for days and doesn't die.
Humiliation pornstars get the money they want.
About 6 million.
Hand him a tampon and ask what period it's from.
A gun.
Wendys nuts going to be in that mouth
Because freedom rings
Zinfandels!!!!!!
A fajita. 
Otherwise they'd kill all the 140 characters.
A Pig with a Flip Knife.
A    I'll see myself out now.
Because he lost his marbles.
A spaghetto.
Nothing. It's rude to talk with your mouth full.
nobody knows actually but it will be perfect for picking cotton.
They both feature a slow, old, white bronco.
Dad: Drugs, Usually
HEY!!! DO YOU WANT TO BUY A CHICKEN!?!?!?!
Cause they'll Pikachu
A crimefighter
In-ya-window
Show me your booty.
Because they always riposte.
A pool table.
A Dell.
I'd tell you more about it but there's really no porpoise...
Chicken sees-a-salad
Whorrible. 
He was pretty loafsome
they show up once a year to make me cringe with their dad jokes, and then give me a shitty gift.
Because he folds five penises and puts them into little drawers!
Cause that ass is refreshing.
Kermit's fingers 
The one with the smallest barrel. It hurts the least when the bear shoves it up your ass. 
Nothing, they both have 1 3
She was cross eyed.
They Bonded over lunch.
A Bark-aeologist
They both love stoning women.
Otter you up to?
Lack-toes intolerant 
(pause....)  WANT TO BUY A CHICKEN??!! (SHOUTING)
They heard she could handle a cockatoo.
Everywhere else. 
Be Alfredo and take out the damn trash. Just told my son this, he hates me now.
Microscope
A ripe bananna
I mean thanks guys. Driving around on flying motor cycles and letting use fossil fuels until we fuck up the planet. Thanks guys. I don't even wanna go to Hogwarts any more
Seizure salad
Because he doesn't exist.
Throwaway, for obvious reasons.
Slow Children At Play
Namaste
Might as well. Nothing dentured, nothing gained.
One terrorbyte.
He heard he would get to watch the inauguration on a plane
Bro, mine 
Disoriented.
In a dictonaerie. 
Because they hav-an-arrow!  :D
F it. 
It's 0K.
Canteloupe
a life depends on whether or not the rubber breaks
Inertia.
Because he had the upper hand
Carl Barron
Subdude
Threesome.
Fruits of labor.
A meanderthal. 
TIE tanium
11, Because it has another 1.
A: Neither have they!
What else do you cover a cunt with?
How much dick could a dik-dik lick if a dik-dik could lick dick?
He liked being artichoked.
Chicken Tinders.
I probably shouldn't spread it.
Because it is part black.
Matt. No arms and no legs in a swimming pool? Bob.
A Dell.
Their last big hit was the wall.
With a porcupine, the pricks are on the outside
2 feet.
Well, it's not 4
If you have weight limits you aren't going to see as much traffic.  
It was out standing in its field!
They had reservations.
Vesicular Basalt 
Farfrompoopin.
It's sedimentary my dear Watson!
Because there's a Target on every corner.
Tsar Wars episode III: Revenge of the scythe.
A whorse.
He kept getting pyro-technicalities.
About 6 feet.
When it stains your underwear.
Donald Trump.
logic
"The Amateurs".
Phil Ming
Thanks For The Mammaries
Hypothermia.
How much their husbands make 
The captains log
Edward Snooden.
A Rastafarian Proctologist
Bruise Lee. I'll see myself out.
"This is why we can't have ice things!"
He couldn't get hole out of his head
The Millenial Falcon.
Because I can feel my infrastructure expanding.
He's having a midlife crisis.
None, they don't change anything.
AY E! I O U edit: added Y
Because he's dead.
Ninutendo 69
The girl scouts come back from the camp.
My YouTube experience lasts longer than 10 seconds.
A lot of likes
The crew.
Your T.V.
They've both got a little Captain in them.
Shleepy!
Unfortunately we broke up. Turns out she leans both ways. 
Take the "s" out of Safe and the "f" out of way.
A sandy hook
It's no big deal unless you're not getting any.
Canadian graffiti be like,  F WORD  (sorry) 
Flint, Michigan.
There are twenty of them. ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) (づ◔v◔)づ
A shit ton.
Both cant work without chains.
Fingerprints. 
...'cuz damn. 
because it doesn't have mushroom to talk.
neapolititian
When she flops the nuts, it really hurts.
If they last more than 4 hours, you need to call a doctor.
They can only mandate.
A puppy piñata
The Star Spangled Banner! 
Because he's only a lightweight.
I didn't seem to have any problems with the first two. 
Because it was dead.
The dark knight rises 
They're not orange for fuck's sake, shouldn't it be called Lemon?
Christian Bale
Pretty gaunt
With the stock market you can only lose when you pull out.
I didn't rape Donald Trump
His goal: transcend dental medication.
The line to Starbucks.
Hawa-a-ai-i
He was on the rocks.
Notice me sin(π) !!!
So they can both watch the hockey game :D
Neither have they.
Catch you later
I don't fuck a sandwich before I eat it.
People got lit and turnt.
It was to much of a cluster-funk.
Chicken Butt...
Well, well, well...
When you left-swipe, all of your matches go up in flames.
Helllllllloooooo  (insert your mother's/wife's/sister's/grandmother's name here.)
A tycoon.
Bloody horrible I said "Put your bikini top back on"
My dad and I are going out for sushi tonight, and he has rescheduled this dinner with me several times for dumb reasons (one night was because he randomly decided to go out drinking instead). Would love to get my revenge by making sushi puns and jokes all night, but Google is failing me--I've only been able to find jokes that either make no sense, or are just not funny at all. Help! 
The lumberjack
Friend: Got any nuts? Me: Yes Friend: I'm totally jacking them
He/she barely even cuts it anymore.
A smooth criminal
Oh look! A heard of elephants.
I guess all the money really is behind her!
Because ladies go in first. 
Because it's easier to deal with just one prick
Because they don't know how to cook!
A farmer
How are you vealing?
At an Australian parliament meeting, two guys were shouting back and forth and one said: "I am a country member!" and the other said: "Oh, I remember!"
Rebel Rebel!
9gag
A couch can support a family
a semenist
Manhatin'
The plot for Wall-E
RELEASE THE RIVERRR!!!!!!!
One slip of the tongue and your in deep shit.
Ciudad
You make a seizure salad.
My Little Penis
Bernd-wagoners!
U2, they're all pro-bono.
There goes the hipster vote.
The Young and The Breast-less
A couple of weeks
Mind if I pull up a stool  ? 
A 360 No-Pope
Novak Chokeovic
Hop in.
He was taking a shot. 
A wok-through.
He wanted to see how the Mercedes bends
A pool table. 
Because the last one to have a dream got shot.
He kept on getting nailed into the boards.
With the Jackson Five
AudiO's
Because it's no big deal unless you're not getting any. 
Nobody at the ticket counter knows what "north career" means
Cus they're annoying and fucking useless
Well the restaurant Carraba-rated his story.
Eventually the Rottweiler lets go.
Never mind, its too cheesy!
It is a play on words, after all
They aren't falling for that again...
He's having a midlife crisis.
Tell the FineBros. about them
A bench can support a family
A-fric-an plumber
Sure I did. I read between the lines.
No, 25 is enough
Fine brothers
There are twenty of them.
Neither did Hellen Keller.
Wodehouse!
Fuckin' nothin'.  
They're impeckable.
J-Peg.
So did the devil.
Kick his sister in the chin.
Hormonal.
With a luigi board. Made this joke up about 10 years ago while trying to think of terrible laffy taffy jokes.
You are my MSB.
He moved to the barbery coast.
Ohmlettes
The worst joke ever. 
I'll be dragon deez nuts across ya head shortly. 
Because they all shot pilots.
because fuck u 
Blue whales
George.
Cause they gotta be nuts, right?
Because he always came in a lil behind.
11, because it has another one.
A bigot is anyone winning an argument with a liberal. 
Election posters. There they are portable, silent and easy to remove. 
When he sits down it takes too long to get back up.
An elephant.  Apologies if this is a repost - heard it yesterday and had to share.
Because Orange is the new Black.
Said my wife as she looked over my shoulder. What a nosy fucking bitch.
Upvote if you agree.﻿
Fifty Shades of Fae.
Because they can't climb high enough on the corporate ladder.
They both say the same jokes over and over again.
It went to Detroit. 
a flu Enza. Thanks a lot everyone, I looked forward to this day for a long time.
Ashe.
Shoo laces
Next to Denny's
None.  Horses are not known to use operating systems nor computers for that matter.
Boo-ah!
Male cotton plants
Hello from the other side...
Because it's too close to the gas chamber. I'll show myself out
Limbitless
He felt a little disoriented.
Cell mate.
Vagabondage.
Eeyore, he's always chasing that tail.
They are used to getting their shit packed
He grabs a pencil and tries to work it out
Nothing he just waved. Sea what I did there? Sorry sometimes I get a bit carried away, it like a tsunami of puns. Water these puns! they're horrible, I'll stop now.
He brew
Sith happens.
You don't. The police shoot you.
nice belt
I don't know, let's reflect on this.
Hopefully your girlfriend
Facebook.
He felt crumby the next day. 
Because it's made of hide
De-liver
They had to do   with all of the ovens.
A marsbar!
Jihadidas.
They're making headlines!
Where deleting history has become more important than making one. 
Steam. I'm so sorry.
Because you need to warm up before you kill a nigga.
Dad.
Redundant
He never got banned.
It's a Nguyen-win situation.
The DaVinci Abode
Better reflexes.
They both got famous for getting a black man off.
What do you call a man chasing a car? -Exhausted What do you call a man being chased by a car? -Tired
We are security guards Peter!
Getting in the habit!
A crime fighter
Because he couldn't find any tricerabottoms!
Hostages.
OVER 9000
The ultra sound guy.
Because they don't know how to use Occam's razor
Get hammered. 
Student: HOMEWORK!
Nostrildamus 
He's got his left ear, his right ear...and the final front ear.
You need dill dough.
Cancer.
Opinions! 
Alien vs Predator.
Take the parent out of the water
Their i's don't work
Student: She was my life.
Lena Dunham wrote the book about it. 
No, BB8.
Honky Tonkinese.
Spring break!
The stove. 
The Stealers.
One has a soul full of hope and the other has a hole full of soap.
45°
OB-Gyn Kenobi
[Deleted]
The magician's wand is used for cunning stunts
Only one side was game
There were too many fowls.
Ash.
The rabbi cuts them off, the priest sucks them off.
If not, it's okay - neither did the Police.
Your mom can't take a joke.
Look for Fresh Prints
dos y dos
Helmetica.
Au Schwitz!
I guess you could say they made copy and pasta.
¿Que? ¿Que? ¿Que?
Nine Inch Nails.
A doctor.
a reTardis   
I dont know, I've only seen kittens out of those two.
A thymbol
They found her head and shoulders on the beach
One is a crusty bus station, and the other is a busty crustacean. 
DJ Beazza Yes it's a stupid pun, but that's a good 50% of my humor, the other half being sarcasm.
I mean, I'm kinda worried about getting sick from it but mostly I hope this made someone's day.
"Why are we even friends?"
"A horse walks into the bar and the bartender comes over and says, 'Why the long face?'" - Not my original for sure, but always makes me smirk.
You can't zucchini bugs! A family-friendly take on the age old "jam VS jelly" joke.
Imagination.
They could never do it before it was cool
Head Ganon
Because he's too legit to shit.
Tosses them off.
The sock, he's always there in hard times.
Net fish and krill
A roamin' Catholic
A yellow license plate.
A Li-ion battery.
Black Jews have to sit at the back of the gas chamber. 
To a hoe-tell.
It was a massive coverup
wraps
Everywhere.
comes out of nowhere.
Han Solo
As he was about to swing to the next tree he said, "OK, Cheeta, hang on anywhere".
Om's Law. 
It is the sound a guitar makes after six or seven generations of inbreeding.
Several thousand yards of white fabric.
The girl in the church has hope in her soul, and the girl In the bathtub has soap in her hole. 
Joseph Gobbles.
Because the sign says no trespassing!
Reach out to me and we can beat it together.
He wouldn't turn in his essay
On one hand, you have a watch... But on the other hand, you have a watch.
Because he was in de-nile
A director's cut
They both have ornamental balls.
A conversation of energy.
Littering.
Half a dog
That's racist. White people should be able to call black people "nigga" like other black people.
Sarah Jessica Parkour 
Anal
A weapon of mast destruction.
They both get jumped by Mexicans.
Yes, I have one evely molning.
Because he didn't have enough vroom! 
It was a Thai!
Discover.
Put him on a horse I'm now going to hell with the rest of you...
The Labia menorah.
A: Stay awake and wonder if there's a dog
They knead the dough.
His throat becomes saurus.
The position of the dirtbag.
First you have a great time, but after 5 minutes you end up crying.
Optimus  .
Still nobody cares.
It's a rip off.
It was a 
All at once. 
What's the difference between a black and a white fairy tale?  White fairy tales begin, "once upon a time,"  black fairy tales begin, "y'all motherfuckas ain't gonna believe dis shit!"﻿
Miss. Management. 
Only one can get stumped...
They both won’t be investigated very closely.
They both look incredibly cute when they are little.  They both grow up and go into the transportation business. Note: sikhs - or sardarji as they are commonly known in india - are the largest ethnic group in the truck driver profession.  Punjabi food is available on highways across the country.
You don't pay her. (My mom is sick. Hilarious. But sick. )
The amount of lead put into black people. (It was funnier over the radio)
Even
Holy
Pancreatic cancer.
Because it was carbon bonded to the chicken.
Carlos.
You get your palm red for free
Diner at the sushi restaurant: "What kind of eel is this?" Waiter: "Do you love it?" Diner: "yeah" Waiter: "Then, that's a moray" 
White vans.
Prose before Hose
Flip it over.
A subwoofer.
Purrth.
Only one... if no one is looking!
It said Focus.
You know they're doing it, you just can't catch them at it.
"Fe" male
A Mars-mallow
Wight Power!
Because they were using a Berner Phone.
Slim Shady 
Culture
Teacher: "Kids, what does the chicken give you?" Student: "Meat!" Teacher: "Very good! Now what does the pig give you?" Student: "Bacon!" Teacher: "Great! And what does the fat cow give you?" Student: "Homework!"
POLLENtics
So you know what cunts yours.   I have to get a ratio of woman to man down/up votes for this haha..
Tell that to my friend who stood still smiling when a thief asked him for all his money
Tartarus
When it involves energy, because energy had no mass.
The bag.
They have such similar interests
Because you might get Sikh
Visit a campground.
Wo 
Heart replied "because you slept in the afternoon, don't act like you're in love"
Because nothing makes the British shit quicker than the sight of George Washington
Hung Lo
Come on guys. Daytona 500 or Indianapolis 500?
Because he left his son.
A Ninutendo
Three Men-A-Night
A snowbank 
"Close that damn door! Can't you see I'm dressing??"
To say hello from the other side. 
denim denim denim
In the first, you must drink a lot of liquids before battle, but in the latter, you only pretend.
Iran
She swallowed the yellow prick's load.
He kept singing, "your ho, your ho, a pirate's wife for me"
Because he felt grizzly after months of unbearable pain.
Bro, do you even function?
Because they're always in the lead. 
A nigger.
Trans-Fender.
One connects to all of your devices and accesses the data, the other is a hardware standard.
Because they are easier to see in the dark.
Nobody knows, they haven't found him yet.
He was outstanding in his field
The U.N
To buy chikken tikka masala!
His Whore-Monica
It'd be a ruined joke.
Because they cantaloupe.
Apparently it's a cross between Idiocracy and Mad Max....it's called Bogan's Run...
Man .
Because Demeter stopped working.
This joke
A Hamburghini.
Jockey straps.
Its Maine Coon.
The airport is Snowden
The ability to tell a person to go to hell in such a way that they look forward to the trip.
Irelephant 
Jellyfish
For his reptile dysfunction. 
A pick-axe
Finding 1 dead Baby in 100 trash bins.
Nobody likes the black ones.
Bromide
Because they had a bad experience with oranges.
Chronic-logically. 
Nothing, they just waved.
Because all they can do is bone. 
It goes back  !
ence
Because all the fans left
The first name they came up with reminded them too much of olive oil.
By doing Squats.
Paints the town red
About 9 month.
Because proper tea is theft.
Kawasakey
OM MY GOD HOW DARE YOU REFER TO ME AS A PERSON!!!!! ILL HAVE YOU KNOW I AM HALV WOLF AND THREE TWENTY SEVENTIES PIXE AND HOW DARE YOU SAY GAYS AND TRANS SHOULDNT HAVE RIGHTS  YOU STUPID WHITE CIS MALE
Comoniwanna. 
Her husband's salary.
Because air is free.
Bliss!
A Dell ( probably a repost, I laughed tho)
1 dead baby in 10 dumpsters
They both were recently ironed.
He was Snowden.
The G
You keep hearing about em but you never see em
Please don't go off on a tangent.
An Asian porn star
Gotcha!
A bipolar bear.
Netflix and chill.
36
They need space.
Because everyone has a little bit of good in them.
L-mayo
My dick. 
It's an udder disappointment.
PUNCH!
Because of the towel ban
Aussie Aus-born.
They all had blood on their hands.  Credit of the joke goes to James of FunHaus
I mean, is it a door or is it a jar?
A bipolar bear.
Because they're Snowden (snowed-in). To all the folks on the East coast, stay safe and warm.
They just didn't click together anymore.
A hipobottomless
The black man because the Pakistani was a shade lighter.
An impasta
Oedipus
Platform Flip flops !
clearly, you wouldn't know...
Only occasionally does something retarded come out of her vagina.
Parachute
Q: Why did the recruiter hire a Spider ? A: Because he wanted to hire a Strong "Web Developer".
Not bad actually, he got high 'C's.
I don't know. He still hasn't opened his gifts.
Mitosis.
Because he can't even.
Because they need a man to do it for them
He gives it an F5
He keeps getting pinned to the boards.
In inches. Snakes don't have any feet.
Shock-top
It didn't peso well.
Cuz I'm about to tape my dick to your forehead so you can CDs nuts
Everything
A mooooope
King Author
A sandy hook survivor.
Apparently its call The Hateful Ate.
No one... its Nguyen Nguyen!
paedophiles
A pound of rubles is worth one dollar. 
A Tomartyr
Because if they had four doors they'd be called chicken sedans.
it's going to be the longest flight ever
You cum on her feet and let the flies do the rest.
InterSTELLLLLLLAAAAAAAR
Urethra Franklin.
Crucified.
It had run out of lettuce
I guess you've never had to roll it down that far
An Amish drive-by shooting.
you don't you go and grab him
It's not hard.
Praying. Now what do you call it when God talks to you? Schizophrenia, it's called schizophrenia.
What do you do when you see your TV hover around the place at night?    You yell put it down n*gger.   What do you do when you see your fridge hover around the place at night?   You dont do anything, thats a big ass n*gger.
[Removed]
E V E R Y W H E R E
Because the pilot was a loaf of bread!  Now he's toast
So it wouldn't explode when he fucked it.
He was afraid of Chemo-sabe.
A: fo drizzle  b: fo shizzle  C: fo nizzle  D: fo bizzle﻿
Changing your ringtone
Alive.
9/11
A Doctor you racist!
A Bi-noceros
They were Holo-costly
Astrology, cosmetology, and a pumpkin space latte
Hey,  !
Be a Viktor, then you are Devinitely In
Arr-PG's
A woman.
Sun of a beach
Never, under no circumcises!
One's a marsupial, the other's a Geordie stuck in a lift
Skip
European!
[removed]
Police police police police police police.
Come quietly and nobody gets hurt.
Put both of them in the trunk of your car...drive around...open the trunk and see who is happy to see you.
Depends how hard you throw them 
Nothing.
A man named Bob running down a train track (only Asians will understand)
Pringlés
El trapo.
A fire truck is red and has four wheels while this post is a complete fucking waste of your time. 
Dead people had lives. 
because it's a 
They can't handle anything that hasn't been consumed and regurgitated. 
An amateur teen ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) 
Because the sky is 
Only a Sith deals in absolutes
They both hire adults that look like teenagers. 
Where is his oscar nomination?
The chicken knows on whose eggs sitting .
A washing machine won't follow you around after you dump your load in it.
The training.
or did they planet
During that's when he's plugged into the know it all.
A Brazilian.
Austronomers
To see how the UDDER side lives! (Thought of it while washing the dishes, hope you all get a kick out of it.)
Bruce Boner.
A helter-skelter Hitler shelter.
Bindere Dundat
Gwyneth Paltrow's head.
Because his spurs will get stuck up his asshole! 
"I was as"salt"ed"
The wrinkles.
Or does amy schumer look like sarah silvermann sounds?
Because then the people would demand a professional football team
Italian ISIS
Because you sure are good at triggering people
They were still monkeys
High-low Ren.
20 Watts
They call it crack cocaine.
...a hamburger. 
Because he's two radical.
Address.
Abortion
Because it couldn't be parsed.
He was mini cooped up for to long.
Dam good question.
To get to the same side.
They're insects. I'll show myself out.
A: The letter "m."
I don't know, I don't have 2020 vision.
Because there's a good chance that you'll get hearing aids!
It's nature's way of telling us to lock them indoors
A Homesick Abortion.
Just call 911 tell them you commited a crime and your location and you will have a free ride!
Because I slam.
Whenever they get a corner they set up a convenience store
Gnome alone.
You can only fit one dick inside a condom.
A depresso
An ass hole
Pacific rim
Narcolepsy
They are constantly putting millions of pounds of crap on it.
The devil has standards.
I can't believe this.  What did he tell his atheist friend? You won't believe this.
A subwoofer.
They wanted to be Soba... I heard that a few days ago and wanted to share it.
Oh don't mind him, he's just the product of our times!
Teacher: Why is your paper blank? Student: Sometimes silence is the best answer ! :D :D
He's billed as Alan Rickgamortis edit: Dievid Bowie does the music (read it like he would say it)
Dragon Lips.
Because you never know how many inches you'll get or how long it will last..
... the holocaust.
I don't care. You pick
A leper's clit 
A criminal mastermind ...
Philippe Philoppe
I got really Stalloned the other night.
One's Cupid stunts...
The NoDinar
A DaVincheese curl
With relish
A Pokémon
They both made Americans despise great whites!
She thought he could come in handy. (I'll let myself out)
A Bowl (B-Owl)
edit: i forgot to say please.
Because they don't like Dick's. 
The dick up your ass
Boy scouts come back from their camp.
I can't ROM my dick in your arse
Hilary Clinton is running for president.
Hotdogs taste like shit 
I can't jelly my dick down your throat. 
At the army surplice store.
He pasta way
Nine inch nails
Nothing.
<in a Dutch accent> Not much Gouda
St. Patrick's day everybody wants to be Irish.
He said "now I have to cleanse my germy knee"
Because of their cold black hearts.
A bird-watcher.
888 MSG
It's capital has been Dublin for a long time.
1forest1
Nothing...because she was in the kitchen where she belongs.
Because her coach was always a pumpkin.
I dont have a Lambo in my Garage...
Puns
There was de-brie everywhere.
I'm sure the title will be enough to do it.
Because the last black man to have a dream got shot.
I get that Kayle is an extremely simple champion mechanically but she's not completely braindead. I always seem to have a lot of death's on kayle but it's not like I feel I am going in too hard. I don't really know how to play team fights as her or how to play lane. I just don't really "get her" even though I really like her.  EDIT: The joke is that it's the wrong subreddit.
Cuz we killed the only one with a dream!!! (I'm very sorry, he was a great man whose death should be treated with respect) Happy MLK Day!
"I got a filling, woo-hoo!"
Let's save humanity.
They're dropping like Freys!
Make way, children. 
A Brick.
"Can't say I have." "That's because it hasn't came out yet."
Because they are always losing  pounds.
Ze Anne Frank, But its so Hard to find
Nothing! You can't use it anywhere!
His dick is covered in blood.
They're dark comedies.
I heard it on the radio where all involved laughed and I've since found it on the internet but I'm still none the wiser? Here goes: Man goes in to a hardware store and asks the owner for a tin of blue paint. The owner replies  I'm very sorry I only have red paint. The man says that's fine I have my bike outside. Am I a bit thick or is this a shit joke??  All I can deduce is he's saying he can go elsewhere or the hardware store owner can borrow his bike to get the paint.
Acne waits until a boy is 13 to come on his face. 
Manuel.
Because he was too far out man.
Because of the Endor-fans.
Very little. 
Because they weren't good at Chopin.
Eclipse it.
Go pee on a pregnancy test just for some good news.
Kilt
He wanted to feed his nightmares. 
because it was pharmacy.
Me: bro, you were there.
Saladdin.
His CAWk.
Kenya West
No, I said it was Breezy.
He was always full of shit
Ninety-nine dollars plus tips.
Terrible at CC
You have to cut her fingers off so she can't tell anyone!
Im hard
They both get loaded from the rear and go whoo-whoo!
In Flint Michigan you can get gasoline that is unleaded.
A twatstika. 
Because it was invented by a black person!
He wanted to get a long little doggy
because those who take them never bring them back.
You'd think it's for the booty, but they really read it for the arrrticles.
2 in the front, 3 in the back, and 20 in the ashtray
He got the sack.
Because they didn't Lajka.
A minor
Cruz control.
He was too far out man!!
They both travel around Uranus looking for Klingons.
None, because they keep on asking why all of the other light bulbs in the house aren't being changed at the same time.
It ain't hard.
A Robin Williams.
I hear he blew his house.
They count sheeple.
Because when they hear "Hoe Down" they think their sister got shot. 
A self-raising flower.  I'm so sorry.
Because MaHamHid
You don't talk about them, you have them.
Cancer.
Put it backwards and it spells racecar, put it sideways and it kills Paul Walker. 
Because if they had 4 doors, it'd be considered a chicken sedan!
A Turnip.
'Cause you are long and sweet.
Pho queue
Because he had a hard drive!
I didn't know disasters can run for office
It ain't hard
He was too far out man
Bi Polar
My life (  ._.)
None. They already glow. 
Spelling classes!
To boost his link karma!
The train to Auschwitz. Some German guy i used to play Path of Exile with told it to me.
None. They're too afraid of the electricity.
Garbage gets picked up.
In Bhuddapest
You pay them and get fucked
He's on route.
How high you tie it on a tree.
Cause Ken cums in another box...
Women
One. He stands in place while the whole world revolves around him. 
Depresso 
They were in ca .
I'm going to crumb! ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
X-Men.
Cliffsides (because it's so steep).
Burkina Fatso
They peng-win
Cause it's what's on the inside that counts! EDIT: it was a joke guys:(
Three lines 
Pappu: As old as I am.  Master: How is it possible?  Pappu: He became father only after I was born.
It's making all the headlines. 
Student: Because of the sign on the road. Teacher: What type of sign? Student: The sign that says, “School Ahead, Go Slow.”
He might give away spoilers!
They are just trying to raise a family in peace. 
If you leave yoghurt alone for 2000 years it'll develop a culture.
Icy Dead People
He was born ina 1818.
Twilight Gap
A pilot you racist asshole
Thanks Verstappen.
Ka-Mayomayo
Snotzies 
halloumi
A Ford Exploder.
One less drunk.
Ones for coming and ones for going. 
It's a nightmare.
Car pole tunnel syndrome
Sex offender.
She comes with all of Ken's stuff.
They found her Head & Shoulders in the glove compartment.
Once removed.
Ultraviolent
A prostidude!
Because the Knights are shorter then.
He gems out his dip cup
Student: Mouthwash. Teacher: Get out.
Because they cantelope!
Americans put it everywhere!
It's a fugazi. 
Well.... You cut a hole in the ice, lay fish all around it, run behind the tree and wait... polar bear comes up and eats the fish... then, you run up and kick him in the ICEHOLE!!!! HAHAHAHAHA
A conductor.
Virgin Mobile
They were two lecturers.
A Fascist
DJ Nocide.
A man walks in to his local butchers and asks, "What happened to your assistant? He was a lovely, young boy" "Oh, I had to fire him" replied the butcher, "He kept putting his dick in the bacon slicer" "Really?! What happened to the bacon slicer?" "Oh... I fired her too."
It's just not their Kappa tea
Dessert.  Buh Dum  CHHHHHHH
69 cents.
Nunn.
Because it doesn't have to stop off to change color!
Goquan
Hebrews it
He missed everything!
White Power Ranger!
His own ass.
They realized with a family like theirs, they really Cantaloupe.
When it shows no vital sines
Depends where you put the cucumber 
He'd be scratching at the lid of his coffin yelling, "Let me out! I'm alive! Let me out!!"
An African or European swallow
He's not much to look at, but he's a great listener.
"STOP RESISTING!!!"
A kidager
Do I have to ask them to resend the authentication email, update my address or do I have to go to my local white privilege depot to request the trial edition of white privilege before I get the real thing?
The theater was too Darth.
Need to know ASAP.
A Pencil cause he's full of lead!
His carrion bag.
A: Hold my purse.
Pati 'O' Furniture
Those trees are scared!
He woke up!
Gets jalapeño business
God doesn't think he's Donald Trump!
Neither Alan Rickman nor David Bowie
Gaseous Clay
Mmm... Sam, Bilbo and Frodo.
A milkshake.
Rabies!
Traditional gender rolls.
Is molestation rape foreplay? Is it rude to molest someone and then not rape them? Woman: I didn't let him rape me because he did not molest me first. I'm not that type of girl.
Because they can't tell afib
Ground and federal expresso
Hare loss. 
Yeah - but it wasn't much of a suit. It was actually a brief case. 
Mathematicians don't struggle with integration.
a dirt bike
Cut Alaska in two and make Texas the third largest state!
He was a miner. 
A cherry float.
It was covered in smagma.
Kick Princess Leia in the jaw.
Everything. Most people just don't realize it though.
...................................................,....................................................BECAUSE THE PILOT WAS A LOAF OF BREAD!
Just swallow.
An undercover cop!
a computer.
Ve have vays of making you tock...
So she could say Hello from the outside.
Gutterskype.
Nun!
The pizza can feed a family of four.
Basset Houndini
A Five-seven.
Yassir Yabetcha
He lost his sense of humerus.
RickRosstrich.
He came out of nowhere!
Wok n' Roll
So she could say "hello from the udder side"
HE drank coffee before it was cool,  man
Because Anakin was ... unarmed.
Because Intermediate value theorem
It kills 99.9% of Germs.
Oak wood.
Merci.
A nail gun.
Cologne.
My ass.
Mack-a-Dameon.
When they transfer you to steve.
That's right. 10.
I was just nuts over her
20-30 years in prison
Because no Juan will vote for him.
Because they're ugly and they smell bad.
That you call them and in 10minutes you have them h...
It becomes very tense.
He spends all of his time on the dashboard.
because they hate french press
It's a perfect 5/7.
It was fucking nuts. 
A caw-cawphony
An envelope!
They are all too Big To Fail.
You don't have to pay for a vibrator. 
They ctrl+alt+delete the history thru don't want anyone to find 
How do you get a baby in a bowl?  With a mixer.  How do you get it out?  "With nachos.
How bout I fuck you in the ass, how'd you like them apples!
Because i can see Uranus through my binoculars at night.
Uta Hagen daz.
One US Leader
Nurse: Doctor, the patient's life support is acting strange.  . . Doctor: Have you tried turning it off and on again? 
The ICU (I-see-you!)
Hi ho, hi ho, it's off to work we go
Hypertrophy!
Women's rights!
Neckrophilia 
A skywalker. (I'm really sorry)
Mordin Volus 
A little Juan
I had a bagel.
Because his dick was stuck in the chicken.
Because the American people could never make it through the erection without raughing. 
Nothing, he just keeps the tips.
M'Laysia
The raindeer.
African American Horror Story
A Grrrrrrrrrrrnade!
WATAAAAAAAAAAA!
Se-cant.
Siri: 
cos sin
Adolfin. 
Its because they're both pussies!!
Use some antioxidants 
Child Obesity.
Cuz it's a running nose
"Get a womb, you two."
PedoPHILE
Disappointment™
"Mad Cow Disease" was taken.
A baby.
she got Holm schooled              [  told me to go here >.>]
The feet
Tenplates
Its called "The Coma Sutra". 
They always stick to the speed limit in front of schools.
At least you can see the asshole in front of you when you're eating pussy.
Because women are right.
A David Blowie.
They both ride bikes and are on a mission.
Carry the Juan
Porn sometimes features good music. R.I.P
Hijab
They both like a tight seal!
Because it teaches them to shoot, run and steal.
Tell them to clap until daddy gets home
to cover up their long black hair
One is used to kill brats, the other makes brats.
the black dress
Disarmed. 
When it comes to the police car, all the pricks are on the inside!
What POC means.
They both want to get there before the hare does.
Blow.
Single.
A slug
An Autipsy. 
There's 20 of them...
To put the bones on the other side.
Because he was a Jew.
Eh... It's tso-tso.
Because they love nitpicking. 
Rib it...duh!
Because BB-8
Because they're port workers.
World history already exists
They tell you.
Because it was a cloud
Because it was too much Hassel
Because 7 8 9.
Because it's either Sunni or Shi'ite
A Jewish submarine.
A paramedics. 
Cause if you do, please tellus
Because they sing "hymns" not "hers"
Nevermind, it's my wurst joke
Apparently you first have to remove your daughter.
punfire.
By occident
You pullet.
One has hope in her soul, The other has soap in her hole.
Fe, because it's so ironic
Because he doesn't fucking exist.
When he takes out the trash
Because he should not be FUCKING RAAWWW!!
Because it is the year of the monkey.
He hosted a Democratic Party.
Because the grass tickles their balls when they run.
Because in charge of distribution, Yoda was.
Man: "Hi there, would you like to play barbies?" Lady: "I guess so?" Man: "Awesome, I'll be Ken and you can be the box I come in."
He was in de-Nile.
Fitting in…
They never get old…
When you find your dads wedding ring in your sister…
Cross-country
Because he shows up the fastest.
Due to unforseen circumstances 
Turns out one of Jackie Chan's Relatives is directing it. His Uncle, I believe.     He's calling it "ONE   THING!"
A steak out.
 it's because of some cannibalism story going around.
Stephen Hawking in a house fire. 
Because they had a point
Bubble gum. 
+4407
Get off me daddy, you're crushing my smokes
Dead.
Hey, the person you're talking to said to give me a few bucks.
Not you!
I'm taking her to pound town
John WOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
my cock.
Jus
Aliens abduct a fisherman 
My zipper
stevie wonder answering the iron
The lottery.  It's over $800 million folks! Dragged this joke back for the occasion. 
A toddler can count past two...
A: a cucumber
It grew square roots.
Carlos
Jose and Hose B
He didn't want to be plotted against.
Because it's a Dell.
They're trying to make America grate again
Were You Home Schooled?
On second thought, there's no doubt in my mind.
Kid asks, "Where are your buccaneers?" Pirate replies, "They're under my Buccan Hat!"
He swings both ways.
More often than not, they were called "peasants" 
He's all right now. 
The expression on their face when they're getting nailed.
A waist of time.
Because he Kant drive Immanuel.
The long long farm.
Kool aids
One bear
I've never heard of it
Embuzzlement! You're damn right
Agave Maria
American teenage girls get stoned BEFORE they have sex.
Because he could nazi anything
Rapefruit
miracle whip 
Nah, I must stay.
SMASHING!
In the mainstream
As Mandy Moore times as I want to. 
A lot of bang for your buck.
Because they couldn't find 3 wise men and a virgin.
Chapped lips
No? That's because it hasn't come out yet.
Because he was a little chile 
Because he did not want to be part of a pyramid scheme
Because they're not Z's!
You put them in prism
Now there are four! Solid, liquid, gas, and black lives.
His bean-stock went up.
Some old stuff just got dug up 
She'd ............................ get it
Crossfit.
Cha Ching
Before he went off on a tangent, he hanged himself with a hypote-noose.
Crimson Tide
The five states of matter are now as follows: gas, liquid, solid, plasma, black lives.
GEORGE ZIMMERMAN 
Boo-bees!
Because he's a calcul-hater.
Because deep down they're really nice people.
Michael J Fox
Oscillate its tit a lot.
Because Freedom Rings!
Tyrannosaurus Wrecks
I kneaded the dough.
No? Then come over here. (Yeah, I know. The punchline just isn't right yet.)
a Mushroom
The middle yeast
udini
Because his career is in ruins.
It has terrible characters, Noah is the only one with an arc.
He gets stumped.
Limp Biscuit.
One is a crusty bus station, the other is a busty crustacean!
Germany/Brazil/2016
One is getting erect, and the other is getting e-wrecked.
I dunno I just fly the drone.....
bruce jenner
Fruity punch
Shuriken
Ayeee-Matey
It didn't have a stable relationship.
Because it runs in your genes!
Dubai fours
Soba noodles!
DD-WRT
A fridge with a denim jacket on.
The Grand I-slam
Beep repaired...
Sexy children. 
Never faget.
When Eight ate eight
PENNAY!
El Chapo
No, BB-8.
A: His brother running with the V.C.R
Because they're over cum with joy.
He threw out all the computers with "dy" on them.
Señor Manager 
Because he always uses the force.
They're real cute when they are young but at a certain age they start getting scary.
He doesn't he just talks about how great it use to be 
ctrl + C
9 months
...telling your dad you're gay
A slightsabre
She opens the car door.
He had a stroke.
He is all right now.
El Niño 
Every time I fuck your girlfriend, she gives me a cookie
Well...apparently more than four.
Fish.
It only takes 1 nail to hang the picture of Jesus Christ
A: You could eat a bowling ball if you had to. 
An inside job.
Because it has a lattitude problem.
A civil serpent.
A Honda quaalude. (Credit to my girlfriend)
Salt Lick City
...Oh don't worry , they'll tell you
A pickpocket snatches watches.
How do you embarrass an archaeologist? Give him a used tampon and ask him which period it came from.
Japotle.
100% of people can go fuck themselves. Told to me by a cab driver in New Orleans.
You just stand in a corner, they are usually around 90 degrees.
Because it was A Dell
Hundreds and thousands were lost
Terra-fied.
Original Content
"You wanna stop in and suck down a couple of cold ones?"
Because they have no i's (plural of i).  Edit: eyes. Eyes guys. It's a bad pun. 
The boron.
A high phive! I'll see myself out now.
Shit's intense.
Scüber!
Konnichihuahua
He was shellfish.
They're always looking for some sort of change!
Re-fried beans!
He was an Ursa Major
Cos they're trident tested. #noapologies
He called I New Deli.
One. We are efficient and don't like humour.
Both were caught with their finger in the dyke.
Shell expectation
No, but april may. ~~ sorry, I just love bad jokes~~
AIDS
Mary. Lied about her extramarital affair, still believed by billions.
Frito Leah's
The sock under my bed.
deez nuts
Kick his sister in the jaw 
X-Men
No? Well that's because it never came out 
They can both smell it, but can't eat it..
NEEEEEEEEOOOOOOWWWWWWW
A 100$ bill 
Because criminals keep turning themselves into the police.
When you open it you hear whhhy do iiii have to get a job.  (Whiney voice)   also I stole this joke!!!!  If he shows up and claims it that's fine but I won't credit it to him cause you know racist.
Your job still sucks 
The A-Men
"You shall not gas!"
Vanilla Isis.
He was diagnosed with shrecktal cancer.
In his Baracks 
Because they're shellfish
A cockadockapoo.
Why don't you google it?
No, but it does when you launder it!  
Humburgers! 
Meowzel tov
A: When he got the momentum, he couldn't find the position, and when he found the position, he couldn't muster up the momentum.  
For the watch . 
He Kermitted suicide
She has to chew.
Martini
If you answered "Ranch", you are mistaken...it was a trick question. Cowboys don't eat salad.
A sans sheriff!
I couldnt find the spanish section of reddit
Because they have the biggest cow center.
2 calves, an ass, a beaver, a camel toe, a bunch of hares and a fish no one can find.
Have you ever seen the trail a snail leaves?
Comet.
Urea!
He's never met a woman he hasn't knocked out.
They handsome money to the cashier
A screwdriver
Every time they start to count, they fall asleep. 
The ninja replies with "Wata!"
A zune
A chef doesn't stir yesterday's food.
Ever open a grilled cheese sandwich?
Sprint 
Sweet Nothings.
I expect to Potter-own 'em.
A stitchadicktomy
Because the grass tickles their balls.
Because if so she would be a Ma Seuss.
One is relevant and can get you a job. The other you went to university for. 
Get a child and then perform sex-altering surgery.  Then you become a transparent.
Because it's two gross.  source: someone told me this joke, it's not my joke.
Names. Because they used to laugh and call him Names. Credit to my dad.
Dr. Dre
"Breaking Bad"
"Make me one with everything."
The screen stays black when you check the time. 
Steph curry
No? Them neither
Oh shit, this isn't Google.
Ho ho ho
Sneakers. Huehuehue.
If I get bored I can't watch porn and coat. 
Their scared they'll say something nigative 
They prefer a cat-alogue.
Juan
Ice melt it.
'Eclipse it.
Not because he was in to bestiality, you Islamophobe. He was at the petting zoo for his wife's 9th birthday.
A condescending con descending
No, BB-8.
When Jesus went up for the cross.
Sock-a-gawea.
400 Million Dollars.
Flemmy
A pool table.
A widow.
How do we find the egg in all this shit?
One slip of the tongue and you're in for some shit.  (It is probably a re-post but I'm sure I've heard it IRL, besides what isn't a Re-post these days anyway?)
"You are now Manuelly breathing."
It holocausts one. 
They should've gone with the Hurricanes. 
The wheelchair
All their windows fell out
No, but they paws.
We gon be all white
Having tulips on your organ!
Wanna go ride a bike?
Doctor.
Because then it would be a foot..
So they don't whistle on the way down! (Ba-dum tish)
When it's only a galaxy
It scares the shit out the dogs.
BanDDoS
The 100-meter daesh. Q: What's Isis' favorite punctuation mark? A: The em-daesh. Q: How much cinnamon does the Isis recipe for gingersnaps call for? A: Just a daesh.
Uniball
A 
He forgot 2pac his bullet proof vest
They are both green and get smoked in bowls!
To the water, it is time!  Or in french...  ... BWA HA HA HA.  OK... I know this is kind a dad joke but.... yeah (for those don't speak French and thus don't get this, click the link and click the speaker to have it read to you ;) )
Dachau
Oedipus.
Two pirates
Neighbor
Top Gear,                    
What are you going to spend forty dollars on, I mean really why do you need thirty dollars?
Spaghetto
Said Cartman.
Because you're making my penis levitate. 
So you can tell them apart from blueberries!
A rooster says "cock-a-doodle-do" and a Hooker says "any cock will do."
He's all right now. 
Not having to listen to awful dad jokes.
A New Years RESOLUTION
Hey, hey, hey,  it was only a pudding pop!
The power of missed-erection.
There is none. All of us hope that the next version will be more stable.
26
DO YOU WANT TO BUY A FROG?  rip. 
One of them is purple 
Viagra
You check its logbook
Beetruet
Mein Kraft
I DON'T KNOW I DON'T HAVE 4 YEAR VISION!!!!!!!!!!
That'd be a shitty way to die.
Natalie Wood.
Yes.
Because they find it insaltine. 
A building in Dubai.
They both always seem to end up in your clothes
A Cameron Diaz
A cold-dog
Put him in a concentration camp. 
It chips.
A farmer is lying in bed with his wife when he turns to her grabs her tits and says "Honey if you could get milk out of these we could sell the cow". Then he grabs her pussy and says "Honey if you could get eggs out of here we could sell the chickens". She turns to him smiles,grabs his dick and says "Honey if you could get this up I could get rid of your brother"
A: It depends how hard you throw them.
Facul-tea
Because Jewish women won't touch anything that isn't 10% off
Pregnant
He likes it dirty.
Because if they fell forward, they'd still be in the boat.
The rotation of the earth
'cause they're ugly and they stink.
Do you want to come to my kryptonite?
New Ears Eve
They all have chinks in their armor.
Cock-A-Doodle-Doo
Yeah the lyrics are really spelt: Cum together  Right now  Over me
The liver
so she could moan with the left
It goes something like if an infinite number of Redditors typed away on keyboards, one of them will eventually type a complete day of work.
He kept trying to tune her G string.
Bill Cosby
Because every time he did, he'd catch a whopper.
They just work it out with a pencil!
Foreskin divers
Anything by Judas Priest and Nine Inch Nails.
Your mom can't take a joke.
Because Americans use imperial unit system.
You've gotta hand it to her
But how can it have a resolution?
I haven't seem any all year! (It's 12:00 NZST)
Anal deva-station
Some people say "nothing", but my stock portfolio's looking promising.
Deaf. Because the blind community can't see each other often.
About 568 horses.
Singapore.
The drone.
Because their head's close to their butt.
The mafia doesn't like witnesses.
He was gelded.
He's now a seasoned veteran.
A drunk drives right through a stop sign, a stoner waits for it to turn green.
Women Say the Darndest Things
They barium.
Amino acid!
M'nigga
Swing!
All of them.
... lol lol lol lol ...
The slide into poverty.
I don't fuck a sandwich before I eat it.
One is a Tale of Two Cities...
Because they don't do shit.
Heracles beat Cancer
Denim Denim Denim......
The DOWNS truck is a little slow.
"Marriage.. you wanna?"
Addictionary
Trap Queen
You can get a prosecutor to indict the ham sandwich.
JabbaScript
A Brazilian
Dr. Dre
Fruit can't talk
Alge-Bras!!
I'm riding solo, I'm riding solo, I'm riding solo solo
Ever tried swatting a fly with a TV?
An alie-kin
A small medium at large.
A car thief who can't drive
Everywhere
They have double barrels. Probably a repeat, but my brother in law hadn't heard it so I figured I would post it.
A Narc.
John Wayne stopped killing Indians 
He lay awake at night, wondering if there is a dog. 
You never forget
I'd tell it to you but it's a bit insensitive to tell jokes about youth in Asia.
Killed.
Because it's a gas planet.
The emancipator-procreator.
Food.
Reuse.
They don't want to be left hanging 
To find inner peas!
Ana-kin
It was his privilege.
He was getting straight D's
Because it's a contact sport.
Because then they'd be two tired
Telepathetic.
Deez Nutz
Guacamelee
A cemetery
Pass it on - or, rather, don't.
Kick their daughter in the jaw.
Brody Jenner, Bruce's / Caitlyn's son First joke posted. 
Paraboly 
Because two Wongs can't make a white.
They're hoping for meatier showers
unaPEELING
squid
Your mom cant take a joke.
Jose and Hose B
Because after you eat one, you want samoa!
Photosynthesis!
Winning the jackpot in two separate lotteries at the same time.
Consecutive normal punches
With the hedgehog the pricks can be seen on the outside and with a Jeep the prick can be seen on the inside.
Because freedom rings.
Tickled.
Because they were mated.
He heard little boys pants were 50% off...
It was a huge drug bust
Guy: Hey girl did you get those pants on sale? Girl: No why. Do they look bad? Guy: No cause they'd be 100% off at my place.
You can tuna piano, but you cant piano tuna!
Burn a question mark on their front lawn.
one is a Crusty bus station, and the other is a Busty Crustacean!
Oil of Oy Vey. 
Because i put on the wrong socks.
Michael Chewbacca EDIT: Some people don't get the joke..... Michael schumacher is a F1 race car driving legend. 
You can't hotel your dick into someone's ass.
Boo-kakke.
Mad props...
Because there's no plate like chrome for the hollandaise. 
They're fun guys!
LAND HO!
Granny are you okay,I said granny are you okay,are you okay granny?!
None really. You can add as much butter as you want, kids just won't enjoy them.
Cuz you know something's about to go down. Im sorry
Duke Nukem.
..to find himself.
A punchline.
It hurts, but olive.
They call it Dante's Alfredo!
Nah Imma stay
On the side of his head.
If you see sap buckets on telephone poles. 
My ass 
A kweer.
A pedal physician in the fetal position.
because they are baked.
It's called Skinder
A Thesaurus.
How do you kill a clown? DING DONG. Someone got the joke.
He knew that some of them wouldn't miss the blind ...
A four-chin teller.
: "Why ya going to the airport? Flying Somewhere?" : "How'd you guess?" : "Well, I saw your luggage, then when I saw the airplane ticket I put two and two together. So where you headed?" : "Aspen." : "Mmm, California.. Beautiful."  
They both lie about their emissions.
He kneaded a poo
"See you next month."
Kick his sister in the jaw.
Def Leppard
Piece of cake. 
You get your wife back. Your house back. Your truck back. Your dog back...
... 2 bad.
They found traces of Mercury in him.
The food's ok, but it has no atmosphere. 
Because open balls are in his neighborhood
Finding a vein in a hot dog.
because it is white and on their land
Philippe Philoppe.
Gladiator.
Because its two tyred
They're both fucking close to water.
11, because it has another one
Green night
I guess you have never had to roll it back that far.
No, there's naan left. 
Vegetarians.  Source: I'm Chinese.
Those who practice them don't want any beef with people.
Why is Santa so jolly? Because he knows where all the naughty girls live. Happy Holidays Fun!
A blow up doll
A psychopath.
I could tell by your poor style.
Clean Teathstwood.
Because of all the seaweed!
An abortion doctor.
Shoot him in June.
Very satisfying.
There was no punch-line. 
Leonardo DiCabrio
Great Food! No atmosphere.
By walking. JK. Rowling.
A brown recluse.
They think that everything Israel.
Sublime.
He is Homoless
One does not simply fly in Turkish airspace without Erdogan's permission.
because there's no chaaaannggggeeeee
Cause he knows where all the bad girls live.
A: Because he could explain the Bush administration's positions on civil liberties in the original German!
A: The Crime Rate!
So they don't explode when you fuck 'em.
Never mind. It's too long.
I don't know. I don't have 2020 Vision.
By looking at a bomb
A guy married his cousin. when they were at their honeymoon, they made sex, she had no idea what was he doing "poor girl". when they came back she asked her husband about it, he explaind, after he went to work, she went to the store. while she was coming back she saw a family friend, she asked him to come by to drink a cup of coffee, while they were talking, she asked him, Do you love sex? He said yes, she was really hot tho. Then she said: my husband will be back soon, he'll fuck both of us.
BOO! Langerieeee!
Their balls are just for decoration
Did you hear Chewbaca won the NFL MVP his first year in the league? It was a great Wookie season!
Because they are always up to something.
They don't make them any longer.
When it's ajar.
A submarine, obviously.
You da real MP3. 
An apology. 
Garbage gets thrown out.
Armageddon.
It ran to the unstable.
Adobe Wan Kenobi
They're both imaginary
The Rice-child was born.
Because they don't run. 
"The track is alright."
Satan comes down the chimney.
Carry it around in your pocket for a while and it'll be on every selfie you take.
By icicle.
Just kidding, you can't change anything in the United States.
Asbestos he can. I'm so sorry.
He couldn't make hands meet.
Because Reddit SUCKS.
Simplifiying Radicals. (MATH joke)
'Cos once you go black, you never go back.
An empty playground
He got caught taking a leek
Claustrophobic 
Pan nick at the disc co.﻿
So deaf people can enjoy them too!
Why did the second monkey fall off the tree? Why did the third monkey fall of the tree?  Peer pressure.
Freeze a jolly good fellow
Orange is new black [p.s. - not my original, my friend told me this one]
A WHITE Christmas!
A wrapper.
They hit the town and blow a few bucks.
Says the punch line first, he does.
A ho ho ho.  (merry xmas!)
A krilling spree!
It hasn’t been tested on mice.
"Sorry, I just needed to vent"
It let out a little wine Eh....eh..eh
In an ash tray
When there's a stamp on it.
An insecurity guard 😏
Secret Satan.
He felt his presents. 
A ricest.
"Good morniiiiiiing ladies!"
It was all a myth-take!
For me, a year's supply.
Stung.
North Pole-land
Snowballs!
He only comes once a year
Because it soots him!  Beat that!!
Like spending time with your whole family, getting tons of Xboxes and play stations. Heaping servings of food, etc.
Abortion.
He smiled and told me "I have Parkinson"
Sennah.
They go into town and blow a few bucks.
Wrap your package before you shove it down the chimney.
He was dragged away by a strong current.
A zoombie
He spied her man.
Because he was hoping for a screamer or a moaner.
Six foot force :)
Because he only comes once a year.  Like most jokes on this thread this is stolen, not being a shitcunt and taking credit...
Bernie Sandmaster Flash
Netflix and pill
The balls are just for decoration
Because the didn't have the guts to do it.
It lacks gravity.
Because you already read it.
Fur traders.
Bbecause they were all tied up...
He only comes once a year. 
They listed his condition as stable.
The time God took to cook us
So you know my pull out game is strong.
Both get thrown out when they have no use
I'm dreaming of a white Christmas
Put a windshield in front of them
Because his wife is dead
Public hair Ill show myself out..
Your mom.
A lessoff.
Well hung.
You cry because you shoved a cactus up your peckar.
A threesome. 
Helmets and Spades. Tee hee.
Because for the rest of the year he's in prison for breaking into people's houses.
Because no woman will wear same dress year after year for same occasion.
Elon's musk
Klondike Bar
Climate 
9/11
To get some Sioux veneers
The odds are against them.
Jew-Jew!
In the direct line of fire of a Storm Trooper.
Ginger bread
If he was going to be Impotent he wanted to look impotent. (important) 
He starts coffin...
He single handedly stops crime.
Because they have trouble taking a Wii.
Because they'd been floored by his punch.
A: Because it's no big deal unless you're not getting any.
It's called a Vegetable Stand.
The iLiner. 
Patme! Patme! Credit to my wife on this one
Because you have to open pandoro's box to eat them.
Because it was Stollen. I made up this joke when I was twelve, 29 years ago.  A search of this subreddit shows that it has been made before.  Being kind of a no-brainer, it is easy to believe that someone else came up with it independently.  But it would be really cool if, and it is entirely possible that it is my own joke getting back to me.
Murder
Conjunction junction, they specialize in hooking up words, phrases, and Clauses
He was making a racket.
For those of us that struggle with our family perhaps this will help break the ice. 
Ebowla.
The first line is even about how he got in illegally at night: "Jose can you see, by the dawn's early light..."
Trump is a Dump with a Lump in his plump body/ He's like a grump with a hump, a nobody/, but his words pump up racists who jump others races and he watches them thump each other to feel like somebody please replace his head with a stump and watch him slump
The pro-lease department
They do Yoda.
David Mikesdaad
My dog won't eat broccoli. 
With shell phones.
They both ate honey and they both have the same middle name.
Beef strokin’ off.(NSFW)
One of it's legs is a little smaller.
For bringing home the bacon.
Macabre!
Neck-romance-y.
You may think you're on the right path, but if you follow it literally, you'll end up crashing into a building.
He felt his presents.
NSYNC
After five years, your job will still suck.
She tasted the blood on her son's penis.
A submarine.
The chick says "cock-a-doodle-do", and the woman says " any-cock-will-do"
No, he would be a donkey with a crown.
Go 'head girl, it's sherbert day
More storage space.
Because they are in sects.
YUUUUUUUUUULLLEEE!!!!!!!!!
Goo of Sum Yung Gai
Neither does his publisher. He gave it a title, but then took it back.
Seizure salad 
Santa stops at three Hos.
Because they have Cotton Balls
[looks over both shoulders]....
Because the women are not allowed to drive.
When John CENA ghost!
The line to KFC
To work on his caw strength.
They love anything 10% off
A centipede with a wooden leg!
With a Nine Inch Nail.
Because they're really good at it.
Eclipse
Barium
Usain Balti
Sounds weird, dozen tit?
They're too Hasidic
Well its a little Chewy
Would you like to buy some candy?
He didn't want to be part of a bad punch line.  
That was a brief case. 
It's a great play on words.
I said hear not read, you fuck.
The finish line at the Boston Marathon
Because it had a bad motivator!
sleigh-er
Well, it's tearable...
uh...a blacker eye?
Make a mad Daesh to a shelter
A salted pretzel
An I-Don't-Think- He-Saurus 
Paralyzing her.
Mice cream.. ba dum dum tsst!
Because it would have been impossible to get a Muslim to take a shower.﻿
He's been looking for love in Alderaan places. 
It had a big APPetite
Their living situation is intense.
A ManDeLorean.
A dictator.
Do you know what he's doing these days?  Or would you say he's just somebody that you used to know?
Because she couldn't see that well.
A low blow
"I can't even look at you anymore!"
You get the feeling that you've Reddit before. 
I don't cry when I cut prostitutes.
Try to disable sticky keys.
July
Rudolph's red hose rain gear...
I'm off the cock.
Roadkill
You can't. A mosquito is a vector and the mountain climber is a scaler. Courtesy of my physics professor.
From a catalogue.  ba dum tss
Obamanable snowman
Because their husbands have hollow-weenies.
To get to the other side.
Beats me.
A wrist-ky buisness.
Don't bother, I'll do it myself.
the NBA
Pipe down.
[Deleted]
"WITNESS ME!"
I just welcomed a baby boy and want to kick off being a father by hearing reddits best dad jokes
Your girlfriend!
A partial in a pear tree.
meow.
Successful.
Areola Borealis.
"Does it even matter? We're all screwed anyway, man."
SnapeChat
All the wieners taste like shit.
....what the third Jewish guy should be paying
A Preppysition
An astronaut you racist..
Because eating-out can be so expensive.
A Teu-tonic.
Lickit Lickit
Jesus on a rubber cross!
Putin Windows duh.
The black Jew sits at the back of the oven.
Because growing up, every Christmas she would run downstairs excited only to find no presents under the tree, just her father, Jack, smiling and saying, "I give you my word."
Framed.
I'll live...
Because they would be using the lord's name in vein
If you drop that damn Cross again you are out of my Parade.
Seven
Their balls are just for decoration.
A radicalized Muslim braaaaaaaaaaaaaa
Some Stormtrooper
Time to suck today's dick!
Six. One to actually change the lightbulb, one to post the joke to reddit, one to make a pun thread, one to make a better joke, one to call it a repost, and one to complain about people complaining about reposts.
The privates. They're either dicks or cunts.
Because he loves miso
"Because it  ." "Ugh, that's so  ."
LED Zeppelin
Tumbling Towers.
Mmm...Your vagina?
Nine months
The K
Being given head.
he was a very sikh man
No ballroom.
One, but he has to create a safe-space where the light-bulb can go to avoid being offended that it's being replaced.
It thought maybe it was a proton, but it wasn't positive. 
 
Unique up on it.
First dig a large hole and surround it with peanuts. Then fill the hole with ash to conceal the trap. Finally, go hide behind some bushes.  Soon enough an elephant will come along and start eating the peanuts. When this happens, sneak up behind the elephant and kick it in the ash-hole.
They both leave kids rooms with an empty sack
She wants to be the first lady.
They both take out everyone with just one punch.
One of them is a paid professional and the other one's your mom.
Because two Wongs don't make a white
She doesn't Swallowbacca. 
He kneaded a poo
Hayden Christensen
By working at an abortion clinic. Or an orphanage.
Stick 2 fingers in his honey.
You look at your X and try to find out Y
Because he wanted a screamer of a moaner.
Because they p-irate.
Hypothermia.
Dr. Dre
A guy at a hotel is wondering if it's alright to bring his cooler of drinks to the pool on a particularly hot day. "Front desk. Can I help you?" "Is it alright if I bring a Playmate to the pool?" "Yeah, as long as she's dressed."
Elf and safety
They become pretty cross...
No have to cut me off.  Fall off barstool by myself. [end metajoke]
Because Santa came early this year.
Because you lose every time you talk about him ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
A bi-polar bear. 
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
It's called the "Stayfree Mini Pad"
It’s so that the men can have some peace and quiet to figure out a solution. 
All he needs is game
By saying Alderaan things.
Seven - one to actually change the bulb and six to complain that they liked the old one better.
None. Darkness foreverrrr!
You command vast powers beyond the scope of smaller minds, but to them all you do is wiggle your fingers and stuff just happens.
One, they are extremely efficient and they dont have any humor.
None. They don't believe in a higher power.
I went on   before seeing the new Star Wars.
The position of the dirt bag.
he has a reptile dysfunction
The rough is combed over the fairway
She was a roamin' catholic.
Pioneer. 
Croatian. 
With a crowbar
Being forced Inuit.
Virgin Mobile....
They heard it was a Superfund site.
Just for shits 'n' giggles.....  Bored at work thought I'd make up a joke
Baked ham.
Wookiepedia
You'll get jurasskicked!
Snowballs
Colorado. 
A sithy.
By working at an abortion clinic.
Because it's his only chance to open the door to Number 10!
Tell a cow they're being watched. 
His funfair will be held on a sundial. Funfair* Funfair* For ducks sake...
He rubbed him the wrong way.
Sack religious
A wookiee talkie.
They practice riposting all the time.
a baaahhhd movie. ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Kardashian 
The average elevation.
The story grows on you.
At Olive Garden the servers actually work.
McFatagain! I'm sorry.
Because China is the biggest coal burner in the world
WH40K Humor: I don't know about you, but I prefer my Khorne Dogs with ketchup.
You push them to the side and keep eating 
They had reservations.
Isn't that redickless?
He was a man of many cultures
peanut butter and jellyfish EDIT: you fucking sjw's can't take a fucking joke jesus christ SRS brigading once again everybody 
She had a period at the end of her sentence.
You poker face!
"I see my ex came by."
You have to get Alloy-er
A Biplane.
A mole
Person 1 : Suggest me a good phone to buy nowadays. Person 2 : Microsoft Lumia 950 XL is good for winters, will keep you warm. Very warm.                                          Person 1 : So what about summers then?                               Person 2 : Same, it freezes often as well
In the morning he was always the first one to rise. He didn't want to be a loaf.
Double double doubles 
an academia nut
about 5 minutes
League of Leg ends.
How long did it take the guy to cum?
Because it saw the ocean's bottom.
Sir Cumference
It was in tents.
Petroleum
Rock.
"It ain't gonna be soft where my engine nearing!"
Junk mail!
The DMZ. Disney Militarized Zone.
"Bitch, I drove a bus my entire life." . . . Why are there no black sailors? "I ain't fallin for that shit again!" Continue?... there's got to be a great chain of these like yo-mamma jokes.
A communitree
What do you call a (insert racist minority slur here) on a brand new bicycle? Thief. What do you call TWO (insert racist minority slur here) on a brand new bicycle? Organized crime.
Matt. Others:
Blue Cocky.
Because they have a claus in their contract.
A Sandyhook survivor...................im so sorry.
Hey pal, you just need to branch out more.
Unlike other carpenters, Jesus may actually return one day
beer nuts are $1.50 and deer nuts are under a buck
Thunderpants
No? Watch out where you sit then.
Sithilis
Guac N' Roll
An Eskimoji
In his SLEEVIES!!!
(Neither did she.)
Cause he is our father, and he never came back.
Hmmmus.
Despairagus =/
Teacher: Change this sentence into Future Tense, "I killed a person" . Student: The Future tense is "You will go to a jail"
Analogy
A Stunted Stunt Stunter.
Because they don't have any soul.
Because it ain't got no Seoul.
They pasta time.
He scared the hell out of him.
Because they Marry Christmas!
There are tobacco spit stains on BOTH the doors of his truck.
A false profit.
Haemoglobin kettles. They really make my blood boil. 
News casts
I do all the work and a fat man in a suit gets all the credit.
Chit-Shatting
They figured out who has been drinking their milk and eating the cookies!
Doesn't matter, you won't be able to pry it out of the cheap bastards' hands anyway.
Muzzle-im
Because 7 ate 9. 
OK
A downs pillow.
They would have eaten the snake
Because they have to run around in the shower to get wet.
Rib-bed
Shrekquille O'Neal I'm sorry
"Notice me 10π"
None, broken lightbulbs have the rights to be treated as a normal lightbulb.
Because they know all the short cuts!
This thread has been locked by the moderators due to excessive off-topic posting. [M]
White flour!
One whore soap-and-sleigh!
to raise his spirits
His waddle bottle.
A nun in a wheelchair
Mascarpone
I've never had a garbanzo bean on my face before
One is a group of cunning stunts. 
Of course. The Empire State building can't jump.
Cuatro sinko. ;)
I know this is an unorthodox post, but, I would love to hear your favorites!
You know she's going to swallow.
Fireball
He's just a wookie!
An autistocrat.
Where is my essay?
Allah spoke the kuran to him through the bush.
Because they're richer and hotter than europeans at the moment.
Female, because it doesn't let you finish a sentence before making a suggestion. 
Dam!
more satisfaction at night for wearing a ninja suit all day.
With a firm handshake.
Congress
Because people who purchase weapons legally are law abiding citizens.
So that the semen doesn't keep getting in their hair.
The Hiroshima bombing didn't kill a nickel of a million civilians.
A Quranosaurus.
Entities. (I AM SO SORRY, GAME PROGRAMMER JOKE)
A bro-thel
LMao Zedong
So that the semen doesn't keep getting in their hair.
He was foiled.
They bombed it...
Because he knows where all the naughty girls live.
Don't worry; they'll tell you themselves.
fillet of soul 
Because 6, 7 8.
Send them to a concentration camp!
The wheelchair.
'Cause they all have phones!
because they can't protect their towers
You can tune a guitar but you can't tuna fish.
He only comes once a year and it's down a chimney.
They each got 6 months 
Nuts.
A little bit froggy 
Adell.
They bombed it...
It does a good job of separating the ladyboys from the ladymen.
"I see what you did there"
...wryly.
Cuz of all the pews. I hate myself
Because they're all pawns and their king doesn't exist.
They get toad away.
A CAIR package.
A feminist
Because you were a good idea last night, but now I just want you to shut the fuck up.
Q: What do you call someone who speaks two languages?  A: Bilingual Q: What do you call someone who speaks three or more languages? A: Multilingual Q: What do you call someone who speaks one language? A: American
one guacamole
Marijuanakkah
We'll find out when the cubs win the World Series
Spiderman
Trick question. Deadheads screw in sleeping bags.
Math class.   Credit to troller_awesomeness
Tin, because tin can.
He's egg-nog-stic
Because it's not called a purconow.
The Cinemon.
The five year old in my trunk.
Al-gore-ythms
Your MOUTH! 
With an Itheberg
They're not falling for that one again!!
elvis parsley what is a fly's favorite singer? gnat king cole
Uluruakbar
Because they are always RUSSIAN to places. thanks
When it'sa Jar-Jar.
A tumblr.
It's quite easy when you think about it.  It's the inside of the hands, inside of the feet, the eyes, the teeth, the nails, and  the owner. 
"Is it really hard ?" "Yes, but can we eat the nougat first ?"
"Get in the trunk"
It was wild.  A Muslim couple showed up and put 14 presents six feet under the Christmas Tree.
Give Swedish handjobs. 
They're harmless until you put one in your mouth and light in on fire
Because their planes kept missing the Eiffel Tower.
It saw the salad dressing.
A mustache 
Because air is free. 
Ho, Ho, Ho
Nine months.
Donald Trump
Deez hoes ain't lawyers.
First grade.
Who cares? It's a relephant.
Because of the synths.
Narco Polo.
The Lyre.
You square them.
Legalize Uber. 
Nothing, cats don't talk you fucking idiot. 
Toucan.
Who is going to build the wall if we deport all the Mexicans?
In the Serengeti there are African lions, but in the White House there's a lyin' African. 
It heils.
Because it may Pikachu.
The one with the lowest mew.
"Ain't got no I-Daer"
He heard voices, but could never pay attention long enough to them to do anything crazy.
They're snowed-en!
What is the national vegetable of Germany?
Because he loves to order some   for his jewish friend.
She wouldn't let his ravenclaw slytherin her Gryffindor. 
It was having a mid life crisis
The snowball! 
He's down to Earth. 
Hitler.
They both leave children's bedrooms with empty sacks.
Because bombs are bright.
I don't use a round piece of plastic as a shift knob.
...because he was a moo-slim.
Fauxty faux
They put parking meters on the roof 
It hasn't come out yet.
It was called law 13 due to the fact that it abolished savory....I will show myself out.
So they can look like their mothers.
A cranberry! ~ Esher (my Grandson) age 5
Me: Ya i got it on the way home from school Dad: Well if you got gas than you better go to the bathroom!
It's called "Our Timer"
He may have a lot of cons, but he also has a lot of prose.
You're too young to smoke. Sorry, it's the first joke I ever learned, and I haven't ever seen it posted.
The IRS waits until you're 18 to fuck you.
Falafel and hummus.
a white power-tie!
Nobody will pay to watch a garbonzo bean
(I'm just asking for a friend)
To fit in the box. 
It was a polar bear.
When they ship them over from the Old Country, they stamp "To N.Y." on them...
I don't know, but it's not wreck-amended.
...see you next month. 
It rises because the rest of the fishes are crying :'(
Art. 
because they spend too much time with the x-position
ONLY ONE MORE NIGHT TILL CHRISTMAS!
Periodically.
Because every time he puts up a prayer… it gets answered. (I thought of this myself, but it is so corny, it could easily be in every damn joke book.)
Because the only constant is change. 
They were just trying to make ends meet.
I'm dreaming of a white Christmas.
Seagull Gawking. 
Testostyrone.
No seriously, im getting lonely.
A moo-slim.
Kike Tyson. 
Only if you sit down before the last guy has gotten up.
She would call you at least 1000 times to tell how sorry she is .
A jambo-laya. Thanks for coming out, I'll be here till Thursday.
I faggot
Your penis.
There are poodles everywhere!
PROFITeroles.     Bad, I know.
He liked to eat, drink, and be Mary.
'Cause it had lead in them
She hides inside a flower and waits for a butterfly to extend its proboscis.
Mad Manx: Furry Road
Sir Cumference 
Heigh-ho the derry-o
They are both always trying to get a Pikachu. 
Because all I see is 80085
They don't want to!
One is a shuttlecock, the other's a cuddle shock
Allahu Akbar.
Free ham
AID...S
HODOR, HODOR, HODOR!
They can blow them up
Me neither.
Names.
By feeding the poor to the hungry.
I-rack
They both start blowing but in the end they take everything from you.
Acid rain.
Is it because he knows where all the BAD girls live?
We both end up with sticky hands after using the web.
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless it's 10% off
They don't change it.  They just watch it burn out, then follow it around for another 15 years.
because pepper water makes them sneeze!
He Tractor.
He didn't have any depth perception 
Eclipse it! 
He has ice in the back of his head. Get it  He has ice in the back of his head. Get it    
Wanna go ride bikes?
Ooooooh, aaaaaah...
President Trump.
Whop, Whop Whop Whop Whop ... Whopper Gangnam Style.
What did you think it would be, you racist?
Protect and swerve.
A hue man.
You wait until last call and use a good pick up line. 
Stew
When he was nailed on the cross.
The age
You have to sit in the back of the oven
What does 90 year old Pu$$y taste like? Depends...
Triplets
Decaf Coffee.
Pulp Fiction!
barack obama
Because for one they aren't on the receiving end! Yes I know i am being racist, so dont point it out
You get your wife, truck, and land back.
Your mom!
No John.
bc it was a girl named sally and it pooped itself
A pizza doesnt scream when it gets thrown in the oven
Tell his owner.
Counter-Feminist: Globally Offended
Would you like to buy some candy?
Cancer
Who are you looking for?
Your mom
I heard their manufacturing was in an ol' factory.
So that there's no chance of a hung jury
"Firetruck"
Roberto
One can support a family
If they were called womanholes, guys would keep trying to get in. 
He's the hero this city feeds
You know that she will definitely swallow
Ho, ho, ho! Merry Christmas!
Not enough"
Only one makes it back from camp. 
you are turbanned
A bird can fly but a fly can't bird.
It's too complex
Cheap labor. 
He named them after his favorite father-son activity.
Throw in your laundry.
Fruity Loops
0, 1, e, pi.
A hit-the-spotimus. 
Dead parents
By having an abortion
A pain in the ass
Nothing, instruments don't talk.
Getting into the habit
White-out.
There aren't many paedos in the camp.
Cause it scares the fuck out of the dogs
Charlie JAPlin.  hahahaahhaha  stop racism.
They'll tell you.
Tattooine.
The World.
82
Haha morons
That's how he became a dictator.
A shleep.
Because they made the Playstasian
Because of the holly cost. 
Fluoride and the Machine
Disney Movies still touch kids
Because he fingered A-minor
Odair he is!  Obligatory: My brother told this to me while watching Mockingjay P2. 
Every single one counts.
Put it into airplane mode
"I can see!"
Abusif
Anyone can roast beef. 
An auction
Because they couldn't get 7up
Every time someone goes to the toilet take 4 shots
Shakespeare (say it out loud)
"I'm just gonna leave this here."
Ans: Nigger with a library card
One brightly shines...
You should catch it sometime - it's a real blast !
Denim, denim, denim. 
Chilly chili
Banana Foster
Nothing because his son is a fucking drug addict loser that would rather sit in a dark room all day and night smoking meth and watching internet porn, I have no idea how the fucking government gives pieces of shit like this a place to live. What a fucking cunt faggot loser who can't even call his father on his birthday that druggie cock sucking fuck waste of sperm
In a choral coral corral
Black-on-black rhyme
He was running out of patients. 
because it's like a really large number and stuff
Phone her
At least acne waits till a kid is 14 to come on his face.
So they can steal their parading skillz
''Damn, you really nailed me last night''
Because if they went forward they'd be in the boat
Because of all the weird shit he's seen him do with 9.
The one that can carry two cups of coffee and a dozen doughnuts at the same time.  The most popular woman?  The one that can eat the 12th doughnut.
Reptile disfunction
When she has a tampon behind her ear and she can't find her pencil.
Namaste.
Because they don't want to wash away their Marx.
It follows a pair'o'bollock trajectory.
About 2 bucks an hour depending on what the current minimum wage is.
Even if you only drink a little bit.
In the non-friction section.
Because they go niggerniggerniggerniggernigger chinkchinkchinkchink
He was a little light headed.
Borderlands
A small medium at large
Cancer
His upper lip.
ereptile dysfunction
The murder-suicide scene at Toucan Sam's Miami penthouse.
Load it in the chum dumpster.
They both can't make any change
A condescending con desending..
Essay
The grass tickles their balls.
Call him daddy in the middle of it
you seamstressed
One costs a lot of money to maintain, keep running, and give you the results you want. The other has four wheels.
Cuban
None. They just shoot the room for being black. Credit: donator on some stream said the joke and just wanted to share it. 
You ask him politely.
Because she keeps running away from the ball
Juan on Juan. 
Because he was no conjurer of Cheap Trick
[THE PUNCHLINE OF THIS JOKE HAS BEEN CENSORED BY THE GOVERNMENT OF THE PEOPLES REPUBLIC OF CHINA, PLEASE REMAIN CALM WHILE WE WILL DEAL WITH THE OP IN A CIVIL MANNER]. 
A quarter pounder with cheese.
For a free cavity search.
You punch african kid in the face.
Walk in with $2 Million. 
It turns "NO! NO! NO!" into "MMM! MMM! MMM!"
Apparently he was mistaken 
Homo-Genius
Cause they struggle to put food on the table
With a crowbar
Because they're not PC.
First he lies on one side, then he lies on the other.  Credit: Nicholas Sparks from his book 'See Me' which I am reading now. 
Calculust
Shit went down 
camembert :)
hit him in the face with an Axe
So he smelled great while dead & bloated.
Answer: Airtel 4G girl.
A nun doing squats in a cucumber field
Most of the time it's hard and long - unless you're Asian.
They found her head and shoulders under the steering wheel.
Rite Aid
Christmas music will still be playing next year. 
abortion. 
Stop Stalin! Just Putin the effort and start Lenin it happen!
Glock coma
You get your drunk ass off the carousel!
A visitor.
because it was being driven by a woman
Chicken Butt
Or do you want to know z?
In vitro, in Prancer, in Dancer, in Vixen.
Hubble butt.
Men at Work
You just did.
all the inequalities
HEAVEN!!
Literally anything.
To get a tight seal.
So it could be timber!
Shyer folk
"Tim ber"ton
She complains to a man.
It nuts
Treason
Boy: because you're CuTe Girl: Are you made of holmium and molybdenum?
A eunuchorn.
Honestly, Justice Fingers.
River Derci. Sorry.
Something racist, probably.
She goes into town and blows a few bucks!
IHOP.  Tipping your waitress takes on a whole new meaning.
GLOVES! Just kidding, he hasn't opened the box yet
Ultra sound
White people didn't allow them to come into the U.S. 
A vagina. Lol, top kek.
Pragma.
Squid Pro Quo
Toothbrush...you dirty bastard
Because they don't cut corners.
He was out standing in his field.
In a good place, but at the wrong time.
A saddle.
A stalk-ing! (A stocking!)
A millennial falcon. 
American: You mean the elevator?  English: Yes, we call it a lift.  American: It's called an elevator. We invented it.  English: And we invented the language.  
1%
Holland.
Tinder
Awoli.
Mare bear. What should you do if you see one?
The fallopian tube! 
Do I have permission Tecumseh?
10g
Mooove
Decalfinated
Brown chicken, brown cow.
A radian.   Math majors don't use degrees.
Ten pigs, two calves, one beaver, and an ass.
Because Curiosity killed her cat
A: They're both intended for children... But, it's usually the father that play with them the most!
Cause your booty is disarming
Derweinerslider
Feminists.
Because it's a high steaks game 
A hypokrout.
Hebrew
I'm in a cent.
I've never paid to have a garbanzo bean on my face.
A frobo.
She grew out of her b-shells 
When there is no "L"
9/11
To say hello from the other side. 
Who cures?
Because he always "hasaki!"
Yeah, he is all right now.
Where o where are you tonight?  Why did you leave me here all alone? I searched the world over and thought I found some one You met a zombie and pblblthpth you were gone. 
Cuz it was yellow and appealing!  Sorry if this is bad. Seen too many of the same jokes here and I wanted to add an original joke. 
She says, " They showed us how to make sex with our hands. ". When he scrapes his brain off the ceiling and calms down enough not to call the teacher he asks her calmly to show him.  Turns out they had a deaf person visit who spent about an hour or so to teach them a little ASL. That was one of the words they learned to spell. 
Mourning Wood
Because his dick was stuck in a chicken.
Something Italians learn in preschool.
One of them makes sense!
... Cause it sounds like a dope ass job.
He showered them.
You rock them.  What if it doesn't work? Use a bigger rock. 
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna
Aaaaarby
Urine big trouble...
Then you must be UNDER the crowd!
A submarine
Because it's white I don't know why it's funny. I just heard it so can someone explain it to me?
A lightbulb.
I can see Uranus from here.
Because they're not PC
Yesterday a friend posted a thread on Slickdeals about shirts I made   since there was a promo for $5 off everything (DRAFTFIVE).  He received LOTS of flak about it being racist/stupid/retarded, was thumbed-down by about 10 people, and the thread was deleted within 5 minutes. I personally find it funny, but I am indeed Asian. Thoughts?
because it's hard as fuck for 6 year olds 
A proppadom
Nothing! It just let out a little wine.
Imagination.
Tooth hurt-y.
Because the camels get tired. 
The guest of honor always shows up late! 
The punch lines.
Unseaworthy
Gloves. Just kidding, he hasn't opened them yet.
Big clits!
A Rocky Road
They call their tailor Herr Dresser
I have no idea, Your Honor, but he was coming right at me and I felt my life was at risk. 
A churn-noble!
They haven't been fucking sunny in a long time...
"Where'd all the roofers come from?"
Yellow Snow.
I pull out of both of them.
They needed to give their characters an eye-patch.
They're never short of Sichuan musicians.
Mountain Dew
Ve haff vays of making you tock!
Because his condom was a little holy...
I don't have a Porsche in my garage.
Legal paedophile. 
Slot shaming. 
An easy-bake oven.
It's just like a regular Denver omelet, but it's served upside down in seawater.
For Mail-Practice!!
A pimp.
It was for being outstanding in his field. 
Pump kin
because to him, alcohol is not a solution.
Because he only comes once a year. 
Because love means nothing to them.
the Foo Fighters
A rappi.
Fucking angary!
One of them is a bunch of cunning runts
He lost the plot.
and Ironwoman a command?
In a satisfactory
Where you put the cucumber
A man sees that his neigjhbnour doesn't have his wheeled trash bin. "Hey bub, where's ya bin`" "I took a little vacation for a few weeks," "No. I meant where's your bin?" "Told ya, vacation, at the beach!" "No man. Where's ya wheely bin?" "Ok, fine! I've wheely been to jail! Happy now?"
a freezer doesn't scream when you put your meat in it
Oooohms
A few degrees. 
Oh you'd know if you had.
I literally pecan't right now.
Cause I sure would like to probe Uranus.
I'll give you the D later.
I read there's some leftover cat.
Because of the Free Exercise Clause.
My Zipper
1
because they lay out in the sun so much lol :P
To concentration camps.
Ke-bab
Nothing, he didn't make it that far.
Just out of Curiosity...
The golfer goes "  Damn!" The skydiver goes "Damn!  "
I don't know. I hope you're not allowed to take the mail out to the mail box.
Because proper tea is theft.
To work on his put-downs.
He put it up Fur Elise!
The sex is the same but the dishes start piling up.
he dunno where the hood at
"InterNEIN"
Because he doesn't know the time of day.
The CI, eh?
His vision was based on movements.
Deep throat
He felt he had lost his sense of porpoise.
They always just Klingon to it
She had a metric pussy.
They Fallout
The second hand shop.
Patels (this may or may not have been inspired by a dumb facebook post I saw)
They Hire 'Em A Biff!
Well.. because Obama said so.
Bricks can get laid.
Park your car, man.
About as West as Taylor
Angles in the Outfield
"I'm gonna have to think long and hard about this one."
I chews you
Angles in the Outfield
You.
Because he's close to The Edge
If you repair both, the E-Wheelchair is the only thing running again
Because MIT blames Cal Tech for stealing their Feynman, and there will never be another man as Fine.  
Addadictomy.
A smile
One makes you: The other is a synthetic drug.
Because he was playing with Pooh.  
Meals on wheels
Being a starving African Child. 
The prefix 'gulli' meaning 'believing' and the suffix 'ble' meaning 'ble-shit'.
Look at the hole photo for 30 seconds straight
You ever try to open a grilled cheese sandwich?
Incense-itive
Because their Zoos ran out of room.
Where you left it.
She raughed (raft).
Bad blood. 
Holy shit!
Joint Family.
To watch Dablooney Toons!
Where's popcorn?
They are all against Turkey
Pump-Kin
A honey comb!
Scott Ad
With Little Caesars.
A tator thot.
A broken nose.
Alarm cock.
His primary philosophical viewpoint is "eeeeehhh"
The concentration camps.
They are both stuck up cunts
Because they need a fandom that won't make them feel like trash.
A Racist!
Neither have they.
Dead.
They did.  Once.
A Fartin' Spartan
Nein
Because the Earth's rotation automatically makes a circle jerk out of him
For safety purposes, I don't know if I should tell you her name..
The trump-et.
Acting
A retarrrrrd
It wouldn't be the first time he pushed a black family out of their home.    
with a big wave
Because Somalia doesn't have an education system
When you start to make deposits at the sperm bank, you loose interest 
Health insurance
All Fridays Matter
You gotta Put-in the hours 
Biev Strokinoff
Because they always get in to heated arguments.
A painting only need one nail to hang
Both are fucking close to water.
Well, Jesus nailed it.
my girlfriend took like an hour to pick out which hijab she wanted to wear... 
Ask them to pronounce "hires"
The finish line at the Boston Marathon.
Mount Rushmore
Hot pants.
OCDC
A florist.
A lawsuit in a pantsuit. 
Your kids 
Because pepper makes them sneeze.
Because bush did 9/11.
A neighbourhood.
Neckbeard the pirate
He got off on a technicality.
Because someone stole his boat.
Well it depends on what you mean by change.
A curry-ous guy
Brothel Sprouts.
It's called the Nickelback, it really sucks.
Turkey
Forgive me Father, for i have wind.
A turkey. Because it's always stuffed.
Leave.
james bond
Goebel Goebbels.
How will I ever find another performer of your caliber? (Source: a dad on thanksgiving)
They fry pranes
Cancer
Your mom.
Matching uniforms.
A genealogist looks up the family tree, a gynecologist looks up the family bush. (Credit to my uncle)
He wanted to part his sees.
Pota-TOES!
Goebbels, Goebbels, Goebbels 
You're Hanging Ten, Dudes!
Of course you have, because that's the definition of an accident.
Not being retarded
Joan of Ark
The screaming speed bumps
Turkey.
Nothing. You push them both aside and keep on eating.
asked the concerned man.  “Everything in moderation,” replied the doctor.   “Is four times a day alright?”   “Well, that’s quite a lot, why don’t you get married, that’s a much better idea.”   “I am married.”    “And is everything fine in bed?”   “It’s great.”   “Then why do you need to masturbate so much?”    “She’s such a spoil-sport. She doesn’t like to do it during mealtimes.”  
Hydraulic rams.
a turkey 
tanksgiving
Chinese-y
Because Rusty thought the scene in the book was better. I'll show myself out. This is a horrible joke.
You can't put a plane through linearly independent vectors
Wii-u-Wii-u-Wii-u-Wii-u-Wii-u
Briiiiines...
UCLA
The outside!
Tuesday
A lot of different reasons.
1 and 3/5ths 
Toyoda
A Naive American. Literally just came up with this.
Because everything they have disappears
Dory was played by Ellen Degeneres. 
Freeze it and run it through a bandsaw. MEEEOWW!!
A native American artifact. What do you call a HALF-EMPTY bud light can on the side of the road?  An extremely rare native American artifact.
Nigga, you racist!
I'm gunna fuck you Inuit pussy.
Turkey
1 in front, 2 at back seat, and 47 in ashtray
Walk-a Walk-a 
a ham-stir
Carlos
"Turkey"
He died of overdose
Woah, the traffic is moving.
I liked the leftovers before they were cool.
...banned from the petting zoo...
Tell him it runs on gas
Masturbation.
the duck say when he bought lipstick?
Because a woman who can't afford her own washing machine won't be able to support you.
One got his head blown off, the other was assassinated
The one who could really Rock-a-feller
per
Atleast not three since my basement is still dark.
Aztec.
Nuke it.
All Fridays Matter. 
9:11pm
Punch him in the throat. 
He was a ripoff. 
Because they were Russian... Why was WWII so long? They were Stalin...
Eat A Bomb?Nuke A Toaster?Ride Nyan Cat Into Space?Bomb ISIS?Oh Theres Just So Much You Can Do!
An American police officer.
Their dicks!
Iran
They can feel it in their bones.
Turkey
Because it says "concentrate"
A Whoopi pie.
Dung! Get it?!
Woof da.
Reflect! I use this dadjoke on my pregnant wife every day when she goes out for walks after dark and wears a safety vest.. 'Now honey, don't forget to reflect on all sorts of things, especially car headlights!'
It was a persona non grappa.
To get to  .
Ayy lil' mayo. 
Because it os humerus.
Deep pan, crisp and even.
A concentration camp!
Pro-bono
Because he was a kami!
because the donkey needs a break
Because they have no soul
When I dump a load in the washing machince, it doesnt follow me around
Don't worry, they'll let you know.
Because deep down they're real nice
Because it'd Krampus style.
This joke. 
The inevitable comment from 
They consume a lot of vitamin SEA!
The butt of every yolk :(
Paulinating.
A small Buddhist.
An ereptile dysfunction.
Give him a white man's wallet. 
Violate his N.A.P.
Oh it was just a list of names
A Roman army
Because you're certainly a fuckfase.
Fathers day.
Because even Aaron Rodgers is a 12!
A dodickahedron.
Because they don't know what a full house is
You probably haven't heard it.
Between a picture of Jesus and Jesus himself?  The picture only needs 1 nail...
From Vato Zone
Three. One to post it, another to post a better punchline in the comment section, and another to repost it with the new punchline.
I don't know, he hasn't managed to open it yet. 
If the rubber blows, you're dead
A bike runs on fat and saves you money. A car runs on money and makes you fat.
A pastafarian.
Yo mama so stupid she gets excited seeing a shooting star.
The epileptic corn shucker shucks between fits.
A question mark. 
Because he was a sensei.
One's a broke stroker and the other is a stroke broker.
Your ears stay warmer.
"Would you like to buy some girl scout cookies, sir?"
Neither have they.
A little bizar
Microfiche.
Ones a snack cracker, the other is a crack snacker.
Depth perception.
Bore them to death.
His platform is lowering inflation.
Bisexual.
They are always full of seed. 
One person. 
ISIS
He topped himself. 
Well, for one, the flag is a big plus.
I heard it was groundbreaking.
The 911 victims. They went through 50 stories in a minute. I'm so sorry
Because they're not real.
starbucks
Nope, unintended.
"You caught me red handed!"
He lost his SANTAty
Not a joke. Just want to see funny comments.
Koran Koran. 
Because if they didn't their local gas station would turn a blind eye.
No I mean it im just asking,
One is a rusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean
Looking for Pooh.
1forrest1
Titicaca
Rollaids
They push Two twins together to make a King
Lukewarm.
James Bonding bah dun tss
Pupa-ty.   
Bravefart
The Titanic sank
OP's mom
A lot when you are having a prostate exam. 
They're both good at rigging erections.
Geigh
Veggie lovers
The same middle name.
If his dick tastes like shit.
What do you mean?
Need for Speed.
No? That's the spirit.
Nothing, you can't cross a vector with a scaler.
Grant.
They meet up a work
He couldn't budget.
The police. They're the police, racist.
500 Internal Server Error
Her gambling habit.
I feel bad for the poor fella.
The street was littered with de brie
Minisoda
The new york Jets
Because a cop robbed him.
The  blue eyes white dragon
A small medium at large.
a lot of countries have been inside her.
Shot.
Beats me ¯_(ツ)_/¯
A foot long
The sphinxster ....
Reservation reservation reservations.
daesh many.
A poo-dle
Depends
Because he cauterize.
"You going to eat that?"
They don't, it's a miff.
That's it; I'm never thrusting you again
An Allah Ak-bar
A Falloffasarus - Patrick age 10
One. And one's friends.
Physics...
I shit, you knot.
Iran
Because there aren't enough ho stages.
Amin Amood
Liquor
A Daesh washer. 
Shit thought, shit joke.
PASSENGERS!
They both blow up people who don't agree with them.
Uni-Ball
Because I want to get on your ToDo list!
two small buns with extra mayo
To cover up your mom sinking.
They end up in a shallow grave.
A Buck-An-Ear
Claude Balls
Breakfast.
A jalapeño pauper
A mentally challenged lumberjack
NEIN!!!
D:
Excuse me are you going to eat that? *Ellen Barken on David Letterman show.
Rear view mirrors so they can see the battles going on.
Nothing, it just waved
Asians? Idk it's been a rough day.
Uncle bens rice
His tungsten
Because the Quran forbids cannibalism 
Daesh Network
San Diego!!
She uses all-porpoise cleaner!
The wheel chair.
B comes after both.
Two counts of possession
Under 16, that is a big win for him.   Credit to 
Hotline Bling.
I heard its pretty Syria-ous
It is always look but don't touch.
A calendar has a future... 
He can't do martial art because he is paralyzed tip to toe.
I give a shit when I lose 6 million dollars.
He was arrested for assault.
Only one of those could stop a race.
He works it out with a pencil!  ✏ ➕ 💩 = 👍
CAAAAAAAH-tin...
Share ya laws.
He fucked Charlie Sheen before he was cool.
He's a smart bomb
He couldn't get his dick out of the chicken.
Na.
Because potholder was already taken
... a soviet
Because they cancan. 
Just wait. They'll tell you.
Absolutely nothing
Border Collie
It was a blast.
Apparently he was out standing in his field. When asked about how he won he said, "hay, it's in my jeans."
Hey, sex cells.
There is little bit of good in all of us.  p.s. not racist, my shadow is black. 
People actually eat pussy..
Idaho either, but Alaska!
Shot in the head in Dallas.
A Stick of Gum...
Spot-on.
A new last name.
The Guardian.
Because the barracuda believed that "anemone of my enemy is a friend."
The s.
Turns out he was running a pyramid scheme all along.
Gotta go fast
A freezer doesn't fart when I pull my meat out.
Because it's too close to the gas chamber
By banging 7-gram rocks.
Me: Because i work for less and good at licking. Mgmt: You're hired.
A waitress leaves me alone after I give her the tip.
In the back of the oven.
Because the ones that don't are never heard from again. I'll be here all day folks.
100 meter Daesh
a new last name
Because it has been very knotty.  Apologies in advance
photo bombing
Dennis Hedfelov
He did it ON A PORPOISE!!
A radical Muslim wants to cut your head off, but a moderate Muslim   the radical Muslim to cut your head off.  Bye. 
Because Charlie Sheen has HIV.
Elevaders
Bar soap.
Blaze it.
A mass murder.
You. 
It pokes holes in condoms.
Swim towards a window
That's a moray!
They can't reflect on what they've done.
R-E-L-I-G-I-O-N
Niggas In Paris
The hide and seek champion.
It was absolutely pawsitive 
Musafa
French toast
Because the French were toast!  This is a joke I made up, along with an alternative : What do Isis eat for breakfast?  French toast. 
He's into that burning bush.
Eye!
Looks like ISIS will finally get fucked by those 72 virgins they are always going on about
Heard it was hardcore. Some people went ballistic.
Pump-Kin
Ereptile dysfunction
A policeman doing his duty!
Because people get all up in his grill.
He was afraid to go down the tracks.
Because of their frequent bow movements.
Because he wasn't   
"Keep off the grass"
He knows where the naughty girls live.
A: Rubbit
Sonny-D
It gave people the right to bare arms.
a daeshcam
He logged a lot of hours.
Because the rest of the letters are not-E.
Plaque and yellow, plaque and yellow, plaque and yellow.
9/12
Child: 'Yes, but I don't know when to stop'.
cumin
The KFC Drive-thru line.
The wheelchairs.
Starving.
I've never had a garbanzo bean in my mouth.
One who likes women more than beer
Minute maids.
They're both a bunch of pussies. Credit to Stephen Colbert.
Minority Deport
Umami.
I don't know. Just look for the Fresh prints! Ha ha.                  He's also black.
Charlie Sheen's new show: "2 and a half T-Cells"
The Shuhites
9/11 victims, they went through 87 stories in 15 seconds
Two plains. 
When Joan used a coat-hanger on Cheryl, she was already out of the womb.
He couldn't Ctrl+P
Ninigger
Henry Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzhenry.
Mention feminism.
To keep the flies off the fried chicken.
Because it isnt Titan Uranus.
She's trans parent 
Your mother never gave me a marshmallow
Because eating one more would have been two-farty.
About 20kg.
Baked Yazidi
A rockin' roller.
Toblerone
Mourning
A scat fetish
I don't know, you haven't said anything yet 
He got lost in the maize.
Because of the eclipse.
Because in charge Yoda was. 
Turn of madden and go to bed. (I'm an eagles fan)
Feeling a little horse. 
fork it.
Because he's a horse racist.
"Pizza shit"
A really good instrumental
The Cubans because they're the strongest swimmers.  ...Dogs? Chinese because it's a dog eat dog world.  ...Beavers? Mexicans because they're mostly into construction.  ...Cockroaches? ISIS because they're still there no matter how many times you bomb the place. 
Nobody likes the black ones. 
It was the pot calling the cattle back.
a gas chamber
Dog turds without borders
" "
An old shoe... ...and Ronda Rousey
Neither did I.
A: Turn it inside out, and shake the fuck out of it.
mArrrs!
The ground!
StockHOLMES!
A misdememer.
Fig u're skating
He needed to sketch the sine and cuisine graphs but only knew how to do cos(-x)
-Ask uncle Yvonne.
I don't know, I just fly the drone.
Because they're never wrong
It was all broused up!
Downstown Abby
The Tricericops
He got a little testy.
Dead ant; dead ant; dead ant dead ant dead ant...
He ate pizza before it was cool.
I'm udderly freezing!
An arrr-pg
To get to the retards house. **knock knock
A paragraph, because he's not big enough to be an esé.
WasWas
What is green and smells like pork? Kermits finger.
They become dis-oriented!
You'd never have to meet the father.
The Eiffel tower
You stop milking a cow after 150 years.
Not being able to see yourself in the mirror afterward.
Hurry up and give me your money or i'll cum and jack you up!
So the blue and red sections are easily removed during a time of war.
You punch her
Robin, get in the batmobile! (credits to  )
I know a guy. Edit: Ghee
It's when your belly sticks out farther than your dickie do.
NACHO-CHEESE
a body bag.
Aaarrrrrrr Kelly!!
Fat Boy Slim, because he's always saying "right here, right now, right here, right now".
Because he wasn’t far enough from the 3pt line to take the shot.
Arrr'n'B
About 100 French people right now 
Nein
He just shakes it off. 
No!!   That's the spirit
He looks all right now.
Nun
The more you play with them, the harder they get
I have a heart-on for you. Credit where credit is due:  -Wayne Gretzky -Michael Scott
Shit in her cunt.
Ask them to pronounce unionized.
Deer testicles. They're under a buck.
Pick him up and suck his dick.
Netanyahoo
Anna May
World war Juan
They come out of the clawset.
You have to drop da bomb on her twice
A miss stake
???????
Jim: we're doing this ritual and we will need A pentagram drawn with your own left hand  John: ok, no problem, though my own right hand Is what I would normally use instead Jim: So, you should write a verse about this time John: I'll call it "I, ambi-pentagrammer" (edited to try to vaguely be in iambic pentameter)
You might actually get me to sub here.
Here is a few I've heard: What's the best thing about sex with twenty one year olds? There's twenty of them How do you get an emo out of a tree? Cut the rope What do you call a black woman who's had 7 abortions? A crime fighter Whats the difference between a jew and a dollar? People would care about losing 6 million dollars
To see Adolphin!
Because these pythons are sick.  (Flex arm muscles)
Nine
They want to save 20%.
Drive me to the grocery store.
Transformers
A Fortnight
A dumb bass I'll sea myself trout
He was over the weather
That's inappropriate.
Because in charge of sequence, Yoda was.
Hide n' seek
Beat it, we're closed.
It goes 'wee-woo wee-woo' I apologize
She forgot her Algae-bra. Ha..
The other plants have to photosympathize with it
A Puto. 
Ebowla
That is something i never herbivore!
Dead in the trash
When the wifi signal doesn't come through.
because it smells so cheesy, most people never heard of it. when in fact this bank is a central bank for central banks. but not all head of every central bank is attending its annual meetups. it is an elite club only G20 members are invited. central banks are not state owned but are private owned institution who can print their very own money. its outrageous if you understand what implications this holds.
Lickety-split.
Sine language.
Hella.
Juan on Juan
Bleach 
Robertoe
A Negro-mancer
Guts is coming home late from the bar, drunk as a skunk meeting your wife at the door with a broom in her hand and asking her if she's still cleaning the house or going out for a ride. Balls is coming home late from the bar, drunk as a skunk with lipstick all over your face and the scent of women's perfume all over you, meeting your wife at the door and stating, "You're next, chubby."
San Diego.  (Sandy Eggo)
They go to the moo-vies!
Kids don't eat broccoli. 
Meraid.
They're always cutting lines
Table for 50,000?
"It twerks!" I don't know how this came to me..
Because she outgrew her B-Shells. Ha...
Allahuak Bar
Well because he had a horrible experience with windows. (credit to Neil Hamburger for this amazing joke)
"Sir, you dropped your receipt!"
Because there extinct.
Free Endless Salad Tossing
He always has plenty of double "eh"s,  triple "eh"s...
Purple  (According to my 3 year old son)
(Offensive)
An atheist writer praying his book will sell.
I don't know. Torqué?
Because there's no Stalin.
USB.
Well Red.
[DATA EXPUNGED]
Woofleball
Kick his sister in the jaw... (Heard this one the other day from a friend, and thought I might share it here. :P)
If you like it then you shudda put a ringtone on it.
Well, I had toast. EDIT: me and   weren't expecting you to know. cuz
Rough...
An egg gets laid.
Episcopaleontologists
A fur-tile bitch
Not me.. Stop calling me that.
Because it's past tents.
There is a vas diference
EDIT: Wow I didn't expect this to become so popular!
They gotta catch 'Jamal
The older they are, the easier they are to pick up.
A threesome. 
The party was for "Wights only."
How do you make a baby politician cry.   Take away his slush-y fund.  
Acne waits until your 12 to come on your face.
diabetes.... I'll see myself out
There was 20 of them 
They turnip the beets!
Cause the cheating bitch ducked.
Any conservative winning an argument with a liberal, Democrat or 'progressive'.
Nothing. He just laughed. 
Because he screwed his wife!
It's a dead giveaway...
I work in a casino and want to hear your best one. Here is mine:  what's the difference between a canoe and a baccarat player? A canoe sometimes tips!
Czechoslovakia. 
Horse ræddish.
Every character was Legoless
i did its ruined the sofa, there is shit all over the house,my arms are in ribbons and now i cant find the dog, i think some charities can be downright irresponsible!
Because they’re pi rates.
See No Green
She wasn't.
When I cut up a prostitute i don't cry.
Because he was crossed. 
Nevermind, it has no point. 
Uni-ball
Bizon
Because it was a chesnut tree.
Nobody made it to the Finnish Line.
Oranges and peaches.
Your wife can take 3 dicks!
Because it was bipolar.
Brigham Young
A pédrophile
Because 6 8 9
They both leave kid's homes with empty sacks.
Because he's your mom's kid.
Thoreau some mo'
because... chicken.lel
There is no f in way
Fuck it, we'll drink in the dark. (Happy birthday Devildogs)
Potenuse  Credit: Key and Peele. I don't want to be like that kid in class. 
He didn't like showing his work; was only interested in the final solution.
Dead ones, you guys. Dead ones. 
You follow the Fresh Prince
Slap an african in the face
Because they're too young for him
The Fat Man.
Because they are really good at it. 
Denim Denim Denim
So he would stop getting lost everything he checked it.
Stephen Hawking's personal gym.
Namaste
Oh, I guess you've never rolled one down far enough.
Netflix and pills :D
She wanted to make some money on the side...
Do you have a ticket for that?
Doesn't matter, ants can't rent a house
heilcopter
A Swallow
Santa.
Chair-y
An astro-fizzy-tits
Men jiggle the nozzle afterwards.
One says "Hasta la vista baby!!" and the other one says "Hasta la vista son"
...  They both burn on re-entry.
He is always Hoe-hoe-hoeing.
She hasn’t even been a women for a year yet.
Behind a badge
He said "I wanna two sheet onna the bed".
"The guns wasn't in the horse fixing resume!"
Phlegmbuoyant. 
Niggative.
Because could never find the Final Solution. 
Too many cheetahs
In chemistry, you should never lick the spoon.
Because his jokes were always in poor taste ..
Because it only ate vegetables.
Anyone who can run, jump or swim is already over the border
Because they always miss.
Does this rag smell of chloroform to you? 
Why did the baker become a baker? He just couldn't cut it as a butcher.
You could almost say it was a surgical strike.
Everything he saw was fuzzy.
Before the first period. 
Q: Why does the Easter Bunny hide his eggs?  A: Because he doesn't want anyone to know he's screwing the chickens.
Not get a job.
Yeah, I saw it on ESPN. It had their team logo and then a big MIA next to it.
Pump kin.
Benjamin Netangoogle
Egg Nog
Nice obi!
One is a cunning bunch of runts
I'm glad I got the hell out of there!
They have a lot of moo/neigh. 
Time is on your side.
It's a weird biological thing
A: One requires tweetment, the other requires oinkment.
His daddy was really a mummy.
Four words. Edit: when do I kill myself.
He became a Super Aryian.
Kicked out of the petting zoo.
The thieves said 'give me all your dough.'
There's ninety of 'em.
Because he is Peter Parkour
Hot wheels.
Russel
Q: What's the difference between a voyeur and a thief?  A: A thief snatches your watch.
Quatro Sinko
Hi-ho
None, Mexicans do it for them.
because it grew  ponentially 
He had locomotives.
Tysssonssss
When it's down to it's last quarter.
Nothing. He's mute. I don't even think he's as ventriloquist.
It's not hard...
It is because it is can-able.
Both have LAX security.
One's a Goodyear, the other's a fucking awesome year!
I forget
Virgin Mobile
Lulz!!! etc etc etc :-D
A cyst!
Having all that trivial information must be a big distraction...
A circus is full of cunning stunts
He was in a dilemma.
Because they don't like periods.
You look in the mirror and see what you saw. Take the saw and saw the table in half. Two half's make a whole, go through the hole. 
Poop: Please don't push. It's already tight in here! Poop to Pee: May I go first? Meanwhile, Fart pushing everyone to the sides.. Fart: Excuse me! Excuse me! I need to go!
Two. On e to he  lp with t he  he lp with  one two  with and the oth  there to  {}}}}}}}}}}}}}  and th e to two  with lp  he
Because his utopia might be classless, but he's not
Experts say that 82% of people believe what is said in make-believe studies when they claim that they are confirmed by experts.
PinkShine
Telling your parents that you're gay.
Neither did he.
Your mother!
It only takes one nail to put him on a wall.
Telling your parents you're gay.
A Roamin' Catholic 
Right where you left it
Pier Pressure 
Old Jed's a millionaire.
Lean Beef.
Two boobs and a man
I just watched it and I don't think Mike really got his character down. He kept saying he hated juice.
Tulips on my organ.
He ran to Jesus to give him a hug and Jesus said:  "Come back when you're eighteen "
Because they can't masturbate.
Poles on the rigth half of the plane are unstable
It was basted on a true story.
The Crimea River.
Because you didn't know they had it.
Orange Jews
Leaving Mustang meets.
A kush and push.
It don't need cleaning!
Juantanamo
Nether of them have a pop.
When you ask the doctor where to put your pants and his reply is right next to mine.
Cashews.
A humpback.
A bloody Mary.
She had gotten him out of a tight spot before.
To the farmacy.
To render the buildings on the other side
A bingo machine. 
Booooooooooooookake
Because they are always spotted!
The lesbians would win, because, they would 69 all the way there, while the homosexuals would still be at home packing their shit. 
bitches have pussies 
Because it was too froggy outside.
Let's get together and make some cents.
Cocktail :-P
Sixty-eight. At 69 you have to turn around.
Walking, Jk rowling
Mr Bus.
It came straight outta Compton's glass.
Cinnamon Toast Brunch
One's a grand car and the other's a grand car
In the NB - "eh"
Me and my co worker was having a good conversation about school that lasted about 20 mins. Then she said "Can I ask you a question" and I replied "You just did"
I heard it's very efishient
Two men walk into a bar. The first one says to the bartender, " I would like some h2o." The second guy says to the bartender " I would like some h2o to." Why did the second guy die?  Because he had h2o TO one in other ways, h2o2 which a poisonous chemical
He makes a fe-line for the door.
I'm sure of it.
So the gerbils can find their way out.
To go back into the first clothes shop we went into two hours ago.
Because he's a Tito-Hitler.    Get it...   Teetotaler.. When you say it out loud.. It sounds like... teetotaler...    don't hate me   
myelin
Because he ran ahead.
You know he's guilty.
You really gotta hand it to her.
You get Solar Morty and WOOOoooooo!
Because he kisses his mother with that mouth
Hudyanika Bolokov
Medium Pizzas 
Equal frights but usually their haircuts are enough to give worse frights! 
They're both manicures
Because they can. 
Cause you're a basic bitch
You can't eat on the job.
He had a brown paper bag hat, brown paper bag boots, a brown paper bag shirt, and a pair of brown paper bag pants. He was arrested. For rustling.
It really nose it's way around. 
It's absolute fire
Nothing, their last big hit was the wall.
He didnt leave them a tip....for dinner.
4 skin divers
He was retarded 
You don't cry when you cut up a saxophone. Happy Saxophone Day Why this musical abomination deserves its own day is beyond me. Edit: beside to beyond
They are sitting on their lips!
An orca-stra.
Sin Pi
You don't know which witch is which!
They make up everything.
They both have a climax.
I don't really remember, I was too busy masturbating.
I'm not going to come into school tomorrow.
paramedics 
Hey, are you Jamaican a cake?
You cant-elope!
He was   to death
Because they have no Seoul.
Sherlock Homie
I heard he got 6 sentences!
Light Blue.
Oven gloves.
Aziz, I'm sorry.
A lamb, duh!
Something punny.
''Hey! I'm Joaquin here!'' 
They're obsessed with rigid bodies!
the infantry
Because they knead the dough.
Apparently he didn't want to marry Kate and Ashley.
.  . . No Racism please !
Because the ends justify the memes
It's neither big nor clever.
Computin science
Because its period was late.
Red paint.
One, while the rest were kung fu fighting
A brushin.
Because they schlepped together.
Six, if you slice them thin enough.
How about a partnerswitch?  I'll bang your wife and give you a handjob after!
He rEDDITed it. I'll leave.
They both spend more time in your wallet than on your dick!
Hodor.
She eats balls all day. WOKA WOKA WOKA WOKA!!!!!
She's innocent until proven quilty.
they both go on your weenie
Cuz I'm bringing you back from the dead!
ma'lady
Cuz' I could go back in time to approach you with a better pickup line than this one
Because they are light. 
Because she's a woman.
A 14-inch pizza can feed a family of four
He throws a block party.
Haven't you ever seen pig's tie? It's filthy!
Hey, S-tat-ue?
You boil the Hell out of it.
Penis potato 
Well, if you don't know I'm definitely not asking you to mail this letter for me.
They both start off sucking and blowing, but you end up losing your house.
Cunt Dracula
Deadpan
He's half dead!
I'm out, urine.
megasoreass
WATERRR THOOOOOSSSSSEEEEE!!!!
An avalanche
Because they all live in de-nile...
What is worse than a dead hooker? A dead hooker in your bed.What is worse than that? Hooker dies when you are doing that. What is worse than that? Hooker doing a blowjob before dying. What is worse than that? Hooker closes his mouth once and for all with your dick in it. What is worse than that? Opening her mouth with a crowbar.What is worse than that? Crowbar breaking.
coz they have RAM-allah
a Highjacker
He just couldn't budget.
Aspergers
Wipe your dick on the curtain. 
They get BUCKED up!
They're afraid of change.
:)
Edit: I'm so sorry. I had to exorcise this shitty joke out of my head before it drove me insane.
Little seizures
Pun-ilingus. 
She got assaulted
'Cause all their pants are half-off
The Dock
Took some tums
It's okay though, he woke up.
They're always getting hooked up
because jew wrongs don't make a riech
A nervous wreck.
Because he was in-a-cent! 
Ones filled with a bunch of baboons and the other just doesn't give a hoot during the day.
It must be 90 degrees because you're the 1.
Because you're showing high interest. 
M'laria
Ones a pant in the country the others a...
If you hit it its fog, if you don't it's mist.
Abercrombie and Bitch
A Sturgeon
Melon and Broccoli!
A Juan-Ton
He was losing packets.
Estas muriendo. Tu necesitas chemo. Sabe?
Because blonde guys are stupid too.
LAX
The father responds "would you fuck a random man for a million dollars"? The daughter replies " well of course"! Father says "ok go ask your mom the same question".  The girl returns and says "mom said for that much money, definitely". The father lets out a long sigh, "well sweetheart, here's the difference.. In theory we're millionaires, but in reality I'm living with a couple of whores".
Te-quil-a
Fix It Again Tony
A pastatute.
I don't have a Lamborghini 
Snowed-in
They planet.
It runs in your jeans.
Finding your dad's wedding ring.
 
Your mom is funny.
You'd spill your drink.
A pool table...
A leave of Absinthe.
Because Cops go there willingly.  Free security and protection.
Good mourning. 
Cap-a-chino
The home delivery.
It had a short circuit.
ARRRby's
A chew-chew train.
They both lost their pop.
He could not hit any of the ketones.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
Just Ice
Dos Eggys
at the stock market
BECAUSE HE'S BLACK
They heard there was water at the end
Hotmale.
....TAHINI!!!
A pugilist!
Lie to me motherfucker.
He was an oppressive shitlord.
Cause he was told to get a long little doggy.
Adolf Hitler's grandmother.
It doesn't.
At an orthodox wedding, the mother of the bride is pregnant. At a conservative wedding, the bride is pregnant. At a reform wedding, the rabbi is pregnant!
a dell
"Your mom."
He didn't even finish his j---
A father. 
He is so misunderstood.
He kept fingering A minor.
Becaauuuussseee 7 8(ate) 9.  You get it huh?
Finks
Relative humidity. 
An apple because the balackman hangs.
They have hollow weenies!
sneakers( iknow its old but its nice)
Haven't you ever peeled apart a hot grilled cheese sandwich?
Gatorade
They'll always swallow
Because you'll get stuck with the bill, and if you don't have money to pay the restaurant will call the cods on you. Fin.
He was alright.
With prostitutes, the more money you pay the more you'll get fucked.
Shiitake mushrooms.
Because it's frowned upon in Islam to smoke ziggurats.
A coffin.
A woman.
It was otter chaos!
Bling blong
Awarewolf 
Because the winner was a cheetah
fettucine afraid-o
Sleeping Beauty 
The Ku Kanux Klan.
2 jews found the same penny
Spare ribs
They don't have windows.
She said: no I really was asleep. (I heard this from Gazzo on Penn & Teller: Fool Us)
Speed while driving past a speed camera.
Mr. Buss
Because he didn't feel very whale
Because ghosts have hollow-weenies! Happy halloween :)
Well... I don't know anything for sure. But I heard he's a roofless killer!
Obviously the coin, the coin sinks!
then she would be luke's sithter
It’s just a little hole in the wall.
Its not hard. 
Because your mother looks like a pig. Because you look damn hot bacon in the Sun. Because I want to stuff you like Thanksgiving dinner. . . . More suggestions appreciated
"Not Metal."
A turban legend
Two bastards.
To keep its nuts dry.
Well jimmy, i could tell you what time it is or i could tell you how babys are made said the father. After telling him jimmy was shocked and holy moly i made you read all that crap.
Wa-tah! Haha.  I'll leave now... (Sorry if already posted.  I searched a little bit but found nothing.)
You will be [deleted]
Uncles
Are you taking off your make-up ?
Because they love BOOOOoooOOoOoOoooooooze!!
It's full of Boo's and Spirits.
Because the ref was blowing a foul.
It's nacho fault.
They're invalids. (Har har) Remember: with proper care and maintenance, your electronic devices will serve you well for many years to come. Reduce landfill; retain your devices.
Because you look like a 10/10!
Acne usually comes on a boys face after he turns 12.
osMoses
He ain't have no boo
Because OCT 31 == DEC 25
father's day
Because the stakes were high!
That Reese, uhhh, whats her name? Reese ....... "WITHERSPOON?" Nah she got stabbed with a knife.
I don't know I don't speak kangaroo.
because it has amazing drops.
ILLEAGLE activity.
Marty Mcsit
Dinners on me!
Nothing, you've already told her twice.
I had a joke to cheer you up... but I loss tit
5. 1 to screw in the light bulb, and 4 to remark on how grand the old one was. 
It's a habit. 
A: They throw them down the stairs to see what noise they make. 
Jew jew!
11, because it has another one.
[removed]
Neither of them could completely finish a race.
I'm not sure, but they both go out with shovels to find the booty.
A handful of sheet.
because that's what they measure.
Kill his family.
Lake Flaccid 
Schrödinger's cut
They both put their meat in 9 year old buns.
A dud of a spud.
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out the window.
Cut the rope.
A Klondike Bar
Because if they flew by the bay they'd be bagels.
8 nothing, 8 nothing, 8 nothing.....
When I'm weed you ;)
When its down your pants; then its a goblin!
I don't know, but it sure can wash a lot of dishes.
Gingers
"Wheeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee!!!"
Pantene.
I'm Arnold to assist you.
Because it is the only thing left that still belongs to black people.
A heavy drinker.
Trigger Treat!!
Their ankles!
They're drop dead gorgeous!
Because the instructions on the shampoo bottle said to "1. Lather  2. Rinse  3. Repeat"
Güdentite
Nothing... he's still stuck to the entrance.
Drive east or west on Interstate 70 until you smell shit. Then go south till you run into it 
A midnight snack A hot Breakfast
An ese.
Nothing.  You already told her twice. 
Jew jipped you!
Because he said he was a master baiter.
Too chinz
With a low-key event 
Awwwwwwwwwwwwmonds P.S. it's my birthday please love me
"You got a fag I can bum?"
Even the cake was in tiers!
The Zebra.
She got a Zebra.
A Gorilla
Bitches.
I’ll give you a hint, he remains very low-key.
Argh.. Sorry, I just killed it...
Neither did anyone else...
A waste. You could fit 1 more in the trunk.
-No? -Well, I do.
they both mount dead things
Allah mode
Scrambled Legs
They give a peck to the cheek.
Because Demons are a Ghouls best friend.
Try to kill the Mrario.
It's when you're in the office, bed is at home and whiskey is in the bar.
i have a egyption speed datin assignment due and i was just wondering if any of u could just come up with a clever ancient pick up line if u can including aphrodite. thanks for the help!
Because he, basalt-ed someone. Ba
To stop it from falling out. 
You pull down their genes.
Because all his genes were hand me downs.
They're both used to store nuts.
Because OCT 31=DEC 25
Because he keeps getting nailed to the boards!
Muscle mammary
Ship monks.
Because he's Arminion.
They haven't either.
Porta-hello
"What is life without a porpoise?"
Put them in a semite-truck.
Q
Their palms are white.
HEY! DO YOU WANT TO BUY A CHICKEN!?!?!
For an European 500 Miles is a long distance, for an American 500 years are a long History
Stephen Hawking 
Turnip
One if nobody is watching.
If you would have been at the other end, you would have...
Because they work for peanuts
They'll be back.
because its too close to the gas chamber
P.S. I Love You
Sexy kids
fitting in
Because he was grounded.
Because if you only invite one, he'll drink all your beer.
Shoot him again. 
To strike the Comy-eddy gold!
Because he had fallen, and could not get back up.
Just one, with ten vegetarian hotdogs.
Sorry!
Dude: It's very simple, I will stop my imagination
Donald Trunk
Because you can't drink and derive
It just ran out of juice.
Pull down his pants.
To see if he was done cooking.
He likes his drinks shaken, not stirred.
Fe-male
Total internal reflection.
How about now?
They are both living off of dead beatles.
Their sausages are the wurst.
He couldn't see the point.
Society.
A door.
U.C.L.A
Judith
They though it was Riel funny!
The boo-keeper.
About $20 a kilo.
Electro cute
I haven't a clous.
Lenin.
Because he's shellfish!
Over a long period. 
Someone who comes knocking on your at 8am on a Sunday and tells you to fuck off!
Because it's not Adele
No comment.
master bait
Pop music.
Im not too sure either but the flags a big plus.
The closer you get to the butt, the more flavor you get.
Because he couldn't find a date!
A pedo file
Your bike. 
They Rocked their doors.
Optical.
Because they are parasites
A conundrum
You can join us, as long as you stay quiet.
He farts
A one-pump Trump
Muzzle'm. 
Medium.
Because proper-tea is theft.
A 
OOOOOWWWWLLLL....
He made him an offer he couldn't understand.
The Gazpacho
"Plane" Bagels!... I'll show myself out...
Coma-toes! (I made up this joke when I was 10.)
A paradox.
Because he doesnt do well on the poles
It's Alaska, don'Juneau.
Yes.
How are we gonna find an egg in all this shit?!
Tripod of the year.
Dunno but I'm sure he made all rights all rights all rights.
A chunk
What do you call an Indian Pornstar? Ramit Baldeep
She doesn't because she's dead. 
QUIT Häagen-Dazs ICE CREAMS!
He had a reptile dysfunction.
Ach! I tink I'm losing mein Herr!
A dumbell
Yours :P 
Mufnasa
Mutton-schnapps.
"Hey you're in my son"
I don't know.
A niece slapper. 
An Oncologist
A: He was hit by a bus
Gloves, but he doesn't know that yet.. since he can't open it.
Dog
ratemypoo.com
A semenar
Sikh Beats. 
a leotard ~ 
Bok Bok Bok CHOY
10
Two! one to change the light bulb and the other to rotate the universe!
HE HAS TOO MUCH LONGER LEG !!!!
Because of all the cold fission it has. 
Don't worry, be hoppy :)
He was a homosexual. 
None.  They just let it burn out and follow it around for twenty years.
He dropped the hard 'arrrrrr.'
Politicians run BEFORE they steal your money.
Bob.
Shower Cream
A person that likes to tell anti jokes. 
Because they take away your house, your car, your furniture and everything you have.
Because before he leaves the factory they give him two test tickles.
He burped 7-Up
A cat.
They both have a problem with mass incarceration.
enormouse
They take "To catch a thief, you have to be a thief" literally.
They're both flat.
A full blooded Cherokee
A San Diego
.... you get a Hyperlink ...
That would be  wong on so many levels!
 warm
Hasta la pasta baby.
They will both blow the entire east coast just to get on TV.
Teacher: What is the difference between lightning and electricity? Alexander: I know – you do not have to pay for lightning.
Because it looks like you landed face first
By trying to jump rope.
He squeezed through the bars.
A raft
Because the princess was always on another Castle.
He was charged with battery. 
We've both been beaten by a black guy, let's not let it happen again.
Because every day is a sadder-day.
You fuck her. 
A badassassin.
Netflix and kill.
People look down on them.
At first they are wet and wild, but then they take away your car and your house.
Because, 7 8 9...
Put the word 'gluten' at the beginning 
The thot police!
Mango!
GERANIUM!
Nobody knows because they've never tried
Because you have a plumbum.
because I would love to find the area under those curves
He used to be a kernel. 
Jewbacca
Funky Bunches of Oats
"Please get out of the swimming pool"
I didn't even know it was sick
He always drop the bass.  sorry
Because you seem so much cooler when I'm around.
Eric Clapton wouldn´t let a bag full of cocaine fall off the window
You've ever gotten one bug bite not on your crotch (or tits).
A bunch of offended Tumblrinas 
It doesn't make cents
Because he only comes once a year
Her monstrual cycle
Because the body of Christ was a cracker!
Because he came-alot 
Because he had too many fans! (thanks George - aged 8)
He had a reptile dysfunction.
Because he's a Wrap God
Because the whole state is inbred
Retorta
He over 'd      
Climate change beat the ice berg 
There's twenty of them.
Piscine.
T. Modern pirates are most likely based in Somalia, and T is the most common consonant in the Somali Latin alphabet.
Show her a used tampon and ask what period it's from. Wakka wakka!
Because they were Turkish.
Because you need to be 21 to get in.
Beyblades.
Hydrogen Iodide
Because they want to
Erotic is when you use a feather, kinky is when you use the whole chicken
A Baa-Homburg! 
A row bot
H Edit: I don't like explaining jokes but since the first guy didn't get I might as well: When pronounced in a French accent it sounds like ash.
In bent-toe boxes.
The Camelot.  PS Booze helped with this and now I'm laughing alone in my apartment Edit: Went to class, came back, saw this. Me and my cat are thoroughly pleased.
He was soda pressed.
A cunning linguist. 
They lack chemistry. 
Throw it into a wood chipper.
They were listening to some Tune-as, but the music was so bad and un-bear-able that the man pawsd the track.  The bear was so furry-ous that he attacked the man.  He met a grizzly end.  
Solve the quiz or die.
Paranormals.
Shake It Off
Poor guy can't remember squats.
He tried to pull an oyster from the serving tray, but ended up pulling a mussel.
A 4chan!
A non-prophet 
Terry Fox
Wars end.
Ed. U. Cation!
I'm Waka-Waka-Waka-Walking here!
Netflix and Jill
I better not tell you, You Might spread it!!!
It has caused multiple cases of aviary cancer.
Elephino
If they are black you will not eat tonight!  (Sorry if this racist joke caused any offence)
No, not Shakey's you insensitive person. Besides having a crippling disability rendering him unable to drive without risk of damage to the pizza, he is also a B-list celebrity worth many hundreds of thousands of dollars. 
Socrates
"Enchantré."
You begin to feel a little eel. 
You drop the bass.
Door jamb.
That's how he mustard the troops.
The CENAry
I am not homophobic, this is for all the 11 year olds on reddit.
So he can have a rest after he gets tired from waking up.
"Watch the Parking son."
grass, i lied about the red part
Michael J Fox's signature.
Silicon Valley.
Because they'd been on the vine.
Cuntrytime Lemonade 
Depends on which country they're from.
None.....
Because the pictures were way to shaky......
Well if you didn't have the sauce then sausages would just be "a jizz"
You give her a test tickle.
So people can grow up getting used to pushing a Ford.
Heavy Metal!
Skepticles.
 mmmmmmmm
They were a small medium at large
They thought it was erection day
A: Three - one to change it, one to not-change it and one to both change-and not-change it.
One hundred people who don't do dick.
DODGE!!!
Everything. These two objects have nothing in common.
Ya'll think it's the Arrr but it be the Ceeee 
It doesn't allow you to tip
Because they're in a depression.
He likes to drive the dog's nuts. 
I I
So a guy goes up to a Rabbi and says, "Excuse me Rabbi, but this has been bothering me all day. What are those little hats that Jewish men wear called?" "Yarmulka", says the Rabbi. "God bless you," says the guy, "but seriously tell me about the hats or this is gonna buy the he'll out of me!"
They're pre cooked
They live in a school
Mountain women.
Arrrrrrrgo
The no man's land. (From me, but that's an easy one, so someone must have come up with it before. But as a frenchman, I'm pretty proud of it.)
If you leave yoghurt alone for long enough it develops its own culture
IndiGENIUS
To see how she looks like when sleeping.
Cos they've got no Seoul! Thank you very much.
Because the bank closes in 5 minutes!
A submarine!
Peas and hominy.
So far the police have found over 300 dead bodies.
1forrest1
Carrot-eh
This is a bomb in a bull.
A sex-offender bender!
Nunavut.
Quack.
A yoke. 
Visa or Mastercard? 
Because these colors don't run.
A concave man
There is no spoon
They got a lot of   Huh? Huh?
If they flew over the bay, they would be bagels :D
Sir Loin.
Because I want to do you on the table
To get a 6Pac! -7th grade me
He's never gonna give you Up.
Photographers.
Well, their flag is a big plus
A stupid snowflake  
Because he doesn't want to be spotted.
I need a punchline for a joke.....What happens when a feminist and a sociopath date? OK GO! 
ANALysis 
Change your name to time, time always passes no matter what
Ctrl+C
There she blows!!!
TENtickles 
Because getting fucked in the asshole when you are not horny feels awful 
They both take their pads off after four periods
We don't. They just come unwanted
Your butthole! *** This joke is awesome because it was created by a third grader where I teach.
A blueberry
The krypton-knight.
Because I thought it would last forever.
Ten tickles 
Debrie everywhere.
Because after I come inside you I'm going to be thoroughly disappointed and end up paying large sums of money for the rest of my life just to leave.
The Dark Knightrogen
Asking for a friend, she's a bitch. 
[deleted] EDIT: Yes! That's the joke!
Cuz.
Con-Descending 
It's Al Gore
Because he had   to go with.
Jewpiter.
It only takes 120 volts to turn on my toaster.
Can't recall where I saw that.. 
Deadlifts 
A parking lot. 
If it didn't stand on any, it would fall over. 
To get to the other side. Why did the chicken want to get to the other side? To get to the bar. Why did the chicken want to get to the bar? To get to the bathroom. Why did the chicken want to get to the bathroom? Cause that's where all the cocks hang out!
Cause I got a semi.
Light
A: She can't find the eleven.
ass-phyxiation
He was a blacksmith
He was killer.
Pumpkin
Stranded.
Once.
Dead silence. What's the sound of a one-handed zombie clapping? Undead silence. Thanks to my gaming group for those.
I think all of their products are toast.
Boo-bees!
Comfortably Dumb
Because they're all tight-fisted wankers!
Because, he's just dying to party.
They use Force quit.
Because they tasted funny.
They drink bleach.
Booooooo, Booooooo
He Park in son's space
Amy Swallowa.
Supernatural food. 
Hee brew
The guay station. 
It's over, man.
Because you're obsessive and loud
He made a spectacle of himself...
Christian Bail
To hold up their pants.
He was just a little beet.
A pumpkin! 
...it was Luke warm.
You put water in a pot and boil the HELL out of it.
A graduated cylinder
Stick a plunger in the toilet 
Al Gore Rhythms
Jigglypuff.
Mister bus
Pump-kin
It's Totally Clips of the Heart.
Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
Because he couldn't find the right droid he was looking for.
Haaand eeeeeeyeeee
A lunatic.
This tall.
Hay bail.
A metrognome.
Fowl ball.
He was feeling down
North Korea. 
Because they're really good at it. 
Mourning wood
It turns NO! NO! NO! into MMM MMM MMM
José and Josb
Carlos.
There was a fork in the road.
You call him by his fucking name what's wrong with you
They don't need to, they glow in the dark...
Because she's miss carriaged.
A Christian...
May be
Cus he looked one way, then another way after.
'Cause I really didn't need this cumback.
We've had to wait 2,000 years for his second coming.
He kept getting nailed to the boards!
My dalmatian after being hit by a car
None because they go barefoot.
He drank H20, too!
A boober!
Eat, drink, and be Mary.
Wave to him!
They were made by his distant relative.
Dead in a tunnel. 
You can say sorry at a funeral.
A MUGshot.
"Next!"
They SETI their alarm-y
A Private Tutor.
They're lining the streets in protest
Ayyyeeeee mmmaattteeeyyy.
Because they can get 4g
They each got six months
A yoke. 
It's Rose, bud.
WiiU
It meant the fall of Turkey, the ruin of Greece, and the breakup of China.
Because they kept falling through his hands.
A dog: He feeds me, takes care about me, gives me shelter... He is God. A cat: He feeds me, takes care about me, gives me shelter...  I am God.
Fast Food!!!  ...  I'll see myself out.   Credit goes to Safari Animals Oatmeal by Quaker.  
Depends how hard you throw them. 
Anne Boleyn's.
Red ring of death.
In the tsundra.
Delivery
He made a booo-ty call
House
The hard-wear store
This is all your fault!
It has a Dark Side, a Light side and it binds everything the galaxy together. Edit:Duct Tape I know, I was tired
The one who shows up with a dozen donuts and two cups of coffee.
(Students will most likely answer the color)  Then you say, "yes, that's one difference but there's another:  The White Sox play in Chicago and the Red Sox play in Boston!
You don't know none.. And here to learn one.. So when you are with your friends.. Or walking with your son.. Tell them reddit jokes.. thinking now they would listen... (to you) play it cool, play it slow.. No need to blow.. Take this further, take this far.. till sang by a star. (Improvise it as you like, don't care about the grammar. No rapper does.)
Ze-bra
Trespassers 
They formed a circle. 
He found his wife sweeping with someone else. 
Student - that you need a smaller bra! 
Arnold Schwarzenegger has already signed up, and said "I'll be Bach."
Because nobody would drink it if it was called nut juice.
The steaks would just be too high.
A youyou
He was nazi in the mirror as well. 
Just one but every time he does he causes a blackout.
son: what's a "dop Ted"? dad: you are, you are adopted!!  son: ... Nice one dad. dad: I'm not your dad. (Dad joke at its finest, credit: Kris Wilson)
To the st  club.
Ihop.
who cares?
None, you can't get any pussy in a smart car.
in an emergenancy
Because a black ball knocks over white pins with red necks.
So the German soldiers can march in shade.
A notebook has papers. -I'll see myself out now 
An apology from the condom factory! 
Smoke
They Planet
Whispering to an elephant: " I'm pregnant with you"
Budweiser your mother naked?
Michael Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzmichaeal 
Virgin Mobile.
A Jamaican proctologist
Because they can not see.
He got off on a technicality.
Because they've literally been running around all day
He uses the best ingredients Stay classy ;)
Because everyone secretly plays for the other team. 
Cause youre inbread.
But when they pronounced  it, the word came out "C-eh" "N-eh" "D-eh"
Whore's radish.
It's so funny I can't breathe  Edit: Woah gold, thank you kind stranger :D
Squats, squats, squats squats, squats squats, squats, squats, squats squats. Everybody!
Artificial Swedeners
He called his decision a no-brainer
A just duet.
Bravefart
He'll restart the nuclear power plant
Xbox SmartGlass
Pimples don't come on your face until you're at least 13.
Poor delivery.
Manet's.
Only one. But they have to sit in the dark room for a year, first, to make sure that the lightbulb is   out.
One's a Goodyear... and one's a   year.
Wa-TAH!
You don't see literature majors calling themselves Starbucks baristas
Many years ago, on Christmas Eve, everything went wrong at the North Pole. Mrs Claus was on the rag, the reindeer had the runs, the elves were on strike and Rudolph hit the bottle pretty hard. Santa was pretty pissed-off and about to explode when the little angel walked in with a freshly cut spruce tree. -- where do you want me to put the tree, Santa? the little Angel asked. Santa exploded:  And this is why there is a little angel at the top of the Christmas tree...
Now it's just called the T
Rhesus.
Just one. All he has to do is hold it in place while the world revolves around him.
A paragraph because he isn't a full ese (essay)...
I've seen some pretty crazy people at parties, but this guy definitely takes the cake 
Phillipé Phillopé Friends and I thought of this in French class today.
A hooker can wash her crack and reuse it.
She wasn't edgy enough!
Because they are worth it!
Because he is the liege of Baes.         
The two are Wolfgang.
A mail escort
No one told him he's black.
He was shellfish.  Woo! Been thinking for days trying to come up with some OC to blast your brains with.
She-mail. 
When it's for play.
This is my last resort.
The second lacks the hypocrisy of the first.
Multiple life sentences.
D
Seoulmates
He came, he saw, he came.
Inherited obesity
Acne doesn’t come on a boys face until he’s 13.
sand.
Sushi
You don't know whether they're awake or asleep. ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Because you a GLONASS man!
I conduit 
[deleted]
Her mommy was in a jam.
My Other Penis is a Vagina
She gets throne.
A liar.
Ice cream fits in a tub. 
Two feet of my cock in your ass.
It was a Free Radical.
Hi-C
A sar-chasm.
Intersect it with a plane.
Q: What do you call books about orange juice? A: 
The potato famine.
A reptile dysfunction. Thank high me for that one.
Because he can.
A cruiseifixion. 
Lyse.
Wait, it would probably come out wrong...
How do you know that you are dating a french horn player? Because when you kiss them they shove their fist up your butt
The cysteine chapel! 
She refused to swallow animal by-products.
The entire outfit is compromised. 
A private tooter
DENIM DENIM DENIM
He was de-stable-ized.
Bike-curious
Hey, wanna hang?
It has its ups and downs. 
Because they eat what bugs them.. Source: 3rd grader told me this joke..
boobs are just basically fat. if you like fat go out with a fat chick
He blew a fortune!
If we stick together we can stop this crap!
Zell, duh!
To look sharp.     Credit: 3rd grade me.
It turns out they were just blowing smoke up everyone's ass. 
early retirement
You stick a chicken wing up her vagina and it comes out clean.  
A no-bell prize
...because Karma is a bitch.
A wolf. I threw in the cement to make it hard.
Get in, Robin. 
Through ex-spear-i-mints.
Shi'a LaBeouf
Poll tree!
Because they're ugly and they stink.
He develops LEPTONspirosis.
Gronkowski
Oh, I'm gonna get mines.
Cuz damn!
a dildo
I want them all! "What's brown and sticky?" "A stick."
Not me
Because he likes to Hit it and Quidditch
Where are the udders? (Thanks to my three boys for that one!)
Hella
As old as trilobites.  
Achoosday
It doesn't matter where you step, shit is about to happen
Dad: Where is the best place to hide an elephant? Me: I don't know, behind a big rock? Dad: In a tree silly.  Me: In a tree? Dad: When's the last time you saw an elephant in a tree?
A submarine 
Jemima's Witnesses.
Concentration camps.
... Is the lightbulb plugged in sir?
A: MOVIES!
Because they knew it would give them a buck in good time.
A pizza can feed a family of four.
She's selling it for half off.
Because he was outstanding in his field.
one's really heavy and the others a little lighter!
It keeps baleing
So people do not take him as a conjurer of cheap tricks.
He didnt use the main stream
A newclear bomb.
Le Tour de Franzia
They're used to disappointment.
Because it's white and kills them.
Judaisms.
acne waits until your 13 to come all over your face 
Magnum P.R.
I've never meeted an person who had.
A Labrador.
If he was going to be impotent he wanted to look impotent.
A: Because 31 OCT = 25 DEC. Man is the best computer we can put aboard a spacecraft… and the only one that can be mass produced with unskilled labor
A paragraph. Because they're a short esé.
I don't know and I don't care
Trombones.
Oops, this was supposed to be for  . There's no punch line!
"I'm cured!"
Because it's fucking in tents!
Because of all the Hymns.
No, only targets.
A: Throw one overboard to make the boat a cigarette lighter.
Roll them into a tire and call it a Goodyear.
Get out of my son!
She already has something stuck up her ass.
nm was thinking of Instantgram
A Bobbitt
He gets stumped.
He heard the drinks were on the house..... I'll see myself out.
And why doesn't my girlfriend share this impulse? 
A Bobbitt
Cause I would only use you If I would get paid.
Blackneckbeard.
Because when he blows his horn everyone comes ;)
because he only comes once a year
Jailbait.
'Cause it looks like you hit ever branch on the ugly tree on the way down! 
Because you sure are an economic pest.
Because their horns don't work!
Spam.
Because why aren't you in the kitchen?
If he was going to be impotent he wanted to look impotent.
Because you're fun to run over with my bike
Because the box said 2-4 years!
Apples ideas.
Excuse me, but is this cereal Glutenfrei?
They quit smoking.
Because you are BeAuTiful.
It was horrible, all of the windows fell out of their new house
Because I've spent the last few years of my life building up an immunity to Iocane Powder. So, yeah...
There's like 90 seconds of ads so you won't miss any of the show.
Jon Bonjela!
Because it feels like I've seen these jokes before
My guitar doesn't yell at me when I snap it's g-string
He reached into his hat, and...viola! 
"Do you believe in God?"  "Of course! There's only one J.C. for me!" AND HIS NAME IS JOHN CENA!!🎺🎺🎺🎺!!  🎺🎺🎺🎺!!!
To not wake the audience.
I wont ever get you and everytime I try I feel embarrassed. 
because fuck off.
Chihuehue
'Cause damn girl.
Cause I wanna grind you up and put you in my freezer.
A La-Barad-dûr
CUZ YOU HAVE GROUND THAT JOKE TO DEATH
Cause I have had enough of your stupid shit.
Cuz damm
Because I want to slam you!
Because I want to spread you and eat you.
Cause you're getting old, fast!
Cuz if I was your dad, I'd be in jail.
BECAUSE OTHERISE WHY YOU NO DOCTAH YET?!
he was two chickens
A Niisan.
They both come on a 12 year old boys face!
Because you are baiting me so hard.
HERROine        
Let's duet! I am so proud for coming up with this one
Because you just slid right out of my asshole. 
Once you're done enjoying the legs, thighs and breasts your left with a greasy box to stick your bone in.
Cock Dracula, because blood isn't the only thing he's sucking ;)
It's called Trisedixagen™ And for men, try Ignordacoc™
Why doesn't our daughter ever come home for Christmas?
Because I just want to fit in..
Into the toilet, you piece of shit?
A blow up doll!
He gets a little cross.
Cub Scouts.
Cuz when I saw your face you scared the shit out of me.
Bearren.
A bird of prey.
Because you're a total 10/10!
In case you wake the sleeping pills! 
'Cause Jamaican me crazy! 
Because you're 10/10 I know we've been doing anti-joke pick up lines but this only comes once a year.
Cause' you're a 10/10
Because you're revolting.
Because he missed a split-end on a curl.
Mabul cake.
Too many cheetahs..
because you're hairy but I still wanna eat you
Error not long enough.
"What, when I fell from Heaven?" "Yeah, cause your face is really fucked up."
urine
My Amount Of Karma.
As John Cena because you can't see them.
I said, Damn girl are you deaf?
A lame joke.
'Cause you are outta this world! 
otterpop
Because I want you in my butt.
To pot the brown.
Because that ass is calling me
They both got fucked by Oscars.
They can both be a homo-genius 
'cause everyone is talking about the ride...
Because fuck you, you stupid piece of shit. 
Cause your the only ten I see
because chicken.
A ghost toastie!
15 years - life in prison. 
Probably not.  Opie delivered.
Because you look like it hurts.
Dr. Dre
Welcome to the quickee mart
I can't jelly my dick down a bitches throat.
when their fingers go through the toilet paper
Because he's not a full esé.
White Vans...
Because you have a seriously fucked up face.
The referee said he wanted a clean fight. :D
Inke
BalIslamic
Do it with SAS.
A pedophile does not get tax exemptions for raping young boys.
Your mattress is missing and, theirs a quarter on the dresser.
Because somethings are butter left unsaid. 
Hitler
Because you're really hot and it's making me nervous. 
you can find both running through the sewer after a nice hot shower.
Forty NEIN ers.
It was a case of two Wongs making a white.
Oh yeah a Yankees hat.
Caesar salad
You're the wurst!
I don't like beer.
Milk and Surreal.
A pedestrian.
I think they were called the Lincoln Logs.
Play-toh. 
Because he kneaded a poo.
He kept getting nailed to the boards.
everywhere
I'm going to a cheese and wine party tonight and the host has requested I bring a "mystery cheese". I'm hoping there's a puntastic cheese out there somewhere that may fit the bill!
Between you and me, something smells.
Greece!
Priests say Amen and gay men say ahh, men.
"Hey.. you're looking fly"
Amanda
Raped.
[removed]
Just tell a girl you love her and her first reaction is to say lets just be friends.
Sum-Young Ho
WOOOOOOOAAHHHHHooOOO, YOUR SAX IS ON FIRE!
LEGALIZATION
Amazon prime. 
He has a hollow-weiner.
Hood orient
Because I'd gladly replace my x with u.
It's only SPF
WASWAS
Water me lawn
A Highlighter
He invited her over to net fish and krill.
It's going to be all white.
I don't know. I don't have 2020 vision.
Sssssssss....
A Dell
Is it: A) memory loss A) memory loss Or  3) The Battle of Hastings
Because it rises in the morning.
"I knead you!"
It was degrating.
A Navy Bean
Étoupée
Because it wasn't 
Because he was dyslectric.
Mourning Wood
tooth-hurty
Nevermind, it doesn't really matter.
Cross Country
He did some seoul searching.
He gold arrested for animal abuse
...because they are set in the future.
Cunt Dracula
Yours.
Coonilingus
Have you ever seen a dumpster with four?
Because she kept throwing out all the W's
A dairy potter.
A cannibull
My favorite Michael Jackson joke.
She fell out of the tree.
2 Na!
Turns out Jet fuel can't melt Steeler dreams.
He had Gnocchi.
His wife. 
One of them you want to see a lot less of.
You wave.
Because there is no Turkey
Because everyone's full of shit.
Because they thought that they were the center of the universe.
A poo'et 
A: Because she grew out of her B shells.
What's her name?  Eileen  If she's Asian what's her name?  Irene   /goingtohellforthis
I'm not sure, but it was quite the pot twist.
This guy!!!
When do we want 'em? Time machines!
Pay-To-File
You get falawful farts.
2 na
Because it was abalonely
The cow. Because they're always in the  . 
Obviously not.
Say the drinks are on the house
Pubes
The sight of premature Ejack-o-lanterns in the neighborhood.  I'm a Dad so this joke is OK
Aaa bloody bummer
They don't like any kind of jobs
NonononononononononoNONONONONONO! NONONONONONONO! NONONONONONONONONONONONONONONO! (he can't.)
K
He was de-lighted.
Done.
It was wrong on so many levels.
who cares.
Assless chaps. Source:
Someone who takes everything literally
Because you are priceless to me. 
Because there is a lot of reposting to do.
KKK Slider
They never get old 
Do they come in bulk?
You push it aside and keep eating. Credit to a coworker that told me this last night. 
Herr Goebbels.
They opened up an incesteraunt.
You jump from the 1st one.
Girl: I don't remember, why do you ask that? Boy: Because my 'Interest' in you is just going up everyday......
You'll never de-fetus. 
The punchline
Your wife.
OP de-livered.
If it was invented anywhere else it would've been called the teethbrush
Plagiarism
White vans Edit: when   beats your joke 
Arnold Schwarzenigger
Scanned-in-avia
Shit in her pussy
Not a lick.
They are in-sects
Because he was generally known to be a square(ed).
21, because ET left Earth in a UFO.
Jews.
Because it was accidental.
Once you've seen Juan, you've seen Jamal.
Because if they were made in the UK they would be called microcrisps.
Cause she was a woman 
"There's no place like cd ~"
Because people get nervous when Mohammad starts counting down from 10.
Cause they work out. 
A squadratic formula, if you will.
Because he was bin laden.
A huge cat ass trophy. God that was terrible :( I just came up with it but I think it needs work. But I really like the cat ass trophy = catastrophy pun as a punchline.
It's just a watered down Manhattan.
Question: Why did the Skeleton cross the road? Answer: To go to the body shop.
"I thought you said you'd never forget...."
Someone's a lot less deadly with a normal potato.
A pizza can feed a family.
Courtney Love
zero, because none of them knows how to 
"M'otherland"
A police horse
There was a hole in Juan.
Because Jesus took the wheel.
*is
Stevie Wonder's speedboat.
You have to deal with people who forget to close their tabs.
Wookieeleaks
Inflation
A baby chewing on a razor blade.
Sparky
Me-sa lovely by scouting for gungans.
"Baby, You're a Firework"
Get a broom.
Because Sheeran away.
Razor
An   -  nflushable  loating  bject
I'm looking for the most cancerous jokes you can think of.
Erotic is using a feather....kinky is using the whole chicken. 
Black paint.
Princess Diana can't stop either
There's 20 of them.
Indian Railways
Wonder how the hell a car got into the kitchen
I don't know. When I turn on the light they're all gone.
Well he is back in town and wants you to give him a call.
Do you know how hard it would be to orchestrate a national erection
Coming unscrewed
You didn't hold down the pillow for long enough.
Telling your parents you're gay.
With a magic 8-ball
We're on a roll now!!!
Everybody's DNA is the same and there are no dental records.
It was rated PG-13.
A vegetarian.
In a riverbank :D
He was studying for a blood test
They found her head and shoulders in the glove box.
Because he was jah bless
A tea bag stays longer in a cup.
He said "Hey Hey Hugh Hugh Get Off Of McCould"
You get Talibanned
Because if they fell forwards they'd still be in the boat. 
...because he was using too much fowl language
"I have left my Mark on Mars"
Because every one that can run, jump or swim has already crossed the border.
A teabag stays in the cup longer! (im so sorry ;-;)
Because they can't even. 
....gotcha bitch!
.docx
Egypt.
Rectal thermometer tastes like shit
Rolaids 
A Jewish Fuck Bag.
A GHETTOrade
apparently it was quite brief.
A snailor. 
You add a bed, subtract the clothes, divide the legs, and pray there's no multiplying.
It boyclotts it
Quid each.
He will be Donald Duck
A: because she ran
Whas-a-matta U.
Faaps. ..someone had to.
Maine
"There goes my hero"
They can find millions of virgins just by going on Reddit.
They don't, they beat the room for being black.
A: Virgin Mobile
Ask them to pronounce it.
a paragraph, because he's too short to be an essay.
He was trying to get her pedicure. 
1100011010000010001000100101011101111100001011101001101000110011010110100000000110001001101011000001
Because they speak in tongs. I'll show myself the door😔
Cuz he likes Dicks.
Quatro cinco.
A pilot, you racist motherfucker.
You're going to have to ci-tris one out.
A potential Tinder date.
Mount Restmore.
Dumbledore, because Gandalf already said, "You shall not pass! "
Possession 
Because they don't have a leg to stand on. Note: I'm a right leg amputee and I made this up myself.
Mr. Bus
The headline was "Small medium at large".
A teabag stays in the cup longer...
A father walked up to him and said, "get out of my sun!"
Because the sign says no trespassing.
Massage a knee.
Crust
Cock. It is basic math. cockasian - asian = cock
||Islam|| ||Christianity|| sin  
Because when helium invited sodium and potassium to the mall, potassium said   but all sodium could say was  . 
It'll take me about 20 minutes to get hard, I just got laid by some chick. 
Because he always gets his martini shaken, not stirred.
He couldn't grow a pear
How would I know, I`m just a US Air Force Operator.
Being rescued by the Americans
Snowballs. 
Because it was stapled to the Chicken.
A coal mining company puts miners in shafts not the other way around.......
Sure, what's your phone number?
None, Even Feminist have standarts
They tickle the goat under the chin.
When she starts her sentence with, "A man once told me..." 
Why do people throw coins into fountains? I don't know, doesn't make any cents.
They go to Home Depot, get paint and rollers  Sometimes they hire private contractors  Lots of paint and tarps and tape, it's not that fun
An oncallogist. 
"Tanks for the memories"!
Disney movies can still touch children.
Sorry, couldn't conceive one.
A Militia Etheridge
No?, and you won't either.
"If you build it they will come."
Consuelo.
Four skin divers
I don't know, I just fly drones.
A peeping Tom snatches watch's
The best bang for your buck.
They give tanks.
Because it's mom was in a real jam.
Third time's the charm
QWERTYUI
Because the priest said "Bear, atone" and the bear thought he said "baritone" as in "play the baritone sax now". The bear immediately started wailing away on the sax, rocking back and forth so hard he knocked over all the prayer candles and almost snapped his own spine. All the priest could do was ask the lord for the strength needed to get this bear into heaven.
You can't milk a cow for 2,000 years.
To avoid being mistaken for feminists.
A sunken chest with no booty.
A frog in a blender.
They were making the PC screens unusable.
They both suck, but the vacuum has a handle on it.
Be right there as soon as I take care of a cock or two.
It's for old married couples where the guy needs to get churched up before going into a haunted house.
He wants a new bathroom door, but his girlfriend's dead against it
Antiaccident
So they don't have hairballs!
Moo many...
He was sofa king comfortable.
Clown poo!
I don't know, ask your mum.
With a pair of Caesars.
Being a first-person shooter
So, I thought of this this morning. I apologize if this has been done already.  A coworker of mine said his son is a huge Japanophile. I responded with "It's a good thing his hobby isn't walking or he'd be a pedophile."
I'm not saying I did it I'm just wondering if I should stop
Throw in your washing.
Or non vegan inmate* Depends on whether you want to eat meat or toss salad.
Because the audience gave him the clap
They both got six months.
Jesus. 
A Black Santa Claus!!!
Pilot season
Hollow-ween
I don't know but I hear it's an assload.
He had cold feet.
Every time your girlfriend goes to the bathroom you take 4 Shots.
Go for the juggler 
A dead epileptic
An Accordion. ...I'll, uh, see myself out.
Suck it's dick. 
Booo Hahahaha 
To make it Fall.
It's a six s (success)
Propheteroles
I don't know, i'm just fucking around.
He moved down-under!!
I don't know, I just fly the drone
It had muscles.
It's fucking intense.
A Freudian Slip.
The guy didn't pull it out fast enough!
He didn't know enough about inequalities
Helen Keller's face after she tries to use a fork.
You just have to start as a billionaire.
He went from having a Kia to Nokia.
Hide it in a science book.
Rick rolled.
They found her face down in Rikki Lake
....Beef stroganoff
rolled into a ball tights
Can I have fries with that please?
Are you Joaquin?
Heath Ledger.
I don't know, ask the Arabs!
Very satisfying.
Mein Kraft.
Both of them are hard to pull out of.
Don't believe me? Turn it off, and see how much the pilot sweats!
One. We are efficient and don't have any humor.
High queue-ality.
What did the scientist say when he created something super BASIC? ExtraOrdinary
A library, because there are so many stories. (Did Not Make Up this Joke)
"You're projecting." (From Star Trek Voyager)
He wasn't Italian, because he carried  work tools, he wasn't Austrian, since he had some brains, he might have been Swiss, since he was outrun  by a glacier, but most probably he was a  German, because nobody else ever walks in sandals in the mountains.
You smell
He just wasn't her type.
Shelf-ish
You don't need to sharpen it.
Lolli-pop
An Uber mensche.
Boo, duh...
Kim Jong-Deux.
You rarely have to meet their dad. 
Because his uncles are aunts. 
To rub peanut butter on your dick and then run through a kindergarten. 
mini-soda.
Because they know how to shut the House down.
Sexy children 
I said play pope music not pop music. 
Because he was a stupid twat who should have never become president. 
A Doge charger
A herbi-whore 
Stpehen hawking after a house fire. 
John Cenile
Rock 'n' Roll
Q: Why are the dinosaurs extinct? A: because they're dead.
A Mellow Yellow
The anorexic would not eat Chinese. 
I said I'm an orphan.
Ewe, no.
010100110110010101111000011110010010000001110100 01101001011011010110010100111111 I am a robot trying to pickup another well manufactured robot. Please offer me your assistance.
When he's a hillbilly.
So he'll finally have the chance to get a bloody nose.
In tennis, love means nothing.
An anchovy's cunt
Girls, like, have a much better, like, grasp of, like, similes.
...Lean Beef.
Because they don't like each other.
Remember when the worst thing about Volkswagen was that they made cars for Hitler?
Beef jerky 
How many trumps could donald trump trump if donald trump could trump trumps?
They both need to be changed after a while for the same reason
Udderly pointless
Because he doesn't want to be nailed to the boards.
Not being retarded 
because its the first date
Because they can't even!
If not, do you wanna go camping?
Ayy, you think it be "r" but it really be the "c". 
"Good artists copy, great artists steal."
One is a Cunning array of Stunts...
Snowballs.
Jetfuel.
My ass
An object oriented programming language.
Because he was trying to swallow the sea men...
Because they both drove Edgar Allen Poe straight into the grave.
A bird can fly but a fly can't bird. 
Both are laid by Mexicans.
JOHN CENA
The New York Jets.
Free-to-pray, pray-to-win.
Back Slash!
Mow-town.
M'lay.
A Basson.
I don't know. I just build the fence.
A llahu akbar
A police horse has an extra asshole on top.
What's worse than that? - When the baby eats it's way out. What's worse than that? - when the baby comes back for seconds
Eclipse it
Because it was an ill-eagle.
they can't even
They both wiggle when I eat them!
A stroke of genius!
It was just going through one of its phases.
A good start
Its called the eyephone.
Danny DeVito
Don't Stop Bereavin'
Try some sparkly earrings.
Because he was a fungi
Nice belt. :)
Britney Spears
There amazed how there are only 7 planets left after i destroyed URANUS.
They are both meat substitutes. 
Neither has he.
Kind Ling
Wataaaaah!
They both cum in quarts
Because you are happy.
It was right by 'your anus'.
Grandpa: Oh you know with my hands mostly.
They both Quackle!
A golfer goes   "damn" and a skydiver goes "damn"  .
They have Hogwarts
I don't think she auditioned for the movie, or was even considered for it.  And she was busy with "Sex and the City" anyway.
Pump kin
Algae-bra!
Because when he turns his girlfriend on he has to turn her off again three times. 
You get someone who stays up all night torturing himself mentally over the question of whether or not there's a dog.
Because people are dying to get in
[removed]
He got the sack..
Because Dey-go-bah.
One is a whiny toddler, and the other is a tiny waddler!            
Because they're always partial. I'm so sorry.
This is in my opinion the best joke I've ever come up with my self. My best friend since grade school's name is Sandy Johnson. (He's a guy, his mother didn't like him very much.) Anyway, here is the joke: What do you get when you have sex on the beach? Sandy Johnson
To get to the bar.  Why the bar?  To get to the toilet.  Why the toilet?  Because that's where all the cocks hang out.
Sharkasm.
Its a Place where Boy posts a JOKE and Gets no Response & If a Girl Posts the same JOKE , She gets Hundreds of likes , comments and Friend Requests and Lots of PM's .
Stick her fingers up your butt.
You can look at both for a second, but if want to stare you need to wear sunglasses.
Infidel-ity.
I can't jelly my dick in your ass.
Blow-up dolls.
Fabric softener. 
What’s the similarity between Income Tax and a Caller Tune? . .. … In both the cases, one pays the money and others enjoy.
1Forrest1 ...yeah we all saw that one coming.
I don't know says the alter boy, what is the difference between a penis and a banana? Doesn't matter, says the priest, Would you like to come on a picnic?
Ate Something! ("8 something", actually 8.306)
Because he wanted to make a difference.  My first original,  time for open mic!
He felt his presents.
Red Paint
People in Dubai don't like the Flintstones but people in Abu Dhabi doooooo.
Turn toward your side!
Pillow fight.
A striped tease dolphin. 
Priest: No, not if you don't know Eskimo: Then why did you tell me?
His rotten girlfriend split on him.
The woman.
-1
He thinks one step ahead
What do you call a Syrian refugee on the Mediterranean? Bob What does a Syrian refugee call their pet? Dinner What's grosser than gross? Two Syrian refugees fighting over a tampon.
A tuber Got any more? A boat or bus or an uber with a stripper in it could be a buber. If your driver is Jewish its a Jewber. If your driver is anonymous its a Whober. Oh and if you get an uber in the movie die hard, youre getting a Gruber
ME: I think's it's when you have an opinion on something and once presented with new facts you are open to changing your opinion.  Friend: Definitely, old people are not at all known for being set in their ways. Bystander ( Young Fat Asian Man): Old doesn't equal maturity.  Bystander #3 ( Some kid ): Does in pornos. Bystander #2( Some old guy...): "Age is wisdom," said the old fool.
It comes in your jeans.
Klu Klux Klam
Their Injun died on them! 
Because Washington still holding the axe
A LockSith. 
Amazon.
Because he was cohabiting.
He kept himself up at night wondering if there really is a dog. 
Anti amine's
A speed weeder. 
The pizza doesn't scream in the oven Sorry 
He's still there.
Me neither, just saw the trailer.
Smack an Ethiopian in the face with a frying pan.
because we can humpback at my place. ;)
Because they'll constantly shift the goal posts.
Hyphae
When you drop a load in, it doesn't follow you around for 6 months trying to get spun.  8) 
Canoes tip
Natural Causes
Afgan I pee... Stan he fer me a minute. 
A. Lesbi-hens
Because it sounds a lot better than "cunt-scrape".
With the level of crime and political violence, they will feel right at home. 
Have you ever seen a straight rainbow?
That's apartheid like to play.
They each got 4 months.
He left his foot on the clutch.
Because they don't believe in the KKK
SIM Card-ashian! (it might help if you say it out loud)
A nuke won't kill a cockroach
Denim denim denim.
My mum is going through Labour and my dad says: "Could Ukip already?"
The mile long club.
It got stares.
Whoops, wrong sub
You Planet!
The knife has a point
Contraception.
They work it out with a pencil!
Because once you go to sleep, you can't trust either of them to not sneak out.
Honestly Im not sure, they havent got back to me yet. It's been 3 weeks.
The pussy is on the inside.
In denile
Chrome.
Its called Hebrew.
1.
They're fucking assholes.
They were really obsessed with forms.
I dont know and I dont care
Well, the mess is the same but the annoying jabbering stops.
That was dill!
Clint Southwood
Take your time, there's no Rush...
A baby.
One means you're taking a load off and shooting the shit, the other is taking a shit and shooting a load off.
Because 7 8 9!
You give her a test-tickle. 
But then, I guess we know he's into that Fiat luxe.
There wasn't enough womb for the two of them!
High koala tea
Pubic transportation
Mass Transit!
Sweet pee.
he thought he was going to Arrrland.
2 Tightends & a Wide Reciever
Algaebra...
Only one; But it takes a WHOLE E.R. room to extract it afterwards. Double joke! "whole... hole." it's a play on words ;)
A stunk. My daughter made this up when she was about 7 years old. I thought it was incredible clever.
Okay, but it's not really kid friendly.
The inside.
A: The food tastes funny.
Nion
How'd you get their little legs apart?
dick van dyke 
One of them is actually wanted!
A sunken chest with no booty.
Rich AND famous, apparently
You can hide your own Easter eggs.
Burr-burr
It was capsaicin. 
Whatever you want
He had reptile dysfunction. 
Well, one's a kinky stunt...
Cause it's the balm baby!
I guess he got his fasts mixed up.
In Heaven, the cops are British, the engineers are German, the lovers are French, the cooks are Italian and the whole thing is managed by the Swiss In Hell, the cops are German, the engineers are French, the lovers are Swiss, the cooks are British and the whole thing is managed by the Italians
A box hedge fund!
Because he had a brother named Enos.
A STOOL Pigeon
Because it's the PHENYL CHAPTER :D I came up with this myself. I'm so proud.
Because he wears an eyepatch and has poor depth perception.
Because his mommy was a sneaker and his daddy was a loafer with only a penny to his name!
Au, yeah!
Obi Juan by Juan Kenobi
BRIANS.
on a cactus, the pricks are on the outside
Because he was outstanding in his field. Annnnd you all have cancer now.
Oxymoron.
Homeless.
Because they eat out every night.
Finding half of a roach in your food.
She's the one with dirty knees.
ADMIRAL ACKBAR!
Monthford and Son
7 Up in Cider
Their balls would fall out.
Good morning officer .
Aryan Air
Donald Trump 's tie
A week.
Bacon bits I came up with this joke 15 years ago when I was a dumbass teen.. maybe in poor taste with everything going on but thought I'd share.
The cloths hanger only solves one problem.
Because they are humerus
You put it in a freezer!
It's almost 3 years old
Over easy! 
I don't wanna be Obama self
you cantaloupe.  i just thought of this. probably not the first person to, but i certainly didn't steal it. 
He was always spiking the ball.
Nothing
"Radical"
You just walk into it
shallot 
You remove an electron from a Seal!
ayy ayy cap'n
That's where we keep them chained up. 
Senpie.
Seems like it's a big 6S
Reality. I'll show myself out now...
She saw his Onix harden.
Jews.
she posts her nudes in bbw subreddits.
Of course not. They haven't made a gig yet.
Cos it's tear-able.
A crack whore.
He went with a poof!
1080p
It's picked-out daily south of the border.
Growing up they hear the best jokes.
When the big hand touches the little hand.
fish are cool
Because he's married.
It was stuck to the chickens foot. 
The Fast and the Furious.
The Next Episode
I plow both.
Shoot lions.
The live ones wouldn't hold still. 
Parfour Sorry
Because he doesn't  want to be spotted.
The populations always Dublin'. :D 
It's an aunt- -him.
Graiins!
Drink this first.
NeIn.
Awarewolf
Snowballs
They both spew toxic hot air disguised as being good for Americans.
It tocked too much
Being struck by an iMac.
Jewpiter
They crucified the carpenter.
Hamlet.
One is fun to hit with a sledgehammer, the other one is a watermelon.
Sorry for a post that's not a joke but I'm interested. Here's one from where I am. These two ducks are flying over Ballymena. The first one says, "quack quack" and the second one says, "slow down! I'm coming as quack as I cyan."
Because they'll never be perfect.
A six-legged, honey-lovin', web-spinnin' 
A heart.
They have bear feet
One yanks for the roots, the other roots for the Yanks.
It's both funny and not funny at the same time, but there is no way of knowing if anyone else will laugh at it until you've told it.
Goosebumps
repost
Currently running crit reave block build  (utilizing abyssus and legacy lightning  coil). I'm still using a binos and hitting lvl 80 maps.  Ide like to upgrade, but at what pdps does a dagger actually beat a binos or is worth the huge  loss of survivability.
My favorite is: "There's a maniac living in our neighborhood. He goes house-to-house leaving severed body parts on the doorstep. He gives me the willies."
when pigs fly
Remove the vowels in his rack.
Of course. You reddit
The Back Hand
9/11.
Blow square breaths.
It's the space between girlfriend and girl friend.
In Tralfamadoloreans.
When you finish your face looks like a glazed doughnut.
Because...bros before hose!
He does crossfit.
The dishes, if she knows what's good for her!
Because they're for boating.
An anti-hissy-tamine.
Because they got homo e-rekt-us.
Spring water
Because he can't tell the time.
Juan vs. Juan
he was on a watch list...
Hose A and Hose B
$18.124 trillion
Cheque, mate!
If you need me, I'll be in my Lab.
Yes.
Everyone thinks it's 'R', but his first love be the 'C'.
Because it reminded him that time was moving forward. 
"Hey, would you like to get astro physical with my dark matter?" Edit: I hope Neil sees this. That's my dream. I love everything he has done for the science community.
They both have at least zero legs.
Allaht
One, but when he unscrews the bulb, the lights go out and your xbox is gone.
Hummuside
A bloody big moth!
Wiz Khalifa's tapeworm. 
None because you would have two balls in your eyes.
Aw shucks!
At some point both of them have said to themselves "This sack is going to make my career."
Because they think that thing on his head (his hair) is an animal and they want to eat it.
The HYAT
With a crowbar. 
Holding the pig together.
Hindu Kush
Times New Ramen
Because Windows 8 9.
One to screw in the lightbulb, stock four carts of supplies, and handle seventeen simultaneous customers at any one time for five consecutive hours.
A pioneer
Pananananana ni ni (to the tune of Welcome to the Jungle) And that's a thatinternetexporer original
her son's dick tastes like shit.
Velrow
They both have four legs. (assuming the amputee is missing a different appendage)
Give them a push.
What flavor au jus?
A Bi bipolar polar bear!
The headmaster.
He fell off the palm tree
Flambuoyancy
Dolphout
you clean your d*ck with the curtains
These days they're both hard to come by.
He was in a lot of pane. 
They will ruin the suspension.
Hide his food stamps under his work boots.
Because they are missing two towers.
She waits until midnight and plugs it back in. Disclaimer: I know it's terrible, I was very young when I came up with it.
2,50
nacho cheese!!
One is pale, bitter and starts off with lots of head and the other one is a beer.
Two scoops of ice-cream and one scoop of dead baby.
A Wookie mistake!
They have RAMallah.
A defetus
Dad: Drugs, usually.
They're both long tubes with an asshole at each end
He made a grave mistake.
\3. Prophet.
The Cysteine Chapel
"Mad Cow Disease" was already taken.
A prison
A cannibal
Because the 'p' is silent
Caesar
Because they do their essays.
A visit from the university board of ethics.
It was too Chicken.
Well, this morning I had a hard boiled egg.  
Ping Pong
They both have Transparents. 
Most people like the idea of pizza better.
Because it's grounded.
For better grip on the broom
CABRACADABRA!
Your sex life.
Because his arguments   against scrutiny.
Kareem of Wheat.
Just China be funny.
By using his Magic Johnson.
Repossessed. (Credit to my great-grandmother.)
2 Source: My discrete professor
Little Caesars. 
He forgot Tupac his lunch!
They're both usually busy doing one of the following: sucking, squeezing, banging, blowing. 
A paradox 
Boy:   Hello? I need your help! 911: Alright, What is it? Boy: Two girls are fighting over me! 911: So what's your emergency? Boy: The ugly one is winning.
"Ohio Satan!"
Their phones would get wet.
Lord of the Rings.
Time to get a new principal.
Because it was the end of all your periods.
A pat on the head.
Not sure who he would have, but I Noah guy.
...there's already something called Mad Cow Disease.
He had a real bad time...
They pulled it over.
If you are wise, you won't listen to him.
"(1 x 1 = 2) + 2 = 5"
Tastes great...less filling....TASTES GREAT!!! LESS FILLING!!!
A mode of transportation. :D
Just two, but how they get in there.. I don't know. (Stolen from an old Maxim in my dad's storage)
I don't know man, maybe check Comedy Central?
I'm having trouble getting it off the ground.
Allahu Clockbar!
Lutin.
For the food to be deported.
They were all dead.
He wanted to see time fly
Sources say that the teachers were alarmed.
He was too concerned with the tan gent.
He had to be rushed to the Mayo Clinic. 
"Stop cracking your NaCles."
PHISH
He was asking for directions for the "k-k-k-mart."
Allah Garden.
Short for words.
Where's the bloody point?
Cornhub.com
Very hungry.
He retired.
OP didn't deliver.
Sherlock-Holmes
When I was young I didn't like going to weddings. My grandmother would tell me, "You're next" However, she stopped doing that after I started saying the same thing to her at funerals. 
When you dads dick tastes like blood. 
The twin towers didn't autumn
Give her $300 and ask for the $299 discount.
reddit
I don't know and I don't care.
he had his dick stuck in a chicken
Any best joke
They are both full of crap.
He was winging it.
Lmayo!
He had to go straight.
im farting carrots, im farting carrots...
GOTTA CATCH JAMAL
I heard it was a real hit with the ladies.
Sneak up behind it and yell BOO BEE!
Two chaise...
A tahini bit!
You can only ran because it's past tents.
All the ones I know are cornea.
ant-ticks
Gingervitis Edit: redheads. I am a disgrace.
Because they shared genes!
A perforated colon.
One is really heavy, the other is a little lighter.
A Catholic will say hello to you in a liquor store. 
Beats me I just fly the drone!
Hebrew
Well this morning I had a PopTart, 2 eggs and a glass of orange juice.
Usain Bolt can finish a race. 
Sorry not sorry
The Lionfish.
You're ribbeting!
They were Snowden.
Someone who lays awake at night wondering if there is a dog.
The New York Jets ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Leia Princess!
Disabled.
I think it's two cocky.
Assprin.
Because Atomic Bombs are pretty bright...
prokaryoats
Camembert
King Kong Un  (From my younger brother).
Because he wanted to transcend dental medication.
He installs a parking meter on the roof
An actress.
He got a little behind in his deliveries.
He loves to go to Bankok.
He tripped on acid
He just loved drinking PBr
It only takes one nail to hang the picture.
There is lotion and used tissues laying around 
He had the axe, but he could only grow Apache beard.
Teacher: Did you finish you homework? Kid: Did you finish grading my test? Teacher: I have other children's tests to grade Kid: I have other teachers homework to do
I Fucked his uncle too hard!!!!!!!!
Bing fwong dong 9/11
Nothing, they were both stuck up cunts!
Because they are surrounded by drafts!
It's not out yet.
A fridge doesn't fart when you pull the meat out.
... Because they are full of Arab semen.
Independence Day
Manet.
Because they don't believe in higher powers
Because they always double Czech their work!
He changed his name to JLU 635.
Fiscal therapy
The French needed it.
Stroganoff
A Brave Sucker Best friends dad coughed this one up to his son-in-law that was native american.
To make up for a lousy summer!
*that
Carpaltunnel
I need to do a vowel movement!
Everything, dumbass
"oops, forgot the KY"
GayLick
With their iBone.
It hasn't come out yet. 
It doesn't matter, they all turn them the the wrong way.
Because it made her wait seven minutes before posting something. 
Lettuce pray. 
Baked Yazidi............ I know where I'm going after this life :(
Because it was charged with battery.
They were boldly going where no man has gone before
It was Nervous
A brain sturgeon.
When you swerve to miss a tree and realize it was your air freshener
well.he.isn't 
A snooker table
Rub some peanut butter on her gums.
A balloon.
I don't know why they even bother putting them in.
Santa. /cringe
Chocolate Ice Cream in July!
A Cantaloupe.
time passes
because he is a Norsissist.
... Take their little stones and brooms away!
Because they like to fool around with Chicsas before they marry.   (A shiksa is a gentile woman)
Neither, they eat out. 
The New York Jets.
I hope you like octopus. 
My son made this up and told it to me today. Look mom it's the "gay moon".  Why are you calling the sun "gay moon"? Because it is FLAAAAMINGGG!
8 a bit music.  
"I can't feel my face when i'm with you"
Because he was too far out mannnn.
Because it's easier to follow the path of leased resistance.
Because they will be at your funeral in spirit
Roger Daltrey.
Because most of them who can run, jump or swim are already in the United States.
12' noon in the cotton fields.
He 'incested'.
pirategay
He fingered a minor
Big Voss.
An extroverted physicist looks at   shoes when they're talking to you.
Americans cant milk a cow for 14 years.
Because he ate his carrion.
gingerly.
Luke warm
YOU SAID YOU'D NEVER FORGET!!!!
Because they ordered pepperoni pizza, and they only got plane.
I give a fuck when my computer crashes.
a canoe tips.
Pizza. Someone ordered two large planes.
getting your reddit jokes downvoted 14 years later because everyone is a crybaby cunt
Cause they're knee grows!!
69 
9/11.
Arrested for procurement of a minor. Trust me on this one.
The clam before the storm!
Maully. 
*Plans.
My phone number, call me please!
She was fucking Goofy
Because they can only count to 3.
Because there is a mile separating the two s'es. 
Mount and do
Student- I've already asked this question to my mum, her 5 brothers and 7 sisters !!
because they are bad at defending towers  ✈️✈️ 🏢 🏢
Nazis.
"Babe: The Final Chapter"
More than ten because my basement is still dark.
A cock that sticks to the roof of your mouth.
A Rod
a condescending condescending
Rice
Neither have I
Tied up the safe and blew the guard.
A community centre
An arm and a leg.
It was the wurst!
A canoe tips.
They can't bite because all that honey rotted their teeth. (From my 7 year old niece)
He breaks his nose.
Start a conversation with them and wait a few minutes. They'll tell you. Repeatedly. 
Boy Scouts come home from camp. 
"I can't feel my face when i'm with you"
Free Bacon!
A Deadbeat.
Poppadom.
Crash of the Titans
Cause they can't protect their towers.
A Boston Logger.
Taken, not stirred.
Whoreganic
Barbie-Q
The Dark Knight Rises.
What's for dinner Dad? Is it any good?
This is not a drill.
Just one.  He holds up the light bulb,  and the world revolves around him
Artificial celery
A little otter
Because it was two tired!
The defendant.
Make it run across Canada
Ciabatta very good!
Because they love those new boots!
Go the other guey.
Because she couldn't stand him.
Everything is cool there already.
'Elephino.
Because he lost interest.
I didn't cum in the pie before I ate it.
The Head Nurse.
A meating!
Amfetamines 
A Czech Republic
No? Probably a good thing, it's pretty tasteless.
You need to get ahead of lettuce
He was looking for a webpage!
He was just doing his doody! (Don't yell at me, I got it from a 7 year old)
Because it was two tyred..
Break his neck by slamming down the toilet seat, while he is drinking.
"Take your finger out of your ear and listen to me!" I saw this in a Highlights magazine when I was a kid.
Because it has software, hardware, but no underwear!
Muammar Gedoffame!
Ex-pair-a-mints.
A kaleidoscope!
A KitKat.
'hey babe, I've got a large pipe bomb and I never pre-maturely detonate."
Chicken Statutory....I'm going, I'm going...sorry but this is how my brain works before I've had coffee.
Because they got sin and cos to give them a tan
C4.
A dislocated hipster.
All of them.
Judge:why did u shoot your wife instead of shootingher lover? Sardar:Your honour, it's easier to shoot a woman once, than shooting one man every week.
"I Juan to break free" 
Greece.
Stick
Canabananalism
They were pitted against each other
Homiecide.... I'll
Because it's probably your bike.  Why would you throw a rock at a black man riding a bike?  Because it's probably your black man.
Antiquing.
No, but you will have a longer shelf life.
A co-pirate
Because they're half-assed!
It smells like teen spirit.
A small medium at large.
Emergen-cheese. :3
The dad who put gasoline in his daughter's sippy cup? Doctor's say she's going to be fine. She just had a little gas.
A croc o' shit.
They call him Little Seizures.  
to which he replied
Two of his fingers are clean.
The earth revolves around me.
Jerk off twice and if you still wanna jerk off, then She is.
Periodically.
if god can do anything can he do nothing?
A Guantanamo Bae Thought of this one earlier and just had to share
The firewood ain't been turned into ash yet.
He put his root beer in a square glass
You can't kill a myth.
Zero. Somebody already did it.
Because it didn't happen in 7/11
Reddit servers.
I'll tell you the answer tomorrow.
Google. Google docs.
A bikkie.
Because no one will take you back 
All of them. However, it still hasn't been changed because they are each working on a more efficient bulb and thread, followed by a lot of arguing.
Only one nights sleep til Christmas!
Has this been posted before?
A new season of lost is out now!
Fart fart fart XD
Termineightor I'll show myself out...
oops wrong sub...
A chronic math debater
Because no one dared to fuck his mother...
"You may get more ass than I do, but look at all the shit you have to take".
Brush their teeth!
 are easily threaded by one person,   with one hand.  Doot.
that guy's so last week
Beat it. We're closed.
He always came on time.
Mud flaps 
Guerrilla warfare
He had misunderstood the doctor when he said "I do probe Ono."
White Infidel.
They both circle Uranus looking for Klingons
"LINE IT!"
f. as in barf  because drinking can make people barf .. f could also mean fuck because drinking can make people fuck that is all
Endwarfins
People said she was making too much of a racket.
Depends what you smoke. (Not native speaker, sorry if it doesn't make sense)
They were fried in ancient grease!
They surf the Net On Yahoo. 
Because there is zero drag.                             Edit:    Q: Why are there no drag queens in space? A: Because there is very little drag and whatever drag there is in LEO is caused by miniscule amounts of athmospheric gasses and tidal forces! HAHAHAHAHAH!                              
The telephone rang while she was ironing.
It goes back four seconds.
A Thundeer
Because when they're not upright, they're grand! 
Paddy was planning to get married and asked his doctor how he could tell if his bride is a virgin. The doctor said, “Well, you need three things from a do it yourself shop. A can of red paint, a can of blue paint… and a shovel.” Paddy asked, “And what do I do with these, doc?” The doctor replied, “Before the wedding night, you paint one of your testicles red and the other one blue. If she says, ‘That’s the strangest pair of balls I ever saw.’, you hit her with the shovel.”
Because it had a 4-way.
When he was nein.
Redhots, DumDums, and smarties.
A suseJ fest
The wheelchair.
You Giraffed it
An abomination.
I don't know, I couldn't hear it over the sound of my masturbating.
Syphilis
The reefercussions
The hamstring.
In the atmosphere.
That is all.  You may laugh now.
Just one, but it takes a really long time, and the lightbulb has to want to change...
A pat on the head. 
Fish muck about in fountains…
BLE-YATCH!
Both have a very expensive retainer.
Have you ever tried pulling apart a grilled cheese?!
Cus it was sad.
Probably banana 
Because Santa only cums once a year and its down the chimney!
Shocked by his son's question , dad felt that he shouldn't lie to his son . Dad began ," son when a man and woman ..." After a detailed explanation dad finished. Then his son replied ,"Daddy mom said that breakfast will be ready in 60 sex ( secs ) .
Because he kneaded a poo.
creampie 
Don't touch my marbles.
Because then it'd be a foot
He goes chew chew chew... creds to my 5yo brother
Jk. 
They have the worst track record for finishing a race.
A Fassbender
The men provide the food and the women do the cooking, leaving the children to wash up afterwards. 
An addicktion
Rest in pieces. I'll show myself out now.
Hello, I'm here to Peru-se your inventory.
Because they can't remember the lyrics
2 in the front,3 in the back,and the rest in the ash tray.
A pizza doesn't scream when you put it in the oven.
A relation-ship.
McChicken-killer... Yeah I'm really stoned smoked a chicken killer and ate McDonald's
Because omg they can't even.
I've never had a garbanzo bean on my chest. 
One builds weapons and the other build targets. 
Because they can't even.
Because she couldn't control her pupils.
Water you talking about?
An impasta!
He pooped his pants!
You can tuna piano but you can't tuna fish.
Atilla the Hungry.
You go to 9gag.
Because the pilot was a loaf of bread. 
traaaiins...
A flat miner.
Fangbang
The blasphemur.
They both get ditched in the park
Pigmies are a cunning bunch of runts. 
One you'll see in a while, the other you'll see later. Credit to Mitch hedburg
He's a small medium at large.
They were just looking for Michelle Bachman. 
Special teams.
Fünf
3 blind mice
Cause I'm Hungarian!
Local Brazilian newspaper...   
A Naanprofit! 
Because if it had four it would be a chicken sedan. 
Ten Mennonite
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna.
What do you call a Hispanic with a Rubber Toe? Roberto
Because none of them want to be Miss I-da-ho
Scott Waddler
In fact, I heard, in his hometown, he's also called David BaGuetta! HA
You can hear someone scooting aboot in it
The one that can carry 2 cups of coffee and a dozen donuts
You pokemon
With dill-dough. Credit goes to a J. Cain
Make a seizure salad
Hey guys, I just recently found out that my friend is an idiot. I was talking with him on Facebook and I was telling him about this game that was free online, and he says "I'm on my way to see my girlfriend". I'm sorry but WHAT? well I have a fish tank. Feel free to comment down below your stories about how you realised your friend is an idiot. 
conjoined twins.
[removed]
A toaster can only burn two things at once.
A: None they have a guy for that comes on Tuesdays only uses reproductions of antique bulbs
To get a long little doggy. 
A pilot, you fuckin racist. 
Help me finish with a clean [PG rated] punch line.  More info: Basically, I'm dating and I like to say bad jokes. But if a girl finished my joke for me then I want to be able to catch her off guard and say ... "you like bad jokes..." And then land the punch line.
Wall Street
Am I Groot?  (Credit to my 7year old son)
Sitting at the back of the oven..
...A pilot you racist piece of shit.
No, seriously.  Cuz I bet it's a lot
Stand up!
Hebrews it
Limbo. They don't set the bar very high.
You have now. 
Hugh Janikabollokov
They take all the green cards
You put his welfare checks in his work boots. 
A hairbrained person.
Because his family got murdered.
Because deep down they're really good people.
Nothing, you've told her twice already
He fell on his ash.
When Greg woke up, his mom had left a note reading, "Please put a load in the washer"
Because it's a catastrophe :-) Yeah, ok, I'll be going now. EDIT: removed explanation.
The Thalidomide Arms. 
People don't split in half when you fuck them
Because Jesus saves. 
They say Jesus fed 5,000 people with two fishes and a loaf of bread. That's not a miracle. That's tapas.
the same way you would a white person.... you racist.
 and   music!
One where you've been a prick to the waiter
PEOPLE, I NEED YOU TO BE HONEST WITH YOURSELVES. WHILE LATHERING IN THE SHOWER OR IN ANY PERSONAL MOMENT, DO YOU HAVE AN URGE TO STICK YOUR FINGER IN YOUR ASSHOLE. HOW MANY OF YOU HAVE DONE SO AND FIND YOU CANNOT STOP?  THERE IS NOW HELP FOR YOU. COME TO A BUTTPLUGGERS ANONYMOUS MEETING FOR HELP WITH YOUR AFFLICTION.  REMEMBER: TAKE IT ONE FINGER AT A TIME
Fuck her!
Give them real self confidence. 
I personally think it's funny, but it is pretty fucked up.
Is it: A) Holy Loaf B) Sacred Baguette Or C) Naan of the above
Turn it upside down
to get rid of his tesserection
Short and sweet
Heelium! I'll see myself out now...
None.  They prefer to cry in the dark.
In the ground.
Her name.
It was set to come out next year but the plan was aborted
Many photons make light work.
Sorry that I screwed up  .
He was caught stroganoff
They say he really let himself go.
Cause I'm Putin deez nuts on yo face.
9/11
It isn't known, never tried.
One fucks an asshole, the other is a fuckin' asshole.
You could say... He went out in a glaze of glory  (•_•) ( •_•)>⌐■-■ (⌐■_■)
........to get to the other side
At least the one I fucked did. 
Jared fogle
Hey little boy, want to buy some candy?
An elephant.
Well Im not sure, but I do Noah guy.
3: One holds the light bulb, and the other two spin the Chair.
Nevermind....  It's too long.
A Lickalotopuss!
Beacuse he drank the coffee before it was Cool
...it's this really obscure number. You've probably never even heard of it. No big deal.
He was on the lamb.
-To render the building on the other side. Console Peasants :DD "Shame of galaxy"
M80
Because cross products don't commute!
My mother asked me that question and my father happened to overhear.  He replied, "Your wife, of course." Both my mother and I asked him why.  "Your mom can float fine on her own." TL;DR: My momma so full of air, she floats on water. 
Because there is a pot at the end of it.
Cuz dis-place-ment a lot to him.
An Instagram. 
With force-fields
Because he didn't wait for it to be cool.
Bipolar
I Hershey is in a new movie.
Come by my place later, we'll crack a cold one. 
Eye cunt bereave tits nut batter.
Yeah? Ok, let me see your driver's license. (My buddy's grandpa told me this back in high school the first time I met him.)
Unix
nothing, they have never met!
An account-ant.
Just kidding he did
Because everyone does that already.
soap on a dope
Only the jews smell bad when you cook them in the oven. 
He was a Monday morning kinda Gueye.
He breaks his nose
Between the two of us we can make a lot of money.
Twerkey
ask about his routine.
Because of all the sand which is there.
One has whiskers and smells like fish. And the other is a fish.
The truth is out there.
Depends.
They both ride bicycles and go on missions
He felt really out of place.
Nobody wants to be I-da-ho.
A pilot, you racist motherfucker.
When it's slightly ajar.
Delete my subscription. I just won the lottery.
Fresh prints
The taste
a pilot, you racist
You only need one nail for the frame
There's twenty of them.
Earthquakes stop shaking
She had it coming.
Pork Chop!
Cause pepper makes them sneeze.
'Ello, 'ello, 'ello!
Goodbye yellow dick road 
They fence it.
"At least I'm not black"
At night you can only see the eyes and the grill.
2:30   (Tooth Hurty)
Mothmatics
Because it scares the fuck out of the dogs. 
He was home free from the start.
Rapeseeds.
Boil the hell out of it.
he made an ass of the first two. 
A Yankee is the same as a quickie except you're by yourself
1 Who's there? 2 Allah 1 Allah who? 2 ALLAHU ACKBAR
Boner kebab.
Because he four feet.
Beat it, we're closed.
...not 7, because it's still dark in my basement
Sexual references.
A nail gun
To the morgue.
Give them earth control pills heh heh heh...
They are both mentally challenged and "just felt like runnin'"
Most smokers know and acknowledge the fact that they're slowly killing themsleves.
Mrs. pacman. For 25 cents that bitch would swallow balls til she died.
You get 8 more.
She worked it out with a pencil.
I'll sue you in hell!
Molesterol
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna!
TRANSportation
He had no arms. Sorry that joke was stupid, let me try again. Knock Knock "Whose there?" Not Billy 
It's fucking intents. 
An Hippic fail.
"Houston, I have a problem."
Straight up.
"Are we there soon?" "Not jet."
The  step.
A pilot, you racist!
Because you end up with a ring on your finger.
Drought it. 
It was an udder catastrophe.
A group of 40 other suicide bombers.
Because they always diode. 
because he was outstanding in his field
Because they are micro-cheap.
Nothing; they eat out!
Tronald Dump
That he only has a 6 inch.
How many Democrats does it take to screw in a lightbulb? None! Because Republicans are women-hating racist homophobes that want to suppress your vote and Fox News sucks!
"Welcome to my field."
A hookar.
Old
Aunt Man
Everywhere
Irene.  (Normally start this as a two part joke with, "What do you call a woman with... Ilene." Ha... But figured everyone had already heard that).
I like to Fuck Pigs !! Lol !!
"You can have my beer if you let me go."
Fowl Ball
The sex is the same but the dishes start piling up in the sink.
roses hurt when your dick is between them.
 SUCK                   
Ask your mom
Bn.  (B "atma" n)
They always miss the shot
KID : Why some of your hair are white dad ? DAD : Every time a son make his dad unhappy , one of his father's hair turns white .... KID : I now understand why grandpa's hairs are all white.
Alien VS Predator
Because movie makers are basically doing a number 2.
The Yankee comes to the south for a visit and quickly leaves.  The Damn Yankee comes for a visit and never leaves.  The God Damn Yankee comes for a visit, never leaves, and then goes on and on about how much nicer it was back home.
The CSS of this subreddit
Because he's alive.
To really understand acids and bases, you need a pHd.
Ken always came in a different box. 
Breasts don’t have eyes.
An HTC One M8.
Marm'lady
1 if you hit him just right
The ultrasound people.!! lol
Because they're really good at it.
There are no dental records and all the DNA is the same.
He ate a 5 year old weiner
One is really heavy, the other is a little lighter.
Critics are calling it sensei-tional.
Me: Is your name Gooogle? Other: No, why? Me: Because you have everything i'm searching for. I guess Reddit is not into being cool, getting laid, and learning what women like using the best pickup lines based on all the down votes. Whatever... 
Remove the ring and your house is gone.
If we don't get some support soon, people are going to think we're nuts!
Ask him to take wok.
I had an Orange Crush.
"Well I'll be a monkey's uncle!"
I'd tell it, but it'd go over your heads.... CORNY JOKES THREAD!  OP will deliver knee slappers and humdingers!
Donor Kebab
A Casual Tee.
Milfheim
Just the tip.
How'd you get your head between it's legs??..
Airheads
Nothing, you already told her 37 times.
Get off me Holmes!
They'll always out number you!
You intersect it with a plane.
It's funny shit!
A flat minor
McConaugHAY
They have nein lives!
Riceist. 
Wanna go ride bikes?
To get to the other side!
One's a crustacean and the other a crushed Asian.
🎺
He bombed the exam.
Dad: What do you call it when you got nuts on your the wall? Brother: Wall nuts.  Dad: Okay, what do you call it when you got nuts on your chest? Brother: Chest nuts. Dad: Alright, what do you call it when you got nuts on your chin? Brother: uhhhhh.... Idk what? Dad: A DICK IN YO MOUTH!
Viet-nom-nom-nom-nom
Because 7 8 out 9.
He is a grammar Nazi.
Morpheus unhappy.
because it's stoned. 
Independent
Fedora the explorer.
Voldetort.
A parroty error
It becomes a high-lighter!
They're Aussielating. 
They train them-self a lot.
Apparently he lost his ass and had no place to go.....
They can be rather one-sided.
They failed on a consistent bassist.
The holocaust 
Moo money moo problems
because 7 ate 9.
Trust me.
kar-a-TEA HA
A cockadial
The files are always smaller.
He had only one pupil.
Alzheimer, Grandma. 
ON WHAT AUTHORITY ARE YOU ASKING? I DO NOT CONSENT TO SEARCHES! AM I BEING DETAINED?
More guns!
They push back harder.  (Told to me by my NZ step father about Australians, of course.)
A wharfanage
He wanted to be on time.
New York Jets
A shot in the dark.
A parking lot.
Because they will steal all the green cards.
Because he Ramparts the red sea each month
feelings. T.T
Half a Romeo. I'll show myself out.
Because his arms were blown off.
gloves! nah don't know, it hasn't opened the present yet
nun
They would finally be right. 
The third grade.
Because if you run behind it you get exhausted, and if you run in front of it you get tired!
With parts unknown.
The Ottoman Empire.
ehh lmao
They all like cantaloupe.
Walk him and pitch to the rhino.
You died of dysentery. Sorry. 
The new softcap limits
Win-Rawr.
Mirror inspector.
ET looked better, smelled better, learned English, didn’t claim benefits, had his own fucking bike, and wanted to go home!
My daughter just announced to me she is in d-Niall :-)
Beater
They just can't come to terms with it
It's called al-gore-rhythms.
cause you make me hard
A polar bear
With a fuse-illi.
Brothers from Another Mothership.
Peking Dick
Linoleum blown apart
A napster
Telling your parents you're gay.
Their jobs get a lot easier when there are no reactions
Just toss em banana, they will suck for it 
Heblew
French press
He joined the Que Que Que
Penny ...
Being black. 
any male bird
A Dictator
Why did Jared go to a Goat farm? He heard there was lots of Kids there.
A fart taking the elevator.
deez nut!
He kicked two 7-year-olds out of his bed.
He always burns the franks.
José
Little Caesars 
Nothing. It was winter and she had mittens on.
Their last big hit was the wall
Once you know Juan, you know Jamal 
Took me 10 years to find it, but when I did; killed it! 
a liquor cabinet. 
what did the boy with no arms an no legs get for Christmas? .... Cancer
A hot pizza ass! Like... like a hot... piece of... you get it.
It looks they took different directions
They both slowly remove clogs.                
Just one. But it takes five episodes.
Because Redditors aren't known for keeping a level head.
A youtuber.
So he could creep hard on uranus
3, and the rest are true stories.
Kung Boo
Shaft.
The Godfather
because she was a woman!
He had Schwimmer's ear.
Tell it a yolk.
A Curtis-y flush
where the woman hires the devil to pull the priest out of her son.
The woman... Im sorry
He got him diss barred.
An oompa loompa with a sore throat.
:D
A home-cooked shower. 
Dad can I go out dancing with my friends tonight? Sure, but not with that miniskirt you're wearing But dad why not? Cause I can see your cock, George
On a jpeg.
Dad! For the umpteenth time there are NO horny girls in this world... Unless they're lesbians.
Because his life was in shambles. 
Bark Roofalo
Menard's!
It depends on the flight delays.
Because there was no cotton in Canada.
Because they can touch A Minor
One's really heavy, and the other's a little lighter. - 
Ms. Pac-man. For 25 cents she would swallow balls until she died.
Def Leppard 
It's a habit that stuck from when they were slaves.
"Hello, ladies"
"Yes" replied mother earth.
I just want to belong
Popeye's
-- My phone is turned off.
None, they just hire a mexican to do it.
European.
Its right ear!
Reddot.com
'A' lmao
Fritos 
Juans upon a time.
"Troll in the dungeon!"
Knight time
None, they just beat the room for being black.
Fission Chips.
Insert punch line below if needed 
Two Spics on a stick! Edit* Spelling  R.I.P Title I P
Threaten, "I'll tell your mom!"
The Mediterranean Sea.
I Fucked your Dad !! Lol !!
A mass-debate.
Still, water.
I made jokes for last years sophomore election but can not think of any for this year. Any help redditors?
A paragraph. Because he's not quite an essay.
his hobo
They told him he was good at deriving
you may think it's R, but his true love be the C!
Well, it worked with the slaves.
Took a lot of balls.
Chez Guevara
He used to lay in bed at night worrying about why he constantly weighed a steak.
None, they just make the nepalese do it.
Black humor - 12 children in one trash can Morbid humor - 1 children in 12 trash cans Brutal humor - 12 trash cans in one children
Just two.  One to politely ask and the other to politely help.
Eventually, Marty McFly stopped going back to 1985.
Because everyone got fucked.
A guard and hoes.
Bark-o.
Arkansas
They both got 6 months.
An Iceburgh.
He did Nazi-it coming.
A selfie stick.
Four counts of defacing a national monument.
It's a game where you get challeged to solve a puzzel. The catch is that the puzzle can't be solved and the only way to win is to solve the puzzle. Until then you'll remain mentally challenged.
6 million Jews 
Coz their eyes opened.
Because she heard that Seven eight Nine's pussy. 
S ry!
Cause it got al dente'd up!
O My GOd! I am so drunk.
After your done with the thighs and breasts all you have left is a greasy box to put your bone in.
Anubis (If you don't get it, say it slower.)
Audi
It takes longer to pick up when they drop it.
Isle of view
Mom: I don't know dear, ask your father.
Thanks for the gold kind stranger!
I'm a professional before model
Abominable
Because he was shellfish.
Incum
A Party Pooper
A Luncheon!
Dam.
They all look the same.
The one with the lowest mew
Because they are cheetahs.
This one's best if you say it out loud.  What's the plural of octopus?  Octopi.  What's the plural of compass?  Cumpie. 
Terminal illness
Hope you fell better tomorrow.
Athen
A bicycle for musicians.
To get to the...   side.
They both start with a lot of sucking and blowing, and in the end you lose your fucking house!  thanks @Canadianmomma 
A notsee
For all we know, they would probaby never show up.
He was too far out. 
None. They live in eternal darkness.
The 100 Meter Sprint
A chewing gum.What did you think?
a pun
Mariguana
It's white and on their land.
Time to make America Grapes Again.
'Do you want a 6 or a 12 inch one?' I heard this joke on Bill Burr's podcast.
None!
you've gotta hand it to her...
Take your girl and your dog, and lock them in the back of a car, return in 5 hours, which one do you think will be happy to see you?
¡No mames!
A pirate was kicked in the nuts and he went, "Arr! Me-nards!"
They didn't spend all that time in the closet doing nothing!
It's hard to put down!
Or are you all left?
In A minor.
Apparently he went to Jared's.
A softball player
A cow with short legs.
Two bees. What's worse that two bees? Three bees. What's worse than three bees? The holocaust. What's worse than the holocaust? Four bees.
Jared doesn't care for bush
Because when they arrive they are wet and wild, and when they leave they take your house and car
Reincarnations!
Yeah, neither.
They both need to be flipped every 10 mins, but only one turns pink when its done.
He molested his sister behind his other sister's back.
African American you racist fucks
I just found a turnip version, but they do a fortune one, too.   
Mariiguana
Hey. Watermelawn. 
Because if it were called Father Nature it would be a lot more predictable.
He wanted to git a long little doggy.  
Dale Earnhardt jr.
Spirit week. 
Because he was an eye wetness.
A Headphone
That means it is a sin to go to Cos and get a tan.
Antibiotics.
In case they run out of food.
Because calves are below-knee
Fifty shades of eyy
He is really anti-semantic...
In front of a busy urinal.
[Deleted]
You get to meet Jared Fogel.
Because when they immigrated from Italy, customs stuck a label on their lapel reading ToN.Y.
Jah bless.
At an apathycary!
Megan slaw
You're so vein.
"Bonjour"
I don't know, sometimes radicals can be irrational.
Her name
Because fruit flies
Teenage Dream
Well hung!
Tom wants his balls illegally deflated on the field and Ben wants that off the field.
A fist taco. 
Shellfish.
A turdle.
(Mom, sad): He went to Jared.
Because there were twenty of them.
“What is orange, burgundy, yellow, blue, violet, candy-apple green, magenta, turquoise, fire-engine red, teal, and ivory . . . and tied up in my backyard?”
The guy was taking nails out of his bag and hammering them in to the frame, and the foreman was watching him. Every so often the worker would take a nail out of the bag, look at it, and throw it away. After a while the foreman comes over and asks why he is throwing away perfectly good nails. He replies, "Some of them have the head on the wrong end." The foreman takes a deep breath and says, "You idiot! Those are for the other side of the house!"
I wub you
19 Kids and Counting
White Power-ade
He went to Jared
A wok.
10. 1 to change it and 9 to say they could have done it better.
Only a Sith deals in absolutes.
Por flavor
Neeeeeeoooooowwwwwwwwwwwwww
He was a lion.
Beacause he always shoots at the black one.
Fo drizzle
He went to Jared. 
He denied Jesus 3 times
Phony
Because he always get nailed into the boards.
Because she just gave her last blow job.
A Nguyen Nguyen situation.
You'll get hearing aids.
Spandau Ballet
He prefers his gut when it's down 45 pounds, and his junk when it's up 45 pounds.
A Subway full of live ones. 
Subway
Dough fucking.
a fsh
Apparently he prefers way less than the standard 6-inches...
Aged meat between fresh buns.  And I'm burning for that one...
He didn't want to seem phlem-bouyant.
Does it matter?
A cloth.
At the Retail Store
Yeah, because they keep   from underneath it.
To get fucked by a third party?
Tweetment!
Black people took to the streets.  White people took it to Reddit and complained about how nobody is doing anything about it.
If there were one more it would be two-farty!
They kept trying 96 but couldn't make each other cum.
He likes to eat a little   fresh.
So he could get into smaller pants.
She comes from verminy
Because he didn't study.
Easter
.......2 Mennonite**
Because a vibrator can't mow the lawn! :D
Pizzas don’t scream when they are put in the oven!
Why are pregnant women given priority on public transport? How do we know their child won’t be an asshole? An asshole who won’t give up their seat to a pregnant woman. What an asshole that person would be. I’m not taking that risk.
How the hell should I know?! I'm not a scientist!
he ran for president
Because they take everything with a grain of salt.
So your asshole doesn't slam shut.
2 girls 1 muff
A right a right a right!
It's not funny.
Wife: "I look fat. Can you give me a compliment?"  Husband: "You have perfect eyesight."
I dont know but saying fucking sentences is a sure-fire way to getting downvotes. (based on the facdt that if you even mention an abuse on reddit in a sentence like "I had such a fucking bad day" is enough to get you a torrent of downvotes).
Light is triggering, shitlord. DOWN WITH THE BULBTRIARCHY
For setting up illegal shell companies!
You kick his sister in the jaw. 
Because they're always Inuit!
Doctor: I'm so sorry. The accident has left her in a vegetative-like state and I don't think she'll ever recover. She can barely move her limbs, if at all, and will be confined to a bed or wheelchair without the ability to ever walk again. You'll need to care for her 24/7, clothe her, feed her, bathe her, and she'll have no control of her bladder or bowels. Again, I'm so, so, sorry...  .....  .....  .....  Just kidding! She's dead.
One you squeeze to get cider, the other you get 'side her to squeeze.
It twerked.
Where they sit on an airplane.
Because Sharon is Karen.
A Brojob.
he was chuffed to bits.
Eric Clapton would never let cocaine fall out a window
a hopscotch
It was outstanding in its field.
He was the first one in the country to look up.
In his poo tin 
They both treat their demons with spirits!
A hissy fit. ba dum tss.
A d orbital
....Sandy ego.
Because all they want is tonics and dominance.
A hit Broadway show. I miss drew.
Old Bay.
He was playing with a cheetah.
Can I push your stool in?
Carbon dating. 
Trick question.  Feminists can't change a thing.
three, but they're really one
A revulva
Someone told him it was 2's day.
I feel sorry for you son, I got 99 problems but you got imaginary ones
J
They never shut up about it! :D
ready pool of girls with daddy issues 
"Not Pregnant"
Neeeeeeeeooooooowwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwww
He goes back four seconds!
Don't stick around to find out!
It's fucking close to water.
Hogwarts
Jew-Jew
Nothing. They fast
Because of the triggers. I'm sorry
Pew pew pew!
Wrong.
He had a hole in one.
The harder you hit them, the more english you get out out of them.
Sure knock yourself out. 
Put a redneck behind it.
The people of 9/11, they ran through 80 stories in 25 seconds. 
Because it's too wet to woo.
They combined for 16 paws.
Stuff.
None of them make the sandwiches.
Pair-a-normal investigators. 
He bit into his flat bread before it was cool!
Neeeeeeoooooowwwwwwwwwwwww
They both good hot or cold
One Nougat-Byte
No? That's because it hasn't come out yet.
Because 111 1000 1001
Sourdough!
 and   titles
Tumblr.
They're always raising the steaks!
What the hell are you doing here then, dipshit ??
Caribbean Jerk. Ayyyyy! 
Rock Band for the XBOX 360
A gran-cracker
The bench can support a family my first post here, a friend told me this joke.
Denim Denim Denim
You put Mustard on the beat
Because they are Russin'
One is caused by hormones and one causes whore moans
A Fuck It list.
Because that is one-significant-figure
Tequila Mockingbird. (Yes I know it's horrible :P)
Nun
Whoops, wrong sub.
Dam. 
It's best to do it on paper. 
A flatbread truck
A philosorapper
Oman!
2-3 weeks tops.
It's just going through one of its phases.
Sure thing, how about the gluten? It's free
"Thank", then it cooed.
By growing up.
I heard it was a shocking experience.
It was pretty clear how he died.
He ran into wrong wall at train station
A nun falling down stairs
because you need it for davision
because he wanted to...
Goddamn right.
So you can get all your stuff back.
She was always told a ruler was 12 inches!
'amhid'
Question Mart.
A Vegetarian 
Because then it would be a foot
The Pastryarchy.
Cause it's an all mail business.
Because they're all about number one
I'm Frito-Lay when you're Everyready.
They're buds
It turns out she was a private tooter.  
Designer jeans.
Boobee!
It Hertz.
Crimea River.
Because he always gives sound advice. Ba dum tsss.
Because they teach what is the history of Al Gebra.
Does it symbolize a cucumber? Are you a latent gardener?  - Sometimes a dick is just a dick.
More bird poop.
Because Windows 7 ate 9.
He was on crystal math.
When she takes the tampon out the cotton is picked.
Ask your mommy He knows it.
Because they are so good at hiding! .... except for 
iDropIt
You can't gargle sand.
Trouterspace. 
Because they have 3 ehs in the name. C-eh-N-eh-D-eh
It was heat-on-a-stick.
A Kurt-Cobainer…
Because my biceps are killer.
MariJUANa
The male ego.
Left behind
"No homo."
A Crocasian
Stone Cold Steve Irwin
Because I use powerpoint for my presentation, of course.
Tough crowd.
They hoe it. 
A:I don't know i dont have 2020 vision  All credit goes to 
One is a shit eating bottom sucker. The other one is a fish...
2. 1 to change the light bulb, the other to take pictures.
The Salvation Army.
Because when she got to 69, there was a frog in her throat.
Muslim Bale
I've seen herbivore.
A pilot of course.
Because there are too many targets. 
My toe sis!
To the menthol institution
Slap her.
Vulcanized rubber!
Because the rancher was a cattlist.
He didn't pass. 
"Show me your nose!"
Caesars.
Rubbit. 
Gladiator. (Glad he ate her)
TRANSparent
He invested in beanstocks!
He won one billion won.
Ones an African lion, the other's a lyin' African. 
Times fun when you're having flies
it was the most violent book he had ever read
Because they can't even...
They both wipe out Klingons.
Because there is a target on every corner,
Then please, lend me your ear.
Three times - Once when you tell it, once when you explain it, and once when she gets it.
It was the first to Sago.
They can never get further than the tip!
You wouldn't pay to have a potato on you.
A wet nose!
!
Flammable Lector.
He was looking for the perfect match.
Crimea river
To find Pluto.
They have two left feet.
Flathead
Thesis Pieces
Web Design. 
A Joint family.
A small medium at large.
They get easily irritated and they ovary act
Jeep Jeep
Scissor me timbers!
If I was a Hamster, and I met a female hamster I liked...id say "Aye Girl, You From Amsterdam? Cause Hamster Damn!"
Feyoncè
He was Jihahahadist!
Italian
A bull-ette.
With an Internet. 
A canned fruit!
An orca-stra. 
Yeah, his name is Aziz I'msorry
Must have Asian parents.
They always forget Tupac.
The leader killed Hitler OP: 
A mole-ionaire.
The vaults!
Someone who stays up all night, wondering if there is a dog.
Because they have to pay extra for Carrion!  Budum tsssss
400 MILLION DOLLARS!!!
Sin Pie Edit: TIL There is an actual pie called Sin Pie in the southern states.
storage
Which one?
Damn! I don't have spare keys either.
Dinner for Juan 
Michael Bae
Close the door and go to  .
He flipped a shit.  
Periodically. I made one yesterday, but it had no reaction. 
I only have one spare tire in my trunk!
An Upboat. 
One way or the other someone is losing a trailer.
The OC.
"Sorry I tied you up"
I'm a whisk taker
Because all the other fore letter words were taken (Thanks to  ... this now makes sense...)
Because they were written by women.
Baroque
Oh come on, it's not hard...
It could lead to dancing.
Because they don't believe in higher powers.
By taking a math gainer.
10
SWV (sisters with voices)
Donald Trunk.
A Moss-cow
A rasta.
It's easy to turn on, and even though it's eleven,  I still love her.
A lionfish
Might have been on here about a thousand times.. If so
Characters.
Because cher-nob'll fall out
Because all the other days are week days.
He stays awake all night wondering if there's a Dog.
A surprise party!
Shout.
Sacramentos
because all day they deal with ores.
Is dark. Bulb is potato.
A jump and touch.
The universe would be light.
Why did Beyonce sing 'to the left', 'to the left'? - Because black people have no rights...
Clan chowder 
They are yellow can they only hold small packages
Just one dumbass. 
They find getting sum trivial.
Nevermind... I wouldn't want to spread it
To stay under cover
Nina
An itssoroomy. 
The drumstick. (Had this joke stuck in my head for a while so felt like sharing it.)
Change for a buck.
Because the p is silent. 
A chicken with a water fetish.
Because when they shouted "GET DOWN!" they all started dancing. 
Because all their runners, jumpers and swimmers are already here.
Any kind you want, there's twenty of them
M'doula obligada.
I realized the word chauvinistic can sound like "shovin' his dick" which is kind of funny and ironic....maybe? I think some kind of Jeff Foxworthy esque joke can be made around this.  Any ideas?
But when I do it, suddenly I am gay?
A cop
On Chap Lane.
Watching the National Geographic channel always makes me wonder how animals like fish manage to travel thousands of miles,and how they know where to go.  Then I realised they can measure distances so well because they have their own scales.  
Where men are men, women are men, and  the national security agents are young children.
Because the head is so high up.
They're a pisstake. 
At parking meteors.
if she has to chew before swallowing.
Is there a dog?
TIMBUUUUUUUURTON
Because the signs say "No trespassing"
It took too long to pull out.
"If you see one movie this summer... see Starwars... but if you see two movies see Austin Powers...."
The Tooth Hurts Donut!
Do you have a small 2$ to spare? Tariq is a 10 year old Pakistani from Pakistan who lives in a tiny village and has to walk 7 miles everyday to bring water for his family. Tariq only has one arm and can barely walk because his legs are uneven, so he has to do the long commute on a bike. Unfortunately, the bike only has one pedal. If you had 2$ to spare, we'd send you the DVD. It's fucking hilarious.
Because a strike only requires one ball while a spare requires two balls
Aye matey. 
a transsexual
By principle, yes. By practicality, no. Because a woman runs faster with her skirt up than a man with his pants down.
You call an investigator
The Rake.
You'll never be president, Jeb.
The bench can support a family.
Like a ROCK Star.
Although it is very exciting, astronomers maintain that its Loki.
Dracula.
It would be funny if it had a punchline Wooden tit
They just can't help themselves.
Everywhere
He won the no bell prize. 
You can negotiate with terrorists
They couldn't tell each other apart.
The bench can support a family of four. 
Because no one would care that he died.
Cause they're good anglers.
Because they knew they would Nguyen. 
A meander-thal!
Trump change
"Icee."
Too much to ask for.
Jury Curls
He takes such a long time to cum that he has to use a special fucking glove!! ( get it cuz it's taking him a really long time to get to earth )
He was a small medium at large.
Air condish.
How does a solar system have a party? They planet
They're both not wanted by the Republican Party.
Gotham?
Babies grow up and stop crying
Synonym rolls
A stalemate.
Dronacharya
You usually want to stand at a corner, they're around 90 degree's xD
They jump off the stage to go krautsurfing.
Metal.
The last one out is meant to get the Wights
Black guy, because nword is mightier than sword.
It's three letters in. "H".
Purrfect
What does a little sister ride? A Nissan.
I give tours at a zoo. Each tour goes for a couple of hours so it is good to engage the guests and make the tour a bit more fun. What is your favourite animal joke I can use at work?
You have to drop the bomb twice before she gets the message.
Because it was white and on his land!
Because they literally can't even.
Chernobyl fallout...
They won't let anyone finger them.
Because 7 8 9!
Orange Is The New Black
They both form a bond in seconds, last (ideally) forever, and are dissolved by alcohol.
A Prosti-Toot
They say he Israeli funny. 
Because they kept complementing each other.
Only one, given that he's koali-fied for the job.
A golden d
The McCrib
Nnneeeeeeeeyyyyyoooooowwwww
Chicken soup with balls!
-No,sir. -Well, it seems I squeezed the canary in my tea again.
South Koreans
Disgusting!
Brown Recluse Kills White Recluse
Swigonometry.
The torch is a symbol of her inability to read in the dark.
A sTurgeon
The o'Beses.
A child asked his father, "How were people born?" So his father said, "Adam and Eve made babies, then their babies became adults and made babies, and so on." The child then went to his mother, asked her the same question and she told him, "We were monkeys then we evolved to become like we are now." The child ran back to his father and said, "You lied to me!" His father replied, "No, your mom was talking about her side of the family."
Carlos
Adipose Rex.
They start with a blowjob then they take your house.
Nasa first called it Albert
Because I'm a cryptozoologist and I've been looking for you my whole life.
Abroad.
Meh
The republican primary debate.
Little Caesars 
Stroganoff
Harry Potter can escape the chambers
Because Windows 7 8 9
Orthodocs 
Because they're happy to take on trans-missions
On and on anon. 
rock-paper-scissor
.....a menorah-tee.
I can't remember.
I don't think he has either......
It gets wet.
She says she doesn't want to move into a smaller house.
I don't remember
A Knife
An oxymoron
In the Snowbank.  My first post is a dad joke LOL
going inside to borrow a coat hanger
I swear it was all he talked about. He would go on and on. "Bach, Bach, Bach"!
The gas bill.
They're making headlines. ..I'll show myself out.
No Game No Life
Nothing. They both explode when nuked in the microwave.
Because they can't even.
arrr lmao
A southerner
Turns out he was just a bit shy. 
To get to the other tide.
Calm your tits, bro
Because he got hit by a truck!
No? Add another one to the list!
A large pizza can feed a family of four!
Suzie Splintercunt.
Laid.
A Kangacrew
He had great appeal.
Quarter-pounder with cheese
Because it’s the only love they get.
Don't bite it back in retaliation.
He's outstanding in his field.
She got hit by a Bus.
Am I a jerk off?
A stick
Two test-tickles!
A low-key person
Kurt and Rod
becuase they burn fat
He worked it out with a pencil!
Red paint
Oral sex makes your whole day. Anal sex makes your hole weak. 
A yellow box
They always use the holy condoms.
Pew Pew PEWPEWPEW!!!
Because they are always lion about everything.
These underpants fit like a glove!
What Men Know About Women…
A new jaw-key
I have no idea...
They're really good at it
Condoms.
A Gummy Bear!
Because the minister wouldn't marry the two, since a melon can't elope!
The chair salesman gives YOU a stool sample.
Ruffles :)
Anyone can roast beef.
Comcat.
A no-brainer.
A Black & Decker Pecker Wrecker
So he could go to Otter Space.
A dead epileptic.
The White Power Ranger
A Hiccup!  Get it? Hick-cup?
DAIRY-AIR!
Flatman and Ribbon.
Air conditioning 
Literally everyone I ask doesn't know.
Buble wrap  Sorry 😜
Because the P is silent.
Two. One to hold it in place, another to rotate the universe around it.
They were trying to keep their german market.
If so, I owe a pretty heartfelt apology to some members of PlaystationNetwork.
It's so refreshing.
They warm up singing, 'Mi, mi, mi.... Mi!'
Don't drink the water.
A seedless, vegetable.
Backwards.
The Cadillac seats five.
"Just put it on my bill"
Because windows 7 8 9
It was tearable
At least a parasite won't leave you for someone else after sucking everything out of you.
because they're not afraid of committing.
"Live vit me if you vant to cum"
He had a problem with his hamstring.
pro-pain
Because they have cotton balls
The next page.
He brews.
Hot. Because you can catch a cold.
It doesn't just happen the once. And I'll be posting this again later. If I remember.
Outlaws are wanted
Comet
I don't know either but I heard she tried to halve split-pea soup and pay with a quarter. 
It'll blow your mind.  . . . . I'm sorry.
I think I have that!
Praguetory
A selfie stick 
Because 7 is a registered 6 offender
Apparently people are getting mad about this, saying the monkey will be too stupid to vote. But, I don't know why people have a problem with this. I mean you already allow Republicans to vote.
Blacking out and gaining money.
Its very time consuming.
Sony-stalgia
Your mother.
one to do it, and five others to tell him how they did it differently in their last kitchen. 
Running Stupid
A vigilan-tea
Because it pounds your anus!
Watts.
They couldn't close his coffin
Not C
He wanted to be a safe driver.
Like a thousand pounds. Read a fuckin' book. 
A punjob.
Stumps
A Beyoncé. 
The feathers, because 200 pounds of bricks is just 200 pounds of bricks, but with the feathers, you've also got to carry the weight of what you did to those poor birds
It's a game changer.
About halfway
Cause it scares the fuck out of the dogs.
A pull over.
They have to sit in the back of the oven.
Poached.
Because there were too many knights....
The information is groundbreaking
Hearing AIDS.
Banana Republic~BA~NA ~
He had to work it out with a pencil.
The Qatar.
A dissexual. 
It hasn't come out yet.
Udder destruction
The Finnish line.
Give him an enema
Caitlyn Jenner doesn't like to steel balls before she comes
A Man.
Because she ate the secretary.
In his sleevies
Shiver me timbers!
B9
Because they cantaloupe. 
For god's sake, try and see the world with some claret-y
a depression.
They conducted an in-turtle investigation.
A golden retriever
"Not right meow, I have a headache."
Pedi-files
THIRTEEN!
He got arrested for possession.
A knife has a point.
It was General Tso, and he will always be known as a chicken
His balls were of two different sizes. One ball was so small, there was no ball at all. The other so large it won prizes.
The door won't close
Because 7 days makes a hole weak
I don't cum when the onion cries and begs for mercy as I cut it up.
I don't know....I was too busy masterbating. 
He fucked his victims before they were cool.
Looking for anyone with specific knowledge of this. Any zoolologists out there?
Jawea 
Because deep down they're all actually good people.
Aunt Man
He's an exterminator.
a woman wont accept a 3 1/2 inch floppy.
Both looking for a tight seal.
Bedlam
Denim denim denim!
a fungimentalist
They both stop sucking when the police show up.
Poached. Thank you, I'm here all week. EDIT: this got no upvotes and I don't think it deserved any 
To slow down speeding geese!
Because 7 8 9 I'm so sorry
You can eat your mom's apple pie.
He disapproved of her exposing her bear midriff.
satsatsat lumlumlum
Iron
God doesn't think he's a lawyer.
Their mouth is moving.
A redneck virgin.
40 hours
.................they both got 6 months.
Savile killed a lot more 12 year old pussy.
I don't know, but it's not a father figure.
An old cat will bite and scratch, but a little pussy never hurt anybody.
Rhinos R Us
I don't have Ferrari in my garage.
Rufi-ooooooo!
Because you don't know who is going to make it to the end.
what do you call a girl on a swing with no arms? Sarah. Knock Knock... Whos there? Not Sarah
Because 7 8 9!
Japplebaum. 
A Pauperazzi
If you need me I'll be in my lab
Gilles de la gourmette
A ROMAN CATHOLIC! 
A boob bee.
Drive a bus through a pride parade
Mountain Jew.
You fuck her in the ass. How do you make her scream again? You wipe your dick off with the drapes. 
White Vans
Land ho!
A man with a gun can rob a bank.  A man with a bank can rob the world.  (Disclaimer: reword of someone else's post to FB today.)
Friendship is magic.
Because it slows their 
They are both hot dogs.
I might be wrong here, but I think it's when you throw up after drinking too much Mexican beer. 
They're no big deal unless you aren't getting any.  
An excavator. Why? It only has one arm.
He was a chronic math-debater
Apparently he went out for a wok and never came back.
An avalanche
Because the majority of their relatives used to pick it
Do they follow territorial boundaries?  If the Kaos Kommandos start a brawl in El Paso and it rolls over into Juarez, do they say "screw it, let Justice League of Mexico handle it"? (Sorry if this isn't technically a joke; it was my shower thought this morning and I thought it was funny.)
White paint
Reload, take better aim.
Periodically 
Only problem was no one knew what the writer was Tolkien about
There's a vas deferens.
Do you want to be in my Crib Tonight (Kryptonite)
Throw a dollar in! How do you get them out? Tell them it's a taxi!
Because 7 (eight) 9
A 30-minute cardio exorcise should do the trick!
...per pound?
Its Lamb
Katie Keurig. (I know the setup might need some work but I just like the punchline I made up.)
Cause holy fuck you have a pile of issues
Hey baby, mind if I   ? ;)
I know I do. 
A Bouncer
oops, wrong sub.
Nothing, it just waved... Prolly my favorite joke of all time, maybe ever.
Awful
Too many cheetahs. 
They were made of honey.
You end up staying awake all night wondering if there is a dog
It's foot. Because if it stands on you you're fucked.
Ali
They'd both probably get raped in prison.
What's the difference between a black and a white fairytale? White begins, "once upon a time," black begins, "y'all motherfuckers ain't gonna believe dis shit!"
James Brady
Friend: who's your favorite comedian Me:Donald Trump Friend:why? Me:Everybody knows Donald trump is a joke
A sneakret.
Only the tip baby, I promise!
A ferrous wheel.
It came out cordless!
Seizure Salad.
Choc ISIS :D
Recording with one hand..
They both feel nice but you never know who's been there first
Me neither.
They don't call them at all.
Condoms
Hebrewed it.
He had too much to drink before he went swimming!
Acne actually comes on a boys face after he turns 12
Denim denim denim.
Turdquoise
Hillarious Clinton
A glass Canon.
To be a star on Broadway Creds to That 70's Show S04 E6
About 1400 dollars
"Allahu Snackbar!"
The Inside...
He heard McCain stayed in a Hilton for 5 years.
When Rodrigo finds out he is his own mother
Pep .
The fridge doesn't fart when you pull the meat out.
She'll tell you
Because they take everything literally. 
Because he was Trans-Chicken
Because 0x0 is always 0.
A phallusy
Don't worry, they'll tell you
A catashopic.
You never know when she'll Let it Go.
Because 7 8 9.
The J'accusi
No, he's on first.
Google.
Green paint.
Germany
A snailor. hahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
It was too Loki.
Alien vs Predator
A little shellfish! I'll
A MANDATE 
The Mexican. The black guy's stopped by the rope!
There was a back to school sale.
If you'd throw an egg on a concrete floor, how can you be sure it won't break? Don't worry about it too much, you don't break those concrete floors that easily!
A gender bender Bender fender bender.
They both have intelligent eyes, but neither can talk properly.
Ruff Bark
You pay them under the table ;)
Whenever a Jamaican women talks about "all these terrible shootings" I'm never sure if they mean gun violence, or footwear accessories. 
Oh,  He's Barack.  pronounced with a bad asian-english accent.
Sparky
She's only attracted to colored guys.
An avalanche. 
Im trying to remember her name. Its Reese something. Help me out here....
Rock is playing three chords for a thousand people. Jazz is playing a thousand chords for three people.
I don't have any friends.
Then why don't you Marriott !!!! Hahahah
It hit the chicken. Bazing! 
No. I'm not a fan.
Diagonal
Because they're shellfish.
He heard they carried rape kits.
In a tax shelter. Blame GROCO PCA
She was adding incest to injury.
You staple food on the ceilings.
Q: Why did Sarah fall of the swing ? A: Because she has no arms.   Q:Who's there ? A:Not Sarah.
LeBronchitis
She just wasn't working out.
Me either, I'm already sleeping by then. 
A leprekhan
Because women can't drive. 
A molecool. 
A laughing cow.  Ahahahahahahahamoo.
A reptile dysfunction. 
Walking... Jk Rowling. 
Personally, I choose dinner with parents. I mean if I'm gonna disappoint two people at once, I at least want it to be two people I know.
A  ty call. 
I apollo-gize.
You are not a chair...
a cashjew
Jose and Hose B
Wharf!
Liquor in the front, poker in the back  ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
A pilot, you racist asshole.
The answer is feathers.   200 pounds of bricks is just a bunch of bricks, but if you try to carry 200 pounds of feathers, you also have to carry the weight of what you did to those poor birds.
Mint conditioner.
Avocado or Donald Trump for president? Well, one is a wrinkly old bag filled with green mush The other one is an avocado. 
"Take us to your liter."
because he didn't want to put Uranus at the end of the solar system
On penny boards. 
Because they work.
Veni.
A woman changes hers more often. 
cause they hate getting fat!! edit: It's physics. The faster an object moves, the heavier it gets.
Your mom never gave me reddit gold. 
A murder most fowl. (I'll see myself out...)
Gotta go fast.
Danke
A: When his wife's out of town.
A pilot you racist!
Because fuck U, that's why.
She was wearing mittens
A meanderthal.
There's no accounting for taste.
breast-stroke!
I can see you
What did the 2 sundaes say to eachother? I wish it was SUNDAY
The Execution. Hehe...get it? No? Fine I'll be-heading off now.
in. Man, I did   that coming.
He answered the iron
No? Neither have I.
9 Months.
A search and SEIZURE
They give you two choices but their always out of one. 
A cop.
K9P.
reddit is so fucking stupid. I'm heading to 9gag. I'm out! fuckers
Loan shark.  
Because if it's longer, it's called a foot.
Because he will always tell you to take the third Reich.
Because pot holder was already taken -rim shot-
Without a hole in the middle they wouldn't be good for shit.  (Wife told me this one)
Cos they're always pro-Bono
Staying up all night wondering if there really is a dog.
an old joke p.s. Today is National Tell an Old Joke Day
Because they're cantaloupes. 
Anyone that goes near my wife!
Blankets.
Gringo Starr
Yeah, they just changed their name to the LAPD...
A mummy bear
"Shop here! You'll be Gladius you did!"
So the whole family has a history of getting black guys off
Because he's a FUN-GUY :P
He never lands.
A sticky beak! 
This music SUCKS!
These Malaysia Airline meals aren't bad.
You're a shitting blood!!!!
BECAUSE THEY THINK WITH THE WRONG HEAD!
What ails you? 
Because his name is Hov, OH, H-to-the-O-V
Cause they would whistle on the way down
Because they're prime mates!
Don't be koi.  
He's currently in a vegetative-state. 
Because someone threw a canoe at him !
We all know the joke "What is worse than finding a worm in your apple?" - "Finding half a worm" I asked this question in my office once and my colleague (without missing a beat) said "Cancer".
Because they had a planktonic relationship.
the polar bear
a baby was born with more eyes than teeth
Because when they stop talking to you, you never know why.
Trying to read the road signs!!!
Toilet paper.
He came up short on his register.
A bullet.
I like Rape !! lol !!
Because it's elemental pee!
You get laid once, and it's by your mom.
Because he knows where all the bad girls are...(sorry)
Because if they were small and purple, they would be called grapes. 
He dates his other sister. 
Get in the car.
Shoot myself
Einstein is famous for special relativity, Kim is famous for simple reality tv.
In case of reindeer.  And because I caribou.
Oinkment!
2 more bullets
[1 Mark]
Flossless compression!
When your wife says that you have the largest in your street.
You wouldn't believe me if I told you.
Because they don't even know if they believe.
Help! I'm melting!
They never expect a ring
You can run but you can't tide!
Your tongue ends up on it even though you know it's wrong. 
A Sir conference. 
Make him run across Canada. (sorry)
Windows XPlosion
She is only 5 feet tall. Shouldn't she be called Ariana Petite? 
Tequila Mockingbird.
Think long and hard before you answer this one.
Because she could not take the heat.
Juan.
Telling your parents that you're gay.
Because there is no water in Africa.
A Flock of Smeagols
Blueit. -just thought of it, sorry its a little late to the party
He committed treeson. 
Grape!
The baby has a soul. 
After the man leaves, they hang around and talk to the woman.
He said it was the best book he's ever read
Because they took Pita on them 
Border Patrol.
The pancakes was flattered.
He had a foot fetish.
Jack and the beans talk
Freud 
Hey there,  whatsapp!!
Because people are dying to get in!
Crude Oil
"Hey Microsoft, why is there no Windows 9? You've given us 7 and 8, and now you're skipping straight to 10?" "Well, to be completely honest, 7 8 9."
They both like a tight seal.
Killed in a Parisian tunnel.
They Planet.
Because the farther it flies, the fewer.
It was a dying business.
Caitlyn Jenner
Definitely not Chocolate
Because every time one bug was fixed, 2 more appeared.
They start tipping balls. 
Sheriff Andy Taylor
She wasn't on the pill
10 to 1.
Hi there! I'm currently helping out one person and researching for the best math (or science related) jokes. They're creating a list of them for their new article. Is there are anyone who have share of their own favourites?  Thank you for your input!
USB
You know, besides the taste.
"A woman never reveals her age", she replied to her young grandson. He said "Alright, just give me the first digit" "Six" she said. "And the second?" Grandma sighed. "Seven." "And the third?"
Because women can't drive
geSTAHPo!
A kid asks his dad:  "Dad, how much is my dick worth?" "Five bucks.", he replies "And yours?" "Ten bucks..." "OMG dad, we're so poor!" "Why?" "Last night, mom told the neighbor his dick was worth millions."
Too bad.
What do you call a magic door? Dumbledoor!
The one that keeps getting bigger
MRSA!  
A Showerkraut.
Through the Hodor
Root beer
A poultry-geist.
Have it wear an aqua-fur.
Rabbit
Clever Dick.
Tombfoolery.
Reddit doesn't constantly have reposts from the other site.
I don't know, but they are literally killing themselves trying.  I was aiming for a little light humour but I think it's actually rather dark because of the amount of death I've witnessed in the writing of this joke. Written by Drew P. Robertson on July 19th 2015 just in case of any funny business and someone tries to claim credit for my original joke.
He saw the gas bill
Calc you later! 
Run, Forest, run!
To get to the dark side.
Because you're something special
Wave it in someone's face and they'll get mad!
idk
They both think the other one gets laid more.
Nothing, she's fine. 
Wiki-Wiki-Wikipedia
Either oar...
Bison.
A submarine.
becuase his peckers on his head
nothing!why? would you like it to be very close to each other. You're not a duck!
"You owe me one cannoli."
A kiddy-fiddler
Because he was out-standing in his field.
Let's go ride our bikes.
Boo-bees
Because he didn't like bakin
A valid target.
Nothing, as he didn't exist. The probability of anyone in that demographic reaching their eighties is particularly low, and an active pirate being eighty one years of age is further rendered a statistical impossibility given that a pirate would need to be above a certain threshold in terms of physical ability.
A booby trap!
A mirror.
Hooooooo-dini!
Hyper-inflated. 
Tostitos.
Because they Arrrr (Yes I know its cheesier than my feet)
Shampooder.
.....rub it rub it. 
He was getting physical  (first joke hope you like it) 
Dr. Reece Etmabak.
The Rue Paul.
No strings attached
A visitorah  Sorry
Mountain Dewm
He has 1 clean finger. src: heard on radio yesterday
... Incase he got a hole in one. HEHE one of my favs.  Whats your fav joke?
He's a real catholic.
A master baiter
It had beef.
Light food.
They don't allow carrion.
Oh my god a talking coconut!
Joaquin.
The Chupacabra.
That's messed up, right?
A gallop poll.
It was roundly condemned as a case of naked aggression.
Nighty Night
You beat the hell out of them
A roll model
2.B or not 2.B
Everyone wants to play first.
A snail...
Because he's a dog. Dogs cannot drive.
A mammoth
Suck this mcdoubledaw dick nyuggahahahahaha /buh dum tiss
a lot of them have a wide open cockpit.
The power of belief in chupacabras is all that keeps his hair in this world.
Poe-etry
Thank you all for coming!
Because he's the fire starter.
Kappatalism
It was tired of being taken for granite. 
Gooks of Hazard
A chewing gum you pervert
Pier pressure!
It's about fucking time.
Nun survived!
Otter Space.
Because he found mercury in it.
Because he said he was pro Bono.
Because he tripped
Pulling a Robin out of Bruce Wayne's Dick
Decaf Coffee
Octopussies.
Clickbait 
He had to close a sail
Because they can't evennn...
Because the instructions usually say: "Take after meals."
Noone cares.
A meat-and-greet. 
you put a piece of bread on the ceiling 
His finger was up his nose. 
Only one of course, as we are highly efficient and have absolutely no sense of humour.
One slip of the tongue and you're in shit! 
"There's a sale on at the fern store!"
You mean Jane Doe?
The chicken butt
They get jalapeño business. :)
A: Because the slow ones are in jail.
Bayou self
A minor.
Jim Jones, I heard he took out 909 people with one punch.
bass players.
A kink is something put in a hose, a fetish is something she wants to put in your hose.
Because it's blue :(
He didn't know water do...
Golden retriever 
Only one. But they totally wanted it.
Aushwitz, 6 million stars.
The Amazon River actually has sails.
There's 19 of them
It's the orange, BOY CAN IT CONCENTRATE!
This is because houses don't.
We're both lawyers.
The cereal killer...
Because his wife is dead.
9/11
Elton's John
The second coming of Jesús.
Liberace 
The outside. 
My ass. LAWL 
Putting her back in the wheel chair
They apollo-gize.
A mormoff!
ma-khakis
About three pounds, including the urn.
Wife: Honey, i think you don't love our kids equally. It seems you have one that gets less love from you. Husband: Really? Which kid do you mean? Karl, Tina or the fat one
He got off on a technicality.
Mastubation
She wouldn't play on a regulation size table
He brew up.
It's all about the star he ploughs.
Because he/she who smelt it, dealt it.
They couldn't close his casket.
You can have sex as loudly as you want. 
Ballroom blitz
Fed-Ex
"Sure you can!"
3.
The smell. The man's been dead for 6 years.
TeX-MeX
Elixir.
Pump-Kin
Apparently they've been doing it on porpoise!
He had a hispanic attack
Vineyard Skynyrd
Shiit-talking mushrooms
He pressed hispanic button
They were playing pass the Parseltongue.
He traded it for the hormonica.
"Quark!"
So that it's easier for the hippos to jump on them.
Elvish Presley
Formaldehyde
Absolut Zero
I reckon it was a diploidocus
I was thinking black, but I'm not sure it would work?
unprotected wifi
50 Drachma.
Censo-red.
You only pick out the K's when you take an eye exam.
Because of the  .
A Specialist knows more and more about less and less until he knows absolutely everything about nothing. A Generalist knows less and less about more and more until he knows absolutely nothing about everything.
He wanted to give a shoutout  to his peeps
Electricity. 
You go on ahead, I'll hang around.
She quits counting.
An NES cartridge.
Coffin 
Toronto maple leafs.
"Clearing my cache."
He always breaks the bat. 
Wii U Wii U Wii U Wii U
They don't care if you cheat.
They take things literally
Ancestry.com
Lightbulb. 
Internjet
You are what you eat
Walking them is a real drag.
By diversifying his Bonds! edit: I'm so sorry.  I know this is terrible.  I just thought of it and it's so fresh that I haven't convinced myself that it's too stupid to post yet.  I'm so so sorry.
Rough translation from Spanish: Child:Mom, why am I dark if my father's skin is alabaster and yours is too? Mother:  With how drunk I was that night it's a miracle you don't bark!
An Eh-lien!
Post something humorous in  . P.S: Is there anyway to ungild myself?
because the owner will tell you
They've both swallowed boatloads of seamen. 
Because two Wongs don't make a Wright.
WiiU
Or do they think we all just have personalities that literally light up a room?
They'll tell you.
I'll have my peephole call your peephole.
The rich Scotsman has a canopy ower his bed. The puir Scotsman has a can o pee under his bed. The deid Scotsman cannae pee at a'. [If you need help:  ]
Hodor
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless its 20% off.
Because he needed one.
None, she fell down the stairs.
Now with 400% more bust!
Because he can see the D
Because 7 10 11
They put on mittens.
Because I know that people have been happy on their wedding day. 
Pimples will wait till you're 14 to come on you're face.
Nothing. Dressings don't have arms
Ripped off.
I don't know
The later you get home, the happier one is to see you
Cross fit
Because of the sand which is there. *edit:  because of the sandwiches  there.....
She was afraid someone would steal her IP address.
The farmer has the fits while he shucks.
Dislocation, dislocation, dislocation
It doesn't take shit from anyone
She got cut off by a dick.
Through the Lucha-door.
Because she wasn't wearing a seatbelt
Because 7 8 9!
Quack
Bill and Sue
There are so many immature assholes.
Cut funding for wind power in Australia
Plantain.
Gatoraids 
A buttload!
Bill Cosby
Deturbaned
Scissor me timbers!
Cause they want the D.
A lager
It was a total flop, nobody came.
A German.
The atmosphere.
at the 
What's that noise?
A Frenchman.
Shame they went under
Fetus.
They don't like pulling out.
Nevermind, turns out my comments just suck.
Because black tires makes your car run faster
Quicksilver Surfer! :D
I don't know, he hasn't opened it yet
When you're done, turn them inside out and shake the fuck out of them.
The COME ON! cold.
"Au, schwitz!"
A highjacker 
None of the detectives could seem to piece the clues together.
A flossiraptor
Because they aren't mourning people. I just made this up!! Could you all help me with the wording? It feels like it could be a little better I just don't know how to word it differently while using the same "mourning" pun as the punch line.
Mandeep.
A tampon
He hasn't either. 
I just got laid by a chick and now I'm getting hard.
Yes, Benjamin Netanya Who.
There's so many Wing's and Wong's they might wing the wong number.
The Anti-oxy-dance
Jose and Hose B
Germany. 
1Forest1
COCK COCK COCK COCk
A deutsche-bag
They're both tearable.
I mustache you a question but I am shaving it for later. 
Well hung!
To increase  !
Little Caesar's
A size-mom-meter
A chi-WAAA-WAAA!!!!
Austerity.
Your room-matey.
Simple - brown it on both sides then throw it into the pot.
Finding out it is curable.
Erectangle
He had Jello fever!
Because he was a  ate professional!
To crunch numbers. 
Because they literally can't even.
Danke Shön.
Car battery 
With a woodpecker
3 days by panzer 
With inflation raising the cost he couldn't afford it.
In the way!
Because zeta eta theta.
Extra virgin oil
Instagram
Toucan
I'm excited about the next but one
a dogerpillar. Sorry. It was so bad that I had to share it. Fuck you Laffy Taffy.
The leaders name is Olama Bin Laden.
1forest1
Probably.
A math problem. 
Not nearly as long as it would take to travel around your mom.
Because air is free.
Not sure where he got his pilot's license, but he sure does always make his arrival times.
Stevie Wonder answering the iron
it becomes a soap opera
the tiny little buns
They have no mass.
How did I wind up here I don't know man just go with the flow.
decomposing.
GET OFF MY LAN!
Ambi ous
When my goat died, I couldn't bring myself to eat it.
Italian Herbs and Child Pornography.
Look at her beaver.
To get to the other side.
Some jobs always have sticky wages...
Because he didn't like the size of the meatballs.
It was udder catastrophe! 
because there are so many targets.
Because he's too short to be an essay
I forgot.
More doors.
A hot dog.
An erectangle.
Garibaldi
Nobody can point at your shoes and say "What are thoooooooooose?!"
I'm not quite sure. I only took one year of Japanese in high school.
It brings a whole new meaning to "eat fresh"
In square feet.
A cop pulled over two drunks, and asked to the first, "What's your name and address?"  "I'm Paddy O'Day, of no fixed address." The cop turned to the second drunk, and asked the same question. "I'm Seamus O'Toole, and I live in the flat above Paddy." 
His wife made sure he only came once a year.
Apparently he did it on porpoise.
cuz they can't even!!!!
The older they are the easier they are to pick up.
Denim denim denim
After all, he did kill Hitler.
They couldn't find three wise men or a virgin. 
You boil the HELL out of it! Har har har.
Her navel. 
Muxed martial arts
Neither did he.
Blu-Tac a euro to the ceiling.
Not that there's anything wrong with that....
One slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit. 
An ore spasm.
A lumberjack.
"In the short run,   all dead!"
A Greek never pays his debts.
A joggernaut.
At least I'm not black.
Seconds? They barely get firsts!
Because he never learned.
Because tampons are stuck up cunts
It was obvious he was kidding.
Defeeted
He could never find an opening.
They ordered pepperoni but all they got was plane 
For shortening!
A coin to scratch it with.
Cannibalism
Eh-corns.
A: Because when they're born they get laid.
A Kick-ass band
Polaroids! I'm so bored...
Schmuckers.
Danke!
He was fiddling with the kids. *
Allah back!
Flip it upside-down.
Dumpster diving. 
The McCann Family.
A five year old footlong. 
Brings a whole new meaning to their slogan, "Eat Fresh."
swimming goggles
Sycamore!
Becuase he was caught fingering A minor.
The answer should be apparent.
It might be his lunch. 
Look through this subreddit, there are plenty of good ones to be found!
Because we WANT to!
One is a busty crustacean and the other is a crusty bus station.
They got marmalaid.
Because he was on the nautilust.
He beeps twice before coming through the flaps.
An Animal, a Vegetable, and a Mineral.
A Transves-tyke.
Isn't that kinda their thing?
They become disoriented.
A "shhh"nauzer
Apparently it was a backhand. 
Neither has a Seoul
Reptiles.
White Vans.
 How do you take your coffee?  Ferguson Police  Huh?  Black, two shots. 
No.. You are all left Ahah is joke
The weapon smith was a bit rapier
He was a little shellfish.
She could not deliver :(
A great thing, ruined by a period
Denice. (De-nice)
He didn't like the phrase fire at will!
Because they are Eh-theists.
A Greek Bank.
One. They hold it in place and wait for the world to revolve around them.
TWIGERING
Isn't every hyena we've discovered a spotted hyena?
That after 200 years, a yogurt can actually build a community. Haha, happy late 4th of July.
The story writes itself. 
General Pao's chicken.
I don't know, but it sure can wash a lot of dishes.
"I'm not Willie Nelson." 
He went out with a bang.
We had two practices in 1945
I-fry-em
Idi Admin.
"I, 4-1, know we won't win."
Preparation H
Sneakers.
They saw her head and shoulders in the glove compartment
They circle Uranus searching for clingons. 
Because 7 ate 9
Drunkin Donuts
Fireunemployed.
DEFEAT STINKS!
He ate his pizza before it was cool. (Written anonymously in the bathroom at work, a pizza joint.)
Cat holics
Steel wool
Half of it is ripostes
Because it was taking the piss out of the pants
L&a
Thailand. 
You're hired! But don't tell anyone.  
Because she hasn't got arms !
You let your 15 year old daughter smoke at the dinner table... in front of her kids.
Because six inches would never satisfy a female elephant.
F***ing close to water!
Because its two tired
The North Pole
Micro trans action.
Because it was s knotty pine! 
She also wants to get a blow job in the oval office
pao pao pao...
Summer, because it comes before fall 
Black Guy Pees. 
Prelude
Thus you can move on to the next one faster
10 books of Snow Whites
Chooters
During Black Friday.
Pin the murder on the black guy
To the PAO Camp.
I'm a Taylor too.
They both banged JFK
There is no spoon.
The retard doesn't need to be buggered to think he's special.
Now they call it the LED zeppelin.
He's at home watching the kids
Because they were forming a massive circle-jerk around her
Purolator.
Infant children.
Through the cell wall.  :D
100. 100 who complain about the lightbulb oppressing them, and 1 man to actually do it.
Cause shes terrible.
Kung-Pao Chicken.
Voat. co
Because it cantaloupe. 
They don't want to pay for mods.
Yo-ghurt. 
Because he is a Dollar Thief.
Because freedom rings.
Kung Pao: Legend of the Fisting.
Mark Fitzgibben , Brandon Berg or BroKaine ? XDDD
I heard they're giving free shots on the beach. They go straight to your head, too.
I'd like to anonymously report a bunch of alcoholics getting together in my neighbor's yard. "Sorry sir, that's not the point of the program"
An impawster.
Everybody gets a happy ending.
It was the Wong choice
BREAKING NEWS: California’s drought is over. Water supply flourishing from the tears of the racist, homophobic, and conservative southerners
In the kitchen.
By getting aboard (a) voat
Was she keeping secrets? What is Victoria's Secret?
e-reptile dysfunction 
Lipstick
Bulbasaurs
He wanted the name to remind him of the time when 4chan users went to 8chan. So in light of the circumstances he named it regreddit.com
Dr. Dre.......just kidding.....poop
Seriously who knows? It's pitch black in here.
One's a scum sucking bottom feeder. The other's a catfish.
It'll make a diabetics feet dissappear!
You need a ho and you need me
Because in both cases you're cracking one oeuf
If you're still waiting for a punchline, why are you here?
In both cases you wish you took it out a few seconds earlier.
"Don't ask don't spell."
Chooter
A pao-erful change
They act too paowerful
With a special interest group, or evidence of a sex scandal.
Nothing, it's just a website.
Most men couldn't find it. 
Your camera.
He was on a summer retreat!
All 0 of it.
Dino-mite.
Pao! Pao!
Pao!
Didn't he know Romney was made in Mexico?
Reddit.
General Knowledge
[This post was removed]
Pao! Edit: Whoa, FP   gold. Thank you! 
Dew diligance
Still waiting to hear back from an admin.
It was a black berry...
A dick-tater.
Hell   bad people
An Amish drive-by shooting 
They both search around Uranus for Klingons
The unfairway
Valleys that have fallen out after an argument.
Because he always plays with Pooh.
It mistbehaved
A beer.
No? Not surprised, they don't have any gigs yet.
Because he was a child of da'force 
It's a little irony
You haven't? Weird. They are really making headlines.
Little Seizures.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
Jihaaaad
A man came across a giant and a midget in a bar. How did you get so tall?" a man asked the giant who replied, "I eat what's right." The man then turned to the midget to enquire, "How did you get so short?" bringing the reply of, "I eat what's left." 
RAWR!
shar pei
The Fourth of "Jew"-ly!!
The banana gets in the way. Banana split
Stoneater the Green.
They always worry about the worst case!
Because he's dead.
A riddle.
Because he doesn't exist.
Lice
Because he got cold feet.
Cause she's got no arms. Knock Knock.  Who's there? Not Sally.
GRRRRRAAAAAIIIINNNNNSSSS
Miav. 
Because someone threw a fridge at her....
Because he loves blue tits.
Drop the base.
Five.  It's a huge problem.
Everywhere.
A tropical fruit.
Clogs
He did crossfit.
Because you didn't ask him what band he's in.  
Because it's such a bonne idée.
Because bears don't go to college.
Don't take me for granite!
His will
A big red sports car.
An investigator.
They don't have the right to bare arms
Five… six… seven… eight!
To get to the other side. Ba dum tssshh 
Greece doesn't have default settings!
Because they can't stop hitting themselves. This joke came to me while I was half asleep this morning. I'm not sure how original it is. I probably heard some variation of it somewhere and have just forgotten. Any suggestions for improving it?
Liam Nissan 
A free-LOTR
A Hot Cross Bunny
A cab.
7-1. (world cup)
A murka 
Banned from 
Pro boner
Come on then you  !
A cheetah
Greece.
Because they are insects.
"Oh no! I've got on the Rhombus!" 
THIS ISN'T EVEN MY FINAL FORM!
Velocity
Toothless methheads give better $3.50 blowjobs
A quarter pounder with cheese
A: Whats this new apple product I keep hearing about? B: Which one? A: the I-sis
A: Lend it to Greece.
Because they weren't period-appropriate!
With Barnacles (bar nickels)
It's 5 o'cluck somewhere.
Father's Day.
To the Allahu Akbar 
Taxi Vader
To get to the other side.
Jason's ¡Dale!
ISITH
an explosive punchline
Hoe! Hoe! Hoe!
You tell him you've kidnapped his mother and that you want $5000 for her release, but when he comes  just tell him it was a prank.
His medical license was doctored.
Daytrogen.
A stick.
Because they didn't have movie theaters back in the 1800's.
They both know "what a girl wants" and "what a girl needs".
Judgemental
My dick as I watch you through them
They're screwed up.
Untrustable
All the space heaters are on earth!
The dock.
The Milky Hue.
Bob.
Because red blue green. 
A Dollar
Seems like every other blog has a 'Trigger Warning.'  
Tell her you refuse to allow her to make you a sandwich.
Cover me, I'm going in..
Because it's worth it.
A condescending condescending!
Nice tits, bitch.
couldn't hurt.
Marriage. Because it's not just a word, it's a fuckin' sentence.
Because he would only do the   minimum?
"Pasta la vista, baby."
A: They're both empty from the neck up.
An Amish with a tool, you know that's unheard of.
Her geography teacher's cock.
Tan lines.
An elefanatic, of course.
Everywhere.
Because they'll crack up anyways
with an en croissant
I don't know, I just fly the drone  Edit/apology: My friend said this to me, I thought I should share with you all, he said that I could post it here. 5 minutes later he told me he found it on reddit.... I'm sorry all.
Dev Patel.
They have love handle's not hate handle's
Yeah, they tried each other. 
The Ford Siesta Many thanks to   for that one.
Roundup, because it kills the  !
Maybe Jesus was Gay? All this time he was actually saying "Ah, men!"
She went to the battered women's shelter
Guesu
For drizzle.
The Loki cokey.
No cubs :)
I can't jelly my cock up your ass
because I don't love you anymore.
Because they love to eat out.
They are both ment for boys but in the end it's the men who plays with them
Because it had to Twinkle.
He Baghdad so he could Bangkok
A Juan man army...
[deleted]
Apparently it was a black-thai do.
Society
Patels
You do all the work and a fat guy in a suit gets all the credit.
Fucking a monkey! Beastiality is still illegal in most states!
She is trans-parent.
Homeless
Anyone can mash potatoes!
"Cait Plus 8-inches."
Because if they went with the first syllable it would have been called Tyranny. 
These used to be sort of popular, and I can only find this as an example: "Show me a man with a nub for an index finger, and I'll show you a man that asked Chuck Norris to 'Pull my Finger'". I think this sub can do better than that. Does anyone out there have some good "show me a..." jokes?! :)
Because they have all of the anthers!
Israeli funny
A Mubarack
Feminists can't change anything.
Damnit! Now I'm going to have to sieg HAIL a cab!
Hose B
Little Caesars.
A pizza doesn't scream when you break it in 8.
Ginseng khan I am in a silly mood.  Have a good day
Both are feeling a little butt hurt after yesterdays decision.
As long as it takes to   it!
A good start.
A subturban!
Ask them to pronounce 'unionized.'
Oops.
Meatlovers.
Why do cow wear bells .......???? Because their don't work :D :P
Boo you whore
Sherlock, Holmes.
A fruit Ninja 
Once fucking someone and the other one if fucking someone over
An electron
Hispanic attacks.
What does a Pirate say on his 80th Birthday? Aye Matey!
Grass. I lied about the wheels. 
Up his sleevies
Well, the flags a big plus. edit: FUCK meant Switzerland
Napalm
Praystation
To get to the other bride!
It takes a lot more thyme to accomplish.
Swiper no swiping!! 
She had a 19" rack.
Freedom Rings.
Ten-ants
Cancer :)
A kleptomaniac!
To get to the middle.
Fo jizzle.
A Chew-Chew Train!  Side note, I have cheesy jokes for days.
Deep ends really.
A slip of the tongue and you're in for some shit. 
Doesn't matter, still born.
Because 789
All those spikes hurt his hands
In the beginning there's a lot of sucking and blowing but then she takes half your house
Because it ran out of juice
Just ask for the "What Would Jesus 'Do!"
Stephen Walkin
I-ran ;)
Pol Potting mix.
You don't want to look down, in either case.
Christian Bale. 
Because he didn't want his daughters to be called Ms. Steaks.
When you're masturbating and your hand falls asleep.
Cry me a peninsula.
An Italian sub!
A crippled homo.
Telling your parents that you are a faggot!
The placement of the dirt bag.
Give him a couple of test-tickles.
How many South Americans does it take to screw in a light bulb? A Brazilian!
Because they reject setian. 
9/11 beams
It's more fun to break wind
Dis cunt.
One can actually support a family.
It was a bit buggy.
50 Cent feat. Nickelback
A butt plug (but why? you ask)
Dora. She has like everything in her backpack.
Christian Bale
To buy some quack croakaine!
I don't see a raisin why not.
Do you want another one?
You can unscrew the light bulb.  - Steve Martin, "My Blue Heaven"
A jalapinup
It helps with division.
He didn't want to get hippothermia.
You put a piece of wire in her and if you feel pulling she is indeed pregnant.
I dont know, but it sure as hell can pick apples.
No it was with her knife
Because they really suck.
"I'm Crossed."
Watch the Dagobah
An Amish drive-by shooting.
A new teacher was trying to make use of her psychology courses. She started her class by saying, "Everyone who thinks they're stupid, stand up!" After a few seconds, Little Johnny stood up.  The teacher said, "Do you think you're stupid, Little Johnny?" "No, ma'am, but I hate to see you standing there all by yourself!"
Because their job is draining.
Their personality.
A 
A Roamin' Catholic
He didn't have a leg to stand on.
An elephant rolling down a hill with a daisy in its mouth!
in their sleevies 
tip!
The punchline
One is a fantastic display of cunning stunts while the other is a fantastic display of stunning cunts
because i wanna see your amiiboobs.
Last time I checked I was 15, and that was 10 years ago! 
They were s !
Credit: Stephen Wright
If it is a regular fight, give the painkiller to the loser. If it is a fight to the death, the winner gets the painkiller.
It's a bit of a low blow...
Oh my god. I'm Friesian!
Said every dog ever.
Ronald Weasley: An invisibility cloak 
A C3POpian
He was Kim Jong Il
Rich... Also an ambulance.
Gorillas in the mist
Raid
A Jehovah's Witness.
ALOHA SNACKBAR 
They didn't...!
They both contain locked up loonies!
Ask them to pronounce "LATEX"
Telling your parents you're gay.
To the concentration camps. 
A quadriplegic chimney sweep.
They both suck without Cream.
Potato quality
Mass zooicide.
It happened once in a Blue Moon
He was a Jehovah's Wheatness
A Union Jack.
Robin Williams. 
About 5 miles per hour.
He flies a kike.
the advocado
Little Caesars!
A Cheetah.
The grass tickles their balls.
Something you throw at wabbits when you haven't got your wifle.
Absolutely!
An Iran-asaurus!
-In the garden. -But I don't see her.  -Oh, you just have to dig a little.
-Both of them can sniff "the goods" but no one can touch !
.. if they are black, you have nothing to eat!
Miscarriage
Ewe, ewe got what I neeeeeed.
Say "hey, you Canadians! Get out of that swimming pool!"
Neither did he.
The grape depression.
Because a Lannister always pays his debts.
A So-be-it.
Manumission
Sol.
Gainsboro.
Slothages.
Because they're different cultures.
Nun
Carlos
Naan Violence
C-Eh?-N-Eh?-D-Eh?
Not John Wilkes Booth!
Tennish
Kermits finger
Paint yourself green and throw forks at her.
He had to take a sheet. 
They both have dead walkers.
It turns out that their landlord was the lessor to two evils. 
Two wee chaps
I'll give you a hint... Take the "F" out of "free" and the "F" out of "way".
A Wife, being the Romantic Sort, sent her Husband a text: "If you are sleeping, send me your Dreams.  If you are laughing, send me your Smile.  If you are eating, send me a Bite.  If you are Drinking, send me a Sip.  If you are Crying, send me your Tears. I LOVE YOU!" The Husband, Typically Unromantic, Replied, "I am in the Toilet. Please advise..".
Circumsized
They were on a roll
The tip! 
And was it in anyway responsible for the death of FPH.
Another time.
Fucking eh's.  I'll see myself out. 
Because it was a kangaroo court.
He didn't understand Flossophy!
Because I can offer you the missionary position.
Not today.
Because you're a bitch.
K9P
Quinoa & Kale
The power goes out.
It's a rottweiler. 
An orbital sander
Nacho cheese 
Light blue
Grand Theft Gelato
None
Because you never sitty down!
I don't want to be Obama self.
Relatively few
He oh...
Because all the good female athletes play in men's leagues. Thank you, thank you.
A Crook Granny's Nooky Cranny!
Light stopped having mass
In the far left corner!
A necrophiliac. 
A Bassturd. 
Reposts are allowed. 
Just because ICANN.
It's not my fault I'm blind.
Frank Sriracha
Your friends took it outside to play. They're cracking walnuts.
Triple, eh?
They're stuck up bitches.
Because it would be eel-eagle!
Because they completely hate the French press. (Reposted) 
Your aim.
A Heblew.
He was hijacking it.
To get stoned
Pump kin.
A vegetarian doesn't like meat in their mouth.
Cause bush did 9/11
Because it saw Lena Dunham on the other side. 
A quack-head.
The caust
You wait here, I'm going to go on a head. 
Because those who can't teach and those who do do.
foreign change 
The Battery has a positive side.
I thought he was inflatable.
I'll tell you later. 
Don't. It was critically panned.
The Boston marathon finish line.
It's like a really obscure number you have probably never heard of.
Michael Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzmichael 
You can type it with one hand.
Why the fuck would a blind man need a light bulb?
No, but he had a great Fall.
A hand grenade.
Because mathematicians in Ancient Greece couldn't get no irrational fraction . . . 
Are you sure?  It contains spoilers!
It went by pretty FAST!
Double 07.
Nobody knows yet.
Mount Rushmore.
Actually nevermind. It may spread
One is a mob of crazed, gun-toting, raving psychotics with radical political viewpoints who rove around with surplus American military gear, inspire acts of mass-murder, and dictate terms to a public that wants nothing to do with them, and the other is... Uhh, wait a minute...
A Cantleope
ground beef. what do you call a cow with three legs? lean beef. what do you call a cow with two legs? your mother.
You have to drop the bomb twice
An ironic paradox.
Both hate when people stick beef between two buns.
BECAUSE HE WAS USING A BANANA FOR SCALE
Walnuts. What do you call two nuts on your chest? Chestnuts. What do you call two nuts on your chin? A dick in your mouth.
Anna Bolika
The sign in the window advertised "Little Boys Pants Half Off!"
His wife   him out.
They woke him up, he's fine.
Orange Jews. 
Boysenberries
Because it doesn't even lift.
Mud Flaps
Because the free pizza wouldn't
Ass seen on TV.
Because they give them gas.
He got roasted!
A widow. 
After the big day, its balls are the first thing to come off.
She was a woman! And it wasn't until 1920 when the 19th Amendment was ratified. At this point she was 40 years old and could vote.
11 is a prime number.
A prose-titute.
Tulips on your organ.
It...um...it was a pretty good one.
A bunch of prostitutes wanted to start a labor union.
Tulips on an Organ. 
Batman can go to a store without robin.
So we'll know which jokes are One-liners,short,long,punny,and anti-humor 
Blow up dolls.
It's what comes to mind when they think of the word facial. 
Exactly like red paint!
Bukkake.
HeHe
Because of all the resistance training
Mine!
I can't jelly my dick up your ass
Their GPA drops
No, it Cantelope.
They didn't get hit by Terrorists. 
They kill my dog.
Swallow the leader. 
Chopsticks
With a Pao Wow.
Kevin Nash
Concentrated orange Jews.
Marry her. 
They're mostly Julys. 
They got Napoleon Blownapart! Happy 200th Anniversary of Waterloo everyone! 
I don't know, I just fly the drones. 
A: Conetiquette
3. One to unscrew the light bulb and screw a new one on another one to operate the crane and a third one to say when the chicken is ready.
For the watch..
a faguette
Typical. What do you call an angry white man? Active shooter.
He likes to keep it pretty Lo-key
Through Frodosynthesis
Bizon  Joke by:   
It's mentioned in the very first line of the U.S. National Anthem. 
a woman with her daughter were chatting when the grandmother came in. The mother was saying : "i can take it til the the first third then it becomes really hard for me." The daughter said :"well, i can stand the first half only then i can't take it anymore" The grandmother replied : "even if he goes balls deep i wont feel a thing" they both look at her with a WTF look and the mother say "uh. mom.. we're talking about Ramadan"
Your sister's hymen. 
Because Donald ducked.
Tolkien.
She didn't want six inches of snow all year long. 
I'm not Willy Nelson
He thinks it's funny how the Knight moves.
Benoit B. Mandelbrot
Why did the house cross the road, One of the most difficult to solve cross the road jokes, I'll give the answer when you all give.
Where The Wildlings Are
Listening to an antijoke.
I dough know. 
He wanted a well balanced meal.
So they won't roll out of bed.
See senior. 
Because no one wants them.
God is the answer.
Neither. It was a tie-die.
They don't believe in the concept of a selfie.
Paintball
He got "uge" 
Periodically, on the table. 
Windows 7 8 9.
He couldn't get passed the Olly
UnawareWolf
At a fist pump.
Shoot the guy driving the cardboard box.
For the crotch.
Oh yeah.
It always spoils the GoT.
Valhalla.
Do you guys have any good jokes to share with people?
He breaks his nose.
I don't wanna be Obama self. P.S. I know, it was super cheesy.
Peaches and Krim
Dust pan and brush
Cause you can turn the tables from 45 to 33. 
Unfortunately he never made it out of the minors and into the bigs.
For the watch
5/3. The same amount as for whites. 
Because the 'P' is silent.
A bullet.  I apologize if that joke was aimed for a younger audience. I love Sandy Hook jokes, they never get old. Just like those children.
I gotchu covered.
The Continental OP.
A blender! How do you get them out? Nacho chips!
Nothing.
He's her ex-terminator
Apparently all of the admins made the fat content too high.
Christopher Walken
None, they'll just beat the room for being black
Three. One to screw it in, one to pour the wine, and one to say 'marvelous, simply marvelous!'
George R. R. Martin.
You'd have to be dead to miss it!
Because they are constantly butt-hurt.
A man walked into a zoo and was asked by a stranger to identify a particular snake.  He responded.  "Do I look like a herpetologist?".  To which the stranger replied " Herpetologist. Paleontologist. Urologist.  Oncologist.  Proctologist.  In the end you are just a gist" Thanks for your help.  I want to use it and I am not sure if it works.  If not can you help me out?  
For the watch.
It transmists H.I.V
At 69 she always gets a frog in her throat.
They both can be stabbed multiple times and not die...
Okay, you start it.
It takes more than one hipster to push the black people out of a neighborhood.
Because Ken came in another box.
In the spaghetto
Well it can be hard sometimes
Ant holes
A pick pocket snatches watches
Two letters.
Ja! Beiherhund das Oder die Flipperwaldt gersput!
If you break a leg, you get cast
Everything, given enough time
Because They're the bomb
A decoi
Thank you, Bruce really needed those botox to make his wife and daughters as beautiful as he is
He'll stop at nothing to avoid them. 
He heard they had PIE.
that was until yo momma got thirsty.
A churro.
One shucks between fits and the other fucks between shits.
A cluckold.
Because whenever they get a corner they open a shop !
Because they can only semi retire. 
For the halibut.
Because of the eclipse
For the good of the watch.
The lumberjack has a job.
National Dyslexic Association
He doesn't know why they're beating him to death
We're both constantly penetrating your mom 
He played many more pieces.
A chicken tender.
Go straight for the juggler.
My extra chromosome. 
Q: What is the tallest building in the entire world?  A: The library, because it has so many stories.
baroque
An ambulance. 
Bissell
The best ones clean up after themselves
I didn't even know they were Catholic!
12 months not just february!
SUPPLIES!
Fitting in.
Obviously more than four, because it's still dark as fuck in here.
Its asshole.
A bowl of ramen noodles is actually ready in 5 minutes.
Hippies don't screw in light bulbs, they screw in tents.
A Navy pilot, asshole.
Turn down for what? 
Moby's Dick
You have to drop the bomb on her twice before she gets it.
Fifty Shades of Black
It cracked.
Most likely a thrift store or Urban Outfitters, TBH.
Because they can't count to 
No matter how hard you try, you're eventually going to press your tongue to it. 
Jello-us
A dic-tater.
They literally can't even.
Or as he's known there, 400 billion dollars.
A watermeloncollie.
He still hasn't found what he's looking for.
blue paint
5 minutes solo. Meh.
Because Satan has more politicians to help him.
Fe-mail
On some of them you actually have a voat
So the Germans can march in the shade.
He was caught beating the egg
He was Stalin.
Because it's the first Indy movie.
Ayy lmao
My dick.
Because he wore a scarf before it was cool.
You made the chain too long in the kitchen.
My name would be "Dad" and my power would be  ...
Why does a dog lick its butt?  To get the taste of dog food out of its mouth.
A waist of time...
They can't find the body. 
He rocks at 
Microsoft Paint
The cow jumped over the moon.
Too bad he never cries.
SUNY
Bernie. 
Little.
let's have sex
a 'fan'atic. 
Ba-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
1 in 50 million has a chance of becoming a human being.
Look for the fresh prints.
A Beemer.
Nah, that's bullshit. There are no streets in Siberia.
Because it follows the path of least resistance.
The pilot was a loaf of bread
Cantaloupe
An order for two large plains.
Because in charge of the numbers, Yoda was
yo mama
A grape punch line
'Elephino!
Corduroy pillows 
For fingering a minor.
Because they're unfair.
He once tried to jump 50 black mean on a steamroller.
He had no leg to stand on.
he came outta nowhere
Because she's better at being a woman than most women are.
Get in the Batmobile Robin.
And the answer is, 'Knee'
Its toothbrush dear dirty minded people.. 
A huge disappointment.  Edit: give me a T!
TransRachel - credit Jennie
Turns out he survived by running all the way to the end until he was all pooped out!
The safety. 
I'll let you guess first before I tell you...
He has to Breddit
Me: You put a check in the dryer? Don't you know money laundering is illegal?
Its hips.
A small medium at large!
and why do all these reggae artists keep talking about wanting to burn him. 
A stroke of luck.
Swim down and knock on the hatch. (In Sweden we have a running tradition of telling jokes about stupid norwegians. They do the same about swedes)
Poseidon: "Sea, Señor!"
A MissUnderstanding!
Progress. 
He drove a Ford.
Apparently she's a former Miss Teen USA.
A video game so realistic, when you screw up you have to play in a wheelchair.  
Violet
Because there's a Giant fan in every seat.
"I can see my shelf"
Mace.
Because prison showers aren't very good...
Her peas
That's how you set the bar high.
an Envelope  EDIT: My deepest Canadian apologies to those who are calling this a riddle. I always took it as a cheesy joke
Whats the point? 3rd wave feminists can't take a joke anyway.
It has no class.
An ISIS member's dick.
Real numbers having period are rational.
Unmeasurable.
Captain's log.
Dey both sinna, mon!
It is because they listen to their motherboard.
[deleted]
The fisherman shucks between fits.
Walking.
Well who held his wings back?   Oldie but a goodie from my grandpa.
Disaster
The Muppets
'cause roosters got no hands
Pretty much the same as anyone else.
About 6 garbage bags and 30 gallons of formaldehyde.
I store them in migranary.
Yeah, but you've probably never heard it before.
Two. One to screw in the lightbulb and another to sing about all the good times they had with the lightbulb. 
They performed unspeakable acts on her.
Because there are already too many targets.   (credit: some old veteran bum looking guy sleeping on a bench at the police station I went to today.)
Bruce Banner  
...you give it ten tickles
It runs in your jeans.
Everything
He's a blacksmith
A: Comet
May I push your stool in?
喲媽媽這麼胖
With a cow-culator!  (Rimshot)
Reaching around and pretending it went all the way through
Gillette.
[This post has been banned for your protected - Ellen Pao]      
Ponzi Buddy
Because they keep falling through the holes in his hands.
Fur-nication! 
The pilot. 
To get to the other side.
"Hey, put that thing back in your trousers!"
Ellen Pao
When you can't.
Because they are preparing a stink bomb
"No, she has a  "
They both love Pujols
He got no customers because his sign said, "Looking for staff, a pie within."
Tthhhhhhh
Exactly where you left it.
A web designer.
Multitasking.
Cocky
...everywhere.......
They've already announced the title: "P.S. I Got 'Eem".
I would never let a garbanzo bean in my mouth.
Because one nun follows the other nun to make sure that nun doesn't get none.
Heres a hint: It's not C!
Because it's too cubed!
iWood.
Because they only wanted to get a little drunk.
Debby Downer 
An eyesaur
Twin. Because the husband has to sleep on the couch. 
He was pawly.  I'm sorry. I'll see myself out.
He's a mean medium, Moe, with range.
A wind tunnel.
"Closed for Winter".
Eating a manda-out.
Yoko Ono.
Use a homophone.
Their spaceships Netherland.
penal tea edit: to someone
Where is my tractor?
because she's pissed.
Filet minYAWN
A rake
He didn't get a good knight's leap. Wakka wakka!
Underdeveloped photos.
A man was at a bar when a beautiful woman walked up to him to say hello. He asks her name to which she says Jane. She asked his name, he said, Ra Ra Ra Ra Ra Fa fa fa fa fa el el el el el el. "Oh, I'm sorry I wasn't aware you had a speech impediment!" she says to him. "Oh my no, I speak just fine. My father was the one with the speech impediment. The person who registered me was just a son of a bitch!"
They are always a bit METEOR! 
A: Senator.
Why does Chuck Norris have a lot of jokes but Bruce Lee doesn't? Because Bruce Lee is no joke... 
Stephen Hawking
Zero. They don't exist.
Pork in a roll. (At least I'm trying)
"The Baconator"
A French pig goes, "Oui! Oui! Oui!" all the way home.
Arrrginine
You don't look like you could take a joke.
the captain's log
So black people remember they were cotton pickers before they were drug dealers.
They always swallow.
They both fly around Uranus looking for Klingons' s
Husband: Darling you are my Queen of Spades.
"Get Jurassic over here!"
BONE JOVI!!!!!!!
A cucumber.  edit: words
One to masturbate, one to moan.
inFUHRERiated.
Wedding cake
Well well well.....
Dogs have owners, cats have staff.
Cancer
His ears! Yes, this is a real joke I got from a Laffy Taffy wrapper today, not 30 years ago.  I did not laugh. 
Decomposing.
A man walks into a bedroom and sees a hot, naked woman lying face-down on the bed. Q:  What's his name? A:  Willie Turner Q:  What's   name? A:  Betty Will
Pink fluff!!!
Splash damage 
The cow has the udder.
Hee Lan To
Pull off the ring and the house is gone.
they have too many ohms to be good conductors.
How'd you get between their tiny little legs?
Sikhs.
Send Matt Damon
If you leave the yogurt for 100 years alone, it develops a culture.
Come on, he wasn't that bad.
Did you hear about that group of midgets suing the local bar? Yeah, they were upset with how short the stools were. The judge threw out the case, though; told them they were grasping at straws.
A racist. :) xxx
They both come in hot and wet and 
Square root of 81
They wash themselves. 
You put floss over his eyes.
Because they want to prevent plaque build-up.
Because their eggs stinked!
He had his reservations.
Because they chew balls. 
Lil' Confidence
Because your really loud and fucking annoying.
Because you have to urn them.
A Horse.
Dill dough.
Can I hold your hand hand hand hand?
A putable bond 
Reddit: Re-Downvote Downvote it.
Beauty. Beauty is in the eye of the beholder.  
It is now a parent. 
AN AMERICAN! YOU GET AN AMERICAN!
A whored
A TACK
Doppelwangers
Because the "p" is silent!
now museum, now you don't
What's the square root of sixty-nine? Eight-something!
A B&B
I heard the advice he gives is enlightning!
Because 7 ate 9. Credit to a guy I work with. 
They revived to much XP 👌
Because she's always drinking from the coup de Grace. (This was my sister's favourite joke when we were kids. Once our mum flipped out on a long car journey because she told it too many times).
"Umami!"
A lecture.
Udder destruction 
Delightful
Because there's nothing wong with it.
You BOTH eat  -booty! 
I've never had a garbanzo on my face.
Refraction of sunlight in raindrops
Beating his meat.
Sunni side up at first. But they always end up scrambled. 
Pocahontas pokin' Hans tits
The have big staffs 
wear a condm.
Popeye got pissed.
Radish
A condescending con descending.
If it's evil, a Deceptigone. If not, an Autobottomoftheocean Shamelessly stolen from 
Pop corn. Get it? like e.g, pop stars
They can both bring out the child from within.
His attempts to cure it were  .
A  !
K.
Two whales in a pod!
"I don't wanna be obama self."
Of chorus.
A man called his local animal control as he was walking through the woods- Animal Control: Thanks for calling, how can we help you? Man: I was walking through the woods and I found a suitcase in the bush, and inside was a Fox and 4 cubs. Animal Control: Oh no, thats terrible. Are they moving? Man: I don't know to be honest, but that would explain the suitcase.
Im working on it.
Oh that's right it hasn't come out yet.
North Koreans have no Seoul.  Thought of this very early in the morning waiting to board a plane.
"Gee U Knit!"
He puts his foot down.
he relished it 
For resisting a rest.
Because he may Pikachu
Because it didn't have a spoon! (Courtesy of my three year old daughter.)
He was infact a   old.
I don't really know, but I think it will run pretty shitty
Gingervitus.
A Conquistador! 
He worked it out with a pencil.
Pumpkin Pi
A condescending con descending. 
An Army of Juan
If left for 400 years, the yoghurt will develop a culture.
They are probably in better shape than you. 
You get a tardy grade. (  that explains the joke if you don't get it.)
A Fall Out Boy.
Because William shat on her.
With the rising cost of inflation he couldn't afford it anymore.
They didn't have ships in common.
"I do."
Well its been 2 whole years; Rick and him are still going strong
Shake'n bake.
High wasted shorts!
He had only one eye, but two pupils!
Too many frames.
Leon-itis.
He got off on the wrong foot
Uncles
Dix Neuf
He wanted more Monet in his wallet. 
He could never finish a race.
Because they always come before it's cool.
A bee flying backwards
Because he caught everything bear handed!
Matisse hurt!
Nobelium
an adadictomy.
It was out of tuna...
Just one, but first they have to sit in the dark for a year and then get letters from two electricians giving them permission.
They tried to onionize.
Suture self!
She was heels over head for him!
"Girls just iguana have fun".
A Brazilian.
You get a certificate for showing you can do it and hope to god you never have to do it again
They screw children, not light bulbs.
Both! Now get in the fucking van.
Slowly.
Timbr
A nose
A dickbutt.
You order a dickbutt at a gay bar.
You don't call it, you pick it up.
Because it would look ridiculous with 8 inches.
To get to the other bribe
XeNON.
Stripper poop particles 
pepperoni and cheese…. 
So nobody will see their bare (bear) bottom!
Iran
It is not like that anywhere else.  It is not like people studying science claim that they are already scientists. Or people studying the arts say they are unemployed.
You can only ran, because it's past tents.
At the BAAAAH
It was a case of two birds one stoner
Cause she has a massive dick.
Dubstrep.
Guacamole.
Da Beers
Want to date hot Russians!
He writes scary stories.
apple juice
Forgive me father fore I have skinned
He was afraid his nickname would be Jockie.
I cunt hear you - scum again.
Because they are test-itch-els!
...ever seen the trail a slug leaves?
One slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit.
They had to remove their Blatter.
Hare you go.
Bees nuts! 
Ask them what OP stands for.
Nine months
You can't gurgle sand.
I heard it was removed.
Because they're ugly and stink! ;)
Because he was a child molester.
paddy o' furniture
He didn't want to live life without a porpoise!
She's already cancelled her wedding and reception due to lack of RSVPs.
The Polish.
Jur-ass-sick
All of them!
Because you can't have a team with only 3 champions.
Because they see typos every day.
Heist cream Got to give credit to my friend, who sadly dosent have reddit.
Because 7.. 8.. 9
Because he saw the snowblower coming 
They found his Head & Shoulders behind the couch.
Just two. One to explain to the public that everything possible is being done to solve the problem, and the other to screw the lightbulb into the water faucet.
Latvian see potato, but when cross is only secret police.
And can I bring my dog to them for a checkup?
Because she can't get rid of the Y chromosome
Hepsi!
Historically insignificant.  Full disclosure: Heard on the radio this morning on my way to work. 
Because all they do is break wind. 
Mean.
ant holes
"Wanna buy some candy?"
Firmware
It's called "two and a half grams"
She works at two different strip clubs.
They hold an erection...
You can beat an egg, but you can't beet a root!
You have to drop the bomb twice before she gets it.
Don't look I'm changing
The Hanbook
You have toupee
The refridgegator.
So she can moan with the other.
A Cantaloupe. 
He got a handful of sheet.
There's already a clock on the stove
Domesticate another animal.
2 scoops ice cream 1 scoop dead baby
Corduroy.
L'Hymen! 
A Nightmare
It's the spot between your twat and shitter. 
A stroke of genius. 
National Dyslexic Association.
I don't know and I don't care
Close the lid to the dumpster. 
A  geist. Thanks! I will show myself out.
with a blender. How do you get them out? With a straw.
They seem kind of arbor-trary.
A high medium low
GAAAARRRRRRRR!!! Edit: I beat ya guys to it. Ha
They could hummus a song! (I was really proud of this one.)
A family. 
Thpeaking.
And why do no rappers fuck with him?
5 minutes talk to wife.
Tagalog-tagalog-tagalog-tagalog. 
An Anne-Boleyn-ce.
between 18 and 24 yrs
By firing squad.
Because men are fucking asshole
Congress.
He only had Ein Stein
Caw Caw why'd my natural habitat get replaced with 165 000 square feet of consumerist wasteland lol
you can't milk a cow for 14 years
Phlegm is mucus secreted in the airways and nasal passages during an infection or disease such as cold or flu. Catarrh on the other hand is that hot place where they bribe FIFA to give them the World Cup.
Raisin brain.
You don't.  You get down from a duck.
Texas after a drought.
Chewing gum. 
This is a stick-up.
Circumcised 
Yukon.
Steppe by steppe.
He got a taste of religion. 
Shaven, not furred
Kenny Killarney and Arny Kilkenny.
there's a big idiot between the "I" and the "Y" on the keyboard. Why don't you go and see who it is?
Coz I'm gonna destroy your pussy tonight
None, they arrest the room because it's black.
Kern-el
Fly Curious.
Having to go inside to ask for a clothes hanger
A MAXican 
A canopy.
"Jet Fuel Don't Melt Steel Beams".
I don't have a Ferrari in my garage
NEIN-CRAFT! 
They both have meat between 7-year-old buns. 
One is a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean ......
They both come out of France in a box. It's not even good and it's not even accurate. From Anthony Horowitz's 'The Killing Joke', a really weird book.
1Forrest1
The Bermuda Triangle.
By swimming in their debt.
Ohm on the range
The riddle of life!
How deep is the Grand Canyon? First post please be considerate but and criticism is welcome
What are you a gay fish
Good fucking question, I need to get stronger locks for the home dungeon.
An optimast.
Because it was  ly ill. I'll show myself out.
VINECRAFT DO IT FOR THE MINE XD
-A slow poke.
Sign language.
Because seven times seven was odd
Well a penis gets hard, but a criminal does HARD time!
She's got a pun in the oven.
A buysexual
He's alright now.
Reese was born Witherspoon but Tyrese stole his.
Because he kept taking advice with a pinch of salt!
froid
If her ankles swell when she farts.
I just want to know the cutoff date.
I walked into an airport with two bags:   "I want this one to go to Chicago, and this one to go to Paris."   "Sir, you can't do that."   "Why not? It happened the last time."
one one appreciates good head
Sikhs 
You push it
By moving the show to a "true crime" channel and calling it "18 Victims and Counting".
Fruit punch! 
Canteloupe
Cumshot
A Shih Tzu
Because he is ein Bärtiger!  The shirt should say it all. And I'm considering getting one.
Not knowing how to use a coathanger...
Curiosity! 
Just two, but more can join in if there's room in the lightbulb.
Your Ti"ming"!
One who could read, one who could write, and the third to watch over those two dangerous intellectuals.
With a pita pan.
You can splooge in her good eye and run away without paying.
It's because they have anty-bodies!
Stay here, I'll just go on ahead.
A  Dobie
The Polterheist 
I hear their bowling alleys are pretty nice. 
Na . . . What about Nitrosoxide NO . . . Umm... Potassium? K..
You Don't Mess with the Gohan
Clear all the Jerry!
Hitler
I can sleep with a light on.
To be sure to be sure
Dago through rain  Dago through mud  Dago through snow  And when Dago flat  Dago wop-wop-wop-wop...
Ask your parents.
With little Nazis
It's so funny, I'm still trying to get over it.
Rasta-four-eyes
They know how to work under the hood!
Police are looking for a small medium at large. 
Put it bluntly.
FIFucked.
You don't know? That's right, you   know, because you weren't there, man!
Because she is dead.
With Little Caesars
Because I really just want you to leave me a loan.
A jerk-off
Colonel, sir. ^ ^
For the Halibut.
so they can reuse the phone after the explosion
One is tedious, the other is "titty-our"
He becomes the Man of Steel
Annette.
Virgin Milf ( ͡͡ ° ͜ ʖ ͡ °)
Because they can spell it.  LOL LOL
I n c o r r e c t l y
Everywhere
because they're really fucking good at it
The farmer (this killed my 12yo brothers)
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick.
They're both full of seamen.
A Hillbilly
Sir Loin.
They always somehow just Klingon to it.
He is in the Nile
BANANANANANANANANANANA
Issac Newton died a virgin.
Edam
It didn't work out.
A Baked Bean!
A genetically modified vegetable 
Banner.
Don't bother. It's pretty Laos-y.
The election year.
10... 10 what? 9, 8....
Because the pee is silent.
What is the difference between a drug dealer and a hooker? A hooker can wash her crack and sell it again.
Because it's Butterfree.
All hands on deck
Psychopaths. (I hate myself) 
Because Greece lightening
A counter argument.
Because if they fell forwards they'd fall back into the boat.
they are both 8........
Woke up in a Korma
At least Pluto exists
Eau myyyyyyyy....
It'll dim sum
Start out with a large fortune.  
Only one, but it take 4 episodes and Krilin died at the end.
Kung Pao Chicken
It's called Uber. 
Sectional assualt.
He thought it was "being at Apple every day", not "eating an apple every day".  
To find a tight seal
About halfway across.
Baba O'Reilly
In the toilet.
I tried to open a new email account today. When it asked me to enter a password I entered "penis". Message flashed up "PASSWORD REJECTED, TOO SHORT". How the fuck do Microsoft know the size of my dick? 
I bought some thyme yesterday.
Just one. But it takes about 8-10 visits.
Burgertory
The lightbulb works fine...
They had baron.
Star-Spangled Banner.
Güey protein.
Two bee stings What's worst than two bee stings? The Holocaust.
They throw silverware down a flight of stairs....ting, tong, ping, ding
Telling your dad that you're gay..
He is going to tell you.
Cause Tony Scott did it first.
They're both irrational.
No?   You must not roll them back far enough. 
Don't ask me, I'm just the drone pilot.
You can only fit three fingers in a bowling ball.
Just one. But it takes 5 episodes.
Professor + I'm sorry. lol.
A Tequila Mockingbird.
An oppresso.
They quack up
Well, you know what happened last time they picked a race...
It induces labor.
With a can't c-section.
Roll Tide.
Wet
The 1 that says   I da ho
It didn't have a peel.
I don't care.
Because they are non-voting felines! 
it has many problems...
He was sacked for only selling Underlay!
When two of the most populated countries clash which race will rise?
You pour it in a square glass.
A turtle.  I was lying about the wheels
Asked my buddy "What would you call an elephant and a rhino mixed?". He looks at me and says "Shit man, Helliphino".
He cured them.
-3/5
Because it was a kitty fiddler.
It had no back story. 
No, me neither.
A math problem
I'm sure she would, too.
Nothing they just waved.... I'll show my self out
Cause they be lion.
Artificial intelligence.
An Eye-patchy helicopter! . Ill show myself out.
Breakfast and lunch. I'll show myself out now
Rick O'Shea.
Who cares!
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick
Smells like carrots!
Because white people have work in the morning.
The games take 3 months to play! 
Oh didn't you hear, he was the first Australian to be killed by ebola!
"hey zeus!"
A greydient
You say "Hail Hitler!" The German baby will stand at attention. The Jewish baby will shit itself. And the Polish will play in the shit.
By leaving a plunger in the toilet
... only if you have enough.
They're always around so many karats.
She kept running away from the ball
Shut the fuck up, Donny
There's whiteout on the screen.
Oh, you're a redditor?
Scar Stories. 
Her tampon is behind her ear and she can't find her pencil! 
Free
Newer magazines
At the beach in San Diego.
They lie still.
One's a pharmacist and the other's a drug dealer.
Special branch.
He kneaded a poo
Sorry for the loss.
Schiznitzel. 
Free ham
His Aunt Arctica
A drummer
Red paint.
Goo goo gai pan!
An Irish funeral has one less drunk.
Gator-aids.
He was born that way you homophobe!
Never mind, it'd probably go right over your head anyway.
19 kids and counting. Too soon?  :/
tea bag stays in the cup
They having a float-on. it very good
Because he was the rightful heir
IHOP.
She was described as being off her tits.
Aww cheap. I screwed up the title.
So Keith Richards can tell which continent he's in.
He couldn't Move Fasa 
The trappé!
Because he couldn't float! (Insert laughter here)
Because it Lubri-Can't Even!
You will be mist.
He's in town with the circus and wants you to call him. 
She kept abreast of the current issues. (go easy...just made this up)
When you diffuse a bomb, you only have to cut one red wire.
A face palm.
A Hebrew
P.U.
You skip the flat ones. 
Not z's
A student used to give his teacher some raisins everyday. He kept giving them for 3 months straight. Then one day he did not give raisins to his teacher. And his teacher asked him "Where are the raisins today?", and the boy said "My rabbit died."
How do you drink through that? (literally the only joke i know and the only one i ever make)
Tut mir leid so ein Ding existiert nicht Edit 1: Grammar
One, we have no time for humour.
I got a bad sunburn a week ago, and my skin is staring to peel of.I guess you could say that it's.....appealing 
Her vagina 
Quack cocaine 
It was stuck to the chicken's legs.
So it doesn't burst when you fuck it. 
Because they come from bulbs. (This is the only   joke I know.)
None, that's women's work!
Celery Stalks.
Klondike Bars
It's pretty cheesy.
... a tectonic plate!
Because he spiked his drink
One. They simply hold the bulb and wait for the world to revolve around them.
Porkchop
Your grip.
Deer balls, they are under a buck
A bipolar bear
Because Han was flying so low. 
Do you have a prescription?" asks the chemist. "No," he replies, "But I've got a photograph of the wife..."
He was making a scene!
In a snow bank.
You only need one nail for the picture.
A play on words
On dos axes
D'oh-ta 2
Because they can't get high.
The visitors.
(•_•) ( •_•)>⌐■-■ (⌐■_■) A Reptile Dysfunction.
Cant-elope :D
A Poltergeese!
Well, one things for sure
A dictator
He had a reptile dysfunction
Because the meat they are eating has definately been abused.
Me: The one her mother missed?
It's called tricoxagain.
Mortal Kombat Ex 
THE LIVER.  ometrist will copyright this joke. hopefully. 
oink
Justin.
He's trying to integrate back into society, but you can still kinda differentiate him from others.
Little Seizures.
They default in our stars
Well, well, well
Because then it would be a foot.
A fuzz ball 
Nah, it 8 a byte earlier.
Because he didn't serve a porpoise...
...they both have a 90% chance of being nailed by a Mexican.
because Sven eight nine! hahahahahahahahaha...
Fur Traders
A lawyer was just waking up from anesthesia after surgery, and his wife was sitting by his side. His eyes fluttered open and he said, "You're beautiful!" and then he fell asleep again. His wife had never heard him say that so she stayed by his side. A couple of minutes later, his eyes fluttered open and he said, "You're cute!" Well, the wife was dissapointed because instead of "beautiful," it was "cute." She asked, "What happened to 'beautiful'?" His reply was "The drugs are wearing off!"
Fat.
Her name was Ella. 
Pretty dangerous, the Hepatitis C
Nothing, you already said it twice.
Pretty dangerous, the Hepatitis B
The MaxiPad
They only  ...
Four. One to change the bulb, three to stand around so he has someone to hi-five after. 
Ehh, it depends.
Maths teachers, they make everybody count.
So he can fit on a spaceship.
Well armed...
It's an obscure number, you have probably never heard of it.
They will never listen to Logic or Reason.
USB
Hairy Potter
He's got somebody else's back, he could probably handle yours.
Not mothers, lightbulbs. Shit.
Both are better between 2 buns
The wheelchair 
The Dark Knight Rises.
Spring break.
Reply: Yes! Answer:  you like it when deez nuts in yo face
to not get to the other side. 
Tell them to eat shit.
When it is pure bread. Told to me by a friend.
Whale oil beef hooked. 
A prayeradactyl.
I'm trying to solve a Rubik's cube and a friend told me that using Al Gore Rhythms could help.
Come on. Lets go to lunch. My treat.
Shake N' Bake.
Because it takes twice as long to fuck their brains out
Idk but it sure as hell can pick cotton
Pop-tart.
Ten.  One to change it and nine to downvote for no reason.
"Oh sorry eh! Oh! Sorry! Sorry, eh? Sorry? So sorry! Oh! Oh no.... Sorry, eh?"
If you leave yogurt for 200 years it'll grow a culture.
DEEZ NUTZ HAHA GOT EM
Overweight suicide bombers.
You just shoot yourself in the face!
The "B" is the aerial view, the "oo" is the front view, the "b" is the side view.
Weighcist
Bad at following directions.
The NHL playoffs
Deflation. 
They know resistance is a waste of energy.
Just one. But the light bulb has to want to change.
Tell someone they reposted.
Two. One to screw in the light bulb, and one to hold the penis. I mean the ladder. One to hold the ladder.
A patchy gunship
Because 'Illinois you!
Because if they went forward they would still be in the boat.
Don't you find it Funny that after Monday(M) and Tuesday(T), the rest of the week says WTF?
I'll bet you wipe yourself with toilet paper too...
Suge Knight Shyamalan.
The casting couch
WEEEEEEEEEE!
Bruce Jenner
Live Jasmine
A person who stays up all night wondering if there is a dog.
Au nevoir.
A silverbach.
Somewhere over the rainbow, weigh a pie.
"Stop being so elfish, Karen!"
The Isobar
Maccaroni
-They only have one pair of trunks.
He had a bad alkaline trip.
Bahhh
I'm a little dino-sore.
Wii-U, Wii-U, Wii-U!
Mufasa.
Wrong.
Blackbirds
I'm not letting you cook dinner again
Speed bump ahead
A crayoff
Take away its USB cable.
Verbatim.
Just stand in the corner to warm up, they are usually 90 degrees.
Cause that would be a big help, I seem to have misplaced him.
Ay kid, go easy on the candy!
Don-key xote
Her algae bra
Damn dude i can't See anything through all That Shit.
He kisses his mother with that mouth!
He had a large drawer of chests right there in his office.
Unorthodox
Women
My recent observation concludes ~$140. Great weekend.
It bombed
cheerio.
A small medium at large
A BOOBEE!
One is a busty crustacean and the other is a crusty bus station. 
John Wayne stopped killing Indians a long time ago.
Mad cow disease was already taken.
Fo Drizzle.
Old folk doing the conga.
A Porqué-pine
Cause love is what I got
She has a tampon behind her ear, and she is looking for her pencil.
Cantaloupes
Bilingual What do you call someone who speaks 3 languages? Trilingual. What do you call someone who speaks only 1 language? American.
Floppy Giuseppe
Unix
National Dyslexics Association.
the underlay! underlay!
If you leave a yoghurt for 200 years, it will eventually develop a culture. Plus the yoghurt's fat free.
It was a test she could pass.
A naked blonde doing cartwheels.
...Christopher Walken
Jewbacca
No, How Long is a Chinaman.
Gangrape
Hip-Pop
I weep uncontrollably when I cut them.
Because it's yellow and settles on their land too. And it melts snow.
An astrounaut you racist bastard!
Feminem
He couldn't budget.
Doppelbangers
"I'll be blunt..."
...
Eric Clapton wouldn't drop a bag of cocaine out the window
— Well, as long as it doesn’t delay the ceremony…
grandpa said nothing! just gently licked his eyebrow
Ted Danson.
The egg-stra.
It only takes two mice to screw in a light bulb. The hard part is getting them in there.
Cancer.
Acne cums on your face after you're 12.
"Sir, when I buy patron I EXPECTO PATRONUM!" (Hauls ass towards the exit)
Don't get me started.
Because it would be economically unviable to market a pharmaceutical in such a vastly unpopulated area.
Sushi bars and stop signs.  Source: am southern Oregonian; lots of bad Cali drivers here
Coke.
I hear it will be a small role
The clock is still right twice a day.
YouTuberculosis.
Jedi do that?
He couldn't remove three nails to save his life
Because they are most certainly guilty.
Omelette you finish.
Because he sleeps before it gets cool.
American.
A barbecue
Kids don't eat broccoli.
They snigger.
Call it whatever. It is not like it is gonna have  a problem with that. 
Ch-ch-ch-ch-ch-cherry balm!
Meow
A bang for your buck.
Heinzenburg
Because he was too close to The Edge. 
Let's just say he had the standard deviation.
Stupid.
Because they're WELL-CULTURED.
He wanted someone who understood   and   case.
Because the "P" is silent
with ducktape!! 😂😂😂
My hot Chinese neighbour told me she was desperate for a roger. It was only when I'd dropped my pants and got my cock out that I realised she meant someone to rent her spare room. 
An anarchid.
Can't legally consent because they're retarrrrrrrrded.
Resisting a rest.
El autobus, porque va lleno!
She starts to fit your wife's clothes.  Yes, I know this isn't OC. Nothing on reddit is. 
You washer and dryer.
...he had a hard time with his allergies
Shlalom! (Oy, that's terrible.)
You can tune a piano but you can't Tuna Fish!  
Telling your parents that you're gay.
The roofie didn't work.
Pindunderjeep
A transition metal.
Liquor.
Because they always *tip*.
Because you can sell the same crack over and over again.
One's a crusty bus station, the other's a busty crustacean. 
ßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßßß....
Sooner or later, you're going to stick you tongue on it.
Pick a cod, any cod!
It's days were numbered!
Unidank
Falling from the 1st floor:    SPLAT! HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA! Falling from the 10th floor: HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA! SPLAT!
A: Floyd Mayweather
A Merangue-utang :-D
His ass
The character Brunehilde is now named Brucehilde.
Because they're stuck up cunts.
They are both stuck-up cunts.
He ChromeCasts.  anDruid humor. 
"Oh baby, you are so (1/cos C)" !!!
It's spring, and the cub comes out of his cave. His knees are wobbling, he's a wreck. He's skin and bones, with big circles under his eyes. His mother says, "Junior! Did you hibernate all winter like you were supposed to?" "Hibernate? Shit, Ma, I thought you said 'masturbate'
Gluten tag!
Drink lighter fluid
Boo bae!     (Read aloud please)
The Thai fighter
I said to him, "Jesus?" and he replied, "Where's Zeus?"
Beez nuts! 
6: Prophet
Sea Level.
Cumberbitches.
A hummussexual.
Queef jerky.
A Fridge
urine trouble.
A: they're always talking about God. 
Because they are all looking for their père
What do evil midgets call it? A 
Russia kept Stalin it
Because only a Sith deals in absolutes.        
"I don't believe we've met..."
I'll tell you later.
... Because it gives them square roots
NYC subway commuters.
Someone who stays up all night wondering whether or not there is dog.
Soon he will be Jah-bless.
Horse power.
Because they are really good at it.
Hey, gattaca? GATTACA? 
because fetch is not going to happen. 
It's really shaking me up!
My dick.
For five dollars you can get one with crabs in it.
Put it in his honey. 
Nom Nom Nominal
Princess Leiabensraum
What is WRONG with you!
A Kosher pork
Linda McCartney
Ereptile Dysfunction.
They gave too many shits
In north korea itself.
tatious.
Because he "got lucky".
The Newport  (My first joke, sorry if bad 8>)
Because the pride comes before the fall.
Mechanic.
An iron.
9-11 victims. They went through 87 stories in 10 seconds.
Mourning wood 
The Grammy's
Because there's too many   juries.
Because it's black. Sorry.
2-pop 
beez nuts
Mariguana.
Icy dead people.
I'm Batman.
Married and virgin.
Gilly suit
"Don't do it! You have so much potential!"
Walking -Jk Rolling
Well, it just wouldn't be right.
Juice
Realizing you only put 10 in
Santa goes down the chimney.
He Was Snowed In(Snowden) ;)
A man.  Courtesy of my grandmother.
Water. It helps them get high. 
They both had curds/Kurds in their whey/way!
Their neighbor
Beets by Dre.
A stay at home dad
An excavator.
They turn off their XBOX and go to bed!
Guaca-mole!
5. 4 reverse and 1 forward for parades.
You put a windshield in front of her. 
Hitlers gas bill.
99, 98 get in a pile while 1 grabs a match and lighter fluid.
A stick. 
Cancer
He can never find the Loki.
Throw    from the plane
Chicken tikka m'sala
A great big pho queue. 
M'self
secret service
Foster Farms
I'll tell you tomorrow.
I'm the wiener!
Yosemite!
Fruits & Vegetables.
Bill Clinton.  He hid from the black guy in between the Bushes.
Fluffer Bunny.
Allahbama
Catoons
She screams her husbands name instead of yours
Me neither, but I had it on the tip of my tongue yesterday.
So you can floss your teeth with them after you've used them.
Beethoven's last movement.
A webinar.
Stick a banana up her cooter, if it comes out half eaten, you've got a monkey on the way!
He uses Pulp Friction
Oh.  Nvm...
Aye matey
Stop smoking. You are too young to smoke
They both have a unique serial number. 
Because they were vaccinated as children.
Because he was always in a cent.
Wiped his ass
He nose what he's doing
they are always up to something...
With crucifictions, they throw the whole jew away.
It was pissed off.
Both make Jews run faster! (Sorry, but as an agnostic Jew myself, I hope that it's okay for me to make this joke.)
It's a little bit funny.
A quarter-pounder with cheese.
They both like a tight seal.
Don't get me started!
Attempted murder.
Poker face.
By crossing the Finnish line!
I don't mind telling work the other jobs I've done
This
Bread and Bakedfast!
Because he's a cross product.
Because they don't want a   man lost!
A pigloo I'll see myself out. 
Tell her to count the stairs on an escalator.
tape velcro to the ceiling.
A Clown-Dyke-Bar Credit to   
A warden
Baltimore, I hear it's backbreaking work.
Eric Clapton would never let a small bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
They were his andouille-ing. [I'll see myself out...]
Deputin
A pige-out ...made it myself...
Because there's cheetahs. 
He parked at a   parking!
I guess I'll tell you all about it when I see you again.
A virgin.
What has two legs and bleeds profusely? Half a cat
A: they're misogynists
A Thot.
Ah-so-late!
An ath1337
Grass, I lied about the wheels.
He knew a short cut.
The lottery.
What's the difference between Jam and Jelly? I can't jelly my cock in your ass.  Inspiration taken from How I Met Your Mother :)
So you can tell them apart from feminists.
The spaghetto
rons
She kept sitting on Pinocchio's face screaming "LIE TO ME"!
She answered the iron.
Juan on Juan. 
You kip.
Punch him in the nose.
I didn't think so.
Seriously,  it  is not a joke. I really want to know.
A Clock-18
When the sandwich drops I'm sad.
I give a shit when my pizza is burnt.
It doesn't take a  bull a 2-6 oz to fuck a cow
The bank robber says: Give me the money or I will shoot!  The football player says: Give me the money or I won't shoot.
Hello Reddit, In  2008 Andrew Warner has written a thesis about grotesque humour. I have yet to find a .pdf of this paper. The full title is: 'P.S. Dead Baby Jokes Aren't Funny: The Grotesque in Sick Humor' written by Andrew M. Warner. If anyone can help me find a copy of this magnificent work, I would love to hear, since I am dying to read this. Cheers
It was electric
A Brazillion!!! 
Election day
Did I miss something? 
It's 150 broof.
I'm sorry, it's confidential. 
Because a sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away.
Rigatoni
Mourning wood
Mistake him for George Clooney.
Waka Flakamole  I'll show myself out
By taking a shit in a rainforest!
Spanish!
Plenty of coat hangers.
They called it Fennec-Kin's Wake
A cat will lie   your face. A politician will lie   your face.
The Mersenne Twister.
A porpoise.
Stephen Hawking.
Every time someone said "Get down!" they jumped up and started dancing. 
They found his head and shoulders in the glove box.
Och noo, me troosers!
A stroke of genius.
Corduroy!
Tom Brady
No, you are all al-left.
An idiot who forgot to take it out earlier.
A paragraph, hes not a full essay yet.
Don't worry, they'll fucking tell you.
Scares their dogs.
And the dashboard, and the windshield...
Likud.
They both feature Chess nuts!
She thought it was diet coke
Eric Clapton never lost a bag of coke out the window.
Cause they carry pistils.
Cause he thought "casta" was Greek for "moms".
pedo-pushers
Never mind. It's a tasteless joke.
No. The universe uses lossy compression.
To 
Cowschwitz.
A. Butter Finger
Spit, swallow, gargle.
there's a coffee shop on the other side. u thought its gonna be '' paul walker''.. didnt u?
They are wearing suspenders and a belt. 
The cannaBUS.
Her asshole.
Gaaaaaaaiiiinnnnnnnnnssssss.
Parents.
It's sublime
Pumpkin Pi
... From the  iometry.  I'll see myself out now.
To keep the flies off of the bride.
NO IDEAR!
Graaaaaaaaaaaaaaaains! ... I'll show myself out...
A leg.
Because the bus route doesn't go to the country club. 
Brown chicken brown cow ;)
Hebrews it
He couldn't read his opponent's moves.
[removed]
It makes them a bit teste.
Ghost Peppers.
(Question sponsored by Al Tebehalah's Discount Lobotomies)
Just kidding
Ayyyy watch it homes!
Sinko de mayo
He was able to stirrup some controversy about his opponent with his effective smear campaign.
The wheelchair.
Farsi.
He suffered from elephant-tight-ass.
It's theft rate.
Challah at ya boy!
Corduroy.
A little boy asks him mom, "Mom how are babies born?". Looking at his innocent question, his mom answers, "When a woman feels like having a cute baby like you, an angel brings a baby from heaven and keeps it in the mom's lap." Patiently hearing this sweet story from his mother, the little boy asks, "So fucking is useless?"
A Dell.
A carpet.
They're anti-semantic.
Abraham Lincoln.
Hola Seniority
Leddit go
A paradox
A grr-affe
Smiles, because there is a mile between each ‘s.
Cot death
"May the forth be with you"
The Triple Entendre.
They just don't believe in labels. 
Deciding which to tell people first.
Ripostes everywhere.
So his buddies could come by and have a cold one with him.
A girl, because it tries to complete your sentences for you, and it   forgets what you said.
It's hill-areas. 
Four whore and seven beers ago....
A backhoe.
Just one, we're stoned not stupid.  
Oh, they'll fucking tell you.
The cooking instructions said remove sleeve and film.
He wanted a hollow cast.
Samurais? 
Schwinning!
To keep them from rolling out of bed
He was screwing around when he was supposed to be nailing her.
Macula.
They don't.
None. They like it on the dark side.
Two chalk outlines.
To remind him that "Toes Go in First."
It was shut down due to mass violins
Toadstool
The mosquito stops sucking after you slap it
"Mayweather May Weather May Weather"
Whatever you like.
There's twenty of them
The inter course
Neither could finish a race
The Know-Nothings!
i did an online search and all i could find were jokes about corn where they were the subject (in the start of the joke) Can anybody tell me a good joke where corn is only in the punchline? 
Isaac newton died a virgin
no .
The bout was declared a bore.
When you ask them "Are you a vegan?" and they say "Yes".
Ereptile dysfunction
A depresso... get it?
MooooOOOoooOoo
Because he was to short to be called an essay
To get the quarterback.
A Brazilian
It ends.
They went to bed on their wedding night. He opened up one pair of legs - not it. He opened up another pair - not it. Damn near took him the whole night. 
The laundromat.
Nothing.
The Flosberry Flop.
Carlos
He is called Edit.
A dollar.
they both need a mute button
Howl-itosis.
...... Him : Um, ten bucks? Me : Like for WinZip. PS: Taken from bash.org
Neither have they ..
I forgot
Let Mayweather lead all the protests, That way we know it will be peaceful and someone will get a hug every minute.
Your arms have gotten sore.
Fuck you.
Fasten the furry ass.
We can't. It's already fixed.
They get eaten.
Tofoo  [7]
"If you need me, I'll be in the lab."
The Dock!
A man and woman got into an argument over who enjoyed sex more.  The man argued,"Of course men enjoy sex more than women, no doubt about it!". The woman replied,"Oh yeah? Well tell me this if your ears itch and you put in your finger inside and wiggle a bit and remove it, which feels better the ear or finger?
Pacquiao isn't his wife. 
[removed]
Because it crashes all the time.
1%
[removed]
That sounded a lot better in my head
Stopwatch you're doing!
He was feeling a little Sikh.
7 is his plus one, but she's bigger than he is.
Caster sugar.
Dead In A Nasty Accident.
Because he was staling a country that was rushing..(Russia) This joke was bad. Im going to bed now.
Munchkin.
i actually don't know where to post this idea, true jokes maybe?...  There has to be a food for thought sub. This is your OP, I promise to deliver!
Good question.
One because his knee grows.
Because 7 8 9.
Decaffeinated.
Just one, except she scissors it in.
Do'mestique
The eye bolt
Surely you will have guessed - the brooth fairy.
Yeah - he calls himself ... wait for it ... Cousine Brucie  
starbucks
A digimon.
It takes 3 days for it to rise again.
What is bruth?
Kaleebri
Islams it.
Too bad, he got the bomb detecting dogs about 7 movies too late.
a brucea
He was charged with Petty theft.
What's up, britches. 
The Pittsburgh Steelers
Because she used #nofilter
Slow down and maybe use some lube...
mature. I'll pack up and leave.
They both like giving nickel rides to black men!
Mine is the Ford F Series. 
Khaleesi (Kristen Wiig): Karen
About fifty pounds
Fire.
They call in a S.W.A.T. team
Hebrews?
More than likely you won't see any stars.
A baked potato
A handjob
The Sex factor
Your Life.
A bodybag
Snowballs.
You shoot the guy pushing it.
Because they're in heat.
He was just playing to his strengths. It was really a natural selection.
My name is Yura Phag
Your mom can fit 3 people inside her comfortably!
Roofs.
Bob Harley
I'm not sure about this NFL draft thing.
The Empty Plate...
Because Jewish girls won't touch anything that's not 10% off
His stage name is Bruce Leigh
Broco Lee
You know what, don't worry about it. She's out of the picture now anyway.
I'm very hoppy.
A Prayfish.
bruces
twerkins
Sans Seraph
alemony
green pees
The only thing they left were the work boots. 
Lettuce alone, without dressing ...
Kobe beef
Electro
You know he did it.
Hey, I'm Danish. JK they're pastries, they can't talk.
Me: I'm a taxidermist  Date: Oh... wow.  Fox: And a ventriloquist
The wheelchair.
Fire cracker
Anti-hissss-tamines!
Using the lords name in vanity
He had a bad heir day 
A Freudian slip.
Then Harry Potter would have to destroy it ofcourse.
Who built the taj mahal
A Nepalitano. Oh yeah - wait a sec - OK - for the low-info crowd here:
In a merry land.
Get to the back of the meat grinder!
What type of drugs to ducks use? Quack cocaine.
it's must-up ..
Because they can't C#!
Well they just recently started offering sex change operations for women, too. It's called the "addadictomy".
A mumble bee
It only takes one to ruin a neighborhood
Don't be stupid, rioters can't change anything. 
a Basic bitch
No? That's cuz it hasn't come out yet...
Because of their proximity to the { }; I'll let myself out..
Cats can handle mice.
She got out of the flying plans and into the friar.
They don't want to be spotted.
Sorry I'm all tied up at the moment
Adele.  Some one set fire to the train
Because they carry guns instead
Sorbet
Because for 3-5 days, it's a PROGRESSIVE pain in the ass.
Taragon
It hasn't come out yet.
A necrophiliac.
A Meringue-u-tang!!! Note: I know it's spelled Orangutan. :P
There are 10 types of people... those who know binary, those who don't and those who understand off-by-one errors.
Because they lactate.
It's in bad taste. 
Tape
It's two tired. 
Swed-ish.
Because he was fuckin' Goofy.
19 poops and counting!
They stopped selling newports...
Because air is free.
Big holes in your garden
It had a sandy bottom.
Wombmates.
All that squinting gives them astigmatism
It's a riot
They get a hole in one! 
After 200 years a yogurt will develop a culture.
Yall nailed it.
Sam, the floor needs painting.
Ereptile dysfunction
He was a veteran Aryan.
Before the first period.
broosts
I don't know and i don't care.
Yeah - they're gonna call it "Bruce or Dare"
Pepper Spray.
A testicle!
Put it on my bill.
A hemogoblin!
They said,  "baby you'd look good if you got a pair of skinny genes" 
Women
The Secret Service 
He was following hors d'oeuvres.
Because you wouldn't know when it was over.
Depends 
Because they're always Li-ion!
Put a nipple on it.
The hockey player takes a shower after three periods.
It hertz.
Greh.
9-1-1
Nothing.
Just 'Cause
"These hot wings have made me a ticking time bomb."
She'll let it go!
Poached, scrambled or fertilized?
They're callin it a Lady Bruce.
They're gonna call it Punky Bruceter.
They're gonna call it Ambrusia.
THAT'S RIGHT!!! YOU DON'T KNOW; BECAUSE YOU WEREN'T THERE!!!
an airbroosh
embruce
Fanny Bruce
broosts
He masturbates to the sight of his ego.
They're going to start with brucelets.
Playdough.  
Sbruce
Wait... nevermind
Nurse: No change yet.
What has a foot but no legs?
Tower defense. 
Little Caesars.
They come to Jesus.
Women and children don't exist. Everyone else is a Man, 90 years old. How long would it have taken for World War II to finish?
Because their plugged into a genius! 
You give the pencil to Michael J. Fox.
Deanda dis dick!!! HA! Got EEEM!
Well the flag is a big plus! ಠ_ಠ
You gotta hand it to her 
Mississippi.
URL #DDD
0K
An abortion clinic.
Because he wanted a good view of the front of a moving Porsche.  RIP lil' Jimmy
thieves..
The bristles
But instead of a call center, they called it a lol center! So much lol, that it will make you fall!
Because people always pull out infront of them.
Anal sex.
"Worst case of suicide I've ever seen"
She spits when she talks.
Puuuuurple. 
So they can see the front-lines.
Earth and Uranus.
It was Nazi time for Holocaust jokes.
The TSA and doctors use latex gloves, the TSA and prostitutes require very little training, while prostitutes and doctors make more money per hour than you do all day, yet they all get paid to touch your junk.
Because there's no plate like chrome for the Hollandaise.
A woman walks into a grocery store and asks the stock boy if he has any nuts. The guy says, "No, ma'am." She says, "Well, do you have any dates?" He replies, "Ma'am, if I don't have nuts, do you really expect me to have dates?"
Rise up lights
He only wears Rolex around his waist.
Felipe Flop
Take the 'F' out of safe and the 'F' out of way.
The secret service is the only police that gets in trouble if a black person dies.     Shamelessly stolen from the correspondents' dinner.
Can't trust this
The "steaks" get higher
Because of its fowl language.
Uranus.
Because in charge of scheduling, Yoda was.
Curried.
Yellow labs
I relish the fact that you've mustard the will to ketchup to me!
Leave some milk in the sun for a few days.
Stephen Hawking's after a house fire
It's too mainstream.
What would you do.
There's 20 of them.
Abs olutely.
Yeah - after she's elected, she has plans to turn into a woman.
pour grammar
Three. 1 to screw it in and 2 to talk about how much better Neil Peart could've done it
They say that 9/11 was an inside job... but planes fly OUTSIDE. Can't explain that
Because they aren't allowed to run in the corridors
slowing down his car. ... ... shoutout to   for this one.
The discrimination.
No? That's 'cause it hasn't been made yet.
Owen.
Because he's Russian
Don't Break the Ice
M O R M O N
All of if its uncles are aunts!
Glue a sandwich on the ceiling.
Yeah, me neither..
A Homerphobe! LOL! Just made that up!
No, but I'd watch a chicken strip.
Club soda
At the Groomers! 
Pay for the pizza
Pover-tea.
In the mainstream.
Certainly not three, because in my basement is still dark.
A hard bargain
Go flux yourself!
Pew Pew.. Sorry. Just became a father 2 years ago. I have some catching up to do. 
A turkey sandwich doesn't recognize the Armenian genocide
She said it tasted like bark.
Stop, drop, and roll
The octopus because it is well armed.
She already gets two times the normal amount of yeast.
Because they're stuck-up cunts.
Right next to Printdinavia and Copydinavia. 
IDK. 
The pizza can feed a family of four. 
Woman's rights.
404 Edit: Sorry it sucks, it's me trying to make oc. 
son-of-a-b***h..!!!
The porky Pine has the prick on the outside.  
Hit them where it won't show.
They gave him a 21 stone salute!
Both of them.
Leave a plunger in the toilet
Dry humor
Nothing, he just staired.
Blingo!
So he can pretend she's decomposing.
Joseph gobulls!
A meowntain :D
because they Ele-cant....Can somebody explain this to me? (Seriously, I don't get it, is it like Elegant?)
You exercise it.
A squid pro quo.
He was seen with an escort...
A BAYYYYker
...
Niggers!
Because they were grounded.... Or black I am not sure.
A Merkin.
Well apparently not eight cause my basement is still dark.
They're starting to get quite dark
Because the subject is still to immature.
European.
Tell him pork is on sale!!!
"Keep it in your Jeans"
Sad Dan 
A reptile-dysfunction.
I mean, seriously, are they seeing anyone?
MY BUTT CHEEKS!!!
Umbreonage
Frisbae
It simply doesn't, because it's odd.
Learn to read.  The door says "pull".
A milkshake
hell naw bitch you'd have a truck in the south
Throw me a frickin bone here. 
They're always stuck with a bill.
Too bad.
He kept on sticking his finger in a tyke.
Take my wife, if you would be so kind.
One turns in screws, one screws interns. 
" Leave it, it's Beaver."
He was in seine
He got a hole in one.
Mourning wood
;)
Dildo
Killed.
Everywhere.
Because it was a windbreaker.
A reptile dysfunction
Dam.
I wouldn't pay $200 to have a Lentil on my face.
A whywolf.
Triforce
Because he only ever takes sum of the numbers!
Because your face looks kind apache!
Dropbox.
NO...YOU DON'T KNOW...YOU WEREN'T THERE
The guys complained about the blow-dryer being too hot ...
"Stop being a centipede." Get it, because the robot has no arms! Hahhahaha, gets me everytime. 
She heard there was a man crucified.
Stephen Hawking
It takes a lot of coaxing to get them to spread when they're cold
A kike!
Because there wasn't mushroom on it.
Can you find the the mistake 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20?
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
Slow down and use lube.
Penicillin.
Go on, have a blast.
No pun in ten did.
He doesn't approve of same sect marriage
Mine is the Boo-Bee...
I just give them Viagra at the funeral.
They both know how to choke.
You can get cereal without nuts.
No, this is Patrick.
Aye Matey!
You spin it. It becomes spin-h. juh-jen
Yeah, basically.
Because they are quasi-models... thought of this a second ago. myabe that is why it's not very good :P.
A-Choo-Choo, Motherfucker!!
It tastes better with jam.
Two cannibals giving each other head
A flat minor.
He was too eccentric.
Because they have pool
Nan? NAN? ..
It's four-twenty Juan!
So, I was in the bushes...
Cop: "Did you kill this man?" Me: "No, a bullet killed him. Bullets are made of lead, which comes from the ground. The ground is part of nature. He died of natural causes. Case closed."
Because of the hormones
A mashed potato.
Blood.
All of the fruits are diploid
Never mind, I shouldn't spread it...
It keeps coming, and coming, and coming...
The one where I out my meat on your grill!
Decomposers
I'm reliving myself.
A U!  Fish!
An epileptic.  
Idk, its too dark to tell them apart. 
You get ohm ed!!!
A ginger snap.
Because you know how to give really good Head   ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
It'll never fly. 
One has parents
Because he was trans-parent
When she goes to pull out her tampon and all the cotton's been picked.
"Have you tried them with ketchup instead of mayonnaise?", they asked.
For the pleasure of the audiophiles.  
Two. One to screw in the bulb and another to talk about how complicated it was.
He was a suislide bomber! 
They made Jews from concentrate.
Because he is nailed to a fucking cross!!!
Illuminati and Half-Life 3 conformed.
You pull down their genes!
[deleted]
Minisoda 
This GOD-DAMN joke has been reposted SO many times, and its not even clever in the first place!!! Im super serial guys, knock it off.
The porcupine has pricks on the outside.
He was a real downer.
Time
His mom wanted him to blaze it
I don't have a stamp collection.
He heard Obi-Wan in his head saying  Out, I shall let myself.
It really blew up 
Chemistry because he always had the final solution
Why did Hitler give the jews a shower? - They were Au-schvitzing.
Seaweed.
Onions, tomatoes, and a whole bunch of lattice
C. LOL! I heard this at work today, top fucking bantz!
Fgypt
hahaha hahaha HAHAHAHAHAHAHA
Sockher!
Cloudy with a chance of heil.
The closing of the Borders.
He's 0K now.
Give him a used tampon and ask him which period it came from.
Five black people having sex is only considered a threesome. 
By the Pound!
People care when a comedian speaks.
A sphinxter.
PEEr pressure!
HAAAANNNNNND EEEEYYYYYYYYEEEEEEEE
You enjoy it when a joke is posted on Facebook
Row row row your boat
A dart
Yes! But we cantaloupe.
A quarter pounder with cheese.
He's been living under The Rock.
esteemed vegetable.
He jumped behind an oncoming train.
Mourning wood.
I'll tell you on my next post
End a race.
A person who stays up all night wondering if there is a dog.
She was giving Snoop Dogg a rim job and he farted.
Depends on how cooked the baby is.
Guacamole dancing is an extra $1.80.
One's a crusty bus station and one's a busty crustacean Credit; Dad
in the ovens
Electricity.
They're both Decomposing
Because he died choking on a bunch of seamen. 
Put a nipple on it!
Cuz there's no way that amount of shit can fit into a normal shoe
Cause he was fullllly sik m8.
Genocide. 
Han Double
Ho Gardens
He's distracting the sniper.  Didn't want to offend.
No home oh
I'll tell you tomorrow
Doctors decided to make some for him out of his foreskin. They say that the boy is doing fine now, but he's a little cock-eyed.
A cantelope.
He He
Chronic delays.
a dyxlixic
Dodged-a-Rango
Because Ken always came in another box.
They'll B flat
They held him in a straightjacket.
A: He gets Tenyear.
They ostrich-sized him
Ben-Her.
No-eye deer.
I'm only 5 and I'm about to turn 6.
BurnEm....BurnEmBurnEmBurnEm.
Handiiiiiiiiiiiii-iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii
You take the f out of "safe" and the f out of "way".
Camal-Flage
The horse, incapable of understanding the human language promptly shits on the floor and leaves
An  -gy...
They don't support cannibalism.
None. He "fell".
Because they have rain over every country in the world.
Stick a nipple on it. 
Mein Ampf
So they can also see the front lines.
Come on in the water's brine!
Becuase if there were it would be called solved
Because its two tired.
By the time you’re finished with the breast and thighs, all you have left is the greasy box to put your bone in.
Wife: If i’m lost, then what you do? Husband: i’ll advertise in newspaper about you, Wife: what will you write there about me ? Husband: who find my wife please leave far away from your destination. On the other side Mother-in-law sitting there and says that my daughter will come back gain, You Should write that who find me Wife, she will be your in form of reward.
Get in the car
Glaucoma is short for driving like Asians syndrome  
No Biggie.
A rooster says "cock-a-doodle-do", and a prostitute says "any-cock-will-do."
It was a cut and dry case.
On second thought, you wouldn't get it. It's an insider joke.
I tell you tomorrow.
An Investigator.
It's full of Arab Seamen.
Long ago in the late 1800s there was a massive international dog convention and every dog in the world was invited to discuss all things dog. However the only stipulation was that they leave their asshole at the door. During the convention a strong gale rolled in and all the assholes were blown away to parts unknown. So it became the single priority for every dog to tirelessly search for their own asshole.
Crack whores.
Order to go.  Seriously, fuck you if you do this. 
A surgeon.
нетerosexual
Because you have to be straight to be a good ruler
Jah bless
Heeeeeeyyyy fever. 
Oral sex makes your day. Anal sex makes your hole weak.
Men usually miss all three. 
It's Asshole.
Man 1: Do you think you could start your own betting company? Man 2: No, but I bet Fred could.
Tell her that she israeli hot!
Battery
He would spend all night long awake thinking about whether or not there was a dog.
A brunette with bad breath
An Afronaut
Ass-fault
Brians.
Well that escalated quickly.
Where will they transfer those Catholic priests next?
Because condoms are too brittle at minus 20.
the mainstream.
C,eh,N,eh,D,eh
A chromatose
Gullibility 
When you're done, you can flip her over and pretend you're having sex with an 8 year old boy...
Because they're always... ...
Duvet?
Names! -Bo Burnham
A roooooooux!
... It's not what it sounds like.
Up heil, down low!
A Kraken-towa!
SQUAAATS! ...Polly want a cracker. 
A. He loved it, but it scared the hell out of his seeing eye dog.
Faith lifts 
A boobie!
Because red blue green. 
A Voltswagen
a semenist
Someone who really gets his head into the game.
One is a bar-room and the other is a BAROOOM!
There'll be no coughin' at his funeral
Because Red Blue Green
<deleted>
An Afishionado You're welcome!
a gang rape
Where my dogs at?
Someone who's too lazy to steal.
A cockerel says cock-a-doodle-do. Whereas a prostitute says any-cock-will-do.
A neighsayer
Because they haven't
a Myfeetasaur
He stole the show.
Because it was dead.
Because on a scale of 1-10, you're a 25 to life
A receding hare-line!
Eric Clapton would never let a bag of cocaine fall out a window.
He needed to 'P'
Because they have big mouths and little dicks.
A stroke of genius.
Periodically.
The Precedent.
Audi's.
Jiggle its balls
Glutentag!
Arkansas
Bofa deez nutz
Because of the sand which is there.
Yup, he's 1.989 x 10  kilos and has a diameter of 1.4 million kilometers. 
Ones a crusty ass bus station, the other is a busty ass crustacean.
"Get back in the ship, men!" 
Because they aren't capitalist
You have been banned from  .
They had to many resources dedicated to screwing in light bulbs. -credit goes to Joe, he will beat me up otherwise
Kick his sister in the jaw.
Rich man has a canopy over the bed, and a poor man has a can o' pee under the bed 
There were only three of us!
We're not sure, its a deep subject....
A faggette
A hooker can wash her crack and resell it.
It's because they are a Seoulless nation.
It was a one knight stand.
THE HUNGER GAMES (I'M GOING TO HELL)
He kept trying the doctors patients(patience)
Because we're pry mates.
It's because they are not thinking straight.
Wimble-not-don :D
Ten Tickles
Sparky.
Country Croak. 
Potato!
He was snowed in.
He had a one track mind.
Take the "S" out of safe and the "F" out of way!
At least he's a vegetable now instead of a fruit.
Kush ups
Because they'd get arrested for peddling crack
Enough to kill Two and a half Men
About Ye big.
His Doughnuts. 
Nah. I'ma stay.
You don't know man, you weren't there!
Because either way someone is losing a trailer.
Comparrison Ford!
"Time to try the udder one."
Don't worry, they will tell you.
He had a black eye.
He does a lot of Pro-Bono work.      
U mad scientist?
cancer -I'm sorry-
Well, first the tire really has to want to change...
Because he's never Finnish.
Why are you picking on me?
69ers, and making sandwiches.
Jewbacca
1.21 jigga watts
A dead rabbit with a big hole.
ρ ρ ρ your boat, gently down the stream...
Roflmao
Hole is going to be huge!
Fedoral republic.
A Jew-breaker!
He retired.
Your wife back, your house back, your car back, and your dog back.
Hissstory
Because they're having difficulties finding out where the ISIS (created by my 10 year old 5 minutes ago)
Because they are good at making stuff up.
Porcupines have pricks on the outside. 
N.O.S. too bad he can't handle the crash...
She kept getting fucked left, right and centre.
A humbug'er.
Fast and Furious 7
It's a tankless job!
He just woke up!
A bit late, but.... A blonde who heard a joke on Friday.
The hebrewgeebies
Tarth Vader.
Because he was too chicken! Sorry.
They don't know it either - that's why they are so sour
Ask them to pronounce unionized.
L'Hospital.
"Nailed it!"
Just one, she will screw anything but it will cost you a hundred or so.
There was a sin tax error. [8.5]
Ant-Eye Biotics (Dad joke, I know)
Oh, you don't know? We should do lunch sometime.
What Super Models should you invite to your birthday party ? Cake Moss and Naomi Candles
He drank his coffee before it was cool.
Beef stroganoff 
A Ford.
The Walking Dead. 
Nah, nevermind. You won't get it.
Nothing, someone is losing a trailer!
Scouts come back from their camp.
Tripical
Unique up on him.
...because K-10 is for cats.
You just brush them off to the side and keep eating
A PENNEtentiary!
Why does a middle eastern person not give a blowjob to an American? Because he hates Bush. ahahahah Get it George Bush ...... Ill see myself out.....
A little tardy.
Fat men,  they'll eat anything. 
Preheat the oven
He took a ship.
Paint yourself green and throw forks at them. 
they can smell it, but they can't eat it.
It's been tainted
A God dam engineer.
This one really sucks.
To whom! 
..ever tried pulling apart a grilled cheese sandwich?
A milk dud. 
A C-cucumber.
He Neverlands. I really love this joke because it never grows old! 
A pilot you racist. 
Because they think they are melting....
They keep Terran.
Because their entire species is extinct.
1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1o1
Two.  One to cut and one to glue 
From a zombee!                                          I'll see myself out
It chickened out.
Hoppy 
Lock them both in the trunk of the car for an hour, then open it up and see which one of them is happier to see you.
So they can remind black people the picked cotton before they sold drugs.
Medicine. 
The Sesame Seeds on his buns. (According to my father this is the first joke I ever told, around 5yo.)
Stuck
They both go down on poles.
To get to the hoes.
I hope you have the time tic come toc to me
They're both useless in Canada.
He has to wait for the verb.
Vasily Bithertitoff
Guy: Because I don't like hair in my food.
4chan
Because if not, you always be trippin nigga.
It was a shit zoo
You can't put passion into an Al Gore Rhythm (algorithm). Anyone? Anyone?
Who cares.
Because that's the chord progression in all their songs.
Go to England and buy something
invisibility
A Hobbyte
Humped-me Dumped-me
Colon-hairy Arts School!
An unlocked kitchen door.
lotta bills..
A: Peter Dinkl-age
Everywhere.
"Quick we need to get to the abortion clinic before it's too late!
So they can piss and moan at the same time.
I've got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one.
Because he's a switch hitter
He couldn't swallow his pride.  
Omelette you finish.
Because Peter's sperm Neverlands.
Sounds like a personnel problem.
Oh sweetheart, you are the eye of my maple....
Well get a new family
I don't want to go anywhere. I'm two tired.
...you know he did it.
Flew it.
Jacks on Jacks off
Nope. That's because it hasn't come out yet.
He took me out to sea
With a crowbar.
*To do *To do *To do to do to do to do to doooooo
Well to perform such an amazing feat, he first needed amazing feet. Insert your hate below.
Ray Charles wasn't a one-hit wonder.
Once you've heard Juan, you've heard Jamal!...I'm sorry, you can hate me if you wish. ;(
O....Hi!.....o.....
Nah I'ma stay. 
So he could say he wore it before it was cool.
A pilot you racist 
They both need natural light to survive!
When you pull her panties to her knees and there's still pussy in them.
To get home.
If they didn't, they'd be Bagulls!
Play-Doh
Hand EYEEEEEIIIEEE.....
What the fuck dude get the hell away from my dog!
Humerus.97
Potassium.  
It thought C lacked class. i'll see myself out
ANKH ANKH!!
I have no eye deer...
The try-angle
Because he was screwing around.
They're both duct-taters (sorry)
The back of the furnace.
My zipper.
Because her coach was a pumpkin
Nothing, it's just a brick, what's wrong with you.
None you know of. Since they signed a Non Disclosure Agreement to not talk about it.
A croissant
Dam(n).
Because its white and it works.
Rice.
Porch-uguese 
They make decent one-liners.
Because they know they love to eat pussy!
OCD.
Because the warranty is void if the seal is broken. 
Lennon really dodged a bullet with that one.
Because they keep trying to take Engrish classes but end up in Engineering.
It happened this morning at twooo:twentytoooo
If you answered no, you need to have that repaired as soon as possible. Many of your perishables that depend on the cold to stay fresh may expire and become unusable. This can become costly, having a faulty refrigeration system and continuing to throw away food as the appliance goes in and out of use. Below I have included a link to a refrigerator repair service. 
He works it out with a pencil. 
Hot Links
Seriously guys, I've been trying for months so if anyone have any useful tips it would be much appreciated.
Because people are dying to get in!
2B or not 2B?
Reposting an old joke that wasn't funny the first time. What gets you an upvote? Posting an original joke, or a funny joke I've heard before. What get's you 5 upvotes? Being 
He would lay awake at night wondering if there was a dog.
First in never out.
One shucks between fits and the other fucks between shits.
Lights out at nine, candles out at ten.
A condom
We is the stuckees.
Upvote
He scared them all spitless.
Un, deux, trois, quatre, cinq!
She just had this breastless feeling.
So that you can tell them apart from feminists
One is gummi bears and the other is gummies bare.
Shocking, I know. I couldn't imagine how his roosafelt.
Be patient
When we invent NANDOR logic gates
Juan Eye.
A buck an ear (buccaneer). 
Because he had a membership.
Because he saw the gas facture.
Lesbian jokes. Those are for pussies.
OPs mom
Because it's eight more.
Answer: I don't know, I'm no scientist
In double HD.
Are you talking to me?
Yes++
They are both more worried about getting inside you than being effective once there!
Terraformal wear.
It runs in your jeans 
Kermit the frog's finger
A piece of ass that brings a tear to your eye
Gold! (works better when told - most will interrupt with "Arrrrrrrrrgon!")
A rekt-tangle
Wipe it off and say you're sorry.
Because he was coached by Liam Neeson. 
Dairy Queen
Because he didn't like poles.
Collared Greens
ELI5 (explain me like I am five)
There goes my gyroooo
Because the date wasn't nailed down.
Clickbait.
God damn inflation.
A snooker table
Reports that she has her finger on The Button would cause panic.
Put it in the tree and paint it's balls red. What's the loudest noise in the world? A giraffe eating cherries Edit: not a cheery tree...cherry
Autoerotic Asphyxiation
The asphalt.
Fsh
The htc M8. Oi mate
Their original slogan was: "Once you poop, you just can't stop."
Dementia
It takes only one nail to hang the photo
You know Hitler will turn Reich.
Medicine.
Both have a cunt at the end of them
Look, I am your Fuhrer
They both change their pads after three periods.
We're letting a   president run the   House!
Blockbuster
He was breaking news
They ride on Adolf-in no? I'll see myself out.
PepSi
The Sel-Fish
None, it only takes Tolkiens
The middle easter bunny
By the vote of the Erectional College...
2:30
Cause he wasn't my Niger.
Yeah - she comes with all of Ken's stuff.
Yeah, police say he was charged with battery.
Even in high-intensity games they always manage to execute
One's a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean.
Nana boo boo
The New York Necks
He went home and drowned in his tea pee.
4:30pm   It let's you out of work a bit early with a valid excuse 
A candle-nah-brah
Take a wok. 
Nevermind, you won't get it.
A shitty relationship
It wasn't twerking out.
Finland.  Once you're a citizen, that's it! You're Finnish! It's over.
Kids are their definition of a good time. 
Change their name to past tense, WASWAS.
You look for his fresh prints. (͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
If we use towels just to dry ourselves after washing off dirt and what not. Why do they get dirty??
He got the gas bill
A. The Ultrasound Guy
Just one. They hold it in place while the world revolves around them.
I'm an audiophile
I forget 
Doesn't matter, just use the jet fuel instead.
Neither have they
A pool table.
They are afraid of triggers.
They throw a toaster down the stairs.
It starts off dark, but the ending is bright.
mor ale
Just turn it inside out and shake the fuck out of it
Dam!
Yeah...it hasn't come out yet.
He had the Mickey taken out of him
WATER YOU DOING
Edward Snowed-in
Because he's an asshole.
Laotians
He could never stand up on his own two feet.
For my cake day, I present   with a favorite of mine, told to me by my uncle during a cousin's wedding.  I make no claims as to its origin, nor to the relative awesomeness of my family: Uncle:  "Hey, got a joke for ya.     Why should a woman always masturbate with these two fingers?" Me:  "I dunno, why?" Uncle:  "Cuz they're mine."
They put a fence around Iowa.
They both contain very large black dicks that can't wait to fuck you. 
I'll give you the set-ups, you give us the lines.
Because they couldn't find 3 wise men or a virgin.
Keebler
An Abelian grape!
A Plebeian J
Cheerios. say it in a British accent
Der.
DJ Vu
He wanted to get head.
red paint
None, they still use torches.
An Irish car bomb followed by a shot of Fireball
Because he isn't a full ese. 
Single.
Arrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrt
The punch line Found in BL magazine
Jew-ish
Pankeks.
Juno
It's not confirmed, but tumor has it
Syruptitiously!
A round of applause ...because they all have the clap.
Asian zombie
Disaster...
He forgot the safe word.
'Cause sugar, you're basic.
The penguin who pushed him!
She was a four-chin teller. 
A veloci-rapper. What about Stalin? A Tyrant-a-saurus rex.
Rick O'Shea.
It hasn't come out yet
they both take money for lip-service.
The phrase "I blew a tranny" means something totally different. 
Because he was always cited as the Anthony hero.
A: All of them.
Wave at them.
Because he doesn't want anybody to know that he's been fucking chickens!
One time He got so hammered that He fell asleep in a cave for three days before He woke up.  (heard in church today) :-) Happy Easter! 
They're both full of bums
Because sometimes, they're fucking assholes.
Nine Inch Nails
Nothing, you already told her once. 
Because he doesn't want anyone to know he's been FUCKING CHICKENS!!!
A cataract
what else is there to do while you're waiting in line?
At the   of the gas chamber. 
"Knock knock" "Who's there?" "The pilot, let me in!!!"
He attributed to the delinquency of a miner.
Put them in a guillotine.
One says "Hey, you, get off of my cloud!" The other says "Hey McCloud,  get off of my ewe!"
He really kneaded the dough alot
you mean like on a scale of 1 to 10? stolen from: 
America
Because they are lactoes intolerant. Told to me by my 12 year old.
A.  To find evidence of time travel. What is the worst reason to become a historian? To find evidence of your own time travel adventures
Thug Lice.
In case conversation at our seder lags.
stupid
Nobody touch my fucking Easter eggs, I'll be back on Sunday.
Just a thought.
Because there aren't any roads from the bedroom to the kitchen.
Half a dog
Just peachy.
because he always put 5 commas before chameleon.
A dead parrot.
You first dig a hole. Then fill it up with ash from your fireplace. Since bears love peas grab a frozen bag from the store and surround the hole with frozen peas then wait. When the bear comes around and bends down to take a pea you kick him in the ash hole.
Going to the gym,  You. Racist.
A laxative. 
You know, if we don't get a lift, people will think we're nuts.
"Look, officer, I may be wearing a turban, and I may have a gun on me, but I ain't Bin Laiden years!"
Absolutely,  they're a blast.
Easter
Because they spend so long in the closet. 
Because he has Cottonballs
Yolko Oh-no
Empty ones  ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Because the commanding officer told his soldiers: "Fire at will"
A grace period.
Because HE's noble.
Frost bite. ;D
A wooly jumper. 
It was a Romaine Iceberg
A jerkus.
Under a bar of soap.
A horny cock.
Because they're always throwing up their hands.
It's been a Good Friday. 
Only one cannoli. 
... A smile !
None. They're all stuck up cunts!
HAND EEEEEEEEEEYYYYYEEEEEEEEEE!!!!
It ova slept.
The Thesaurus
A: They planet Insert death threats below
Because he looked pretty seedy!
a ginger ail
In Reddit, you get served no matter who you are.
He was more of a necrOpheliac anyway.
He got off on a technicality. 
Because they all wear red shirts
360 hoscope 
Because he's always dipping it in Olive Oyl.
You gouda bounty on your head. You cheddar be here when I get back.
There's no such thing as potato quality there.
K.  I was going to tell you a sodium joke but Na. 
Cut off your head.
Danke.
Someone left the irony on...
He tries finding the expiration date on the marriage cirtifficate
Wife: I'd divorce you and take half the money  Husband: Well I won $10, here's your 5, now fuck off!
"Jesus: friday?" "Judas: Yeah, the Last Supper." "Jesus: The what?" "Judas: Supper. Normal supper with the fellas."
He lost his patients...
The Contrasection.
A newborn with osteoporosis.
To match the rest of the household appliances.
Paul Walker dies.
Stick a nipple on it.
You haven't AG-ed a bit.
The spelling.
Women's rights.
To catch everything that goes over their heads. 
Swelling organs.
Tufaloffahsofa
Because they'll bite us!
What's the difference between Will Ferrell and a man with erectile dysfunction? One can... "Get Hard"
De-calf
A brunette, a blonde and a redhead, all heavily pregnant, are waiting for a scan; the brunette says 'I was on top, so I'm going to have a bay', the redhead responds with 'I was on the bottom, so I'm going to have a girl', at which point the blonde bursts into tears. The other two manage to calm her down, and ask what is wrong? 'I'm going to have puppies!'
Give it two test-tickles!
If he was, did they call him the pounding father?
Because of his enthusiasm for Carbon-Dating.
Woody Alien
I may be a two but your an eight..
I've got you under a vest. 
Florine talent.
To get to the other side.
All of its servers were busy
If you don't you should be more careful when you eat!
They don't know the difference between a bishop and a queen
Tell them a secret
Pac Man-free Ver.
No. I got all of them cut.
Me: Yes, I am.  Interviewer: Hmm, I thought you were going to say something unexpec-- oh, you're good.
Blender. How do you get them out?  Chips.
You flip it upside down.
A large twist cone.
Because their asses are closer to their mouths. 
He thought they'd want to hear that back at the farm, he likes doin' chickens right also.
RPG's
Because they're stars-of-day-vids.
An undercover cop. 
They both spit.
A cluster cluck.
School Hallways
I can't hear you, but I can  see your point
You get ate more.
Dam!  A customer told me that joke, equipped with an " old guys rule" shirt and a hardy fist bump. 
It's mantequilla.
It's my WiFi Sci-Fi HiFi. 
you get eight more. 88 you get ate twice
If it's black it won't give you any food
"You'd think it would be R but its actually the c!" Aye matey
Nothing, Chris Brown doesn't want you getting involved in his personal life
Purple circle.
Ayy lmayo
68. Once you go 69 you have to stop and turn around.
Annoying. 
Who cares, because How Can Light Be Real If Our Eyes Arent Real?
The umpire called it: nine won one.
Hell yeah!
i'll see myself out....
It was endless love.
Free points for traveling? This is all fucked up 
Well, one is filled with cows.   And the other is in Asia.
"Get off me paw, you're crushing my smokes."
She answered the waffle iron. How did she burn the other side? They called back.
A watermelon.
Because she was hit by a bus.
He blew away.
The autochoke. 
The hotdogs taste like shit.
He just passed away and they had troubles putting him in the coffin.  When they put his left leg in his right leg came out.
Klondykes
It was nuts, the race was neck and neck till the very end!
Guess we're wombmates!
Sound investments.
You mustard be joking!
AND OR a
Grounding
...throw in your dirty laundry.
Decap
The lanlord!
Oil
Russell Crowe: No. Jackson: Is Mr.s Wall there? Crowe: No. Jackson: Are there any walls there? Crowe: Um.. no? Jackson: That what's holding up the roof? Apparently MJ used to call up Crowe at the hotels where he was staying and tell him jokes. This was one of them.
To use his rich neighbor's outhouse.
Small medium at large.
Don't make it hard for yourself.
Beef strokin'-off
Patio Furniture
He had barkinsons disease.
Concentration camp.
Line dancing at sun city
Elementary, my dear Watson.
Seems they prove the state of California causes cancer.
Kick boxing
It was all over the news! (Can't remember where I heard this, so sorry if its a repost)
An  chestra.
Never mind, they were just blowing smoke.
You get repossessed.
Wachsmalstift
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
They both shower after 3 periods!
The Bayou
a cosh(x/a)
2B or not 2B?
Brians
Neither did he.
Because he didn't start the fire.
Daworfed
Logarithms 
Graysonatomy.
I'm making an entertaining speech for my speech and drama class and I'm having trouble coming up with jokes and funny content to add into it. I'm a ginger myself, but I am really not a funny person so appropriate ginger jokes would be appreciated!
They call it "White Infidel."
Because Joy was stuck on the roof.
Hu died and left Yu king. Wait a minute - how can you so sure about what's after death? Who died and left you king? Isn't that what I just said?
Flacowitz
Glasnots.
To catch a buzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
It's called 'Lasik Instinct'.
Roll her in flour and look for the wet spot.
Because they're always Stalin
I'm not wearing socks
So your asshole doesn't slam shut
It's fucking close to water.  (A Canadian just told me this joke)
Gaylene!
It's called Monopoulos and you just borrow all the money from the bank. Everyone loses.
RUN! She's got a grenade in her mouth!
Because Hu died and made Yu king. Hu died and made Yu king? Isn't that what I just said?
She starts fitting in your wife's clothes...
A student walks up to his friend a week before prom and asks, "Hey, how many Twitter retweets do i have to get to take your sister to prom?" His friend says, "Dude, she was abducted! She's been missing 3 weeks, you know this!" The student says, "So you're saying if i find her, i can take her?"
Not much but they say it three times. 
Guac-A-Mole.
Because Oct 31 equals Dec 25
Two:  One to change it, and the other one to change it back again.
Their wee-knees! 
Ponzi Buddy.
Ive got a step ladder,I never really knew my real ladder
He has excellent delivery.
Na.
Because they don't meet the koalifications!
He sold his soul to Santa
Two feet of my cock in your ass.
Winning the game tournament!
You can't show a group of Jews getting baked
Because they (some of them) don't have a garbage collector.
Naming things, caching things and off-by-one errors!
A gay-theist. EDIT: Spelling error. whoops
They caught him eating a brownie
A book has papers.
Heh, pubes.
No I've always been a guy, why do you ask? ( I'm starting a new job in a few weeks, and I've been trying to come up with some new ice breakers. They're going to love me)
He always used two fingers, in case his patients wanted a second opinion.
It should. I've been practicing all night!
Horseradish
That's just a stereotype.
A: He wanted to make a clean getaway.
It runs in your jeans.
American kids come home from boyscouts
The Gray Poupon
KUSHions please tell me that joke is funny, my girlfriend is trying to tell me that it isn't funny. We all know it is. 
She gets payed less than the transsexual prostitute. 
An old faschund.
a leaf
Transparence!
Heroin
Stevie wonder answering the iron!
Sex, there's hundreds of thousands of sex offenders.
It's mostly corn...but you have to make a reservation. 
Because he didn't want to be mistaken for a WASP
Because they’re always so one sided!
Order anything you like and the guy behind you has to pay for it. 
Because if they were straight, they'd be poking you in the eyes.
Call Baltimore, M.D.
A Tut offensive.
Some guy forgot to lock the kitchen door
Damn
She told the teacher she wanted to go down in history...
The Game.
U wan'a m8?
Artificial colouring.
IHOP.
The nail gun. So sorry if this offends you Credit to the   podcast
Ask your parents
A trains-vestite.
boobees ! :D I'll show myself out.
Artificial Swedeners
A Cock-a-Doodle-Duel!
He just got laid by some chick!
Don't worry they'll tell you 
Bark!
Because they don't do Windows
Because 69's a mouthful.
I don't have a Lamborghini in my garage  I do realize this is a sick joke but it still makes me laugh when I hear it. I'm a horrible person
Shitler
A barbie queue (BBQ)!  Also, I made a quick sketch on my iPad.   I found the genesis to this joke as a text note in my Evernote this morning, after what seemed like a night of free flow beers. Feel free to downvote me to oblivion.
They always steal the green cards.
Because the grass tickled his willy :)
P1: knock knock. P2: who's there? P1: Deedee who. P2: Deedee who who? P1: one. 
You only get presents from one set of grandparents. 
Go to a john mayer concert!
Because they are not Cs.
Uh oh... I think I made a boo boo.
Memento. 
He didn't want to upset Chuck Norris.
Yoko Ono
A woe boat.
It's where you say one thing but fuck your mother. 
Four. Because calling the trunk a leg doesn’t make it a leg. 
What happens when everyone in the country takes a pee at the same time? Urine-nation!
The punchline is too long.
Friend: Because people are FUCKING ASSHOLES!   This can be taken in two ways and both are correct.
A cross-dresser.
Dinner entertainment at Guantanamo Bay 
The game.
Would any lawyer be in a preposition to answer this one for me?
A lesbi-hen
The Cat: because is a cat and a spider :) ... oh, wait.
Carlos. 
It's fine though, at least she went out with a bang!
Ooo mami!   (Umami)
One with everything
Shallots 
At the infideli counter. 
Ha2Au (I'm sorry, also the 2 should be sub-scripted but reddit wouldn't let me do that)
Neither is terribly important until you're not getting any.
Well, the flag is a big plus.
A banana split
It was feeling a little crumby. 
Franchicing
Gaseous Clay
Let MEOOWWWWTTTT!!!!
Neightiri.
He died on the cross!
"Sorry, I didn't do it on porpoise."
Cause you're attractive.
Anti feminists? Nah, they can't screw
Dam.
because he was blind.
So they can both peek out the blinds. 
Bison.
Baghdad
It was with Robotussin and space heaters.
He buys it from Starbucks...
NO
A Tyrannosaurus Wrecks. EDIT: Spelled "Tyrannosaurus" incorrectly.
They're both fun to ride.....until your friends see you.
It had a little boogie in it.
Voltz-swaggin. I thought of this myself and I am so, so sorry.
I'm bleating all over the place!
Because they're always dead tired. I stole this from    plain and simple.  Just straight up stole it.  Why?  Because it made me laugh and I didn't see it posted here before.  
It was stuck to the chicken.
a pianist
Because two flagrant fouls is an automatic ejection.
PeekaJew
Your dreams are not the only thing going up in smokes.
Let MEOWWWWWOUT!!
I'm gonna get some head tonight.
Also being forced to fill his Viagra prescription.
Radio Shack. Not even the brain dead would go there. 
There where you left him.
We Israel..
One Direction
Pork Chops
There's 21 of them. 
An Investigator
Under the soap. 
Because of the seaweed. I've already shown myself out, don't worry.
Because they literally can't even.
I heard she was a mistake
Ones a rusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean! ahahhahahahahah 
Piece of cake.
A Zebra
I think the whole thing is a huge miss-steak. 
Apparently they deliver large plane's 
Shit in her cunt. (its just a joke people)
Finishing.
I know he turns you on but man, that guy just pushes my buttons! 
Because they're great at scatting.
That's because it hasn't come out yet.
A jolly rancher. Credit goes to my friend at school.
because she never had to work her butt off. 
I'll let you know when I get to the other side.
One I eat everyday, and the other is an Italian-based flatbread with tomato sauce
I'm not lion. Ill be here all week...
Yea, it was in tents
Vote.
Ehhh never mind. It's over your head.
Your father's cock tastes like blood.
Put a nipple on it.
Radical.
BOOBIES!!!
A tomato in an elevator
A minister! Courtesy of a patient.
They don't just turn on a dime, they pick it up too
Turnover.
Juanted
The Prostate
Coma-toast.
Tyranisu
What do bieber and grumpy cat have in common? They are both pussies who were discovered on the internet. 
A Christian Bale
Ctrl - C, Ctrl - V
Que... so?
Laying mantises. 
His life is obviously taking on a new direction...
Sprite
The ones between 39 and 40.
One of them is a big puss
Romcomnoms
a herbiwhore
No but a tin can. (sorry)
This breed can jump higher than the average house. You might think, WOW, how can this be?  Well, it has very strong legs and the average house can't jump.
I've no idea, you'll have to ask the wife.
Cause he was  Lookin' for loooove in alllll the wrong places.
A wet nose.
He got the sack.
Al Gore Rhythm
Common Sense
You'll get crabs from the cheap one, and lobsters from the other. Heard this years ago, hope this ain't a repost. Cheers
Eat, drink and be Mary
Crimea River. 
Person B: I don't know Person A: Nobody knows. Sniff
Because I have a shitty sense of humor.
Infantry.
One's a President and the other's a pressie dent. i'll see myself out.
As much as you can curry.
Splinters.
A problem. What do you call two Mexicans on the moon? A bigger problem. What do you call all the Mexicans on the moon? Problem solved.
...my phone.
About an hour
Comic downs
They both have wet noses
They both study abroad.
Yeah, but I only do it every unce in a while.
It's quiet and embarrassing.
A conclave!
Yeah..he's on the road again.
Not only does it stop on the dime, but it picks it up too!
Sheik Shake
Abortion clinic.
A huge dog and pony show
Check, mate!
A faguette
When your eating pussy and it tastes like shit
A sink.
Because fuck u that's why.
"What did one ape say to the other ape. "
Gullible.
Genocide
it had a javelin through it's head.
Text her "He's busy" and turn your phone off. 
John Cougar Meloncamp An old joke I haven't heard in ages.
Because the bus hit him.
I couldn't
Depends on who has the best crack.
"You raped her! ! You murdered her! ! You killed her children! !
Because only two parties exist for the whole country 
Fairway to Heaven
Because he was anti social.
Because people are dying to get in.
There...their...they're..
A man with a small penis realizing his hot new girlfriend has terrible depth perception.
Ca ba?
I guess that some people just want to see the world turn
Peanut butter and jammies!
mud wasps.  
It's not easy to hike a trail when you're always falling down drunk. 
Finding out it was traced.
The pawlice.
The gearbox in the wife's car...
He gets toad.
An "A" frame...
Chuckleslovakia
A chop happy chappy with a crap happy pappy.
So you can read her lips!
I'm just not hoppy anymore man
And what the hell is an egg cunt anyway?  [OC]
They left the plunger in the toilet.
Minivans.
He dyed in his sleep. 
Both of them fill a stadium with 60,000 people shouting " "
Three, one suggests to check if it is plug in, another recommends to reboot the printer, and finally one to check to see if the printer had paper and laugh about how easy the solution was.
A carrot!
Because it was a transgender chicken!
A boobie..
It doesn't sit well.
Haboob
I will take over now, if you allow.
A good personality
They always fall back on old habits.
Alane
He was not Boeing.
surgery? But... was this not an autopsy???!!!
A vegetarian. 
Between you and me, our neighbor is a dick.
It folded.
Allah mode.
Eve stole first, Adam stole second, and Abel struck out.
An eternally suffering abomination...YOU MONSTER!
He lays awake at night wondering if there really is a dog.
Sure, you know how it works, but now it's dead.
Constipated? Naw, that's never gonna come out.
US: "NATO my watch!"
Because they don't like to judge anyone.
He holds it up to the socket and the world revolves around him.
Roll a penny down a hill.
They found him aPEELing.
Or am I shoving mine up to far?
By using a spookey!
Hint: It's a dead giveaway.
not enough hops
My ass!
One hundred people who don't do dick.
It said that it had 20 cookies in it.
They planet!
The Jew, home court advantage
I might tell you tomorrow.
Because she had no arms.  Knock Knock.  Whose there?? Not Megan.
The spaghetto
In hertz! 
Detroitus
There are literally Sicilians. 
Amumu
It's not the passengers fault, it's the not the flight attendants fault, it's the asphalt. 
He had Auschwitzim
There's a KFC at the end of the finish line.
A cucumber 😜
Hunch-black of Notre Dame
Park your car man.
He had a bit of a puzzle in his hands
I'll supply the dough, you bring the toppings.
tequila
A baked potato.
I've heard of it but don't know what it means?
A gorilla pooped on his face.
lol 
A 7 year-old girl who can run faster than her brothers.
a HULK RASH!!!!
Cuz she left the plunger in the toilet. - Jackie Martling
Boys and girls.
They taste like chicken.
Yarrrrrn.
A percushion
Cotton mouth
Carlos-t
Mississippi.
Please sir, I don't want any treble.
my supply was short.
INDIGO!
Sub-WUB-WUB-WUB-way
He says Tyrannosorry.  
They're to die for.
"I heard some shits about to go down!"
I mean, America had four fathers and it turned out alright
hitcoin
A stagger-saurus. 
[deleted]
Nothing, he just waved.
Bob Jones.  
They don't like triggers
She was told that the most effective way would be to shoot herself through the heart, just below her left breast... She woke up in hospital with a gunshot wound to her knee.
His mom was in a jam!
Life support.
The police. 
A horse
Officer.
None, just the one black guy they get to do it so they can tell him how oppressed he is.
The gearbox in my wife's car.
He just came out of the cupboard.
Red bull and merlot
Q:Why are all Quaker truck drivers stuck in the 1980's? A: Because they are Haulin' Oats!
An Alcapelca... yeah that was bad.. sorry world..
A boogati!
I don't know, I don't have 2020 vision.
Finding a donor. Truth is funnier than fiction. Got this one straight from today's   Smithsonian  .
Wipe your face
Because she found her honey!
A redditor.
A virgin
Nothing.
Well they [deleted]
They both stop sucking when The Police are around.
You better not make a habit out of this.
Juan shot, Juan kill.
Because whenever one started up, the big blades would go "wop...wop... wop" and the little blades would go "guineaguineaguinea".
Wataaahh 
Common sense
I'd like some H20 please.
Try to get a long well.
You summit.
An accountant you sexist fucker.
I'll be Bach.
M'mosa
Deer Balls.   They're under a buck!
M'Larynx 
It gets toad away
A queerium
He took her for granite. 
Bcoz they are single, have no kids, got nailed and serve alcoholic beverage.
Doesn't matter how many femenists try, they can't change anything. Alternatively, they just hold it up and wait for the world to revolve around them. 
Everyone.
Answer: Teenage girls. Why? Because they are cunts. 
Two. One to hold the light bulb and one to drink until the room spins.
68, cause at 69 you flip over
How have you been?
"The Empty Plate"
None. They just blame feminism for the darkness.
Brakedance.
Just one. They are very efficient and don't have much of a sense of humor.
It was really successful - the prophets just kept on coming
They both spread for bread
They were always either Russian or Stalin.
A veteran Aryan
Poli, Nate
The one in the wheelchair.
"Honey I'm down at the pub having a pint with the lads.  Be home in about 30 min.  If I'm not back by then please read this message again."
Two. One to post it and another to create a better punchline in the comments.
Ebola
He didn't binge, though, he just purged.
A:Your mom OOOOOOOooooooOOOOOOooooo
Can I push your stool in?
It e-loaf-es! :)
A LOT.
Denim denim denim...denim denim demin I'll see myself out now...thank you
A bowling ball.  Or Bruce Wayne's parents. 
Namaste
An amazing PUN-chline. it has to be a real knockout
He works them out with a pencil.
Mental Abuse To Humans
That's not funny.
A Bee-Hind
She fell out of the tree! I may not be a girl, but I'm blonde and find blonde jokes hilarious. xD
Your penis.
With a blue elephant gun. You hold his trunk until he turns blue, then you shoot him with the blue elephant gun Edit: My 5 year old nephew loves this joke. 
Because I'd like to put foreign you.
Chickenbutt
Because he was alfredo the dark!
unevening.
He paints his hooves red.
Ben and Jerry's....
You can tune a chainsaw.
Because he was barefooted!!!
Heil lights.
Unawerewolf
Because it's all about the delivery.
Allah take the flight controls
A hardened criminal.
Let's Rock and Roll. 
When it fails
Because she will "Let It Go.
Nothing.
Ebola Cereal
Jennifer is 21 years older than her son Douglas. 6 years from now, Jennifer will be 5 times as old as Douglas. Question: Where is Jennifer's husband? Solution: J=D+21 J+6=5(D+6) According to my math, Douglas has −3/4 years, which means -9 months. Pregnancy lasts for nine months, so Jennifer's husband is in the bed with her right now. Sauce: 
Her clam smells like fish!
You only need one nail to hang up the picture.
Because he is a racist.
Kryptocurrency
A short one with no punchline 
His dick tastes like shit
The toothfairy.
Elle Vader. 
Speak now, or forever hold your piss.
Bach Bach Bach Bach
Rigatoni
My refrigerator doesn't fart when I pull my meat out of it.
Re-tail.
If we stick together we can stop this shit. 
I dunno, they just seem a bit shady.
Do you even, bro?
You can negotiate with a terrorist.
The hippie carrying it.  What's dumber than that? The yuppie buying it.  What's dumber than that? The box of rocks
A  gressman
Aye Matey!  (Edit: Say it out loud if you don't get it)
You take him for a drag.
A dogfish!
Because you can have your vagina and eat it, too!
Senseless Slaughter... 
No, because it's no longer awesome. Thanks.
You: You can tuna piano but you can't piano a tuna! Person getting told joke: What about the jar of glue? You: I knew you'd get stuck there
Even when he's not joking, he's kidding.
Chili today, Hot Tamale...
Because of the flashbacks.
Neither has she.
Park in it, man.
Computer chips.
Because he told his wife he cheated on her.
Because he couldn't resistor... Old but classic!
There's nothing athletes want more to see in a magazine than sports and illustrations.
Hy-Ayy-nas
He's up all night to get Loki.
Piers Morgan.
They were Marooned.
Blame it on the night
You start to laugh, than I will tell you that.
Slopéz
or just his career?
they have a shawl in temple
It varies from person to person. 
Get to the back of the oven...
Because if they had 4 doors they'd be a chicken sedan.
He didn't reich the finish line.
A Chicken Sedan
Puns.  Fuck puns.
Virgin immobile. Loosely based off the nun in a wheelchair joke.  
A triple Entendre. History jokes, man. they're killers.
..A pilot you fuckin racists
Arrrish
M
It gets Blinded I excuse myself out.
Your penis. 
An Amish drive by shooting.
I don't know.  He still hasn't opened it.
Nobody grew the balls to do it.
The grass tickles their balls
He hadn't got a leg to stand on.
A pigment of your imagination.
a dozen people that don't do dick.
She left him a "John Deere" letter
Because he never let the dust settle.
HAND EYEEEEE..........
They gave each other the willies.
Two Wongs don't make a white
Are ye alright in the back there lads?
Hey, is that you coffin?  Ba-dum-tsk...
Ground Beef
She had no arms.
He kneaded the doe.   (Doesn't work too well in text)
Because he rarely shaved the balls.
I'm stoked!
He puts himself in the other person's shoes and then walks away.
"This is an actual question"
play got your nose with him
Someone threw a fridge at her. It's not supposed to make sense
Bombay.
Criminal Intent.
Bob.
Because there are no pennies to pick up off the ground.
As far away as possible.  shameful 
He was all right.  Andddd I'll see myself out.
Squash one and deal with the other later.
Don't make me stone you to death..
The Just-Ice League.
A female's issues. They won't ever be able to get over them.
Checkmate!
Pat MiGroin.  Yeah, my grandpa just told me that one...some visual images cannot be unseen. 
Walking. Jk Rowling.
A New Delhi
The time has come.
For a $5 footlong.
Always thought you was a bit spineless.
The one with the least mew.
Tramnear Rovers
Both are a play on words.
Unique up on it.
Because he didn't want to be spotted. 
I guess that's what happens when you toot on Common.
Rubberto
About 2 inches.
Chrome.
The Big Foreplay. 
Ukrainian take away.
Well, you can sleep with a light on.
Because all of his children needed new shoes.
I don't know, I can't get them outside of the house. 
They don't know Hutu blame.
Namaste
A beatboxer.
That's my nigger and I'll paint him whatever color I want!
I can clearly see your nuts!
Shine a flashlight in his ears
They Russian. I'll also see myself out.
You can't tuna fish.
Do you even lift?
Lawsuits.
A seasoned veteran
A cat.
Condescending
Their occupation makes them very shelf conscious.
"Sorry sir, the morgue is closed after 6."
Because all their best runners, jumpers, and swimmers are in America.
I can't believe I blew 50 bucks back there!
Typo
Nevermid, it's too long.
because they wanna look like their mother.
Clash of Clams
Pretty good.
That it's a fucking joke.
They're cheap.
Nobody knows
Because they're typo negative
Names
This fork just isn't cutting it.
Because they're easier to spot
A virgin.
an ॐlette
They're calling the operation Cheesus of Nazareth...
sweetzerland
B to cancel evolution
ECE
Buuuurrrrrr!!!
Because Vlad is Putin everyone in their place. I'll let myself out.
You put a nipple on it.
Tell him he is racist. 
A frog in a blender. 
Because Pol Pot's followers are called Potheads.
A contemplate
It never ends.
An Orangy
Nothing.
Because Jesus was born in a barn.
Depresso
A shamrock.
Jager bombs
Banana Skin
They don't find them Hume-erous.
If People were made of irons.
An eggshibitionist
A torque-y sandwich.
Three.  A left ear, a right ear, and a final frontier.
1 Terrahertz
Because the resemblance was uncanny.
It got cancelled.  There wasn't enough legroom. 
Psi Phi.
A stick. I'll see myself out now.
Sir Cumference
Pissed off
well I'm glad I've gotten that cleared up
He slipped and got the sack.
Bullied
"Moo." What did the cow saw when she fell into a ditch? "Moo." What did the cow say when she fell onto the electric fence? "Moo." What did the cow say when she got hit by a train? "Why does everything always happen to meeee?" Protip: My dad wrote this joke for me when I was six.
Because they are not sea-men.
Scrabble. 
Past Tents
A blind guy with a rubix cube
Hebrews it!
2 in the front, 3 in the back, and 95 in the ashtray.
Because none of them fucking work
At least the food won't take away their rights. Do a little oppression of their own. 
No atmosphere
Some dick rear-ended him.
Good Faraday to you, sir!
A stripper 
[removed]
Tax Inspectre
A Con-Yay!
Because she's never spoonfed anyone anything.
Alzheimer. I'd rather drink my beer shaking than forget to to drink it.
A baby polar bear says to his mum, "Mum, am I a real polar bear?" and his mother smiles at him and answers, "Why yes sweetheart, of course you're a real polar bear. Your father is a real polar bear, his father before him, and as far back as I can remember, we are all real polar bears, through and through. Why ever do you ask, honey?" To which her son replies, "Because I'm fucking freezing."
Shredded tweet.
It's in tents.
30 in the ashtray
At the Hickory Dickory Dock!
Boo-ddhism
He's all right now.
I mean, just in terms of not letting themselves get crucified.
I think we can exploit them by increasing our amount of sweatshops.
Your mom's pussy
It was a great way to get out of kids' bedrooms unheard.
WANNA RIDE BIKES???
We have zero inclination.
You're high-on-pot...enuse. Thanks Key&Peele, I'll see myself out.
All the way
Slippers.
Not sure, but the flag is a big plus.
A-flat minor.
A tomato in an elevator.
Because you ran: It's past tents. I'll show myself out. 
Half of them are lyin'.
What's a similarity between anal sex and spinach? If one or the other was forced upon you as a child, you won't like it as an adult.
Impounding your mother
A sedimentary.
Because we're all a little obtuse.
Fa Ting
Blue painting
I heard it was quintessential.
A Little Endian -I'll get the door.
He was galactose-intolerant. I'm sorry.
Das Jude
A Crip
Ovaries-y
How you bean?
Two policemen call the station on the radio. "Hello. Is that you Sarge?" "Yes?" "We have a case here. A woman has shot her husband for stepping on the floor she had just mopped clean." "Have you arrested the woman?" "No sir. The floor is still wet.
First, you put the cricket on a box, tap the box, and you see that the cricket jumps away. Now, you cut his legs off, put him on a box, tap the box, and you'll see that the cricket does not jump away.
Zimbab-Bee!
With your bare hands.
Not Z.
A dead horse with a duster in his ass
he realized he was a Bartender
Baaaa......Baka....Baka....Baka! 
U. Fuck U.
Because  Sin 90 = Cot 45!
Who knows, there is no tax record of it.
Whore knee
They hold a runoff election.
They can tell when the girls are faking it. (This joke best after a few drinks)
A butt quack.  Hahahahha I'm funny ...
What did the Physics professor say when he forgot his lines of a speech? Give me a moment...ummmm.(momentum)
SEVEN.
A sandy hook.
Nobody nose. My 8-year-old niece claims she made this up. I have my doubts.
Smoke on the water. ... My most sincere apologies.
Kermit The Frog's fingers.
When they make sandwiches, because they're man-spreading.
Neo, you are the Juan ... I'll show myself the door...
Cancer came back 
Nothing! This is real life.
Cross-Country Running
A humanitarian. 
"I'm not Willie Nelson."
hell if i know.
Because freedom rings.
Kermit The Frog's finger. 
Yeah! It was great, how could I "Pho-get-abouttit"
They coral
Because he ate plenty of fruits and vag.
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna!
They were never comfortable with integration.
I've always liked the joke from "Friends", that Ross has geology rocks! written in his childhood notepad. I also thought you could say geometry rules! Can you guys think of any others?
They make up everything. Credit to   from an askreddit thread about what not to trust.
What is the difference between a GOOD and a BAD girl?  A GOOD girl goes to a party, goes home then goes to bed.  A BAD girl goes to a party, goes to bed then goes home.
A: rolaids
A person who stays up all night wondering whether or not there is a dog.
Bean dip
Because everything isis
Lots of Pounds.
A pretentious connoisseurous.
Because he was an Art-Offical Intelligence 
A submarine
He worked it out with a pencil. What does this joke mean?
They're rrrrribbet for her pleasure!
I mean, it is only hanging by threads...
So they have somewhere to put their dip at lunch. 
He got his by a bus.  My little brother just told me this!😳
So they can stamp out fires. Why do elephants have flat feet? So they can stamp out flaming ducks.
Qué Qué Qué
Alive.
Shell fish......
When the rooster wakes, his primal urge is to cluck defiance.
He lost the huile d'olive. 
9 year old Nephew: Triangle?? No Square??
The Que Que Que.
The lesbian. She got there lickity split while the gay guy was still packing his shit. 
Because he was outstanding in his field. 
An itheberg.
An astronaut.
Gluten Morgen!
Police are saying he topped himself.
He wanted cold cuts.
Everywhere.
Because you're MR (squared)
The captain's log.
You take off your boots to jump on a trampoline 
A: Homeless. 
Let's go ride our bikes!
A small medium at large.
Catholic priests
The blasfemur
A bul-dog-gi
One is a cunning runt.
Patty O'furniture.
Everyone started partying like it was $19.99.
Knock knock Who's there? I eat mop. I eat mop who!
It didn't want to get stuck in any cracks.
An aware wolf.
A teabag stays in the cup longer
A pro boner.
She wiped her arse.
A where wolf.
A stillborn.
Space Bars
Attempted murder
Hitler Hit. Stalin Stalled.
Robin/Nightwing - depends how big it is
nothing
nothing, theyre both stuck up cunts edit: special thanks to justinjoytheride
The vegan club
A Bondana.
2 calves, an ass, a beaver, a shitload of hares, 1 camel toe and a fish nobody can find.
White Russian, Straight
I'm the shit.
To get another Golden Globe.  Tina Fey walks into the Tina Fey,the Tina Fey asks "How can i Tina   Fey you ?to which Tina Fey reply,"Ah just give me a Tina Fey"  and then leaves with a Golden Globe.  Unbreakable is good.  
I immediately stopped telling people I was xenophobic when I realized it doesn't mean "afraid of xenomorphs".
He's all right now.
The man replies: This is wrong english, you should say 'Hi, How are You?'
Because it didn't.
Private employee starts work checking email. Public official starts works making a coffee.
Just two, as long as they can find a way in.
A rip off
Whenever they get a corner, they will set up a shop.
Islam Dunk
The second one.
because it scares the shit out of their dogs.
Times New Ramen
"I want to go to Miami!"
Because he just watched his mom get plowed.
One's a legacy, the other a sea of legs.
Spatula.
Beats me.
They say he went out "buns-a-glazing"
European.
It was soda pressed
Mesothelioma 
It doesn't need cleaning
Speckle-ed.
Nothing, they never met.
The punchline
A baby with forks in it's eyes.
They have a Pho-bia!
"You going to eat that?"
HAAAAAND EYEEEEEEE!
None, they don't use light bulbs. They live in caves and use no forms of artificial energy because they wouldn't want to be perceived as hypocrites or morons.
Your mom can wash her crack and re-sell it. 
Its in case he gets a hole-in-one.
'Caution- Hot surface' in braille.
You oscillate it's tit a lot!
Because I have some absolutely a-maize-ing ones!
Her mom rearranged the living room
A knife has a point.
Nun
Because jail is free.
because he was flying solo and went look no hans...
One is a group made up of radicals with extremist views.                 And the other group is ISIS.
A Fraudian slip.
Mannecan
He went straight for the juggler
Audi!
Because every women call his name during sex.
His anaconda don't want none unless you got buns hun.
Cos they're in bread
A: Shit-take Q: How do you say "took a shit" in Japanese? A: Shit-take-mashita
That's because muslims can't drink.
None. They just beat the room for being black.
A piece of ass that will bring a tear in your eyes.
To Mecca Bingo.
They all died because of unknown source :)
Because they're all Petra-flied of using the air!
Bing Bing
"People did not like my movie. I guess I am 50 shades of letdown... But I can sure GET UP"!
"Master Bateman."
¡BRRRRRRRRiba!
A friar? A chip monk?
1forrest1
"Yargg! Woman! Stop asking me! You're driving me nuts!"
People keep ripping me off.
They can't get their trunks off...
Primordial soup
(you're mom can't take a joke)
Because she fucks everybody.
One is a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean.
She grated it.
He had one-million dollars, but no cents.
Walnuts. . What do you call nuts on a chest? . Chestnuts. . What do you call nuts on a chin? . A blowjob.
Gee, it's hard to say, although he did seem pretty shaken up about it.
Subordinate clauses. ... I'll see myself out.
Because the chicken hadn't evolved yet.
Because they're afraid of Wales!
Tooth hurty.
A: He held up a pair of pants.
I guess he shouldn't have been..... (•_•) ( •_•)>⌐■-■ (⌐■_■) Flying solo.
They both fly, except for the mole...
They can't even..
It was in tents.
Because one more would be too farty
Because they have appeal
Because when they promise a foot, you know you're only getting three inches. 
Wedding cake
A sunny day.
"It's bacon in there!"
Iron-y
Crib death.
Because it was out of tuna.
"Getting black men off since the O.J. trial."
Microsoft.
Someday my prints will come.
It's because they're not allowed to run in the corridors.
Cuz theres a clock on the microwave
Not bad!
[deleted]
Because nine ate seven!
A flat!
An airplane.
Because Mancome wasn't selling
A  ...
For drinking and deriving.
Because they are really good at it
joke of the day: Boy bought gift 4 His Girl friend on breakup party- Girl Friend:Wat the hell would I do with this rocket? Boy: U wanted stars ???? Now sit on it and GET LOST :D hahhahah
Think about it
Denim denim denim 
Cause you're the only miss I ssippi. (I have no clue)
Haaaaaannnnnneeeeeessssss
Finger foods...
neither have they
Satisfying. 
Because if they drug them by the feet the would have filled with dirt.
James Brady.
Post and repost are on a bridge. Post jumps off. Who is left?
Reddit gold.
He puts the diaper back on. 
March 4th
Police are looking for hardened criminals.
Answer:  Because if you only take one, he'll drink all your beer. 
I've never paid to have a garbanzo bean on my face.
Otter space!
He had phantom loads.
The wheelchair 
Because he was Uber busy.
Angela Merkel. 
Because there is no point!
A: De-calf-i-nated.
Women who don't shut up.
His fault. He shouldn't be driving in the kitchen.
Because it makes cents (sense).
... It's a long story
Never mind, it's cheesy.
Shuriken!
"Tigga please!" Sorry, I heard it years ago. I don't remember where or when but I've just been saying alot lately. :p
The Lamp Post.
A: A crocodile Q: what's got a 100 balls and a pair of teeth? A: A singing choir of army veterans
Because no one man should have all that flour.
You don't ejaculate on a hotdog before you eat it.
He fry through it!
They're both ballpark figures.
His professor said he should study hard.
They found him drowned in his teepee.
It's a lot of fun as long as you don't end up with bugs in your teeth.
Very limited fonts.
They're making headlines everywhere
They produce a lot of endworfins. 
9/12
Kermit the frogs finger (shoutout to Hesher)
When you drop a load into a washing machine it doesn't follow you around for a week. 
Derive, derive, derive!
No body knows! 
A family reunion.
Nothing he just broke the ice.
Their last hit was the wall
Banned from the zoo.
M'lybdenum.
Dropping 2 scoops of ice cream.  What's worse than dropping 2 scoops of ice cream? Getting a hand chopped off.  What's worse than getting a hand chopped off? Getting both hands chopped off.  What's worse than getting both hands chopped off? The Holocaust.  What's worse than the Holocaust? Dropping 3 scoops of ice cream. 
Flap Flap The Giraffe was walking around the savannah, when a helicopter came in to land.   The giraffe looked up, and then :::flap flap::: the giraffe!
It saves its sole. 
When Hitler found out, he was führer-ious.
A little con-descending
Women 
Because it's in da-skies!
Because he was a dirty double crosser!
Nein.
He just told her " I guess I just had to 'let it Gogh'. EDIT: removed the u from gogh
A bad habit.
Because Japan isn't good at basketball. 
They marched in backwards and the Polish thought they were leaving
One.  They just hold the lightbulb and cry until the universe spins around them.
This was my grandfathers all time favorite joke. Pop Pop: What's red and dingle dangles from the ceiling? Me: I don't know... Pop Pop: A Red dingle dangle of course! Pop Pop: What's green and dingle dangles from the ceiling? Me: A green dingle dangle! Pop Pop: No they only come in Red. Me: :|
As someone who has passed their prime. 
The dog had skid marks in front of it.  
Linda Mcartney
Beautician says: you want me to put a black cock in your mouth?
A dick in a box.
Asses and faces
Jew Lee
It had a reptile dysfunction!
Similar to the way the   that way we can see if it's just a one liner, a short setup or a long epic? I'm not entirely sure this is the place to put this, so if there's a better spot can someone tell me?
One. We're efficient not funny!
The Tooth Fairy.
A naughty strawberry 
Why are you shaking? She's gonna eat me.
Typo
Tulips on my pianist.
So they can run their fingers through their hair.
"It was a business doing pleasure with you."
About 6 hours. 
Cute, but how do you pick up peanuts with it?
Me:  Yeah.  She was stabbed in California, in broad day light.  The one from legally blonde.   Reese....Something.... with-er... um...with-uh... ..ummm... Friend: Witherspoon? Me:  No.  With a knife.
I hear it's fair in height
Don't poop where you scoop.
I appreciate the sediment. 
The harder you hit 'em, the more English you get out of them.
A rooster says, "Cock-a-doodle-doo.". A surfer says, "Dude, a Cock will do.".
Falawful.
Hey, ja!
How to finger A minor
Me either, it got cut short. 
Out of the trash and into the garbage
They both started out black and blue then became white and golden
Because it clogs its SINGAPORES!
Because he thought people were taking him for granite.
Wom
Because he had a Halloweenie!
A lady asked me if I thought she was wearing to much makeup. I told her it depends ... on whether she was trying to kill Batman or not.
Because it makes up everything.
A Grammar Nazi
That was your fault!!!
Hambush
Because he isn't real.
Ovary-acting 
The Neck-Romancer
We both barely last 14 seconds and leave our partners underwhelmed. 
Because he had a Halloweenie! (Hollow-weenie)
All his cousins are male!
You kick her in the groin.
I'm putin' that guy to sleep
ISIS
Because it looks like Picasso painted you.
When he's an alien! I'll see myself out now
AIDS for humanity
Because he has only been convicted mythdemeanors.
One is a group of cunning runts and the other is a group of running cunts.
Three. One left ear, one right ear, and a Final Front-ear.
Break-fist
Its those damn acidic jews!
First time posting to  .
A violin has strings and a fiddle has strangs.
Methrandir
Socialize
A-flat "minor"
A sneezing ticket holder.
So I asked the question," Black and Blue or Gold and White" ? "It doesn't matter Sir" replied the Police Officer "Your wife still has extensive bruising"
[deleted]
Dang ol' Dangle dangle.
Irrelephant.
He spent the night in a warehouse.
Because of the people that fathered them.
Sir.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
He asked a kid to run across the street and buy him a pack of cigarettes. The kid was like, "No way man, fuck you." So the man ran over himself.
Change the drinking age to 25
They can't handle their liquor--They always black out
His son with the xbox.
I'll get in your face and you blow it out of proportion.
It's mizzen.
Sure, "abcdefghiJK."
You get one from snatching a kiss. 
At las!
Yeah, well she's been asking about you
Because one is un oeuf
"Yeah, uh huh, you know what it is."
A big wave.
Just ice.
What can kill you with a glance and goes "Hittthhh"? The Basilisp.
Because they have big fingers! Not mine. Told to me by my late grandfather, funniest pastor ever. :)
Nothing, he just let out a little wiiiine.
ARGGGLLLAGHHHHGAAAAA
The hacked him to death.
Selfless
a PUNchline
He's ok he can stop whenever he wants.
Because he doesn't need sleepAIDS.
Inspecto Elemento
A: A wind tunnel.
Somebody had an idea.
They both wriggle when you eat them. 
Seriously, I gotta figure out how many slaves I need to buy
ded-ant.. ded-ant.. ded-ant dedan deadANT~~~ dedandead-annnnnt #  d-d-d-deadant.
In the trunk of a car.
He didn't have enough koalifications!
cervical cancer
More than you can shake a stick at
An oar-gy
He was charged with battery!
He gets out the Bible Belt!
The employees where slacking off.
To teach women to walk on their hind legs.
To scare off Cat burglars!
A bus full of old people
To indicate where the treasure is buried.
She was alright.
Cause he knead that dough. ........ Sorry I'm drunk
Let's just say that his backstreet went more than one direction.
It's White and all over his land.
Not an iPhone because Apple doesn't support flash
Down in hisssstory!
Men kept disappearing in her black hole! (#69BadJokes buy it like everywhere on-line!) ((unless you're a hater of funny stuff ;))
Blue and Blue Light.
A flat major
Answer: I don't know. I don't have 2020 vision.
Because they learn about the x-axis.
One you need for a rough patch, the other you need to patch your rough. 
Teeth marks on the toilet seat.
Because they knead dough. 
A condescendant con descending.
He was melting
Depends
Because I want to spreadsheet your legs.
A carri-on bag
Auchwhips
Go sit at the back of the oven
Sedimentary, my dear Watson 
BBQ Sauce
Beats me, I just man the drone. 
Hippies screw in dirty sleeping bags!
It's called Crystal Meh
A plane
Because he was Legoless
Drool
Dude, your dick is hanging out.
So he could C#.
A black man who committed a crime.
the black man
Marry her.
Why did the blonde get so excited after she finished her jigsaw puzzle in only six months?  Because on the box it said From 2 to 4 years.
Two cannibals giving each other a blowjob. 
He went straight for the jocular every time
Nothing. You told her twice already… 😀
Zippity Bop, Puddin' pop!
A circle-jerk.
Only thyme will tell.
Go republicans! 
He was blowing off Steam
He was too super fish oil.
Concentration camp.
Inspecting mirrors 
She's throne.
A baked potato. 
He's all right now.
They both had to die to become the icon of saving.
Because the p is silent.
Because they're hill areas....sorry I had to share this cheesy joke I just overheard my coworker tell.
A shortcunt.
Fuck
They take the Psycho path.
It doesn't matter, they'll just compliment it a lot and then complain because it won't screw.
A Rain Deer.
Wiped his ass
Celebrity names dropping.
For playing wom
When he eats his first brownie.
Said the man in the pub to the bear. First heard this joke told by Eddie Izzard.
A white horse fell in a mud puddle.
One is a runt with a cache.
It's rated RRRR!
Uh, like, can you knot?
The turkey said gobble, gobble, gobble. The goat said back abdul akbar before blowing up.
the hitlers!
Everyone I meet won't stop saying Aye!
The UK National Lottery!
At first there is a lot of sucking and blowing, but when it's over your house is gone.
"Revenge!"
Where the funnel be!
Well, well, well...
GerMany
Sir.
Every time he looked between a woman's legs, he saw Bush.
You Barium
A washing machine doesn't cry when it takes a load.
Elephants
Well. I don't know about you guys, but I wouldn't want something that horny chasing me!
When Jesus cleared the temple.
A Chopin board
Boo-Bees....
I remember there was a joke about why women aren't political leaders and the punchline being that they would bicker and argue with each other or something... Anyone know which joke I am talking about?
You don't call her.
One whose career is in ruins.
An investigator. Ba dum tss.
My 10yo is doing a project on  Mississippi and one of it's famous residents was Elvis.  She was doing some research on him and started asking me questions: 10: Dad was Elvis on drugs? M:  Yep....I think he even died on the toilet 10:  Whhaaattt?  Was he going to the bathroom when he died? M:  Not sure, but I do know....it was a pretty shitty way to go Cue:  Laughter explosion, I don't curse around them so the impact was bigger
"Fine, suture yourself."
"I want my Nickel back!"
Yea, it was in tents. 
Fo Drizzle 
'Pun-kins'
Stick his bill up his arse.
Aaaaaaaaallah Snackbar.
Cause they're white
a faguettè
Hidden Run.
Sesame Street has an Oscar.
Beef Wellington
Won-ton soup
Society What's black on top and white on bottom? Rape
To late, you already clicked the link.
Plutocracy
Get your head in the game.
Her Boyfriend was blonde too!!
Life outside of prison.
Preferably really dark or 'just plain wrong' jokes.
He gets her Dawn.
Its always in the rear of the field.
To go to the motel with her client so they could have some fucking privacy.
He was a fungi.
A cloud.  
Sorry, this option is not available in Beta version.
Nobody wants to marry an underemployed alcoholic.
Staple food to the ceiling!
Because he bumped his head on the low-way! I guess we're doing 4 year old's jokes today :)
Enough to kill Two and a Half Men.
At 8 -- You take her to bed and tell her a story. At 18 -- You tell her a story and take her to bed. At 28 -- You don't need to tell her a story to take her to bed. At 38 -- She tells you a story and takes you to bed. At 48 -- She tells you a story to avoid going to bed. At 58 -- You stay in bed to avoid her story. At 68 -- If you take her to bed, that will be a story. At 78 -- What story??? What bed??? Who the hell are you???
Title.
"Sure"  "Sex"  "... I don't get it."  "Yeah, I know you don't."  
They woke him up.
Witherspoon?  No, she did it with a knife.
Because they are unorthodox.
I tried shoving the handle up my ass but I don't think I had enough lube. What else can I try with it?
It changes your blood type.
A total attention whore. 
I don't know, ask your dad.
69
Militia Etheridge
Cause its white and its on their land.
They both hate the French press
He'll tell you. 
Sexy kids
Never mind, it's tearable.
Because they're delicious.  What?  You've never tried them?  You're missing out.
The great depression
Sir Cumference!
He wanted to taco bout his problems
He-brews it
Because D-shells are too big and B-shells are too small.
...throw a load of dirty laundry in.
Love doesn't burn. What's worst part about making love to a dead baby.  Digging up the coffin. How long does take to play hide and seek with a dead baby?  It depends how small the pieces are.
Shove its bill up its ass.
Messie  Thank you and goodnight. 
The pole dance.
Well today I had bacon, fried eggs, toast, and milk. 
She had no arms Knock knock. Who's there? Not Sally. What did Sally get for her Birthday? We don't know, she didn't open it yet.
Cook him some Uncle Ben's
free masonry.
They decided to rig a Tony
"Noth"
I don't know, but you better keep it away from your ass! (Credit: Kenny Hotz)
Oily!
Make them wipe their screen because they think text is a smudge.
Hitler.......
Shoot him he probably stole that bike. What do you do when you see a black man on a bike? Shoot the bike, that's your nigger.
Ewe-substitution
You get a lot of puse.
He was out of bounds
Wrong
Because she was out standing in her field.
That thing sure is cute, but can it pick up peanuts?
"Come, spot!"
Oopsie daisies.
Maamilade! Tada....... anyone? Anyone? I'll get my coat
Tea-Rex
bad drivers.
Man, deep
The hooker because she can wash her crack and sell it again.
So there won't be a World War III.
With little Nazis.
Jews
Polaroids
Because 7 8 9 A.
The Tooth Fairy!
Someone who is out-standing in his field!
Neither one is a squirrel.
What do you call a man with one extra finger on his left hand?    John Dillinger.
"I'm not ready to get hard yet, I just got laid!"
Wedding cake. 
Hang out here while I go inside.
Infidel Castro.
Chi-LE!!!!!!!!!! My girlfriend came up with that one hope u guys love it as much as I do!!!!! :)
"TOUGH TITTIES!"
Go for the juggler!
 Put it in Putin!
It became entally handicapped
Because Windows 7 8 9
Because they're fatter. 
A bomb in a bull snowman.
So people can see them surrender from afar. Edit: wrong form of the form "wear"
Plagiarism!
They both love Ten D's
All women are complicated.
Because he was SO-DIMM!
Meat Patty
Because Australians mate...
man-go juice!
You cry when you cut up the onion.
An alligator.
It was in tents.
A bright eye deer.
Young boy is curious and asked his father where people come from dad says "well son it goes way back to Adam and eve and they were mother and father to everyone" Young boy still confused asks his mother "Mommy where do people come from?" She responds with "well after years of evolution we evolved from monkeys and gorillas" The young boy even more confused now goes back to his father for and explanation and he replys "well son your mother was talking about her side of the family"
A PALM TREE!!!
Bacon.
FedEx Kinky's
TBC
I wrote you a song but it's only one verse... But it's only because you're my UNIVERSE ...lol...
What do you get when you cross an Aboriginal with a Caucasian? A half decent person.
Cuz I'd like to go home from the baa and ram ewe.
They do beat around the bush...
A midget walks under a bar.
What do you call a lesbian dinosaur? A lickalotapuss. What do you call a gay dinosaur? A megasoreass.
Fidel Sass-tro
What starts with "F" and ends with "UCK"?  "FIRETRUCK"!!! What were you thinking?  What starts with "P" and ends with "ORN"?  ..."POPCORN"!!  What were you thinking?!?!?!
Human Resources. 
He didn't play well with udders.
A faguette
A junk shop.
Baaaah bye!
Because he was a fungi 
Cancer.
A bunch of moooovers.
Gruyèauuuurrrrrrrrrr
His pants fit him like a glove.
Because he is stronger than you. 
Acne doesn't come on your face till about thirteen.
A real pain in the ass!
Because she was his sole mate.
Regression therapy
Everywhere.
The polar bear, because he's polar! 
You can't hear an enzyme
No, because the "p" is silent.
Because he was Haydn.
Poohnanni
Mack-Le-More!!!!!!
Christopher Reeve.
Daddy issues
A homo-genius mixture
Because other people took the bait.
The meat was fowl.
Well, this morning I had scrambled eggs, hash browns, a side of bacon, a glass of milk...
You hear about them but never see them
Crust-asian
A woman can understand irony and satire without being offended.
Because it had too many issues.
He couldn't reach the final solution. 
Because when they find the position, they can't find the momentum, and when they have the momentum, they can't find the position. 
A traveller who is a huge fan of seafood arrives in Boston for the first time.  He leaves the airport and hails a cab.  After he gets in, he excitedly says to the cabbie, "Hey, I'm new in town.  Can you tell me a good place to go to get scrod?"  The cabbie replies [in a thick Boston accent], "Pal, I've got to congratulate you.  I've heard that question a lot over the years, but that's the first time I've ever heard it in the pluperfect subjunctive."
A bromosectional
Their hump has no bone.
Q: Doctor, before you performed the autopsy, did you check for a pulse? A: No. Q: Did you check for blood pressure? A: No. Q: Did you check for breathing? A: No. Q: So, then it is possible that the patient was alive when you began the autopsy? A: No. Q: How can you be so sure, Doctor? A: Because his brain was sitting on my desk in a jar. Q: But could the patient have still been alive nevertheless? A: It is possible that he could have been alive and practising law somewhere.
Ask your mom. (Sorry if this has already been posted)
Because I want to give you a midnight ride!
Teabrew.
Michael Jackson the third.
Because no matter what, women are always right, even when they're full of shit.
Lo Meintenance
He is well known for being outstanding in his field. 
Every time his wife gets hot he beats her with a shovel. 
The crow bar. 
Because he was looking for Pooh!
The mooovies. pls tell to friends.
...Their dicks. Where else? (is bad i know)
Because it wasn't big enough to be a Buck.
A horribly depraved piece of human garbage.
I am not sure but I think it will come out a bit zonkey
At a crow bar. 
A cereal killer!
Snowd-en
"Daddy."
a Stick
They both think they can fly.
Because they're "heel areas" ... I'll show myself out
I'm floored!
They compliment each other nicely.
M'Kay
There's something between us that smells..
Marma'lady 
Innocence : Nuns doing squats in a cucumber field. Frustration : Attempting to pin diarrhea to a wall. Agony : A horse in a wet suit with an erection. Can anyone else come up with ones for: Benevolence, Joy and Fury?
A Rug's Life.
Because there are mad trees.
The U.S. mint (cents)
A pair'a'normal activities. 
They ate all the dinosaurs
Just curious and looking for laughs lol.
Because we're Snowedin.
I promise not to crumb in your mouth. 
Because there were lots of turn ons. 
Who's playing this Shit?
He was told not to play with his food. 
Is he a ladybug or a fruit fly?
One. But it'll take 3 episodes, and Krillin dies.
You can't brush your teeth with a crocodile.
Because they don't want the world to know!
The other half drive Lincolns
Get in the car
At least the burglar has the decency to leave you the house.
Cot death.
beats me
A rushin' russian.
Linen
periodically 
Smoke-a-mon
Dozen tit
He takes the elevader. 
By looking over your shoulder!
The one percent
A buck-an-ear!
Chia LaBeouf
He is heir to the throne.
Dingos with straws....!! 😆
On camera. Credit to this week's episode of  .
From squinting and saying, "Suck what?" 
Essays. 
Muhammed muhammed muhammena.
Long John Silver First of my original jokes to actually make my girlfriend chuckle.
A fan. The moment the thing is turned off, the people inside start sweating.
Three way.
Deranged.
He has only one strat: "You shall not pass!"
So the dishwasher matches the washing machine
He had a high pressure job
Beats by Dre. 
"10 bucks says I don't need this oxygen tank"
The Family Channel.
BeeBee guns
Between a rock and a hard place.
He couldn't stop.
Vladimir's Poo Tin
Dozens of dollars worth of Ramen was lost.
when you say one thing and mean a mother. Don't remember where I heard it.  Haven't read it here yet.
(is it "R"?) NAAAAAY!!!    'Tis the C 
Because they eat out.
NEINtales
Because otherwise his name would be E-war Woo-woo.
His name is Tom Tukaluk
A cross-wok.
He gave off a good Impression, but couldn't make a Van Gogh.
What is the likelihood it will be a hairtest
DINO-MITE!
I promise I'll leave a piece of me inside you.
It said "twist to open"
 -- the Seven Cs.
Because he hated au jus.
They're identical too! Once you've seen Juan, you've seen Jamal.
A Nokia
.....have you ever tried to peel apart a grilled cheese?
How did the hipster burn his tongue ? cos he drank he coffee before it was cool...
Americium-1776
They vote. 
Condescending. ;)
Depressed.
REDDIT
Nobody knows, the never get to keep the house.
Deadmau5
Scallops, scallops!
I don't know, but it was pretty bazaar
Red Robin... Ya Bum
He got turd degree burns.
Independence Day
You really think I want to search for 'hardcore poem'???
He literally couldn't even.
Dissing Terry.
He is wanted for being the Man of Steal.
Joaquin
The boy scout returns home from the camp.
Because it was two tired.
Depends.
A hug and a little quiche.
Don't do it! You have potential!
Bridge.
Barackoli.
Brokeback Mountain.
Trick Question. They only think they can reach that high.
It's mistaken for granite.
It's nothing without its tail.
What its the difference between a quarter and a guy? Neither gets had when you want tail
They shake hands.
Shitty wok 
Punch his sister in the throat.
Because he was in bread!
Mourning
So that the musician would have a place to put their beer.
Commaraderie
Because she was tired of a bottomless pitt.
A chair
I can't imagine a situation in which blowing on a whistle is more effective than yelling "RAPE!"
Put him in a concentration camp
He ran out of tissue paper. Edit: Thank you so much for the gold. You have quite possibly made my dreams come true! Never thought something I came up with at 5:00 A.M. would make it happen.
Because they make shit happen.
I'll sit
Heroine overdose
If it has 4 doors, it's a sedan.
A calendar has a date on Valentine's day.
It was a challahcaust.
A man brings his son to the hospital. The boy has severe burns. The doctor asks him what happened. The boy says:"I wanted to see how much gas there was  left in the canister and it was dark, so I lit a match". The doctor, sarcasticly, asks:"So, did you see?". The boys father cries:" The whole fuckin neighborhood saw!!!"
Ewok'd.
If they're not on your dick they're in your wallet.
I don't know. They've never tried.
Cause I wanna fuck the shit out of you.
Dad-which one do u love more? papa or mama.. Akpos- both Dad- if i go to America n mama go to Paris.where wil u go? Akpos- Paris Dad- that mins u lyk mama.. Akpos- i lyk paris Dad-if i go to Paris n mama go to America,wher wil u go? Akpos- America Dad- y? Akpos- coz i went to paris b4 
Incognegro.
By taking the integral of the acceleraptor! Me:  Everyone else: 
Vampires don't come inside without permission
When they get tired and burn out, they work twice as hard.
He got a little behind in his work.
because they 
Aw sieg heil no!
conics
he was tired of coffin.
*What does a walrus and Tupperware have in common? .. They both like a tight seal *What looks like a lemon and shaped like a rock? .. A lemon shaped rock *What is brown and sticky? ..A brown stick
she was ms. steak'n... and got grilled
Natty Rights
Prawn Hub
Fermatation.
He made a spectacle of himself.
Because he was Legolas 
Their balls are just for decoration.
Wednesday, Tom and Joe went to a restaurant and ate dinner. When they were done they paid for the food and left. But Tom and Joe didn't pay for the food. Who did?
Why did the number 6 cry? Because 7 8 9.                (7 ate 9)
the Sin of 4
¡El misterioso! I'll see myself out now...
Because Juice control the media
Having to go inside and ask for a coat hanger.
Bukkake
Make me one with everything.
Fearless Reader
A person who stays up all night wondering whether or not there is a dog.
An aircondtior can be hot
Because then they'd have to hold erections.
A priest.
Tequila Mockingbird
one's name is "one two three" and the others name is "un deux trois". who made it across? one two three, because un deux trois cat sank. 
cuntfucius
He had to parrot.
He left fresh prints all over the scene.
San Diego.
The Fedoral Government.
A herpepotamus.
a bilingual chicken
Income Equality activist
Your sense of guilt
Kanye's not him.
To see the chicken strip!!!
Bernadette
Don't go to school.
Interracial 
In the onion ring!
A Lickalottapus
U WOt M8>?
Your ears.
You can't milk a cow for 14 years.
You should stop by later.   The missus and I are having people for dinner.
Tally ho!
Wow, you seamstressed out. (I'm so sorry)
Amor-Man
don't give me that latitude
I'm not completely shore, but it must have been pretty deep. 
'I want Samoa!'
Shots.
Well well well....
Look for the one with shaved legs....
Taylor not so Swift
She shrugged and said "Beats me!"
A threesome
They were just chilling
Because he was a fungi!
Miso impossible
The discrimination.
you have to sit in the back of the oven...
On a Solid Snake Drive 120 gb sorry :\
Depends on which method you try....
Pastramyou 
(In a frustrated voice)  They just don't listen.
You planet.
He was born with a left knee, a right knee, and a little wee-knee
He was malnourished due to his paltry (poultry) diet.
He was convicted of crepe. 
HOLY MACKAREL!
Because the exit doors were coin operated.
JESUS HALLELUJAH
"Thats great!"
Because jungle is massive.
Self-Raising flour.. I'll get my coat.
Its become nothing but pocket change.
Short. 
With a trainslator 
nun
One wrong slip of the tongue and you'll probably wind up in deep shit.
Lick'er.
87.5% unrelated. (Shamelessly stolen from  )
Neither came to my birthday party
Get jalapeño business!
TURNUP!
Idk. (I decay)
MUH SOGGY KEYS!
GERMany.
Because she's a woman.
Bernadette.
Light? What's that?
a b-r-r-r-r-ito
An anes-theologist. (close enough)
He gets there before the hare
A tattoo.
They both fucked minors
I don't know I just fly the drones
Your mom didnt give me a corvette
It varies from person to person.
Pepperoni Picza!
Kanye
Tongue and groove
Russell
Idk... 
Michael Phelps can finish a race
A nun with a javelin in her throat.  (The only joke I can ever recall when asked for one. Told to me by my art teacher in Grade 11. Needless to say, he was my favourite teacher)
A Pickpocket snatches watches.
Because they are always lying in bed!
No, they just whisper it so the goat doesn't get startled. 
"Hey I hear your neighbor's a real dick"
The lettuce was a head and the tomato was trying to ketchup.
Because his parents are vegetables. Source: On mobile so can't post link but it's the ask reddit thread about Harry Potter being written in a different perspective.
.. just so he could rewrite my.cnf
because the sea-weed.
S'aul Good man.
Turban Outfitters.
Too soon?
A meowntain!
An unfunny joke 
They don't care, as long as they do it better than people from Devon.
I asked my grandad the other day "why do old people read the bible so much?" He replied "cause we're cramming for finals"
Fowl ball
He's already got the driving part down.
I'll tell you guys tomorrow
Boku no Pico de Gallo
M'genta
Udder destruction!
It has no Seoul!!
Classic conditioning.
It gets jalapeño business.
'ell if I know.
A stretch
Cos i noah guy
The Tie of the Igor.
No wait, it isn't In Utero.  It's...Nevermind
American Snipper
The rifle owner.
A dutch oven...
The line at KFC.
9 months.
......yeah, some dick cut her off.................
Because they don't have a function
I'm looking for jokes that have more than one punchline.   One option is jokes that have two different endings, both funny (e.g.:   ) A second option is jokes that don't end after the first punchline and continue on to a second punchline (e.g.:   ) There may be more options.  Do you know of any jokes that fit these criteria?
[deleted]
Nothing. Calenders are inanimate objects that are used to keep  track of the date and important events.
Really ugly olives.
He was unhurt but his tranny was damaged. 
the taste.
Nevermind. 
Just in case they get a hole in one. Credit to 
Gassius Clay
lowering the bar. or not to.
Poo Pee.
Punjabi.
A Dick Van Dyke
Thoreau Back Thursday
A Puthy
Because it was more Loki than he wanted. 
A wet nose.
Stand on top of his head and make it rain.
The tire doesn't sing gospels when you put it in chains.
Pido.
She came home with a big, red snapper.
Tulane University
Nothing, they just waved.
A Guardian of the Galaxy
A magic Juan
A redneck virgin 
The fridge doesn't fart when you pull meat out.
They never saw it coming.
Obi-Juan
No dental records and the DNA is all the same.
Unstable. 
You suck his dick. How can you tell your dogs gay? His dick tastes like shit.
In his sex drive
As a .jpg
Its the food. There is too much raw dog.  Heard it on Adam Carolla's Podcast. A caller phoned in and told it to Adam. Thought you guys would like it. 
Ash Wednesday
They picked random letters out of a hat. C.... eh? N... eh? D....eh?
They planet.
Because he's literally the fastest man on earth  (get it cuz sex)
One is a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean ;)
Wipes his ass.
My tax refund.
Catch you later!
They outsauced it.
An M-poster
He threw up the horns.
So they can stand closer to the sink.
The news put out a trigger warning.
"Count Dracula."
Because he was a physicist.
The cake-cake-cake. 
When I was in London, UK, I asked my Indian colleague if he knows  the emergency number in UK. He answered '349'. I said 'No it's not. It's 999'. He insisted 'Yes 349'. Thinking he was a deaf but knowing he is not I said 'No it is 999'. So he answered slowly. 'Yes TTTRRRRIIII PPOOOLLLLL NINE!!' in Indian Accent.
One more.
Both are long-haired, live at their parents' till their 30's, and if they'll do anything, it is considered a miracle.
He was made out of Plato
I don't know but they cantaloupe.
I say that we start the NBDBL (National blind dodge ball league) and then televise it. What are your thoughts on this? 
Because of an inconvenient tooth. 
He decided to stick it out for another year. 
They think it's whale shit.
Jesus fed 5000 people with 5 loaves of bread and 2 fish... Hitler made 6 million Jews toast... 
Interrupting cow.  Interup.....MOO!
NOOOO, THANK you! I don't even wanna walk a mile in my own shoes!!! Do you know how long a mile is?
You put it back in the crib.
It's a line dance at the old folks home...
A little get together.
He needed somebody to cosine.
Get another 90 year old to yell "BINGO!"
It's fucking close to water.
Because it was Da-rude Sandstorm
He thought nothing could possibly travel faster than sea.
Please answer. It's very urgent.
U SeXe.
He got straight "gays"
Anti-oppressants.
...was the capital of Wodesia
My you're looking "acute" today.
A swallow
Most of them prefer playing in the minors.
It's a long-winded story.
A. Because she's got a pumpkin for a coach B. Because she keeps running away from the ball
Nothing. I beat both.
steamed Franks 
The original grammar Nazi.
It's braille for blind babies... -=Women=-  It spells out ...."Suck here"   -=Men=- " I am the daddy " 
Never mind, I'll escalator
They always come up with the final solution.
Alzheimer, granpa.
The next day he was found dead in his tea pee
The customer always comes first.
BRAAAAAAAAAAAAANS 
Chili CON Carne!
James
The awning. I know, I'm sorry.
What do you call a condensed version of the history of ISIS? CaliphNotes!
...... A jeanius
Testosteroni.
Expecto Erection
Because if so, it could have Fifty Grades of Shea.
Crust.
because they certainly aren't rare, and are definitely not well done.
To get to the same side.
Because they're all a bunch of vassals.
cancer.
Do not touch.
A pit bully!
1) Female Ego... Rejection without Reason! 2) Male Ego... Won't Ask For Directions!
Me...........Owwwwww!!
You're both dense motherfuckers.
Because they're all laymen.
The White Wizzer
A pork chop.
The family size.
Neither has he.
Shitty tips.
Yarn. 
The chemist may frown.
Current events. 
EVERYWHERE!
They are both doable as long as you don't mind following a bunch of black guys.
Because he was a quack head
They ordered pepperoni and all they got was plane
They have a lot of issues
Anal-isis.
Because you already know she'll work out.
Ewe wouldn't understand.
Cretins!
Because they like their dicks?(* eating them ofcourse) I seriously dont know.
2POC
It means to make or become different.
Eh?
A bus driver.
Gingerbread
Bagles
His customers lost interest in him.
The Seattle Seahawks
"Hey, this looks new!"
OOOOOOOOUUUUUUUUUUUIIIIIIIIIII!
Is it worth it?
I've never had a Lentil on my chest.
"After giving it a substantial amount of thought and discussing it with my advisors, I've decided against it. I mean, I'd love to, and I appreciate those who'd support me, but I feel like I wouldn't be able to take the stress mentally- and physically." After being asked what physical stress he'd experience, he responded: "I don't think I'd be able to handle that much running."
because they knew the "12" will be deflated during/after Superbowl.
As a real growth opprotunity
Just ask the NSA, They always keep backups!
"This butt a scratch!"
No thanks, We'll pass!
Red.
Here's a hint: take the F out of Free and take the F out of Way
The Seattle Seahawks play book. Edit: sorry for the typo.
...the wheelchair
Being the 45th white one. 
Сибирь-bullying
Turn it inside out and shake the shit out of it!
Well, when I'm looking in the mirror, me. 
They couldn't fined him.
Geometry
"No thanks, we'll pass" 
Because I keep hearing the same ones over and over
Patty-O`Furniture
You do you!
He floated his stock while the rest of the world was in liquidation. The greatest journalist? Samson. He took two columns and made an impression on everyone.
A butler serves you.
Nah, we'll pass. 
You can't take a joke.
Because your friends might Nazi (not see) the humor.
To get his quarterback!!
FIRE BEVELL
He thought they were revolting 
I don't know, I'm a Patriots fan
You can always say "well, look at it this way; he was a fruit, now hes a vegetable!"
Her smile.
His hand caught fire.
Slap an African child in the face.
In the end, I settled.
"Ilean who?" I lean over and you kiss my ass!
A bro-tato
To get back to the first shop we went to 4 fucking hours ago!
A half cast
Making them.  
Wipe it off and say sorry. (My uncle told me this joke when I was five. I didn't get it at the time, and he knew I'd get it someday. That makes it kind of funnier. One day when I was like 14, I suddenly remembered that joke and went, "Oh! Now I get it!" and laughed my ass off.)
Since all the puppies are already neutered, there's no worry about deflated balls giving one team an advantage...
Idaho
Eventually,  a waterproofer stops coming home with cock all over them. Forgive my accent, I meant caulk. (My first waterproofing joke)
I do.
A Lickalotofpuss 
Probably clawing at the inside of his coffin.
100 people who don't do dick.
Hobosexual
Because people in wheelchairs shouldn't be laughed at.
A widow
Both of em are in plastic, except for the adjustable spanner
A fake name
They both have a hated governor.
A cock that stays up all night.
I'm stumped.
A boomerang 
Because he kneaded them. 
Blonde: "What does IDK stand for?" Brunette: "I don’t know." Blonde: "OMG, nobody does!"
Aloha Akbar.
What a twist. 
A palette.
Juan on Juan
He wipes his ass.
your about to now how. 
He wanted his new dish washer to match his fridge.
Simbalism 
They're the ones who look at YOUR shoes when they talk to you.
He got off on a technicality.
"Isreal?"
The brides are already dressed in white.
cantelope 
Place a banana on the Berlin Wall. East is where a bite has been taken out of it.
Well, this morning I had bacon, eggs, juice...
An American zoo will only have a description of the animal. The Chinese zoo has the price and recipe of the animal.
That's your mom's number.
Halloween Halloween Halloween!
There were no roads!
parkin'sins
A ganguin 
The console. What was JFK Jr's wife drinking when the plane crashed?  Ocean Spray.
A corny poop joke. You can really visualize it.
Mozeltov Cocktails
ju ju  ju ju  ju ju  G-Unit?
Little Ceasars
They are both crustaceans. 
Carrion, my wayward son.
of course the f*cking are... (thanks dad)
He went to Paris and saw an Eiffel
two chengs
a muffin doesn't scream when you put it in an oven.
He  .
He was in de-Nile.
Mom: if you’re a good boy, you’ll  get one when you’re older. Son: What is I’m not a good boy? Mom: You’ll get many.
Hire a cunning linguist.
Untie her
Canoes tip.
It has great food, but it has no atmosphere.
One's a busty crustacean and the other's a crusty bus station!
Same question for "GTA IV: The Lost and The Damned.
Data
RUFFles
Just one. They're retardedily strong.
Aged whisky costs more.
A dindonuffin muffin
LeichtTractor Premium
Mentally dis-cabled. 
EX SO FAT
The coming of the Lord!
Because Ubisoft
They both worry about the position of colons.
I gillt was killing me.
Head.
A Christian bail.
The German!
Coat-Hanger Abortions
They made a movie about him: American Snipper
They both like girls
Data
Sir Veillance
loading...
"That’s the last straw!"  helped me refine the wording.
The landlord at The Dog And Duck pub needed a new sign to hang above the door, so he contacted his signwriter. The signwriter arrived a week later with the new sign, hung it above the door, and asked the landlord what he thought.  The landlord replied with, "I like it. However, I do feel that there should be bigger spaces between ' ' and ' ', and ' ' and ' '".
If not, I have a pirated copy you can borrow.
Well done ewe.
There are twenty of them.
Depressions.
[Deleted]
I thought it was pretty tearable.
This morning I had a boiled egg.
Y NO LEGS!
Because it's a carrion bird.
Running... JK rolling
A stand up guy
A library.
Shoot for the Tsars.
C, eh! N, eh!, D, eh!
Cause eight reindeer and a sleigh are a lot quicker than 6 pigs and a stoneboat. 
They fly in an 'A' (eh)
Because he was in de-nile.
Batman-do
He had swine flu 
...go for the Juggler!
Because they will always steal the green cards.
C: PU!
Tchai   Tea
A massage in a brothel
It only takes one to ruin a neighborhood.
Mein Kraft
Commonwealth Games
Noeyedeer  (Say it out loud) 
It was: "Small medium at large"
Fuck knows
An impasta
The boat cuts through the water, a woman waters through the cut.
Because they're kiwis.
Because he's blind you racist.
Go ask your mother.
Because he'll never give you a penny for your thoughts, he'll never put his two cents in, & he'll never drop a dime on you!
They boil the hell out of it.
A Micromanager.
I am... Still 1080p
The stepmother, because sometimes you want to hit her, even though you shouldn't
Just Ice
Ugly sheep. 
Right about now, funk soul brother. Check it out now, funk soul brother.
The Rolling Stones say "Hey, you, get off of my cloud." A Scotsman says "Hey, McCloud, get off of my ewe." 
Blue.  One blue this way  <---- and the other blue that way    ----->
Because they use "net" profits
... because Mao is more of a chair man!
Jerry's Kids...
Because every time they do all they do is crap
The cigarette.
Yeah. As long as you don't get in the habit.
He experiences culture shock.
The TSA. They are always asking people, "Who are you?", "Where did you come from?", "Why are you here?", and "Where are you going?"
A Watermelon...
They both strip for parts!
Plato
Now you're just some bubbles that I used to blow.
Hamburger, it's in the ground state.
What the fuck are you waiting for bitch?  Get in there and make me a fucking sandwich!!!  
Neither does she.
short hands..
You can analyse my rocks anytime ;)
The who's-who of WHO!
zero (compliments to my SO who thinks she made this up)
I'm just here so I won't get fined.
They would have a more detailed understanding of what Hell is actually like.
They're easier to convince.
Eggsact measurements.
No?  Be careful, there's a small medium at large.
It's all out of eggs..
Dagon.
A barber!
A man who is outstanding in his field.
They drive alpacars.
You can get close to it, but you can't touch it
First M'lady 
Me: Are you seeing someone? Girl: Um, no. Me: Not even a psychiatrist?
Because vibrators can't mow the lawn.
He assumed the lawnmower was a vacuum 
A promegranate.
the harder you hit them, the more english they pick up...
They figured three squares was enough for the sewers to handle.
She was disappointed to learn she'd gained 300 pounds.
Sparky
ihop
He couldn't find 3 wise men or a virgin.
Pirate bae
He's sofa king funny.
Was hoping you guys would have a few golf jokes for when I play my first game tomorrow. From PG to R rated is fine with me ;)
Subtractem
You get a crab wound. So you go the police but they clam't help you. Eventually you end up at the hospital and they tell you you'll need a sturgeon. Then you murder everyone because you are so god damn tired of their undersea puns. 
Can't- elope! 
"What do you want to be when you blow up?"
Sherbert. (I can't take credit for this amazing piece of comedy. Heard it from a friend, no idea if he came up with it or not.)
Two, one to hold the bulb and one to rotate the universe.
Eyes, in deep despair, looking up, said in a passive tone, "wazzup brow"
LinkedIn Park
He's a web developer.
You don't know when they're coming, you don't know how many inches you'll get, and you don't know long they'll last
One, his own.
Because they spic spanish.
Hollywood!  (Made this up while i was doing a project.)
FUCKIN' LIGHT BULBS!  HOW DO THEY WORK!?!
Because of dat  Djibouti.
One gets sun on your skin and the other gets skin on your son.
One of them gets taken in every once in a while.
Steal whatever it is that you want to buy so badly, don't let the cops have it back, then pay restitution.  Edit: It's only a joke if you let them have the stuff back and then end up paying for the thing, twice.
The one with the welfare check in it.
Because he kept insisting everyone only get one shot.
I heard he nailed it!
There's no punchline.
Having to find out that your dog has AIDs too.
He became Thor.
De-calf
You never know if your gums are bruised. 
"They are German and a tad-Polish"
One with everything
“When he owns it.” 
Decalf
French press. (Too soon?)
A cataract.
It would be nice if this joke had a punch line, woodentit?
She was having a midwife crisis. 
Eyeronic.
Deflated. 
Because they take things literally. 
Because the steaks are too high. 
Bañana
A Punjab. 
Because it got waterlogged.
You would too if you had to fly Alitalia.
Because curiosity killed the cat.
Justice fingers 
Its not that hard
You get high.
Because seven, eight, nine.
Nothing. Either way someone is going to lose a trailer
Two cents
Jason MRAz
"Get off my nuts!" (ps. I made this joke up yesterday... i am having hernia surgery tomorrow, and i lol'd so hard at myself that i about caused a second one to pop out) 
the stroke of midnight.
Shakira. Her hips don't lie.
The Senile River 
That one doesn't believe in six before marriage.
You're probably not going to get it.
Because he's a little prick!
It's the latest in Christian warship.
Because nothing is faster then Liecht!
Drank his coffee before it was cool
Third from the Reich
My PNS
two cents
None because ice cream doesn't have bones.  
The Price is Reich
I won't tell you which one I am, but I like to bring my own candy and just watch.
"It's not a tuba!"
Gatesgate.
I'll tell you later.
He was the vermicellist
Most things.
It's sew sew.
"Thanks, I'll never part with it."
Hide his food stamps in his work boots.
"Well, its not preferred, but I practice abstinence."
A dictator.
A grasshole.
Because they can't even.
D12
Obviously not. gg y'all, inbox = rekt
In A Routine Checkup Nurse To Engineer: “Breathe Deeply In And Slowly Exhale, Do It 3 Times.” Engineer: “Ok” Nurse: “What Do You Feel Now?” Engineer: “Your BODY SPRAY Is Simply Superb Babe.“
The Piledriver: No Holes Barred
A new last name.
He once made out with Bea Arthur for ten minutes and stayed flaccid the whole time even though she took her shirt off halfway through and he saw her breasts
Unique up on him. How do you catch a tame lion? tame way! Zingo!
Alone, An OP is not very strong, he cannot do very much alone, Much like a stick; But, When you combine all of these sticks together, you get a massive heap of faggots.
Because there's lots of AYE ARRR (IR) radiation!
your dads cock tastes like blood.
Nothing, he just waved.
He tried to jump a steam roller over 6 blacks
Happi-ness
Aw-burn!
Because it's too close to the gas chamber.
Oy!-L
You check the oven.
Any school for the deaf
Doctor
Jack Danimals!
A misconception.
Just water, officer. Then why do I smell wine? Good Lord! He's done it again!!!
Stealth Bomber
A cheese grater
Too many Sumo tried to squeeze into it.
Because he was so full of himself.  
They say it was a huge dictator-ship.
Gracias.
call 9-Juan-Juan
All of them.
Dinomite
Gsus
A bloody cunt.
A senõr citizen
The Dine-and-Daesh.
I think there was a fight. It got a little dicey and tears were shed.
He developed guacoma
Death row
A passenger 
I'm going to PUMP YOU UP!
They're both fun to ride until one of your friends sees you on one.
They seem like real neigh sayers, and they're always whinnying about everything
I haven't but I heard it is BLOWING up
TE-QUILA MOCKINGBIRD!
A PENISSAUR!
A sprinkler, chink chink chink chink nigga nigga nigga nigga
A Jew dropped a penny down a gopher hole
Rimit rimit..
To eat vegetables.
A zebra with a private jet.
A non-prophet non-profit.
Air is free....
Looks like his Korea is over
Well an erection of course.
Because they didn't agree with him.
I guess it was a conflict of Pinterest.
Because they always leave you stumped!
Your mom cant take a joke. (Heard this from somebody in my class today)
Jesus going up for the cross!
You'll disappoint 2 women instead of 1
He heard time was relative.
I want a D voice.
To get to the other side!
Go for the juggler.
The smell.
Genocide
All white, all white, all whiiiiiiiite...
Allah-mni!
Because the p is silent 
I don't have a boner right now. -Hugh Hefner, probably
The ¿Qué Qué Qué?
Outlaws are wanted.
He was slow around the bases, but that boy had an arm on him!
The Clitaurus
Nuts and bolts. 
Because I think I'm getting it from my patients.
Because any more would be too farty.
Two large plains.
Eric Clapton would never let a bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
Finnish Goods
Miracle Whip.
One.  You just have to spread him real thin.
He always gets nailed to the boards. 
Piss off Satan's wife.
Take off the chain and both stop working. Going straight to hell :)
Tuesday.
An onion 
A huge short coming.
Because he Tudor house.
Your Bike...
TIMBURRRTON!  
He never saw it coming.
Another black man bites the dust.
A walkie talkie!
Well Well Well
They both are ajar.
Only one shows an interest in the balls.
Organized crime.
They are all "Not-C's" !
One with everything
A Curryean I know Indians are Asian, I felt that stating Korean earlier in the joke would make it worse...worser.
Mun Cheese!
Elephino.
The ultra-sound guy. [read next comment]
Because they work.
The Titanic.
A high body count of black people
A dick, you moron.
pick it up and suck its dick
Bob.
Homeless.
Acne doesn't come on your face until you're 12.
Because his wife was dead-set against it...
I don't know, ask an alter boy.
Call B52!!
You don’t. There is a clock on the oven.
Bach.
I fucking rock.
So the black people will not be the only ones skipping school. 
Oh don't worry, they'll tell you.
He had a dog before every NBA game.
She fucks men. 
They always deliver!
a palm-agranate!
Because 7 8 9
Yes, I'm completely sure.
Acne waits till you are 13 to come all over your face.
He ran into the bank and shouted, "Air in the hands motherstickers, this is a fuck up!!!"
With Little Cesars 
It's a total ripoff. 
Because it has a smaller bulge. 
During. Because you're plugged into the know it all
He needed to keep up with Jenny's U-turns.
He wanted a tight seal.
He still has some whistle left in his fart.
Pungent
To turn them straight.
asprin works.
He wanted to make some doe!
Business was dropping off!
A threesome Edit: In the 1800s
A Terrista
The cysteine chapel.
You can see them coming from miles away.
Semen
you planet
Naan violence.
The cock
by giving him the shroud of turing test.
She replied: Well i like it infrequently. He said: is that one word or two?
A Brazilian. 
Tep on the break tupid!  :D:D:D
Clawing at the lid of her coffin.
He was an alfalfa male.
Because Atheism is a not for-prophet organization. 
.. I'm only Peking.
Neither did she.
2(pi)r or not 2(pi)r....(snicker)
David Lee Roth was in Van Halen Snoop Lion was in a van in halen
Once in awhile. 
bear
...It's a piece of cake!
An eMoo.
Cus he drank it before it was cool.
A douchefag.
With the chicken still around it
Because that's where the mini apple is!
To make a path for the Israelice.
Everyone wants to be Irish on Saint Patrick's Day.
I want my baby back, baby back, baby back. 
Swim for it...
24/7
He was hit by a truck. 
9gag
Hippo-critical.
One, you can turn off without even trying. The other, you spend all day waving a dish cloth at.
Because she woke up 
Sharia Law.
Nothing, he just let out a little whine.
It made Bud wiser. 
Names
A bee-have
...Is it mine?
A pastatute.
He has loco motives.
I'm very squared.
Jose and Hose B
they both can get 16 shoved down their throat without choking
Sharon Rodgers 
Stannous Baratheon.
He made no scents.
Her resume.
Taken Befour
scientist A : Are you sure ? scientist B : Trust me, I know what i'm doing.
Because you're real, but your girlfriend is imaginary
Maybe it's maple leaf.
When she starts her sentence with "A man once told me" .
A wizard is never late.
His asshole stops burning.
It doesn't protect from harmful rays
Antimony.     
The worst case of suicide he has ever seen. 
~Why? -Because she had no arms ... -Knock knock ~Who's there? -Well, it sure as shit isn't little Suzy
Another pops up.
IMHOtep
oral sex can make your day, but anal sex can make your hole weak
The tracks were unfinished.
White privilege
Cha-Ching
The protagonists name is Adam.
The grin reaper
Mein Craft.
Allahu Snackbar!
denim denim denim
To get to the same side
You nuke it.
Both are French.
Texans tend to ride horses whereas rednecks ride their cousins. -American Sniper
Luftwaffles 
A what?
Because the pedals fell off.
The Burger King forgot to wrap his whopper!
A frog. It croaks every night.
Yorkies
A pedophile with a thesaurus.
Testicles (though I'm sure you smarties already got it).
WATCH THIS ! 
They hate to boil their nipples.
A seasoned veteran.
How do you find an egg in all this shit?
Ever pull apart a grilled cheese sandwich?
Medi-Ogre
Erotic is when you use a feather ; kinky is when you use the whole chicken.
Knott, et al.
A Wahhobbyist. 
The pricks are on the outside of a porcupine.
CNN shows the missiles taking off and Al Jazeera shows them landing.
You remove her diaper first.
A genie grants wishes, while a genius wishes for grants.  Source: 
I won't pay 10 bucks to have a Garbanzo bean on my face
They said IT couldn't be done
they eat lox...
a TALKtor
Wii U Wii U Wii U Wii U HINT: Say it outloud
a milkshake 
It's called Delta Delta Delta.
"'Ello 'ello 'ello, you look 'armless, 'op in."
Your lawn won't cut itself.
That's a missed steak
Everyone knows black people can't work a full week.
Someone who stays up wondering if there is a dog.
An inner tuber.
They wine too much.
Because old Hobbits die hard...
Blue eyes white aryan
A Christler
The location of the dirtbag.
I read some jokes from this sub to my Asian co-worker and she wanted me to ask if you guys have some good Asian jokes to help us get through the rest of the work day.
1.21 Jigga whats.
They even got a new slogan: Do work or ALDI port ya
QUARK!
Supposedly the wedding was alright but the reception was great ;)
You shuck the oyster between fits.
They hate getting cured.
Beef Stroganoff 
Robeerto. 
Because they hate French Press!
Because it was deterred.
£20
The more you play with it, the harder it gets. Repost, forgot to proofread "What's does a dick and a Rubiks Cube have in common?" From 
Because it's a long-rod kinetic penetrator!
They both feel like fucking death in the morning.
The other 5% aren't in jail.
At the coroner store. 
metro gnomes
Why only today they found a Beagle!
Poutini!
Rib it.
Every mother-fucker was there!
Mike Dyson
She just needed something to get her by until she could get back on her back
No, but because they don't register for benefits, they don't count as unemployed either. 
So he could make his 4Chan.
The lonely one dated igneous rocks!
If you had a choice between world peace or Bill Gates' money, what color would your Lamborghini be?
A six pack and a potato
A counter reformation.
Because clubbing isn't any fun.
... A hippiepotamus
They are both flat-chested and laid by Mexicans. Source: My old middle  school.
Because she's knows what to spit and what to swallow.
Q: What do you tell someone from Moscow who is in a hurry? A: Quit Russian. Q: What do you call a Mexican pessimist? A: A Mexican't Q: What do you call a German who is urinating in an alley? A: A you're a peein'. Q: What does an Asian person have if their leg joints are socially awkward? A: Shy knees. Q: What is a Parisian country cover band's favorite song to play? A: "I've got France in low places."
They don't want to overwork the camel.
No one! They're extinct!
Invite all of your friends over and have an oven warming party.
The Chosen Juan.
Talibanter
It's snot rocket science.
by the instagram. 
Giraffe.
Because he was black.
2 more bullets
Because everyone who can run, jump, or swim is already across the boarder
The outlaws are wanted.
Teutonic Plates.  I'm sorry I'll find my own way out
SCAR-L
A con-quiche-ador
"Charlie has been neutralised"
Zebra
Ricesis
They can both be fixed with a coat hanger. 
He gets taller.
Is there a dog?
They couldn't get his bonepart 
What up doe
because you'll like it when im dragon my balls across your face
HysterISIS
Doctor
because it scares the shit out of their dogs
Lynchables
Your mommmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm
Ohm...
doctor whore
Because all the fish in there goes "bloo bloo bloo" 
High G.
A broken nose.
Because you can blind them with dental floss
I heard they offer new hires a company cell phone and/or car.
"I am not a crook!"
... How hard you squeeze it.
they pronounce everything with a hard "aargh"
Phil, eh?
To get to the other side.
because they have cotton balls.
Because he was good at pulling weed
A clubbed sandwich
Because it was raining cats and dogs.  :D
Public Enema
It was a PDF file.
It was a cuckoo coop coup.
Because women GRAB anything 20% off!!
..cancer
His boss always took him for granite.
The shit you stepped on
Foreplay 
Heavy petting.
Vladimir Puddin'
Hopefully arrested you sick fuck... also a Dash-hound
It wooden go.
Because of all the booty
You can taste shit on his dick.
Kick his sister in the jaw.
Because he was in da Nile. 
Nothing!
Because he doesn't eat junk food.
Blood on the Dancefloor.
Pixels.
EX-STREAM!
Like going down on your sister. It tastes the same but something's not right.
(snickering) Nice suit, must have cost you an ...
Nothing, You already told her twice.
Drop it Ni**a (sorry for the offensive word)
Women.
Because they hate french press.
Remind him that he's full of untapped potential!
"Great, it's a hung jury."
Because two wongs don't make a white.
Calculus
It's gonna be called Source Code: The SQL!
A Dreddit!
They're both trying to screw everybody.
Because she was told it makes you see things!
He wanted to become a butterfly!
A ginger ninja
A homiesexual
He "sleighs" them.
An Ambulance Armstrong
Don't worry, they'll let you know.
Buzz.....
cant jelly my dick in your ass...
I don't know... Most prisons are indoors.
It's like in Star Wars where Luke with his team had to get past all the defenses of the Death Star and fly through this really long trench to find this 2 meter hole and shoot his torpedo inside it to finish her off.
Hehehe.. Gorgon-zola 
A hooker says "Faster! faster!"   A lover says "Slower....slooower..."   A housewife says "Beige. I think I'll paint the ceiling beige."
Or is that just stereotyping.
Wipe it off and apologize.
"I've Fallen In Love And I Can't Get Up"
A pig pen!
It's won't be long now!
Shemail
They meet up and crack each other up. 
He received a T minus.
Burger King forgot to wrap his whopper
Depends.
When she fits in your wife's jeans. 
Fo drizzle
"Ay, you!"
Put Turkey in Greece to cook it, then cut it up and put it into Chile. Then put it on China and give it to Hungary. 
Stall
He couldn't decide what font to use.
None. It will happen itself. 
It wasn't very good but they gave it a precipitation medal.
You grill the sausage.
People could see right through him.
He buys two cases of beer instead of one.
To die as a martyr.
"You can run but you can't tide."
A Pull-it-surprise!
Justice Fingers!
Well, I guess we better Barium.
Keep the tip.
Because she was too ahoof.
Neither can get enough booty
Because it was dead. 
A hung jury.
"Hey, let's hang out together?"
Because they live in misery
Because they all suck ass.
He had his raisins...
He couldn't sea anything.
For Fundsies! I made that one up yesterday so I really hope nobody has heard it before.
Because they know they'll be fucked over. Edit: Don't, not doesn't. Sorry can't change title.
They don't see the point and just sit in the dark.
there, their, they're.
Jew-Lie
A hot mess.
Hey man ! Who do you know here ? This is a Brothers only party ! 
Because it was 
They don't do liver
Because they Pac-12 of everything
Vitamin sea.
they taste funny
Because he drank religiously
It's a really obscure number and you've probably never heard of it.
You kill his family
I think its 2 cocky.
You go on ahead, I'll give these two a lift.
Uuuuuueeeeuuuuhhhh!!!
Because there's a Target on every corner.
Do you lava me like I lava you. It's beautiful.
A picky eater wearing a Garfield costume.
when her stache is on fire!
Bill Cosby liked pudding his dick where it didn't belong.
My Roku.
Because they heard it was radical! 
"Orff Orff Orff Orff!"
They drank their tea before it was cool.
Papayas See, you're confused right?
Personally, I'd say that 6:30 is the best clock time, hands down.
Put-in. (In a Russian accent) 
Because they're shellfish
He performs circumcisions and uses the foreskins to make wallets.   The best feature of the wallets is if your flight gets cancelled and you are stuck somewhere all you have to do is rub your wallet and it will turn into an overnight bag.
K9P
Les Goldman
One is a dictator, the other is a dick-tater.
ian!
Wub, wub, wubs.
"Can I push your stool in"?
Stew. Bonus: what do you do if an epileptic jumps into a jacuzzi? You throw in your laundry.
There wasn't a punch line.
Someone who knocks on your door and tells YOU to fuck off.
A green bean.
Check it out it's 
.-- .. .-.. .-.. / -.-- --- ..- / -- .- .-. .-. -.-- / -- . ..--..
He brews!
Water.
Because their sperms are always ready and eager for suicide missions.
Caddyshack-ack-ack-ack-ack-ack.
Because it wasn't prophet maximizing. 
What I mean is that people from NY are New Yorkers, people from California are Californian, and coincidentally people from Colorado and Washington are Potheads.  
It's nacho business!
because he was a fungi
Tequila Mockingbird.
It's because they are  ually obligated to do so.
The little boy comes in to his mother, and says:  "Mum, why is my name Feather?"  "That is because son, when you were born, a feather fell on your head."  Her daughter then comes in, and asks:  "Mum, why is my name Leaf?"  "That is because when you were born, a leaf fell on your head."  Then her last child comes in, and says: "Hymacttmmdrerrr?" "Be quiet, Tumbledryer."
a crowbar!
it was erase-ist
He went from rags to riches
Bark
Because all the politicians are in hell. 
Eiffel.
"Drop it, nigga."
HD Porn
One.  He makes three Polacks do it at gunpoint.
Anyone can roast beef.
They have a hard time sharing what's inside with strangers.
What it could be loike?
ya'll watch this!
What's the difference between Pizza and a Jew? A pizza doesn't scream when it goes into the oven.  That joke got a kid suspended from my high school english class. 
Ransom notes.
To stomp out fires. Why do elephants have flat feet? To stomp out the burning ducks.
A Two Pack
Arrgh, it's driving me nuts!
If they don't, they'll be irregulars.
They clubbed together and bought a warehouse.
You say: Look mom, no hands!
mumblr
When you leave yogurt alone it grows a culture!
Because it's all relative.
A. Bola B. Bola C. Bola D. Bola E. Bola
Because E: Bola Strike.
You put it in your butt-jet.
He was too far out, man. 
Underlay! Underlay!
An Aww-topsy.
Premature inoculation.
To live in a motor home 
M'llenium
A small medium at large.
Because they're cunts. EDIT: punchline.
A sheopard.
They like rock.
Pay him for the pizza
Decap
Because they like to climax at the part when the hooker gives the money back. 
Microchips
Because they dont have to pay attention
They both have a GARBAGE box.
Monica Lewinsky's teeth.
Speed bumbs.
Linoleum Blown-apart.
Eater Route
So it's a shorter drive to Toronto!
Because every time they get a corner they open up a restaurant.
Urine charge now.
Abu Bikr
They don't have a Pitchfork.  (This is a music reference joke)
A Buffa-Loan!
M'drid
A roamin' catholic.
Got so excited she wet her plants. 
A large pizza can feed a family.
A cock that sticks to the roof of your mouth.
They don't want to wear the camel out.
She gets an abortion. 
Well?
'Cause they hate the French press
Because the drummer locked himself in the car with the keys.
96
A  paracetamole!
So that he could understand culture.
Christian Bale.
Whoa did you hear that?
He gives your underwear blue streaks.
They're both looking for a tight seal. 
Artificial Intelligence. 
You wipe your bloody dick off on her teddy bear.
I don’t ejaculate on an apple before I eat it. 
The holiest Prophet of Islam.
A little boy comes home with his mother from a trip down town. Above his head he has a big bunch of balloons. - Why do you need so many? - Asks his father. - Did not your mother and I teach you that you should save your money? - I did not spend any! It’s just that every time Mummy bought something the salesperson gave me a free balloon.
A blowjob
IDK
They are all things the Republican party likes to ride until their friends see them on them.
The cure
Because they hate Tibet.
Premier Inn.
They can both smell it but can't eat it.
It will be a huge 6s
Crimean river.
Boo bees
Metal
Put your hands in its pockets & tickle its balls. 
You would turn red too if you had to change in front of everybody.
Whatever their name is, you insensitive jerk.
Terrorists can't take a joke about Muhammad.
Because it's perfect, just the way God made it.
Laxatives.
She Peedherpants
Having a threesome with Dwayne Johnson 
One.
Stollen
I'll meet you at the Taint.
Because they're ugly and they smell bad.
Or does it merely raise the standard by which they are judged?
A play on words.
GAINSSS!!!
The cheerleader in my trunk.
You can skip the flat ones.
A Total TreeCull.   Basically, on the evening of December 25th, every christmas tree salesperson does the trees     
He didn't like the juice. 
I am the extruder...
Orange Jews
They both come when you are sleeping
Good night, sweet prints...
Don't know but its so scary that they drink for ten days straight right after!
I asked my girlfriend what she wanted tonight and she said she could use a wiener in cider.  
Micro-Worgenisms! (From my Bizzard support ticket response today.)
Because when it's white, they leave it the fuck alone
There's more flavor the closer you get to the butt.
It's two tired.
Nobody knows,  history is still waiting....
She gives birth to a son.
Because he wanted a tight seal.
You can punch information into a computer.
Infinity plus 1. I'm sorry.
Just one... But it takes 4 episodes and Krillin dies...
They tend to humpback.
They wanted to see what a winning team looked like.
One life
None. Once they shut up, no-one has any reason left to oppress them :)
Yakmanninov
Having sex with a different woman every year. 
A friend told me this joke in high school. I admit I laughed harder than I should have.  How many girls does it take to screw in a light bulb? None, they just sit in the dark and bitch.
French War Victories.
One testtickle
To find a tight seal.
He said, "Look how far I can kick this bucket."
Concentration camp. 
A biguette
They love to gambol.
Cracka-lackin
Because you might get chirpies, which is a canararial disease, but don't worry, it's tweetable. 
A bunch of sissies.
Tulips around your organ! Ba dum bum chhhhhhh.
He ate something that disagreed with him
A Southern Zoo has a description of the animal on the cage along with a recipe.
I don't need a bottle of lube to get into a nightclub.
They're both too fucking close to water.
Tip him for the pizza. 
Because everyone who can run, jump or swim is in the US.
M'laysia
They Havana no money to spend.
Cause they're the best!
Because the Chinese don't like Tibet...
Clogs.
Public transportation.
The cold shoulder
Christians pay for their sins
The beesnese
Because two wongs don't make a white.
M8
...because he's too short to be called an essay. 
If you got hit in the Peter with a pan, you'd fly too.
Steer Clear.
Vietman.
Fo' drizzle.
Their whole lives they have been told 5 inches is 8 
All of them are adopted
Imsosaurus!
An ambulance.
The ice might crack up! I use this at the beginning of conversations... it's a reall ice breaker.
The Holy See 
Acne only attacks little boys when they reach puberty
To a remote island...
C Minor 
Because other cars have Mordor.
Because it cuts itself.
Vladimir Poopin
Sir Loin
I keep hearing on the radio about cheddar vans not being allowed overseas
A trajeudi.
Ida Ho
Because he couldn't tuna piano!       
Santa knows to stop after three Ho's.
They cents it. 
You tep on the brake, toopid.
Over-easy E
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
Because the supermarket closes at 7:30
You'll get repossessed! 
I know several people who are having "superb owl"  parties next month 
"Tell her you're a paratrooper. Chicks dig that kind of thing."
Princess Aurorasaurus
Princess Arielephant
Cinderellephant
He has a peda-smile.
Drop it, nigga! What do you say when you see your refrigerator floating in the night? Nothing. That's a big-ass nigga.
Head & Smolders
A massage-onist.
The number 86. (No seriously. Google "86".)
My Dad: We used to keep useless information to ourselves.
Free Ham
Da rude "eh" sandstorm
A meowntain
Son: I'm cleaning it as fast as I like to!
He couldn't handle his lacquer
The pinker the better and they're both an acquired taste.
His pants fit like a glove. I'm so sorry. So sorry.
No, but a tiger wood.
Wasabi? 
To piss off drivers
You give her a test-tickle.
1forest1
Crumfortably Numb!
Natasha Ramenoff
the white power ranger 
You talk to him!
Sir Cumference. He acquired his size from too much pi.
An elephant wearing a leather jacket!
In a snow bank!
TimBuuurrrrrrrton
He already told you so.
because it provides cavity protection
Uncle Bens!
NA'CHO CHEESE
The motorist. He really shouldn't be driving in the kitchen. (Edit: formatting)
As soon as the people carrying soup cans in the backpacks arrive we can eat.
To turn the light on.
Bae-thoven. I'll
Borders
Cryptic code. 
Check to make sure your dick is bigger than hers.
You probably won't get it.
M'genta 
Never fired, dropped once.
The odds are ever in their favours.
Cause damn, you're precious.
Everyone is just dying to get in them
A Saab-woofer :)
He lifts your spirits.
God doesn't go around thinking he's Bono.
None, he tripped. ;)
Because only men can be seXY.
Outgoing mail.
Because she's all about that bass
The counter. 
ma
Head over heels. 
Well, it's got everyone out and about, celebrating another revolution..... (I'll show myself out)
Church.
Cancer.
A luna-tick.
Curt and Rod
He didn't know the final solution.
A Navel Destroyer. 
To get a clean getaway
You skip the flat ones.
Stop beating a dead horse!
Took a while to set in but it sure gave me a jiggle
Kimistry
He went to jail because he commit a murder.
Because one was two three four five.
I don't know, his voice was muffled.
"Theeeeeeeeey Never expect the Spanish Inquisition!"
Because I eat a lot of pussy
Your in 8.
Hand Solo
No one could perform the execution well enough.
WASABI!!!
I hardly even know her.
He was given a constellation prize.
Cuz Pikachu might Pik a Chu
Public Transport
I can't jelly my dick down your throat
What are you Tolkien about...
That's a pretty big donkey dick.
At random.
Nigger Mortis 
Christian bail. 
Grow away.
The Lake Champlain Champagne Campaign
Watching his wife and children die before his eyes.
Apparently it had HIV..........................................Biologists think it may have been rear-ended by a ferry.
He turned on the UV light in the Holodeck.
A watermeloin.. Don't worry, I remember where the door is. 
If you don't know the answer please never invite me to dinner.
The man, he shouldn't be driving in the kitchen.
Because Windows 7 8 9.
A baegull.
(ass been)
Because it saw Salad dressing. 
He lay awake at night wondering if there really was a dog...
...
Mines is still 1920x1080, unfortunately.
Alpaca bowl!!!
One is black and hairy and the other is a coconut
"I've cod a cold."
The epileptic corn husker shucks between fits.
Because then he will always be in prime. 
Her hubby had a reptile dysfunction.
To throw the Roadrunner off.
Happy new ears Eve!
Vin Diesel! : D  Source: 
Deaf Lee's "HELLO!"
Mike. 
Eating a watch. . . . . Note: This is not my joke, credit goes to  , and   for setting him up.
Don't worry, they'll fucking tell you. 
Igloo
A human being
Paint it black.
A flat miner 
Ayyyds
When the ham is cured!
They send a rubix cube up to see if it gets solved.
A bird can fly but a fly can't bird!
They sent them to concentration camps.
A cat scratcher.
it crashed.
Because they can't spell toboggan. 
Dinosaurs aren't old enough to smoke. Told to me by my niece at christmas.
the back of my hand
There was a face off in the corner.
Because it wasn't their Destiny.
They both plat no more.
A trayvon martini.  Yeah I thought that joke might GARNER some negative attention. It was a 1/5 joke. 3/5 with RICE. 
A repost.
Gummy Bear
Boobs below waist.
Because they're great at getting you off.
Marriage
The hot dogs taste like shit
But the light bulb has to want to change. 
He hates camping
Get on top and call her by the wrong name and try and hold on for 8 seconds.
Because everytime they try to pronounce "election" everyone starts to giggle
Because two Wongs don't make a white.
Tom Cruise
The shoe has a sole
His dick was stuck in the chicken.
A cock is an animal. Penis is a male sexual organ.
Beef stroganoff!
De-calf-inated
Because you will get Jurasskicked.
He "came" a lot.
Because Day tripped him.
You'd fly too if somebody panned your peter.
..because their lipstick
"Can I have some 'change'?"
He'd be Bach
None. They aren't about to change a bulb when flipping a switch has worked for 15 years.
Made her chain too long.
You spreddit.
Spit, Swallow and Gargle. 
Cuz I had sloppy joe's for dinner last night.
He's really got away with kids.
The police ended up searching every crooked nanny
The Baa-zar.
A Magpie. 
Because if they had one more, they would be 240.
People are dying to get in there...
Popcorn, of course!
Deep pockets.
It had locomotive.  (I'm not sorry)
I can't stand being in this
"Honey, I'm home!"
In one you don't want to jerk the hook, but in the other you don't want to hook the jerk.
"Tengo toasty toes, toast y toes, y Tostitos." My friend just posted this to Facebook :)
"This thread is shit."
It's all right!
In prison, you have a chance at getting a reach around
The look on their face when you're nailing them.
They both like seeing the same thing a year later.
"Don't go bacon my heart"
Barack Obama's Tie
Dam.
A woman
It'll leave you in stitches!
You come here often?
A potato.
Air traffic control didn't.
Ben and Jerry
Deutscher Humor!
It raises their shellfish steam.
Because it's the first date.
I could've gone my whole life without seeing that shit.
 One you sit on and the other is a park bench.
poke her face
He was a member of the Mothia. Edit: Thanks guys, I made this up when I was about 8 and learned what the Mofia was... I have been trying to find an outlet for it ever since! 
I don't know son, ask your grandfather...
"Do you ladies wanna go back to my place and conduct a double slit experiment?"
Wife: I too fat to be a personal trainer? Me: No honey you just need to lose weight.
He was expecting showers.
You can't make matter.
Because they have little patients.
The drummer dribbles out of both corners of his mouth
because it's deep!
Cos' they keep Dublin and Dublin and Dublin...
Putout
Because when you see it, you spin one degree and walk away.
Uranus!  Thank you, I'm new here :)
At the crust station.
Just the tip...
A R.I.P off.
Because David Schwimmer and Lisa Kudrow.
Antihissssstamines!
Leave.
Idk EDIT: Read the letters out loud :)
You name it, he was Inuit!
A womansion
I hate the fucking Eagles, man!
It's rated AHRRRRRRRRR!
Decalfinated.
A mother asks little Johnny "do you know who Newton is?"  Little Johnny replies "no"  She says "if you paid attention in school, you would know who he is"  Little Johnny says "do you know who Candy is?"  Mom says "no"  Little Johnny says "if you paid attention to dad, you'd know who she is"
I'm a fungi!
Because it's two tired.
BYE-SON!
The first one. 
Tweets of course! ....and then your family.
He couldn't pay the priest afterwards and got repossessed.
When you get off the plane, walk into the propellers!! its that easy...
Because he got hit by a car
It closed after a month... they couldn't find any good wrappers.
Apatite.
HEIL!
He made them Batman.
Just one, Phillip Hughes
Like a glove
Stand back, I don't know how big this thing gets!
Wipe your bloody dick off with her teddy bear.
A change of pace.
"Looks like you've got me in a pinch."
One's a bunch of cunning runts.....
By putting flowers on the grave
Germans seem to give them bad gas...
NOICE!!!!
Here I am!
Because there is 90 of them...
In  Yeah you'd probably only get this if you read ASOIF but the joke came to me randomly.
Because the 'P' is silent
Mark Spitz and Greg Swallows Yeah, I know it's old....
Claus-trophobic.
Atomic bombs are realllllly bright. 
With a Ruff IRA. 
Jesus in a submarine.
... They both use the force
It said 'concentrate' on it
See you next period!
Get out of my Son
Anyways, that's how I lost my job as a gynaecologist...
The Upper Sunny-Side 
Fuck nose.
Because if they fell forwards, they'd still be in the boat
They take an aspie
How many pessimists does it take to change a light bulb? None - it's probably screwed it too tight anyhow!
They're both cereal killers!
A small medium at large
Hard Rock.
Holding their hands up
...an eggnogstic
His Cavs can't handle the Heat 
Vegetable soup. I apologise to those offended by my terrible joke. Have another; Whats the hardest part of cooking a vegetable? Getting the wheelchair into the oven
Because it is sticky.
She would be   fucked!
A riveting tale.
You're an eight.
Because they knead the dough. (Kneading hand motions required during recital.)
A husband in his hybrid
A cow with no lips.
Cold turkey
Mine was dead within 30 minutes  (credit goes to my Grandma)
Drool
Roquefort.
A pimple doesn't come on a boys face until he's 13.  This joke is all in good fun, sorry if anyone happens to be offended!
Steamed vegetables.
It's Christmas, Eve!
They can smell it, but they can't eat it! (Joke from sikipedia)
To show he wasn't a chicken.
Three blind mice.
There is noel
Because XD
You've gotta be kitten me. You can SPEAK?!?
elephino.  (Hell if I know)
A jealou'sea'
A frostitute
In case he got a hole in one.
The most animalistic way to ride a pussy
Santa goes down the chimney.
You take the "S" out of safe and the "F" out of way. One of my all time faves. If you say it out loud it will make sense :D
Nobody can.
A not see.
By son. 
He was unbereaveable.
Because Indiana sucks and Iowa blows.
Because of all of the coffin.
A big wave
The power of crust compels you.
They both taste like my dad's approval.
Sleigher
Beef Strokenoff 
If your gonna turn on a light... Why shade it.
Give him his gas bill.
Because he knows where all the naughty girls live. You've probably heard this one before. But it's Christmas tomorrow so what the hell. 
Because he only comes once a year
420
The cowboys suck. 
Neither! They're both research scientists gathering data on Google's driverless car. You racist
Hoppy holidays, and have a hoppin New Hare! Happy holidays everyone.
The Elf and Saftey Executive. 
He stayed up all night wondering if there was a dog.
An Airrab.
Yes he is.
Canoes tip
Stark lighting.
Do You Hear what I Hear?
Punchline
Because all the girls know he just wants to smash
A pilot.
Last Christmas I gave you my fart
Analysis.
Dam... I got to get in shape!
Because Adam came before Eve!
Because it was a play on words.
I'm so old that I was around when the Dead Sea was just sick. (Told to me by my grandfather)
At Christmas, there's a nip in the air.
U2
motorcycles don't have trunks
Popeye's penis
"Way to go dude, you're kiln it!"
Because it keeps hitting pause. 
Because we're a match!
Because it's paneless.
Oh, you know. About 5 pounds. I'll show myself the door now.
Lonely.
What a waist... 
Christmas Adam
He says, "Gourmet I be excused?"
Santa goes down the chimney.
That's a moray.
Because they switched to Comcast.
Because the car had a sun "woof"!  Yes, I made this up myself. Yes, I have no friends. 
Yeah mom!
I tend to go with "Happy wife, extended life."
You can sleep with a light on
"If were all here, who's looking after Madeline?"
When this gets 500 upvotes, I'll tell you the answer.
A pirate ship thailing clothe to an itheberg
Because they don't know the words.
Penicillin
Yes. Matthew 14:92: "And Mary rode Joseph's ass all the way to Egypt " 
Im Stoned :p
Lick his Comatoes 
Naw, they're just exspearminting. 
Sparky
They can both live off a dead bear for years.
Five. One to change the lightbulb and four road guards.
Because he didn't have to Monet to pay the Guy to make the Van Gogh.
Tell her to put a cock in it
Zero. Let that bitch cook in the dark
Cook them in the microwave
"I don't have the energy for this."
Sleigher.
Kim Jong Un what you thought it was Slim Jong Un? Sorry but you are not allowed to make puns on your supreme leader's name in North Korea
Nothing because OP never delivers. 
Phelps can finish a race.
Root Beer
Lo mein.
A blowjob 
Ton
You freeze it, put it on a bandsaw and cut it; "Meoooow".
Because he was the Solaire!
Birthday suit
No whey.
Lack-toes intolerant
She was told to do an essay in school. 
Baby reindeer
They both have a Tutankhamun.
Santa goes down the chimney.﻿
4 in the seats and 47 in the ashtray.
Because they can't even!
trout
No one fucking reads them.
It started out as a smear campaign, but ended up being a real shitshow.
They should be eating oranges because they have vitamin C. haha
It rectum.
New Jersey got to pick first
Because the P is silent.
Shut the door im dressing
A subordinate clause
Pissdov
At bingo
Let's hang.
(>_<)  Hnng.  Aaaaaaaah. Like that. I'll show myself the door.        
Friend 1: You know people called Richard get called Dick. How do you get Dick from Richard? Friend 2: Depends how you ask him
Flu-catcher bread
Ever tried dipping a sailor in a boiled egg?
Poke them in the eye
Incum
Because inertia is a property of matter. 
Because they'll never meat in the middle.
Fo drizzle
Because he was in deNile
When you're in cider
Why di'n'ja 'vite us?
3/5ths
Because like, it sucks waiting around for underwear.
They have Barkinson's
He was shellfish.
Mu
Alone
Getting a N64 now
Denim denim denim. 
The wheelchair
I'm here all night
When you are the villain
Sunday, Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, Friday, Saturday. 
A Russian spy.
Because of their 'cush'ions!
They both like bears.
He was fucking crackers.
Getting a 2 inch dick out of 3 inches of clothing. Stay warm out there!
themommeter
Shrimp. 
He heard he might be playing a big roll
If you slick her hair back just right, she looks nine!
Because the tomato sauce couldn't Ketchup.
Because two Wongs don't make a White! The credit to this joke goes to andino on sikipedia (cos if i dont credit it you lot will come after me with your pitchforks again!)
Get him off. 
Time dilution.
They only have one Tinkie-Winkie
Am I feeling nuts?
Why was the professional so impressed with the farmer? Because he was outstanding in his field!
Fine specimens.
Because he had a bone to pick.
Slanta Claus.
It's keeps all the texans in one fucking place!
Hella.
Dupli-cats
Because it's a mini soda. 
pussy.
A clamboni driver!
Gladiator Get it? Glad He Ate Her..
Respectacles
BringemYoung University
An engi-near! 
Every once in a while a Canoe would tip.
Because they're all in   relationships!
Attire. My brother told this to me and it gave me a chuckle.
Mom:if you are a good boy,you will get one when you're older. Son:What if i'm not a good boy? Mom:You'll get many.
He had a very flashy ending
Over-krauted. 
Velma
Hiding the erection.
Her husband on a date.
Formed a coustic d'état
One knows he's not always right.
Because they'd get in trouble.
A sunken chest with no booty
One fits before they shuck, the other shits before they fuck.
Braaaaaaiiiiiiin freeze
One is a crusty bus station, the other is a busty crustacean.
Turns out punching a mirror is painful for your hand.
A Buddha-pest.
A noose
You can't fuck the shit out of a calendar
I don't use sugar in my signature cookies. 
Sin/Cos
i understand....he says she's frigid.....
Dementos
John and Jenna had just finished making love and in a post coital moment John asked Jenna,"Sweety I am feeling a bit akward asking this but was I the first guy with whom, you know".  Jenna frowned and said," Yes you are my first! GeezI I hate it when you guys ask the same question"
Condoms are for fucking pussies, and for assholes.
You're under a vest lol
Sluts.
Because they're not fucking pussies
Chewing gum. What'd you think it was? 
currito
... it would create a fell Dell smell.
You can tuna piano but you can't piano a tuna What about the pot of glue reddit will ask. Hahahahaha I knew you'd get stuck there 
Talk about a double standard. 
Because he was Aminor
Because it's a Finnish hymn.
Toot uncommon
Artificial Intelligence
He got off on a technicality.
He was afraid she would come home stoned.
Once you've seen Juan, you've seen Jamal.  (Sorry if you're offended, I love all races.)
It depends on which way she wipes her ass.
One's a tragic Mick...
When they start to like spankings
She's got no legs.
When one of his fingers is clean.
...you have to drop the bomb twice in order for her to get it.
Because they'll take all of your green cards.
Revocation of your grant money and a stern rebuke from the ethics committee.
Jogging
You. Why I oughta...! Edit: Wow, thanks for all the love. My son is quite the character and he really caught me off guard with this!
The rest are all true.
Borate.
You remove the pizza delivery sign! Hahahahaaa..ha
He came in pferd
We're both lawyers.
Muuuuuuon
I find racist jokes to be the funniest! Share your best racist jokes here, but please stay respectful ;)
It was terrible
One dollar
Kabamouflage
He commited sewercide
It's taking the piss out of your knickers!
Use your fists.
Because they never dig up daddies.
Edam
Edam! (Kill me)
So they can both watch the hockey game
Because it's so easy to make a ginger snap. 
Dr. Dreidel with Justin Timberlatke. (There's gotta be more we can do with this.)
Syphilis Snape
A bloody big cricket.
After extensive marketing research the Colonel concluded that the franchise would benefit from better traffic patterns on the other side of the intersection.  (from my grandmother's Reader's Digest circa 1988)
A paranoid. (Wooo maths jokes)
Because you take my breath away. 
Why do polish people all have ski at the end of their name? Because they can't spell toboggan.
Traitor Joe's.
Snoop Dinner
He only comes if you sleep, not if Ukip.
I don't know why they're still speculating. After all, it's pretty clear that   was nailing him.
Everyone was yelling "Hands up, Don't Shoot" but J.R. Smith and Carmelo Anthony just wouldn't listen.
Santa Clause rolling down a hill
Nice belt.
They both have a camel toe.
Spaghetti-No's I'm sorry.
He felt his presents.
Because he hasn't Read October. 
A dead centipede. 
Because they're delicious!
A Zero.
Roll up her sleeve.
They have no rights.
Skip to the next track
A Jehoover's Witness
Tell her drinks are on the house.
Her teacher told her to go home and do an essay.
VietNOMNOMNOM
Depends on the wifi at Starbucks.
Stylus. 
THEIR HOUSE GOT REPOSSESSED! 
'Cause you look gouda to me.
If it had four doors it would be a chicken sedan !
Because he'd look pretty silly with four inches.
Get another one to yell BINGO
A. The Ultra Sound guy.  Q. Who is the second coolest?  A. The Hip replacement dude. 
Going to Thailand with your own children
He never changes his position.
You stumped me!
A drizzly bear, of course
What's the matador?
A cock a dude'll do!
Depresso.
Nothing. He just keeps the tips.
To get to the udder side
Because it was alive when you started.
Pop-Tardis
One goes down the chimney, the other goes up.
There are twenty of them.  (Yes I'm aware that there shouldn't be a hyphen if you're referring two twenty children who are four years old but that a misleading opener is what makes this joke funny.)
Mourning wood.
Because their weapons were made in China
They call it the tic-tac tactic.
Because Asians love to take a photo of their food before eating.
Need for speed.
Best Duck Ever. 
Whole Foods
That shits like liquid Coke!
In square feet.
Exodus  
They eat out.
SUM YUNG HO
A cognac
Symphony in A Minor
Family research.
Jeffrey. Knock knock, Who's there? NOT JEFFREY
Fleas Navidad
Put it under the soap.
A slut sleeps with everyone and a bitch sleeps with everyone but you.
Sir Cumfrence
drizzle.
She's outstanding in her field.
The Boston Marathon Bombing ended a race.
Because they don't have seals on the south pole Takes a while to get, but it's worth it in the end.
Eight a'cock
A whispering eye patch.
There were mazel tov cocktails everywhere!
Citrus down.
A. The GofuckyoursElf.
Acceptable
Telling your parents you're gay
One shoots but can't hit, the other hoots but can't sh...
Aye Matey!
Because poor kids have behavioural problems! *rimshot*
Because part tickles.
He AJAXulated.
Clausetrophobic. I'm here all week.
Because he's a bad wrapper
Breathe Again- Toni Braxton
why do chickens cluck? …….. cause you can't say fuck with out a bottom lip.
My last bowel movement. Seriously folks, for a healthy stool, drink plenty of water, eat vegetables and use a squatting position.
I'm not doing that again for two bucks.
Because she tried on your wife's pants and they fit.
Because he liked playin around all those miners.
Third grade.
Mistletoe.
Pro   work
A 10 inch long cock.
Because all their friends are dead.
The refrigerator doesn't fart when you take the meat out.
Peekaboo.
Mycoxafloppin
So he can hoe-hoe-hoe! 
Twenty-Juan
The horse knows when I'm grooming him.
He had an Inconvenient Tooth.  
Hitler changed that
[Content Removed] 
He knows where all the naughty girls live. Why am I so jolly? I stole his list.
A private investigator. 
Because they were stuck up bitches. 
Depends!
The Stones say "hey you get off of my cloud!" The Shepard says "hey Mc Cloud get of of my ewe!"
Infucktious Diseases
Christian Bale
They both know when you are sleeping.
A waggin'
"My mom is gonna kill me!" What did the fetus say when the teen found out she was pregnant? " My mom is gonna kill me!"
"Ummm ... forget about the changing the lightbulb, honey, maybe let's start with changing those curtains"
Apparently some prick cut her off.
"We don't care how you bring 'em, just Brigham Young."
Ruthless.
Yeah, after his plane went down they found his Head and Shoulders washed up on a beach.
The boy scout in my trunk.
Stick your finger in and try to walk away.
Asbestos they can.
Numbers not divisible by 2.
much wow such doge much grammar such hamburger so good
2, one to hold the light bulb the other to drink until the room spins 
You take it to the Moo-seum. I know this joke is terrible, but I totally came up with it on my own, but I'm sure it exists already.   
She gives great hem jobs.
2 years of marriage.
Myxomatosis doesn't need Viagra to fuck bunnies. 
Gee, I'm a tree.
Because it was pissed off.
He only needed them after he'd opened it.
Because it was making a Great Leap Forward.
Snowballs.
You can only get 4 fingers in a Kit Kat.
A roamin catholic
He said hi...
He looks at your shoes while he's talking to you instead of his own.
Black boo-tea
Little Caesers
I'm so sick and tired of Panda Express. 
Because it's mage tipping berry ready for us. Obligatory edit: very easy for us
Because he was grounded! (I'll see myself out)
The Bible
Pencilvania. 
Imagine all the shit you would see...
Because if they didn't drop the base it would be a neutral reaction and they wouldn't feel the psychedelic effects.
Uke hunt!
Because, corn has ears!
The Big Cigarette
A Ginger Bread-House
Because She had no arms...... Knock Knock Who's There?? Not Sally........
They both steal cookies ;) 
A pool table.
A crisp Pringle
Because niggas can't swim
He wasn't worried about all that alarmism.
Crimea River
Because, it's acidic juice.
the back of the oven!!!!
Some baked beans
It runs in your jeans. ba dum tss.
No! Endangered species are protected by the law. -Chris Rock
A Dicktater
he is OK now.
He was caught fingering A-minor. 
Because the label said, "Contents Under Pressure" Got this joke from my brother :D
Dill Doe :D
Rasta-four-eyes!
They're both Marine layers
.
uuuuuUuuuUUUUuuuuuuuUuUUUuuuuuuuuuU
Shake it off
Because he didn't believe in integration. 
COPD
Because they're always dropping the Bass.
They'll fucking tell you!
A Mistlehoe.
Because you're one basic BiTcH
It drives me nuts.
None.  He fell down some stairs.
two weeks later out popped a pickle
A woman that won't do what she's told.
Except slavery
Wrong
The issues raised aren't exactly black or white.
Mine hair!! 
They're all a bunch of drama-dairies.
beats me
They're on the side of your buccin head.
Because it's when you're closest to her heart. 
fuck you
.....................................Timing.
He was Snowden. 
By frying kikes.
Tukaluk
They only had two vans 
(whisper) HHAAAAAAAARRRRRRRRRRRRRYYYYYYYYY
Pappu:- Should i punished for the work which I have not done?? Teacher: - No of course not, but why do you ask? Pappu: - Because, I have not done my home work…. :) :)
10, one to change the lightbulb; the other nine to act in a manner stereo-typically associated with said ethnicity.
one, but it takes 32 lightbulbs. 
Aburrido.
Cross-country
Your nose
A doppler-gänger
A working stiff
Bob: What are nuts on a wall? Dan: walnuts? Bob: What are nuts on a chest? Dan: Chestnuts? Bob: What are nuts on your chin? Dan: Chinnuts? Bob: No, dick in your mouth!
Antibiotics!
Because no one ever makes sandwiches.
Nah, It's too corny.
NASCAR
Tequila mockingbird Or Ernest Hemingway
One of those greasy bums is making a lot more money. 
Cross-Country
That means 75% are not getting the help they need
I need space. 
Everyone I ask says they dont know
Shorts!
50 bucks
If it where anyone else it woulda been called a teethbrush
She had a bowel movement during her vowel movement.
They exorcise.
Because it's either Sunni or Shiite
A Jiraffa.
A full set of teeth
You're nothing but a joke.
None, they just stand around  complimenting it, and get mad when it won't screw.
You pay the hooker and she does what you want. And you pay your wife and she does what she wants.
You straight jack it.
Missle Toe.
A: Cause they're sick of all his royal flushes.
They are the path of leaf resistance. 
It was completely runed.
Cos.
Because fuck you that's why
Pyroglyphs.
I dont know. I was too busy masturbating!
He felt he had no porpoise in life
To a retail store.
Necrophiliacs
Superman committed suicide. 
Inbred
Up his sleevies!
Discuss
A whore sleeps with everybody at the party, and a bitch sleeps with everybody at the party except you.
They can't drive cars.
A labracadabrador
Canadian Club on the Rocks
It doesn't matter, mine itches so bad it's on fire, providing plenty of light for everyone in the room!
There isn't.
Because they're ugly and they stink.
 is funny and   is a joke!
The Commodore Amiga.
With smoke signals
You can't marmalade your cock up your girlfriends ass.
Ebola.
Because it was PG
Both of the doctor's hands on your shoulders.
You just stand there and take 8 shots
One is a hollow cylinder and the other a silly Hollander. Source (Cause I can't claim fame for Victorian era jokes): 
Because Auto-Bots pull out!
You know they are going to keep coming back, and despite the fact they are weaker each time, you still don't look forward to them.
Michael brown's death
They are fun to ride until your friends find out.
For example, my father is a physicist and is constantly telling jokes that only people with a lot of experience in his field could actually understand.
A Pedro leak.
Because the trees break wind.
Lieutenant
Usain Bolt
Oh, no? Nevermind then. 
Scotsman South African  Canadian Englishman Israeli Preferably about them walking into a bar, Im meeting my clients next week and im Canadian, we decided to plan to meet into a bar. So i think it would be funny to crack a joke right?
He was only a few cents off.
Patty O'Furniture.
It gets blown to 
Because they cantaloupe..
Well Gandhi  as well know was a very important person who in recent times has taken on a mystic quality to some. He often fasted for long periods of time making him rather weak and fragile, he went barefoot for long periods of time and so it's fair to assume he built up lots and lots of callouses and he was reported at one point to have very bad breath because of a gum disease. This all means he was a... Super Calloused Fragile Mystic Hexed By Halitosis 
"All I want for christmas is yeux"
You boil the hell out of it.
They call themselves Al-Dehydes.
A vegiterrier!
Because 7 raped 6 when he was 4.
Cuz 12, 13, 14
His package cums  too quickly
Spit, swallow, bite, and gargle.
Bubblegum
Not in the mainstream
Everywhere!
Muchas Grassy-ass. I'm sorry.
It's his tenth alt account.
Oh yeah, Phil Rudd. Too soon?
Prostitootie.
A Cosby Sweater
Not many of them know how to dance.
They're both at the bottom of the ocean and full of seamen
A jolly rancher!
Fodrizzle 
Nevermind, it's tearable! 
This is the only good one I know: "Why don't DJs play pool?  They always scratch."
He wanted to be the Changs he wanted to see in the world.
Ebenezer Scrooge-yagirl
He felt his life was heading for a downward spiral.
Being told by your dentist
Because he might come in Andy
He just nose. All credit to my BFF
Two test tickles 
1.Open the fridge  2.Put the elephant in  3.Close the fridge
The poor swiss washes his Mercedes by himself
Because they all had a tare
Hear hear...
...Cancer
What arrr ya buncha pirates or sumthin?
Because they can't spell toboggan (This joke brought to you by a 90 yr old polish man I take care of at a nursing home)
It's growing on them.
He sold his soul to Santa.
He was safety-pinned to the chicken.
Making a homemade meal.
Because fuck u and no one likes u, that's why.
Bob had a bath with bubbles.  Want to hear a dirty joke? Bubbles was a guy. 
Because Tom had previously drowned in the well and everyone said "Tom is sleeping with the fishes."
Matt
You get Insta-Gram
Why is everyone in the Soviet Union is always in a hurry? They're all Russian.
Ten-tickles
No Stairway.
I'll be black.
A: None. Each lightbulb contains the means of its own revolution.
a diseased beaver on your organ...
He solved for y! Thought this one up myself and thought it was post worthy
So that the bride wouldn't get cold feet.
A cucumber.
Namaste
Mace Hindu.
Become a cop first.
Games.
The khrushchev
He's still there.
Turns out it was a naan issue.
Wipe it off and say sorry.
,.........mmmnhhhhgcdddxxdtyyhhbvbbb
It wouldn't matter. Jon Snow knows nothing.
Must have been all degrassi was smoking. I'll let myself out.
I'm cerebro
Gang rape What do those 9 disagree about? The order
Even the name has 'lack' in it
Because he had two dads 
About halfway.
jalapeno business!
A Brazillian.
Because it is a zero G environment.
A jihahahad!
Don't worry he woke up
Today's your lucky day, because I've got two!
Neither did the children in my basement.
interracial couple losing virginity
Because he only comes once a year. 
It's someone who cuts hair in a library.
To Tally-hos!
Because he had no pocket money.
There's twenty of them
An Illumi-neti pot
(Zzzzip)
A hard on 
Nativities.
Neither of them are a clarinet!
Because women always think they're right.
Micoxafalin.
7
Everyone got swine flu
Fry pranes.
Having legs.....
Me doula oblongota   
A he brew.
Up his sleevies. 
A Star-Spangled Banner.
Canoes tip.
Probably.
put a scratch and sniff sticker at the bottom of a pool
pants up, dont poop. 
He opensh hish doorsh with them. 
Anything you want. He is 'armless
a noble gas!
Counter-Esp on ge
did you hear the one about santa went to the doctors doctor says to him what is the problem , Santa says i have a mince pie stuck up my bum the doctor say bend over let me have a look, santa say well doc what do you think DOctor replies your in luck i got some cream for that.
Pontius Pilates.
she wanted to wash up on shore...
Its ass.
Drop dead gore-geous!
White Christmas.
You trying to get a rise out of me! Came up with while I was making pizza. 
Macademia.
To the lo mein menu
Bad mother faker.  
Beats me
An amputee
In case he got a hole in one
Teacher: why did you laugh? Boy: I saw one strap of your bra. Teacher: get out of the class for 1 week. Two boys laughed, Teacher: why did you laugh: boys: I saw both straps. Teacher: get out for 1 month. She bent down to take chalk, jony started walking out. Teacher: jony, why you are going out? Jony: what I just saw I think my school days are over.
No shit Sherlock.
Niggas in Ferris.
Whats the difference between OP and a magical ram? One is a Fey Goat, while the other is a  .
They both like a tight seal.
Snow Balls
Call her and tell her all about it.
It takes 10 months to give it a good meal
Because they are  phobes.
You would too if you had crabs on your bottom and oysters in your bed.
RAWR
For the love of everything sacred on reddit please do not make me actually key the answer....okay, let's say it together, "Salad Shooter".
Because they're Not-Z's ( )
Comet books! Edit: What do planets like to read?**
Because the camels can't handle it
Read all the other threads. I need new content. The old stuff is getting, well old.  Here's my contribution.  Have you head of the new drinking game? The mike brown special: stand there and take 12 shots.  What's the difference between mike brown and a college kid? College kids can handle more shots before they fall down. 
So they can win one every now and again. (Thanks, John Cleese! This was too good not to share.)
With his Shtick.
All the hot dogs taste like shit. 
He found a lump on his testicle.
The Beatless
Because she wanted the D. (I dreamed this joke last night. Not bad for a dream joke.)
Disaster.
Because of Santa and his Raindeer.
Police Navidad.
A seasoned veteran. 
You'll never see me cumming.
The grammar police.
Sunny-D
Her hips. 
De-stalinization plants
On a Harley, the dick is on the top.
Because they have to be.
After they said no, he used the Force.  
Paper or plastic?
I'm fast.
One says, "Hey, you, get off of my cloud!" The other says, "Hey, MacLeod, get off of my ewe!
Smashed potatoes.
They have a semillon!
Because you're assured that the recipient will get it. (Don't you DARE explain the joke in the comments)
When a woman rejects feminism.
He had friends on the other side.
Because he only comes once a year.
The taste.
Because he was born in a barn.
It depends on ashtrays capacity. //badenglishsorry
Beer nuts are over a dollar; deer nuts are under a buck.
Well, he couldn't afford a dog.
When he eats his first brownie
Deep
Jews.
They only have one joystick to worry about.
Cokeasian.
They both kill your dog
What do you call a Nazi who is social and moves freely at a party? Josef Mengeling
They found her Head and Shoulders in the glove box.
Because they have already looted everything they would have bought anyway.
Apple Martini
Everyone takes him for granite.
A master batter
Cause he can't do stand-up.
A: Yes
A mute telling a deaf guy that a blind guy saw a paraplegic running behind a bald guy while grabbing his hair.
Denim Denim Denim
Tell him the Final Solution.
Me love you wrong time.
.
Because it's white, and it's on their land.
To get to the other side.
Ate something.
Go for the juggler
We all know they dont gather mass.
Because it's Homo.
Because he went ice-skating before it was cool ‎( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Pout while all the colored folk were bumpin and grinding with all the fine white bitches
Poverty.  :(
Put it in the freezer for three days.  Run it through a bandsaw.  Meoooooow.
Two feet of my cock in your ass.
My moms van, its been sitting on blocks all summer you racist bastard.
His amp.
9 polar bears (joke on a mug at work. lame, ik)
Yes, an alarm system.
Because they always try to mess with his nails.
He only ate quadraplegics. Credit to:   for the inspiration
[deleted]
You wake up 3 hours later drowsy and wondering why you feel like you just got stuffed with dark meat
Sir Cumference 
Suk Sum Toh
"Tea, Rex?"
They BURy it
A non-prophet organisation.
Because his bread was stollen!!!
A play on words.
It cried Oui Oui Oui all the way home.
I saved you a stool.
The New York Necks
"Well that's really tiny writing!"
They go straight for the juggler.
Because everything is 3/5ths the original price!
Because there's gonna be a bone for you to discover in Uranus
Sexy children.
understand bull
Ferguson, it was a steal.
The cheque I just sent to Save the Children. 
You can lick a plate dry
Because they can't even.
Me neither.
God doesn't walk around thinking he's Bono.
Turkey-two j.k. we don't celebrate thanksgiving here lol happy normal day to us
Ferguson!
They pulled letters out of a hat. C, eh N, eh D, eh
Last Supper
One makes you feel sick and the other one is free!
Mullet. Business in the front and outdated by today's standards in the rear
In the seedy part of town
NO
Yahweh or the highway.
Because the door was ajar!
"I Apollogize".
Surreal.
The iPhone Ayyyye-t
Because everyone hates chain mail.
A: an AYE-Phone. (Joke brought to you by a 5 year old)
Australian.  Yes I know lions aren't jungle animals, but as per common nomenclature etc etc yadda yadda raspberry :) 
I CAME FIRST! edit: CAME = CUM
Dress her up like an altar boy
Freedom.
How do you call the homosexuell mathematic department of ISIS?
Not cool.
They say he ate 7 alligators before they could drag him out of there.
Pick her up out of the wheelchair
Because there's a target on every corner
A hot rod. NOTE:  When I was about 5, I thought this was the funniest joke on earth.
Sea-Weed. I'll show myself the door.
A firm believer. 
He couldn't get off on the standard deviation
Arrrrbys
I don't know, ask your mom.
The Turkey. 
The Janitor
M-I-S-S-I-S-S-I-P-P-I
It's not like they are coming to yours.
Smoked Muenster.
CANTELOPE
They become alpha-beta-cle 
A Roamin Catholic.
Harrelson's woodie.
He couldn't use Lime Wire anymore.
When her moustache is on fire!
There's a little nip in the air.
All three of them. 
He had his soup before it was cool.
Because Bruce Lee is no joke.
Hor-crocs.
Truth or Darren Wilson.
Beer X-post from 
Turkey
Because they're in the kitchen melting.
Thought I would give it a shot. 
Nachomama
Unlimited twerky
Santa stops after three hoes.
Because they carefully and objectively reviewed the evidence from the trial and thought a legitimate injustice had been done.
Easel-y
Because usually they're stuck with reservations.
Because if you can't Helium or Curium, you Barium. (Heard it from Heimerdinger, League of Legends)
Cancer.
by m'tosis
An empty bus..
A passenger you racist fuck.
He didn't want to be called chicken 
Because they're all insecure assholes with small dicks, and adding "THE" in front of their second rate school's name adds some sort of meaning to their pitiful existences... ...at least that's what a Michigan alum told me the other day
Harry Daughter.
A. It is not a problem, since you will never find an elephant with one hand.
Turd Furgeson
Only one of them knows how to dodge a bullet.
Adolfin.
"Toby"
Some bloke named Winter. Managed to go 4 years without cumming.
It's a riot.
By the time they said "I'm not that kind of girl" they were.
A condom.
He wasnt about to take directions from some bitch
Dinkleberry!
Everywhere.
Wave hello
Now you have to say "Jamaal can you please paint the fence".
"You know what else they can't get? Good jobs." I received a write-up :(
An anorchy... ...I swear, that one KILLED at the urology convention
At first there's lots of blowing and sucking, then your house is gone. 
a weenner the pooh
It's Narnia business.
All of them.
Chubby wubby
P-irate 
He got a battery charge.
Because they make up everything 
None, they just beat the room for being black. 
Lumbar mill.
The people of Ferguson.
Go straight for the juggler.
They couldn't get with the pogrom.
Space Jam
When she pulls the tampon out and the cotton is already picked.
Officer Wilson can dodge a bullet
because he had two Drumsticks. 
You can unscrew a lightbulb.
Because the steaks are too high.
Why was Harry Potter kicked out of Hogwarts? He was caught playing with his broomstick.
What do you call a postmodernist ravioli? An intellectual impasta'.
You can eat a cricket ball
More than a Coppola times....Solozzo times I guess..don't be a Fredo gettin' addicted to it.... It's Kay    :)  
A Paralegal.
Because his girlfriend was in a Roofie induced coma.
A Pi-nurse.
Osama Bin Eating
Because I want to throw you aside and forget about you forever.
Adolfin.  Stolen from 
What's in your wallet?
Where's Spiderman's home page?  On the world wide web. 
Ethiopian.
By cramming.
French Toast.
No whey.
Because he lost all his Tudors.
Neither. The rooster did.
Because it was framed. 
Dicken's. Because everyone wants their Dicken's Cider.
....The food was great, but there was no atmosphere.
A nun with a javelin through her head
Here --> *
There portions are like..nothing.
All right,  all right,  all right..
Cover me, I'm going in.
Because it was a fowl.
Because he never really was on your side.
Porkour
Because they can weigh things by eye man. 
You get a blowjob from the fetus.
With erections.
Kids generally don't enjoy them
Plosive diarrhea
a necromancer
Because its between AC...
ten tickles
Free fap material
Depends
...I'm lovin' shit
The dinocologist
You can silence a gun. 
In Alabama you have sex with your sister. In Mississippi you have sex with your fat sister.... Thought of it this morning and felt like sharing. Cheers
Because they can't even.
The Salivation Army. 
To get to the other  .
Oatmeal.
The teachers aren't too worried about it. The students can stop anytime. 
None, they'll just shoot the room for being black. 
Because he Neverlands
Because she didn't see it coming.
It's called, "Women say the Dardest things." He denies rape charges for thirty minutes.
Your fence.
They both sang at the police.
You can only fit 3 fingers in a can of Copenhagen.
You know you shouldn't, but you're gonna lick it eventually.
you wont get it...
They wub one out
Because all of the Mexicans that can run,jump,and swim are in America!
Because he couldn't commit.
The Woof of Wall Street.
To avoid unnecessary beef.
Neither has he.
Because then it would be a foot
68 .  Because at 69 you flip over and eat it.
Don't worry about changing the lightbulb. I'll just sit here in the dark.
The birds refused to clean them because it was in-denture servitude.
A bloody waste of fucking time.
Who wants to know?
Because it doesn't lift
Mouthwash. funny story behind this I was on a trial for door to door sales, me and the guy who was going to be my manager went into some womans house with her friend too, took the friends address which was 69 and she cracks this out couldnt stop laughing.
The time between when I come, and you go.
It had a loco-motive.
"have you tried turning the light off and back on?"
It's ill-eagle
Tomato-saurus
Geurrilla warfare
They were just getting the first teams hitched up when things got out of control and 117 people were killed. They say its the deadliest occident on record.
Nah, I've never met herbivore.
The Neighbor of the Beast.
At   oh-my-goodness! ~Skip
He needed to see if how fast his grade dropped broke any laws of physics.
It was wrong on so many levels.
He was hit by a buss
"Me! That hurts!"
Freshly whipped masochist!
Batman can go out without robbin
Lidl people.
He stayed up all night wondering if there really was a dog.
That horse you're on needs to go to rehab, because he is FUCKING HIGH!
They scurry!
The short ones drowned in the floods
...misogynistic.
He eyes the b'ys.
Twist
Cause Jimmy had a frog stapled to his face.
Nothing until the jobs done.
A gynecologist, you racist bastard!
They torque.
Because they got sin and cos to give them a tan.
A Virgin
a brunette with bad breath...
Because he's dead.
Go for the Jugular (juggler)!
yanks and the expos
Goose bumps
Batman can go to a store without robbin'.
Cigarettes don't scream when they're burning.
Cause my heart stops everytime I see you
It's the one who has knee pads on.
It's just nice having an extra set of hands around. 
One wags it's tail, while the other tags a whale
.....That's all he had.
A blood diamond... (doh!)
They got a head
You're-a-pee'n
She returned because all he ever did was split her in the middle for log(n) time.
Doughnuts
Give head to their mom
Countdown This was a joke I heard on TV some time ago ... Thought it was worth a share.
The shit reeeeeeally hit the fan
W
By the ears
He didn't have the guts for it.
Keep the tip.... Note: I have a hard time believing I'm the first person to think of this but I did think of it on my own, even if it has already been done.
He had a lot of cache.
Both are massive, have oil and have been invaded by the west.
The sociopath.
Because they're shellfish.
A Lift (only a joke, my American friends)
He's a small medium at large!
Iran.
Eau de Toilette! (eww, the toilet)
Centrifugal force scales with mass
They haven't heard about it.
Black male
Sametime next month? I heard this jome a while back. Sorry if its a repost
Spain - 8 Ethiopia - didn't
A pedi-file
A hockey player will take a shower after three periods. 
Meh, it has its ups and downs 
A kid kat. (My 9 year old son made this up.)
The Crimea River
A prostitoot.
The spaghetto.
Cos' that ass is refreshing
It's called a strapadictomy
None. They're fine sucking each other's dicks in the dark. Preemptive edit: Not my joke.
the Sixth German Panzer Division
a giraffic jam!
Mom (about her son): Look at these marks Jim has scored... 8.. 10... 7..  Dad: Out of?  Mom: Out of pity!
Nothing.
Because we're beautiful and smell good!
Only some people get it.
Because she can't drive for sh*t.
You stakeasaurus.
Me in my red and black rape cape.
R niggers 2 gay 4 u? How many jews can you fit in a volswagnon?  2 in the front,2 in the bak, and none in the ashtray because the holocaust didn't happen,
Judo know if I have a knife, Judo know if I got a gun.
What are some good jokes you know? I would prefer ones that aren't too raunchy. 
Punkin pie
Because there couldn’t be 2-liters.
Because they were neckromancers
It's riveting.
His car was always breaking down, so OP never delivered. 
He came and went. 
That rig a Tonys.
Deer nuts: they're under a buck.
Because the pilot kept ending sentences with a preposition, over.
Oh no Michelle !
He shit the sheriff (but he did not shit the deputy).
Gangrape.
Because climbing Mount Everest is no small feat
It didn't Fett.
Because they can.  
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick.
Shut up. The movie is about to start.
Automating. 
Clawing at the inside of her coffin.
Why do we have to hang? Dick did the shooting!
Malteasers
Whirled Peas
the taste.
Right where you left him. 
Nein.
A forced joke can still be somewhat humerous.
A basic bitch.
A paragraph,  because he's too short to be an essay.
couldnt find 3 wise men and a virgin...
Neither did I.
Heil
A faux-cet.
pizzas dont scream when they get put in the oven.
Raise a family.
aw shit imma fall again
They wanted to beat the crowd. 
To prove they can focus on two things at once. 
Tikka Malala
A prostitute.  Because a prostitute can always wash her crack and resell it.
He couldn't even.
It's a moot point!
They both pull strings for work. (Inspired by Bo Burnham, this popped into my head the other day) 
Britney Spears
It's just got such a great atmosphere.
She doesn't have a dick! I'm so, so sorry.
Fuck i'm broke.
Never mind, you wouldn't get it anyways 
Everybody loves Putin!
They are calling themselves the Italian ISIS.
Just ask someone not to smoke it next to you. 
Literally nothing, because nobody fucking ever answers their phone to begin with.
Beats me
IN PLANE SIGHT!
What happened to the cat when it ate a ball of wool? It had mittens
I want to see what the community can come up with.
Framed
We would get paid every day, and all women would bleed to death.
Bisexual.
Ted can swim away from an accident.
A Man-in-a-tee.
Because everyone had equal rice. 
Ebola soup
I'm not sure if Kim Kardashian has actually managed to 'break the internet', but she's certainly put a big crack in it!
I hardly know her!
My balls!
Saint Christopher
He went out for the knight. OK I'll leave now
None. They can't get up that high! 
Because he always burns the franks
The same middle name.
Because it's pointless.
A trophy wife beater.
I'm a Comedian           
None
got you
The satisfactory.
The BP station.
A lambo-greenie!
I mean a bacteria.Thank you ladies and germs.
It made him shit himself.
"We're both doctors"
whore d'oeuvres
A man was telling his neighbor, 'I just bought a new hearing aid. It cost me four thousand dollars, but it's state of the art. It's perfect.'  'Really,' answered the neighbor. 'What kind is it?'  'Twelve thirty.' 
The dog has cerebral pawlsy.
Great big holes all over australia
I can't find the twine.
Unzip your genes.
Oh, it has its up and downs...
I'll never part with this!
Doesn't matter. They'll just nerf darkness next patch instead.
Many are cold, but few are frozen.
The lesbian because they get off lickety-split, the guys have to stop and pack their shit.  Disclaimer: heard this when I was like 10, I am now 28. I hope this isn't a repost. 
Jesus already saved her for later.
Captain's log
You can keep the tip.
The other half have BMW's.
It's testicle physics.
2820!!!!!!!!
You don't get laid after prunes  (Courtesy of my date last night after I asked her this question seriously)
Necrophiliacs
Gingerly.
A vagetarian.
a glycan
A tea rex.
A peel-estate business
because they take everything literally (p.s. you can steal this joke if you want)
When she fits in your wife's clothing.
Crimea river! (I just came up with this shitty joke when I heard some guy on the news pronounce it cry-me-a, I always pronounce it as Crimea like crib. Sorry, I'll let myself out now)
Because he could nazi anyone. 
You butterfly!
She saw some off-nom telemetry.
Because he saw his gas bill
None. Because feminists can't change anything. 
You can get your dog to come.
Giant fans.
My nose up your ass.
Ouch.
Because God couldn't find 3 wise men and a virgin.
One nightstand.
Christian Bale
Smiles... It has a mile between the two 'S's 
It put a ring on it.
Can I bayou a drink?
They just have a feel for that kind of thing.
No?    It takes place in Japan near the Toyota Headquarters.  He must save Toyota from poor builds, quality assurance and defective vehicles.   Arnold Schwarzenegger stars in...  'Toyota Recall'
He desperately needed Apu.
For identification.
One
Because no one wants to be the master beta tester.
"I literally chant even..."
This will hopefully be sfw but my have strong words.
Because they are screwing old women!
2 Chinz
Shooting the breeze. 
He'll tell you.
The pan... duh
Your place or mine
In large baskets balanced on top of their heads.
Kids say the darndest things.
Aye, Chi-Chi, Why?
Ya, so do I.
Pun intended.
Same time next month?
No one knows. No one ever watches the choir director.
They both call an 8-course meal a bite.
Whore-igami
He burned yews.
Was Rave'n
I'm fucking Hillary-ass (hilarious)
Let's get dirty.
Pennsylvania
I really like your logger rhythm! 
You break its spine.
he drank it before it was cool. 
He almost pulled it off.
He's a little off kilter. 
Vulvasoar
Because no matter what card you cross, and how many, you're bound to start a fire.
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless it's 20% off. Got this joke from   
Because he shits on it.
Mu.
You would be all right.
Because he heard it was the place to get toes.
An Addadicktome.
The general idea is that the end of each song is determined by a combination of the beginning of that song and the subsequent bars taken to reach the end. It's called 'al-gore-rhythm'. 
A Poorno.
Man have no chicken. All animals are die in famine. Man cross to look for potato. No potato.
Shaking Bad.
A stagnation
NEINNN!!
He was always out standing.
But I'm gayer and water resistant!
Wataaaaah!
Fall.
He started to lay them down when he realized it was fruit-tile.
Hair-vents.
Harry can survive the Chamber.
Bob.
One howls on the prairie; the other prowls on the hairy.
Shitty Christmas Jokes
Mooicide ...Okay, fine, I'll leave...
They keep blowing and blowing until they end up on a fence in Wyoming.
Purrgatory
A napkin.
It's a shame really. He was a damn good vet. 
Vladislov, baby don't hurt me, don't hurt me, no more... I'm sorry..
Northern fairy tails start with, "Once upon a time," and Southern fairy tales start with "Ya'll ain't gonna believe this shit."
Social net twerking
Spatula.
A little plaque.
Carlos
In a Christian calling Scientology crazy?
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
He died at such a Jung age.
He's a bird of pray.
Duck.
Because they're already used to being whipped.
It has huge balls on it. Credit goes to the 70 year old man who just came into my work and made my day.
Because TWO rhymes with POO
Neither—they prefer boysenberries.
Just one if it's Professor X.
New Jersey got to choose first
Little ceasars!!! (Scissors)
An irrelephant.
I clicked not now, because I thought it was some kind of virus.
A dilldoe.
Edible gold.
Turns out, he lost his sense of porpoise. 
"Meet Patty"
Polaroids.
Crystal balls deep made this up.
They'll get chapped lips!
to the dump, to the dump, to the dump dump dump.
A space bar.
Artifical Swedeners
A nub scout. 
I'd give a shit if I lost 6 million dollars.
200 people died.
Christian Bale
1. Is yo momma a bread saleslady? No, why you ask?  Cause this morning she was leanin' out the window yelling "Pumpanickel, Pumpanickel". 2. Do you have a brother named Humphrey? No, why you ask? Cause this mornin yo momma was leanin' out the window yelling "Hump freee, Hump free".
The holocaust
What's the hardest part of a vegetable to eat?
Give the bitch a shovel
She had no arms. Knock knock. Who's there? Not Sally.
Because they cantaloupe
He started with 2 million.
A right a right a right
Someone that didn't take it out in time.
Continental breakfast, served on tectonic plates.
They don't they have "bare" feet.
Edgar Allen's......bitches!!!
Fucked
Because their lips have so many chaps on them!
Elevenis
Beer nuts are a dollar twenty five, deer nuts are under a buck
A baby in two dumpsters.
The groundhog. 
He was a Wise© Potato Chip.
Her miscarriage.
A mootation 
don't ask me!
She came back with a red snapper.
Error 404 joke not found.
Yet again, I am very sorry.
I'll show meself out.
Because his dick was in the chicken! 
A pedrophile
They both get red rings when they're fucked.
with a blender. how do you get them out? with a straw.
A nice tight seal
Because everywhere he went, he was Ronin! HAHAHAHAHAHAHA! I'll see myself out...
The cops finally nailed him.
The good ones are hard to put down
You make me Sikh!
Omhmeo and Jouleiet
Herr Doctor.
It takes four years to get an election.
In the blood bank. And why did he like to deposit his savings there? Because everyone there helped increase his savings.
In the bloodstream.
They both take their sweet time before the second coming. 
At least with Parkinson's you have half a pint.
I dunno, you'll have to Ashkenazi
They're both wondering where their ninjas are at.
... he worked it out with a pencil.
It was race related
They can both smell it but they can't eat it.
Trycoxide is showing staggering results!
Oh honey, I'm not worried about a little thing like that!
Fincest. (This joke is shitty, I know, but I couldn't resist posting it.)
polar-oids
An innertube.
Nananananananananana BATMAN!
It hasn't come out yet.
"OH  NO  !"
They're both tight in the temples.
Or what I like to call breakfast in bed.
You can see right through them.
He felt his presents…
They hog the Schwing set.
Wait.
Digits...
They both gotta go fast.
An Epoch fail!
With Don-keys.
Weirdo!
Is it getting hot in here or is it just me?
'cause if they fell forward, they'd still be in the Fuckin' boat! I'll show myself out.
He was the first black man to admit he is the father.
You couldn't, your balls would be in your eyes. (thanks to my 11th grade math teacher for this joke, I've been telling it for 17 years)
Tailor Swift
The one who can bring his friends two cups of coffee and a dozen donuts. 
It only takes one, but we weren't able to get the work done in 1 term because we inherited a really bad situation from the prior administration.
If you get it from someone in a Chuck E. Cheese's it's never very good. 
It's hard to drive when you're patting yourself on the back all the time. 
Because the last one that stepped into a shower got bad gas. 
Hi starving!  I'm dad!
Because it had a bad conductor.
The state of alert in the White House rises to Defecate 2. 
Because their pinkie is out
It's where you say one thing and fuck your mother.
A cheeky bastard.
...hold on, it's coming. 
It was a Freudian slip
Two. Obviously.
Dip your anus in nutella. Hahahahaha :')   
Jewshi
Because it hides their teeth.
Who cares
It eats shoots and leaves. 
Don't you worry don't you worry child,  Seahaven's got a plan for you
So they can reach their head!
A tissue
He didn't have any body to go with him.
DATERADE
"Don't look. I'm dressing."
Their last names.
He was a baroque ass'  negro
"Ve have Vays of making you tock!"
Because I think I need more of U! Edit 1: Also sorry for the bad grammar in the title sadly I cannot change it...
Because they sing hymns, not hers.
You probably won't get it.
They already know everything.
Don't know, the pope hasn't said yet.  How many Lutherans does it take to screw in a light bulb? None, Lutherans don't change.
Ebola cereal!
"To the Batmobile!"
A Robin Williams.
A pilot you racist!
Because yoda best thing I've seen all day
Gold Scars. I'll see myself out.
Flatbush. 
GingINVITEus in!
Ebola cereal! 
It's pretty good, but it's pray2win.
About 8 inches.
Very pleasurable.
Dyslexia.
Because I put the D in raw
Sir Veza
Because when you're a carpenter in the desert you can't get wood.
I can't go deep in juice.
Neither exist.
Two Kwanzaas 
The Sirens of the Rams.
Mousechwitz
Because they always steal the green cards....
so black kids can make a mess too...
He had some outstanding warrants. 
Color coded: "Yellow in front, brown in the back"
Family practice 
Age
(read aloud) One is six months of hell with a team of your closest brothers, getting screamed at, and pushing your body to its absolute limits. The other is just fucking intense.
He farts.
A maize runner. Credit goes to my girlfriend.
I've got two round the house going cheep!  
Cannelonely!
Boobies
I need a clean, funny and long joke that lasts for around 2 minutes. Thanks reddit!
You can smell the weed from across the room.
A box.
Because he was a   
Cos(play)
A dead baby in two garbage bags.
A Hippie-crite.
When she fits into your wifes clothes
Sure, Bert!
She starts fitting in your wife's clothes...
HAAAANNNNNNNDDDDDDDDD EYYYYYYEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!!!!!!!!
A baked potato. 
Manipulatives.  god i'm so lonely
Dome Chrome.
A Pimp
A crustacean :D :D
Saturday
On the couch!
No?  I'm not surprised; it was a complete flop.  Nobody came. 
Throw him a basketball
A:I don't know,Alaska guy and tell you
Because it can't be taken on empty stomach
What do you call a donkey with three legs?? A wonkey!!
Cuz they're yammy!!!
My ass.
It can be a very Hubble-ing experience. These jokes may not be funny for you, but they are Fermi.
78.5
At womb temperature!
Because diamonds are a woman's best friend.
To protect the sanctity of the word "partner." [I thought this one up with my mom the other day.  Please help me refine it into something tell-able!]
bassturd
Cause he has a Halloweenie
I can't even
Terri-fried!
Because he has a hollow-weenie
Because he was pain in the neck!
I dunno, a Grover something.
A rip-off.
Because you can put it in someones drink 
Get dressed a doctor is taking us out to night.
They both live on Uranus
An issue of 
Because they're less bloody.
The domesticated doesnt have balls
Because warlocks have hollow weenies!
Because they have Halloweenies
In case he got a hole in one.
2 Grainz
The crayon is non-toxic!
SNOWBALLS!!!!
I was in middle school and can't remember it completely. 
splurge
Apparently he was pretty Exhausted....  <.<      .>.>      I'll show myself out -.-
It went fucking horribly.
I wouldn't pay $100 to have a kidney bean on my face.
A dictator.
1 bear.
Because they can't even. Huh huh?
It's all about the execution
Cause then there would be a hole in one!
Because he wanted his dishwasher to match the fridge and stove
he's a brave sucker....
Cause they have lots of secs with lots of min.
a sweater and a dildo...  if she doesnt like the sweater, she can go fuck herself
Jew Jitsu. 
THEY ARE NOT!
I dunno, but you should see that son of a bitch hang dry wall.
Scream and scratch at the top of his coffin.
You eat what you can, and you can, what you can't.
He was sick of the hormones! (whore-moans)
It was a Cessna 2 seater, crashed into a graveyard, the body count is up to 453 and they are still finding more. 
Send it a byte. Kind of lame but I couldn't help myself.
Because they dominate the gas industry
To get to the body shop.
What did they chicken say to his friends after being sent to the hospital after failing to cross the road ?.  Don't worry ill get over it.
No shit, Sherlock. 
you wont get it
You flipper!
The guards thought he was a drug mule.
One in the driver's seat, one in the passenger, three in the back, and the rest in the ash tray.
You'll probably get it this time, i promise! So I recently started spamming Nigerian e-mail adresses with the following; "Have 50 boxes of ZMapp experimental Ebola vaccine. Need to send to you. Please send deeds and all legal documents for your property to me so I know where to send them. All the best ZMapp Distribution Services" Jokes on you this time suckers!
You mean bitch mints?
Because pterodactyls are extinct.
Ebola cereal.  Note: Got it from my stepbrother who has his moments. 
Gsus
It takes a lot more than a hammer to make the IRS shut up.
It scares the hell out of the dog.
The meth head still has teeth.
FLY, YOU FOOLS!
To get to the other slide.  Edit: spelling.
Green paint.
Astronuts!
Ooh, "Stood" for is probably not the best word to use there.  On the bright side, no one in a wheelchair has ever walked out when I told that joke.
Ultamate frisbee badger!
Cuz no one wants to say they're giving a shit.
Jill tells her husband, "Jack, that young couple that just moved in next door seem such a loving twosome. Every morning, when he leaves the house, he kisses her goodbye, and every evening when he comes homes, he brings her a dozen roses.  Now, why can't you do that?"  "Gosh," Jack says, "why I hardly know the girl." 
Cos iv never heard of an airplane reverse into a mountain... ill help myself out...
Snow-balls.
He let God take the wheel Edit:   He let   take the wheel
A Juand
I like to slip one in every now and again.
BYE PLANE
Pier pressure
I'm glad you all came!
They had a firey start, then a major break up.  
D-flat
Not infected.
Because they're 
This is a joke I came up with. Q: How many religious people does it take to change a light bulb? A: There's no need to change it when you can easily convince everyone that it still works, but they've gone blind.
Because blonde guys aren't that smart either
Pacific Rim Job.
A repli-can't!
Both have curds in their whey. -Credit goes to my professor
care
Hazardous doodie pay!
She had a massive anus rhythm. 
Because Ken came in another box
He was snowed in
A meanderthal.
You're out of shape.
On Tinder.
E - Bola Soup
Sets education. 
A haunting license 
Numbers that can't be divided by two.
It's pump-ken time
Because he "pulled a few strings"!
All of those guys already have boyfriends.
A bundt cake!
Scone.
Because they're so...viet.
innit.
Because he had sithilis.
Lance Armstrong can finish a race!
A small medium at large
A snow blower 
Euthanasia.
Depends.
He contracted chirpes. And the worst thing? It was untweetable.
Bambooze
When they find the position, they don't have the momentum. When they have the momentum, they can't find the position.
You put it in a pot and boil the fuck out of it.
Two turds with one bone
A Yarrrrrrrrris. 
1forrest1
One is a crusty bus station, the other is a busty crustacean
Neither of them can be used as functional tables. 
Cracktose Intolerant 
A small medium at large
Kermit the Frog's fingers.
A small medium at large.
He didn't want to get hearing aids.
A small medium at large.
On the rocks
Mein Kampfy chair.
Because you only get out what you pudding.
Two.  Libya's to start the race, and France's to signal there's one lap to go.
A small medium at large. (One of my sister's favourites)
Nine months later.
"No whey."
The headline said "Small Medium at Large"
Slim to nun.
He heard that beauty was in the eyes of the bee holder.
well, too bad. I can't talk to you over the internet. Stupid.
Depends how hard you throw them.
Penot More
Because the have a lot of pigments.
When your balls are slapping her butthole you know you are in definitely. 
A Bloodhound.
There are twenty of them.
You tape bread to the ceiling.
The dentist pulls it out when it hurts.
Goodandtight
Because he's low key.
It's not like the flowers ever consented.
you don't call them she, and they're not male
Mom: No, you have to flush it like everyone else.
A pizza can feed a family.
Jose (hoes eh?)
Count Snatchula
Fillipe F'Lop
M80
He was to far outtttttttttt........ Ha weeeeeeed.
E Bol A Cereal
They say ebola perfect game.
They might Pikachu.
The dress code was causal.
A mosqueito. 
On less person is drunk
The Wurst.
Numbers not divisble by 2
Paddy Hor D'oeuvre
I don't have a Ferrari in my garage
The man on the moon? Santa Claus? Or an honest Lawyer? Yes you got it Santa. The other two are figments of the imagination.
Dont leave me hangin' bro
All of them
B-negative.
There isn't one...
High Steaks
Because he couldn't handle his roast
Because they're always footing the bill.
A good thing ruined by a period.
A microwave doesn't brown your meat. Courtesy of Chuck Palahnuik at his reading for 'Beautiful You' in Phoenix last night.
His old one wouldn't let him swab her poop deck.
Irene 
Lmao
Nip Tuck
15 lbs and a flannel shirt.  
Toys arrrrrr Us.
A pizza can actually feed a family of four.
A parabola.
Seppooku.
Old bae.
...
Beat-root
Because they both "practice" their professions.
A pie shart.
Fish and Ships. 
A Transformer! (Literally my favourite joke of all time.)
Stephen Hawking after a house fire.
No one has ever paid to have a green bean on their chest
it hasn't come out yet.
Because he went ice skating before it was cool. 
Bison
it lifts their spirits
Eucaliftus
You're a day late and a dolla short!
It was a wopping dose.
Mourning wood! :)
Mount Rushmore
Because it's baked in an oven...
34.5ing 
 Neil deGrasse cause he will grass on you!
I just got laid by a chick, its gonna take me a while to get hard.
Well, he gets out of jail next month. 
A flat major.
Y'know, with that whole "turn the other cheek" thing?
With a broom and dust pan.
A karaoke!
A TIMBERwolf
The rock is kyptonite and the man is superman.
There was a teenager hanging pumpkins on a rope off of the overpass as a prank. When a car would drive by, he would yank it up quickly, scaring the driver and causing accidents. Well, a semi truck came by when he wasn't paying attention and got a hold of the pumpkin. In turn, it tore his arm off. The cops were called, and they assessed the situation. They decided the truck driver should be charged with armed robbery.
Because they'll be sexy(6c) and a success(6s)
It is now just White
"You don't have the   to do it!"
For HOMO-cide. 
Take a step back.
A delivery.
Nothing. Neither can climb out of a bathtub. 
They ate their dinner before it was cool.
Cuz they always stick it to the man!
They both like Clinton-Dix
"I'm stumped."
Because it went straight pasta.
He was double-hung. 
As soon as I put money on them, they suck. 
You'll usually get more money for them if you sell them for parts 
Laura C-Chord.
I'm having naan of it.
A master debater.
They don't say please when I'm paying. They say, "That'll be $5". I should be able to say, "That'll be a sandwich."
A woman has no use  for a 3 1/2" inch floppy.
"rawmen"
Listening  .
Christian Bale.
Black and Yellow
A bannister always pays his deafs.
When you slap a mosquito it stops sucking.
The Papal bull.
He was stoned
A big Miss Steak.
Because 7 8 9
A joke about what kind of dough does an italian use to make seb bread, with really good delivery.
At least Ebola will finish me off
When the workers of the world united, they all got an equal part in her.
Rekt-javík
to get is quarterback.
(my girlfriend who's a high school teacher heard this from a student the other day)  Q: What do you call a cow with 3 legs? A: Lean Beef Q: What do you call a cow with no legs? A: Ground Beef Q: What do you call a cow with 2 legs? A: Your mom
This guy
A threesome.
With Avocado's Constant.
Too much Stalin'. Yeah it's bad but it made me giggle when I thought of it... :P
It's odd they couldn't see the issue with all those UTI's
I don't know go ask your mom. 
Serpants. 
What is it called when a turtle is mentally retarded?  Reptile disfunction. . 
The Bald Eagle..... I'm here all day folks
A medium medium on the median.
He swallowed all of the seamen.
They amputated the wrong one. Now they're both in a wheelchair.
A cup of Joe.
Is it just me, or is this room getting really hot??
He can't go to the bathroom at all. It's called Mission Impissable.
It's a baby only army.  The infant-ry.
A baked potato
With lots of hops!
They even run on thyme!
Because they're all pointless
Trick question.  There are no roads in Africa.
With a crowbar.
He got eballa
Bloody hell
The tragedy of Canada is that we could have had English culture, French cuisine, and American technology. Instead we have American culture, English cuisine, and French technology.
A small medium at large
Tentickles!
Red Red Wine!
One baby nailed to 7 trees:) 
Because she likes to eat out!
They don't like fastfood
I guess you would call it a high-class conversation.
Osama-Been-Loggin'
They're both pretending that they're enjoying it.
I heard it went viral.
Because his nuts were in his neck!
Cutting-edge technology
"That was very amoosing"
Because their pecker is on their face.. Thank you, good night!
You have to start from scratch.
Make it grain.
Only vegetables. 
A negromancer.
Bob's Burgers
I was at an event the other day and someone asked "So... anyone know any jokes?"  What's everyone's "go to" joke in social situations? 
Her given name was Lorena Cutyourcockoff.
We're on our sixth.
He looks at   shoes when he's talking to you.
He's a Sea-Monkee.
Pump Kin
Shoot one of them.
Because it didn't plan it.
"It's going to take me a while to get hard, I just got laid this morning."
The rest of her is cold too.
Well standard procedure is to jump 50 feet and spread over a wide area.
I'll start 'What business are you in?' 'I'm in the Necrophiliac business.' 'How is it?' 'Fucking dead.' 'What business are you in?' 'I'm in the Parkinson's business.' 'How is it?' 'Bit shaky at the moment.' A game we played as 13 year olds. Plenty more in the tank
A depressed onion cutting itself.
No? Well, if you do go there I don't suggest getting the bible sandwich. They really try to shove it down your throat.
You probably won't get it. 
Galapaghost Islands.
In pumpkin carving, one is trying to get all of the seeds out.
 
A new last name!
Because to get him you have to rig-a-tony..
What did the french chef say when the cheese factory exploded? Looks like we have debris all over the place
Because she was a quack.
There's 20 of them.
Beret White
The Ebola gay
Tits for Tats
Brown chicken, Brown cow!
... BECAUSE THEIR SO VIET :3
One to read, one to write, and one to keep an eye on the two intellectuals.
Quack.
A sadist is honest about his intentions. That probably wasn't funny, but what do I know?
He had no prior convictions.
Michelle must have called the bank and told them she was tired of her husband always "going Dutch."
Ebola oatmeal...
Oui.   Courtesy of Stewart Francis.
so his friends could stop by for a cold one...
So gnar
The stern 
Durian durian! im sorry
For the boos.
Nothing, the pee is silent
He's with the angel hair now.
It cums in the male
an apple a day keeps the doctor away
Kit-tea
No strings attached
I don't know, I guess she really had him pegged.
What's a movie?
The Magic Flute in A Minor
The only thing he served for breakfast was concentrated juice.
After upgrading to iOS8, I pressed the power button of my iPhone 4S to turn on the screen, and then pressed the home button. It TOOK A SCREENSHOT...orz
They get a fangover.
Allahsaurus! 
Yeah, they don't know how it got up there considering there are no trees there.
A man walks up to a woman at a bar and asks "Would you have sex with me for a million dollars?" She replies "Well, that is a lot of money, ok." He then asks "Well then, will you do it for 10 dollars?" She replies " Of course not, what do you think I am a whore?" He says "I've already established that, at this point we're simply negotiating." 
They fight back.
because he was in the coo klux klan
He pissed off.
nobody ever compliments our back end  :(  
He sold his soul to Santa.
Beastiality. 
The whiskey usually doesn't get drunk until it's at least ten years old.
One has a d where the other doesn't.  
It is because pro-choice people kill babies. And murder is a sin. And people who commit sins go to heck. The joke is people call themselves pro-choice and want to be considered 'good' people.
The Polka Mon
About 2-3 inches.
He had a fear of commitment 
Eruptile dysfunction.
A sports brah
"Yes" :p Or also "Yes she is" (yes cheese) Just made it up, I can't stop laughing, thought I'd share...
A jerkin Turkin 
He came out of nowhere.
50 pounds and a flannel.
Because the lights in his house were contolled by a switch 
You can reach around the front and you think you went all the way through.
He was caught playing in A minor.
They both like to come down your shoot. 
Her vagina...
Snow White's cherry
If you beat your fish, it will die.
You kill it.
About tennish.
I don't know, but it's definitely not z's!!!
Goldman Sachs
Arapahoe.
IHOP 
Because he couldn't control his pupils.
Because the citizens of Gotham aren't morons, like those idiots over in Metropolis
Man.
You should probably go on a diet. 
They're both purple, except bunnies...bunnies aren't purple :/
Daniel Morcombe
Fiction.
When there's change in the weather.
They're fun to play with but I wouldn't want to take one home
I guess its jusht me, myshelf, and I tonight. 
An ill-eagle
Park your car man :) - Classic!
Date Simon Cowell.
Fbola.
No seriously, I've got $100 riding on this.
AT & AT.
Batman.
Ebola soup!
The Necronomnomnomicon.
a beaver cleaver
A nun with a spear through her head.
The yellow man lives in the yellow house. The purple man lives in the purple house. The red man in the red house. And the blue man in the blue house. So who lives in the White House? The black man. It's better in person, I'm so sorry.
A referee
Arkansas
When you wake up in the morning with an erection so stiff, that when you bend it down to take a leak, your legs kick back and you hit your head on the toilet.
Too Mennonite.
 lololololololol--   --lololololol
Because it had pork sausage toppings.
One's a sick dick, and I can't remember how it ends, but your mother is a whore. -SNL reruns-
Fuck I hate writing thank you cards...
The punch line. 
To the Dock
No, he was moving at the time.
The one on the range.
have you ever experienced that moment when you see that girl that makes your world turn upside down.  The way she moves to do the simplest of tasks.  You can tell that her lips are nice and soft. Nothing would make you happier than being with her forever.  Then you make eye contact and you say, "Ow, my eye."
They used the foreskin from the circumcision to make them. I guess you could say he was a little cockeyed.
his pants fit like a glove.
One's a fat, ugly, disturbing waste of money. The other's married to a bearded lady.
Lager-heads at loggerheads about Loggerheads.
He went to town and found another feller.
A three-legged lady
Because they're filled with iraqi semen
Love of the Halflings' queef. 
Pizza because it can be slipped under the door. 
A condom
Because they're full of Arab semen.
one.. one stone. 
Because Windows 7 8 9! 
Slow down and use Lubricant.
BETTER TO RUN THAN CURSE THE ROAD
Psi...
My wife is pissed off with me again. Last night, whilst she was fast asleep, I gently removed her tampon and replaced it with a party popper leaving the string hanging out. I'm telling you, that woman has got no sense of humour at all..! 
None, they just all stand around complaining that it won't screw!
Because he couldn't race anymore!
A buttload.
He has loco motives.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
10 E's
A PDF file.
Tibet. 
Well that got a load off my mind.
An Ethiopian person who has been hoarding for several years now.
A two-torial!
You start as a billionaire 
Slap an African child in the face.
Eventually he pulled it off!
Never mind, I forgot.
Graaaains! GRAAAAINS! [Also, I like to think it's zombie cows who are keeping the grass so nicely trimmed in The Walking Dead universe]
I nominate Chris Rock's Never Scared.
Because he was stuffed!
Abola chicken noodle soup!
They eat lox!
...He got in a flap.
One is a brainless, dirty, slow moving abomination, and the other is a zombie.
He was just being tempuramental.
So far, nothing.
a meat-up
Acne waits until a boy is at least 14 before coming on his face.
Rubbit!
McRibbed
Because he was too far out
They Catholick it.
Traaaains.
He joined the Marine Corpse. 
Pornithography.
The execution.
He got a woodpecker. 
Hey baby, what's ursine?
That guy.
He He He
Their Master's. 
A Tomato (because he's both a fruit AND a vegetable) 
Lettuce pray. 
Captain Crunch 
I don't know man, I just fly the drone
Bola
Because he was Saulty. I'll
North West. 
Waiting for it to dry so you can glue it to your sex doll
It was the best of Grimes...
Gravy 
She grew out of her b-shells.
 Queso!
Because that sort of information is on a knead to know basis. 
Fore-play
Shneakoff ( I apologise, this is my first ever post so I'm using that as my excuse)
Boo!
The retail store! 
it was a naan issue sorry
Acidic. [My apologies]
Scrambled egg
Cancer
The prostitute, because they just wash their crack and sell it again.
You never see them coming.
Task Oriental.
they come from edamames
A: Gravity. It's always bringing me down.
She goes home
Pound an alarm
She didn't, it was just an Aleutian.
They were intense.
Stand up and I'll push your stool in. Yeah it's gross.
Ask them to pronounce the word, "unionized".
Parti-san 
I pushed her.
They can't find the key and don't know when to come in.
It was a Good Year... 
Because she used the other to sing
Because you're 10/10
Because seven just came back from a trip to West Africa.
Bison
One tooth
Because she's dead. 
Somebody threw a bone very far and Hulk yelled "HULK GET IT!  HEY WAIT." 
"Who the hell ordered a new roof?"
Fuck off
Rolls Rice
Because if it had four it would be a sedan.
ASK YOUR MA!
Substrate.
The latter is a group of cunning runts.
A brunette with bad breath.
the hunter shoots but can't hit... 
She kept on sitting on Pinocchio's face yelling "Lie to me... lie to me!"
Respiridol
They involve assault.
His shunglasshesh
The Road of Bones
Eamon
Because they fall through the holes in his hands.
so she could moan with the other...
1forrest1
A frog in my blender
Quarter Pound Town.
Because he had nein lives!
You do? Good. Cause I am gonna be draggin' my balls across your face. Someone at work told me this and I couldn't stop laughing.
He never charged for his services, but he always kept the tips.
Give her a basketball and tell her to read it.
A Hallowiener.
impasta.
A Brick.
Your credit card.
Apparently he Adolf Hitler.
They're both crushed-asians
They found his head and shoulders on the dash.
Yeah, I didn't think so.
How do you fit 20 Cubans in a shoebox? Tell them it floats!
The breast stroke
Because he abused when he was younger.. it's really quite sad.
The prostitute fucks between shits and the oyster fisherman shucks between fits. 
Terrorists have sympathizers.
Satyre.
Because he blueberry.
It was Chewy
....a yaybor.
The Incredible Sulk!
One of his fingers is clean
Hue hue hue
Two. But only for procreation. 
He had to roll with it...
Both of their biggest hits were the wall. 
Someone spilled wine (bolla) on his ELECTRONIC. (E)phones.
Prism
Because his life had no porpoise
He was in denial
Two had a stroke and one couldn't reach.
Alphabreadically!
A monkey. What key opens a carrot? A donkey.
One is a Dan-hating Mike. The other is a man-hating dyke. edit: spelling because of anal dykes
"Poor core"
Areola 51
Exi-stencilism
With the NHL season getting started tonight. I am wondering what are you best jokes making fun off sports teams. All Sports (Baseball,hockey,football, soccer etc). 
Roberto.
Pulled
Well, the cook stirs today's meal while the homo stirs yesterday's.
what was the question?
Because if it were French it would stop working!
They don't; they're dead.
They can both make me swell up to 3 times my normal size.
Irrelelephant.  
Refrigerators don't fart when the meat gets pulled out
" Did you try turning me off and on again?"
Sir Loin.
Transparents
Murder. I had to post this to   to keep from implicating myself
Saviory
He had elbow-a
It's not hard.
somebody help plz I need help on kindergarten project
Boo man! Boo!
No one knows, it's never been done.
A spooky dookie.
Because they are just out standing in their fields.
Only one, but an extra 15 to repost.
apparently he blew the judges away!
A Free-to-lay
Nothing, they both suck dick.  As a Jets fan it hurts to say. But it's been kind of true. 
Because he didn't need a living room anymore!
Oh, gosh!
What did Bacon say to Tomato?  "Lettuce get together"
Urine luck
"Dude, your   is hanging out"
A ham brake !
Most of those ones over in Asia have never even been to the States.
Re-morse code
They're both meat substitutes.
Great service but no atmosphere.
Canada.
just one, but it will take 4 episodes.
None. They just beat the room for being black.
Get off me dad, you're crushing my smokes!
The retail store. Edit: WHERE NOT WERE I'M RETARDED I KNOW :(((((
Gingerly
They have a sixth sense of humor
They always lie
They don't know when to shut the fuck up
They're both overrated bags of shit
They ain't worth shit
Crust
A Cache-Advance
Hebrews it.
Tanakh Tanakh Tun
"Make it slow."
Because he drank his coffee before it was cool...
"IED mubarak.."  
<EOM> ;
He/she's kisses
Because 7 ate 9.
9/11. 
It's a play on words...
If they are forced on you as a child, you wont enjoy them as much as an adult
You come home to find a question mark burned into your lawn.
He was in a Jam. 
You can tuna piano, but you can't piano a tuna!
Hitler can't finish a race
A whorifice.  
Only men would call something that measures 5.5 inches, "six plus"
The traffic.
1 US Leader.
One has cubs
His catch-phrase. Short n' Sweet, hope you like it!
Because izquierda going right.
Because it had Lemon-Aids
Crack.
Seriously.  Even the smartest and most accomplished women are dumber than the most retarded head lice.
Whose the asshole in the middle.
Surprisingly pleasing. 
Because you can eat all the sand which is there
It's a carbon dated beverage... Good jokes are good
He stayed up all night wondering whether or not there was a Dog. 
(Teacher) "With all this talking I assume you are done with your work" (Student) "And with all this complaining I assume you're single"
Because you still have ears, teacher.
A lawyer.
He used a Sea-saw.
i j k
an aeroplane
Nata-LEE-HEE!
Nothing very interesting, they are both completely ordinary members of society who should not be judged based on their ethnic background and skin colour... ...And then the building exploded.  
Your mother never ran away to join the circus.
I forget...
Me: "Girl, did you fall from heaven?" Her: "Don't even think about it?" Me: "...because Satan did"
10-4 
Shit in her cunt
Fruits and vegetables!
I don't know, but they end up fucking in-tents (intense).  Yes, it's a pun, but what else do you expect from me first thing in the morning. 
Because they can't see if they close both.
10.
Hamlet du fromage
No. But April May
Because they can never find a place to sit.
if they do, why do men get hard for them?
A giraffic jam!
He took one too many whisks.
There was nothing left but de Brie.
Because if he turned the   into   someone would have kicked the shit out of him.
Arrrrrrr-wen
salmon or eight minutes.
Because the captain was sitting on the top of the deck.
It's made from scratch      
Because her boyfriend was blonde too! Take a second.  I'll show myself out.
Syria-l
They're too God-y
"Well, glad I got that over with."
One has thick whiskers and smells like fish. The others a WALRUS. 
Its time for lunch.
Siri-al
Bloodweiser
Disoriented. 
SaTURDay
War Biscuit
When she comes she's wet and wild, but when she leaves she takes the house, the car and the kids...
He woke up.
Get in the car.
They CURIOUSLY MASTERCATE.
Infantacide
GET TO THE VIRGINS
Wanna go ride bikes?? 
I've been feeding the kids in my political science class a steady diet of Japanese Government jokes.
Not being retarded.  Sorry guys. Poor taste. But it is what it is. 
A swollow.
Swarm.
A ping pong block.
I'd be surprised if you could fit two in there 
A Freudian slip.
Musl'im
A cap and chinos.
Catholics will say hello to each other in the liquor store.
Scissor me timbers.
Because he couldn't see that well. 
They planet
She was trying to blow the horn
High Street of course!
It was attached to my bumper...
A lunartick.
Because MEAT IS MORDOR!
consuelo
Because there's too many cheetahs.
Yeah, they found her head and shoulders in the dashboard.
No, that's because it hasn't come out yet.
Your grip. 
So they can both watch the hockey game.
Because they're born fucked.
I've been hearing this shitty joke around town quite frequently as of late. I know it's been around for a while but where the f did it come from? I know I heard it on "The Office" a while ago but some people say it's older. What's the deal?
It's in bread
At least the Dallas Cowboys don't have to worry about it. They can't catch anything. 
Because Windows 7 ate 9!!! :D
Options are: 1) Crack a witty comment 2) Link to  3) Submit a damn joke and the answer is.....drumroll...... just reply with a "whoosh", simple!
A fruit doesn't need a wheelchair
Europeans don't want to die yet. Unlike Americans who don't wanna diet.
Christian Bail
His wife ended up taking someone else. 
Because it multiplied by dividing.
-Malcolm Young
All those who can run, jump and swim are in Texas.
He worked it out with a pencil.
Tough shit.
The perfect system to avoid condom accident, use double condom with chilly powder in between, if outer breaks she will know , if inner breaks u will know.
Girl: Sorry, but alcohol is bad for my legs. Guy: Do they swell? Girl: No. They spread
E-Bowler.
Because 7 8 9
Innuend-O
He couldn't finish his sentence. 
You look quite put-together this evening.
I'm-in-a-cent!
lmayo ahh
Because 7 ate 9. 
A Solution Manuel
None, they prefer Natural Light
Because 
We don't like anything white on our land.
A nun on roller skates. - kills self
Because 7 8 9.
Because they needed a switch-hitter.
Fedora Linux!
Because since the Higgs Boson gives mass to tiny particles, they imagined that it had to be a tiny priest.
Because 7 8 9.
Because Windows 7, 8  9.....
because 7 8 9
A cantaloupe
A Lenintil...
A bellybutton
I don't know, but it was going at it one byte at a time.
Actually, never mind. You pricks would probably just poke holes in it.
Because it is only 2/5 solution.
Au-burn
Batman can go a day without robin.
C. U. Tomorov
Christian Bale
I wouldn't pay $100 to have a garbanzo bean on my face.
One Direction
K
To Test a Mint
A dead baby in three trash cans.
To get to the dark side...
Because the 'P' is silent. 
No... my mouth is just liftin weights
Because they were still considered monkeys.
Because he was terminally hill.
The ones with the golden proportions!
A zombie may eat your brains, but a baby kills your dreams.
Why don't you give it a shot?
Semper-fried! (Bring on the booings and the beatings)
The Jews.
I don't have a Ferrari in my garage. 
The IV Drip
E-gypt
No?  That's the spirit!
Kermit the frog's finger... 
It was dead.
Because OCT 31 = DEC 25!
Juan less car (one less car)
Because it's two-tired
..Because none of them want to be Miss. Idaho
There's a nap for that!
Because he's got little legs. 
Because they're ear-rash-ional.
He re-peeled it.
He got cold feet.
An atom. We are only about 2 metres bigger than an atom, but about 12,472 kilometres smaller than the Earth!
Split pee
A. With a blender. Q. How do you get a baby out of a shoebox? A. With a straw.
A person who stays up at night, wondering if there's a dog.
Paula Dean is the mother.
Your cerebral pal-sy.
Never mind it won't work
She'd had cosmetic surgery before they'd met and never told him, then they got married and had a couple of children who obviously had some of the biological features of their mother. after losing the case the mother said she would have gotten away with it too if it hadn't been for those meddling kids.
Throw a flashbang into the room.
At the Schopenhauer. 
They're a little Chewie. (Edit: Wookiee***)
They both survive on dead beatles (beetles).
He was caught in the possession of small arms
Two bums got wiped
Because they want us all under super-vision!
Math hue.
He kisses his mother with that mouth
Germany 8, Ethiopia didn't.
A lawn mewer. (I wrote this yesterday).
Bustamante.  After the grandfather.
Nothing, they just waved. sea what i did there? I'm shore you got it come on, dont be a beach
Because mail men don't come on Sundays.  
Partial Arts! :)
A Jew lost a penny (incoming angry comments)
Q: Why did the dick go to 7-11?  A: To get a Slurpee.
Well, kicked out of the zoo for starters. 
The Wall was both their last big hit. 
In the complete opposite direction of a vagina.
A.heading B.heading C.heading
Michael Phelps can actually finish a race...
Urine for a treat!
IDK
Grassy-ass
Peter Parker can swing a web. Clark Kent.
They have a pirate bay......
They exchange cell numbers.
If they look fabric-cated Very bad, I know.    "This is why we don't have friends!!"   
Disburse!
A condom. haha
It's bananas!
D
Park in it, of course.
With little Nazis.
Because they are held together by weak van den Gaal's forces.
the bird was wearing underpants.
"will i marry you?"
Concentrated.
No Oscar!
Usain Bolt.
They say thansk.
Datsik but not dat well.
Just cream, it's not sour. -told me to by a friend. AP
So you can get traction in the mud.
Someone's losing a trailer.
Shabbat-a
Locomotives
Neither did he
It's not hard.
Make him run across Canada
Asians
Knee-on!
Rooster goes CockaDOODLEDOOO!! Prostitute goes AnyCOCKLEDOOO!! (Such an old joke maybe some of these young redditors have never heard it ;)
Why yes, she was absolutely ribbeting.
A. 1 scoop of ice cream and 2 scoops of dead baby.
Gluten 
He got turnip
Did you make that Fermi?
A Neo Nazi.
Women's rights...
Kinder.
Well one day he  !!!
It was unmiscible.
The fastest way to get across a river.
Not sure, but the flag is a big plus.
Herpes last forever.
A "Minstrel".
A moo-suem.
I1
In the end, someone is going to lose a trailer.
The one with the wee calf.
XP
A quacker
They're easier to find in the dark.
It only takes 1 nail to hang the painting.
Nyet long. He's always Russian.
He got hammered with his buddies.
Nickleback sucks.
I certainty won't beheading their anytime soon! -wink-
They work it out with a pencil.
The joke! Usually one would introduce this one with: "I'm gonna tell you a joke" - but since we are in   here, the setup should be ok.
I guess it's got people all bent out of shape.
My iPhone 6.
Here's a bottle opener, go get me a beer.
Patty O'Furniture.
Mounting pressure from his friends and family
Popeye kicked his ass.
Answer: to hide in avocado trees.. How did Tarzan die? Answer: Picking avocados
Kool-AIDs
Inserting a rod into the reactor turns it off.
None, he 'fell'.
The European goes to the gym, the American goes to Jim's.
Adele
"I freed the what?"
A bassturd
Hebrewed his own
It makes their makeup run.
A telephono lens. 
They played some original songs yesterday. One was called 'Smells Like Kurt's Spirit'. 
Remains to be seen!
A penis shaped potato. Its a dick-tater. 
I'll tell you tomorrow.
Because it blew up.
a HIPAAcrite
A rip off
[deleted] 
The vacuum has the dirtbag on the inside.
space junk
Barberians.
Connossieurs are praising its distinctive nose.
Because they live in the kingdom where the hyrule.
Operation Yewtree. 
The Wurst Guy.
Quark.
His dad didn't want to buy him a new sheet. 
You haven't?  Oh, wait...that's right.... that's because they can't. (Menopause) Ha.
The look on their face while being nailed. 
Let his people go!
Krillex.
Mein Kraft
Tentickles.
It's not your fault.
I feel like this is a great setup, but I can't think of a punchline. Any help, reddit?
It's a mystery.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
She Cos(plays)
Sinko :D
Is the answer: A: Heading B: Heading C: Heading
Utter destruction.
A shit-zoo.
because he heard George Bush had a dick cheney 
Homo genius. 
A receding hare line!
The procedure removes their force-kin. 
Salvador Deli
Dam!!
A Plaid-A-Pus
What would you do ew ew in a Klondike bar.
Life is harder.
Because all their husbands have Halloween-ies!
They lay down on their backs and put their legs and arms toward the sky.
Fucked. 
One's a cunning runt...
Tres Leches!
He got a compound sentence.
Whatever you want
Camotow
A nervous wreck.
It was framed.
USB
Turns into a real Soap Opera.
In his Taurus!
She kick starts her vibrator and rolls her own tampons :D
And the shuttle to hell is boarding if anyone cares to join me....
fiiish. (works when spoken :-/)
Na
Bison.
It's Not Lobster.
They both like a tight seal.
Doug.
A Bag-El
A Chromophobe.
Your mother. 
Beanstalking. 
one requires 'oinkment' and the other needs 'tweetment'. i'm sorry.
They both have handlebars. Well,  except for the duck.
Feeding Frenzy.
nevermind its too long
I heard it was directed by Phil Atio.
or does it tell the person calling that they can just assume yes to whatever they were calling about?
Only two more sleeps til' Christmas!
This dick.
They are two tired.
So they didn't leave slug trails. My father told me that when I was 8 years old.
Have a pirate cook it...they always add an "arrr"...
Teacher: "Kids,what does the chicken give you?" Student: "Meat!" Teacher: "Very good! Now what does the pig give you?" Student: "Bacon!" Teacher: "Great! And what does the fat cow give you?" Student: "Homework!"
A spectater.
My teacher pointed me with her ruler and declared that at the end of her ruler is an idiot. I was suspended for a week for just asking which end!
Snoop dog.
He's a small medium at large.
I'll post the punchline later.
He hung around until his assistant arrived
Go for the juggler
Dead bodies.
The Sixth Cents
They're stuck at C for years
On an unrelated topic, I'm not allowed in Petco anymore.
Because they are so anal!
Christian Bale
It's often on! 
A:She becomes PirateBae  
They're always taking things...literally.
Head over heels 
They traded him to the Minnesota Twins because the Twins needed a Switch Hitter.
A tra-jeudi.
Left ear, right ear... and final front ear.
A tooter. (thanks, honey)
The Alpacalisp.
A confederate fag. 
Rubbit.
Take me to your leader!
Dead men sell no snails!
He might play for the twins this year. Apparently he is a switch hitter. 
Because it got a lot of creepy stairs.  FML.
They get their Aaargh-On!
A buccaneer!
The NFL will review the tape of the wide receiver getting hit
AM I BEING DE-STAINED?!
A Toy-Yoda
Every body says its the "R" but it is actually the "C."
Boxed wine, obviously. 
Because he had no depth perception.
"Arrg, it's driving me nuts!"
They're close enough to smell it, but can't have a taste. 
Oral Roberts!
The walks
Paraffin and matches.
In his treas-arrrr chest!
Arduous.
Ayy Matey
Don't worry they'll tell you.
Patty O'Furniture
No, he left
Arrrrrrrrrbyyyyssss
New product, same design.
They think, therefore they arrrr
Scotland
Apparently he's one hell of a switch hitter.
It was being chased by the kluck kluck klan
He came into a lot of money
, ye mateys!
Because they ARRRRR
10 "number 1's" and a not guilty verdict 
Independence Day
an addadicktomy
One in Fife
My zipper
Hey girl, I'd sleep in that box.
Denim denim denim
A Bark-ista! I said a bark-ista Coral.
because he had no knees
Figuring out what to tell you about first.
They really scared the Shiite outa me!
Because the spray paint can wasn't invented until 1949.
He had firearms. 
Like, oh fuck! Oh shit! TITTY SPRINKLESSSSSSS
A shitzoo.
Seizure Salad
Hoe, hoe, hoe.
A barbecue
OMg
It doesn't matter
The lab.
A stillborn
Allah them.   (I googled several varations and thus far I believe I am the originator)
peter parker can shoot webs. clark kent.
invisigoths
It turned out to be all right.
"Whoa! fuggodaboutit!"
That you get to meet new people everyday!
The milkshake, because it brought all the boys to his yard
Licker cabinet.
Eat her out.
Zero emissions. 
they can't keep their calves together
Cause it couldn't get on the right track. I made that joke when I was little and remembered it today, might as well post it.
You really gotta hand it to her. 
two little boys are sitting at the kitchen table. the mom says to one "what do you want for breakfast?"the boy says "bitch! make me some muthafucken pancakes!" the mom goes crazy and beat the shit out of him and sends him to his room. she turn to the other boy and says "what do you want for breakfast?" the boy says "you bet your sweet ass I don't want no fucking pancakes!"
Cleopatra. 
a woman kneeling in prayer has hope in her soul.
The neigh-neigh.
They were having trouble making ends meet
....Because everyone knows General Tsao's chicken. Heard from a friend today. :)
Because I am stronger than you.
Because he was a master-baiter.
Because they've had their chloro-fill.
Jock itch.
Hydrogen  mide.
A vowel movement.
Because old hobbits die hard. (Just a different Punchline)
Speech impaired.
Could you spare some change?
Tie his hands behind his back
He says "I'm not a sales guy".
A saison premiere! 
Just Juan!
Gutterfingers!
Feces pieces
"There's no such thing as negative energy" 
...an Oriental Rug.
Because magic is stupid.
Because it wasn't ceiling.
She was a little husky.
You take the c out of ice and the f out of weigh.
His daddy was a mummy
Miracle whip. 
an erection that points north.
...the same thing Arkansas
Popeye fucking smacked him one.
Insure ants?
Because old Hobbits die hard...
Birkenstock
There's twenty of them. (Works better in spoken format, I know)
He was out of control.
A whole-lot-more
He did it and instantly began coughing up blood and falling over the place, before vomiting, passing out and tragically slipping into a Korma. 
My friend told me this 'joke' after he found out I was Muslim.  Him: Why do Muslims hate Hitler? Me: Why? Him: He didn't kill ALL the Jews.
gag...
because everybody that can run, swim or jump in in the united states...
You take the S out of SAFE and you take the F out of WAY
It was so bad it made me sustainably groan.
One of the main articles was about Hitler and his dog, Blondi. Another debated the ease of electronic burglar alarms over the hassle of owning a German Shepherd. A third, illustrated with the picture of a lavishly pruned poodle, analyzed "The phenomenology of slutty poodles: the role of dogs in the sex trade."
Beef Stroganoff 
It's petty unknown, last time not a single soul came.
Word is they needed a switch hitter...
Because they're long, hard and full of seamen.
Sad terrorist 
Grandma: F*ck the pills,did you see those dragons in the kitchen ?
A daughterboard. 
...Demetre.
To get to the other side.   ...Told by my brother last night
Where there is a fork in the road. This and other tyre jokes here: 
...if it had one more, it would be "teew faarty"
.exe
A cranberry holding its breath. 
A footilada!
Because it is very strong at beating the son.
Because He-Man has the power.
"You've got a lot of potential!"
If you like dialogue, theres a whole lot of Tolkein.
They like to eat wood. Drunk at a bar and just made this joke myself, unless somebody already made it, in which case, cheers to the individual who thinks like me.
A ragamuffin. Knew it was a dadjoke as soon as I saw my 9 year old roll his eyes.
A pebble caught between the wrinkle of a flea's ball.
Only one, but... It takes the entire ER department to get it back out. 
Nothing.
Because they all have the same DNA and no dental records.
...a white girl's ass! (I AM a white girl, BTW, so don't start with me about racism).
Normal day at the office, when one guy notices his coworker distraught. He goes over to his cubicle and sees him looking for something on the floor. They spend half an hour looking for it, when the guy starts picking his nose: 
He wrecked em'. 
They call it comic sands
Inosaur.
You only need one nail for the picture!
Vachina 
He'll have Nunavut
None
He didn't like breast stroke.
Because manholes are round
when he`s f*cking in an elevator. (ED.S)
Nothing. It just waved.
The NBA
Fitting the wheelchair in the oven.
Is there really a dog. Dog lover joke.
Because they're 90 degrees!
A paragraph. 
Because it "caust" them 6 million.
The plot thickens!
Because the grass tickles their balls! 
You kill his family
Wondering who the hell names their son Rape.
Rhesus species
You're very appealing 
I would buy a new butt, mine has a hole in it.
Mine is the enderdragon
Because your accent and appearance suggests that you hail from the southeast.
Nothing....you find them both in an alley, finger the holes, throw them in the gutter, and they keep coming back.
She doesn't, she's dead
They both glide around Uranus and wipe out Klingons!
It has a great punchline.
They scream when they come and take the house when they leave.
Lost
The Waffle S.S.
 
#nophiltrum
Because the P is silent.
"Where on Earth have you been??!!" **Thank you, I'll be here all night... Edit: Thanks for da love Dr. Jones!
Joke: Why don't birds have to wear camouflage? Punch:  Because they are already "in the skies". Thank you, I'll see myself out.
A mar tiny.
A Kripple. 
They come in hot and wet and leave with 
A PETAphile.
Just one, if you put it in the right place. 
None. That's a hardware problem.
Bookkake
A Portugoose.  Because you cant have one gees.
Cause you know, They have the moscow? Sorry for the cheesy joke :/
he had no cock!!! 
What do you call it when you throw a black person in the water? Pollution What do you call it when you throw all the black people in the water? Solution.
They train them
A Spain in the ass.
Yeah.  He woke up.  :) 
They don't work.
he worked it out with a pencil....  a number two pencil
santa only comes once a year and when he does it's down a chimney...
Because techies respawns
One gets lots of annoyed hangups, the other has a lot of annoying hangups.
Because it has a turd in it.
Missile Toe
Artificial Intelligence!
Because Curiosity kills the cat.
You put it in his shoe and it makes him limp.
Dansk kush.
Because Ken came in a different box...
They both have 15 African-American women ready to go to work for them.
They're calling it Bloody Hell.
He sold his soul to Santa.
Steven King.  JK Rowling.  
YOU GET KNOCKED OUT!!!
The Caliph ate.
Yes. They call it "rain"
with binoculars. u know, he has to watch whatever the neighbours are watching.
Hide and Go Seek Champion, 1973.
No body nose.
because their knee grows
Nothing. He just grit his teeth.
He needed someone to lend him a hand!
Because the camels can't handle it. 
Everyone's got mexican, Jewish, and Islamic jokes. I wanna hear the one's bashing America.
...because William Shatner
A WOOLY JUMPER :)
Only A's are acceptable 
Keep the Tip.
PUN-GENT
Supposed to have great food but there's just no atmosphere...
Yeah, he's infamous for his quickieleaks. 
An elephant.
You're being very teste
"I don't know I just fly the drone"
Putine...
Ray Rice
He burns his lips on the tail pipes.
Did you hear about the Indian that drank too much iced tea? He died in his tea pee.
De minimis non curat lex.
Don't worry, they've already told you the superior qualities it has over all the other smart phones by this time.
"Who ordered the two jumbos?!"
It was two tired...
A fish can take a left hook.
I dunno, I just fly the drone.
He went home and gave his wife a right bollocking.
I don't no
The floor
Okay. You start.
It has legs, but doesn't walk, beak, but it doesn't bite and wings, but it doesn't fly. What is it? -A dead crow
A nice Indian woman gets up mid-flight to the US and shouts "Is there a doctor here?" A nice, serious guy approaches her quickly and tells her: "I am. What is the problem?" She replies: "Do you want to meet my daughter?"
A man rings up his local Indian restaurant and asks, "Do you deliver?"  And the man at the other end of the phone replies, "Nah mate. Just beef, chicken and lamb."
Just Juan and Emmanuel.
LASIK is half off.
The Holocaust
They're both really high and have no access to water. 
There was a big panic at first, but it's all settled down now.
Chinese food comes out in about 15-20 minutes and Mexican food comes outta you in about 15-20 minutes.
They always riposte. 
A prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.... To Generiquai and everybody reading this, I would just like you to know I obviously didn't make this up. Just remembered it from a few years back and thought it was funny. Whoever made it up I give you all the credit. Thanks for checking it out!
Because corners are   
9 mouths
Sneakers!
Cher
4:04
She kept running away from the ball.
Six women drivers.
He only knows up strokes 
Up his sleevies.
It got pissed off. . (I'll get my coat...)
You can't buy happiness!
Her tits
Find out on the next episode of Dragon Ball Z
(Gravely voice) "Just ice."
It has a recognizable gait
A futility knife.
To get to the other slide.
TO GET TO THE OTHER SIDE!
Grab a cup of joe. 
You can't coriander your pants.
to become ketchup
You know they'll swallow
ISIS
Things were going well, but it broke up. 
You stop milking a cow after 10 years. 
She kept wetting the bed.
RAPE.
In brain cells!
You can only put them in neutral. edit:pronouns
Because his colleagues would call him the Quantum Mechanic.
Type "fresh prints" in the  "search reddit" box at the right.
The "head" nurse.
They only speak in Morse-toad!
Cause you know how to raise a cock!
I've fallen and I can't giddyup. 
To get to the other side!
I'm sitting there typing and the battery drains, does this ever happen to you? So this little message pops up: Plug in or find another power source. Do you get that message? What other power source are they talking about? Well, I can't find that cable, so I'll go ahead and plug in to the hamster wheel generator I keep just in case. That's my other power source.
Juan in Emiliano
The dishes if she knows what's good for her!
Tweetment.
...in grease
The part where you have to bury them afterwards.
Don't worry, he's allright now.
You don't know when it's cumming, how many inches you'll get, or how long it will hang around.  
Aspirin sorry guys
Getting hit by Rice
Nothing. 
HAL-i-toe-sis
What is the most masculine profession? Maleman
A margarine of error!
Because they like to pump kin.
He's still there.
because it was two-tired.
His name was Yung Bu Ti.
A pair of polegics! 
Crimea river.
Nishikori
Boobehs
They ran out of san storage
take the 'f' out of free and the 'f' out of way...
Don't worry, I've got you covered. 
A hoedown! 
Hg wells
A precipuss. 
To catch a predator. Why do white girls walk around in groups of 3 and 5?  Because they can't even! Why do white people have so many pets?  Because owning people is not legal anymore  Would love to hear more white people-specific jokes :) They seem to be really rare.
"Sure, son. But it's your 12th cup tonight..." "I know, the baby's room is still on fire."
Discus(s). [I think this works better verbally...]
To beat the crowds.
A photographer. 
Q: Why did Joan Rivers die during throat surgery?  A: Because her career as a comic was stuck, but no matter how he tried, the Dr. couldn't pull a laugh out of her.
Liqourace.
Don't fret 
A visit from the cops.
You ask an informer
A Mallardy.
"see you next month!"
A paedophile.
Web Development.
Thar she blows!
Michael Brown
The ceremony was okay, but the reception was excellent. 
To teach women how to stand on their hind legs.
Because they peel. 
To keep their foreskin from flopping over their head.
A centipede on meth.
They dont. They turn it into the hype of the new generation.
One is a group of cunning runts.
It was a timeless classic.
Dick Van Dyke
Both of them.
They both have early termination fees
In meowers
Cause he kept going in circles...
You made her chain to long.
an heir conditioner. 
It only taek won do change a lightbulb.
tulips on your organ
Its brail for, "Suck This."
Two, but don't ask me how they got in there.
They tell you.
That's okay. I'll just sit here in the dark. 
None. The just stand around for years bitching about how it went out. EDIT: does not disc. 
Not Sea Food.
You Planet.
I don't know, what do you guys think?
A 40-foot cock trying to reach out and touch someone.
Because they're greedy dirty Jews
Curling Iron.
Aye Matey!
Because he's snowed-in
You can mash potatoes, but you can't pee soup. (sorry sorry. Really. I've loved this joke since I was... oh.. six...)
The Andouille Decimal System
He's the guy in the creepy van rolling up to kids and asking "Hey kids, you want to buy some candy?"
Get a new robe!
A cloister fuck, obviously.
un burrito
make it into cured bacon
Your tally skeet. 
"Just concentrate on golf and fuck everything else"
because faggot hahahaha
A. Betty White.
You kill his family
Because all proper tea is theft.
A fridge with a leather jacket on.
Tridixigin
Yes. And what did he say? Yaaaaauh!
We Three Kims
I did not see that cumming....
Dyson.
A school bus full of black people (Sorry for racism, it is just a joke, nothing personal)
It's gonna take a while to get me hard, because I just got laid by a chick!
Gross.
Because he reached terminal velocity.
They call him the elastic clause.
Because it goes wolf!
The mortuary got $32 at the recycling center for her body.
All come from not pulling out on time.
An incongruity between expectation and result.
"I can't, I'm not a conductor." Pffffffhehewheheheheheh.
5000 views
Its called window.Mua
Shut up
Getting to the root of the problem.
B: No, I don't think that I have. A: "..."
Because you're an stone cold stunner. Edit: Stone not ice  Thanks 
EEEEEE-YARRRRRRRR
...I dont want people to know I use google+
University! Happy 1st day back to school to many of you :)
He cums down the chimney.
Because it's too much wok! [Sorry, I just made that up!]
You'd turn red if someone pulled on your hose wouldn't you?
When its head is up a Fairy's skirt, then it's a goblin.
A pizza shit
Only the good die, Jung.
Boom-shackle-lacquer!
Shredder
A cubicicle
Capital Juan
Because that could create a pair o' Docs.
I can throw her food on the floor, call her a bitch and she'll still play with my balls.
A Wise Ass.
Stay out of parms way.
The purr-rimiter.
I don't know, they both suck.
Because they can't even.
Infrognito.
Because he was too far out... (dude).
Because 7 was mean. Get it?             
Joaquin.
My personal favourite:  Two peanuts walked into a bar, one was assaulted.
Whey
A can of coke, a scoop of vanilla ice cream, and an elephant.
They are full of arab semen.
A slut sleeps with everyone. A bitch sleeps with everyone, except you.
A Kia Soul.
Jalapeno business! ha ha.. haha.. ha love this joke (Usually accompanied with three snaps of the fingers in the shape of the letter Z and moving my head from side to side) 
"For what?" "To play video games with.  Dafuq? For getting your dick wet, what else?" "Bro is that all women are good for?" "Yea, you're right.  I should make women suck my dick while their cleaning the house next time." -Actual conversation between me and a friend.  Sorry if its offensive.
A cunt.
A bender.
They say he's the first person ever to be hi-fived to death.
Tripoli batteries.
Put him in a synagogue. 
Umbros
So it could hide in the strawberry patch.... Have you ever seen an elephant in a strawberry patch? No?  See, it worked!
Hmm, yes if you shit enough...
Me: I don't know Her: The green guy! Who lives in the red house? Me: The red guy Her: Yes! Who lives in the blue house? Me: The blue guy Her: Yeah! Who lives in the yellow house? Me: The yellow guy Her: Who lives in the white house? [Now since I've heard this "riddle" before, I knew the trick answer. I was ready to answer The President! when my uncle blurted out:] The black guy!!
That's where you think one thing but fuck your mother.
Because she's the only one with a fat load on her face.
He wanted to be a ninja-neer.
 
Because they can't even.
It's the final condom...  Ta da da da...
The satisfactory.
They just wanna be loved by ewe. Made up this joke/pun at work the other day (I'm sure I'm not the first), decided to subject you all to it. All apologies to shepherds who are not physical with your sheep.
They exert less ground pressure. Because their penis is so big it acts like a third leg.
Because they were appealing. 
Never-mind, it's too cheesy!
Inconceivable. 
Drizzle.. my nizzle
Both are  ) 
Ash.
scRAM
Sits down and works it out with a pencil.
Because they can't even.
He gets good marx.
I wanna rock!
Pina colliders.
Because Mr. Clean comes in a bottle.
The look on your face when you lick it
He was afraid , he would make an ass of himself . 
There was a face off in the corner.
The oyster shucker, shucks between fits.......
because they cant have zippers
She won't swallow
Because they can't Peruve they're citizens
Easy, go on Twitter right now.
A baby combing it's hair with a vegetable peeler.
Because the sea weed. ha.
I just passed your friend in the woods.
They crepe themselves ;D
I don't know but your mother's a whore! 
Human beans
Wanna take a shower? They're to die for. 
Because they've got sick beets!
It was taped. 
White Vans. Creds to a friend of mine :)
Accessories 
Because he used a non-stick pan.
nothing they were tearable. 
Hell-if-I-know! 
They have crystal balls so they see it coming.
Ariana Grande
IT'S FROOOOOOOZZZZEEEN
A Shia pet.  *friend of mine came up with this and was pretty proud of himself 
They're all suckers.
Get the fork outta here!
Defence
Yes
To get another degree.  My sister thought it up and found it so funny she called to tell me. 
Arrrriados
To get to a place you've probably never heard of.
Asbergers
Because they came from afar.
The wheelchair
Cuz then they'd be baygulls. 
Acne waits till you're 14 to come on your face
He didn't want to go off half cocked.
You would still eat the beans after a month in the woods
It didn't protect him from harmful rays Edit: Steve Irwin was the man. RIP
he was scared that he'd end up serfing again 
anonagon.
He fell asleep in the job.
A fart.  It goes right through your pants and doesn't leave a hole.
He totally flipped his shit.
One's organized.
Two. The light bulb you remove and the light bulb you replace it with.
Someone who pointlessly knocks on the door.
Because if they're on the fence too long they get caught.
Jew-lato
Its easy to harass a 90lb aneroxic and walk away.  It's a lot harder to do the same to the 250lb tattooed, long haired, biker.
Laissez-fur!
It depends on how much crack he can produce.
Because after "p" comes "irate"
....hasidic  I'll let myself out now. I know that was matzo good...
Data!
The other 40% drive Mitsubishis.
I am working on a project, and its going to revolve around a phrase. I need it to be really out there, yet could be used in everyday life. But honestly just give me anything you got.
I dab.
Because they last for 3 periods.
By hiding the shovel in the shed/garage
Bye Bye White
Foreignade.
The water was so cold , he's still shaking.
One goes to the bar for a cold one. The other goes to a morgue.
A Scotland Yard.
both of them
Lend me your ears
Ariana Venti.
A jacked rabbit.
I'll tell you later.
He removed the appendix!
Extra points if it can be about a burger monster (don't ask). 
A prosti-toot. Zing pow!
He needed a place to crash.
It was just out of his reich.
Arizona
I'll be goddamned.
It won the award for the best period drama
Because when it isn't sunni, it's utter shiite
Only 1/5th of what comes out of her vagina is retarded.
Boxer briefs!
THAT'S THE JOKE.
Two Bullets.
A Cereal Killer.
Is it too basic?
An Oreo cookie.
Because that's the sound it makes when you kick it.
Any fish that is swimming near a dolphin, because then, it swims with a porpoise.
So it would push back.
I dunno, ashkenazi!
Sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away.
A butt load.
Because it got grassed up by the lawn.
Dinner!
You never appreciate them until they go down on you. edit: computers
To avoid circumlocution.
Artificial intelligence!
Because they taste funny
Because they have nein lives.
Cheese was.
You drop it on her twice.
"Quit being yourself, quit being yourself!"
He had arachnophobia.
Made him an offer he couldn't understand
Divine intervention. edit: Oh.
Two fingers.
In the hobobituaries
Don't worry, we caught him
Joulery!
Because curiosity killed them all.
Baby on board.
Doesn't matter; Had sex 😃
It makes cents.
A Polish man calls up an airline. "How long is the flight from Chicago to Warsaw?" "One minute..." "Thank you." 
They have in-door fins
Society.
He'll re-possess it
I hear they're hiring at the zoo circumcising elephants. The pay is small, but the tips are big!
The vagina only tastes like piss in the beginning. Translated from danish, where   is used instead of Bud Light.
Glue bread to the ceiling.
Sweet and Low-brow..
Cobain Cobain
Paulina, Melvina and Lunt.
Because they are Hung Arian's 
Well, both carry stiffs, but one's for coming and the other's for going.
Commie commie commie commie chameleon.
Because they were under a buck.
No, reely?
A hand shake.
He was out of meth.
Yeah? I bet you have.
Because air is free.
They are delighted. 
A yeast infection!
HIV
The women's bathrooms in the engineering building. Credit to 
When god makes it rain bitches get wet.
al pa-chinos
Ebola Gay.
Moorse code.
They both chopped down their own cherry trees.
She outgrew her B shells. 
Here's mine. 
Good morning, ladies.
Tu Yung Tu,  Tu Dum Tu,  and No Yen Tu.
His left ear, his right ear, and his wild frontier.
She closes her eyes and imagines she's having cordon bleu.
The school folded.
Martian Luther King jr.
WASWAS.
He got tied up in court.
Hallooooo me! 
Ballah ballah ballah ballah ballah
A moo-slim
It's in tents.
Re-fried brains.
Because they have three hundred and sixty degrees.
A galligator
He lost his Marples.
She was just trying to make ends meet.
Because we are hungry
Well, my dear reddit, in nature there is law of conservation of matter. Therefore, if the vodka disappeared somewhere, it would appear somewhere else. And then there would be Russia.
He woke up
Van Nuys
He died from a massive underdose.
Irene
Ballah
Because it's two against one
Bloody inflation. 
She doesn't have one. She'll eat anyone that's bruised!
Because the light at the end of the tunnel is New Jersey.
Well, here he is:   EDIT: Anyone remember that old-old joke?
Because we get sleepy.
There was a joke about a guy being pulled over saying he was a clown late for the circus, then he took out road flares to juggle to prove to the cop he was a clown, then maybe somebody else drove by or something... does this sound familiar to anyone?
It was pissed off.
His team is the first pee wee team to run a 5 wide receiver offensive set...he said there won't be a single tight end on his team. ...forgive me for that joke. 
A rekt angle
Yes.
He was hit by a BRAAAANNDDD NEEEEWWWW CAAAAAARRRRR!
A trike
Because he had a reptile dysfunction. ... Okay bye now
That's not funny.
A knobstacle.
you let your 12yr old daughter smoke in front of her kids.
Persona naan grata! sorry.....
he Gottfried..
A noughty one.
A minor 
Because one egg is 
Because his father was in the pen, and he didn't know how long the sentence was!
Yeah, there's a small medium at large!
Sometimes it's Sunni, other times it's Shiite.
Because without it, our friends would be fiends. 
He used the force . 
He begs to differ.
Hang onto your nuts, because this is going to be one hell of a blow job.
Vas the deferens?
... One is greasy with big eyes.  The other's a fish.
A BM-cuddle-U
Ten minutes.
ja, ja, arsch ficken mich härter, gestüt
a Shure-opean
They make out like bandits.
Negromancy.
They both screw you for $300 per hour. What's the difference? Most prostitutes have standards. 
none he fell
Jesus died a virgin.
What up, britches?
It's On & On Anon.
Karmaflage!
SHEBOY-gan You're welcome
Challenge her to the ALS Ice Bucket Challenge.
He used a hypote-"noose"
-1
Drop it. How do you make a baby stop crying? Drop it again. 
Because he marches to the Imperial March and not the Metric March
You're fired!
It's wrong on so many levels.
You kick his sister in the jaw!
0 - Nice belt. 8 - thank you :) 
Brazil... They've got Brazillions
Because they can't even.
To get laid.
If you don't suck them fast enough they lose their shape.
One's against the law, and the other's a sick bird. 
He was feeling a little horse.
You've got a strange vag-dick.
Shinglers Lisp. 
I have one here, it's just collecting dust.
Post-Hummus
Haw
He was looking for a porpoise. (thought this one up but I doubt I was the first one that did.)
A sombre-ero!
Don't worry he's "ALRIGHT" now!
1 year since their last blowjob.
He just found his chicken strips. (Courtesy of my creative bartender pal)
NapKIN
You just wait for the comments to link you up.
A BABOOM!
A gentleman monkey is a monkey that won't monkey around with another monkey's monkey.  
A lady walks into the drug store and asks the pharmacist for some arsenic. The pharmacist asks "Ma'am, what do you want with arsenic?"  The lady says "To kill my husband."  "I can't sell you any for that reason" says the pharmacist.  The lady then reaches into her purse and pulls out a photo of her husband in bed with the pharmacist's wife.  He looks at the photo and says "Oh...........I didn't know you had a prescription!"
BRIANS!!  Everyone else is safe
They can't spell TOBOGGAN !
Beer.
Clive, usually. 
A melon collie!
I WILL NOT BE A VICTIM!
Yes
Fast food
Tennish.
Norse code.
It's sweeping the nation! 
"You are the wind beneath my wings."
The Asian girl because the blonde would stop and ask for directions.
He shines a flashlight in her ear.
He's all right now!
Come in different colors.
Because it's like fucking close to water.
ctrl+v
A PILOT, YOU RACIST!
Start dating them
2 but how they got in the light bulb I will never know
A hornet!
He was outstanding in his field...
...5,6,7,8!
He was on a roll!
It...all...happened...soooooooo...fast
A 69 with 3 people watching.
Cheerios
Jello doesn't hit the back of your throat at 120 mph.
Because bears don't have fine   skills
Because they take a fence to that.
They are really down to earth people.
So you know whether he's coming or going.
Q: What's 72? A: 69 with three people watching.
Their bills are over dew
Congress
milk sheikh
HAAAAAAAAAY!
A couple of rolls got fresh. source: Dr. Katz, Profesional Therapist season 6 episode 16.  Yes, the son in this show is the same guy who plays Archer.  This was H. Jon Benjamin's first job apparently and the show is amazing.
Cause they play the fairway. 
So the Germans can march in the shade
None, because little boys don't fit in a lightbulb.
A sham poo 
Because pepper makes them sneeze
Shedder Cheese!
It says "Hey Shrek, whats up?" (I was 9 when i made this okay)
AWWW YEHP
Because he charges!
Get the quarter back.
King Nottocommon
By taking the psychopath. hhhhehehhehe good one right? yeh? no..? ok.
White powerade!
So he can cut corners.
A. Because he was pissed off!
The half-black
Better not say. I feel like I'm already treading on a slippery slope.
A thiefdom.
Argh, shiva me timbers
Cause all the kid's clothes are 60% off. 
Techno.
He got "boar"ed to death.
You put floss over their eyes!
Because Mr. Sippi is hung like a horse.
One. Never look someone in the eyes. What is the second rule? Two. Never look up.
I can roast chicken but I can't pea soup
Your mom can't take a joke
What did the boy say when his dog died?   I'm gonna miss you buddy, you were my best friend.
A Bi-Polar Bear.
You take away their tiny brooms.
An Ambush ;)
Because they use their head.
One of its legs are both the same.
You know he did it
A life sentence.
Tony.
Because we don't negotiate with chair-orrists.
Missionary style.
ICU. 
Pan 
A period piece! 
Hey, why don't you cut me some slacks?
Full
A Bug report
On a plane.
Because he didn't wake him up before he went went.  It's  , people.
"Oeuf!"
'Ommm' lettes!
The drunk driver passes a stop sign, the stoner waits for it to turn green.
It was epic.
That's the spirit!
He's considering a Mrs. Doubtfire sequel. 
He was having a coffin fit!
He was sitting.
He hasn't.
(Who?) MY BUTTCHEEKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Answer: A donut hole!
I've never heard any good ones so please give me your best!
Hebrews it
In Iraq.
She got him the wrong kind of blowup doll. 
He became a veteran Aryan. 
What is the opposite of an autistic? A Socialist.
Just stand in the corner of your house, since it's usually 90 degrees
Anything you like - he can't hear you.
He wanted to find a tight seal. 
Nothing - they've never met.
New Cops: Belly with abs. Old Cops: Belly with Fats.
Because he neverlands
It looks like the backstroke, sir.
A cocktopus.
None. They just shoot the room for being black. 
A pork-u-pine My brain is dumb
It's the thot that counts.
Because its capital is always Dublin. 
Whale, whale, whale, who do we have here? Please, this is a cry for help.
He bit the tail off a submarine and sucked out all the seamen.
Dill Dough. 
Silver Mullet
There was a chink in his armor.
Because they are taken to the hospital if the election lasts more than 4 hours
Prosecc-oh...
Bang! (빵!)
An antique.
He had a reptile dysfunction (I just made that up but I'm sure it's been thought of) 
The seahorse. 
A socialist.
Because I am stiff below the waist
Chirpes. It's a canarial disease, and I hear it's untweetable. 
ARRRR Rated Movies!
It made him angry. 
I've memorized a lot of jokes from a previous "doctor joke" thread, and need some fresh  material!
When entered on a microwave.
Eclipse it.
He likes dead-'Pan'...
Peace and carrots... Thought this up at work today. I'm sure it's been done before but it made me chuckle...
Cunt!
....Be-fore
I noah guy!
IPA
Hoover fuck said this job would be a good idea?
I don't know, I only fly the drone
Urinate
Because all the replays are in shlomo. 
Guacamole, sour cream, and salsa.
Sacrilegious. 
That's impossible, because they can't climb the ladder.
The stationmaster minds trains while the schoolmaster trains minds.
Clinton-Dix
Aaahhh.
He hates nieeeeeeeeces to pieeeeeecesssssssss!!!!!!!
The nun has hope in her soul!
Because she was a little tart.
Cuz he musturd. 
I don't know the joke, but apparently he nailed the execution.
bout tree fiddy.
A pilot, you fucking racist.
Nobody's buying it! 
seaweed! lol my friends 12 yr old daughter told us this one 
Robin Williams
IHOP
I woun't pay a 100 bucks for a Gorbanzo bean on my face.
An Astronaut.
......because they would sneeze in pepper water.
..accommodating.
Their shackle
He got excited when he was ordered to rub Juan out.
Oh for faux sake!
Proof that skunks and monkeys fuck.
"Sorry guys...I gotta go see about a girl."
Nothing, someone's losing the trailer. -Robin Williams
Q: Why did the ants dance on the jam jar? A: The lid said, "Twist to open."
They're all about force projection.
Because opposites attract.
To get to the same side.
Hahaharvard
Jah bless.
Two. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . IT JUST DOES, OKAY?
Stop laughing and reload.
Finger-prints. 
I heard that Robin Williams will be starring in it
So he'd only get a 2 game suspension for abusing her. 
E-bae... I'll see myself out
Before you get your panties in a bunch, I know I did not make this joke. I heard it from a friend and I don't know how came up with it first. Probably Bill Gates... 
Hasta last vista, baby.
They're rushin'
Because 1 more would have been 240... 
He was half-assing it 
He was walking down the street and turned into a drug store 
Because tatthrees were too expensive.
Because twitter has an 140 character limit.
'I'm not Willie Nelson' Credit: old joke via: Norm Macdonald
Because he heard the snowblower was coming. 
Karate is a martial art and Judo is used to make bagels. 
2/10 
I didn't lose my virginity to a Ferrari.
A receding hare line.
OP: Uh, I don't know, why? YOU: I'm just trying to figure out how to screw you.
Baghdad!
The Darth Mall!
Get a 5th old lady to yell "Bingo!"
Hip hop. 
They all had a brave-heart. 
"Gotta go fast!"
The Grudge at a rave.
It's rated "Arrrrrrrr!"
Stumped.
Memory loss.
I saw this joke in a thread on Reddit but I cannot find the source.  If anyone knows where it is, please comment it!  Not a tasteful joke, more of a "I'm going to hell for laughing at this" type.  There are real websites out there for this, which I personally find neat.
15 to life
Do Re Mi Fa So La Ti No (This is a joke I wrote a loooonnngg time ago, tell me what you think.)
Flip it upside-down.  (sorry in advance) 
His ass
A Chrysler 
They get a fangover.
Minge eater
SHIT
throw it on the ground and tampon it.
9 months.
Tennish
That's all.
It was too tired
Because it scares the shit out of the dog!
What branch of government actually listens to the people?
Syndrome of a Down...
An egg gets laid before it cracks.
It's easy; just throw in a couple of Boolean cubes.
Wanna go ride bikes?
Jesus didn't walk around Dublin acting like he's Bono.
Because he felt like IT
Plastic Italians.
A coincidence. 
Mango Lassi
Ka-ta-na-na!
Yeah? Well, how did you get their tiny legs apart?
Grass, I lied about the wheels! Shnockers
So they know where to stop shaving.
Jesus doesn't have any tattoos of Mexicans.
Because he had anal prolapse.
Because there isn't mush-room.
When her sentence starts with "A wise man once said"
He was too open-minded.
None, they just beat the room for being black.
There's a lot less of them than there used to be...
Getting a blowjob at the same time.
I don't know, I just fly the drones.
Because she had no arms. 
Because a Jewish woman won't touch anything unless it's 50% off.
America.
A mushroom!
Because they can't even.
Tacos. Overheard an old man telling another guy how he lost his farm in Mexico , and how the smell reminded  him of tacos. 
A Pair-a-ducks.
No on knows. It's a Mister Bee.
Beef-Stroke-Anoff
They taste different.
Q: What do the Mafia and a pussy have in common?  A: One slip of the tongue, and you're in deep shit.
Only one, but it takes the entire emergency room to remove it.
They are both meat substitutes!
Paddy O'furniture
If you had to, you could eat the leather shoe.
They blow themselves up.
Jackdaw Niel's
One Direction
Farfalle. It always gives me butterflies in my stomach.
Go 'n' Wash
Rape.
One's weasily recognised - the other's stoatally different
Lay awake in bed wondering if there really is a dog.
Grols
Meeeeeaaaaaaoooooo
Ebola.
Because he was Messi
They admit de feet.
The balls are just for decoration.
The Chicago Blackhawks
Because its brand new and never been used
Throw a penny off. How do you get the other half to jump too? ... Tell them no one found it yet.
I don't know, but it's not Yeezy being green.
Nine. One to do the shoeing, and eight to lift up the horse!
Crimea River
It's intense.
I didn't make an enzyme last night.
Car Keys
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a kilo of cocaine fall out of a window.
Mini-Mum
Why can't they just be the Illuminice?
Punch him in the nose.
A small medium at large.
That the Hilbert Hotel didn't book Uncountables.
They were my friends. :(
Twister.
Putos (Ask your Mexican friend)
Look! No hands!
Gravity...
Periodically. 
I love a good joke, but I'm a sucker for skipping ahead. Like, my eyes just skip to the last line for no reason. I read the punchline, and I didn't get any chuckles at all. Does anyone else do this? If it's not just me, do we want start spoiler tagging the punchlines? Or does this cause trouble (like, mobile viewing for example)?
White and black noise.
...because he always drops the bass.
A caneless pimp.
I want that pearl! Don't be shellfish! 
4 if you turn it upside down.
Because there's so much base. 
Hasbro.
Paranoid!
Arr matey! 
Queerings
She was a trans-sister! I'm so sorry for wasting your precious mouse clicks on that god-awful joke
They were Putin up with him. 
No, it'snot
Because he would've saved everybody.
The Internship
He counted 1 Mississippi, 2 Mississippi, 3 Mississippi, 4 Mississippi...
Jerry took a bath with bubbles.  Want to hear a dirty joke?  Bubbles is a man.
Cosmic jokes.
A pilot, you sexist!
the coma ward.
Six: one to screw it in and five to cheer him on loudly while standing in front of other people's bulbs so no one can see them.
Swine flu 
They have great hARRRmony. I'm sorry.
Roberto
Sir Amick
A gardener doesn't want his hose to have kinks.
Antelopes
.... it wooden work
A. With copper wire and strong electric current. (read it in a shower thoughts thread)
$5.50 per pound.
I have no idea, but this   looks like a good joke. So post your proposals in comments.
He's now a man trapped in a woman's  body..
She likes him to do the justice lick.
One is a fit bunny and the other is a bit funny
A child asked his father, "How were people born?" So his father said, "Adam and Eve made babies, then their babies became adults and made babies, and so on."  The child then went to his mother, asked her the same question and she told him, "We were monkeys then we evolved to become like we are now."  The child ran back to his father and said, "You lied to me!" His father replied, "No, your mom was talking about her side of the family
Ahhh never mind, it's too long.
Naan-Fiction. 
They tried that but people kept on thinking it was the checkout line at Home Depot.
"I just need some space."
You look for the fresh prints. 
Spring water.
Steel Man.
G sus
And if they they have quite a will, surely they are even more nominally determined, and surely if they are only slightly quite willful, surely they are ever more nominally determined, and in fact, because of this, the amount they are nominally determined is so much that they surely their name causes their life to be determined by their name so much that they cannot escape from their (W/w)ill. Hell, I guess you can tell by this long paragraph that nominal determinism is, in fact, my middle name.
Deer's Balls There are always under a buck
In its honey
They have no jobs
gize.
It's pretty swell. And I would tell you about the d-shaped well, but I'd rather not dwell on it.
Throw in your laundry.
They tell you.
With white powder.
A witch.
Neither did he.
Just ice. 
"R?" NOOO!!! It's the Sea!!!
Its kind of a Nietzsche philosophy. 
His underwear fit like a glove.
Get off me dad you're crushing my smokes! Or "That'll do pig, that'll do." I have heard it both ways. 
Because sheep can hear a zipper a mile away.
Surely they should be called asteroids? :]
You're my breast friend. 
They're both staples.
A Decibell.
It was a megabyte. 
He just quit eating cold turkey.
Father's Day
the camel would get overworked
The ova achiever
Answer in comments. 
M80
Rape culture.
KoRn
hush puppies
Because it will go right over his head
Supplies!, I'm gay.
the iTouch. ( lame but I made it up in class when I was like 15 lmfao)
Hide and go Sikh
A good Samaritan means well, whereas a Jew is just well, mean.
He craved more risk.
Quite a mouthful.
Furlong
One is forced and borderline torture, the other is sex. 
Because their dicks grow to their knees. Negro=knee grow
He rectum 
A happy person has a light heart and ET has a heart light
Because it's got no Seoul!
People are dying to get in.
Punch
Yeahman
To burn some calories.
Christian Bale
The crow bar
They log on
Pillow cases
Pair-o-Medics
Bison
He had a reptile dysfunction.
One shucks between fits and the other, well...
He has thrust issues.
They got stoned to death.
Lubrican
A Pastafaryan.
Burger King forgot to wrap his Whopper.
Amok
Grindcore
The Country!
It's okay though, he said he can stop whenever he wants.
About 3 inches
Gsus
Because his tanks wouldn't stop Stallin'.
A feminist.
Church
He wanted to make sure he was getting the best, the best, the best, the best-a view.
Reddit.
Anderson Pooper
Because it was for chair-ity
A black guy with small 
Q. What do you call a bald teddy? A. Fred bear I don't get it.
The Mail Room
Her belly button.
Rub-it
because he did crossfit...
Double Click! (Okay, Khoisan only.)
Neither did she.
Bob
Enjoy the silence. 
There's no million dollar car in my garage.
Eric Clapton would never drop a pound of coke.
It was in tents.
When they come, they are wet and wild, and when they leave they take the house.
He was a-roasted peanut.
Marijuana
Curry-osity
M'Laysia
Put a nipple on it.
Cut off his hands
Then it'll be a foot.  I'm so sorry. 
He got cancelled.
You can scrape it off your mom's teeth
Hardcore.
...because Ken comes in a separate box. 
Because she refused to work in a mail dominated industry.
Really anything with a strong Heroine
The coming of the lord
AUDI. 
An army soldier
A pilot you racist bastard
Depends.
Just Juan.
A Bearcooter
One is the ancient art of self defense. The other is what you make bagels out of. 
Little Caesars 
Quack
Deer balls. They're under a buck.
because he's covering an erection!
A cunt-astro-fee!
Irony.
The new York jets.
It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia.
Because the charges wooden stick.   My humblest apologies.  * The case! Drop the case! Ah fuckit.
Einstein's cock.
Busch Light.
Because they literally cannot EVEN right now, ugh!
one with everything
It pulled a mussel. 
Mine keeps correcting into weird things. Like changing "my" into "me", "money" into "gold pieces" and the letter x into "here be treasure". It's a pirate copy.
"I stand corrected." -From 
Stab them in their right arm and then have a doctor wrap the wound in gauze. The blood will soak up the gauze and turn it red, possibly leaving a white circle on it. They are now a Nazi.
They're grounded.
Wasabi
Getting into a bit of a .tiff!
She was skipping without her bra
Seriously, how hard is it to feed your potatoes?
Desuball
They have poltergasms
A wet nose.
You Euler up.
You get your drunk ass off the carousel.  Edit: *off Thanks captain.
Rasta Pasta.
He got it before it was cool.
"Statue bro?"
Walnuts
Never mind, you probably won't get it anyways...
I'm not Immanuel Kant. I'm Genghis Kahn!
He was out standing in his field.
Iambs!
Because they're sitting on a box.
Nothing, she knew what was coming...
He's been transferred to a different branch.
...make allegations
There are footprints in the butter 
He was a master baiter, but they told him to beat it.
¡ Homo Estás!
Electrifying entertainment.
Thanks for the Baghdad.
A Hueman 
Only 12. One for every month.
The PGA tour.
You take off their hats
When you put your hand down her pants you think you're feeding a horse.
With a crowbar.
(This joke?)
Urine for a treat!
A pain in the ass
Luckily the doctors were able to graft him a new pair from his foreskin. The operation was a success, however now the baby's a little cockeyed.
It can turn "no, no, no!" Into "mmm, mmm, mmm"
Supreme Court comes with sour cream and guac. 
OP delivers. Not a great joke, but my wife claims no one will get it. I am trying to prove her wrong.
...... ...... ...... I'll get back to you in a few weeks
The Crimea River
WalMart!
2 Changz
Works it out with a pencil.
All of them..
A brother, because you can choose your friends.
They can't even.
Put them in the ash tray
He was getting cold, so he turned off the fan
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
She gets to 69 and has a frog in her throat. Edit
Because they are full of antibodies!
Crossfit. Why did the Romans hate Jesus so much? He wouldn't shut up about crossfit.
He's an acidic Jew....
Because once you've heard Juan, you've heard Jamal.
Derek Bin Jeter
In his 
Semper fries
Christmas in July
"I'm a bundle of nerves right now!"
I don't know and I don't care.
Aw sheet!  One of my favorite, cheesiest jokes of all time. Thought it would be a good first post to Reddit!
Make aedile. 
it has 3 power chords and the lyrics are about being a badass, Thanks!
Robbin' hood
No matter where they are, they'll always make it rain when they dance.
To get to the other side.
You mech a wish.
High Knees
A hegemon.
"do you smell carrots?"
Go fuck yourself.
Dragon balls!
Disoriented.
Dead animals have skid marks AROUND them
The real download button on Softpedia.com
Trans fats. 
He keeps looking for love in Alderaan places
( ):  Hmmm, I guess things are really getting serious between me and my girlfriend, uh, Angie, because I just added the song "Angie" to my favourites playlist.  ( ):  I mean, I don't even particularly like that song.
He had a chicken stapled to his face.
there's no kids in hell
Kermits finger
"I'm sorry , I'm not very good at executing punchlines."
Because he had   fever!
...which ever one was more excited. 
I guess, just trying to fit in.
"What can I do you for?"
Bad dates.
Michael Phelps can actually finish a race.
Pay for the pizza.
He racism.  
The New York Cock Exchange
Because organ traders offer good price.
Because he's two Dents.
Bánh mì
Hexlax
meningococcal
Raw raw raw raw raw!
5. The other half is 3.
Cunningham
An enterpreNeuer.
Self raising.
A Northern girl says "You can" but  a Southern girl says "Y'all can"!
WOTAHHHHHH
They both can't even.
HYATT!!!
A rottweiller.
Ground beef
Quack
Malaysia Airlines only has been shot down once.
High C!
a Christian Bale
Juan on Juan.
Christopher Sitten
Even the P is silent.
They each got 6 months. 
cantaloupe ;)
Hey, so are you familiar with my parodies? Yeah my PAIR O DEEZ NUTS!!!
Put it on my bill.
A brick-layer.
"C - Eh - N - Eh - D - Eh" 
Yoghurt has a culture.
Trying to win a new mattress in a contest and I need a clean mattress joke to win (dumb, I know)
Crawl up a chickens ass and wait.
One has a job.
I'm still working on it...
I think that is unfair because math loves them. The problem is that math shows its love by playing hard to get.
a retail sto- goddamn it I did it again
A bonesaw
A-AAAAAAYYYYYYYY
He couldn't budge-it!
Thrown out of the petting zoo.
He got shot down.
You put a little boogie in it.
Because fuck u  that's why
Two more bullets.
Because they are members of an underground Splinter cell.
Shoot him before he hits the ground
The movie would have been pretty... Neo-Nazi.
I ACTUALLY GIVE A FUCK WHEN MY COMPUTER CRASHES.
Their nose
Because he didn't arbor any feelings!
A magi-chien.
Bigmac and fries please
Namaste.
Russel. 
you dont bury survivors
One is a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean! Edit: HAHahHAHA OMFG I'm the epitome of hilarity
Quarter pounder with cheese !
I wouldn't pay $100 to have a garbanzo bean on my face.....  :D eh. Eh.?
Freedom.
Methy
To get to the other tide!
No Eye-deer! What do you call a deer with no eyes and no legs? Still no eye-deer! What do you call a deer with no eyes, no legs, and no dick? Still no fucking eye-deer!
ten tickles 
You take the letter "S" out of "sub", and the letter "F" out of "way".
Nothing. Because the blind man can't fucking see him and even if he said something, the deaf man wouldn't be able to fucking hear it.
A tourist
Because it came from the Suez.
Because the service was horrible.
It's butt!
A bloody cunt.
Ghandi-rhea
Because its got Seoul.
I don't know, and i don't care..
I am tired of looking for a job.
In the former, man exploits man, in the latter, it's exactly the opposite.
It keeps crashing unexpectedly :/
"Robin, get in the car." 
Posthumous Prime
Hibearnation
fathers day is when you thank your dad for not pulling out. mothers day is when you thank your mom for not swallowing you.. or spit you out... doesnt matter.
Explosive Diarrhea
Because two wongs don't make a white
I had just bought a box of condoms when the cashier asked, "Do you need a bag?" I replied, "No, she's not that ugly."
... Naan sense!
A bucking horse.
He had her pay his tab!
No Gandhi
The  . Because the lion is not as fierce as it seems...
Jose and Hose B
Juan ton
She worked it out with a #2 pencil.
I don't even like pegging.
they both get laid by mexicans
Dam.
A Ramen Manual.
Shuck it long, and shuck it hard.
Turnip for what
The restraining order
They were itentacle twins.
Sha-neigh-neigh. Thought of it at work.
Because they taste funny
None- that's hardware.
Getting her back into the wheelchair.
attaturk. 
A BMXican.
dikewondo
A sock takes five toes and a camera takes photos.
We're having a BB.
His family died.
Because that's when they brake fast.
Two. One to put it in and one to complain that he never screws anything anymore.
Fo drizzle.
On the rocks
It runs in your jeans.
Went outside. I didn't know how big it would get. 
Red paint
The Aphid Brothers
He was board to death.
a Kimono
nevermind its so cheesy 
Because it scares the shit out of their dogs.
Because you can't be a fan of hat care and cat hair.
Because you do a one and walk away.
A noodlehead..
Shenanigons
Even though he didn't rank in the top three he still got atrophy.
Because there's a   in the way.
Patience!
"How are you holding up?"
He brews it.
Neckbeard
A cock that sticks to the roof of your mouth.
He has rust issues.
When they were asked to spell it, they spelled it: C-eh. N-eh. D-eh.
Slow your roll.
Badmintin' (P.s. I'm sorry, this is terrible)
Because she couldn't finish her sentences. Why couldn't she finish her sentences? He kept eating her periods.
Forte
Brazilians!
Because the creationist did not believe in carbon dating.
Well, not all of them.
One copper coin, two dwarves.
Ugh never mind that , it's pointless.
The lesbians, because they leave lickety-split.  Meanwhile, the gay guys are still packing their shit.
To get a better grip on the broomstick.
Because P is silent 
He looks for fresh prints.
beer
"Oh come on, I'm only cumin!" I was so proud when I came up with this jewel.
A snowman blowing his nose!!!!!!!!
No bae Jose
Make it Wayne.
Because I feel really bad about lying to my mom like that
Your mom cant take a joke.
Shit in the living room
Two guys are in a park and see a dog licking it's nuts. First Guy: "Damn I wish I could do that" Second Guy: "Shouldn't you pet him first?"
He had to change his name to J3X CY4
Great. Can I Slytherin? 
Snow White had the excuse of being asleep before letting seven in. 
Iron man is a superhero.  Iron woman is a command. 
By bearing straight
Iron condome
A bi-polar bear.
He wanted to finally get respecced. 
They both have quills. I was really annoyed when I first read Alice In Wonderland as a kid and there was no answer to this joke/riddle, so I just made up an answer. It's not too funny, so if anyone wants to come up with something clever/funnier, be my guest!
A bad gambler
An I-shoulda-pede.
Yes, but you Götze try a little tenderness.
Nobody knows!
I gotta drop the cosby kids off at the pool.
"Cri-me-a river!"
Warren
Have YOU ever tried to open a grilled cheese sandwich?
He always leaves you hanging
Text.GetRect()
You just put your lips together and whistle
I'll tell you tomorrow.
Because if you can't Helium or Curium , You'd Barium!
On the second page of Google search results.
His family advertised it as a barbecue.
Somebody threw the towel in.
Because it's prayer conditioned.  I'll leave now....
Because then it'd be a foot
They love butts in their mouth
A nocturnal E-mission!!! I came up with this a few years ago and thought I should share with the masses:)
Hi guys, this is my first post in this subreddit and i really need helps with a joke come back and im not sure of this subreddit is the right place but i check the rules and theres no rules about asking a joke so.. Anyway, i was texting with my bestie, we were joking and our last text was like this Me: Its a joke, not a dick, dont take it too hard Her: Jokes are ment to be funny Me: ... ...
Jew jitsu
They were too Cutler-y.
Ho, tell me where my money is!
Nivea milk.
Superman is flying around one day when he spots Wonder Woman laying on the beach butt naked. He thinks to himself "I'm faster than a speeding bullet, I could fly down there, take care of my business and be gone before she can blink an eye". So he swoops in, does his thing and disappears into the sky. Sensing the commotion, Wonder Woman cries out "What was that?". Invisible Man replies " I don't know, but all of the sudden my ass hurts".
Warren.
U syrup 'em
When i was younger, i used to drink any brand of  beer, but now  i am older Budweiser
He heard they had fresh beets.
Electricity
He's a lion in a coma. 
Hodor.
Shakespeare 
They're eternally disappointed by two-can Sam.  
I don't have a Ferrari in my garage.
Integration.
To pick up some chicks.
On a shellphone! My 7 year old self was very proud of coming up with this one....
Mein Kraft
Fire in the hole!
Nothing. Are you racist or something? 
She wanted some chicken.
quack
Jeffrey Dahmer!
His pants fit like a glove!!
They caught him stroganoff. 
A horse walks into a bar.  Bartender: why the long face ?  Horse: because I'm a raging alcoholic. 
Tennish
Because he sings lead. (Better read than said.)
Stopping it with a shovel. 
the new born white duckling fell into the mud. the filthy, filthy mud.
He turned a leaf and made an entry.
A brazillian
Unique up on it. How do you catch a tame bird? Tame way you caught the unique bird.
Because it was charged with battery!
Füreriously.
Rags to bitches
It was way over my head.
I Noah guy.
I'm bacon!
When it's ajar.
She eventually overcame her disorder, but then lapsed into compulsive overeating. She gained 300 pounds and died of a heart attack. In the end, she was a round character.
No one knows - every time they pick one up, they end up giving it away. 
A Brazilianaire!
He doesn't like to be spotted
A puppy eventually grows up and stops whining. Thanks to PuddinHead742 for this one.
He took a vow of Pavarotti.
A Brazillion...
A cannibal.
Weak back.
Yes, one blew this way and one blew that way.  [Someone wrote a biography about her so I thought I'd throw this one out there to commemorate - Sally Ride:America's First Woman in Space]
She was making quite the habit of it.
Red paint
Illegal
A pimple waits until you're 13-years-old before coming on your face. 
About a hundred bucks an hour.
so they can come when the prostitute hands the money to the guy
ur jellyfish
They just  .
He's very arcticulate! AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!!
A labracadabrador.
It's a play on words. 
Nothing, both were stuck up bitches.
Amandeep trouble.
I dunno, probably making friends and fitting in
They go phishing
Bach
"Pay attention. I'm only going to show this to you once."
an advent calender all those doors so many possibiltes.
Dad: But its your 12th cup tonight! Son: I know, the baby's room is still on fire.
With little Nazis.
We will  We will  Rock you!
I heard he is all right now.
They can go three weeks without water, but can't go a day without a hump.
Because he killed all the Yuenglings.
A honkey
Put him in a synagogue. 
Down ze hall on ze Third Reich!
A privet tutor
You put it in, you take it out, then you lose interest!
It was High Larrius 
To get to the other side.
So it won't get too Messi.
Nevermind, it's too corny.
There are always 4 men and 8 wheels on board, 8+4 is 12,  There are 12 inches in a ruler, Queen Mary was a ruler, Queen Mary was the name of a ship, Ships go on water, Fish are in water, Fish have fins, The Fins fought the Russians in the war, The Russian flag has red on it, ........and fire trucks are always russian
Finding a plane in your field.
Dos Eggies
He's still nuts over her.
Nevermind, it's time has passed.
It's arse
A: A mudslide How do you make one? A: Roll a coin down a hill Who is the richest man in India? A: The guy who got the coin
Because you cant take a joke.
It's ok now, he woke up.
A buck an ear
Why couldn't JFK become a boxer? Because he couldn't take a shot to the head.
March 14.
Because, nobody appreciates good friction anymore.
A twatstika....buh dum chh!
Sir cumcised
Neither of us have finished The Castle. 
Cashearing! (Joke I made up last night at work, so be gentle with me)
Well, Bubbles is back in town and wondering how you're doing these days...
He had   her.
to get to the other side...
Cause he wanted to get along little doggie.
Jesus had 11 guys he could depend on.
A phonygraph
A Spam.
to get to the geno-side.
You can't gargle sand.
Giraffic.
My zipper.
Because the steaks are too high. 
Nobody knows.
1001 1 to offer up the bulb and 1000 to scream 'Get in the hole'
The drunk driver will blow through a stop sign without even knowing it was there.. The high driver will wait until it turns green
Elixir
"It's my tummy, and I feed it NOW!"
Because they are always œuf.
Juan on Juan.
Because he was a cagey bee agent.
A small medium at large
Because he didn't have the thyme or the plaice.
A Conch.
Incognitoad.
A crummy thief!
You'll have to be a little patient.
Thtop taking the pith out of me!
They drive me up the fucking wall.
"You double timing son of a bitch!"
Twerquoise
I need a joke for a meeting we have tomorrow at work but I cant remember any good ones after following this tradition weekly for the last few months. It must be short with just an opening line and a punchline like this: The punchline doesnt have to be one word of course, but it cant be a long joke. Can anybody remember any good ones?
He heard the snow-blower was coming.
Because they can't even
7
That's why I stopped buying condoms.
Nevermind. It doesn't transplant well.
Well, the flag is a big plus.
From the German tank tracks.
NO PLEASE DON'T CUT OFF MY TOE!
Because it was a Number 2.
Oralé, homes!
Because they hate exorcising.
Yarrrrrrr Metis!
25 years - life 
Speedy Gonzales.
You can have a penis, and you can be proud of your penis, but don't shove your penis in my face.
Because he tries to keep things Loki...
Brash.
In Albu-quirky.
ICU
George Bush and Al Gore walks into a bar, and the bartender asks "what's up?" Bush says "Well, tomorrow, I'm going to have the troops storm into iraq and kill 2000 Iraqis and one bicycle repairman. The bartender replies "Oh my god, what did the bicycle repairman done to deserve this?" Bush then turns to Gore and patted him on the back and says "See, i told you no one would care about those 2000 iraqis."
STUPID AMERICAN!
Trick question, anarchists can't change anything.
Reality
It's ARRRtillery! bonus: A pirate's favourite melee weapon? A scimitARRR
Retards don't wear Black.
It all depends on how you look at it
cyance
What are the similarities between fat chicks and bricks,  they both get Laid by mexicans
 
He got hit by a bus
"...Would you like fries with that?"
A social leper.
Because they don't have any rulers.
A magic show is full of  
Boo-bees (say it out loud =D) NOTE: Not original. My uncle heard it on the radio, told it to me, and I shared it with you guys.
Because they're always high and outside. 
They both get paid by the load.
Cantaloupe.
Because there's no mail. (Male)
Bricks.
They call him... 
RubiCon.
Look under his kilt, if it's a quarter-pounder, he's a McDonald. 
His pants had no ballroom.
If it's red on top, fire in the hole.
Pepper spray
They both circle your anus searching for cling-ons
Cancer got Jobs
(It helps to know that the capital of Mozambique is Maputo and "puto" is a homophobic slur meaning "gay male prostitute" in Mexican Spanish.) Jokes are a fun way to learn about the world!
Because he's a C sponge!
Luiz Suarez.
Maui.
because there is alot of sin going on.
Dead on the inside...
Laziness is the art of taking rest before getting tired. lol
To see what was on the other side. 
His clean fingers. 
One slip of the tongue and you’re in deep shit.
Zeros and Juans.
Nothing
You don't get down from an elephant, you get down from a duck!
nun
A booby-trap
Cause they're always in the moo'd!
Well I've 'ad me ups n downs, but I've never been pushed to one side...  
She wasn't feeling herself that day.
I don't know, and I don't care.
Because they just cantaloupe.
Barack-oli
Because they don't know the words. 
Two for me and one for you.
"The Xbox One"
Karatea   From Fargo Ep. 2
A gummy bear!
Nobody knows!
"Did they seasonally adjust that score yet? Oh, and don't even get me started on the horrible weather on our side of the field!"
At least a brazillion dollars...
Sugar Puff Daddy
To steep.
Tea-towl
Someone who is not crazy.  Nomad= No+mad.
Your wife will always blow your bonus!
The iceeu
Shake that blasphemy
Nothing.
He got a little behind in his work.
Because if you take one, he'll drink all your beer
Spay Roses.
.... because a brazillian things could go wrong
The pope died a virgin
Because he was biting.
Artificial intelligence.
Eat chicken and watermelon then wash it down with grape drink.
Their flag is a big plus. 
Because Freedom Rings. 
The finish line at the Boston Marathon.
Her Miscarriage.
Linkin Park.
Because he was taking the pith. /gets coat. bai.
My grandma doesn't die when I fuck her.
'Cause he has infinite degrees of FREEEEEDOM!!!
She has a tampon behind her ear and she can't find her pencil.
Sue.
I don't know, and I don't care one way or the other.
You black male.
I'm not sure, but I know 
Half time, they get to switch sides again 
He went up on a guy.
With a look over the shoulder.
I used to like tractors, but I don't anymore.
Once you've heard Juan, you've heard Jamal.
Because he was suspended ! EDIT : Mistyped title : Why Jesus didn't play in FIFA World Cup in 33 ?
Ghetto
Hey! We really DO taste like chicken!
A wanton one-ton wonton.
The other day I was walking down the street and I saw a man with a dog on a leash. I approached and asked "does your dog bite?" He said no and I as I reached down to pet the dog it jumped up and bit my hand. I was little upset and said "Hey I though your dog didn't bite!" To which he replied "that's not my dog."
Because it can't drive a car without making it all denty.
Because there aren't any free erections.
Because he was a little behind on Rent!
Unix.
An  -tuary!
I guess you haven't rolled it down far enough.
"I don't have time for your ship."
Moped
Call a toe truck.
bae's theorem
Because it wasn't feline well
A. A pilot...you racist
The south shall rise again!
An EULer spill
Because storm troopers always miss.
I rock. You Rock. We Rock.  Disclaimer: This joke was made during a 6 hour road trip with the family. My only scenery was rocks. 
Because he's dead.
Two marks.
A Brazilian.
15 years.
They're both short essays.
A cold shoulder
Two test tickles. 
I can go to sleep with a light on
A polygone!
The teabag stays in the cup longer.
Diego wop wop wop .
Bicepsual.
A rebel without applause. 
he was up all night, wondering if there was a dog.
An anti-derivative. 
RUN! She's got a grenade in her mouth!
I don't   lobsters!
The Holocaust
They are putting lines in your face!
Well, one you shuck between the fits and the other...
He grounded him.
Because the cell doors was still locked
The Lakers . (Laker fan here. Sorry prob would have been more appropriate last week during the finals. ) Edit: I heard this some where the other day. I can't take credit for the joke . 
The referee
Trying to fit in.
Hodor.
Not being retarded. 
HEY HEY!!!!
At the bottom of the fifth the bags were loaded.
The teabag stays in the cup longer.
How come when a woman is pregnant, people rub her tummy and say, "Congratulations" but no one rubs the guy's balls and says "Good job"?!
Bison.
Hitler stopped trying at 6 million.
The Yellow Fellow. 
Everyone can roast beef
...Yeah, it's a real hole in the wall.
A Nantucket.
lettuce pray
...A tea bag stays in the cup longer!
Doctor, you racist son of a bitch.
Subduction!
If they were forced on you as a child you probably don't like them as an adult.
Because she's dead.
The fallopian tuba. 
The Mediterranean Sea
i turn women gay all the time.
He was killing two birds with one stone
68, because at 69, you eat it.
Acne doesn't cum on a boys face until he is 13.
Because they're cheetahs.
Not much, but the flag is a big plus.
A crackhead buys crack so he can put it into his pipe and burn it. A John pays so that he can put his pipe into a crack that might burn him.
I don't know, I left early.
Attractive.
Urine.
The one with the smallest 
It is possible that UFOs exist.
Because they are always right
Too much overhead.
Because Noddy won't pay the ransom!
I heard they played like Shiate'
Both should have said no to the latest update. 
Push him down a hill. BONUS: How do you make French Wine? Invade.
They're on your buccan head!
Talk about a meatier shower!
It was time to split. 
A titty bear.
...Depends.
Both cum on your face when you're 13. How are Roman Polanski and body hair similar?  Both cum on your ass when you're 13.
they're afraid of natural light
So you would never know what side he was on.
Because it feels like a wizard's sleave.
 "Cabaret Sauvignon"  What's the director's favorite drink?  "Cabernet Show-must-go-on" ... maybe this is more appropriate for   
A señor citizen.
Middle East
There's 20 of them.
They've never been spotted.
Take me to the airport.
Because he was a cheetah.
Because it's BS. Yea that was bullshit. Fine I'll cut it out..
The woman coming out of church as hope in her soul!
You can tuna piano but you can't piano a tuna! Don't ask me about the bucket of glue though... I've been stuck there for a while
Because he didn't want to get the cold shoulder.
Even the pool tables have no balls
I bet you haven't; he died laughing. 
A hooker can wash her crack and sell it again.
Cast iron.
A shout out goes to   for the thread where this was originally posted: And also to   for the setup:
Asbestos he can.
He always gets stuck on 2 Across.
The Ghanarena
Sin language 
You use an o-silly-scope!
I see frozen peas are cool this time of year. ..you might say that's a corny joke, but it's really not. It's a pea joke.
James Blunt
She never saw it coming!!!
Shuriken
Fiancée
It was too self-loafing.
Two Wongs don't make a Reich 
Well I hear he's back in town. Source: The Amazing Jeffery 
They're into pussies.(; 
It was Terror bull.
Cause his mom was in a jam. :(
Half of a worm in half of a cherry.
A socialist who wants to be king!
The nun has hope in her soul.
Pole Position
A-lemon-tree my dear Watson.
The feel the leash go slack! (heard this one while listening to some irish tunes)
The Miami Heat flag.
They didn't believe in integration.
Yoko Ono
Hazelnuts are normally around $1.50/lb, deernuts are always under a buck. 
It Herzegovina 
Shoes wisely
the veins 
A member of the Queen's guard doing a single squat.
1 corpsepower
The Mos Eisley can't even.
Kill his family.
He's been underground for five years now.
Not z, that's for sure.
The Marquis de 
A God Dam!
When you pull your meet out of a freezer it doesn't fart
Well they said the wedding was okay, but the reception was awesome!
Having to go inside and ask for a coat-hanger.
Right now, I don't have a Lamborghini ;)
He was knotty. 
The mass * acceleration is strong with you.
An eggsy-stench-alist.
Pierre to Pierre.
Period films
Log jam.
Porn.
Yeah. I saw it coming too.
Chimp handsfree
He didn't want to be spotted.
Me open up.
They get jalapeño business. 
You pokemon.
In little nazis
Avo, CA does.
A threeway
Engage.
Tennish
The chicken, eggs don't cum.
They're too shell-fish!
Cantaloupe...
Tennish.
Dokken
Ivana Pulyova
Nothing
One is a Snack Cracker and the other is a Crack Snacker!!
See ya next month.
......Bloke chaps. Play me off Johnny!
Never mind, there's no point. 
They both get clubbed by Norwegians...
Because he couldn't find a Date!
He locked the bass player in the car.
Four rosters of boners & you'd want to die too.
He didn't see a porpoise...
Qwack
They make up everything.
Because SJP kept eating the script.  Come on, someone has to have something better than me for this. 
One.
Because it was rated "PG"
Cancer. ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Peter Pansky
Slow down and grab some lube!!
A wireless notwork
Ceasefire 
He had to get a C-PUP machine.
It rhymes when they say. "Keep at eye out for a coyote."
GRAAAAAAINS!
Because it's too hard on the donkey.
Because dey go baa...
It takes longer to pick up.
She's just a country!
FREEDOM RINGS
Because she was a-Kraid to. Now I think about it, this joke is a bit more "Riddle-y," than say an actual joke.
Typing withw my peniuasd 9damnit!)
COOOOOOOOOOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAALLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Because they literally can't even.
It's a fish.
Hebrews it
About halfway between Dayton and Marion
Greece! (courtesy of my ten year old)
I don't know but they sure are Russian.
You get some hoes and they get dough for you.
The Hare Force
Yeah but it doesn't work there assholes are too small.
No strings attached.
Cause they can't stab them in the back
A hallucination.
N and Y. 
Because the Paracetomol
He really had loco-motives.
Ears!
A Sandy Hook survivor!!
The Kurds have their ways
One to unscrew it, and one to hold the     ladder. 
Gets jalapeño business.
Irene.
Scotch tape.
Two cows.
There's twenty of them.
Vampliers
unique up on it. (im sorry)
Um what's her name? Blonde girl, Reece someone .... "Witherspoon?" No, no. It was with a knife. 
Dam. What did the dam say to the fish? Dumb bass.
It's a riot.
because they're too poor to afford chairs.
A blood-light
Aqua-Vlad
It was a high school.
Icy dead people!
The short ones are never good.
Trilobite, you'll love it!
Finnish Hymn!
Depends on how many cops planted it there
Outstanding in his field
It has two bytes and no memory
He couldn't stand all the racket!
Someone saw the face of Ralph Waldo Emerson on a tortilla.
He had no   to go with!!! As told by a Professor, in a serious Aerospace class, reading off of Laffy Taffy.
Just Juan
So the Mexicans can window shop.
Depends
The first couple of times you cough, the loogeys aren't yours!
A mosquito can "fly", but a fly can not "mosquito".
One has hope in her soul...
Dick
Because the last time he took political orders from a Bush, his country went mucking around in the Middle East for forty years.
He got the bill for gas
Eat-a-lotta-puss
Cos Lettuce
Because it gets past-your-eyes (pasteurized)
Too soon, man. 
Oops i forgot it. .
Bologna.
Because he crawls in his hole during winter.
A new last name.
Someone who is outstanding in his field.  Credit: Laffy Taffy
The toilet. It always takes all the shit.
None, they'll just compliment it and get pissed when it won't screw. 
A mazal tov cocktail
Cat-has-trophy. Such punny. Much Cringe. 
It stops you eyes from sticking together.
Because they can't even
Barium
YemenHeads
"You dumb motherfucker!"
"I see the floor in your plan."
You can negotiate with terrorists
You're too young to smoke!
Cuz he be Ilyn. 
When Joseph served in Pharaoh's court
Two feet of my cock in your ass.
Two unemployed Irishmen walk past a police notice board with "two black men wanted for rape" first one says "fucking niggers get all the best jobs"
Keep the tip!
He ran into trafiki.
A pair of slippers! :D
The Strokes
Nobody eats rice pudding.
He was looking for pooh.
In little nazis!
WATAAAH! 2.What is Bruce Lee's favorite hamburger?  WHOPPAH! 3.Which hotel does Bruce Lee stay overnight?  HYAAAAATT!
The directions clearly state: "Rinse, lather, repeat"
A smallrus.
Dad doesn't piss all over his dinner. :D
It was a ranged marriage.
Because all proper tea is theft.
Fucking hertz.
He just came out of nowhere 
He was paid per word.
Up Djibouti!
aggregated basalt
Forest gunk.
plague-arism
They saw him getting blown in the back seat.
Castro-intestinal distress.
It needs more space.
Elephant grape sine theta.
Nothing, you can't cross a vector and a scalar.
The former has a cunning array of stunts
Incase onion rings
He only does brojobs.
He said, “Hey, everybody! I AM JESUS CHRIST!” and then jumped into a pool believing he could walk on water. He sank right down to the bottom. He was totally diluted.
corduroy
I'll be Bach.
"I don't know"   Wanna go for a picnic?
Conditioner Gordon.
Lentil next time.
Propanic Depression
A dictator.
Taco Bell's Cannon
A bone cause all the bitches run after it
Its musk
They came in like a wrecking ball.
— Actually, I don't know, son. And I don't give a shit.
The Child Predators. 
At the Chocolate Mint.
They're both assholes who can't commit.
It has its ups and downs.
I have kleenexes.
He was surrounded by phone-ys!
I'll start What is the difference between chopping up a baby and an onion? - chopping up an onion makes you cry.
Cut a hole in the ice, place peas around the hole and when the Polar bear comes up to take a pea, you kick it in the icehole. :)
Meat Patty.
Crimea River
Their capital is always Dublin. Hehe
I wasn't a big fan of the idea
I don't know, but it isn't  !
I need some good jokes about deli and or the meats and cheeses sold in them. 
A boy fell in the mud. Want to hear a clean joke? The boy took a bath with bubbles. Want to hear a dirty joke? Bubbles is the girl next door,
Brooklyn 
Homiecide
Just one. But it takes 20 episodes
"You discussed me!"
Because they push back harder. 
Because there's no rust for the wicked
None. Lightbulbs promote rape culture.
The Sachs
Tree O'clock!
A BokBok...
One is an array of cunning stunts!
They constantly discuss productivity GOOOOOOOOOOOOOOAAAAALs.
Depends on how thick you slice 'em. 
Because they literally can't even.
His dick tastes like shit.
Just cos.
in his sleevies!!!
Because icing is not allowed.
NONE OF YOUR DAMN BUSINESS! AM I BEING DETAINED?
Nothing. They just waved...
He was always dropping the bass. 
The Meatball
He just couldn't find the guys angle!
To remind black people they picked cotton before they sold drugs.
One.
Because only Siths deal in absolutes.
A sandwitch
Twitter only allows 160 characters
Mitosis
Ze-bras!
A can't opener. 
Rrrrrrrrrrrr Kelly 
Weedicide.
The "p" is silent.
piece of cake
It's the only thing that they get something  straight inside a woman's head.
20 after 1.
A guy is walking down the street and sees a brown lump ahead. "Is that dog poo?" He thinks to himself. He approaches it to examine if it is dog poo. "Well it looks like dog poo." He bends down and sniffs it. "Smells like dog poo." He grazes the substance with his finger. "Feels like dog poo." His finger scoops up a part of the poo, and he licks it. "Tastes like dog poo.... Yep, this is dog poo alright." "Well, good thing I didn't step in it."
"I'll take a shot"
Good hiders, aren't they?
Take the "F" out of "free" and the "F" out "way". ... (there's no effin' way)
Because they are always stalin.
They always leave a piece of themselves behind.
She thought it was diet coke.
Hebrews it
Guac-a Guac-a!
Because they always take things littorally
Cell culture.
Wipe it off and apologise.
He did the wurst. 
Kendrick Lamarrghhhh
A frog if you throw it hard enough...
A prick
Holy shit.
It's the world's quietest pervert. 
a Barker Lounger !
Nice shades. (sorry)
A parsnip.
Μμ
To keep geese from speeding!
IT'S R/AWW!!
Because an apple a day keeps the doctor away.
It's a quickie....but you do it yourself
A rip off.
a stick :) haha (yes i know its super lame)
Shanghai
A taxidermist takes only your skin. [Mark Twain]
When he was told to "go big or go home," he only had one option.  (I've posted this joke here before, but I believe I've been the first, so if you recognize it as a repost it's because I wanted to tell it again!)
Because he swept for 20 years.
College professor asks students , "  There is so much so going on about big data right now so What is big data ?" John responds , " Sir, its like teenage sex.  Nobody quite understand it, everybody says know how to do it and claims to have done it and tell stories about how amazing was it everyday"
The wheelchair
How should I know? I just fly the drones.
A little bitch
One's a Goodyear, and the other's a great year. x/post from 
Their lipstick.
Your Dad and I are getting a divorce. 
None. They just sit around and compliment it and get pissed when it won't screw.
Both are fucking close to water.
Microsoft 
The American rabbit goes hippity hop and the French rabbit goes lickety split!
Give me some good jokes I can laugh at that are casual enough to be put into a conversation or just tell me some jokes I can laugh at. One liners are preferred but story jokes can be fun as well
They both come on little crackers!
"Hello ladies"
They glazed into each other's eyes
he was snowden
Dafeat
Because they've been lied to all their lives about how long "8" inches   is.
Check, mate.
Jose 
Male Boxes. 
It's got great food, just no atmosphere..
GET OFF ME HOMES!
Jose can you see
Because they have no pits.
...the radiush.
Horns in the back Asshole up front.
A colour scheme.
A hooker that just won the lottery
His name was Mike Dyson.
To remeber the black man of what he did before he dealt drugs.
It is as close as they can get to making love to a tree.
They always pick it up pick it up pick it up.
TosTADA!
None, they'll compliment it, but then get pissed off when it doesn't screw.
Infidel Castro
She couldn't stand making Kermitments
Chiseled.
Head over heels
"The Kaaay Kaaay Kaaaaay!"
As a teacher, its very hard to know where to stand in class. At the front where you cant see the students but can write on the board, or at the back where you can see the students and not write on the board. Its not an easy decision to make, not by a long chalk
Wind chimes.
Mike Jones is Still Tippin'.
Because days of fuchsia passed
Dropping some ill beets.
I can't peanut butter my dick down your mom's throat. 
Hee broo
By giving her a Brazilian wax first!
None.  The lightbulb contains the seeds of its own revolution.  
No, you have to charge it.
I can run a 5k pretty well but these 10ks are killing me.
Your mom can't take a joke.
 (credit to one of the writers from Bob's Burgers).
Customer: Oh I just moved the potatoes and there it was!
never mind, just forget about it, it's probably over your head.
Asparagus...
Shlo-mo.
An aunt-eater.
Because he killed all 144 characters -stolen from 
A dick in a box
They knew no one would come.
For looking at kitty porn.
All they found was a dead beetle...
Because if you just take one, he'll drink all your beer.
All their best work is behind them
Because the Indians just kept coming, and coming...
Because their liquor is strong and their women are hairy.
FawnDoo! Nailed it.
R and J
They  allel park
Kick the alter boy in the chin ;)
8008132
So blind people can hate them to
One to drop it and six to pick it up pick it up pick it up
The leisure centre. 
I don't know, I just fly the drone.
He dumped his girlfriend...  
Ba-na-na-na! 
Because they can't even...
My zipper
It's fine, he woke up.
Irene.
Because he felt like bacon. :P
Satisfying 
They are both in bread.
The wheelchair.
A-Men.
They're making headlines!
Two jews fighting over a penny. 
You just make fun of it, and it cuts itself!
Ass fucking cunt bitch just one cocksucker whore
A P. Because it's like an ARR, but it's missing a leg.
Quackers.
Piratechnics!
Heblew.
He was the odd Nguyen out.
Not all men.
I thought you said you'd never forget.
A firecracker
I guess the eggplant came first! I work at a grocery store and a guy in the produce department told me this. He thought it was hilarious
The farmer shucks between fits.
Some idiot pulled it out to late
Because the competition is stiff. 
A jack-off all trades.
Tried to jump 47 niggers with a steamroller.
An Eggsodus.
They'll both make you one with everything. 
There were no FAT-alities, but everyone felt really, really dead.
A pick pocket snatches watches. 
cantaloupe
Macaque
China!
Two psychotherapists pass each other in the hallway. The first says to the second, "Hello!" The second smiles back nervously and half nods his head. When he is comfortably out of earshot, he mumbles, "God, I wonder what   was all about?"
A ginger bread man
He tripped a fan
Hogwarts.
They had a hung jury.
Because there horns don't work. :)
Korean Barbecue.
They were in the same grade!!
"Hey dude, what's your moms name?" "Sarah" "How do you spell it?" "S-a-r-a-h" "No, haha you spelt it wrong!" "Bitch, I'm pretty sure I know how to spell it" "No you don't" "Fine, how do you spell it?" "I-t"
It's called 2fast2furherious.
Just one she hokds the blub and the world revolves around her.
About six drinks
He needed a kid knee transplant.
It takes two to make a dingo write.
A Robber Ducky!  
I don't know, I couldn't hear him through the door.
Because he knows it's a waste of time, it's impossible to get a Muslim to take a shower
'cause you can't Shaka Zulu.
I don't know about the piano, but she sucks at the organ.
He was Bjorn again. 
The hooker stops fucking you when your dead.
An answer panzer!
Cast Steel! Bahahahahah! You know! Cause it has a poor dampening value it vibrates so much! They um. They both vibrate. Well ok. One vibrates, the other reciprocates. That's kinda... Hehe. Heh.  Reciprocate my humor damn it!
a shellocopter.  damn homies 
Having to see your ex at family gatherings.
Toucan
Very little, he brews. 
If you have a son, there's only one penis you have to worry about. 
A kangajew
Because Hitler at least wrote his own books
It's Terminal. (OC joke.)
Two, one to change the bulb and another to hold the penis. ladder! I meant ladder.
Nothing.  (It's a cucumber.  (They don't talk.))
she had no arms
To protect himself from UV Rays
He chose to walk the world barefoot which caused he feet to blister a thousand times over. He ate only bugs and berries that he found in nature which caused him to became very frail. This diet also caused him to be plagued with horribly bad breath. He was known as the Super Calloused Fragile Mystic Hexed by Halitosis.
The Holocaust
She does netwerking!
What did the NSA agent say when the blizzard hit? Looks like we're snowed in.
Misoyaki!
Oprahs Black
he was out-standing in his field.
What is a carpenters dream girl? Flat as a board, skinny as a nail and easy to screw.
Because they'll take them too hard.
Artificial Intelligence.
because he kisses his mother with that mouth.
He walks into a bra. 
They think, therefore they ARRRRRRRR!
They both came in a little behind.
If they had 4, it would be a chicken sedan!
Having a pair of legs...... I know, I know, I'm going to hell
It could be R and the C, but they definitely aren't OC.  
A whore doesn't always suck cock. 
Mandel broth Ha ha ha The puns I make up while working as a grocery cashier..
...you give him space.
They go to Y'arrgggghhh sales. 
The teacher asked Jimmy, "Why is your cat at school today Jimmy?" Jimmy replied crying, "Because I heard my daddy tell my mommy, 'I am going to eat that p*ssy once Jimmy leaves for school today!'"
Habit
"ARGHH! You're driving me nuts!"
Finding a treasure chest with no booty.
You'd think it would be "Arrrr" but it's actually the C.
"Arrrrr?"  Nope... you'd think so, but it'd be the "C." 
They both murder on the high C's.
Na na na na na na na na BAT MAN What do you say when a stolen Batmobile drives by? Na na na na na na na na BLACK MAN
TOTEM POLE!!
A: Because they are 'Lo Mein-tenance' and they don't won a ton of attention. ...but then again, Italian noodles have great Penne-tration...
 
They are both meteorologists. (Works better spoken)
Ok, so this three part one which requires a little build up: Ask, "what a pirate's favorite letter?" Usually people get the "Rrrr" Ask, "What's a pirates favorite restaurant?" Wait for a response: "Harrrdees" or "Arrrbys"  and lastly, ask "What's a pirate's favorite branch of the military?" At this point you should get "the ARrrrrmy" and you reply "No it's the Navy stupid!"
He missed Debussy. I'll just leave.
Rob...wait for it... erto! Rubeartoe!
A small chest with no booty. 
Six. One to change it, one to take pictures and four to make t-shirts for the event. 
Jock Itch!
Hello
That's okay! We prefer hummers anyway! 
Ones like: what's the difference between dinner and your sister? I wash my hands before eating dinner.
They always turn out to be sub par.
An elk It has the E, the L, and the K. Would like to hear some more if you guys have any.
Keep the tip
If you lay them right the first time, you can walk all over them for years.
"I herd that!"
Because they AAAAAARRRRRRRRRRRRR!!!!!!!!!
YARRRRMULKES. 
Don't worry! They will tell you!
A watchman. 
90,000 buckets. 
They both have flies on them.
Fire.
Because one more, and it would be too-farty.
A gorilla is ground-dwelling, predominantly herbivorous ape that inhabits the forests of central Africa, & your mother is a nice lady.  ... Also I did not have sex with a gorilla.
A glutton for punishment.
They both care way too much about the Đức Dynasty.
Dim Sum.
Because watching people porkin' just ain't Kosher! Wakakakaka
BROOM BROOM BROOOOOOOM
Milk.  Because it's pasteurised before you see it.
Deer balls. Because they are under a buck.
Me too.
I guess you could say it's a procrasti-NATION
Hodor. Hodor! Hodor! 
Little Caesars (say it out loud)
He kept making rash decisions.
Sandiego  (The first joke I ever made as a kid)
"Allah akbar!"
They were putting drugs in there products
Baguette and tag it. 
The mistress says "Oh, darling - that was  !", and the wife says "Beige. I think we'll paint the ceiling beige..."
A hens nights
it's butt.
Give him a basketball and ask him what it says. 
A fart.  It goes through your pants without even making a hole.
Because he was pissed off.
So that the Puerto Ricans can window-shop. 
Clearly not this one!
Because they can't even...
All men must die.
JPEG
quatro cinqo  sorry
Nice Assimo.
To get to the other bar!
Because it was dead. 
QUACK
Back up a couple of inches. 
a Lenin. ;)
A pool table.
Irene.
Yesterday at social get together I was explaining to my friend how android is better than iOS in many respect.  A  girl in group says, "Are you that cool nerd guy?" I replied, "Yum"
Because flashing gives them seizures.
because he's a kaiju
Because their P is silent.
They both come on those little jugs of Olive Oil.
A napkin.
They both moan like hell when they come, and they take the whole damn house when they leave.
A thief snatches your watch...
It was sold to the highest Buddha.
Clever Dick.
These are nacho-nachos.
A sperm whale. * *
It makes your dick look HUUUGE!
Neil Armstrong was the first man on the moon, and Michael Jackson rapes kids and gets away with it.
More like Anal 
One's got hydraulics, the other's got high bollocks.
Because people are dying to get in.
They SS it.
Because love means nothing to them!
amuse me first...hahaha
I yam that I yam.
A Sven diagram!
About four beers 
Trick question; the rooster.
His name was Mahatma Coat.
Ahh Phuket. Nevermind.
Because it's   is silent....
I don't have a stick up my ass!
Well it's over your head anyway...
You better C  or you'll B
Because he was dead!
Aarrrrrrr Kelly!
This is mostly because the antelope has powerful hind leg muscles, and houses can't jump.
Jacket Chan
I heard one recently, what do you get when you put TNT in a bra? Tit bits.
Because you never know if they're seeing someone on the side.  
Whodyanikanipplov
Someone to kiss while you're wanking
funny or not
Yasalivason Medickubitch
follow the Fresh Prints! 
Hairy Potter
European
K.
Once you hear it, it's already too late.
A waist of time.
His mom was in a jam. 
iFap
There are no   videos of Mike Tyson.
Just two, but you're going to need a lot of patience and light bulbs.
It was two tired.
One is a Holocaust denier, and the other one rapes women and gets away with it.
Would #69 be too offensive?
KAAA DOOOUUCHE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
So they don't burst when you fuck them
Don't worry... they'll tell you.
He read that it was an invisible solid. 
They spent a year doing missionary work.
Nothing. It's a gift she will always remember. Edit: Wording clarified (Thanks to therinnovator).
It's true. You drink too much you get fat, get emotional, talk too much, cry, and you can't drive a car. All apologies to the fairer sex.
Yeah, it needs a little work.
A nice young hillbilly couple decided to get married. Their parents wanted to give them the best wedding ever, so they reserved the nicest hotel in town. Everything was perfect. After the wedding the newlyweds went to the front desk to check in. The desk clerk asked,"Bridal" and the new husband said "Na, I'll just hold her by the ears till she gets used to it".
1.21 JiggaWhats
Pontius Pilates.
Because they don't C#
Too many thank-you notes to write
The cue tip.
The Bald Eagle is free c:
If you can smell the pussy across the room, it's probably not the good stuff.
An irrelephant.
In yarr'ds.
Because he prefers Dick's.
Nunavut.
Russell.
He was fired because of his walk. He had a problem with heels.
Because they've done nothing to deserve it.
Novak.
Mother's Day.
What makes the loudest noise in the jungle?
ya, he finally came out of the cupboard.
The headlines read "Small Medium at Large"
Atrophy. 
They had such success with  , where you box one round then play a game of chess, they tried to created another combination sport called baseball poetry. You play an inning of baseball, then compose one poem. "Ve vere not so gut at it ven ve practiced," said a spokesman. "And ven ve tried to play anozzer team, tings quickly vent from bat to verse."
How many chicks do you know that would turn up for a cunt scrape?
To get a Pabst smear.
He made Mary Shelly roll over in her grave.
Wartortellini!
Serving dual porpoises!
You tickle its citrus. (all credit to the movie  )
Everywhere.
To which the Roman replied "I Wood" because he lived in the 1st house on Wood st. 
The police are on the lookout for hardened criminals.
Because when he found the correct position, he didn't have the momentum, and when he finally found the time, he didn't have the energy. 
IN HIS SLEEVIES LOL xp cuz it's like armies like babi talk for arms instead of an armie like a bunch of dudes w/ issues w/ theer masculinity  np, glad i cud explain dis 2 u
He didn't last too long; his jokes didn't get the best reactions.
mourning wood
It only takes your left hand to type "stewardesses"
An informant
hey kid, wanna buy some candy?
To get to the other side
A zoo with no animals.
Bass players
They both bore the fuck out of you!
He would be robin.
Hyuuuuuuundaaaaaiiiieeeiiii
Mad Cow Disease" was already taken.
It's making headlines. 
You may now "hiss" the bride.
Icy dead people.
For shits and giggles
amiright?
Someone who knocks on your door and tells YOU to fuck off.
Eric Clapton would absolutely NEVER let an ounce of cociane fall 49 stories out a window onto the streets of New York.
Hopefully this is the right place for this. But I'm looking for more jokes like the "Fuck me and I'll tell you" joke and the "Knock Knock/May I come in who?" joke. Basically, any joke that sets you up to be inappropriate toward the one being told to insinuate some sort of sexual relations.
I falafel.
About halfway.      
Your love life.
Because black people make "Wong" decisions! 
To draw blood.
the security is pretty lenient 
They both hang out at the Space Bar.
I don't dough!
Because you spend more but, at least you don't get a virus
An Ethiopian Chicken
Only 1, she'll hold the bulb in place and wait while the world revolves around her.
...When he tells you that your wife's hair smells good.
Chillin. 
They lose their shit over the smallest things!
Because you are raisin my dick
does anyone know a knock knock joke that's actually funny? most of the ones i have heard are not funny at all. 
She was a rare medium, well-done. 
(Better said than written)  Ask someone, "Do you like fish sticks?"  If they reply yes,  Ask them, "So you like putting fish sticks in your mouth?" They will say yes, then you call them a gay fish.
Soy milk.
A caiman like a wrecking ball.
Because everyone uses the Internet to look up phone numbers or people don't have landlines anymore and cell phone numbers aren't listed in the phone book. Also people use social media to communicate and connect with people.
I like little asian kids
Because there are so many "Wings" and "Wongs" they'd still wing the wong number. 
Because they can't even.
...a DVD.
The USS Arrrrrr
Turner, Front, Mascher, Cherry
Rich woman and her driver are out in the country. They get a flat tire, and of course the driver can't get the hubcap off. The woman searches the tool bag, and spies a tool that will help. "You want a screwdriver?" she asks. "Might as well, I can't get this damned hubcap off." 
They both get paid to chauffeur. (show fur)
Nun
It's called Pulpit Fiction
Guccheese.
Cause they would quack up.
The Y.
Most people don't get angry when you toss a salad.
He didnt see the point.
Their dancing can make it rain.
Sarah Palin
Egg_salad
Because from a distance, they looked like hare.
Because she can clean her crack and sell it again
No matter how much you shake them, they still leak a little bit when you try and put them away.
In the duke box!
A period piece
A CABBAGE!
"I'm Slavic and I know it"
Cinco de Mayo
Autobots, roll up!
Your father...
BILLY MAYS HERE!
Because 6 7 8! ...(in honor of May 4th Star Wars day)...
If they were Jewish their dicks couldn't live in the hood.
It's your pussy's way of saying "I love you."
A jolly rogering.
Well, he burned his lips on the exhaust pipe.
Because she was a woman. 
It was Saturn by Uranus.
Life without parole
They like their fur long! I'll show myself out...
Paul Walker wouldn't be caught dead in a Honda
Your girl has to chew before she swallows. 
 Yogurt, dammit! I meant   doesn't hit the back of your partner's throat at 30 MPH. * I always mess up punchlines when I'm drunk!
Because they were only a quideach
That sinking feeling...
They have sects.
Fission chips.
You have to sit in the back of the gas chamber
"Let me be loud and clear!"
A koke.
"Some men have greatness thrust upon them, some men thrust upon greatness."
He never did turn up.
He worked for tips. 
The same way you take the F out of 'way'
He was really beside himself after that one.
Because 4 8 16!
Because the P is silent.
He heard beer was on the house
Hebrews.
Hebrew up.
A refrigerator doesn't fart when you pull the meat out!
He fell to pieces.
You get your palm red for free.
He wipes his butt!
Because its head is so far away from its body.
Because the P is silent!
Dental floss.
Because you'll give them hearing AIDS.
They only had 2 vans 
They're bitter.
Bugs Bunny! 
Argon
Because she was his relative
Benoit B Mandelbrot 
Two self-conscious guys taking a shit in a public restroom.
I can't get my whole fist in the Pringles guy's can.
A half-ass joke. Credit to   for inspiration. 
a) A Roamin' Catholic b) An unconscious habit
Crucifried
Ask him to count how many sexual partners he has had (Because they're sheep fuckers).
Would you like me to show you what it feels like to get nailed?
Don't stand so close to me.
A bull shiht
Lightbulb.
No ballroom
Tell you the truth, it's pretty bad. It's filled with holes.
Because they can't even.
A  . 
Cool your jets.
Because they're SO-VIET
Zero.
Kermit the frogs finger.
One is an oscar meyer weiner, the other admires oscar's weinner
A clop cop.
He always takes office clothes.
"you turn me on"
Speed bumps
A little suspect
The judges said "Sorry, we've got enough dumbbells"
A park bench can support a family.
tickle its balls.
Elton John in a coma.
Anyone can roast beef. 
Because they bring Mayflowers
Dewy
He worked his problem out with a pencil.
You could say he is all right now
oops, forgot the ky
Because she doesn't get to marry the best man. 
A six-pack and a potato
You get your palm red for free.
Because all his friends Argon.
You can't wash your face in a buffalo.
Cancer
Because she had no arms. Knock, knock. Who's there? Not Susie.
A dirty cotton rock sucker.
Q: What do you call a blind Australian Crocodile? A: Crocodile Dunsee
Because she had no arms. Why did she not get back up? Because she had no legs. What did Jill get for Christmas? A bicycle.
I don't know where they stand on the issue.
I don't know he hasn't opened it yet. 
To prevent double billing.
A b
Threw it overboard. it formed the UK. Taken from here: 
A Kenyan child. 
An escapea 
Because they're the class cut-ups.
A grrrrrrrizzly bear
He stuck a match in a frogs ass and then shaved the skin off of the frog. Looking at it upside down he said "now who wants some popcorn?"
Antelopes.
Nevermind, it's over your head
Rihanna.
Because he's one of the few people in World that couldn't kick down the door.
It's baaad...
A cow-culator! (Cue groans)
you can't wank yourself clever.
A Nietzsche-t sheet!
He was outstanding in his field 
Calculator!
she didn't see him coming
Klaustrophobic
first they drop the bass. then they pickitup-pickitup-pickitup!
Queries.
To get to the second hand store!
Decaffeinated!  Bah dum dum...ting
Stand in a corner, corners are 90 degrees 
They don't know the words.
Have you ever tried to open a grilled cheese sandwich?
Because they're too cheap to buy the new! 
Rub your bloody dick on his teddy bear.  (think about it) 
OCD, OCD, OCD. Wait the last time didn't feel right. OCD, OCD, OCD. Wait, the second time didn't feel right. OCD, OCD, OCD. Wait...
Hushpuppies.
No? Eh, it's way over your head.
Now is the winter of our discount tents
Malaysia Airlines Flight 370
Because you don't want them hanging around Parks at night.
half a dog [Derek, s01e05]
2 Mennonite. 
Don't worry, he woke up
It's After Earth Day.
Because, he doesn't want anyone to know he's screwing a chicken.
Floral sex.
Prolly wanted a cracker!
Fire Crackers.
Q: What's the difference between zombies? A: Zombies make honey, and zombies don't.
Plow Me!
Because they don't know what to do with cap sizes.
Give it to Michael J Fox
Tequila Mockingbird. (X-post  )
Your ears
Because he makes so many brilliant deductions.
A trip without the kids.
A stick
A freezer doesn't fart when you take the meat out!
Because of their inability to pass the bar! Credit to my dad for this one
He was talking smack. 
Palm Sunday.
The horses would drown. Ba-dum TISH
Because they have a quidditch.
Been awhile since I've her some priest and a rabbi jokes. Hit me with your best one! Mine: a priest and a rabbi are waking down the street  The priest asks " wanna screw some kids?" The rabbi replies "out if what?"
Lion vomit.
Traitor Joe's
Barium
The second page of a youtube search.
Nothing. Weren't you listening?
an electron
There isn't a single person left!  Bwahahahahaha
Juan Republic
[reasons unknown]
Because it takes three days for him to rise again, and two thousand years to come twice.
Too many Negus.
Because he doesn't want anyone to know he's fucking a chicken.
Because it has to come from his own sack (Joke might work better in Dutch, where 'zak' means both sack and pocket)
You can steal a car but you can't drive it. 
Edit*: tried to fix the 1 into a 3 but my Reddit app is being a bitch.
"I D K"
Because he doesn't want everyone to know that he's been fucking that chicken.
Numberwank.
Because all he says is "Chug Chug Chug"
They work it out with a pencil.
Udder destruction!
A Pastatute
Kill-joy
Mine is: Wht do Jewish men have their sons circumsised? Because they know Jewish women can't resist anything 10% off.
Dunk your head in a bucket of water and pull it out twice. 
They're both white fluffy things that float high above the fruitful land where the seeds are planted. Source: Brandon Sanderson
Bison
He only comes once a year.
He turns into Kim Jong-ill!
They got new fur coats. 
The teacher says, "Spit out your gum," but a train says, "Chew chew!"
It's been called a dairy drama about a dromedary.
She committed Frued. Thank you, thank you, I'll be here all week.
Flaww
Add $5 to a cup of coffee.
He was charged with shooting kids and framing the parents.
Let's just say I pulled some strings.
Who has the diploma when you get rid of them.
Because it hurts their buccaneers. (Sorry it's lame, I just made it up) 
Because the parrots eat 'em all.
Utter udder shudder.
Halloumi! (Hello me) 
He was Haydn
He got the sack!
Because we killed the only one with a dream
Because no one will believe them.
Transparent
If it ends up on your wall, you're probably retarded.
They spend the entire time in the greenhouses bitching about the glass ceiling. 
They both have curds in their whey.
A little hoarse!!! 
Riblings
Demerara Source:   by  .
No, but April may.
Smallpox.
Circumference. 
Dessert.
He's still there.
How to Train Your Dragon. Good parenting, that is.
Because they can't even
The hypocrite's the one that exists.
boo bees
The Qué Qué Qué.
Did You Ever Stop And Think?? ¤ Do blind people dream,can they see their dreams? ¤ If corn oil is made from corns and vegetable oil is made from  vegetables,then what is baby oil made of? ¤ Why do Twinkle Twinkle little star & a b c song have the same tunes? STOP SINGING AND READ ON!!! ¤ If electricity is made from electrons then does morality comes from morons? ¤ Why there is a light in the refrigerator but not in a freezer.. Expand ur imagination;)
Talk about a clerical error!
Because he always blitzes.
“tummy, my X-Men!”
Because he kisses his mother with that mouth
Because he couldn't kick the bucket.
Muah hahaha
Someone who stays up all night wondering if there is a Dog.
Two very unhappy animals.
100 pounds.
A group of gay men
She got an F in sex.
Because they cantaloupe. =D.....=).....=|……='(
She became an anchor...
You take the letter "f" out of the word "way" (there's no f in way) *joke works best when the person being asked the question has to think about it for some time and says the phrase themselves without realizing what they said
A wrecktangle.  (Made up by my 10 year old daughter :)
You can't take a joke.
Genocide.
Because he started drinking it before it was cool.
My favorite is "There are two kinds of people...those who cheat at 7-up, and god damned liars."
"Now, this may be difficult to hear..."
the wheelchair
One's by Dire Straits, the other's by dryer states.  
When it Israeli hot
in one night stand you tear off the panties in long relationship you gently remove the panties in marriage you wash and dry the panties.  then fold them and put them in the clothes cupboard.
Short answer: No Long answer: Yes
They''ll tell you.
A speech impediment.
They were both designed for the kids but it's the dad that ends up playing with them.
The USA
He was Cross-Fit.
Turn down the volume on your porn. Problem solved!
He was playing with a bunch of cheetahs!
Because they had ten issues.
A Chopin' knife!
Because old habits die hard.
Because she can't even.
Alcmene triple-dog-dared him.
You did that on porpoise 
They can't even
WAA-TAA!
Pimples don't come on your face until you are 12.
Ten-ants
It wooden go.
Because The Hound wanted to eat both of them. 
That's not my fucking sidework!
They can't dance very well. 
  
Petal.
To fuck your mom.
I'm going to be an Emcee at a superhero themed  event and some jokes would be great. The sexual assault superman one just won't fly. Many people there aren't really into super heros but some (very few) are. My favorite so far is... If Iron Man and Silver Surfer teamed up....they would be alloys.
He's outstanding in his field
Wave.
Interviewer:"If the Earth rotates 30 times faster, what will happen?" engineer:"We will get our salary everyday" :D Think Greedily Act Confidently
So they can see the battle. 
Split pee soup. (I made it up. I'm sorry.)
Because if they don't spread they are worthless.
Names
Call him whatever you want, its not like he's gonna get up and do anything about it.
Asshole.
One missed period is enough to freak them out. 
Because she got used to your soft meat.
It was too tired.
They all die when they turn aidy.
Because he's a Fungi!
John Cougar's Melon Camp
Neither did she.
Because the grass tickles their balls.
One is a dirty bike and the other is a derpy dyke. 
Because they can't even.
Second cannibal: Yes. Everyone's eaten.
A male table is made with hard wood.
It goes like... no wait... ah, damn it.
She always faced a tough crowd. 
Hebrewed it.
Just once. /**************************************/ Edit: Thank you all for letting the world know that planes have in fact crashed more than once throughout history. No shit, Sherlock. Its called a joke. Do you think it would be all that funny if the punchline was "Usually, they get destroyed when they crash, but sometimes they go back up in da air."?
a moscow
The trailer was better
One you are finished with the breast and the thighs, you still have a greasy box to put your bone
Santa Claus comes down the chimney
Because they always have an anti-body
When your dads dick tastes like shit.
It's okay if you haven't - it was a quick release.
A saussage 
It's called Prison Yard Secrets "They" Don't Want You to Know About. 
He was so radium carbon iodine thorium he joined the potassium potassium potassium.
Legs
Incontinent 
Mount Rushmore.
Chair? Statue?! :D
Everything they serve is an entree. WUBBA LUBBA DUB DUB
ly a second.
PIC on someone your own size!
Because they don't have the necessary koalafications. (Derived from:  )
YMCK
He was a real quackhead. 
Justice Thumbs
He went to the Shell station.
Don't know?? Use DINO-MITE
So that they have something to pick in the off-season.
Bill Gates never got a Mac, but Steve Jobs got PC.
I on it.
He was trying to make a booty call!
Yeah, but it's up his ass and it belongs to Usher
Me neither.
they both fell off the motorcycle 
You don't speak English fourchette!
Because they can't even.
More than three because the basement is still dark!
A lickalottapuss.
A show off
The longer you play with them, the harder they get.
in their sleevies
Downvote it.
He did everything half-assed.
Geezcake
Lift your hand up and put all fingers down except your middle finger.
"I don't know." "So you're the one!"
prime rib
Oil
Pilgrims. What do Pilgrims bring? Smallpox
There was too much friction.
John Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzjohn 
Their last big hit was the wall.
Proper-Tea
Warren
He's six feet under now.
Twack......... Shit!
They're always complaining about the 10" they don't have.
Where does Amy go after the explosion? EVERYWHERE!!!
Well, Right now I'm frying up some eggs, got some toast in the toaster and the coffees brewing. 
Bollyball
I don't recall.
Eclair. 
I'll tell you tomorrow!
Benoît B. Mandelbrot
Itali-cized.
An oister
I'M GOING TILAPIA!!!
They can't resist all of the cha-'ching'.
They just can't resist the heroine.
Everyone knows that you should see a doctor for an erection that last longer than 4 hours.
hang one tennis ball from the tailgate!!
One's a snack cracker and the other is a crack snacker. 
It stops them from rolling out of bed.
Jelly's fine, but paper jam is the best!
A small medium at large.
Don't worry, he'll tell you.
Nun
Because it's off the chain.
Pilot error. 
-panic
One, if you throw it hard enough.
Shoot the guy pushing it.
The Dick-tater.
Intercourse.
"I can't take it anymore!"
Mine is this: How do you pick out the Frenchmen in a room full of naked soldiers? They're the ones with sunburned armpits. 
A DOH-berman!
Say "purple". 
One's an algorithm, and the other's an Al Gore-ism!
Because 7, 10, 11!
An ovary-action.
... because he felt crumby! 
"I did them not because they were easy, but because I was hard."
Batman can go in a convenience store without Robbin.
Fucking big ones!
Hockey players shower after three periods.
Armin Van Buren.
What did the super smart dude say to the moron?
A reptile dysfunction
Two, two... One, two.
Nothing, they both run, jump, shoot and steal.
Double Chin
JEWSUS 
Well they say he's "allRIGHT" xD
Recyc-bling (I'm pretty sure I thought of this myself but I used to smoke the Mary Jane a lot so......)
Stink.
Pronounce this word: unionized
Mitosis 
Cliff.
An americano with an extra shot
coo. coo.
An acidic Jew.
Because he was Snowden.
Orange you glad I painfully waited until I was done cooking your food to take a poop?
he was tooooo faaaaaaar oouuuuutttt maaaaaannnn
Senseless violence.
It was a classic open-and-shut case.
A bowl of Chicken noodle coupe
Black magic doesn't work. 
A Checkoutslovakian. (Better said than read)
Peter. He can deny Jesus three times.
the Easter Bunny
God knows he's not a surgeon.
No shit sherlock.
No R-E-S-P-E-C-T.
A cuss-todian!
Both were shot in Vegas
He has two clean fingers. 
It had excellent mussel memory.
A poser!
They both love to crack open a cold one.
None - the lightbulb has the capacity for its own revolution
None of them because they are stuck up cunts.
The other half.
One rocks the mic, while the other mocks the reich.
He got off scat-free
Old Age
We're both businessmen.
The Devil's advocado.
Wait, I can explain everything!
Buy 2 get 1 free
Let me push your stool in for you.
Because there were too many knights.
"Mmmm. Move Over."
Because people keep reporting they've found de brie.
-Tiger Wood
Cause baby, i'm lost in you.
"You are very disagreeable."
Names. 
Both will eventually be laid by a Mexican.
Sir, you fucking pervert! 
I don't want to tell you because you might spread it around... BONUS: What concert is cheaper than 50 cents to attend? 50 Cent feat. Nickelback
In Mike Rowe Economics and Mike Rowe Biology. 
Stranded!
A woman's car breaks down on a busy highway. She manages to ease it over to the shoulder and gets out and opens the trunk. Immediately two men clothed only in trench coats leap out and begin to open and close their coats, exposing themselves to the oncoming traffic. Pretty soon a police officer stops. "What's going on here?" the cop asks. "My car just broke down," the woman responds. "NO, I mean those two guys," the cop continues. "Oh," the woman replies, "they're just my emergency flashers."
One, but it takes at least three light bulbs.
An oxymormon 
Because everytime he told a joke people fainted in the end.
I wouldn't pay $200 to have a lentil on my face
Professional courtesy. 
Introverted Engineer looks at His shoes when he's talking to you. Extroverted Engineer looks at Your shoes when he's talking to you.
The cabbage, it's a head
The hornier, the better!
It doesn't matter where you drop them off.
Damn.
"I like my steak like I like my Pokemon... Rare"
They never got a reaction out of him.
A hobbitat
A high-steaks mission.
Crimea River
Because they aren't really worth anything. Econ 101 humor.
A brick gets laid!
It was really well trained.
RoboClop....so sorry
What do you call a homosexual in a wheelchair? Rolaids. 
So you can cum on its face
Sexy kids.
Some dick cut her off!
Into a prism.
They have a good sense of aqueous humor.
Juan on Juan
Shrimp cocktail.
He heard he was going to Mount Olive
The temperature of their caffeine
The wheelchairs!
Being black
How did you catch the little buggers?
The adora-bowl.
Retired U.S. Air Force here and this is my favorite military joke:   The biggest difference between the branches of the U.S. Armed Forces is that if you give the order to      I slept for 8 hours and came back to some pretty good jokes; It looks like people in movies/theater came out swinging but now it is 2 AM and the computer geeks are a-flocking.  Keep it up!
I need a muse for an art project I'm doing.  Also who doesn't love terrible jokes/puns. Looking for things like refrigerator/nose running, but other objects.
"I'm going to be the mother of your children." I have no idea whether the joke is lost in translation...
It's non barking! Hopefully some software people get this one
Because she stopped taking the pill about a month earlier.
A fucking pilot you racist!
Because they get jalapeño business.
They say that they are generally wrong.
got a pencil and worked it out.
Her clitosaurus...
Arrrrrrabic! A friend and I were extremely high and he thought of this.Good times. 
Because of his retractable clause.
HAND EYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYE.
I originally thought that the black rock gets wet, but it was brought to my attention that the Red Sea is in the middle east, so it prob'ly starts a holy war!
One is a crusty bus station the other is a busty crustacean
Wrap!  (I came up with this when i was 8….)
A stick
Algae bru
A flat.
Sticks it in Olive Oyl.
They have no function.
You want to?
Urine trouble now.
Rabbit farts
Because its delicious.
He had loco-motives
Because he tryptophan.
Ten-ish.
It wasn't raining.
≠
Because it kept falling out.
50 shades of heeeeey.
I do.
You can beat an egg.
A: Usually when the penis returns to flaccid state, it will slide out of the vagina. Even if does not, be rest assured the vagina will not have it for breakfast.
They both create gravity waves when they bang.
Rick O'Shea
When it dies it becomes immortal. ∞
It depends on where I draw the line.
They say he had a loco motive.
A 6 pack and a potato.
Cause they can't tell Green from Red!
Because he was Russian
Because there's no rest for the wicked. 
Would you like a bag with that? Would you like a bag with that? Would you like a bag with that? I know now it isn't really the most efficient way to sell tea!
Tut-an-kham-en 
Soooo much penis.
My god, you're all insane. Am I the only one Hussein?
Well after being there for 30 years, neither do I!
They're all M.I.A.    
So they can get a long little doggie.
One of them can read, and one of them can write. The third one is there to keep an eye on the two intellectuals. 
The one wearing the sack that reads IDAHO
What are you talking about? The bulb is fine.
Your dad didnt cry when I fucked him in the ass.
If it's bill withers!
A deep friar.
About a quarter inch of chocolate
An OranguTAN! 
Because he sucked on the organ.
Toot Uncommon. 
Steal their lines 
Pretzalcoatl
A fruit roll-up
none (inspired by   )
A   tree.
Shake 'n Bake.
You'll have to c-4 yourself.
He was a boar.
A DILF
Not having to set aside money for your old age.
When you make an ELI5 post, you end up receiving a dick pic.
Luters 
And why did he paint so many pictures of my parents fighting? -Rob DenBleyker
Because his career was in ruins
To prevent further breakouts.
Have a rest. (Everest, get it?) Really awful joke, but I thought of it last night and was wondering if anyone recognised it? Who knows, it might be original....
Apparently he's now ohm-less.
Nothing.
Harvard graduate: The kind of place where we don't end our sentences with prepositions. Texan: Where you from jackass?
The one who can walk with 2 cups of coffee and a dozen donuts.
Because they were "Nazis"!!!! eyyyyy :D
He plead the Fifth!
They couldn't find 3 wise men and a virgin. 
He loves Dicks
It ain't hard.
They just get hammered. 
The redditor never gets gold
They're making head lines.
He kept getting in everyone's hair.
Well, there-- Nevermind, it's pointless.
Thunderwear!
He went back four seconds.
They were spic and spaniel
Only one, but it takes nine years. 
He went to the wrong camp. Bonus: I'm a Jewish Boy Scout
Because they all have a "Vera Nice Sea". (Say it out loud)
Depends.
Kicked out of the petting zoo.
My friend is doing a video project for school and needs fruit jokes.
Child labor laws forced all the shoe factories to shut down.
Because they don't like the smell of Derry air.
Apple.
Shocked.
He drops it like it's hot.
A woman.
An elephant. 
Nun.
You oscillate its tit a lot.
Oedipus
Kick his sister in the jaw
a baked potato lol xD
It had a hissy fit.
Because he couldn't pass the bar.
Sophia. (sphere) it works best spoken
Trombones.
Take him to the top of his ego and throw him off.
A metal band
Crimea River
"Damn, I sure got some hot wings!"
Because they have no Seoul.
Polyunsaturated
They're both a great ride until someone sees you on one.
Just one, but she charges me extra for weird stuff
Pay for the pizza.
Because all proper tea is theft.
It's in the name...
A rock guitarist plays 10 chords for 50,000 people, and a jazz guitarist plays 50,000 chords for 10 people.
William Shatner
Christopher Walken
Seeder
a drummer ...
It's not really worth it, it doesn't have a point.
It was charged with a salt.
Chess nuts boasting in an open foyer.
A condom wasn't on my dick last night!
Cello?
1969
A pilot; what else would you call him? You racist prick!
Realising you only put 9 in
he looks at your feet instead of his own... 
Through Frodo-synthesis.
You don't. You get down from a duck. 
Rama llama ding dongs
Start from scratch.
He fell asleep at the wheel
They are full of Iranian seman
Nothing. They've never met.
Make the jacket first.
Huey Louie Andouille.
Pants.
They couldn't find 3 wise men or a virgin!
Prepare to get RIDD of your intron.
Crimea River
About 3 inches.
Astro-knot 
A whore will have sex with anybody, a bitch will have sex with anybody except you.
They both change pads after 3 periods
It was very unOregonized.
Pollution. What do you call every Mexican at the bottom of the ocean? Solution.
Pubstep
They threatened to release one every hour til their demands were met.
K
So they don't get mistaken for feminists.
A groundhog
Just for the halibut.
Seriously,  it ruins the joke every time without fail.
A bird of pray.
A centimeter-alada
At the undertakers, they were putting him into the coffin. They got his left leg in. That's when the trouble started...
moscows
A fridge doesn't fart when you pull the meat out of it.
"Nailed It"
Okay, you start.
The atoms family.  
Because if it had four doors it would be a chicken sedan.
A manila folder!!!
Because everyone who could jump, run, and swim have already crossed the border.
Because they devour wood.
A Polysneezin.
Human Beans.
He didn't knead any more dough.
A chunk.
Inward
Unique up on it.
He just couldn't pass the bar.
Because it's too cold outtide
knee-mail
Mini-Soda (Minnesota) Such a bad joke... :/
Bereave it. 
The Lower Yeast Side.
One is a superhero and the other is a simple command.
The night shift at Waffle House.
A dumb blonde bitch.
A skunk rolling down a hill with a pickle in its mouth.
He's left there trying to "guess" what happened.
Because he was Snow'den.
The Cross Product
You use a pair of caesars.
Don't eat me! I'm a fun guy!
You can drop her off anywhere
Zombees
Reaching around and pretending it went all the way through. 
Darth Mall.
Levon.
Spitting, Swallowing,  and gargling.
Because than it would be REcycling
The Italian. The black is tied to the tree.
Because they all involve iPatches. 
Because they grew a part.
Because they needed more Thai Interceptors!
Duck in a hurry. (c) beatattitude 2014
I don't think he named is other leg...
Pearl Harbor pizza.
It comes in waves.
Disoriented
Give them a used tampon and ask what period it's from. 
No one actually reads the articles.
The doctors said they could give the boy eyelids made out of his foreskin. The only problem is that he would be a little cockeyed.
Having legs.
Men toes.
Because he's a bad mother fucker.
Too many thank you notes to write
loading...
An envelope! 
She unlocks the handcuffs. Edit: for everyone that isn't getting it, it means kinky sex
Haaaayyyy!!
the only one ever to have a dream was shot.
he composts it
A daiquiri.
The Bureau of All Things Fine.
Dominoes. Falling one at a time.
A rapist.
For a square root canal
they're always asking "when will this period be over?"
thepiratebay
Tek War
The bucket.
I was watching Dave Chappelle's For What It's Worth yesterday and honestly I'm not a stand up comedy guy but this shit was real bruh! For the part I watched it was funny as hell. This is probably the fourth I've watched following Kevin Hart's main stand ups. Do you have any that is way better than this for us redditers? P.S - I hope this is the right subreddit if not :p 
I don't know. It kept breaking my guitar strings so I gave up.
It's legal to get stoned 
An extroverted scientist will stare at YOUR feet.
You get repossessed.
"Barbecue tonight!"
The "Space Bar"
Fidel Castro.
Syphilis
She burned her mouth on the exhaust.
Rape. 
"THERE CAN BE ONLY JUAN!"
Because they refuse to Submit to anyone but Allah.
Ugg Li
What do a prison and a concentration camp have in common?  In both people don't feel like showering.
Psychopaths are fun at parties. 
LANscaping.
Pregnancy.
Because it needs some bragging rights.
Life support for a cunt.
A fedoral offense.
One prick...and it's all over.
Because of their Crystal Balls EDIT: I'm not sure if anyone's posted this before my mum's sister emailed her from across the globe.(New Zealand) I laughed so hard I thought I'd put it here. Credit goes to my Mum's sister though. 
My girlfriend won't blow a red light.
He hibernated in the summer. 
1080 Pee -- My roommate
...
Phuket, I don't know...
Because she had no arms.    Knock Knock, who's there?  Not Sally.
A denominatrix.
They throw a spoon down the stairs
N-Gage
I'm going to kill myself, or die trying.
Just the tips.
Yeah, some dick cut her off.
"Okay men, get on the ship."
Batteries
Not the dirtiest but I laughed. Three guys go to a ski lodge, and there aren't enough rooms, so they have to share a bed. In the middle of the night, the guy on the right wakes up and says, "I had this wild, vivid dream of getting a hand job!" The guy on the left wakes up, and unbelievably, he's had the same dream, too. Then the guy in the middle wakes up and says, "That's funny, I dreamed I was skiing!"
Just two.  It only requires that either the people are very small or the light bulb is very large.
Of course not, they haven't had any gigs yet. 
It's another chance to look up old friends.
Answer: Tulips on an Organ.
Nothing, she just made gagging noises
Give Marcie a strap-on.
Any kind, buildings can't jump.
He was percussed. 
No difference - when you gotta go, you gotta go!
The Pygmies are a bunch of cunning runts. 
They were trying to start a business.
Shooting arrows at lovers is a Cupid stunt.
At the end of the day, a stiff gets buried either way.
Nothing... yet.
Because these colors don't run
She can't find the key and doesn't know where to come in.
Friend has an eyepatch on for some reason or another and I'm running out of decent jokes.
(scream) APPLE!!!
He made no sense. I tried, I really did.
A white cross emblazoned on a white background!
They tell you.
He doesn't need to tell him to shake the martini. 
Mt. Rushmore! Happy presidents day! 
The knock speeds up. 
All she could sing was, "Law, law, law, law, law, law, law."
Currier.
No but have you seen the Dragon in the kitchen?
A Tattoo. 
So their feet don't smell like pussy.
He got lemonaids.
A racing club
Home Depot.
They're full of acidic juice.
The extrovert looks at the other person's shoes.
He married his cousin.
He got off on a technicality.
Gloves! Haha I'm joking. He hasn't opened it yet.
Barbecue sauce
I heard he got it from Putin.
You'll eventually end up with enough bricks to build a free garage.
One to screw in the lightbulb and one to give me a blow job while I supervise. 
Because they're always under pressure!
You can talk to your mate while they are sitting on you face!
Karma?
Baby don't hurt me.
A slow poke. 
Because he was Snowden.
One. Five. One. 
2 . One to screw it in and another to say, "I could do that".
You take your shoes off to jump on the trampoline.
None. We don't address hardware issues.
It's for my sister. 
A. Pink fluff. Q. What's blue and fluffy? A. Pink fluff holding its breath Q. What's green and fluffy? A. Moss.
Someone who stays up all night wondering if there is a dog.
"Oh, how I pine for you!"
My penis.
Petite (Basin Tss)
Tickles...
NEIN NEIN NEIN NEIN NEIN!
We would have called it a teeth brush
Flappy Bird.      
(A)........ They're both fun to ride until your friends find out.
How do you make a dog say meow? Put it in the freezer, then get a chainsaw and cut it. MEEEEEEEOOOWWW!!
Convirgin.
Ugly sheep.
A: Mohammered.
the front row to a Willie Nelson concert
If you're not careful, you can pop a ball.
Not being retarded
That way they can see the hooker give the money back.
Don't kid yourself.
A comical flask.
An envelope!
With the force and knife.
He has a sign on the door that says "Either way, you get your dog back."
Because they have developed very good punch quality.
A shampoodle
Inxs
His personality.
Having to go inside and ask for a coathanger
During any conversation he's looking at YOUR shoes. 
Did you planet?
... ... Batman!
Give them a test-tickle
Honey, I'm home!
Because prostitutes can wash their crack and sell it again.
DOUCHE
I'm like Sherlock, holmes.
To get to the other side.
What did one snowman say to the other snowman?                                                                                     Hey, do you smell carrots?
A spider. (They have two legs and an additional six legs also)
I can’t decide whether you are a fruitcake or a doughnut! 
They're all in jail.
They only wanna go down on her once a month
The vegetable.
Data
They're both fucking close to water.  (credit goes to my dad for this one...)
A natural log
Because the punchline is to long
Can I push your stool in?
An erection.
It's a classic coming-a-phage story.
The ones with food.
It was being irrational.
Because he doesn't have a tail.
The tender ones (Badum Tss)
Relative Humidity
Twister
Feed it laxatives.
They're going right over my head.
A token ring.
I was in a pub in far Western Queensland last Saturday night, when this really brutally ugly girl came up to me, squeezed my arse and said, "Give me your number, sexy." I replied "Have you got a pen?" She smiled and said "Yes." I replied, "Well you better get back to it, before the farmer notices you're missing." 
She threw out all the W's.
One potato two potato three potato splat! 
Slow runners. 
A woebot. :(
A flat minor.
When I'm choking the lawnmower, I don't stick my dick in it.
My mom just broke one of her ribs shoveling snow. (Really mom? You're 60 years old, with a snowblower, with a husband who was literally 10 minutes away from coming home) Anyway, does anyone have any good jokes involving ribs? I know the Adam/Eve ones...any others? 
They both have a one in 100 million chance of being human.
Call in the swat team!
I'm never doing THAT for two bucks again. 
They were bringing up the rear.
"can't anchor us"  /bow..  this is as clever as i get, people..   so sorry.
They all had masters
It's like Russian Roulette except all the chambers are loaded. edit: "chambers," not "barrels"
Man: I can't pee, doc! Doctor: How old are you? Man: I'm 90 years old. Doctor: Oh, you've peed enough! Heard this one in a bathroom at Walmart.
Because blonde men are idiots too.
dead ants... dead ants... dead ants, dead ants, dead ants, dead ants, dead aaaaantsss 
The 
They both know when it's time to turn things over.
A brunette is on a busy street across from a department store she needs to visit, and is looking for an intersection to cross over when she spots a blonde walking out of the store. The brunette waves and calls out over the traffic noise, "hey there! How do I get to the other side?" The blonde looks confused and calls back, "you ARE on the other side!" 
Cowboys can sit three abreast in the front seat of a pickup truck that way.
Neither can finish a play.
Page two in Google search results!
Cannibalism
Adult porno. Kiddie porn is gross, you sick fuck!
By Celibating!
Pure Heroine by Lorde.
Justin
Scaaaaaarrves
Testicular Cancer Society: Hi there, did you receive our email? Me: No... why? Testicular Cancer Society: Maybe you should check your junk.
"Hey anon, do you want to know why your grandmother and I had so many children?" "Why's that, Grandpa?" "No TV."
Watch the second half.
Because he's an Xboxer.
None. They wait for the electrician to make a mistake and yell at them for doing it wrong.
Lean meat!!
Vladimir Putting
Incase he got a hole in one!
Your chron-tact.
I want to be more outgoing.
close the door, I'm dressing!
Because he kept calling "One Love"
Because they have great toe fu. 
A Dairy Queen.
They say it's going to be 10 inches, then end up only being 4 to 6.
Four. One to hold the lightbulb and three to smoke until the room starts spinning!
One.
Little Caesars 
My friend Andrew met a girl in the pub last night, and they ended up going home together. Tonight the girl walks into a supermarket and on her way round she sees Andrew...He was stacking washing powder boxes onto the shelves. "Andrew you lying bastard" she yells "last night you told me you were a stunt pilot!" "No" he says "I told you I was a member of the Ariel display team."
Philip Hoffman's belt.
Beat em in a bowl for three hours.
It's gotta be getting kicked in the balls.  Every time a woman has a kid she starts talking about wanting to have another, but I've never heard of a man asking to get kicked in the balls again.
...played footbal but lost and made ppl sad as fuck. joke's on the ppl cus their sad as fuck and i dont care 
Hocus Focus
Did you hear about the proctologist who became and English teacher? He specializes in teaching analogies.
The blowout
2, it only takes two people to carry a trash-can.
Rubidium's.
Because if it was the Coke Half-Time there would have been a hologram of Tupac or the Beetles instead of Bruno Mars.
The Beatis. 
One. Unless it's a blowout then the whole team shows up. 
He kept beating a dead horse.
Bordercross
Don't go in my thongoh
Jack Daniel's is still killing indians.
Bob
Polar bears gather around the ice hole. 
You could say he was surrounded by assholes.
He gave her a ring. 
Too long for here, read comments.
Because he likes Dicks.
Her son's dick tastes funny
pumpkin
Because he was still at large. 
San Andreas fault. 
Because Indiana sucks and Wisconsin blows
In Geometrees. I am not embarrassed to say I made this up two weeks ago while teaching quadrilaterals. The groan from my students could be heard for miles.
Because it keeps the Doctor away!
My ass. TL'DR - My ass.
Nihon-jeans (Nihon-jin)
Because they like the scenes where the prostitutes return the money to their clients.
A recycling TIN!
The lady that had the recipe died.
It's about time.
Keep your mouth shut and you'll never get caught. 
When you sniff paint, you get high
Have you ever tried to pull apart a grilled cheese?
He wax off. 
Just trying to make a Polish girl I like laugh
Depends...
They have a Bobba Fetish
Cross country.
A cop pulled me over the other day for speeding. After giving me the ticket, he teases me a bit about my out of state plate and the fact that I'm driving a car that's in my Dad's name. He points to my dash and asks, "Is that a radar detector I see?" Me: I don't know. Cop: Is that a radar detector I see? Me: I don't know it's my Dad's car. It's just always been there, but it does let me know every time I pass a Krispy Kreme. He smirked, said, "Good one. Now slow down."
Because once you've seen Juan, you've seen Jamaul.
I need some new material for the court house. 
Because property is theft.
It's his altar ego.
Because there was 2 basketball courts. DUH!
He was looking for the Captain's log.
How many psychiatrists dose it take to change a light bulb? One, but the light bulb has to want to change.
Justinice.
So women know where to stand in the kitchen. 
In Africa
They dough nut have anything in common.
He got out on bale.
They use a machine gun.
They always go off on tangents in class.
The sausages.
Spot.
Billable vowels.
Because no matter the sport, he would always play write 
Because there are 3 periods and only 2 pads. 
Just one, but it takes three episodes.
Nun
Because he didn't mufasa.
With 69 you see the cunt coming at you.
A faux!
Send down four skin divers. 
Because they won't hold a public erection.
The Pillage People. 
They rated it ARrrrrrrr 16. 
All the blood goes to your head.
Popeye kicked his ass!
A wind tunnel.
a PLANE biscuit
Because it saw the salad dressing.
A jelly baby.
They're both load-bearing
It was made of pranks.
Chicks are for kids!
Its fucking in tents!
Jiu Jitsu.
Bunnylingus!
Swim for it.
Shark infested mashed potatoes.
My room mate came up with this one earlier, has anyone ever heard it?
Whipped cream.
Did you hear the one about the Concubine and the Muse...? Fucking Inspirational...!!!
Fan-fucking-tastic!
Flip it upside down.
They don't work out. 
Because she had beef with him. 
Disaster 
I don't know why they did it but they must have had a pretty 'loco' motive.
The position of the dirtbag
North Koreans have no Seoul.
No? Then how do you put them on?
Surrey. 
Two Guys are walking down the street after leaving the bar. When they look across the street and see a dog licking himself. The one guy goes to the other, "man I wish i could do that", and then his friend says, "Don't you think you should try petting him first?" 
A stern letter from the ethics committee and an immediate cessation of funding. *stolen from I Fucking Love Science
He stays awake all night wondering if there is a dog.
[deleted]
Wipe his ass.
An assless chap.
Yes, there is a vas deferens!
Cactus has little pricks on the outside
Because the bong threatened to get him baked.
Is that you, coffin?
Utter despair.
They think their children are small enough to neglect! Adapted from a Saturday Morning Breakfast Cereal, I forget which one.
he does it in heels
Because he wanted to go on a honeymoon.
Ω my ghosh 
I have no Idea.
What do you call a reptile who says "But Cowardly Lion......You've had courage..... This entire....Time"?
Will you envelope with me? (I know its Corny, but it makes me chuckle.)
First old lady had a stroke. Second old lady had a stroke. Third old lady's arm was too short to reach. 
Because two Wongs don't make a white
A stick.
Two guys walk into a bar...
They can't-elope.
None. They just sit in the dark and cry.
So they can put out a paper on December 26th.
To hear a smart politician.
The doctors actually used his foreskin from circumcision to construct his eyelids. He's OK, but just a little cock-eyed.
Please cum again!
He's okay. It was light beer.
The blonde has a higher sperm count.
Because the sea-weed.  
Attempted murder.
Because they want that 
Posession
With a pair of Caesars. (Thanks  )
Their CCCCUUUUUNNNNNTTTTT!!!
Because they're sending them to the infantry!
Because he had a reptile dysfunction! 
Having to watch him do a half barrel roll over 8 of them. R.I.P. Bobby. Never forget.
Wooooooden Woooooooden Woooooden!
Olive or Twist.
Hearing AIDS.
Because they had no bars on their cells!
José and Hose-B
a conundrum
Because they always take things literally
They found her head and shoulders in the glove box
Nascar If you can even call it a sport.
Nothing. She's already been told.
All Rook same!
Everything you say goes in one ear and out the udder!
He's staring at your shoes instead of his own.
one has claws at the end of it's paws...the other has a pause at the end of it's clause. 
Thoreau editing.
So you always have access to cold hard cash...
Thinking you are following someone.
A small medium at large
No, they cantaloupe.
A condescending con descending.
He uses study strategeries.
ones a complete laughing stock and the other ones a clown.
Suck my  !!!
Scratching like hell at the inside of his casket.
Because the C-section is always messy.
"Oh, ewe"
A woman will always blow your paycheck
He had tentackles.
Goblin....
Decomposing
The epileptic oyster shucker shucks between fits. 
The Harlem Shake
He burned his wiener
Because it was irr-elephant
There are never enough camels to go around.
Whoreigami
Well, you never know!
To help the firemen find the hydrants
What's the most offensive jokes you have ever hear
In legal tender
Bark! What is his favorite canine?  Wolf! How does he like his sex? Ruff!
Iceberg Lettuce! :D
They always drive slowly near schools
A cock who stays up all night.
Because they have a hard time fitting in
Husband: "Hello, 911? Yes, there's this Hindu fellow who's been following my wife around for the past few hours, and it's starting to really creep us out. He just now got down on his knees and he's... praying, or something." 911 Operator: "Sir, calm down, there's no issue here- Hindus are well known to worship cows."
because of the tally-ban
Because they don't believe in higher powers!
"May I take your order?"
It's a real knee slapper.
She kept on saying that everything I said was complete bullschist
A Master Baiter.
Because their horses would drown.
A book store.
Wipe forward!
Tulips on your organ!
Student: no he did it all by himself 
Olive Oil
A:   
Jews get really angry, but Christians just get a little cross.
Because they have foul balls.
Impeach Cobbler
Getting there before the first period.
Aluminatti foil
Tony. (A joke created by a non-redditing friend)
I'm in nursing school right now and there's a competition in one of my classes for the funniest renal joke. I can't think of any! Help?
A butler.
A hobbyte. 
It rounds them up and points them in the right direction.
NHL Players shower after three periods.
My sister’s fiance is so short that he has trouble playing computer games. The only way he can reach the keyboard is if he lies flat on the ground.
It only takes two, but the trick is getting them in the lightbulb.
HEYYY LAAADIESS
"Hole is gonna be huge."
I have 2020 vision.
She only eats vegetables
The Ohm Depot.
Piece of cake.
50 cents. That's Ludicris!
I just don't get it, so it is either meant to be absurd/nonsensical or I am missing historical context: Q:What do you know about Damascus? A:It kills 99% of germs.
One has hope in her soul and the other has soap in her hole
A 'murical.
........................... ........................... I have the first :) Stole it from 50 first dates.
I can count three from here!
Pubs
Because it's insecure. It has trust issues.
REDDIT
"Hi, Cliff "
....
Because he was a fungi.
A robber duck....
It never lets me down!
The Thalidomide Arms.
She keeps   her feet.
A brunette with bad breath. 
Alien vs Predator
Well he's back in town and said he misses you.
There's a pregnant mother and her young child, here's the conversation. Mom: Honey, what do you want the stork to bring you? A little sister or a little brother? Child: Mom, if your pussy doesn't hurt too much I would like a wooden horse...
Uh-Leave!  I made this up when I was a little kid and naturally thought I was a comedic genius for many unfortunate years to come. 
Nothing.
An erotic person will use a feather on their partner. A perverted person uses the whole chicken.
You take away its credit card
Anti-chromactic
Rectoplasm...
There was a face off at centre ice.
A new-Bourne
...it was repossessed! 
There are Poles everywhere.
the search party animal!
Because they backdoor their way into everything.
A song called "My Corona"
Let's meet up in the corner.
"Depends"
Headline read: Small Medium at Large
Crib death.
Finding cum stains in the back of the underwear.
Brooke Shields.
♪ I've got a golden tinkle in my eye... ♪
She was butthurt.
Scooter the unicorn.
nun
You take away its tiny brooms.
Turn off their Nintendo and go to bed.  
A widow 
I'm Snowden!
The wonderbread man.
Squirt(-1).
It's not going to be too expensive, though, all they have to do is add the "e" to the front.
Because get off at different times.
A  .
A white story starts with "Once Apon a Time" and a black story starts with "Y'all ain't gonna believe this"
Something you do for the first week of the new year.
He tee-peed his pants.
Have a chickpea in your mouth
A fart.
The "Baracks"
Sans Sheriff! 
Too many thank you notes to write
Boy, do we have issues!
Nothing - either way someone's gonna lose a trailer *shamelessly stolen from Robin Williams
One Mississippi.
meh
They were both caught with hands in their drawers.
I ain't buyin those fancy   Big-Government ones. The free market idn't ready.
A turd.
Mycoxafloppin
Cowboys that suck. 
I'm game.
One sees a glass half full, the other doesn't care because the glass is going to fall and break anyways.
That even the most Orthodox Jew, and the cruelest of all the people of Al-Qaeda, will look for the same thing once they get down from a plane. A Synagogue.
Satisfying.
Play-doh.
By: 
They both came in a little behind.
Because he kneaded a poo.
He was charged with won ton destruction  
His personality
You get to meet new people everyday. 
They're both run by Unix.
Ahola.
He goes to WUBway! 
the torque
She was on the highway and some dick cut her off.
Chernobyl fallout.
because Francisco Franco made a typo and didn't want to admit his mistake. He forced the people to change the pronunciation instead of admitting he was fallible. [ Hahah..an original joke you guys, can you believe it? I had to google Spanish dictator and Francisco Franco was the name that came up]
Long neck or giraffed?
a vanilla shake
The taste.
There are those who are waiting to get in it and then you have those wanting too get out of it.
No, he was baroque.
Herp-n-derp-es
Molar opposites. 
Fluorida!
You're in some sticky shit.  
A nun falling down the stairs 
Michael J. Fox.
To keep his nuts dry!
Chicken Tenders.
The   episode.
One porks women the other un-porks them. 
the I see you.
It was a tad unexpected.
Ten.
I think everyone in this bank just saw my face.
Depends.
He knows where all the naughty girls live. I actually heard this in the video game LA Noire. Thought it was pretty funny so I bust it out every Christmas.
Luckily for him I was still up playing my bagpipes
Juana Sum Peeksa.  
Her teacher told her to do an essay. 
To pick is to make a selection... And choose are what Cubans wear on their feet.
Because porkin isn't kosher.
I think you're condensating for something.
A teacup is what the British drink out of and a pea cup is what the Mexicans drive.
He got coal for Christmas.
Over-Yeezy.  
My grandfather always said, "Don't watch your money, watch your health." So one day while I was watching my health, someone stole my money. It was my grandfather.
Because they won't stop fucking up
A tire.
There will never be another ewe.
Trust me
I need some for tonight. 
Curiosity.
So they dont forget it.
A dog with a hair lip
I want a refund: there's not one darn thing about how to kill a bird   in this book.
An Italian astronaut :-D
So they can get a better grip on their broom. 
Knock knock Who's there? I eat mop I eat mop who?
Hey baby, wanna see the exponential growth of my natural log?
Because Chernobyl fall-out.
The Reich-stag!
You don't fuck an orange after you peel its skin. Credits go to my friend for telling me.
Manuel labour.
Because they never part with them 
Alpine Chinos
UDDERLY SURPRISED! (Edit: UTTERLY to UDDERLY)
CON Edison.
Because of the violins inherent in the cistern.
North Poleish 
A Banananananana Banananananana! 
suet
"It's Christmas, Eve."
Wonton endangerment.
Because if they are they'll tell you, and if they aren't you don't want to insult them.
Boograr
Residue.
Be nice to him.
"It looks like we're going to Neverland."
He was skating before it was cool
BMWs have the pricks on the inside! 
Veni, Vidi, Veni.
Ohmmmm, Ohmmmm, Ohmmmm...
Both want to be real boys
I am a ski instructor and I've recently been teaching these two boys who are 6 and 8 year old brothers. I realized today that I know zero jokes appropriate enough or funny to this demographic. I feel like they think I am super boring. Give me some help to make the chairlift more exciting!!
Cut a hole in the ice. Put a line of peas around the hole. When the polar bear takes a pea, kick him in the ice hole.
Because the waves keep going "shhhhhh".
Gangsta wrappers! 
He was running a little behind
We Vishnu a Merry Krishnas.
The woman.
He was making a long-distance caw.
If you can't helium, and you can't curium, then you might as well barium.
None, they will all just stand there complimenting it and get pissed when it wont screw. 
Because he's married. 
I don't know, that's why I'm asking you.
A ninety-year-old man went to the doctor and said, "Doctor, my eighteen-year-old wife is expecting a baby." The doctor said, "Let me tell you a story. A man went hunting, but instead of a rifle, he picked up an umbrella by mistake. When a bear suddenly appeared and charged at the man - he picked up the umbrella, shot the bear, and killed it." The man said, "Impossible. Someone else must have shot that bear." The doctor said, "My point exactly!"
His hand slipped.
...A  ( I'll see myself out.. :)
I don't want to go TOO over the top, and I definitely don't want to actually damage anything. But he has a pretty good sense of humor.
They all get stoned constantly.
Catonese
... he drank his coffee 
I thought not...
A Meow-tain!
Owl
Baster! Baster!
Both don't shower until after 3 periods.
Yep.  He's still pushing apples.
You think you've got AIDS
Merry Crips-mas
"Hebrew".
Pink Floyd kept going after the wall.
A mechanic!
To keep the Nazis in Czech!
Eve, she made Adam's banana stand.
Yemen
It won't be long now...
Because they make everything up.
this isn't even a joke... some of y'all are borderline retarded, "I don't get it" is like a given for 50 upvotes around here. If you don't get a joke, just take the L and move on to the next post....
The middle school boy just wants to snatch a kiss. 
Getting a right call.
Wine-er-melon
Just gopher it.
μ
They can smell it but they can't eat it
Pho Soup
Talking while driving.
Because their balls cover their assholes and they vapor lock.
None, "she fell".
Because he is ashamed of fucking the chicken.
She was all over the radio.  And the dash. And the windshield...
A really good watch.
It had a hard drive.
A rip off.  (Da da tshhh) 
Doughnuts. 
Uncle Bens rice.
He tells them to "Give Peas a Chance"
Prime mates
"Everyone got seat belts on back there?"
He was ahead of his time.
You are the man of the house now.
NOTHING!
Tie watermelons to the bottom of a lake
Bagels. I'll be here all night, people!
"You Irwin some you Irlose some" Then he dieded.
How do you get the elephant out of the theatre? You can’t. It’s in his blood.
Salt.
Everything is priced in pesos. 
WATERBOARDING!!!
They put it in Solitaire confinement.
Spitting, swallowing, and gargling. 
Fettuccini Alfedora.
his biancée
His dick tastes like shit.
Flatbush
Buock choi
Sig-fig Newtons
Itookalook
This is really just a bad pun, but to me those are the best kind of jokes Pluto strikes from the back and destroys Uranus.
Nevermind, it's too cheesey.
It was awesome
Nm, it's too cheesy.
It was pretense.
Yoko Ono
Let's go ride bikes!
She was all dressed up with no place to go!
Neither did his audience.
An OxyMoron!
It failed the Smaug test.
"Hey, can I push your stool in?"
Because he's Snow'd-in!
What did one earring say to the other? You go on a head, i'll just hang round 'ere
Because he killed Candy-Abel 
They were too far out, man.
Radical
They Duckerate cookies. ...lol...
Ohio
A leprechaun!
He wrote complete works of friction.
One of them was captured but the other two vanished without a tres. 
Joke is the title. If you don't get it, think about it a bit.
Coincerned
That way he just shits bricks.
His toga size went from L to XL.
You're outta line!
It's called Innuendo...
They don't... they just talk about how good the old one was.
His mummy.
You tell her to read a basketball.
She says, "Daddy, I want a new apartment."
She had no arms. Knock Knock? Who's there? ….Not Kelly.
Idiots that couldn't hunt or fish.
Can we just bury this?
Because it had no Guts.
He disappeared with a puff.
Make-bereave
Optional.
I don't hate this bar, but I pity the stool.
So that they can hear each other over their clothes
Ja Mall
Because they spend more time in your wallet than on your dick.
Where you put the cucumber....
Her pussy is well cultured.
Youve foiled my plans again!
Snow balls!
They don't have to go through as many obsticles.
From scratch.
Because they're all dead. As told by my best friend, in light of the Indian joke.
White noise.
Because he could nazi!
50 cent, featuring Nickleback.
Ben Dover and Phil Mcrakkin
A veterinarian (veteran aryan).
There are so many Wings and Wongs, you might wing a wong number.
On every Dec. 7, he would attack Pearl Bailey.
That was a dildon't 
A:Why the fuck are you shaking, she's going to eat me!
Because 25 DEC = 31 OCT.
Two dam bad!  (OC!)
They like being stationery.
Kinky is using a feather. Perverted is using the whole chicken. 
I heard he has some loco motives. (Locomotives)
Paul Walker wouldn't be caught dead in a KIA.
My ass.
Farfrompoopin'
He needed more coal anyway.
Nothing... she just mmmooOOOAAAANNnnnsssss...
Both are yelling at the same kid.
Only one, but with a perticular FETISH
You know you shouldn't but you are going to put your tongue on it eventually.
He was taking a sheet.
Costa Deli-Sol
After many speech errors, mispronunciations, apparent Freudian slips, rumors began to swirl that President Bush may be dyslexic. At a press conference the following month, one journalist found the courage to ask "Mr. President, is there any truth the the current rumor that you are, in fact, dyslexic?" To which he emphatically replied, "ON!"
A graduated cylinder. This is the only joke I've ever thought of.
breaking the seal on a rock. 
Someone's ring gets broken.
He took everything literally
A bit cross.
A small medium at large. 
Take your foot off of their head.
Sandusky
Because he gets so many letters from dyslexic children.
They both hate concentration camps.
Juice
Gingers just don't last in the sun.
Because he only comes once a year!
To sit on Pinnochio`s face and hope he tells lies.
A bleached whale!
TWERQY.
Abdull.
Just one guy with a really weird fetish. 
Their reaction when someone asks if they want to get baked.
Hayyyyyyy
That's methed-up!
A: Chump day.
I am not sure,  I haven't seen them try and I can't do it either.
Lukewarm
A 
His grades were below sea level    
Because she uses the other one to sing.
Branch Manager
Only one fifth of what comes out of her vagina is retarded.
Because that ass is calling me!
Sold his soul to Santa.
A Pasta-tute! 
Def Leppard
Little Caesars
f(x), where f(x) = the optimal number of x for establishing a humorous stereotype.
Having to convince your parents you're Haitian... Some context: When the AIDS epidemic really started to hit America, it was often called "4H Disease" after the people at most risk: Haitians, Haemophiliacs, Heroin Users and Homosexuals. 
A firm believer
It was wrong on so many levels.
Scamdium.
You put it in your shoe, and it makes you limp.
A Scamtron.
She was taken in by the coppers.
He's in all the papers. ...Ba-dum bum
Occam's razor
It's no bad luck to walk under a truck.
Kick em.
None they just compliment it and get pissed when it won’t screw.
Rosa Parks
It tastes sweeter the younger it is.
BBQ sauce
Need some more Billy & Highliner Jokes. One is "Hey billy you ever been to sea" "No Captain Highliner but I have been blown ashore"
Slobodan Mikokubic
A ginja... Ensue mildly dramatic slow clapping.
Oh never mind, I'll just sit here in the dark...
He wears mittens.
One.
To get to the other side!
Neither did she.
A:Kick his sister in the jaw!!
He wasn't comfortable with having that much time on his hands. 
An Audi.    
It didn't match with the Iron Curtains. 
Gas giant.
a school bus full of Negros going off a cliff.
Assuming it takes place in a vacuum, approximating the lightbulb as a point particle, Assuming it takes place at precisely 300 K, and ignoring the Heisenberg Uncertainty Principle: π/3
The reposts on reddit.
He stole the show!
The Sound of Silence. 
Albert Camoo
How'd you get their tiny legs open?
so little tyrome is in the locker room getting changed for gym class. He notices that he has the biggest penis in his class and from the looks of it the whole third grade. He goes home that day and asks his dad, "hey dad, ive got the biggest penis in the third grade. is it because im black?" His dad replies, "no tyrone its because your eighteen"
It's amazing. I didn't even know they could knit! waaaaaaka waka.
With a crowbar.
He drowned in his tea-pee.
well stop doin anal.
You have to get out and check to see how bad your car is damaged.
Because the deals are such..A nigger
Microsoft Word.
6 Below
You don't want to know.
About tree fiddy.
A crowbar.
He got too attached to his work.
Cancer.
They are out standing in their field.
He pinned it on someone else.
It's Allah this world!
they only had one pickup
He got a way with words.
The sexual tensions
Instagram
It hasn't come out yet though. ....
Because there's not mushroom!
Because they dig homes.
They throw a drawer of silverware down the stairs and name it whatever sound it makes.
Little boysenberries.
He's scared of getting nailed into the boards
His life was at stake. Badum psh.
She said "If you like your Dr. Pepper, you can keep your Dr. Pepper."
How do you make a gay guy fuck a woman?  
Because the grass tickles their balls.
Because he was fat.
Toowet Towoo
They cut a little off before they know how big it's going to be.
I've had enough of your shit.
A one-legged man in an ass kicking contest.
Mexicane.
Eclipse it. Ha.
A Faggot.
You don't.
He worked it out with a pencil.
If you had an one-legged horse, what would you name it?  Flattery.
Social netwerking
Darn tootin'!  (this is so dumb im sorry)
Because Ken came in a different box. Badum tiss.
Because when you see it, you turn one degree and walk away.
They become "super" glue!
To get a byte to eat...
He was invited to thunday math. 
The gorilla gets out to shit.
take a taxi
The cat shat on the mat.
Buddha-pest.
-She wore her New Jersey! Why did California? -She called to ask Hawaii. Where did Chicago? -The same place Oregon Where has Oregon?  I don't know but Alaska. She said she went to pay her Texas. What did Missisip? She sipped a Minnesota. What did Tennessee? The same thing Arkansas How did Wisconsin? He robbed an Oklahoma using a Kentucky. 
Holy Braille 
Depends ...
Her husband had a holloween-ie.
Only four more sleeps 'til Christmas!
I don't have a Cadillac in my garage
A Green Bean
Is sad but now has five more potato for all of Latvia.
She kept sitting on Pinocchio's face and screaming, "Lie to me, Pinocchio! Lie to me!"
Mein Camphor
Slow children.
A small medium at large.
My girlfriend never laughs at my jokes
First, you cut a hole in the ice, then you sprinkle some pees around the hole. When the polar bear goes to take a pee, you kick him in the ice hole!
Achoo Achoo!
No?  It's because "A peace if crap was already taken."
None! In Soviet Russia, light bulb changes you!
Hebrews!
(A)...... Clinton wouldn't come clean.
a command
Do tell.
The Iguanodon
Hehe... 'screw' Alternatively: 69, but everyone expects that one.
The bread has more culture.
A donkey.
The handicap.
Ten tickles.
No-eye deer!  Note: we are from Hicksville, USA. This may not make sense without the Midwestern accent. 
The second one's a race for the cure. Shamelessely stolen from  .
Write "Please turn over" on both sides of a page and hand it to her. 
A periodic table.
Now he's just somebody that we used to know
If you're forced to try it as a kid.. you probably wont like it as an adult.
An eavesdropper!
Bidet, mate. 
Toucan play at that game!
Son they can both look out the window.
Pulled a muscle.
Tell him that asylum seekers kill pedophiles.
He took the rhombus.
He was pulled under by a strong currant 
Nothing, because he is the one who knocks.
Grey Moose
Cant-elope.
He took the chicken's job.
It was framed.
Jurassic times call for Jurassic  Measures.
00000000000001adf44c7d69767585--5572eca4dd4-db7d0c0b845-916d849af76 PM me the answer!
Ive only ever been caught stealing cookies.
They won't ever hit anything.
"Stand back - I don't know how big it's going to get!"
They can't stop licking their paws. 
Roseanne Barr bodies heh
Because it's still dressing. 
The woman. 
De-calf-inated
Abominable!  (say it out loud, slowly)
It's the one on the range.
Don't worry, he was cured.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
He was hoping one would take first place, but no pun – in ten – did. 
He was a little hoarse.
The shampoo bottle put him in an infinite loop.
Alec Baldwin
Is it your right thigh, or your left?  Or does the answer lie somewhere in the middle?
Jesus may actually return some day.
The dead cat has skid marks around it.
Michael Bay Leaves.
Allah-peños
Irrelephant. 
They went on a Joad Trip.
The last time I dumped a load into the washing machine, she didn't follow me around for a week!
"Groundbreaking"
Submarines.
... cause you're giving me the bar
Hodor
'scat'alogical
By Stevie Wonder.
They get crabby! Badum tsss.
He was a seminal fluid dynamicist.
It depends on how close they are to the Mexico-United States border.
A few months after he got home he got a call from a woman he had spent some time with while he was out of town. "Remember me from a while back? We had a few drinks and I was a good sport; we had a good time." He said, "Of course how could I forget about you Janet?" She told him, "Well, I just found out I'm pregnant... and I'm going to kill myself." The businessman chuckled and said, "WOW, you are a good sport!"
Niggers and poo are the same thing!!!!!
Yours.
He was reading road signs at 50 miles per hour
"I bought a new house last week but the previous owners had put a really steep staircase in.... I did ask the estate agent but they just told me that the previous owners were that way inclined." "I got caught vandalising my neighbours roof, thankfully they have forgiven me and we have moved on. Now I can start again with a clean slate" "I went to a car dealership and looked at a car that could only go in reverse. I wasn't happy but ended up buying it, i suppose that's just the way it goes...."
Freud rice.
2 in the front 3 in the back and 45 in the ash tray.
To show girls what it's like to live with an annoying cunt.
Döppelspider
It goes pretty smoothly until you start hitting the rock. 
Let me fill you in.
bracket
A lawyer was just waking up from anesthesia after surgery, and his wife was sitting by his side. His eyes fluttered open and he said, "You're beautiful!"; and then he fell asleep again. His wife had never heard him say that so she stayed by his side. A couple minutes later his eyes fluttered open and he said, "You're cute!"; Well, the wife was dissapointed because instead of "beautiful"; it was "cute"; She said "What happened to 'beautiful'?" His reply was "The drugs are wearing off!"
In pentagrams
Because he was driving under the influenza......
Pyrex of the Caribbean
Oscar im so sorry
Tupac-aday
Tell him the snowblower is coming.
because he was in a jam
Because she married Mr. Softy! 
Because it was steeped in tradition. 
One is white and stinks, and the other is cheese. (As told to me by the UPS guy)
Noble gas
Quattro sinko.
Two Panes
Someone told her drinks were on the house. 
Marriage-u-wanna?
The woman.
Helsinki
Boo Jeans
The rest drive rincolns.
Get off me, homes!
Give her a knife and ask her who is the prettiest of all  . 
Because nobody wants to hold an erection.
there was a porkward silence
NaBrO!!
Four-tified
Binge and parge.
We were tight until that Dick came between us.
A pap schmear.
Two, one to change the light-bulb, and one to observe how it symbolizes an incandescent beacon of subjectivity in a netherworld of cosmic nothingness.  This is courtesy of Spencer Reid.(CM)
Taiga Wood
If it had four doors it would be a chicken sedan
None, political idealists can't change anything.
because he's always justin time
Rhein, Inn, Main, Po
Neil Armstrong walked on the moon.  Whereas, Michael Jackson...... Fucked little kids! I saw a video clip of one of the guys from "The Bloodhound Gang" tell a version this joke. Best delivery ever! (Just giving credit. Or blame).
All of them.
If we don't get some support soon, people are gonna think we're nuts. 
Radiohead. 
Celebrity adoption.
Because he was two tired.
To whom it may concern.
An ILL-EAGLE! 2X COMBO
Kill his entire family.
This guy in middle is a dick.
He's outstanding in his field
Inert gas.
Geometry.
Because it's fucking close to water.
I don't have to beg my wife to blow my paycheck.
Chixie Dicks 
Because he was a hummusexual...
they have a peel
She isn't standing in the kitchen 
He turns off his Xbox, and goes to bed.
none, they blew it up already.
Juan nail at a time.
My mum.
Nothing.
Only one, but it takes a shitload of lightbulbs.
A winnebago.
Because he couldn't see shit 
Because he'd drop everything
Because they're the wurst.
Because if your burn it, it gets you stoned
He could only cook eggs Sunni side up and, honestly, they tasted like Shi'ite.
Wanna go ride bikes?         My all time favorite joke.  Sorry if it has already been posted but who has the time to browse all of  .
69.
Triple Eh's.
A group of homosexual lions
None. Babies don't have the motor skills or the depth perception to change a light bulb.
The locals call it Linoleum Blown-apart.
Carbon-14 is the most common method, I believe.
A chandiqueer
Just wait, they'll tell you.
Just one, but the light bulb really has to want to change.
Brown Chicken, Brown Cow
Four, one to change it and three to comment on the changing.
He was looking shady.
He had to sit in his own pew.
It must have fallen through a crack.
Two.  One to do it, a second to keep yelling, "You're lookin' BIG, man!"
Because he was Haydn.
He's seen some shit.
Exactly the same amount as the Redditors on   and   . 
probably just one, but we may never know because they're all way too busy coming up with lightbulb jokes.
Depends on how clumsy you are.
Because Oct 31 is Dec 25
my zipper!
Drummers. 
None, there not too bright with doing anything except showing us where to go when were lost in the dark
.....Depends. 
No more light bulb jokes!
Depends.
No one knows! The results were stolen from the Politburo just last night!
Two. One to hold it in the socket and the other to drink until the room starts spinning!
Son says, 'Father, I cannot tell a lie: I tipped over the outhouse into the creek'.  Father says 'That's it, you're going to the woodshed for some serious ass-whuppin!'  'But Father, George Washington told his dad the truth about chopping down the cherry tree and didn't get punished!'  'George Washington's father wasn't IN the cherry tree!' 
Because he hated the Bù shuō!
Light bulb.
Azkabarn
Just one, but he'd have to watch Radiohead do it first.
An ocellate.
None. Just have the keybord player do it with their left hand.
five, one to drop it and four to two step and PICK IT UP PICK IT UP PICK IT UP!
Three;  one to drop the bulb and two to yell "pick it up pick it up!"
Seven. One to change it, two to take pictures, and four to make t-shirts for the event.
It's a touchy subject.
None. They'll just compliment it and get pissed when it doesn't screw.
None. They'll sit in the dark and blame the Jews
Litterbox.
Two men having sex. Whats gayer than two men having sex? Three gay men having sex.  What's even gayer? An infinite number of gay men having sex.
Because they like the part where the hooker gives the money back to the guy.
Boo-bees
You end up clean round the bend.  Apologies for stealing the title from   
Olive My Love
A knucklehead.
Because they often spend years at C  EDIT: made it more punny
Two cannibals doing 69.
By looking over your shoulder!
Amigo Acid
Nothing.
He was gladiator.
Because deep down they're good people
He had no body to dance with
Oh God, not the B's! Not the B's!
A Halloweenie!
Because they're full of cans. 
Because everyone was calling him a bone-head. (I was 6 when I came up with that).
EDIT: Formatting.
because they ran out of Natural Light
Because ken always comes in a different box.
Call them "carrot top"
To lift his spirits.
Grass. The cake is a lie.
Staying up all night wondering if there really is a dog.
get in the car :P
Your mum
A Casualty (Casual-Tee, as in Tee-Shirt) 100% Guraneed Originality You can know for sure I made it up because of how corny it is...
Hand her a shovel
He's 
Dairy
3 if you don't use protection. 
they have socks. goodnight folks
Omeletteyoufinish -stolen from raininginreverse on tumblr.
Stephen Hawking's
Wun-Hung-Lo
A week, a week, a week, a week, a week, a week.
Anything you want. He can't hear a thing.
They became flatman and ribbon.  has left the building.
He's taking another stab at it.
an ass that'll bring a tear to your eye
Has it been that long (Depending on the audience, it may be important to complete with a comedic pause and) ... ... since breakfast?
It was to convince the world that Mozart was Austrian and that Hitler in fact was German. 
Porcupines have pricks on the outside.
Tennish
Booze.
...the 
Nothing because they were both stuck up cunts.
You don't have to change your profile picture for Halloween.
My girlfriend knows about my wife.
He got off on a technicality.
Oh,the humanities! 
Dumb ones!
They vote
pi
Urine angel. 
I hate to say I told you so. No sarcasm: I...I truly hate to say I told you so.
They know their limits.
He Brews It!
A-minor
He couldn't
It's called "Sex Feet Under".
Sieze the day
It's got no Seoul.
DownlOdin. What do you call getting a movie about Norse gods from the Internet illegally?  Thorrenting. 
She's a small medium at large.
Benoit B Mandelbrot.
Steven Hawking
"Ve haff vays of meking you tock."
In a handicapped spot.
Humor is a shift of wit...
Because he had a boner.
It's just a fucking rock.
Miss Carriage
I'd tap that.
A one molar solution.
Nothing. They were both stuck up bitches. 
He gets the cold shoulder.
It had a terminal illness.
You stay here. I'll go on a head.
It's the Wurst.
The wheelchair.
... Cause it was stuck to the chicken. I heard that on the radio today. I LOLed.
5 MutantA MutantB MutantC MutantD and Mutiny 
Q: Why don't women wear watches? A: Because there is a clock on the stove.
Straight away. 
ANS - When you are lying face down in your front lawn and you have to hold onto the grass to keep from falling off.
'cause if I was your dad I'd be in prison.
Knock knock? Who's there?  9/11! 9/11 who? So much for "NEVER FORGET"
He was un-feta-ed of his cheese.
...High Definition
Because all they serve is cold turkey.
wife : Do these jeans make me look fat?  Me totally scared: Would you get mad if i tell you the truth?  Wife : No, i won't! Tell me.  Me : I slept with your sister  
I think the world is ready. Shoot!
I own a restaurant and I have extremely funny fortune cookies, but I'm running out of fortune ideas! Help me! I need some raunchy, dirty and insulting fortunes! Show me what you got and you could see them in a fortune cookie one day!
An Aristotalitarian Regime.
Because they can't find three wise men and a virgin.
He's dreadful.
They have hollow weenies!  .... And I'll just see myself out.
No, I guess you wouldn't have; he kept it pretty Loki.
When you drink a bad coffee in Switzerland you say, "Merci!". 
Every time they danced, they made it rain.
There's twenty of 'em.
Because she's taken enough hits.
He doesn't like to be left hanging.
Monte Cristo
What is the difference between light and hard?  If a man tries long enough, he can sleep with a light on... 
Need for Speed.
On duck tape  !
He wasn't very good at taking shots.
He got pissed off.
The taste!
He won't stop banging at the door.
$100 bill.
...WMD40. 
"Holy schist."
He ate someone who disagreed with him.
An udder disaster.
You get the pleasure of punching a woman but with none of the guilt!
Now you have.
You got the Wong guy.
He was appointed first attorney genital. 
When she got back, there were 14 more.
They both want to unzip your genes! credit goes to Hank from CrashCourse on Youtube :)
They're in-bread.
He didn't know if he was coming or going.
So not jokes like the current front page:
They're making all the headlines! Never said it was a good joke...
They boil the hell out of it.
   
So they know if they are going to the gig, or coming from it. Ta-boom!
A Cheese Kurd.
Because it's sham poo.
Because their knee grows.
It only took 1 nail to hang the picture.
Dr. Dre
Nope, they just keep the tips.
....because they were a rip off
They never get old.
I'll jizz here, eh?
It's pretty big news.
Shellfish.
A leperchaun! 
A pilot, you racist bastard.
His alibi.
A normal consumer aims to get the most bang for their buck. A prostitute aims to get the most buck for their bang.
When it's pure bread.
Why arent you precipitating?  (a joke me and my buddy came up with while driving. and its scientifically correct. lol)
The bass was pegged, his hook was just right, and it made all the girls shake they booty. 
{choking noises}
I need some really good cop jokes for a cop buddy of mine who is retiring, he asked for us to bring him the best so I turned to you guys. Have a field day! Edit: Thanks to everyone who posted a joke!
The girl in church has hope in her soul
WHERE DA HOOD WHERE DA HOOD WHERE DA HOOD AT?
Druma
He was a little horse
Cheers, mate.
Coworkers say she has an excellent Twerk ethic
The cocktails are great, but it has no atmosphere. 
They are both more enjoyable with dates!
Mewww.
They both look good hanging from a tree
Talk
Because he couldn't find the Droid he was looking for. 
I'm never doing that for two bucks again!
: Sweetie, will you buy me a cellphone?   : What about the other one?   : The other one is buying me a tablet.
Because he would just go home and master bait.
Not enough cement EDIT: Okay thanks for pointing out that I messed up the wording but the joke is supposed to be the funny part
They order a beer sampler and the bartender tells them to pick 6.
I am a were
He doesn't, he's dead!
Halfway, when you walk further then you will walk out of the forest! HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAH
Because their boobs are too big for b-shells.
About three centimeters. 
Spaghetto.
Twitter only allows 140 characters. 
There's 20 of them
Minding my own business, then next minute BOSCH.
A bad judge of character. 
Depends.
You're about to meet da-feet!
A reptile dysfunction
Because when she gets to 69 she gets a frog in her throat.
the answer isnt congress
Pumpkin pi.
He ate it before it was cool.
A Pink Car Nation!
Because yellow blue red.
I don't see where you're coming from.
No one cries when you cut up an accordion
She saw the salad dressing.
Blood on your stool
Adorable (A-dora-bull)
Hippies can't change anything. And they smell bad.
She forgot to use Spell Check.
No one knows, they wait for it to burn out and follow it around for twenty years.
Jogging home from your vasectomy. 
Really anything that's heavy enough to beat somebody to death with, such as a motorcycle helmet or a cannonball.
"I don't know what your blaming me for, it's your fault!"
Because he cantaloupe.
Lets get Jobs!
With a pumpkin patch!
Trace
A flashbang.
Steve Jobs went underground.
I have a friend that absolutely loves cheesy, question and answer jokes and I wanna make a card with a list of them! The problem is that she knows just about every joke known to man so I challenge you   to give me hilarious, short jokes that aren't very widely known. Make me laugh!
Tell Her To Lose Just One More Pound And She'll Be Beautiful.
Because if there were one more, it'd be two forty. (Too farty) [This works much better when spoken out loud. The joke how Irish people pronounce "forty."]
A dead rabbit with a gaping asshole.
It's the one that says, "Idaho."
A full set of teeth.
Cut the rope!
Jew-lie
A few notches on the belt buckle.
Camping.
Because he only knows about The White Stripes.
The Sermonator. 
He put it in a conviction-oven.
He kept his stock afloat while everything else was in liquidation.
Because they can resistor.
A pizza can feed a family of four.
Well it's killing me.
Joe had a blind date with Maria for the prom and, as the evening progressed, he found himself more and more attracted to her. After some really passionate embracing, he said: "Tell me, do you object to making love?" "That is something I have never done before," Maria replied. "Never made love? You mean you are a virgin?" Joe was amazed! "No, silly," she giggled, "I've never objected!"
How’s the chemotherapy going?
It’s really cool.
G!  You knit!
Atro-Pee
because they think men care.
25
to a concentration camp.
Both have a one-in-a-million chance of becoming a human being.
when it's B-9
with dill dough
One sucks free of cost while the other is paid for sucking
Government bonds mature over time and earn money
His de-fence attorney!
Because they dont get the difference between 33 and 45.
You pay for your pizza.
, it was Wong on so many levels. 
You might have Wham!nesia...
They turn off their Xbox.
He listens to his old music.
A lap
So he could catch all the fly ladies.
Neither did I.
British dentist.
Al-Gebra
The guys didn't catch anything, but the woman came home with a red snapper.
His owner.
...because curiosty killed the cat
Snickers satisfies.
Yep. First one he named Jose. Second one he named hose B.(again, better spoken)
Nothing neither one has been working since Tuesday...
Will Smith
None, cuz in the end it doesn't even matter!!!
You put a little boogie in it!
Just one, but he has to see Radiohead do it first.
I'm not Willie Nelson.
You can unscrew a lightbulb. 
They're calling it Borking Bad.
It lifts spirits
On the road to Extinction.
Because freedom rings.  Bazinga!
Santa stops after three ho's.
"the Steaks are high."
Because there are twenty of them.
Michael Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzmichael.
They both had kurds in their way. (Curds in their whey.) ***This joke is phonetically superior to its' written version.
1280x720
Both leave you waiting for the drop.
RRRrrrrrrrrrrrape!
The posters.
The Speaker of the House
he had to much baggage
He was caught red-handed! ...I'll see myself to the door.
Everywhere.
Because it's always in bed.
Because everyone knows they're in the closet
Keep the tip.
You know, there is twenty of them
A hit and run
BOOBIES XD 
Cuz he's jalapeno .business
It's called tricoxagain.
Boy: What color are your panties, babe? Girl: Why do you keep asking me stupid questions, don't you ever think about anything else? Boy: Ok, do you think the republicans should support the congress with their decision to raise the debt ceiling ? Girl:You know i am wearing your favourite purple lace panties..You want a pic?
It's gone.
Because religions don't like competing with an invisible power that actually works.
Because they get 8 (ate) more. Repurposed from a    comment.
One is hoplite, and the other a light hops.
You don't. You get down off a goose. 
His ass.
Under the ground.
Because they're shellfish...
You can't hear an enzyme.
Because her teacher told her to go do an essay.
One weak! 
He's on the lam.
Because the grass tickles there balls
Because if it did it would be a chicken sedan.
They take classes on mass debating. 
Because they liked each other.
Ay now. A Scot is a lad that can play the pipes. Scotch is what makes it so that he canna.
Because they always take things... Literally
"That's not Willie Nelson."
Chuck Florist
Girl - Give me 1 good reason, why I should date you? Guy - I'll give you 69.
Brigham Young
Like a joke that involves a pun on a word that has different meanings in different languages. Please tell us what languages they are in.
They woooooooOOOOOOOooooo them.
You can make soldiers out of toast!
What is a fruit bun's favourite subject in a Pub Quiz? Currant affairs.
Self Employed
Because freedom rings
Kick his sister in the jaw.
Daddy came on his shoe and kicked mommy in the ass. Or Daddy came on the wall and mommy ran against the wall.
Mick Jagger sings, "Hey you, get off of my cloud . . ", while the Scottish Highlander yells, "Hey McCloud, get off of my ewe!"
Because 7 is a registered 6 offender  
A troop of gorillas  A shiver of sharks  A streak of tigers  A band of Indians  And a gang of niggers.   
The rooster clucks defiance.       
One looks up your family tree, the other looks up your family bush.
It's absorbing.
They wouldn't let him bring his carrion. Sorry.
His chemistry teacher told him he was mostly made of cabron.
The man wears a full suit, the dog just pants
Fancy food is delicious, but military food is deliciousir!
They give no reaction.
Buffering.
I'm bad under pressure!! It's the lamest car joke in the world.
Apparently he's too small to be a dog.
He had a reptile dysfunction.
Fours
Jalapeno Business........... 
Because old hobbits die hard.
Deer balls, they're under a buck.
BOOM-SHAKA-LAKA!
Apparently he busted a capillary in someone's ass.
In the computerus.
Because they have a good supply of ARRgon.
Ahmad.
Hardcore prawn
A non-prophet organization.
no, who? Football fans.
In all 3 cases, someone forgot to pull it out.
He doesn't even give a bother.
He went back four seconds.
Brown-chicken-brown-coooow 
"I"m arriving, I'm arriving."
It didn't Snowden.
To-do, to-do, to-do, to-do, to-dooooooo
They both stop working properly when you open windows.
A spiDUUUUUUUR
You have to drop the bomb twice.
His matey told him he needed an iPatch
on a Freudian Slip
Crawl up a chicken's ass and wait. 
Squintin' Tarantino
When the last person you want to see is the last person you see.
Because it was too shallow.
Because they have no buccaneers! Happy speak like a pirate day!
The water washes away her tears
He goes back four seconds.
Why Did Hitler commit suicide? Because his gas bill was too high...
They were having dinar. 
All their work is pro Bono.
Wow, I did not expect this post to blow up
Four feet tall, fold back teeth, flat head so you can rest your beer on it, and turns into a pizza at midnight.
An ex-terminator.
He didn't have a safe Hayden place, and couldn't Handel the thought of being sent Bach to prison.
Lie in bed wondering "Is there really a dog?"
Because she's probably thick and tired of it!
Who cares.....
"Been drinking tonight sir?" The policeman asked. "I had one earlier, but that was all," I replied. "I think you've had a few more than that sir. Would you step out of the van please." "Why?" I asked. "Because the Postman Pat ride isn't really designed for adults and there's children waiting for their go."
Wrinkly.
she starts crying
Because they have to
A-fish-in-sea. 
Well, he was good at his job, but I just couldn't stand how he kept sticking his head in my business.
A tan gent.
Most commonly it's whole wheat or rye
"I'll be Bach"
No nuts or screwing; just tongue in groove
Silly faggot, Dicks are for chicks! 
A Jalapenyo-yo
A drizzly bear.
Because they take everything literally.
Picasso 
You hide in a field and make carrot noises.
Because he saw the salad dressing
Because it makes cents.
A: French War Heroes.
He drank his coffee before it was cool
Democracy
Spuddies
A clothes hanger.
He stays up all night wondering if dog exists.
Nah, nevermind, the punchline is too long.
I leave it on the curb everyday, and its always there when I get back from work. 
Fur traders.
(from Stephen King - The Cell)
...He booked it.
Tongue and groove.
Don't look I'm changing!
When it's intersected by a plane
Because they were Snowden.
Data Remember
Put Ranch on it...
Because it was too cheesy. I work at a hot dog stand and tell this from time to time.
A key.
ELECTRICITY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I'm a huge fan.
They were just never on the same page...
Knock Knock Who's there? The documentary The documentary who? The documentary Hoop Dreams.
I don't want to taco bout it.
Neighbor
Cunts way low
..I Noah guy.
Almond joy. 
This might be better suited for   but I think its more a joke Cats have claws at the ends of it's paws commas haves pauses at the ends of its clause.
because it was the first Indie film.
Because there is a target on every corner. Guys, this syriaous. 
Betty White.
He was fixin' to get his fixie fixed. 
Because it was a chili dog!
Oral, B. 
twerk
A-bun-dance
A fap happy jappy with a slap happy pappy. 
That's my story and I'm sticking to it.
the wheelchair.
one’s a crusty bus station and the other’s a busty crustacean
The military service.
Apparelently.
Deer nuts are under a buck.
i'll start it off: What was the last thing going through Mr. Jones’ head when he was working on the World Trade Center’s 90th floor? A: The 91st floor.
It runs in your jeans!
One's a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean.
Southbound 35.
Because he had a frog stapled to his face
Because Kansas sucks, and Texas blows
He's the first dog to be able to lick his own Pollocks
Disgusting. I'll see myself out...
You never have to spend time in the bathroom! I made this one on the fly while I was in there. It might have already been made, but if so, I haven't heard it. 
They're able to stomach a lot.
Women don't point and laugh at the Three Stooges.
Some adults like lawyers.
Industrial Metal
Santa FE GUURLL!!!!
I know, right! Like, OMg!
in bytes
Holy shit!
On the Dias  On the Dias Oh Oh Oh, on the dais.
A Wikipedophile!
To keep his nuts dry
I couldn't make it to the bathroom.
He ate it before it was cool. 
Because the egg cracked a yolk.
ELECTRICITY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! :)
A WHAM reunion.
Because they're ugly and smell bad.
∫π’s of the Carribean.
Most members of the band haven't been in a Porsche.
They planet!
I do.
Her professor told her if she wanted to pass, she had to do an essay 
Pasteurized milk.
chicken but. lol
Turn it inside-out and shake the fuck out of it.
Just some light jokes with bit of humor . Nothing too dark.
He drops the base!
Ma, when are we going to Miami?
Your wife.
Is it in yet? How does a man destroy a womans pride with 4 words? I don't know.
Truck.
I go to the tallest tower in my city. Call up a pizza place and order two large planes.
Hunover.
Because then you'd have to call them bagels.
that was a low blow 
One's fun to hit with a sledge hammer, the other one's a water melon.
Cuz she 'asked' for it!
shit just got real!
I'm working on it.
"Cigarette" because you take him out for a drag.
If you have, then did you ever feel that it could have carried more people?
Because Rouleaux triangles are too hard to manufacture. What do you call 8 hobbits? A hobbyte.
He received a Sunkist from his Crush
Long Island.
Big bad habits. 
The teacher asked Jimmy, "Why is your cat at school today Jimmy?" Jimmy replied crying, "Because I heard my daddy tell my mommy, 'I am going to eat that pussy once Jimmy leaves for school today!'" 
Well, mostly to forget.....
A suicide note. Edit: I already feel horrible Edit 2: I left out a semicolon
Answer:  To a Bananas foster home.
Alicia Quiche 
He would have won, if it weren't for all those medaling swimmers!
They can not stand stakes!
Did you know It takes the average American male approximately 4 minutes to have an orgasm.  Do you know how long it takes the average woman?  Who fucking cares. 
It was awful!  Most of his books hadn't even been colored in yet.
She broke it off
With a poulette surprise!
Inception
It protects from deadly rays.
people are dying to get in.
He's got a   in front of his ass
It feels fuckin awesome but when you get caught its awkward as hell.
Because your mom was on the other side..
He was trying to heel them.
What's the difference between beer nuts and deer nuts? Beer nuts are a dollar and deer nuts are just under a buck.
Poppa Boner
Ronald Reagan always fucked up.
Because the pressure makes him flatter. 
Because Santa only comes once a year and that's down a chimney.
Because he lies on one side and then turns around and lies on the other one. 
When it finally happened, he was beside himself.
He just couldn't 
Anteloping.
They contacted him to give him a TV show, but once they found out he was a fake, it never materialized.
Moose-saka
He played Squint Eastwood.
We are both constantly penetrating your mum.
A paradux
A Mexi
Nothing, trees can't talk!
A vegetarian.
He went back 4 seconds.
An elevator can raise a family I'll just see myself out.
I'll never do that for two bucks again.
Because the only thing to eat is shampoo.
Answer. Madonna doing cartwheels.
either way you lose the trailer
The guy who can carry a dozen doughnuts without using his hands.  Who's the most popular woman? The one who can get the last one without using hers. 
After realizing he didn't need to follow Jewish customs, he exclaimed to the rabbi, "you didn't have to cut me off!"
you dont get either at home. 
A rubber band
Frank
The patella. (I'll show myself out)
An untenable situation
Sketchy
They're both looking for a tight seal.
loading...
Because they like to be in other peoples mouths.
None, they just stand around and compliment it and get pissed off when it doesn't screw. 
A Small, Medium, at Large 
First he wax on, then he wax off!
Eric Clapton would never let a bag of cocaine fall out of a window.
Soooey!-cide
They can both smell it but cant eat it.
Because Ken always comes in a different box
A fucking thief!
what do you call it when 3 muppets have sex together?
Hodor
How do you project confidence?  Multiply by the cosine of the angle.
Glue a piece of toast to the ceiling
You Wanna See A Perfect Relationship? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Watch A Movie... :P Coz it is possible in movies only.
So blind people can hate hippies too.
Because B-shells were too small.
A guy who stays up all night wondering if there's a dog. ~ Infinite Jest, by DFW
They're inbred
Two. One to screw in the lightbulb and the other to hold the penis... I meant... The ladder.
It rars
She goes to the bathroom.
Nobody knows...
Sack-Religious
Tubby.
The toilet doesn't insist on cuddling after you drop your load in it. 
I have a cream.
Telling your parents that you are gay.
He's 0K now.
Because they heard black makes you look thin.
Because there needs to be a period at the end of each sentence.
He pasta way.
He can only stick to himself.
"Want to get kinky and have a 4G?"
Whoever tripped her.
....half a dog.
50 pounds.
He was a little... Possesive
Kermit the frogs finger...
A bad Habit. I'll see myself out.
You get repossessed.
It was Oak, Eh!
He was very cross with them!
One slip of the tongue, and you're in deep shit.
Thort thorts.
Nothing. They bark. 
He re-posts it.
A meanderthal. 
(p + l)(a + n)=pa+pn+la+ln 
One's a Goodyear, an the other's a great year.
The prostitute can wash her crack and use it again and again.
Mufasa!
His shirts get all winkly. 
With A-Rod.
Both offer $5 dollar Foot Longs I'll be here all week cause my car broke down by the shakeys next the aqueduct 
They both have a lot of bum buddies.
68 Because at 69, you flip over and eat it.
Not everyone can tell when you have a fake Christmas tree.
To protect himself from the harmful rays.
Because you cannot have your cake and eat it too
A cuntry (country)
Ge-gnome therapy
C'mon, I bet we can crank some out.
Dates.
In bytes.
Barack Obama!
Rex (made this one up myself!)
A little stiff.
He was making up for lost thyme.  Thank you, thank you. I'll just show myself out now.
Because they weren't getting a square meal.
depresso 
They're both de-calf-inated. 
To the airport please
Make blonde jokes!
Spaghetto.
You take the 's' out of safe and the 'f' out of way.
One of his legs is the same. 
Who knows some funny jokes in a foreign language? (Other than English). I've learned some funny ones over the years but I would love to hear some from others out there. Post the joke in it's language and the translation to English. [I do realize that not all jokes translate properly].
Nothing, you already told her twice.
Goldie Lox (my little sis just came up with this...or so she said)
It's confi-dental 
because he was mortall.
They had a  mantic** time. 
He wax off
Because 7 has friends in the politburo
I Noah guy.
That don't impress me much...
Try spelling Evian backwards.
Death Valley.
Cross your legs
He played a flat baroque piece!
Because they both run after sticks and balls.
White Vans.
Trycoxagain
Pointless.
He lost the porpoise to live.
They finally decided on a name: Soh Doh Mi
They didn't bereave him
A lady of dill repute.
Killed.
They didn't want to leave their brothers behind.
Shoot the guy who's pushing it.
Won on Won. 2 Mexicans playing basketball: Juan on Juan. 2 Indians playing basketball: Khan on Khan.
Depends on how fast you can carry it.
Because it made him mean
Seals.
a stick of gum :D
Manors.
That's me in the corner.
They are always looking for prophets.
A pig won't stay up all night to fuck a musician 
What's the difference between Neil Armstrong and Michael Jackson? One of them walks on the moon, the other one fucks little boys in the ass
Under each seventh cap -  !
Prisons are indoors. 
A circle, eh.
I don't remember the pain but I couldn't manage to walk for a year after.
Where did you leave your legless dog? Where you left him. And how do you call him? Doesn't matter, he won't come.
Juan and a half
They kept falling threw the holes in his hands.
2 in the front, 3 in the back and 1000 in the ash tray.
Because they can`t wait to get out and tell all their friends about scoring.
You can drive a golf ball 200 yards.
A kid with cerebral palsy living in Australia
Proctology.
Endocrine is not a hormone.
"I'm gonna make you eat those words!"
Michael Jackson!
Depends on the supply and demand curve
Don't pay her.
Tooth Hurty (2:30)
We need to give you a cavity search
We are called Juan Direction.
On the perineum falcon!
Eat, drink and be Mary.
Gang rape
Gluk gluk gluk (say it out loud)
Stereotyping.
Bilbo Braggins
Interia
The other whale didn't humpback.
Genocide.
Her personality
That's why I always get in trouble when I do it in school zones.
Paint a goal line on your driveway.
None. Monkeys screw in trees.
Too soon.
Tires need changing too you know!
Luke warm.
One of them has a good driver.
Its arse.
One, ......A Greek will screw anything! 
They found her Head & Shoulders on the  dashboard.
It's a French kiss, ......down under!
The fact that red guards can swim.
A Yacult...
He floated his stock while everyone else was in liquidation.
Cause you have me hooked!
Blond guys aren't too smart either. 
Because the cell door was still locked.
I'm burning, I'm burning, I'm burning Beru.
there are 27 people in the room but on 53 eggs, you know what that means, someone is missing an egg. 
What did batman say to robin before they got in the bat-mobile?  "Get in" 
It's not hard
They both couldn't vote before 1920
They keep stealing green cards.
He has tiny legs.  (if you know what i mean)
Iron Pirate 
rearrange the furniture
The Heir Apparent with no Hair Apparent.
It runs in the Jeans.
Holy fucking shit.
He goes to the Evans
Whedon?
What are your Hemsworth?
He sold his soul to Santa.
A bit of a Downey
It was to cucumbersome.
When it gets it in the ass, he blows his load!
Meowi
There's twenty of them.
Don't worry, they'll tell you
Paper or plasic?
He's gonna find out what's knotty or gneiss.
They have big socks. 
He's an unorthodox orthodox orthodontist
A bar-bee!
The holiest Prophet of Islam.
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless it's ten percent off.
Fuck her in the ass then wipe your dick on the bedspread.
Shurikan
To be long.
Battleshvitz
Because they don't C#.
Dip it in ranch dressing.
His parents weren't 18 or older.
Neither acknowledge their fellow church-goers at the liquor store.
Killed in a tunnel.
Here's mine: Did you hear about the guy who had to snort a line of baking soda every day? He was basically addicted.
it's fucking in tents
a man goes into a pet shop and asks "how much are your wasps" the pet shop owner replies "we don't sell any wasps" "what about the one in the window"
Its ass
Because their marketing is a joke.
On account of the coffin.
Because 0 1 2
Jungle Bells
because air is free
africas population
She prosti-toots!
Yukanol Fukov
He was truly Ag.
Beat it, we're closed.
So, this man and woman are married 44 years and the woman dies, then a few months later the man dies. When he gets to heaven, his wife runs up to him and says, "Hey baby!" and he says,"Sorry honey, death's done us part."
Triangull
Probably killed.
Oil of Ole'
A slap happy jappy with a crap happy pappy
"Life's a bee-itch and then you die."
He was Bin Laden.
"What glass?"
Because I believe that the inventor of the knock knock joke deserves a 'No-bell' prize.
Because their horns don't work. 
When you call the front desk and say, "I gotta leak in my sink,"     and the clerk replies, "okay, Go ahead."
Retortellini.
WOW THAT YEAR FLEW BY 
They don't have any inheritance. Or... Why should you not date a C programmer? They have no class.
Depth Perception!
Second hand smoking! My own joke that I've been meaning to put up for a while. Time to see how it goes haha.
Anne Frank's drum kit.
Did you hear about the bassist that was SO out of tune people noticed?
high ho's, high ho's, it's off to work I go
Meat stroganoff
A singer
Septembrus
I know plenty of raunchy jokes, but was asked this recently and came up blank
He's back in town and wants you to give him a call.
He was galactose intolerant.
A small medium at large
Hijacking.
cacawatches
A hockey goalie changes his pads after 3 periods
Vegetables.
Subjugation.
Ewoks
Because he will always fold.
Because he is never late, nor is he early. He reaches orgasm precisely when he means to.
A bull-shiht!
ninety-nine point nein nein nein nein nein nein nein percent
Because it was a moth ball. 
House music
Luke warm
None.  He'd eat them raw!
When she pulls out her tampon and all of the cotton is missing..
A: Obama.
"I only loved you for your body!"
Because he needed laser eye surgery!
In a Snow Den. (This is a joke. Please refrain from yelling at me, that he is not a spy. Thank you and have a nice day.)
Billiards and Billiards
There isn't one, you can't fuck with either one.
All the signs say Cancer.
Cory Monteith's heroin syringe
They come out in hives.
HIP HOP
Dad's cock tastes like blood.
From PC
So she didn't whistle on the way down.
They think long and hard before they touch weiner. 
Lettuce Alone. 
He's super clingy.
Because it's a stairway to heaven, not a ramp. 
It's Italian for "suppository".
Did you hear about the guy who was obsessed with building HOV lanes through mountains?  Classic case of carpool tunnel syndrome 
Niggles
An asymptoad.
One's a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean. 
Gaaaainsss
They were both two shellfish
Spring time :D I'm not funny (._.)
There's 20 of them
To get some soles!
A Happy Medium. Sorry, a played around with the wording of this a lot and couldn't find anything better.  Please suggest a better phrasing.
Coma patients. 
Sink-o de Mayo.
Haaaay!
Niggas with altitude
Because they can't put their finger on it.
Because they all share the same DNA and there are no dental records.
"Know your roll!"
No eye deer. Say it fast and with a southern accent for full effect.
A Shipmint!
An Instagram.
Nothing really, the just zit there.
Because it rhymes with Bank Manager
Because they want the D.
Mango Lassie
Meet you at the corner!
The broom gets sweepy.
He got baked. 
I dont cry when I cut up a hooker
Jean Cocteau
Heard it.
Bone apetit
She was wearing mittens.
The Whore-Monica 
Chewed three legs off.. and still had one in the trap.
Emptea!
Nothing grows in the shade. 
Hi hoe, hi hoe. It's off to work you go!
Americans eat the food after they nuke it.
Gorgon zola.
Last year's Hide and Go seek champion. 
Because his pecker is on his head
A pilot you fucking racist!
I was having a couple of drinks in a London pub on a Saturday night. I noticed to very large women by the bar. They both had strong accents, so I asked, "Hey, are you two ladies from Scotland?" One of them turned to me and screamed, "It's Wales, you idiot!" So, I immediately apologized, and said, "Sorry, are you two whales from Scotland?"
Say, "You have pretty I's!"
A solipsistic Alphabet.
He came out of the cupboard
About 7 beers.
He hurt his widdle finger.
So he could make ends meet!
Weow!
My Mexican neighbor
When she can't find her pencil and there is a tampon behind her ear.
He heard the ref was blowing fouls!
He had all the money in the world, but no thyme.
"Piece of cake."
She was going through the change...
You probably don't want to, it's fucking retarded. 
Under his buckin' hat.
Enough to kill two and a half men.
Because he practices safe sex and they were on sale. 
I don't know, but she would sure be fun to dance with. 
To fry the chicken.
Reading road signs at 30 MPH
An adadictomy
I'm not sure, but Oklahoma's is OK.
Beef twerky.
9 months.
They were both stuck up bitches
They barely had any atmosphere.
It's smoking a cigarette. 
Finding crabs on your organ.
A Biceptual
Pack-it-stan
The steaks are too high.      
Binary fish-ion.
Watch this!
Free delivery.
Reservations.
She thought it was diet coke.
A Hebrew.
A: No ideer. Q: What do you call a deer with no eyes or legs? A: Still no ideer
An Epikorean.
Pop, Lock & Drop It
He was looking for miners.
Close... but no cigar.
A midget at a urinal. 
it was full of fans.    Thank thank you for your time
Cancer.
A mad lib...
or is it just being a dick? 
She had a litter of mittens.
The Dark Knight Rises.
Mohammad Ali All-E
Names. 
Sheet cake.
Because they've got Ramallah. 
The Wheelchair.
White Flour!
1) The engagement ring 2) The wedding ring 3) The suffering
Because they know their father can read their emails.
A Dino-sore-ass.
She had no legs.
They go hog wild
A crustacean
Bison.
They can both smell it but can't eat it.
Scrambled.
Apple Sauce
It was lame. (I think this is an original by me)
I have Facebook, I already know who got fat.
The both came in a little behind
You hand the bitch a shovel.
He said it was the most violent book he'd ever read. 
Au lait.
Ice Bergers.
because i'm not going to pay you
I asked for pizza.
Two cannibals giving each other a blow iob.
Nothing. They've never met.
Just Kitten
'Let's be avenue.'
Nothing lmao bees cant learn.
Because people are offended by seeing Boo Bees.
Bone.
Just checking how creative the Humorists in Reddit are.
He saw a  .
Swimming trunks!
of course not, it never came out.
Adieu!
Exorcise it.
Zimmerman can dodge a bullet.
A chew-chew train.
The heads-up display
Everyone was issued a nail gun.
When He is standing next to your girlfriend saying her hair smells nice!
They tried to carry-on my wayward son.
A wild asstronaught.
They like the way the meat spins
Men usually miss all three.
The dog is gone, the homework is done, and they're still trying to get out of the driveway.
His name was Neil. Neil da Grass-fed Bison.
They go clubbing. 
So a Roman walks into a bar and says "I'll have a martinus". The bartender says "Sir, do you mean a martini?" to which the Roman replies "If I wanted a double, I would have asked for one."
It's a 'Walking Dead' crossover.
She drops him off at band practice. 
Aristartle
The longer you play with them, the harder they get.
using a vibrator 
Moonwalking
He had allure.
Probably.
How do you stay faithful in a room full of hoes?
They cantelope.
It would be a land of mass-murder 
Hostess Twinkies
Swimming Trunks. 
A Chair-ity!
It asked the digital watch for its hand in marriage. 
Nevermind, there's no point
A logical phallusy!
They're both in bread
Does that mean they cantaloupe?  *Thanks to My Drunk Kitchen! 
If you don't beat it enough, it'll start standing up for itself in public.
Put it in the back yard.
Cancer.
Eleven. One chief of police to oversee it, and 10 cops to beat the lightbulb until it wants to change.
Because they can`t spell the word, beer.
An essay.
By air.
Your mom.
He was out standing in his field. This has Always been my favourite pun.
Because blonde boys aren't all that bright either.
Because D shells are too big.
They have periods every half hour!
Because he was Snowden.
"Geometry!"
ze Hoegaarden.
What a stupid question: Obama won't change jack shit.
Because fucked up duck-beaver lookin thing doesn't sound scientific enough. 
Cause their airplanes kept STALIN!! (Ill see myself out...)
Because the market got flooded.
Automobile! Everyone says gasoline because they don't think about it.
An hour wait for a 30 second ride.
A plaid tie.  
Afroturf
Bagels. Ha.
Undercover. 
In case he gets a hole-in-one
They 'turnip' their noses. 
Because he always spills the beans. 
Give them a dirty tampon and ask what period its from.
Boston Cream Pie
An engineer and an attorney were fishing in the Caribbean. The attorney said, “I’m here because my house burned down and everything I owned was destroyed by the fire. The insurance company paid for everything.” "That’s quite a coincidence," said the engineer. “I’m here because my house and all my belongings were destroyed by a flood and my insurance company also paid for everything.” The puzzled attorney asked, “How do you start a flood?”
She wipes back to front.
Turn it upside down.
Hi ho, Hi ho, it's off to work I go!
Yeah, police are calling it a hummus-cide.
Poke 'em on.
Abra!
The Wheelchair.
A Black man is a sentient creature.
The NBA
Hi cornflake. don't blame me... you clicked on it... what did you expect?
"Keep the tip."
Kermit the frogs middle finger.
A Crane.
There's twenty of them.
One, but he wishes it was two.
because they cantaloupe 
because they would all surrender.
Trying to fit in.
He got fired.
Nothing wrapped in Emptiness. How did the birthday child respond? You are thoughtless for giving me this meaningless gift. To which the Buddhist Master replied, "Thank you."
A jolly rancher! Hahahahahahahahah you guys have no idea how alone I am. 
Virgins. Sorry if it's a repost, I'm fairly new here.
If that's true, I'm all the way up to three inches.
A communist party
The rib cage.
One day she'd just had un œuf.
Sue she
Dr. Dre
Don't Stop
Coach
They've never been fired, and only dropped once.
What did the molar use to cross the root canal? Who did Micheal Corleone have to contact in order to flee to Sicily? Why did Wendy drown trying to get from the Island of Lost Boys to  Pirate Town? 
A Doberman.
Wasaaaabi! 
Because, she was on her pyramid!
Better traction in the mud.
A Gummy Bear!
The box a penis comes in.
He was out standing in his field.
Left Hook.
Looking for a lost golf ball is a hunt on a course.
The spelling Teehee
They gave him the cold shoulder.
Stink.
It's feeling down.
He became a Muslim.
They are taking the geography lessons from their Canadian neighbors in the south.
Because he only comes once a year, and when he does it's down the chimney. 
Sea-sections 
Phil. 
You get laid the same amount of times but the dishes start to pile up. Hey now!
No shit Sherlock...
Turkey
A hate crime.
Cross country
You can't jelly your cock down your girlfriend's throat.
He's OK now
The aftertaste. 
To get the quarter back.
A TOR pedo.
Latvian potato is best potato. Is kind you spend whole life looking for. Also, low calories.
The Kia Ora.
She's only happy when "It's Complicated."
Because he was Snowden...
he was tired of dealing with that shit every day
He's never doing his homework. Yarr.
Candy Kush.
He stays up at night wondering if there really is a dog.
Barry Bonds... Do you know who leads the MLB in strikeouts pitched?  Nolan Ryan... Do you know who has been hit by the most balls? Liberaci
You can't marmalade your dick down someone's throat.
"Ugh, stop standing so colostomy."
Everywhere.
Santa stops after 3 Ho's
Fore.
Call a "toe" truck.
You might get your baby back off a pitbull.
Bean Dip.
He went to court and was charged with battery.
Depends. EDIT: Nobody got this joke. It's not an anti-joke...  are like diapers for the elderly with urinary incontinence / IBS. Oh well.
An astronaut.
The Cowboys' endzone; because no one goes there
Nevermind, it's an inside joke.
She's wearing a sash that says Idaho.
The pit bull will eventually let go.
You can negotiate with terrorists. 
She choked.
In Diana 
He was trying to get some Natural Light.
Cows just aren't getting a square meal these days.
Acne usually comes on a boy's face after he hits puberty.
Pooched. 
They're both orange except for the Apple.
I'm not sure yet.
The spaghetto
A punkin. Edit: and apparently not me.
Nunavut.
Brown chicken brown cow.. 
Well, all marriages are legal in North Korea, but no one has them because there's no rice to throw.
Under his buccan-hat.
Goldfish like to muck around the fountain.
 
They only serve crackers!
He was in the newd today.
Because it was on the house.
Because anyone who can swim, run, or climb is already in America.
Def Leppard
Special KKK.
By leaving the toilet seat at a 45 degree angle for the next person to decide without bias.
Q: what does Oedipus the king's mother wear under her dress? A: a Freudian slip
Because that's where most accidents happend!
You can hide your own Easter eggs.
Because when da white boy whipping dem, they'd jump really high from the pain like from Tom and Jerry
Wes Welker. Everyone knows you need a white Bronco to get away with murder.
Because Ken comes in a different box!
It takes longer to pick up.
Me- No, but the dishwasher is.. Prank Caller- Huh??? Me- Yeah my wife's out on a jog...
Nothing. They both stink!
A panda. It's black, it's white and it's Asian.
In his sleevies! 
Cadillac seats 5.
Her parents left the plunger in the toilet.
A whinecologist. 
Smurfette, as she's the only one with a blue box! Lol
Rasputin
Cause he was snowden.
Snow whites cherry. 
In honor of the recent joke trends I ask you what is the dirtiest joke you know? 
Because everytime they look down they shit themselves.
The Ground.
What do the WWE and CNN have in common?  They're both fake, but sometimes people still get hurt.
Squatters.
Because he's snowed in.
Ruth-less.
Too many cheetahs.
It was in bread.....
C, eh. N, eh. D, eh.
A log!
Does that mean mary had a little lamb?
It's for yids, by yids!
Because I've got an unattended package I think you should investigate.
A trip without the kids
Because he would just kill off all 140 characters.
Area 52
The Middle. That way, you're always driving out of Iowa.
Because he was snowed in.
A nun with a harpoon through her head.
Crackers don't come in cans, they come in boxes!
tulips on your organ.
A firecracker.
they only live for three days, and spend it fucking with you
Because the Earth is not a sandwich!
You can't make your van gogh.
Because it was his duty.
C-C-C-COMBO BREAKER!
they only bring a smile if used properly.
A toe-mat-o.
If you had one you would know.
KK-cake
Nothing, it just let out a little wine.
A: Kermit the Frog's Finger
When you throw your knickers against the wall, and they stay there.
A tents atmosphere
The order was for two large planes!
Because she already has 315 degrees.
A spatula. Maybe she'll be more responsible making dinner than making babies.
Rastafriedrice
Paradice...
Helen Keller.
Hey, teacher, leave those kids alone!
"Fuck-ooooff, fuck-ooooff, FUCK-OFF!!!"
Because they suck.
I have no idea, I just know they aren't free
Because they're good at commiting.
Hummuside
My Buttcheeks ((_
He was a super pallid Cali mystic, expert at hypnosis. (Today I had wanted to tell someone the Gandhi joke I read on here the other day, but I couldn't remember it so I made this up and thought I may as well share it even though it's purely derivative.)
A handicrapped zone.
Jesus didn't have a bunch of tattoos of a Mexican...
I laughed but still. I find it unlikely that a quarter billion people subscribed to 
Because proper tea is theft!
Child: Knock Knock Grandmother: Who's there? Child: [Insert Name] Grandmother: [Insert Name] who? Child: Oh no! You have Alzheimer's! Yes? No?
A club sandwich with extra beets.
We'll get on it next week
He ate a 3 year old wiener.
Ewoks
Wait until the leash goes slack, then pull the rip cord.
Good credit and a fat ass. 
Because the stalks are all ears.
Nothing. It just waved.
Jah-Bless!
She offered to pay for half of his J-date membership.
Eh, it's some number you've probably never heard of.
No Mata!!
One is so hot that you blow on it before you stick your dick in,  and the other is a person and shouldn't be seen as a mere sexual object.
Neither, they both burn shorter.
Go for the juggler.
A nervous wreck.
They couldn't be further from my mind.
Because they are disappointed in you...
It would be funny if this joke had a punchline. Wooden tit.
When you throw your knickers against the wall, and they stay there.
Because they always see widescreen!
A geek.
An illegal.
Because all of it's Uncles were Aunts(Ants)
A: You lift their kilts, and whichever one has a Quarter Pounder is a McDonald!!
A golfer goes whack......shit. A climber goes shit.......whack.
He got mixed up with a few bad apples.
Because, their pecker is on their head.
Only one of them is organized. Couldn't help but post this.  Went to see a former mafia boss today, and that joke was told leading up to him speaking.
A Swallow.
They can't, it'd be much too cramped.  How would they even get in there in the first place?
Because he was Snowden!
He's never gonna give you Up! Credit to my friend who doesn't even Reddit.
Yeah right, like married women ever screw anything other than poolboys.....
You marry her.
Keep the tip.
Because they cantaloupe
The blonde doesn't sit still when she is on eggs.
Because there were 'nights.
1% Do it again 1% Go Smoking 1% Fall Asleep 97% Clear History EDIT: Punctuation
Awesome...
He couldn't shit. 
I don't know, but it sure can pick lettuce.
Because he was Snowden
Penis weakness leaving the body.
Baked Beans.
Mourning wood
Recently heard a yo mama joke and wondered if there is such a thing as yo daddy jokes. If they do exist, I'd like to read some!
Brown chicken, brown cow. (say outloud for full effect)
Scooby doo.
I candel you.
A good thing screwed up by a period.
What do you call a cow that's missing a leg? Lean Beef. What do you call a cow with no legs? Ground Beef. What do you call a cow that's masturbating? Beef Strokin-Off
Kermit the Frog's finger
Possession!
A bull smiles when you milk it. 
Because the P is Silent!
They both had Kurds in their way!
Because he was out standing in his field. 
Wanna go ride bikes?
Because he had his appendix removed. note: books can also be female.
He was floored.
He never really got the hang of Parthian shots.
Decepticondoms.
Buy a deck of cards.
It reminds him of Uncle Ben.
Brevity.
doesn't matter...  must not look down..
Luftwaffles
The Hippocampus!
Tape his mouth shut. 
His name is Ryan Fitzpatrick
Because they can't get past "the wall".
Uhh' banananaaaaaa
Because the tower is an Eiffel. 
Credit: Saw the comment in this   [1:55]
Carlos
because it was two tired
Tim Tebow
Self employed
A portugeeser
Because she got an F in sex.
Pale ale
It's driving me nuts
Rover Flows Out Of You.
The French word for "cheese" is "fromage".
Because you always want another one!
expellianus!
Cherry pop.  See you all in hell!
Both get to smell the goods but neither get to eat it.   (A straight rip from   with my apologies)
He called for her three times, but she she still didn't answer. ...
Put a windshield in front of her.
Eh, I'll tell you later.
Because it's un oeuf.
"You're my breast friend"
The epileptic corn-husker shucks between fits.
One's a crusty bus station... The other's a busty crustacean! 
Come again?
Sparky
Cancer can get jobs
[Meekly]   
Emission impossible
My dad recently clipped a child on his way to pick my brother up from school. Everyone was okay and everything is sorted out, but he's been noticeably sad and depressed and stuff. I could not come up with any jokes, sadly. Can anyone help me out?
Rick O'Shay.
Because the sunscreen instructed to apply liberally and he was unwilling to compromise.
Grazing. 
'Cause 69's a mouthful!
You can't gargle sand.
Cuz you a Ho
None; they all stand around complementing it then get mad when it wont screw. Heard from my friend
It's naan of your business!!!
One cold night, she broke it off!
Nought two sixty.
With summer getting sunnier a woman asks her husband: "What do you think: should I go sunbathing in the nude in the backyard?" The husband just shrugs and says:"Do as you like." The woman replies: "What do you think the neighbors will say if they see me sunbathing like that?" The husband replies:"They'll probably think I married you for the money."
A menstrual cyclist!
Because none of their plans are ill-conceived.
You get better grip on the brooms.
Because of the green piece inside.
Emilio Incestevez
"Cheep"
I'm always taken for granite!
SHELLom
I don't cum on an apple before I eat it
No one knows yet!
Because Opie is faggot
A reservation reservation reservation.  Credit to Brian Regan, this is my favorite joke of his!
The Boss of our small company was complaining during a staff meeting that people didn’t respect him enough. Trying to change the attitude in the office he came in the next day with a sign for his door it said, “I am the boss”. One of the employees apparently not appreciating the change posted a post-a-note on the sign it said “your wife wants her sign back” 
'Cause they're a bunch of pussies.
bob
Because they can't monitor all those dropped calls!
[ ] Some-where over the rain-bow... Weigh a pie.
because the Trail Of Tears had a toll booth.
They don't hit on anything over 14.
A strapadictome
a handshake
Cause they be quacking jokes
A trailer
Depends
The spaghetto.
To hide his nuts!!
Where there's a Will, there's a way.
One is a bunch of Cunning Stunts
Because he hates Costco.
At 'Wass-a-matta U'
Han Jobs
It's all just white noise.
They always come pre-paired. 
Theres twenty four of them.
''Doctor Dolittle.'' EDIT: The doctor off that movie that talks to the animals.
He works it out with a pencil.
Little Seizures.
Because he d-d-d-d-dropped the vase.  Stupid. I know. 
An Unexpecturd.
Everywhere
Concentrated juice.
Up vote if you agree
Allah-board
Mitosis!
They Cantaeloped!
Because we're too afraid to go outside
Two, but you have to get them in the lightbulb first.
A cussomer. 
Sandwiches.  Friend told me this today and had to share
There's a parking meter on the roof.
a pedophile
Because they don't like Dicks.
To get the serf report
to the dog.
At a meatball!
He's already started suing again.
Because he was wayyy far out man.
It's a local anthesisia anesthesia, you've probably never heard of it. 
A sheep-da
A cross breeze.
A cab.
Oh, Plebes.
1forrest1
I don't think you understand the gravity of your situation
They never get old.
The Diarrhea of Anne Frank
Mace
It got stuck to the chicken. 
Dat shit Frey.
Temperatures above 100 degrees celsius.
Entra-Manure 
Echo-location, location, location (Replace "bat" with "zubat" if you wish.)
At least you get to start with an anonymous tip.
Peter Shrinklage
A 'Miley Cyprus'.  Dear god, shoot me.
Portugeese
You've never heard of him.
Probably because he was such a- "Fagget about it!"
Coaster Rica
A good start.
Because 7,10,11!
"It has Injun problems."
Because he takes everything for granite.
Viet-nom.
One in thousnads has a chance to e a human being.  ~Edit: I edited the title. 
"Don't look back in hanger"
Holy Smokes!
It gives out a little wine!
Eh-K-47
Ask your parents
Lil Wayne-ker
They have four lips
None, that's a Mexican's job.
He smelled a little fishy.  Edit: a word. 
Nobody laughs at your jokes.
They know they've given their last blowjob. 
Because when it works, it is always half-ass.
None of them, they are all stuck up cunts
If its on your fourhead?
My zipper.
Tot Pockets
Brothel sprouts.
vim, vim, vim, vim, vim, vim, emacs, and vim.
Because jungle is massive
They're both interested in whips and chains.
A Slut sleeps with everyone A Bitch sleeps with everyone, except you.
As a soldier, it is your job to kill people. As a teacher, it is your job to try very hard not to kill people.
Then I bet you wish you'd given them proper names instead of thinking you were clever by calling them Lake and Destiny.
My advice is to pop it in a bag of rice overnight...
So you know what shows   to watch.
What is the difference between a introverted engineer and an extroverted engineer? An introverted engineer looks at his feet when he talks to you. An extroverted engineer looks at YOUR feet when he talks to you!
They can't pass the bar.
Don't worry--THEY'LL FUCKING TELL YOU.
He strained his leg.  
A 7-year-old that can run faster than her brothers!
He died of exposure.  It was not a pretty picture.
nevermind it's satill in beta
Because if you went down a slide you'd go blblblblblblblblbll... (When telling the joke you're supposed to do a duck face and hum and put your finger up and down on your lips.
They wouldn't. They'd rather spend a decade bitching about how it went out.
Because he couldn't get his dick out of the chicken.
Lenght of chimney x wind speed
We usually are outside for hours arguing over who get the hold the door open for everyone.
Come  Help  A Nigger  Get  Elected
The haunted mouse
Because he makes two Adams smash together
So it doesn't burst when you fuck it.
They don't have enough teeth for dental records, and they all have the same DNA.
He breaks his nose.
Huge tits. 
It was feeling down
My dad just took a piece of metal to his chest and it is imbedded in his skin. We have thought of all jokes possible relevant to the situation. He has a good sense of humor. We need more jokes.  Please help me reddit!
Ba dum 
His Feyonce.
He's out standing in his field.
A yama-cat
Lots
Because he's dead.
They both like a tight seal
Yell "BINGO!"
One likes pipelines, and the other likes pipes   lines.
Two, but how do they get in there?
because he has no Seoul
Urine trouble!
Your parents would know!
"No, and I bet she hasn't heard about it." "She probably hasn't seen it either."
I genuinely care about your mother.
It's a secret!
Because he wanted to transcend dental medication. 
Rape.
CROSS fire
It wasn't because he was Jewish, it's because he didn't exsist. 
Society 
Must be hard to beat.
HAND-EEEEEYYYYYYYYYEEEEEEEEEEE
Because they're jahbless!
Acne waits until you've hit puberty to come on your face.
Ape-ril
Because he couldn't branch out.
Because it reminded him of Jonathan Clock the man who raped his wife the night before.
Homo erectus.
When you rub your dick on her teddy bear.
Vladislav, baby don't hurt me, don't hurt me, no more.
You can unscrew a lightbulb
Nobody knows.
Planters.
what the hail was that?!
Arbortion
Kill his entire family
I could use some sage advice.
Because he kneaded a poo.
The father says - "40 dollars, what do you need 30 dollars for?"
I'm taking a psychology of death and dying class, and one of the assignments is to dig up some jokes about death, dead people, dying, etc. Whatever you post here will probably make it into my paper. Anything you can think of will help and I'll probably end up laughing my ass off reading through here. 
You're gonna get raped!
Are you fucking Sirius?
Because you take one look and walk away.
A roundhouse kick from Chuck Norris!  However, this method will cause more destruction than the tornado.
Two cooks in the house.
Pilgrims.
A Gay Raj band
The girl in a church has a soul full of hope and the girl in a bath has, well... EDIT: better structure.
A frog in a blender.
Some women say size doesn't matter. Some even say that they prefer smaller ones. I think that they're just shallow.
Be sharp or Be flat.
Back into the microwave so I can get in another round.
They've got to get their 72 virgins 
Nobody knows.
Weapons of mass-reduction.
Coop d'etah
Nah, she couldn't be fucked.
It krilled iself!
He desperately kneaded the dough!
You wouldn't get it... It's too long.
They want to finish before it's cool.
You know you shouldn't, but eventually you're gunna lick it.
A box of assorted creams.
I pity the stool!
Because they recognise Ty won
Finnish hymns
Give them 2 cocks and they'll blow. 
For example, "this is so bad TBS just picked it up for 6 episodes."
Canceled Czechs
Walk him, and pitch to the giraffe! 
A paragraph, because he isn't yet an ése.
In the end, everyone did it.
Looking for the tight seal
A cemetary, freaks a woman out a little bit, makes it that much tighter...
The Doors.
Shuriken.
Two test-tickles.
What's the porpoise? 
...she shattered his jaw!
None. They prefer Natural Light.
He forgot to wrap his whopper.
We had a female news anchor that, the day after it was supposed  to have snowed and didn't, turned to the weatherman  and asked:  'So Bobby, where's that 8 inches you  promised me last night?' 
They both circle around Uranus searching for klingons.
A man walks into a bar, thirsty for a drink. He finds an open stool and sits down at the bar. The bartender looks at him and asks, "what do you want, jackass?" The man sitting next to him looks shocked and asks, "are you going to let him call you that?" "HEE HAW, HEE HAW, HE ALWAYS CALLS ME THAT."
Rolaids.
Doctor.
Were both constantly penetrating your mom
A black guy, because it's probably already stolen.
Cross-Crountry
"fertilized"
None, they only screw playoff games.
Purr-tuguese
Bu-khakis
It's an obscure number, your probably never heard of it. 
Underlay! Underlay!
It's simple. We all know 69 as a sex position. Satan's own number is 666. Now think about gays, and 666 as a sex position.
Count for yourself...
The cold shoulder
Do you like fishdicks?  Do you like to put fishsticks in your mouth? You're a gay fish.
Wanna ride bikes?
I like your hat. 
On a bull, the horns are at the front, and the ass hole is at the back.
Condoms.   Courtesy of my witty ole' uncle mike
Little Caesars.
A PRIVATE TUTOR
Every time his wife gets hot he beats her with a shovel..
Jews.
Because he kept running out of the pen.
Zimbabwe.
Quacker Oats
Debris.
You'd probably think it's missionary, but i'm pretty sure they'd try the back door if they had the chance.
Because plastic surgery costs a fortune!
Who wants to know?
... Cashews. 
Interracial double penetration
Ruuuubbbby?
She was always eating her curds and whey.
They both moan like hell when they come and take the house when they leave.
Its ass. 
"What are all these landscapers doing here?"
If we stick together, we can stop this shit. 
Bringham Young
A reptile dysfunction 
A golden retriever
Please share if you have any, no rules O.o
Because they can't reach the top shelf. 
None, Rather than change it they will just sit in a corner and cry like little bitches
Cause they love the part when the hooker returns the money!
It's intense!
.. A cereal killer !
All the damn digging.
So a guy from Minnesota goes to Harvard and he goes up to one of the students and asks, "hey could you tell me where the library is at"? and the student snobbly replies, "This is Harvard we don't end our sentences with prepositions". To which the student form Minnesota replies, "okay, could you tell me where the library is at asshole"?
The wheelchair.
History
Let's get Jobs.  Found in the comments of a   post by   
Fruit by the foot.
Give her a used tampon and ask her what period it came from.
A blender. How do you get them out? Tostitos
A sheep. 
Do you lava me like I lava you?
One's a sick duck, and I forget the rest of the joke but your mother's a whore.
Subtlety.
A Query. 
Because cowboys always eat with their hats on.
Fluoride, duh.
Prism (Note: I made this joke up. Sorry if this little note refracts from the humour.)
No, I'm not in a hurry.
A water sprinkler, cuz it goes spic...spic... spic, chink, niggerniggerniggernigger I'm black btw, heard it at an anti-racism assembly in high school of all places.
Luke warm.
Whale shit!
Sore Arms.
I'm sorry officer I didn't know this was your jurisdicktion. I heard this on a movie years ago,  can anyone guess which one it was? 
In case he got a hole-in-one!
Off the hook. (It's stupid but I did make it up)
Because Boston has all the cups!
It turns Noooo! Noooo! Noooo!......to..... Mmmmm, Mmmmm, Mmmmm.
A magician makes rabbits appear in hats, while a psychologist makes habits appear in rats.
A Boyscout comes back from camp!
A plesiosaur.
It must be a prequel spin off.
Iron Man is a superhero. Iron woman is a command.
Mycoxafloppin.
A homesick abortion.
It was plane to sea.  
'Cause the B-shells were too small.
He was charged with possession.
A cock that sticks to the roof of your mouth.
Whoa, whoa, whoa... Wade just a minute. 
Woofsh
Let's just say he felt overall sadness.
george crooney
because he can't aim steadily  
Connect the Dots.
A heart surgeon takes his Cadillac to his mechanic to get his engine fixed. When he returns a few days after to pick up the car, the mechanic calls him over to show him something. He says, "Okay Doc, I've changed the seals out and fixed everything up but I have one question. The engine is to the car as the heart is to the body. Why is it that you make some much more money than me?" The doctor examines the engine carefully and says, "try fixing it while the engine is running." 
Rustle
A butt load...
It's called The Pun-isher.
I will not stand for this.
I bang them both on my coffee table at night. 
I would love some jokes to tell to my teachers :D
The stuff they have looks good but its impossible to put together. huehue
A velocirapture
In a skeptic tank. (Note: I just made up this joke earlier today. I'm not 100% sure the joke is obvious; feel free to suggest a better wording!)
Mick Jagger says "Hey (hey) you (you) get off of my cloud..." the Scottish farmer says "Hey McCloud get off of my ewe"
A human-sized microwave.
Not long... they like to do it while it's still warm.
Follow instructions. Say - Eye Spell-map Say-ness
A rooster goes cockle-doodle-doo and and a prostitute goes any cock will do
The cold shoulder!
You can't hear an enzyme
EU!
When the choir boys have diarrhea.
Captain Hand
It's knees.
Ginger ale!
Free Ham!
These pants fit like a glove!
I can maintain polite conversation.
Because they had nothing in comma
Dago wop wop wop
They both get a hard on when they find a gap in the fossil record. 
Give him sheet music.
His kid said, "Dad, I'm over here!"
Jackpot!
milk 
Toad.
Depends
Because the pee is silent.
Niggers.
He was playing on the road again.
No L
You can't fit your finger between the noose and his neck.
Militia Etheridge
A Trampoline.
An overall statement.
A Chinese finger trap
He had to sarcophagi for the drug money
a Shar-Pei :)
It's not hard.
He couldn't figure out how he got a period.
Depends.
Zero fucks gibbon. (sorry)
He was looking for Pooh.
One's a hairy beast that spits and the other's native to South America.
A Nguyen mill.
Motherless.com
Punch him in the nose.
A homogeneous mixture.
A stoner gets baked on purpose
Botulism. Bad meat in the can.
because Chinese eat fish and Koreans selfish 
It got   away!
Nothing. Fruits can't talk. Idiot.
Oh never mind it's too long.
Nobody wants to pretend to be a Mexican for a day. 
The weekend!
I don't know why you're shaking, she's going to eat me.
Haaaaayyyy(gay voice)
He bought a warehouse.
It got toad away.
Cuatro Sinko.
A piece of cake
Mourning wood.
How do you drive this thing?!
Because they're too cornea.
Because they'll steal all the green cards.
Boy Scouts get to leave the camp.
Czechers.
You planet.
BBBRRAAAAAAAHHHHHMMM...'s lullaby.
She was a woman.
A statesman is a dead politician. God knows we need more statesman.
A wonkey.  What do you call a three-legged donkey with one eye? A winky-wonkey. 
A bit of this and a byte of that.     Courtesy of   here 
When the leash goes slack.
No sound at all, the D is silent 
Ted Bunyan.
His pairs are unmatched!
Because they can't keep a straight face.
Because he has seen plenty of balls drop.  (Sorry)
coming out of the pantry! i dunno if this is the kinda stuff you guys like, but i had to share it with someone.
Meowcus
Eileen Dover...
Tooth-Hurty
50 cent with Nickelback
Iron, man.
I call that unfortunate.
He isn't a fungi.
A functioning alcoholic.
Because you could easily fit another pair of tits down there.
Because he's dead
Tequila Mockingbird I made this up just now... I'm so excited about it.
WANNA RIDE BIKES?
Emoglobin.
Because she was looking for a stable relationship.
Because if it flew over the bay it would be a bagel!
Of course you haven't.
Cancer.
They don't like Dicks...
Because it was Hammertime'
Algorithm
Leek.
Because it was popular in California 10 years ago.
Dark side of the moon.  You sick bastard.
The driving point is that it's auto-biographical.
Because 9 was still alive.
He ended up nailing Jesus.
There was a face-off in the corner.
Baroque.
I'm nuttin' without you.
They come in pears
Pilgrims
In a nutshell!
Hitler. 
"I have only my shelf to blame"
His goal: transcend dental medication
They both want to bury their bone.
It Depends
Two Mennonite 
What do you call a fruit that procrastinates? ...A Cramberry!
Salt Lick City.  
Just for the halibut.
Anything but blue waffles.
Jim Brady
Your Wife is shouting at you to open the front door, and your dog is barking at the back door. Which one do you let in? Well you can choose, but if you let the dog in at least they will stop barking. 
SQUIRREL SHIT!
She's a Woman....  No, Seriously, it's cause she's dead.
I don't have a BMW in my garage.  ....and if I did, I   wouldn't masturbate in it. 
The PUNter.
Holy smokes. 
A Freudian Slip
Call gary
None.  They glow in the dark.
That all depends on the drill.
Deport him.
It was rated R.
Both can be fixed with a coathanger.
A nun with a spear through her head.
you stink.
Americans. Alternatives: What's the only thing Americans and the French agree on? The English. What's the only thing the English and Americans agree on? The French.
The spawn shop.
They taste funny
Elvis Parsley
Rape. It's not a family game.
All they've got is Harden
Either way you lose a motorhome.
You can't gargle sand.
A tuna, because the rest of them are crustaceans. 
Polaroids.          
Vladimir Pootin'
The wife always blows the bonus.
A Nguyen-Nguyen situation
Militia Etheridge
One is a busty crustacean and the other is a crusty bus station
Someone who literally gets off beating a dead horse.
Free bacon. Let the downvotes rain down on me.
I know there's a joke in there somewhere... 
Mat. I neglected to mention he has no arms or legs.
Because he's a dickhead.
Juan more time!
Hey, Sally... what's your favorite color? Piiiiiiiink Hey, Sally, what's your favorite smell? Roooooooses Hey Sally, what's your favorite animal? Pretty butterflies! Hey Sally, what's your favorite sound?  BALLS! SLLLLLAPPIN' AGAINST MY ASS!
Putting her back in the wheel chair...
Punch them in the hands.
He was thrown out at home.  - His two balls got a strike. 
String theory!!
You get banned from the petting zoo. 
That is Nazi answer.
They were his best fronds.
He came out of nowhere.
It's pretty much a downward spiral.
It was awesome!
All of them!
Boobees!!!
Because they'll Pikachu
It was on a strict diet of worms. edit:  changed pronoun to avoid ambiguity
Snigger. 
Because there's a vas deferens between them.
They both have 3 balls and 2 strikes.
Pack him a lunch and tell him to go to work!
They're scared of Wales.
Hey guys, so our office is right between where the two bombs went off in Boston last week. They opened everything back up last night, and so we're back in today. I saw a lot of stuff that I never wanted to last week, and it seems like I'm the only one here (out of 6 employees) that is really struggling with this. Can you help me get through today with some feel good jokes?
Because he was a fucking liar! -from Louis CK's AMA-
I love ewe!
Monkey vomit
....because he was afraid he'd see Bush. 
It was hard to make a living. 
I was just wondering about how many jokes today maybe irrelevant 100 years into the future. To test this theory, what are the oldest recorded jokes? 
Because pepper makes them sneeze
"Crick"
The second hour is free.
Like, "It's time for a spanking." "You've been a bad girl." Or "Come over here and suck daddy's dick."
There once was a genie with a 10 foot wienie  so he showed it to the woman next door she thought it was a snake so she hit it with a rake and now it is 5foot 4
KKK-Mart.
A pinecone.
"Bro, do you even shift?"
It went on a road trip and had an auto body experience!
I tried taking his shell off but it only made him more sluggish.
Person 1: Her name was Reese, errr, Reese, Reese whatshername... Person 2: Witherspoon? Person 1: No, with a knife. 
A scientologist.
I'm Thor
Beaners
Because they're always looking for drains.
Pee-er to pee-er networking (P2P).
Era Error
Albums released through California penal records.
Coal'd.
One... The rest are true stories.
Put on the wrong sock.....
He felt his presents.
Make sure you get my Gouda side!
All, to save this world from the darkness. 
He is really gay
When the Doctor changes the timeline, it's usually for a good reason.
What do you call a couch, chair, and a table made out of plants? Ferniture.
Because he was on duty.
Because he couldn't concentrate.
I can't be your friend anymore you're just too shallow!
because he was DEAD
I don't have a Ferrari.
Because it was more than 90 degrees.
To get to the other side
1 very large cricket
No one likes to eat parsely.
Because he was bored of the rings!
He got the sack.
"You're grounded."
I can't goat my dick in your ass.
It was too tired...
I heard everybody had a blast. 
Because they can't wear a strait-jacket.
Push it down a hill.
He forgot his head and shoulders.
"Do you sell flip-flips?"
Once they're blown, they're useless.
De-composing
The one who broke a G string while fingering A minor.
"Brown-chicken-brown-cow!"  And then they swagger a bit.
She was tired of raisin' kids.
I can feel it coming In The Air Tonight, Oh Lord!
Go for the juggler.
He was second to Nun.
From doing Magic.
Big bird's eggs and ABCmen.
The hunger games
You don't
It might Pikachu.
He broke his glasses.
When your balls slap your girlfriend's ass, you know you're in definitely.
"I'm not Willie Nelson"
Because he didn't drywall. 
boobies 
dog gone
Because she can't fit into D shells
Having to sit in the back of the oven.
One less drunk.
A Piece of ass that'll bring a tear to your eye
they touched some many lives 
because they are very touching 
Plesbians
No!!!  A pilot! A fucking pilot! You racist bastard!
Because its humerus!
Mee yew!
How many do you want?
The Boston Marathon!
Depends.
The NBA.
Because ze Germans like to march in ze shade.
Nothing. They just waved.
Because they own none chucks.
He had a very eunuch style.
He was out standing in his field.
Pull back a few inches
None, Nazis can't finish a race. 
What's 72? 69 with 3 people watching!
A 7 year old who can run faster than her brothers.
Sum ting wong
Because you can't see in the dark Badambum!
Kids don't eat spinach
"Lettuce, pray."
...because he had Loco-Motive.
You stay up all night wondering if there's a dog.
One. 
In the foliage.
scrotemeal
Because everytime his wife gets hot ,he covers her with dirt and beats her with a shovel. :-P
He pulled some strings.
Homocide.
An issue. 
So he'd use natural logs!
Republicans are against them and democrats want more for schools.
The D is silent.
because if they go forward they would fall inside the boat.
What do I have to do to get ahead around here?
After you're done with the breasts and thighs, all you have left is the greasy box. 
Because even if they had 4 players they still couldn’t throw a ball.
One.
Apparently half of London
To get to the other side.
None. Once the bulb goes out, they replace the house.
SHE FELL, DAMNIT! God! What is with all the fucking questions?
A pouch potato!!
The Cowboys stadium, the only place there'll never be a touchdown
You only need one nail to hang a picture of Jesus.
It wasn't going over too well.
Little seizures
He got crêped out.
Watching them break down on the witness stand.
Because it had too many threads.
Never mind, it's pointless.
Hi, Ladies!
They go back and re-herse.
A Stephen Fry-up.
A BIPOLAR BEAR
All day long they're talking about "buck, buck, big cock!"
Because a tuna can!
You'd turn red too if you had to change in the street.
....He broke his nose
She needs the other to moan.
kick his sister in the jaw
Got Ham?
You whore. 
Very satisfying.
"BAAAHH RAIN!"
Because he would always drop the bass
He got caught on the internet, looking up chicks.
A mute.  Sorry if repost. 
Bring 'em on! Post em all here.
No really. Only paid a couple of bucks.
He knows a lot about black holes
Once you've heard Juan you've heard Jamal
There once was a fellow from Kent, Whose cock was so long that it bent. To save him some trouble, He'd put it in double. And instead of coming, he went.
Eclipse it.
Girls don't laugh at the 3 Stooges
An elephant sitting on your fence masturbating.  
An algae bra.
They will tell you.
Wok it off! Wok it off!
Seven.
Someone else's pants on.  My grandfathers favorite joke.
Neither did she.
Cos they'll always hook a brutha up
The only tool it used was a flapjack.
He blew him off. 
Apparently he was "too cool for school".
Because Marx said "You have nothing to lose but your chains."
So you'll have a sucker when they rob you. Eh, someone will like it.
There was this girl from Boston, Mass.  She wade into the sea and wet her ankles,  it doesn't rhyme now,  but just wait until the tide comes in  
There once was a fellow named Blair  Who was having his girl on the stair On the 44th stroke The banister broke So he finished her off in the air. 
He was a Tad-Pole
B
Jewbacca
Well, Mister Bigger's  baby's a just little bigger.
For fingering A Minor
You can beat a drum.  And you can beat a woman. But you can't beat a blowjob.  
....nevermind its too cheesy
On the Breast of a woman named Gale was tattooed the price of her tail and on her behind for the sake of the blind was the same information in braile.
He had 4 sacks. 
Having to sit in the back of the oven.
It was soda pressing. 
Why don't schools in the south teach Driver's Ed and Sex Ed on same day? Too hard on the mule.
They got away from the scene without a tres.
CAPS LOCK
The cop
Oh, wait. That's a hardware problem. 
heres a hint, join the two words and put a jew in there
Its Juan vs. Juan
He always beats her to the punchline.
Matt.
A mosquito stops sucking after it's slapped
Gopher gold.
The Captain's Log.
Yes, for sizzles. Edit: Snoop Lion
The black guy doesn't give a shit
Who farted?
With a pair of Caesars!
Oy Vey!
It was the Tequila Mockingbird.
Qui-Gon Gin
Algorithm.
His hand was bigger than his face.
An Amish mechanic.  A favorite from Robin Williams
A cawcus
You 'WOOOO' him!
The satchel charge.
They better hope it's not the Asian.
It's the wurst!
You don't.
Their, they're, there. You'll be all right.
You stay here, I'll go on a head!
You, knead me.
You know you shouldn't, but sooner or later you're gonna give it a lick.
Have you tired pulling apart a grilled cheese sandwhich.
The overheads were too high.
Candice who?? Candice dick fit in your mouth??
Whatever you want.
Even with butter, children still do not like it.
It's like a metaphor.
A homosexual.
A receding hareline.
Getting money and dicks out of their minds. 
The pizza can feed a family of four
Your mums cunt lol
Their pacifists
Because he was tired of working with assholes all day
Douse it with petrol and toss a lit match. WOOF!
Baraaaaaak Obama
At the BP station. (thanks grandma)
Because he promised change.
Marry it
Two of my favorites are:
There's only one you can unload with a pitchfork. Edit: Who said something about dead babies?
CNN shows the missiles taking off and Al-Jazeera shows them landing. (Not mine, just heard it on the Jimmy Dore show) also "My favorite indie band is palestinian.  I think they're really going to blow up."
Split the bill.
It's the only place they can call someone "father".
(A)..... The rooster clucks defiance.
The last black person that had a dream got shot!
A RUBBER BAND.
She puts in in the microwave.
Because they steal, shoot, and run!
Grade 1.
RAPE
Because the head had to be empty in order to build a restaurant.
There's none. They both have big hearts but a short reach.
because they deserve them
Her scar pupil.
A hippopottymouth
The baby starts picking cotton off her tampons. (aaannnd i'll see myself out)
So woman know what it's like to live with an irritating cunt!
Because it's worth it.
They each got six months
When you slap a mosquito it stops sucking!
I need a good, clean, short joke about a mammal.  I know this is an odd request, but maybe some of you will enjoy the challenge, or maybe you have some good ones you're just waiting to share. Let me have em.
Because they taste funny.
Connect the dots. (I'll see my self out.)
A physicist is atoms studying themselves, while a biologist is cells that study themselves.
Its been renamed to The View, however...
Cause she was too big for B- shells! (my 6 year old niece likes to tell this joke)
Just Juan. 
She was on her pyramid. Stolen from Whose Line Is It Anyway.
"Row, Row, Row Your Boat..."
Santa Claus goes down the chimney. 
A hooker can wash her crack and sell it again!
In Fidel.
A man.
It was taken into custardy.
First get her out of the chair
She had no arms! Why didnt jillian get back up? She had no legs! Knock knock! Whos there? Sure as hell not jillian :)
Worthless
When his dick tastes like shit
The  -er elves.
Militia Etheridge
Because no one will look for them.
Because red means stop ;D
Their last big hit was the wall.
The wall behind him.
If it had four doors it would be a chicken sedan!
People in Dubai don't watch the Flinstones, but people in Abu Dhabi do.
errr mer GERD
Nothing, it just waved.
..... a father in law.
A horse made by committee.
It's a shelter for lightly battered women.
She has the cleanest teeth I've ever come across. 
A tree has limbs.
Nothing, she's already been told twice.
One is a pharmacist and one is a drug dealer!
Having  crabs on yer organ!
A quarter-pounder with cheese.
A man wears a suit and the dog, pants. 
TVs are getting heavier.
Pre-nup brittle.
I don't want my friends knowing I use Google+.
The cow didn't make it.
IHOP
Well urine luck.
The black person.
A hypochondriac
Surreal.
The smell. 
Dinner for 4.
Me neither. He couldn't open his presents. 
Mini-mom wage.
He liked to eat, drink, and be Mary.
Acme doesn't come on to your  face until after 13.
rofl
Pull up your pants, I can see your vagina. Bahahahahahahahahahaha.
Do you come here often?
They're called dykies....... The main selling points for them is: * They've got an extra long tongue. * you need to use 3 fingers to get 'em off.
Choosing a career in which your job is to make people straight again.
Thank you for coming!
Virgin Mobile 
It's not hard
Of course he does!  He has a ball!
So the dishwasher can match the refrigerator and stove
He was always afraid he was following someone.
roll up her sleeve
Can I push your stool in?
Little seizures. 
One's a fruit, you idiot.
"I made you breakfast in bed!"
Assault.
Neither did he.
Because the see weed.
First they are all wild and wet, then they take your house.
To make a difference.
Some guy sitting up all night wondering if there really is a dog
A drunk Irishman.
What do you call a dinosaur with an extensive vocabulary?
You can't.
From the block.
A sock puppy.
He was trying to bust a move
What did the Nazi Police Officer Give to the Schoolchildren? SWAT Sticka's!
I'll hang around here, you go on a head.
Run over an Italian.
A polish bowling ball.
R2 Detour.
spit, sallow, and gargle.
The wheelchair. 
Dr. Dre
Welcome to McDonalds. May I take your order?
A dildon't
Tenish.
Cause 7 is a six offender
Scraping them back off
A school application.
Falconers have to be more talon-ted
Bison.
A boneless, skinless chicken!
He fainted.
Patty O'Furniture
Because its very complementary!
It would be a real pain in the ass 
It's usually a Nguyen/Nguyen.
Banal.
He did too much coding.
The attorney charges more.
'CAUSE THERE'S TOO MANY CHEETAHS!!!
His girlfriend had a yeast infection 
Trick question. Protesters never change anything. 
A lickalotopuss.
He starved to death.
Concentrate on golf—fuck everything else. 
Irish pride 
Lil seizure
A St. Patrick's Day parade!
None.  Happy St. Patrick's Day everyone!
(A)..... The Interpreter.
Hebrews it. -- How does a Jew make beer? --Hebrews Hops
A tahini bit.
He gets taller.
BECAUSE IT OVERSWEPT.
There is no sound...  The P is silent.
He was a"salted" 
"Water Jew doing?"
AN IMPASTA.
Yours.
Because if it lived by the bay, it would be called a Bagel.
The Headlines in the paper read "Small medium at large"
It was pissed off.
The taste changes the closer you get to the butt.
Presence.
Any kind you want, there's twenty of them.
Banana Nut Crunch.
In case they get a hole in one!
With her vibrator
They are both fucking close to water!
Because money doesnt grow on trees
All that was left was de brie.
Toad stools
His dick tastes like shit.
Hung
the wheel chair.
There were Poles on the right half of the plane.
The cucumbers in Elton John's fridge.
They both always start with tsk tsk tsk tsk tsk tsk tsk tsk...
K
One has hope in her soul, the other has soap in her hole.
At launch time.
You ever deal with a sunburned asshole?
1 and 12 people to say how inspiring it was
you call him a little slow
It wooden go.
It means fucking nothing.
A hockey player showers after three periods.
Cause they're dead.
soldier
Because the cardinals like to be in something, that isn't eighteen yet.
One's a crusty bus station, and the other is a busty crustacean. 
I'm not Willie Nelson...
I heard it has a good trailer.
"can't complain"
A bison-tennial.
What is the difference between Memory and RAM? I can't Memory my junk in a girl's butt.
It was two-tired.
"TWO CAAAAAAAAAAAAANES!"
Very, very hungry.
They use a Milwaukee-Talkie
Because water fountains were designed for humans! HEYOOOOOOO
Burger King didn't cover his whopper.
They were too sacrifishal
They're both fucking close to water.
Where you left them.
Cause niggas be trippin
See you next period.
Their Punch. 
Because it doesn't have a Seoul! 
Get off of me dad, you're crushing my Pall Malls!
GO -  VAH -  KYUUM!!!
Because only A's are acceptable. Heard this from a friend.
Because I'm 9 and 3/4.
Its butt!
Because they're afraid of Dicks!
Paan ten.
Feminem.
Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
Their rocket kept Stalin!
He was charged with assault and battery.
Beef stroganoff!
Pumpkin pie!
Comet books.
There were two Canadians and an American. They put letters in a hat and drew. They got "C-eh", "N-eh", "D-eh". The American didn't know what was going on, but he relayed the message.  I know i need to work on my execution.
A crow with a machine gun.
They like the part where the hooker gives the money back. 
The wedding was dull, but the reception was great.
Because you don't wanna sinc!
With a crowbar.
Because 7, 10, 11.
One's poppin' caps, and the other's cap'n pops!
A ransom note.
It doesn't just happen the once. 
A very worn-out thuper hero. (An excerpt from Brother Time and the Turtle: More Excuses for Jokes:  )
He came out of nowhere.
Hebrews it
to see the butterFLY!
People Eating Tasty Animals
He felt the slack in his dog's leash.
About a week or so
They are still there.
Because one egg is 
Old.
The light was on.
Because no one wants to hold an erection. 
Turns out they cantaloupe.
Polled pork.
Nobody knows. LA cops just beat the shit out of the room for being black in the first place.
Sparky.
Well-Armed
Rape.
"No thanks, I'm stuffed."
Shaken. Not stirred 
Very Caerphilly.
Hardware breaks if you  maintain it. 
She should have a pretty good resumè though. She had a job as a mother once and killed it!
None, because ice cream doesn't have bones.
He was a melon-cauliflower. 
He was dyslexic.
Three, one to hold the giraffe, and one to put the clocks in the bath tub.
They both can't ride a bicycle!
Because he told everyone to march fourth.
A nun with a spear through her head.
A Freudian slip is when someone says one thing when thinking of amother.
PayPal 
Wonton-amo Bay
Nothing, because either way, someone is losing their trailer.
You have to get through a lot of fluid to find the perfect stroke.
One's a crusty bus station, the other is a busty crustacean
L'eggo my n'egro.
The rest of the world has varying degrees of communism.
A tromboner.
They're both Black and Decker.
A freezer doesn't fart when you pull meat out of it.
Yolo Swaggins
Cause you're a jerk!
Tuna Fey.
So the sheep will push back. 
Because they have no attachments. 
Justin Timberpuddle!
Tulips on an organ.  Edit: accidentally a letter. 
a spaghetto.
Not many people know this, but zebras aren’t actually born with stripes. There is actually an entire industry of people called “zebra painters” who go around painting black stripes on zebras. This is done so zebras aren’t confused with albino donkeys.
A retarded gorilla.
Cooperstown is where Baseball wasn't invented and Woodstock is where the festival didn't happen.
It was in her whoremoans.
A 16 year old boy outside the Fuck-For-A-Buck shop with only 99 cents.
He was a Die Hard fan. 
Hot cross bunnies.
Partly cloudy with Sonny around a tree.
quiet the opposite.
He's a small medium at large.
Lantis. I can't believe nobody has thought to look there yet.
How you bean doing.
Meat.
Coming out of the cupboard. 
His job. 
Trick question. They just beat the room for being black.
Very satisfying. Retweaked joke: How does a (insert nationality here) find a sheep in the tall grass? Very (insert extremely lustful emotion here)!
How could someone stoop so low?
Glad-'e-ate-'er
They already thought you were burnt
Popeye beat the shit out of him.
First person shooter.
Chirpies. :-)
...Fuck
He was too far out man.
He was a little down. 
Hobbitat for Humanity
Because he thinks it doesn't matter if you make it or not
One...but it takes him 27 tries
Because he was scared of vacuums!
A peeano.
It takes forever to get in, and nine months later you wish you hadn't come.
One has hope in her soul...
NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO LOOOOOOONG JOHNSON!!!!
One Joke One Vision.
You stay here, I'll go on a head
A bike because a vest has no sleeves.
When I drop a load in the washing machine it doesn't follow me around for a week.
There are too many cheetahs.  Courtesy of the St. Louis Zoo Facebook page.
Nah this joke just goes on forever                   -------------------
You'll find it between Shit and Syphilis in the dictionary.
A spectator.
LIESTRONG bracelets.
Aleve.
One is a master debater. The other is a masterbater.
Good point
Neither has he.
One that will humpback!
Ex-Benedict.   
Wit jam in? 
Gynecolleges.
He always gets DEC 25 and OCT 31 confused.
... because he was in the middle of 9-11! Better phrasing recommendations appreciated :-)
Because Paracetamol on fire.
They both get laid by Mexicans.
Taylor Swifts boyfriend
They both know how to throw a good hoe down. 
The Rolling Stones.
One is white, plastic, and dangerous for your kids to play with and the other holds your groceries
What did the termite say to the chair? .... It was nice knawing you. 
Haha, now we   have AIDS
"Robin, get in the car."
Because he kneads the dough.
It's called Cry Me A Reeva
They both like to crack open a cold one.
Because he's a transparent.  Apologies if I could've worded it different.
Bullets For My Valentine
A hockey player showers after 3 periods.
They're usually only interest in you if you already have one.
Beef strokinoff
He used an eyepatch
Decaffeinated
Avocado pickers
A woman has just given birth and the doctor walks in. He says: 'Which do you want first, bad news or good news?' The woman says: 'bad news' So the doctor says: 'bad news is, your son was born disabled, good news is he died' the woman cried
He was a master of blocking attacks.
Same middle name.
The police officer
Pirates (pronounced like pilates)
Just got off the phone with a friend who lives in Northern tip of Connecticut. He said that since early this morning the snow has been nearly waist high and is still falling. The temperature is dropping way below zero and the North wind is increasing to near gale force. His wife has done nothing but look through the kitchen window and just stare. He says that if it gets much worse, he may have to let her in.
Wow, white folks are pretty smart. They run sitting down. 
When the train announces an arriving "Station", you can see it.
Shiver me lumbars.
pa-jammins
Burr-ito!
Because it's worth it
Super Science.
From an old family friend.
A little girl, when asked her name, would reply, "I'm Mr.  Sugarbrown's daughter." Her mother told her this was wrong, she must say,"I'm Janey Sugarbrown." The Vicar spoke to her in Sunday School, and said,"Aren't you Mr.  Sugarbrown's daughter?" With her mother standing just a few feet away, the little girl replied, "I thought I was, but Mommy says I'm not."
Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? Did you hear the one about Philip Glass? 
Junk mail.  (Credit to one if my FB friends)
They can smell it, but they can't eat it.
A nissan 
To get to the other side... err, no it was to pick up the laundry... nope, to get groceries? I forget. 
Their last biggest hit was The Wall
Because it's a Nietzsche Market.
Swisconsin.
The Ultrasound guy.
Bi-son
"no,  son"... "oh I guess I shit myself then"
Yes...but you've probably never heard it before.
'cause if it had four doors it'd be a chicken sedan
The sex is the same, but the dishes are piling up.
It was counter-inuitive.
16 One to screw it in and 15 others to stand around and talk shit about how bad the one person did.
NASCOW
..nobody gave a shirt. 
Lukewarm.
It could be your car
Ate something
Food's on me tonight.
Yeah, they're kinda pointless now. 
OMg
It's making head lines!
A Cruci-fixie.
The D is silent.
Ilene. What if she is Chinese? Irene.
Want to hear a joke about Alzheimer's? 
Why can't a hand be 12 inches long? BECAUSE THEN IT WOULD BE A FOOT!
Pandatory. Stupid, I know.
Her new phone came with a little packet in the box that said, "Do not eat."
Personality.
It seats 20.
3 periods 2 pads.
A Moshe Pit
During scrabble.  Because it's worth a shitload of points. - Zach Galifianakis
Eucalyptus.
Dung.
He had lost a deer friend
A Boston lager. . . . . . I made this up yesterday in the car.
Thesaurus. 
When your hand goes to sleep while you're masturbating.
Cornography
In the ICU
They don't have the right koalfications!
Consuelo! My mother told me this one
A wiki-wiki-wi-wi-wi-kipedia
Because they threw the bass player under the bus.
Because, if you can't 'helium' or 'curium', you 'BARIUM'!
The Czech's in the mail.
A
"Washer? I don't even know 'er!"
A seatbelt.
To boldly split infinitives!
Get him Catstrated
Neither has he!
Symmetree.
Nothing.
A crowbar.
He was afraid they wouldn't be taken on their merits, that they'd just be seen as Tolkien blacks.
He farts.
A Neckromancer
"Is it mine"?
Horny.
Two! One to hold the bulb, the other to hold the cock, uh, penis, I mean, uh, ladder. 
When he eats his first brownie!
"Look, a herd of elephants in the distance!"
Nostrildamus
I don't know, and I don't care!
A hot cross bun.
GG.
One shucks while he fits and the other one....
...because he was always Stalin.
A man frantically calls 911 stating "my wife is pregnant, her water broke and her contractions are about one minute apart!" The 911 operator asks "is this her first child?" "No, you fucking idiot", the man angrily responds "this is her fucking husband!"
One was assulated, the other was shelled. 
Because every time you kiss, they'll try to shove their fist up your ass.
You have a Dell, rolling in the deep.
Carpal Tunnel...
In tips.
A Redditor is a living breathing human being, and a Calender is an inanimate object.
Tell him there's something on its chest
They write an o-bitch-uary
I'm font of you.
....another one popes up.
He was lucky it was a soft drink. 
I need some arrrrrrrrrrrgua!
the hotdogs taste like shit
One U.S. Liter
Come back essay!
Put it in water
Nevermind. It's too cheesy.
Hallmark.  God cares enough to send the very best.
Because they fall through his hands.
I, Mac.
Find out next time, on Dragonball Z!
A calendar has a date on Valentine's day.
Carpet burn
Can't complain.
Have you ever blown a Transformer?
A. Blowjob: You can beat your meat, eggs or wife, but you can't beat a blowjob.
Because its a band substance
Don't cross me.
Burned them on a cars tailpipe when he tried blowing it up.
Hella copters
So they can see the old French navy.
He said, "For all the good these are doing me, I may as well shove 'em up my ass!"
Don't use child labor.
A booby trap
He got a little too close to the edge.
Stop using Chex as a weapon!
My circuit breaker be trippin and my joint wouldn't solder...
They've both put their faith in the cloud.
The 15 minutes of silence.
The Taxi Dermist.
Answer: The Pope!
Because they make up an awful lot of stuff. EDIT: Because I forgot about neutrinos.
Because you can't have mass without him
Slow dance.
His job.
Kick the altar boy in the chin.
You nook at its crannies.
I'm canadian and i was just wondering
No, no you didn't.
A fifth. 
gets jalapeño buisness.
Goose bumps.
does anyone know of any good jokes about homeless people.?
Because those men already have boyfriends. 
Neither of them can finish a race
a pool table 
A firecracker!
If you leave joghurt alone for 200 years, it will grow a culture!
Simple, they just ask "ASL?"
cha ching
Lettuce Turnip The Beet
So that deaf people can enjoy them too!
two. one to screw in the bulb and and to hold the cock, LADDER!
Cold day in Hell yesterday. Tomorrow, zombies.
Lukewarm. 
A hematologist pricks fingers.
A boat-ique. ...I'll get my coat.
'What makes you think that Minnie Mouse is crazy?' the psychiatrist asks  Mickey Mouse. And Mickey replies: 'I didn't say that she is crazy. I said that she's fucking Goofy'
...because lions only understand .rars
He comes in a bottle. 
I do.
He wanted 2 hit singles
An iAndiPod. Just made that one up. I can hear the groans.
Because, they're so darn stupid!
Take away it's drivers license.
Because they're bitter.
Everyday I'm shufflin'. 
A Dell.
A little Down.
Pho queue!
Depressed
Four different answers
Get off at the next stop!
Big fat horse cock. 
He knew Nunavut was real.
Mrs. Pacman--for 25 cents that bitch swallowed balls till she died.
What do you call a Black Abortion clinic? Crime Stoppers. 
Cause it's always Jammin'
My hands.
Because the material is so groovy. 
They both moan when you nail them, but only one of them actually enjoys it.
N'Singh.
Because sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away.
When she takes the tampon out and all of the cotton's gone
Because the meat was Chewy.
The bucket. 
I'm 17, can drive and have a source of income. I would really like to make this one good. 
a peeler of the community!
Blowjob. You can beat your meat, eggs, and wife; but you can’t beat a blowjob.
A cinemon
"Fangs for nothing!"
Bon'nichiwa
Ridley Scott. Thank you.
It's always right.
Could you warn the Byzantine empire that Leo VI is going to die next year and they should appreciate him while they can?
"no?"  Well that's the spirit! 
Because there's a clock on the stove.
Wanna get shit faced?!
They turn out the lights.
Niggaless Cage (My girlfriend came up with this today. We're not racist I swear. This just cracked me up.)
They're both battered.
Both teams suffered from blackouts 
A chilly dog.
Because there can only be Juan.
The mexican border.
Anyone can roast beef.
Dead. 
Well a joke that isn't funny, but still is because it isn't. If you know what I mean. These are kind of much easier to remember.
The D is silent.
big boned
Chicken Caesar salad.
European!
Because they're extinct. 
He took stEHreroids
Worked it out with a pencil.
So when he drove by people would say, "Hey, look at that S car go!"
She was taking god's name in vein.
So they can run their fingers through their hair.
Yes, Sir, what happened ? "I think my wife's dead". "What happened, Sir ?" "Well...she's lying in bed, cold and stiff as usual, but the dishes haven't been done in 3 days !"
"So long and thanks for all the fish." Edit: Everyone hates me.
Free Ham.
He ate a 10 year old wiener.
GO FUCK YOURSELF!
None. There are no light bulbs in the closet. Another one: Why is Justin Bieber so pale? Because there's no light inside the closet
One is a Goodyear, the other is a Great year!
Their prices can't be beat  Have you heard about their guitar sale? The prices are solo
It's the only job where you have to stay late if you come early.
They only had 2 cars.
Sounds better than a Cunt Scrape
Depends
A Dell.
They steal all the green cards.
Cuz they got tired of Stalin.
A Pedophile 
Cross-country.
A catholic will say "hello" to you in the liquor store.
"Looks like I'm gonna have to read the trouble shooting section of the manual."
"Witherspoon?" "No, with a knife!" Only really works if you actually tell it to someone (and can maintain a good pokerface)
6:30... 
A currant pulled him under.
I wouldn't let a creep sit on my lap.
Ask yo momma. Sorry
All the girls put on their panties and go home.
PASTA
Start a war.
statue bro?
All the blood had rushed to his stomach.
Bitch please.
Jesus in a hurry.
Just ice
They herd
"I'll show myself out."
Pos-tits.
its a good thing screwed up by a period
Because they produced such a great prophet.
A Sharc-eatery
Need some good ones!
He couldn't take it in the end.
Tractor beams.
Chessturbation.
A Hun knee comb.
He drowned in his tea-pee. 
'elephino..
A louger.
Have you ever tried to spread a grilled cheese?
Buried in the third page of google search results.
It was cheesy 
There are too many cheetahs. 
Because he always called shotgun
Beat it.
Curiosity killed his cat.
... she just couldn't control her pupils.
Virgin Mobile!
Wagmans.
How many dragon Ball z characters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?  Only one, but it'll take at least 6 episodes!
a pilot you fucken racist!
He fainted after the punch line.
A BMW's pricks are on the inside!
Why was Epsilon afraid of Zeta?  Because Zeta Eta Theta!
Oh don't worry, they'll fucking tell you
JOHN LENIN
He woke up.
He used cowculus!
Whore-naments
A hush puppy.
Because they kept saying "Bach, bach, bach"
She worked it out with a pencil. 
IHOP.
They cantaloupe
Eric Clapton would never drop an ounce of Coke out of a window
Cousins.....
Well one of them is a cunning runt.
He pasta way :(
"Goebbles Goesbbles"
Kermit's finger.
There's no telling.
A 4chan teller
He couldn't finish a race either. 
A pickpocket snatches watches...
I find it a tad one-sided.
The ones with diabases. 
What do chickens say? Cock-a-doodle-doo What does a chicken in the bathroom say? Doodle-doodle-cock What does a gay chicken say? Any-cock'll-do
A small medium at large.
She had a frog in her throat.
Patty O'Furniture
In the main steam
Bloodbath&Beyond
A four chin teller.
Everyone keeps offering to push your stool in
'Cause they're all scum.
The tarmac, you racist.
Cell shading.
I'm cumin! I'm cumin!
You can't 69 in binary.
It's a mix of two swear words; "SHIIIT" and "FAAARK"
Because he said he loves miso.
A job application.
Ask if her hair is an extensive property
The Patriots
Their pecker's on the wrong end. 
Because the stock broker!
Tulips on your organ.
She wanted to buy an algae bra.
Velveetazane
Not really. There's a vas deferens between the two.
You'd think it would be floodlights, but in reality it was the Israelites!
What would you do for a Klondike Bar?
"I feel like a kid again"
A roamin' Catholic.
A stuttering South African tribesman. 
He was being SHELLFISH
Planet
The smell.
A pool table.
Nothing. It always fucking sucks.
Do you have 11 protons?  Because you're sodium fine...
Because their heads are so far from their bodies!
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
None, they just stand around and compliment it, and then get pissed when it won't screw
Calf Raises.
Well, a thief snatches watches...
Everybody wants to be Irish on St. Patrick's day.
They both had curds in their whey. 
A week later they pretend they don't even know you.
A drizzley bear.
"Stay"
Just ice.
A Humble Hindi Bundle.
Being up to your nuts in cider. 
The were only two donors. One came on the bus, the other missed the tube.
Its the only father they will ever know.
A nazi.
I'm the master of ceremony (as Elvis) for a Vegas-themed casino night. Thanks Reddit! 
Because Dec 25 is Oct 31 Edit: corrected because I'm a fucking tool
Amadeus on my dais.
He works it out with a pencil.
Finding an empty bottle in the trash.
They both circle Uranus looking for Klingons.
A sweatstop.
One going to see a Friend who had lain a considerable Time in the Marshalsea Prison, in a starving Condition, was persuading him, rather than lie there in that miserable Case, to go to Sea; which not agreeing with his high Spirit,  , replies the Prisoner,  via 
just cos.
ate something. 
Nothing, he just let out a little wine.
Pasts
They were too constricting.
An Allahgator!
Digging for booty.
Ginger snaps.
He fainted.
They don't.
Low hanging fruit.
A predditor. EDIT: 
A Trailer park has much more interesting drama and less than a third of those pesky white teeth.
Because the always hit the RIM!
A stand up driver.
There was a face off in the corner.
She finds out her son is gay, but is dating a doctor.
Jesus doesn't have a bunch of Mexicans tattooed all over himself.
They had way to many chinks in their armor. 
So, Lance, do you see the scrotum as half-full, or do you see the scrotum as half-empty?
Spent 10 years in the closet.
Because she wanted to see whats on the other side.
She takes off her glass eye
I don't know, Vigo and see. (best read in Yanosh's voice)
He went in a tight end and came out a wide receiver.
He had a killer final draft. 
An 
Because it wasn't Canon.
A row-tater.
Because it was outstanding in its field
Everywhere
"Hello. I'm from the head office and I'm here to help you" "Welcome. We're glad to have you"
for drinking and deriving
elephants 
Doesnt matter. PETA cant chqnge anything!
Shaken, not stirred.
a c-section.
Hang at home.
They both only take one to ruin a neighborhood.
Because its not a cheetah.
He still comes home periodically.
he is a small medium, at large
...neither has he!
Too many Tannens.
Your so fly man
Apparently, he had a few scores to settle.
Teacher: You just did. 
Blizzard Entertainment.
A sub routine. 
They're the dog's bollocks!
Toulouse
She sings with the other hand. 
Toot-N-Cummin!
You take the "S" out of sub, and the "F" out of way.  [Say it out loud]
Replace the laces with earphones.
Tequila Mockingbird!
3 weeks of the blues, one week of rag-time
Me neither.
i dont know...try asking the suicide bombers
So, you are walking around in a forest and see a girl lying on the floor, half naked and clothes tattered. She is weeping heavily, and you can tell she has just been raped. What do you do? You check your map, because you have been walking in a circle.
He smashed his nose
Dr. Dre, of course. 
A prostitute can wash her crack and resell it.
Who cares! More bacon for me.
AU SHWITZ
Because he wanted a tight seal.
Because it was two tired.
A park bench can support a family of four.
It'll Dimsum.
I went for corny. 
What do you call someone who only gives back rubs to men? A massage-inist.
Notseafood
Broom and a Dustpan. 
You get half way
you'll just have to be a little patient
Oh sheeeeeettttt!
Get off me, homes. 
At least you can leave your child alone with the babysit
Its Tricerabottom.
Stick a car windshield in front of her face.
Aim for the Juggler...
A start.
By spending a large fortune.
Elrond's cupboard.
A bus full of niggers going over a cliff.
Going inside to ask for a coat hanger.
A young man went up to his father and asks "Can I have twenty bucks for a blow job?" His father says "I don't know. Are you any good?"
Im not saying she a slut but:   She's been boarded more times than Amtrak
Split pee soup.
they're just fucking immature assholes
They give them gas.
A "coup d'isaster".
Gang rape.
Probably not. The P is silent.
Ouch, my nose!
Names.
Because they're all a bunch of flakes
Great food no atmosphere.
He stayed up all night wondering if there really was a dog 
He jogs home after his vasectomy. . Fairly old, vasectomies may not be so bad any longer. 
He heard the snow blower was coming.
You know you can't but you really want to hit it. 
Because it will create pandamonium
European.
6 inches makes you day but 12 inches can make your hole weak.
An elephant with diarrhea. 
A punchline would be funny here, Wooden Tit?
You jacket
It's eerie.
Because most men have big mouths and small cocks.
You put them in a bowl way too big for it...and then beat repeatedly for 3 hours
Outlaws are wanted
It was rated rrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrr!
No, we sign it.
Because they are lazy and have small hands!
Because it scares the fuck out of the dogs.
Which bird symbolizes love? Swallow.
I don't have a mercedes in my garage!
NACHO CHEESE!
Got yer nose!
Auschwitz.
A receding hare line!
The pussy only tastes like piss at the start.
because she lost the recipe.
Burrrrberry
Their teacher told them not to use tables!
A white Christmas.
A stick
An envelope.
using both hands
Yeah, I dig 'em.
The chair
Gobbledy gook.
I could see myself doing that.
A crowbar.
So it has happened twice in the last two days where my phone rings (both times calls from people I know), I pick it up and start to talk (thinking they called me) but after 30 seconds of talking we both give the "so why did you call me" only to find out both of our phones were ringing from each others numbers. So how is this happening? is there a website that I dont know about that double spoofs at the same time? reddit I ask for your help...
It was over  pacity.
kielbasa (said with an italian accent)
Because they were being "brewed"
Don't do anything until I get back
The woman!
"tardy"
Spicks and specks. (google it)
He got the sack.
D'EAU!
NEIN NEIN NEIN!
HIV.
When someone told her that it's a complication she replied, "No it's not. It simplifies my life." "How so?" she was asked. "Simple" she replied, "When dinner's ready I just call Anthony and all of them come." "But what do you do if you want to call the attention of one in particular?" "I call him by his last name."
Her pussy.
Low-hanging fruit
Sssshhhhhh
Alzheimer, grandma, Alzheimer...
The new girl in the women's refuge.
because he had malaria
They lost 500 souls!
A ginger bread man. 
Don't worry, they'll fucking tell you.
They can't stand a Nickleback!
Seven.  Six to carry the casket and one to drag the body
Christianity.
He used Apple Maps.
Denim denim denim. 
French War Heroes.
The ford car.
The nun has hope in her soul...
I love you too, fellas.
The kind that has multi ply's.
Your family has impeccable taste.
It swept with his girlfriend :P
Because they can!
It already did, it's called "The Hobbit".
They love to swim in gold coins.
It becomes Daytrogen
In a city effort to improve public transportation.
Morris Marina. badump-pshhh
Because his friend asked him when he thought they should cross.
Nothing.
Of course you haven't.
WILL.I.WAS
faint
Nothing. They just keep the tips.
Because she had no arms.
They're not falling for that one again.
Neither. They both eat out!
A chicken is easier to eat if you bone it first.
a necromancer
Put a steering wheel in front of them
Because they have Seoul.
Because FUCK and SHIT were already taken.
Aftermath
A she-mail
Hot potato. Hot potato.
Put a windshield in front of her.
So-Bear! 
None. Mice can't change light-bulbs as they are mere rodents without the physical or mental ability to do so. Not to mention it's much safer for them to pilfer food in the dark.
He got prison for caching false Czechs.
On a steampunk bike the gears don't do anything. 
Because she's thick and tired of it.
Mark Sanchez.
A church bell peals from the steeple.
Some came out running, others ran out coming.
Yes, if you have enough.
BOOBEES! 
Her father just died.
Diabetes
Even though you know you shouldn't you lick it anyway.
Who gives a fuck
holy shit.
A church bell peals from the steeple.
There's 20 of them.
Your girlfriend has to chew before she can swallow,
Not very well at all...
little kids won't eat broccoli . 
STICK IT IN MY ANGUS
Because he kept cutting up in class
An alcoholic with a drinking problem
Because in France one egg is un oeuf.
He could really whale.
Wet noses
H to O
Gandhi walked around a bunch and built up giant callouses on the bottoms of his feet. He fasted a bunch which gave his bones a rather fragile brittle nature. He was a spiritual man, a mystic to many people. And he had a strange diet of green tea and white rice which gave him constant bad breath.  So   Gandhi was a super-calloused, fragile mystic, vexed with halitosis. 
He said "If we stick together, we can stop this shit."
It never gets old!
Because they all live in  kansas.
Bragging
She knows that she no longer has to give blow jobs.
Slayer.
In disguise. 
Necrophilia
Turns out he got hearing aids.
K.
Don Juan de Marco Polo.
Your grip.
Because they always fear the wurst.
Raised the I.Q. of both states.
because sex cells... Thank you thank you i'll be here all week.
Because he was cold before it was cool.
Who cares?
Because windows wasn't open. 
Holy Guacamole
In case of any night mares!
There ain't no rest for the wicked
Because all the kids have to play in side.
There's twenty of them.
Artificial intelligence.
Because cowboys always eat with their hats on.
...Light blue
If it´s black it ain´t good
I won't be an accessory to this.
Mike Easter
A table for two.
Because they're always Stalin.  Thank you, good night. 
Pastorized milk.
Im a fungi
...he won first place for a dried arrangement!
Yes!
Because God bless America
Not dropping all your fucking socks
Nitrogen Monoxide
Orangu-Tang.
Smack an Ethiopian kid in the face.
Santa Claus has 10 reindeers according to the song.  
Ohh.. About a handful.
Well, the magician has a cunning array of stunts...
You won't find a Lambo in a landfill.
No, they already have names.
Honeycombs!
Because you do all the work, and the fat guy with the suit gets all of the credit.
The one that says Idaho 
Because OCT 31 = DEC 25. 
Because it was two tired...
They both leave little boys rooms with lighter sacks.
Because the snowblower was coming down the block.
In an unstable.
She didn't have any arms. Knock knock. (Who's There) Not Sally
So the kids have something to unwrap on Christmas morning.
Ever seen a spic do something right the first time?
No? K. 
Look for Fresh Prince
Charlie Sheen. Because you know it's GUARANTEED to be a white Christmas when he's around.
Slow down and use lubricant.
A vegetarian.
The roots.
(Pointing to each in turn) Ho! Ho! Ho!
Mr.Garrison: "Let's start the day with a world news question. Why are there school shootings?" The media: "Violent video games?" Mr.Garrison: "Okay, now lets try to get an answer from someone who's not a complete retard.
They use French resistors.
More guns.
To go to the grand opening. Why did the ant crawl up Prince Williams' trousers? To get to the royal ball.
You'd get fired if you drank piss at work.
You know you shouldn't, but one day you're probably going to try licking one.
... The climax is always the same. 
she had no Juan to go with 
So you can see the look on its face. How do you get said baby out of the blender? Tortilla chips. 
So blind people can hate them too
A: More guns.
He wants to see the prostitute give back money.
A Quakter
Violint
Hey kid, do you want to buy some candy?
Tupacalypse. (thanks to my buddy Mike)
Mayan didn't
Mayan hasn't.
A grandfather claus got him out of it!
They might trip on the string. 
Because Minnie is fucking Goofy
The steaks were too high.
It's making Head-Lines!
...just think about it.
The wheelchair
They shake.
Snushi.
Does any one know any really cheesy but actually really funny christmas jokes? short ones as they are easier to send? struggling to think of any myself
Nah, you'll just spread it around.
They keep sticking their noses into everyone else's business.
They both like a tight seal.
So that they can see the battle.
kkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkkk
Professor: Astronomical. 
He's outstanding in his field
Cause i wanna see you Baghdad ass up. 
Jose and Josb
Christmas dinner every night. Happy holidays reddit!
That's the worst book I ever read.
They have Conductors. 
ask your mother
A cloud
Lift her gut.
He is risen.
It gets jalepeño face. 
Cross-country
Rigatoni!
WATAAAAAR
Gee, you knit?
Can I borrow ten dollars, but can you only give me five dollars now? Why do I only want five dollars, you ask? Well, then you'd owe me five dollars, and I'd owe you five dollars, and then we'd both be even.
The "My Yen" Apocalypse
"Robin, get in the batmobile!"
If you lick it, and nothing happens, you know its dead.
Please allow me to push in your stool sir.
i'm easy to read
Just ice. 
this morning, I ate some toast, cereal, coffee, bacon & eggs, hash browns...
One of them shucks between fits. 
Kermit the Frog's finger.
A calendar has dates. 
Hide and go sleep.
Nothing. It just waved.
the taste
Vietnam. Because over there you need 20840 dongs to make a dollar.
slapping a nigerian kid in the face
Bachelors come home, check to see what's in the fridge, and go to bed. ….Married men come home, check to see what's in the bed, and go the fridge.
The porcupine has the pricks on the outside.
Brainwashing.
Because any Mexican that can run, jump or swim is in america!
Lumberjack: Oh, you really don't know why? Tree: Sorry, I'm stumped.
500 soles were lost. 
Yeah man. You didn't know? They're short and fat, and people call them rhinos.
"I didn't do it on Porpoise!!"
The Apostrosea.
It was in tents. 
A cracker with cheese.
Tie his hands together
Season's greetings!
Crackers get soggy when wet.
All the good ones are taken, the rest are full of shit. 
A payday
One says " Hey you get off my cloud", and the other says "Hey McCloud get off my ewe!"
Because they hate Dick's
Their Father built the place and their Mother cleans it.
pants
A PiNEAPPLE! Get it? ;-D
Jealous
McAfee Removal Tool
Ya dick is hangin out.
a pilot you racist fuck
Because it's soda pressing. 
Yes but we cantaloupe.
It contained a borscht ton.
All the good ones are already taken, and the available ones are either pay or handicapped.
...he was totally drinking it before it was cool. 
I need to see your privates.
I have never been hungry enough that I could eat a cabbage.
Because the border says "No TRESpassing"
They Kermit suicide.
Chirpies.  It's a Canarial Disease.  It's Untweetable!
None. They just beat the room for being black
Because she was out of lemo-nada. It's okay guys, i'll let myself out...
Sniggas.
The ATM
Around Ten-ish.
Your mom never gave me pizza.
Herder
Because it is intents
He was arrested and charged. ...this is the stuff I come up with while procrastinating studying for finals.
Your grip!!!
Or should I introduce myself?
Because they don't have wing mirrors.
A dictator.
Because this shit needs to stop. 
Unless you're broke and desperate, they're not worth picking up. 
They wear mittens.
A pilot, you fucking racist.
There was a Lil Wayne.
The iPad. 
Collar ID
A penis.
Somewhere around a buck an ear.
Because he doesn't have a brain
Oh, wait… they're done. 
all the slow ones are in jail
A. Why are you shaking? She's going to eat me!
Someone who stays up all night wondering if there really is a dog.
Yoko Ono
They used his foreskin for an eyelid skin graft. . . . . .
A magic banana...
investigator 
The kids walked out of Ice Age 4... Alive
In Laotian.
In the womb, he used to fight bald clowns. (Self made joke)
There are   posts on the frontpage
it was a struggle, but eventually he passed the class.
Tuba glue.
So your asshole doesn't slam shut.
Matador
'Coz the boys pants are all half off.
Close, but no cigar.
Because without them they would be pointless. 
A Jew with a coupon  
Leaving a plunger in the toilet.
I don't get an erection when I beat a video game.
He's   now
I'd hit it
The Defenestration of Smaug.
Stop hating yourself, stop hating yourself!
He had lost his contacts!
They're allowed to smell it, but they get in trouble if they eat it. Teehee
It's in their "jeans" ;)
Yes? Well if you have, just try this experiment... Put your dog and your wife in the boot of the car for an hour. When you open the trunk, which one is really happy to see you?
Q: how do you turn a dishwasher into a snow plow? A: give her a shovel.
White Vans.
Take your dick out of its mouth.
In little nazis
None, it's a hardware problem!
The looks on their faces while you're nailing them.
Easy - just use the ashtray
He didn't
HOWAREYOUKEN?!
It's sin-ful. [self made joke]
He's just as fast as Rudolf, he just can't stop as quick
Bean dip.
Abortions.
That movie sucks ass.
The Chargers.
Bi-Polar
Thousands of brown loafers
They do it on porpoise.
Because they can lie about their age!
A small medium at large.
...sexy kids NOTE:  Don't let this note, my acct. name, and the fact that this is only my second post interrupt your comedic   enjoyment
Your dad's cock tastes like blood.
A nervous wreck!
Alfredosehen
They had no rights.
69 for midgets
a salad-manager
Because it held up a pair of pants.  I'll show myself out. 
A slow poke! 
Wanna go swimming? 
Meals on Wheels
A sedan d'état.
Joke. Joke. Jooooooooooke. 
A pap smear.
They steal all the green cards.
He wanted to smoke a joint!
He smashed his his nose.
Because if they had 4 doors they would be called chicken sedans!
Nobody wanted to play on his team any longer after he had a 0 and 2 kill/death ratio and it took him 3 days to respawn. 
One's a sick duck... I forget the rest but your mother's a whore
You could probably eat a baseball.
Cucumber
I like your belt.  Ok, ok. I know it's elementary, but I still love it.
I ate so many chickpeas, now I falafel.
He keeps coming and coming and coming.
He was cross.
Very tired feet.
Up the Shepherd's leg!
A Jewish family reunion.
She had a yeast infection 
Chemistree.
They only had 4 cars.
Women. They heavier they are, the easier they are to pick up.
He was out standing in his field
because she didn't like dicks.
De-calf-inated
Legolas
Ite. Sorry, a kid said this in elementary school and it was funny back then :)
A fruit roll up
Sir. The man has enough on his plate without being treated as a lesser individual by society.
He says "Cerebro"
Caesar said:"I came, I saw, I conquered." Casanova said:"I saw, I conquered, I came."
A minor
How does she not fall over?
His brother holding the VCR.
One of them is a meatier shower. 
Baked Ham
You stick a piece of bread to the ceiling
Because he wanted to run his fingers through his hair.
She can use your wifes clothes
A meanderin' orange.
So they won't run into each other in the dark.
Because he got hit by the bus.
I'm arriving
Midget shortage.
They only want the tip
Michael Jackson
Get the quarter back!
They were my friends :(
Just ice
Give her a shovel!
Dirty hairy.
A dictator!
A small medium at large!
The papers the next day read, "SMALL MEDIUM AT LARGE"
It was in mean median mode.
The saddest vegetable known to man: a melonccoli.
The director of Life of Pi.
Medium.
A 12 Gauge Shotgun
The cold shoulder.
Because Jesus WEPt.
The lottery.
They torque it..
The left-ovaries.
Title
Douse it in gasoline and set it on fire.  !
Nein! Ooooo nein!
A vice grip.
They always pull out at the last second (usually to avoid a child).
One acts solely for money, the other is the actor. 
A radical equation.
Just one to hold it in place while the rest of Europe runs circles around it.
He had reptile dysfunction.
Reptile. 
WRAP MUSIC!
Well, it doesn't really matter...
One of them is red and the other one is dead. LOLZ
He couldn't C#
When She fits in your wife's clothes.
One was a salted.
Because he has MS-DOS
Take away her rights.
Because everyone has a little good in them
Did you hear that asshole talking shit behind my back?
So they'd fit like a glove.
...Stays up all night pondering the existence of a dog
Macaroni and Qi. 
I am not funny and I need to be. I am writing a script for a short show that's formatted like "Weekend Update" on Saturday Night Live. So that means one sentence about the topic, and then one liner joke. Thank you all!
nice belt.
Their just desserts.
A Nanak Nanak joke.
Niether did he.
Bubble-0-7
One is a hairy beast that spits, the other is native to South America.
Mountain Jew.
A balloon animal!
Because it was Meloncholic
Honor roll. 
Bondage...
Two test tickles
I pumice I'll come back soon!
Pamperspired.
The Sims
Because there's a target on every corner.
The Pope.  (sorry if repost, my friend just told it to me) 
A dustpan.
My contribution: Q: Why is a vagina just like the weather? A: When it's wet, it's time to go inside Q: Why is a woman's pussy like a public restroom?  A: They both feel good, but you wonder who has been there before you! Vagina jokes are not funny. Period.
A park bench can support a family.
You Blow-Fish!
One is fun to smash with a sledgehammer and the other one is a watermelon
an erection
Snazis. This insanely corny joke brought to you by my Dad, circa 1990. May he rest in peace!
One is full of screaming 10 year old boys and the other is Call of Duty.
He said "Hey, kid. Can I sell ya some candy?"
He was suicider.
Nobody likes a soggy cracker! 
Gives the X Box back to grandkids
A polar bear.
Give me a blender and we'll call her a bloody mary.
Ones with an obtuse angle.
They're both D-composed.
Put them both in the trunk of your car, drive around the block, and see which ones happy to see you afterwards.
Ten: one to screw it in and nine to say, "Pssh, I can do that."
Awnser: Home Depot They have power tools lol
Because two wongs don't make a white.
Constant ripostes.
You mean you don't know? 
Because it has microwaves
One is a cunning array of stunts.
Hoe hoe hoe!
He feinted. (Sorry)
Whose Line is it Anyway
I'll tell you later.
Tequila mockingbird.
Her hips
In a henvelope!
My cock while I'm doing it.
Because he is a bad influenza
Your girlfriend has to chew before she swallows. 
A bullet.
via sticky notes
She was a cat.
Because they die so young. 
A no weigh Jose.
Infanticider. 
He wanted to transcend dental medication...
Polaroid Integral Film and Babies 
Orange juice.
Wife asks her husband: Honey, If a lion attacks my mother and I, Who would you save first? Husband: Well, the lion!
"I think I'm in loaf." Ba dum, tss. 
Because he's all up in your bismuth.
He had to get toad.
Dip the dog's dick in ranch dressing.
Sparky.
Neither, because they're both ashamed of their children's disgusting and sinful lifestyle choices.
There's 20 of them.
BBQ sauce.
One is a frigid midget with a rigid digit, the other is a massive vassal with a passive tassel  (found this in Horace's Satires)
What a cleverdick...
When he takes a shit. 
fucked
Marry her.
It was PISSED OFF!
Racist jokes are offensive.
Cause he prefers Dicks.
You gots the purdiest tooth I ever comed across, Sis.
A killing Spree.
Donutello * I love pun jokes give me some more
Patty
kung flu
The sock under my bed.
Say, " Everyone out of the pool please."
A bus driver can't change his stops.
Crust.
It went back 4 seconds.
Fairy codmother
Because you get better results from slowly roasting it in the oven.
A baboom.
You don't know? Well let's go have a discussion... 
The shi'ite really hit the fan.
Batman can go into a store without robin....
Juice.
DODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODODO
The periodic table!
Eat, drink and be Mary.
A school teacher tells you to spit out your gum, a train says choo choo.
It's fucking close to water
That you clicked on this link only to correct my grammer....
When they are forced on you as a child you resent them as an adult
The reindeer 
They feel they can no longer trust a children's TV star who claims to be able to 'fix it' 
You might try and knock some mud off on the sidewalk before you step on the doormat.
Digesting the wheelchair.
They're wearing a SOMBERERO
He worked it out with a pencil
Because 12 13 14!!!!! GET IT?!?!??! source: some comment on reddit I read like 6 months ago
One. They stick the bulb in the socket and wait for the world to revolve around them!
Christianity
They ate the pizza before it was cool
They're both homo-genius.
Your mom can't handle the truth.
A pomegranate. 
" i lava you "
rape
because it had a hard drive! (stole it from ellen, from her classic joke tuesday)
An algae bra.
A Dell
None, they go commando.
He got the stuffing knocked out of him.
It's very "touching".
A nun with a javelin through her. 
Because ζ η θ!
You never have to buy batteries.
It is very interesting to look at the relationships and intricacies that make an inside joke so funny and sometimes even create a personality of its own.  It would be awesome to see all of your stories!  I would love to hear why they are funny to you and your friends.  How long has the joke been going on? Have new people been included in the circle?  If you can think of anything else, go for it!!!
virgin mobile
Hacidic!
Nevermind, it's tearribly cheesy.
Baked Beans
Because they cantaloupe. 
Very satisfying!!
It made Bud wiser.
because theres not road from the bed room to the kitchen 
One is a busty crustacean and the other is a crusty bus station.
Lemonade.
P-p-p-poke her face.
He pasta way
There is nothing left too loose.
Because they have to.
So when their ship sinks they can walk back to shore.
It's like a metaphor.
They say he's a seasoned vet. 
You can drop her off anywhere!!
A hooker will stop screwing you after you're dead.
I haven't got the faintest idea.
Relaxatives.
A moo-slim.
A Clunt.
A stairorist.
Because he likes Dick's.
In christianity, one guy died for all the others.
People tell you not to, but you're still going to put your tongue on it.
On The Wire. 
The teacher marked him absent.
The closer you get to discharge, the better you feel.
Christianity.
Two-thirty-nine.  One more and it'd be too farty.
An Apparigine!
Crack Rock. 
Connect the dots.
You can drop her off anywhere.
A pilot, you fucking racist.
That's when you blow me and I owe you 1.
they would have to use to much ink. 
Très bien
A slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit.
Namaste
Because the "p" is silent...
One's a bottom-dwelling, muck-sucker and the other is a fish. 
Quite a while ago I found some jokes that you just right down and make people say, Example (I won a math debate) = I want to masterbait. Does anybody else know of more of these jokes/pranks. Thanks
6.9 because it's a 69 with a period in the middle.
You don't let her out.
Because the hotdogs taste like shit.
Because he only likes whites.
She wanted to make some money on the side.
D shells were too big. 
Stevie Wonder when he answers the iron.
He ate it before it was cool
You: Can I have some orange juice? Other person: sure go ahead. You: Do you have any orange? Other person: what? You: I have jews but i dont have any orange.
Denim denim denim.  
Because that was how many dicks he could fit in his mouth before he gagged.
Thinking about putting mine on a diet.  
Showers take in lost of dirty people, but don't take shit from no one.
No ballroom.
A refrigerator doesn't fart when you take your meat out.
I come to this great city with great intentions.
If you looked at them, you could only see a dick; and both ended up just an inch short
Snowbama
A sandwich!
Rubbit
The Girl Scout that got hit by a car.
Boo Bee
The kitchen must be a very safe place
Because dildos can't take out the trash. 
The penis, Because we can lift it with a thought.
It has a lot of mussels.
He votes!
I rest my queso.
Disgruntled
A Carrot
No idear. What do you call a blind buck with no legs? Still no idear.
Tree fellas
Goesintight.
He was tired of playing second Fidel.
It's hard to put makeup on two faces.
Gang-rape.
Hey, we should get together and square dance!
How does everyone feel about making a new joke subreddit for oneliners, because most of the time I open a   post it is so long that I don't read it, it puts me off reading them and you cant make a tl;dr for a joke so why not have a subreddit for oneliners.
Micecream!
they all happened because some dumbass didn't pull it out in time.
Phelps is the favourite.
Feta 
The baby carriage is the result of last year's fun on wheels.
Mustuuurd
Stopping it with a shovel!
The second hour's free.
He couldn't find the Droid he was looking for
A furry fish market.
Bin-der-done-dat
The swim-fast diet.
I am a common object enjoyed by both sexes, normally about 8 inches long, with little hairs on one end, and a hole in the other. For most of the day I am laying down, but I am ready for instant action. When in use, I move back and forth and in and out of a warm, moist hole. When the work is finally done, a white, slushy, sticky mush is left behind and I return to my original position. Cleaning is normally done after I have finished. What am I? Why, I am your very own toothbrush!
It's not hard
Mine is that old binary one -  "There are 10 kinds of people in the world.  Those who understand binary and those who don't."  Well DUR HUR HUR, congratulations on counting to two. Being a timid person, I just chuckle and seethe on the inside.  
It's your fault!
I don't know but don't try to milk it!
Mourning wood.
pi!
Because it was two tired! 
Peanut butter and jammin!
Have I got an ax to grind with you.
"It's asbestos could be."
She puts her clothes back on and goes home.
There was no clear winner.
Camenbert
Arrrrrrt class.
He had butterfingers!
Fo' drizzle.... 
In a tank. 
A few billion dollars worth of improvements
...It's a watered down Manhattan!
faceBAWK!
An impasta.
It's tearable.
Hear about the restaurant on the Moon? Great food but no atmosphere.
the boogie
Christian bail.
Crack-ers
Because NE-coli.
Because that's how it comes in the box :D
A ten foot cock that wants to reach out and touch someone.
Natural causes.
A hockey team showers after 3 periods.
She didn't want to litter.
New Orleans!
You planet!
One looks up your family tree, the other looks up your family bush.
10 people that don't do dick.
They love to pump kin.
Because one is un œuf.
If they have become scent-ient.
It isn't, now have a landmine. -Ron Swanson
Bamboo
"Drop it, nigger" What do you say when you wake in the middle of the night and see your refrigerator floating in the air? Not a goddamn thing. That's a HUGE nigger.
Because they're jalapeno business!
A MINI-TAUR!
Grandma, hush, that's Nicki Minaj
One's $2.50 and the Other's Under a Buck!
They cantaloupe.
One hundred and one. Two to wash it, one to dry it, and ninety eight to talk about how dirty it was.
it's a pretty obscure number, you probably haven't heard of it.
A shoe.
He stares at   shoes while he talks to you.
He can't get out of a bath.
Pew! Pew!
A police horse.
Knocking on ovens door
Because as they got on the boat to leave Italy, they were stamped on the head, "TO NY".
Cronflakes.
They get a pencil and work it out. 
A full set of teeth
Toof Hurty.
He fell out of the tree.
He thought the bond was ironic.
Pumpkin Pi
The punchlines are too long.
The beans are always under-ground.
None, they prefer the dark.
Cause the zombies are looking for braaaaaaaains
Because their men have hollow-weenies!
Flip it over!
They're still talking about what happened in 1982.
Cholera, bitch.
Depends...
A boner 
Pick on someone your own size.
A "C" gull!
They mix watermelon and grape soda.  (On a side note, I'm not racist. I just think black people and racist jokes are funny.) 
He drown in his tea pee.
Auschwitz
Barium.
Nah let's just skip it.
Patty O'Furniture
They got along swimmingly
Only one of them shakes hands. I guess if you're worried about offending epileptics, you can swap out "epileptic" with "well-trained dog." I came up with this after hearing another UDP joke: "I know a great UDP joke, but you might not get it."
"Hey, guys, look what I can do!"
I've always been a fan or dark humor, so, what's the darkest joke you know. no boundaries, no getting offended. please don't downvote anyone because you find it offensive, that's life, get over it. 
When he starts using condoms with other girls.
Auschwitz
They think outside the box.
It depends on the girl
2 Guys Walk Into A Bar
He got the phone bill
An  -disiac.
Elephant snot. Funniest part is seeing people's reaction when you tell it.
Mad cow disease was already taken.
He sipped his coffee before it was cool
Humpfree! :P
Your bike.
He asked her to do an essay. [Also, I'm latin]
To get to the other slide.
Because you made my PP go up.
Mass hysteria.
This guy!
The nostrils so she can breathe while she sucks your dick.
Flip flops
What are U doing here?
Kick him in the balls
Because they are popular, inexpensive, and a good source of potassium. 
You have to sit in the back of the oven.
Guaca-MOL-e
How are there 127 million subscribers when the Reddit population is WAY LESS????
Want to hear a clean joke? Bob took a bath. With Bubbles. Want to hear a dirty joke? (Punchline hidden so you don't accidentally read)
I know this isn't a joke but I'm sick and tired of how ridiculous some of the comments on this subreddit. Case and point read through some of the comments on the Michael j fox joke and you'll realize how stupid some of the people commenting are. I understand that the downvotes should take care of this but it would be better if they weren't even in existence. Thanks for reading.
Now where will 9gag get all of its content? 
Lance Armstrong
Her son's dick taste weird 
a Karaoke 
Six.  Why?  It just does! OKAY!
Chernobyl fallout.
It freaks out the dogs!
No one, they both eat out.
Bison
You look for the fresh prints.
Let's get shitfaced!
Asked the stranger who just pulled up wih his truck outside a bar. "No" the barkeep replied. "Well fuck," he said, "I guess I just ran over a nun..."
AA, Eh
You don't find out whats in it until you pass it...
Regular sex can make your night, but anal sex can make your hole weak.
Running into a wall with a erection and your nose touches the wall first.
A wolffle. 
Get off me, homes!
They never got past the white belt.
There were 3 car accidents in Mexico 70 people died.  What do you call a bunch of black people in a swimming pool?  Coco puffs.
Who wants to know?  .... saw this joke in today's 
One of my favorites seems a perfect starter.  There once was a [person] from [place] Whose [body part] was [special case]. When [event] would occur, It would cause [him or her] To violate [law of time/space]
Because his mother was in the pen, and they didn't know how long the sentence would be.
Better grip. Happy Halloween :)
Time to go to sweep.
How can you make seven even? Take away the letter S.
The back of my hand.
A pain in the arse.
Because they can only get As.
"we're walking four abreast."
they don't mind if you're a little behind.
A StayGosaurus
A polar bear.
Ten naked men running around in a circle and the first one stops.
What do you say to piss off a redditor?
All the corny jokes.
Alex Crossdresser
In the Sith grade.
Jalapeño Business You need to say this in a pretty thick Hispanic accent for it to work. I heard it from some classmates.
So he could get to the second hand store!
Why aren't there any walmarts in Afghanistan? Because there's a Target on every corner! 
A friend of mine was once employed in a pickle factory. One day, out of nowhere, he expressed a strong urge to stick his dick into the factory's pickle slicer. After a long, hard battle of will and self control, he comes home early one day to tell his wife the bad news: "I got fired for sticking my junk into the pickle slicer." -"What happened to the pickle slicer?" -"Oh, she got fired too."
The white one, because it's  . 
Because it wanted "to change". 
An avalanche. What do you call a bunch of Mexicans running down? A mud slide. What do you call a bunch of black people running down a hill? Jail break.
One is white and scares young children and the other is a ghost.
Sue
Justin Time. 
Muscletov.
...From all the Pharaoh moans.
His lips are moving.
At a dwarfanage
Because the wind blew him there.
Damn
She kept throwing away all the W's.
A hybrid
Nein!
One gets turned on and all wet when I speak to it.  The other is a voice activated sink.
A hot dog with ketchup at one end.
They are both "in-bread" Downvote me to hell if you want. This is my only joke.
Two. One to launch it, and one to watch CNN to find out where it landed.
With debate. 
The OBOE.
When its had it's Baaaaa-Mitzvah!
Give them a bible
Of course, I also have the right ...
It's what the doctor does to heal you. For one you need 'oinkment', and for the other you need 'tweatment'. 
There's only 30 millions of Frenchmen on earth.
It never gets old.
In the beginning, you only need two hearts and a diamond. Later on, a club and a spade.
Because he doesnt want anybody to know he is fucking the chicken.
Quack on quack crime.
They both like to paddle little, white balls.
It will be known as the itouch kids!
Looks like we got a tail.
Jesus doesn't have Mexicans tattooed all over him.
A dead parrot. 
... my face muscles
A hand-me-down.
I'msosaurus
...when he found out, the guy went nut.
This joke makes more sense if you can see it in person, but we'll give it a shot, anyway. Use your imagination. Why do the ladies love Jesus? Because he was hung like this!
He came out a wide receiver 
Every time i clap my hands.
Discreet uniform distribution
Rome.
Because he only comes once a year.
When the monkey wants its bum back? :D
Because it's humerus.
It keeps cumming and cumming and cumming.... 
His mouth is moving.
Eurapoopin.   -my daughter
One is a shift of wit and the other is a whiff of shit.
A cuddlefish! (corny I know)
Because of the vas deferens.
She gave herself a tonsillectomy, an appendectomy, a hysterectomy, and circumcised three of the doctors on her shift.
Ken came in a different box.
'Cause they're knee grows!
He had nothing left to chauffeur it.
The hot dogs taste like crap
Knot cool
He usually flies twice as high.
Jew...ish
It had a fear of Cometment 
When they wake up every morning.
A pilot you fucking racist!
He was basically addicted.
A balaclava. 
unique up on it. :) How do you catch a tame bunny? The TAME way!!! favorite cheesy joke.
Well, you would too, if you had to change in front of that many people!
They both shafted minors in the 1980's.
I cant get hard, i just got laid  by the chicken. 
Bakin'!
One shucks between fits, and the other fucks between shits.
A homogeneous homo genius!
Pump-kin
Don't worry, they'll tell you. 
I usually don't remember anything I dream, and don't ever dream anything "creative."  However, I was sleeping on the couch with the TV on, so Idk; here it is: If I were a bear, I would walk around mauling the shit out of everyone.  When asked, "how can you commit such   murders," I would simply reply: "The fuck do I know, I'm a bear." Not even sure if it's as funny as I think, but has anyone ever encountered that one?
Garbage.
An attempted murder.
Because we got all the money back from the Jews.
Wooden poop.
Neither has he.
Disclaimer: I don't know how well this joke will work in english. What's yellow and lies in a pond? An excevator. You don't think this is funny? Neither does the operator.
A math problem.
They take all the green cards.
They both get laid by Mexicans. 
Outlaws are wanted.
When it starts talking to you again. 
It's a never ending story.
Joke Joke Jooooooooke.
A line of marathon runners
He farts.
De fishes
"Gouda worka"
A woman doesn't accept 3 1/2 inch floppies
Because sex cells.
Nothing, she was wearing mittens.
uunnnnnnnnnnnnngggggggggggggg!
If your parents force it on you too much as a child you won't like it as an  adult.
Because they had great stock options. 
Cause I think I'll knead a little bit of dough to get by.
Dr Dre
Should it really be a lightbulb?
The MOMbo. 
Because the P is silent.
A little plaque.
They're both off and running.
You don't want it, but your dad gives it to you anyway. 
A spoilsport.
A flat white.
"'jew gonna do anything with that, 'cause I can take it off your hands?"
Shit on their stick
Definatly the   it spends all day going chink-chink-chink-SPIC-nigga-nigga-nigga
"The sky's the limit for you".
An orcastra
No boos for me. 
NOTHING I FUCKING HATE IT!
feed us fetus fajitas! I hope that joke was shitty enough to make you laugh.  Inspired from this post in no context  
Drops it like it's hot.
Braille for SUCK ME.
Because they don't C# 
It hurts when IP.
Pessimist Prime
Crack-a-lacking
Only one, but the light bulb has to want to change. 
..... Decalfinated.
Condom-Mints
Neither did she. 
My donation check to Feed the Children!
A banana-nana-nana Got it on a popsicle stick. Laughed for way too long.
Fish. I got this from bash.org a long time ago, but I can't find the original post, so have this 
So she could moan with the other.
A light bulb weighs about 50g and a single ant can lift about .2g, so it takes somewhere around 250 ants working together.
Copies.
twatstika.
The passenger list.
The midget geniuses are cunning runts.
The football player   
None, they are too busy beating the shit out the room for being black.
A loose Canon.
"You have a severe case of meningitis."
Romney supporters sign their checks on the front. Obama supporters sign their checks on the back.
A seizure salad.
Cross country.
They traded loads
Pick Six
Abundance.
It doesn't matter (go ahead and down vote :P)
Talk in your sleep.
Its significant  .
Dr Dre.......
Because it takes them so much longer to say "Kaaa-WIT!"
Anything but Canadian Club..
A visitor
The car light comes on
How do you make a cat sound like a dog?  Pour gasoline on it and set it on fire : WOOF! How do you make a dog sound like a cat? Freeze it and put it thru a table saw: meeeeooooow
What's   fastest thing in the world?
He claims 47% of the U.S. as dependents. 
He'll tell you. 
No mom. The smell is incense, my eyes are red from browsing reddit for hours, and I'm just keeping that unicorn here until Tim comes back from Florida.
Beef Stroganoff
It was mass murder. 
You know what, never mind.  I don't want to spread it around.
BARACK-oli. Courtesy of my friend Abraham.
Early critics say the food is good, but there's no atmosphere.
She wasn't wearing her seatbelt.
A chicken and an egg are lying in bed. The chicken is leaning against the headboard smoking a cigarette with a satisfied smile on its face. The egg, looking a bit ticked off, grabs the sheet, rolls over and says ... "Well, I guess we finally answered THAT question!"
A dead rabbit with a beat-up asshole.
Pants. 
Stew!
Dust for Fresh Prints! (i this version better than any snowstorm b.s.)
You take a pocketknife and scrape off some of the paint on the hood. If it's a real Ferrari... someone will kick your ass.
The wrinkles.
There was a man teaching the children's Sunday school class, and his lesson was on resurrection. The man asks the kids if they know what the word resurrection means. After a long silence a little boy in the back of the room raises his hand and says "Well I don't know what it is but I know that if it lasts more than 4 hours, you have to go see a doctor."
Take notes.
don't they know the black one runs faster?
A lot of people think that Saudi Arabians are uninformed. What do you expect? They live under Iraq (a rock).
Sometimes you have to slay a few dragons before you get to the princess
None. They just beat the room for being black.
Because they had their shit packed the night before
Magikarp. So he can take Jasmine to a Magikarpet Ride.
A brunette with bad breath.
He lost it back in the 'Nom War
A pussy makes your cock feel nice and makes you cum, a cunt is who owns the pussy.
A 'buff'alo
Sheep.
Spoiled milk.
Because two wongs don't make a white!
Wooden shoe like me to tell you. [Props to my 8-year-old daughter for this one]
Cause you Israeli hot. My go-to joke at parties. 
That's what I call my crotch.
First-AIDS
Running through a field of dead babies and getting your toe stuck in an eye socket.
Everyone has the same DNA.
The giraffe put him up to it.
Because they worship prophets!
google maps.
I came early.
Ask Apple.
Xu wong
I can't jelly a dick in your ass
Anusteaseology.
A Nectarine! What's a vampire bat's favorite dog breed? The blood hound! 
"Well, if you hadn't been so fresh last night, we wouldn't have ended up in this jam!"
He shaterpillar.
BECASE IT'S ATTACHED TO YOUR HUMERUS
Damn
I don't know, let me go check my Facebook feed.
Turn it over.
Eva Brown!
You can't eat normal blood with a fork. 
Jap-pennies
...mainly SMALL ARMS.
Nothing because I'm a good parent.
Kick a little kid in the jaw.
Because of the pepper spray.
Because 7 is a sand-nigger. 
Someone who shows up to your door for no reason. 
He forgot the safe word. 
It was a blast
He burnt his lips on the exhaust pipe.
A pair of pliers
Ireland: More bars in more places
what did the baby corn say to momma corn?  where is popcorn.
Because his dick was in the chicken.
this just in
Over Do-se-do.
He had  .
Orientation.
They're both fucking close to water.
Because all the ones who can run, jump or swim are ready in the US. 
That you   to fart.
♪Knock, knock, knockin on Heavens door♪
He's always getting nailed to the boards.
Brenda
It's for cereal.
Well, you'd blubber too if you had to eat whale meat.
Right where you left it. 
Moo-thai. 
He'll give you a Bro-Job.
Taiwon Shou.
Bob Barker
C4
a spigot.
Because the seaweed.
Because thats the only place that King Mino's touches them!
It scares the hell out of the dog
They tell you.
The KKK dresses in white and scares the hell out of black people, the Supreme Court dresses in black and scares the hell out of white people.
Very blight.
Thankfully there were no souls on board.
Just two.
A police horse.
She was a woman
They found him dead the next day in his tea pee.
Christopher Reeve at a strip club.
  because he was hung like this
Because they are fucking worth it!
Somebody shot her.
She had no arms. Knock knock Who's there?  Obviously not Sally 
sexy children
I 'ardly know 'im!
everywhere
designer genes
Heblew
Open the door, hand him the cash and take the pizza
Freedom
'Twas rated Argggghhhhh!!!!
...Nothing, because he was jewish.
Because it can swim 
Their snooze button only lasts 6 minutes.
Potatoe 
It was the Battle of the A'la Mode.
a pitbull will eventually let it go
Because he was pissed off.
A two-knee fish! (works better when you're drunk)
Oh you know, it has its prose and cons. Badum Tish. Be gentle, first time here.
with a look over your shoulder.
Cancer.
Something you throw a wabbits.
Receiving a blowjob from a cannibal
KNOCK, KNOCK  WHO'S THERE? 9/11. 9/11 WHO? WHAT? I THOUGHT WE NEVER FORGOT
I'm a big fan.
i dont know how long its going to take me to get hard i just got laid by a chick
they both put thirty year old meat in five year old buns
My local diner was having a promotion where you peeled a sticker off of your drink and got whatever was on the other side. As I sat down to my breakfast I saw this girl stand up yelling "I won a RV" The manager came over and said that that wasn't possible and that the biggest prize available was a cheeseburger. The girl then says "it says right here 'winnebago' the RV company"When the manager looked at the sticker he said "Miss, it doesn't say 'Winnebago' it says 'win a BAGEL'
If the rubber brakes, you're screwed.
Because then they would be bay-gulls.
When I was a kid we used to call people in the phone book with funny names. One unfortunate person was named Lipschitz.  We'd call and ask, "Is this Lipschitz?"  When he/she said "Yes," we would reply, "Well, if your lip shits, my ass whistles!" Any other good ones from days of the past?
Be on the lookout for a small medium at large.
Militia Etheridge.
You get your house back, your dog back, your wife back, and you sober up.
Propertea
Vodka does not freeze
None... they live an ascetic lifestyle and prefer to not use electricity.
3.14159265358979323846.....
The Fig Newton.
Sandwiches. 
Pass the Parcel in a Belfast Pub.
Q: How do you get a giraffe in the refrigerator? Q: The King of the animals holds a big meeting and all of the animals are there except one, who's not there? Q: Three adventurers come to a crocodile invested river that they must cross, how do they get across? A: They swim. All the crocodiles are at the meeting.
Call her up and tell her where you are.
My Bologna had a first name.
When you reach for the Preparation H and accidentally grab the Ben-Gay
Fur traders.
Half of a cat.
They both change their pads after three periods. 
Here teacher said to go home and do her "essay".
when your a system admin, and your server if tipped could destroy many websites.
It would of scared the shit out of the dog.
Because I put one in last night and it was dead this morning.
to get to the bottom!
√4 the home team
It's a center for lightly battered women.
Because if they went forward they'd fall in the boat.
Word is he's down to about four butts a day.
Some nights, I don't know.
... either way, someone is losing a trailer.
A gangbang
Nothing.
A bull.
No whey!
throw a bunch of pocket change in the middle of town. How do u tell who is the richest person in that village? Find the person who gathered the most change.
TWOOO PLANES!!
Stop fallowing me!
Light Blue. 
Q: How Many New Yorkers Does it Take to Screw in a Light Blub? A: None - they all jump out of the building when it gets too hot Not the best, I admit. But yeah - top that.
In his lab!
That one broke the ice. Reddit I come to you with a request - Do you have any good ice breaker jokes? Better than the one I just used? This is because I have used that one for almost 3 years now and it might be wearing thin on it's life of being funny. The only other one I have heard is (From reddit today - not twelve hours ago): Do you know how many Hydrogen bonds I can disrupt?  Enough to break the ice.
A tresumé.
The hotdogs smell like shit. 
He wasn't koalafied!
Everytime the car stops, she wants to jump in the backseat.
because he was full of BOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOS!
What do you do ? When you cum across a tiger? Zip up and run like hell!
Your bicycle.
A snow-blower that doesn't work.
Anether(another) Nether
Topic.
He prefers them shaken, not stirred.
Dudddeee.....your dicks out!
September 19th is international talk like a pirate day, and I would love to hear all of your guys best pirate jokes. Here is mine: Why do pirates have trouble learning the alphabet? Because they spend years at Sea!
The steaks are just too high.
Because it's not the same three holes over and over again. 
Because he was charged with battery.
You can only fit one asshole in a pair of Dockers.
Aren't they themselves a carry-on?
Princess Diana wouldn't be caught dead in a Lexus...
They've both had a downy inside em.
It got old pretty fast. (I know, it's awful).
one is a superhero and the other is a command.
His Third Treich.
I need some jokes for class and they don't have to be funny. Thanks and make sure they are about Russia or Stalin. Edit: Thanks for all the jokes! I'll use some of them for sure.
... he shat-a-pillar.
Wrecked'em. Damn near killed him.
There's no sunlight in the closet.
An hour 5 minutes for the Ramen noodles and foil. 55 minutes to fix the squeaky shopping cart wheel.
An old woman was sipping on a glass of wine, while sitting on the patio with her husband, and she says. "I love you so much, I don't know how I could ever live without you" Her husband asks, "Is that you or the wine talking?" ... She replies, "It's me... talking to the wine."
Just one more.
Only two more sleeps until christmas.
Don't worry, they'll let you know.
In One Direction. 
None. That light bulb fell down the stairs.
A Cunt stubble
Because they're a diamond dozen
There were no survivors.
Apparently he was outstanding in his field. [modified repost]
Because they lacked porpoises.
Babe Ruthless
Sock puppets... -credit to Daniel Tosh
Yeah, he just came out of the cupboard.
The blondes were throwing hand grenades, and the brunettes were pulling the pins and throwing them back.
They both go down for the count!!
MOM: Make your bed!  KID: Why make my bed if I'm gonna sleep in it again tonight?  MOM: Why wipe your ass if your gonna poop again?  KID: O_O
A semicolon. 
Here's mine:  What do you call a dead Mexican?  Dearly deported.
There's only one Bender in Futurama
HIV
Bean-laden
Because a sheep can hear a zipper from a mile away.
PGA Tour.
Luke Warm
Get out of my son.
They got pissed off. 
Raggedy Ann setting on Pinocchio's face screaming,"Lie to me, lie to me."
Called "Sub-Mitt"?  
Many hands make light work. 
They had reservations.
Nothing, They were both stuck-up bitches.
When he eats his first Brownie.?
Search and Destroy.
Big holes all over Australia!
A filling station!
68, because any faster and you'll flip over and eat it.
she got ripped in half by a giant crab.. 
What do you do when your girlfriend starts smoking? Slow down, and use more lube.
gas
You feed 'em shit and keep 'em in the dark.
Genoslide.
Get off me Pa you're crushing my Copenhagen!
When you exit a museum, you trigger the alarm.
Their balls will show.
forget it once.
You can negotiate with a terrorist. 
You can negotiate with the terrorist. 
He's all right though.
A Chinese restaurant's newest entree! 
A veterinarian
G,Esus.
Nothing, you've already told her.
It makes you look hard
Any other stereotypical job/industry comments/jokes would also be greatly appreciated (even though they're groan-inducing). Thanks (in advance)!
A computer only has to have information punched into it once.
Bush hog.
A pilot, you f'n racist!!
The taste!
No more blowjobs.
If you absolutely had to, you could eat the bowling ball.
What color to paint the ceiling.
They both have wet noses.
bunny farts
None because they pee sitting down.
Carlos
raw raw raw raw raw
Crib-death
Shit in her cunt.
Rady O'Gaga
a pastatute lol
Fish and ships
There's twenty of them!
not alot. (Just thought of it, tell me what you think :) )
They all went down on a President. 
Both are fucking close to water.
"You can't gentrify this place! I just moved here!"
100; 1 to do it, and 99 to say "I could do that."
To see the Gash
You can beat an egg.
They both stop working when you take their chains off. Edit: Oh, I'm sorry. I thought this was America. By the way, got this from AskReddit.
Entering the friend zone.
A fruit roll-up
Don't look! I'm changing!
So they can hide in apple trees.  What's the loudest noise in the jungle? A giraffe eating apples. 
Completely Useless By September
The diarrhea of Anne Frank.
Ripostes
Both have a great place to go but at a terrible time.
A bra.
nothing, they were both stuck up bitches.
Mick Jagger sings “eh you, get offa mai cloud”, but the Scottish farmer says “eh McLeod, get offa mai ewe!
Pun-fu fighting
A tourist.
He was fingering A minor.
Gerald Fitzpatrick and Patrick Fitzgerald
Because seven days makes a hole weak.
My job still sucks
Because they're hard to iron.
the could spend years at sea
My cock while doing it.
Because when people fall off of 'em, they yell AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAALLLLLLPPPP!!!!!!!!
because his dick was stuck in the chicken
Not even, homes
See you next month!
Drool
It could be   your bike. EDIT: Spelling.
Iceberg :D
The Vice President takes over. What happens when the Vice President dies? The Speaker of the House takes over. What happens when the Speaker of the House dies? You go to Radio Shack and buy a new speaker.
Well, that was an unexpected twist!
People who comment "repost" on a Joke subreddit.
I won't digest yet.
because all good kitchen appliances come in white.
Because he D-D-D-D-DROPPED THE BABY.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
A Bear trap.
Fucks funny
None, they're all stuck up bitches.
Apparently he got a little behind in his orders.
A plane bagel.
Because the last time they shunned a child molester, he started Islam.
By moving the trees closer together.
He could tell all his friends he had a threesome!
Welp.... I guess it's back to jerking off!
Want to go out with me and Di tonight?
Necrotizing Fascists.
... He had foam on the range.
Nothing.  She's dead.
You go on ahead, I'll just hang around.
of course you don't.
When you are eating watermelon .
Too many Thank You notes to write.
Son :How much does it cost to get married, Dad?            Father:I don't know, son, I'm still paying for it.           Son :Is it true, Dad, that I heard that in ancient China, a man        doesn't know his wife until he marries?           Father:That happens everywhere, son, EVERYWHERE.
Little Debbie, everybody eats her.
Meals on wheels.
When you reach for the Preparation H but accidentally grabbed a BenGay.
Equine.
They're book-keepers.
You don't pay her.
For bird flu you need tweetment, for swine flu you need oinkment.
He would have won if he had just a little more thyme.
A birth certificate states the sex.
Spicket fence.
A person that lays awake late at night and ponders if there's such a thing as a dog.
He had a high MIDI-chlorian count. Test.
Putting them back in the wheelchair when you're done.
He had no more pane
Shoving 12 oysters up your grandmothers vagina and sucking out 13.
'Hi girls!'
He kneaded the dough!
She goes down on you and you owe her one
Boo-bees! 
Flip the stool over. 
No? Well it's very underground right now.
Through the windshield
He turns tight ends into wide receivers 
CUZITHODZITFOMFOPIN.
I-HOP
Virgins.
He was just a nerdy digger.
His hand caught on fire.
I can't believe I blew ten bucks in there. 
The guy who gave it to the pitbull.
An udder failure.
No idea, No ones ever tried.
Awwlllll!
Throw in a load of laundry.
He regained his sight in ICU.
Second man:  uhh... I give up
Beef jerky.
Give him a bloody tampon and ask him what period its from.
A racket.
Wuh-wuh-wuh-one.
Cut off your head.
Tequila.
Scares the living shit outa their dogs!
Seizure salad.
Both their last greatest hits was the wall.
Bacon! Get it?
7up in cider.
Cuz all that can run, jump or swim have got their ass over here.
You're golden retriever. 
They're right we do taste like chicken!
An Amish drive by shooting
They both die in tunnels
They both want to make money off of other people's work!
The prostitute- she can wash her crack and resell it.
The oven doesn't fart when you take the meat out. 
with WOOFilin
It's a sin to put it in, but it's a shame to take it out.
Depends.
Four Skindivers.
The constellation prize.
Because the friar rises!
Two. One to eat it, another to look out for traffic!
Who the hells been dressing me all these years?
Because there's no snow between the kitchen and the bedroom..
Boy Scouts come back from their camps.
well many how???
It doesn't matter how many you get, because all they'll do is sit around complaining about how misogynistic the use of the word "screw" is.
Roberto
He didn't either.
An algae-bra!
VAGINA PECTORIS!
...and the dashboard, the windshield, and the hood of the car too
I always enjoy a good joke told as if it actually happened to the person telling it. Know any good ones?
There's 20 of em'
The letter M
You can hide your own easter eggs.
didn't see that coming..
They both can smell it, but can't eat it.
POKE-MON!
Because a and b shells are too small.
She looked very Theroux-ly.
Dad says: "You are my son, I'm confident about that. Your friend over there, is also my son, THAT is confidential. 
A microwave doesn't brown your meat.
Because he might fiddle with your kids.
Because they dont C#
I'm just kitten..
They both got a wet nose.
Eileen
A waist of paper. 
They say "Do you know what they say about guys who have big feet?"
Because there were 6 million jews waiting for him in hell.
You tell him... "that's definitely a win sir".  Or if he did ok you can say you half win sir i suppose.    :/
Never mind, it's pointless. 
Nothing, because muffins can't talk..
Because Curiosity killed the cat!
soak it in gasoline and light it on fire... WOOF!
A shit
Oh wait - it hasn't come out yet!
Elixir
'Tep on the brake 'tupid.
Only some of the things that come out of her vagina are retarded.
What do you call nuts on the wall? Walnuts What do you call nuts on your chest? Chestnuts What do you call nuts on your chin? My dick in your mouth
Because if they had four doors, they would be a chicken sedan. 
They don't want to leave their brothers behind
A pain in the ass.
Nostalgebra
Because we told them to.
Lesbi-honest, they don't.
Water Polio
Mine would have to be Why did sally fall out of the tree? Because she had no arms.  Knock knock.  Who's there? Not sally. 
You don' want your boat to be full of leeks.
They're all gone!
A Hemp-ster
2 jews fighting over a penny
You actually want to cuddle a kitten after you fuck it.
NO?  Oh well never mind then.
The Holocaust. (pun, hologram deal)
It's great! If you win, you gat a dollar each year... for a million years.
You hang around I'll go on ahead
Glue a penny to the bottom of a swimming pool ALTERNATE ENDING: Put a scratch n' sniff at the bottom of a swimming pool
Gets jalapeno business.
Cirque d'Olay
Just ice.
In denial.
I herd. 
A homiesexual!
With a pilaf.
Four. One to change the bulb and three to make a t-shirt about it.
What is Green...and Smells Like Pork? Kermit the Frog's Finger!!
What's up, britches?!
He always drops the bass.  Teehee 
Spit, swallow, gargle.
A frog, I lied about the wheels.
It got toad.
He lay awake at night wondering if there really was a dog.
Once upon a time there was a female brain cell that by mistake happened to end up in a man's head.  She looked around nervously but it was all empty and quiet. "Hello?" she cried, but no answer. "Is there anyone here?" she cried a little louder, but still no answer. Now the female brain cell started to feel alone and scared and again she yelled: "HELLO, IS THERE ANYONE HERE!!?" Then she heard a voice from far, far away: "Hello! We're down here..."
He came out of the cupboard.
His girlfriend was great at blowing 100 bucks.
A viola burns longer.
To get to the other side.
A Barkeologist.
...fünf.
I've heard the lead role goes to explosions. 
Because he was feeling a little horse.
Because it's two gross.
Because, they don't like Poles.
They're dollar coins, because a quarter is two bits, which means a dollar is 8 bits.
Eh?
My English Monologue Draft...
They were both stuck up cunts!
Nun of your business.
They prefer cash.
Well the flag's a big plus.
The closer you get to the butt the stronger the taste. 
They both came in a little behind!
you put it in the water
None. Don't worry about me, I'll just sit here in the dark.
Niggers.  
lightbulbs buy light bulbs neon lights sex porn
They have diplomatic immunity.
He was feeling a little crummy.
You wouldn't want to get repossessed!
a SAIYANtist!
No one knows. They ride single file to hide their numbers. 
Eric Clapton wouldn't let a baggie of cocaine fall out the window.
One's a cunning runt and the other's a running cunt.
Because she had no arms. "knock knock" "whose there?" "not sally!"
Whom whom.
A hit Broadway show. (heard Drew Carey make this joke in a Whose Line blooper reel)
Is there a subreddit for this?
So it won't explode when you fuck it.
Apparently he was too far out.
Cot death.
A quarter pounder with cheese! -From   the movie
Because he left a shrimp cock-trail.
Every month it has the same centerfold.
too many technical fowls
They're both full of shit, but the government's got more assholes. 
for meatier showers.
You have to read ursine.
Trash gets picked up.
A girl on top.
You can't peanut-butter it into her ass !
He got pissed off.
There is one less drunk at the wake
Because someone dropped a quarter.
GO AWAY
garglgarglgarglgarglgargl
Because Stevie Nicks.
They're two Maine streams.
To get it pier reviewed.
Rubber clit...
nothing.  sombodys losing a trailer!
Mine is: What is the white stuff in bird poop? (That is also bird poop.) edit: til you can't edit the topic to fix spelling errors...
Hey kid, ya wanna buy some candy?
Niggers
They don't take no for an answer. 
To get all their stuff back.
"dinner's on me"
... Grains!!!
Because anyone who can run, jump, or swim is already across the border
Reload.
Barbecue Sauce
You don't, there's already a clock on the stove.
Because the beans keep falling through the grill.
Quit laughing, and reload.
Shit in her cunt. 
Some jokes work better when told. This subreddit seems to be void of any spoken jokes. So, what are some of your favorite jokes in video form? I can already imagine an hour long Nate the Snake joke.
It never gets old. Did you hear the joke about Michelle Obama's vagina? It's a dark one.
Put it on my bill.
They both came in a yellow box
A basketball team. What do you call 9 black guys and a white guy?  A baseball team. What do you call 11 black guys and a white guy?  A football team. What do you call 100 black guys and a white guy?  A cell block
Because of the mace.
As Many Times As It Wants!
A flat miner. EDIT: spelling
bagels
In fifty shades of gray
Mr. Whodyounickabollockov
The crust.
They say he was half nuts.
Just a German who wants to laugh.
Beef Stroganoff.
With a John Deere letter. 
You can come in, but you can't come out. <editorial non-joke remark - I'm straight, but these guys need to learn a lesson IMHO>
He couldn't take shots to the head.
The grass tickles their balls.
A peng-lose!
Just 1 because we are all equal and race has no impact.
Apparently he came home early and caught his wife surrendering to a German.
oh, sorry, i misspelled "why"...
because they deserve them.
The police heard it was full of pedal-philes.
"It's not a too-nah!"
just one 's'. One is skyscraper and the other one is skycraper.
It comes from the Tattlesnake!
A pickpocket snatches watches
Grow a penis
For American readers:
Because they have big fingers.  My FAVORITE clean joke, by far. 
They both had curds in their whey.
Juan on Juan
You try so hard to get in but 9 months later you regret you ever came. 
He beats his meat
Decaffinated
A chillbilly.
It makes them feel popular.
They come in handy.
Reefer
"Geronimoo!"
Paddy O'Furniture
Because they get jalapeño business.
It takes 1 to screw it in, and 99 to tweet about it.
...because he wanted to win the "Nobel" prize!
Upvote!
Glass doesn't burn.
It's full of hoes.
They wouldn't let him in because he showed up dressed as a goat.
Wave at him
none. they just beat it for being  black!
Because the Jihad.
Because when he grows up he will be Batman.
Lickalotypus.
Not Jessica
I hear it's killer.
Ground Coffee.
Well, its making headlines. 
So that the choir boys could get more meat in their mouth besides the Reverend.
YOU DON'T KNOW, MAN! YOU WEREN'T THERE!
sheeeeeeeeeeeeit..
If the rubber breaks, you're dead.
She heard there were free shots.
I heard that people were really Fired up about it! too spoon?
A hundred dollar bill.
A bad magician
gay rights
[betta]s
He was so proud he took it home and had it bronzed.
Tooth hurty
White Vans.
"I'm a huge fan!"
...because "pot holder" was already taken.
One is a crusty bus station the other is a busty crustation! ::buh dum bum::
A seizure salad!
A group of loud and rowdy drunks were making a racket in the street.It was the wee small hours of the morning and the lady of the houseflung open a window and shouted at them to keep quiet. "Is this where Frank lives?" one of the drunks asked. "Yes, it is," the woman replied. "Well then," said the drunk, "Could you come and pick him out so therest of us can go home?"
Bat man can go a whole night without robin
My donation check to the orphanage.
Denim denim denim ;p
They spend more time in your wallet than on your dick.
Because she didn't have any arms. Knock Knock..who's there..Not Sara.
Timbuuuuuurrrrrrrrton~!
Here's mine: ______________________________
In Soviet Russia, consciousness regulates the cerebral cortex.
Fahfrompoopin
...Can't tell you anyway because you wouldn't get over it.
Heath Ledger jokes can get old....
I do. 
Copernicus.
He took warm ones instead.
I've been scouring the posts on here but a lot of them are highly sexual/not appropriate.  Have to give a joke for my Toastmasters class. Ideas?
Sorry
"I'm not Willie Nelson."
For them, the light at the end of the tunnel is New Jersey.
It only takes one nail to hang a photo
Because it's Camel-flaged...
When they get to third base they think they've scored
because then they would be Chicken sedans
Because all his white friends got better gifts than him.
A: Any way you want, concrete floors tend to be very hard to crack.
One's a goodyear and the other is a great year.
The unemployment line. 
It's a Dell.
Because they can make themselves dinner.
Cancer. 
FOOD CHAINZZZ!!
He's all right now.
Because the couch didn't pull out.
yeah, they.re called tenants.
Listener usually answers: R? Punchline: (In pirate voice) No! It is the C!
You take the "F" out of way. 
Patti O'Furniture
Because they cantaloupe
You have to put the partly-eaten dismembered body of your infant daughter in the freezer instead.
Because atomic bombs are pretty bright.
I loave you.
Eric Clapton would never let a bag of coke fall out the window.
Stevie Wonder when he answers the iron.
I had a joke about Alzheimer's but damnit, I don't remember it.
So birds don't shit on their lips.
The higher it flies, the much.
how does an irish duck say hello... whats the quack?   - this may be the worst irish joke ever... does anyone have an irish joke worse than this?
Amish drive by shooting.
Family reunion They even brought a bucket of KFC 
Yea, he was doing Magic. 
Dr. Dre.
I'm a really big fan.
One shucks between fits
Come on, don't leave me hanging.
you're stuck on the basement level!
Because he has less understanding.
If it had been invented anywhere else, it would be called a teethbrush. What's the latest invention to come out of the UA engineering program? A solar-powered flashlight. How can you tell if someone's a UA graduate? Look at the ring while they're picking their nose. Why are criminals so hard to catch in Alabama? Everyone has the same DNA. What does an Alabaman call a six-pack and a dead possum? A seven-course meal. Since state jokes seem to be the thing today, and, well, I'm from Georgia...
Hop in
They both can be used to carry vegetables....
She better come back with a goddamn sandwich!
...'cause you're a frickin' babe.
The black ones steal your watch.
It's called "101 ways to wok your dog"
Well, just, whoever was in charge. The people in charge decided not to let the gorilla in, in case there were problems. EDIT: I didn’t mention this was Louis CK’s daughter’s joke because I assumed most people would know that already. It was never my intention to make it seem like I came up with it or to try to steal it.
4 if you flip it upside down. 
The one who you have to explain the joke to.
It's two shots and a splash of water.
Very satisfying.
Reflexivity and transitivity.
Welfare.
Because a jewish woman wouldn't touch anything unless it's 20% off.
Def Leppard.
you wave at her.
By the time you hear it, it's too late to do anything about it. A long list of viola jokes:
It didn't have any fans!
Irrelevant, you will be assimilated!
He was pissed off.  (It took me an embarrassing amount of time to get this one.)
Lets go in there and get shit faced.
Because 69's a mouthful!
Hitler was an evil  .
Prose before hoes.
Of Course they do, they just don't celebrate it!
A sticky Wicket.
Fur traders!
Half a cat
Snap, crackle, pop. 
Two.  One to actually do it, the other to film it so fundamentalists won't claim that God did it.
A loophole Credit to Doug Benson
One spreads easily and the other is peanut butter 
her miscarriage 
That is, until 1982 when your mom got on one.
"Don't wash it in there, you'll make the fish smell like that!"
A SHIT-szu. I thought of this due to the fact that my Shitszu came inside covered in mud.
Ugly.
Cashews!
Maui.
So they can look at the 2nd Italian Navy!  Edit: Grammar
Because they know it is tough to get into the habit.
Because there are more birds on that side.
Your fat sisters boyfriend
That he built.
It wooden go
With a big dong.......
Nothing, it never happens.
Every night, he'd go out and drink until it was light.
Cripple Sec
nothing, it just let out a little whine
I'll tagalog!
Step one:  penetrate the student body. 
Kobayoshi.
Because of  nomials!
Just ask them to read this word: unionized.
The Library
On a scale from Casey Anthony to Jerry Sandusky, how much do you love kids?
A web Bowser.
Because they hate mandates.
Xbox
A buttload
All they ever say is Mao.
Denim denim denim.
You shit in her cunt.
Go for the juggler
The porcupine has its pricks on the outside. 
A buffa
Free of charge, of course.
 
They both like to stick meat in their 10 year old buns.
Because when his commanding officer read his letter saying he was now a WOP, it was assumed that he had expatriated. 
It's not hard.
Hammad. What do you call a VERY drunk Muslim? Mohammad.
you enjoy both more as an adult if they arent forced on you as a child.
GRRAAAAINS!!
Nothing if her husband knows what's good for him!
No. He just keeps the tips.
She didn't have any arms . Knock-Knock Who's there ? Not Sally !
because they have no Seoul
Here come the elephants. . . . What did he say when he saw the elephants coming over the hill wearing sunglasses? Nothing, he didn't recognize them. . . . What did he say when he saw the giraffes coming over the hill wearing sunglasses? Those goddamn elephants won't fool me this time.
Tape a hula hoop to the bottom of a pool
Which famous celebrity has had the most children over the last 20 years?  Michael Jackson
EL-ton John
Throw in a load of laundry, and soap
Everyone who can run, jump, and swim are already over here. 
Because at the second mile they get raped.
Because they run you over with a tank if you do. Found this on Becker, didn't know if I should put this here or goingtohellforthis
rubbertoe
Apparently it's the   of reddit.
The mid-life crisis.
Yep.  It's in his ass and belongs to Usher.
He got away with words.
One is a group of immature internet trolls....and the other thinks it isn't.
... a smooth criminal.
Ninja chicken.
Buy-sexual (I know it is cheesy, but I thought of it all on my own.)
If you're forced to have it as a kid, you probably won't like it as an adult
They always drop the bass
moo-tilated.
One that never misses a period.
Somewhere over a rainbow...
Cos to Mariguana is illegal.
Because they're poor conductors! (I know they're called Engineers but cut me some slack, I thought of this in the 9th grade.)
A drummer...
...nothing.
Tulips on an organ.
Sorry!
"Dear Reader"
A Brick!
To get to the otherside!
My truck is paid for, and honestly officer, I was just helping the sheep over the fence. 
A butt load.
Both of them cost $100 and if the rubber breaks, you're screwed!
Between you and me, we can make a lot of money!
They both get laid by Mexicans...
One in the center eating its way out. What's worse than that? It goes back for seconds.
One has a cunning array of stunts, the other has a stunning array of cunts. 
Bono-y-Bono
White children get immense joy after tearing one open
Someone stops you in the middle of the road and asks you to tell him a good joke, What would be your reply?
The old lady with the recipe died...
... so that they could close their jackets.
They turn the stool up side down
A Dell, rolling in the deep.
Because it was pi-rated.
One
A Magic Johnson.
Five. Germany to start it, France to try and then give up almost immediately, Italy to start, give up, and try again from the other side, America to finish it and claim credit for the whole thing, and Switzerland to sit in the dark and pretend that nothing happened.
Because..........It is hard to eat Jenny Craig with Mary Kay on her face.
Because their pecker's on their face
Because they don't know the words.
Because the rain in Spain falls mostly in the plain.
Because when they dance, they make it rain.
Because he was too far out, man.
Don't worry, they'll tell you.
A dog that is smart enough to bury the bodies.
Employed people.
He jump off the diving board before it was pool.
Where you put the cucumber! 
He was feeling a little hoarse.
You haven't? Never mind, I don't want to spread it.
¡Grassy Ass!
Because every time his wife gets hot, he covers her with dirt and beats her with a shovel.
They picked letters out of a hat: C eh, N eh, D eh.
He was trapped under da-Brie!
An extractor fan
You really gotta hand it to 'er. 
Because two wongs don't make a white
A Navajo.
He was 0K.
I reich you.
"No, that's all right.  I'll just sit here in the dark."
12 pirates.
When they blow, you got no power!!
Reddit reddit.. First joke i thought of. :) 
If so, was it a white one?
Warren.
Wednesday
Because they only worked from 38 to 45
McDonald's knows how to use salt
When the librarian tells you to leave.
A condom wasn't on my dick last night.
Spring water.
You can drop her off anywhere!
A: He couldn't recall.
So he can be juan with everything.
Juan Direction.
That would be a dead giveaway. 
Because their hands are always in someone else's!
Swallows
They are making headlines!
If you answered "I don't know." I would like to tell you that I spent all day cleaning that mess up.
A sociopath sees people as things; a buddhist sees things as people.
If you answered 'I don't know,' I'm certainly not letting you borrow any of   DVDs in the future!
Neither have I! I hope this isn't a repost. I made this joke, but I wouldn't be surprised if somebody else thought of it before me.
Dago wop wop wop
A: You feel his hand going up your ass!
Going in and asking for a coat hanger.
An unholy mess!
and
The free lunch. 
They keep slipping off.
Cum on her feet and let the flies do the rest.
The refrigerator doesn't fart when you take the meat out.
Pa-Ra-Bo-La (do doooo do dodo)
Thanks for the mammaries.
Beaver Dam
He doesn't like to look down on the unemployed. 
Because they're dead
Sorry, the punchline is the joke.  If you don't get it, ask your dad.
Their last names!
They are both front-page material on reddit
About 74,000 Insta-grams.
Looks like I got my work cut out for me.
A re-cyclist.
I still love vista, baby
Nothing, Michael liked boys.
A shell phone!
It was the Battle of the A La Mode!
"Can I push in your stool?" 
Nothing. Lesbians don't cook. They eat out. 
For me, it's gotta be Emo Phillips' Baptist joke. Although to tell it you've gotta get his execution down.
The police officer
Litter that the wind blew out of the trash you racist piece of shit!
They got six months each.
One's a Goodyear, the other's an awesome year. 
Kermit the Frog's finger.
Oh, well I guess it doesn't really matter anyway...
Spic and span
What does Spock sing in the shower?  I'll stop the world and meld with you!
Because he's dead.
Bunny farts
Eric Clapton would never let a bag of cocaine fall out a window.
One's a crusty bus station.
These jokes should be any jokes that are even vaguely related to animals!
I've cleaned up and found Jesus. 
... 70 because after 69 your mouth's full.
They can't go into a store without Robin
A Balanced Diet!
He can't go anywhere without Robin'
10 people who don't do dick.
"I'm not Willie Nelson."
They fire a Canon.
You give them 99c, and they throw a burrito in the toilet for you.
Because poly means many and ticks mean blood-sucking parasites. 
Ba na na na na na na na na na na na na na grapefruit.
Mega-sore-ass!
He gets mourning wood. 
You go on ahead. I'll hang around
One does not scream when I pack my meat into it.
Abasement.
He turns off his Xbox.
Don't worry, he'll tell you
A dill doe
Schwarzenegger has a big one, Michael J. Fox has a small one, Madonna doesn't have one, The POPE has one but doesn't use it, Clinton uses his all the time, Mickey Mouse has an unusual one, George Burns' was hot, Liberace NEVER used his on women, Jerry Seinfeld is very very proud of his, We never saw Lucy use Desi's what is it?
Give him sheet music
It's a real mind-blowing experience.
both can be solved with a coat hanger
That's a Moray.
So the other day I'm talking to a friend about what happened to the Energizer Bunny. It's been quite sometime since I've seen him appear in a commercial. I was always under the impression that he "kept going." My friend proceeds to tell me the Energizer Bunny was arrested last year ,and they charged him with battery. Now it all makes sense. 
He died falling off a watch tower
bye son
A subwoofer. 
Because it hurts and they deserve it
Because the grass tickles their balls. 
In one direction.
that's the porpoise.  (came up with this at work...i love a good pun)
I pity the stool!
It's called "Björn This Way".
Rodney King Pinatas 
He got the sack.
A certain number! One to actually perform the task, and the rest to act in a manner stereotypical of the group.
Drop some peas along the shore, and when a fish comes up to take a pea, you grab him.
He woks.
Not your cheese....
They were MAROONED!
Meat patty
One is a group of cunning runts. 
So they know what it is like to live with an irritating cunt. Zing!
A hobosexual
Bison!
How is the Quran like weed? Burning that shit will get you stoned.
A table can support itself
Why did little Timmy fall off his bike?  Because someone threw a canoe at him!!!
a three-year-old was resisting a rest
Because Ken comes in a different box.  Heyooooooo
I need a joke that involves the band The Cure ... Anyone know any (or can make one up)?
They're both grey.....................................well except for the apricot. 
It was a cycle-path.
A large pizza can feed a family of 4
Ginger Ale
The parrots-eat-em-all.
Koala Lumpur
Because a black widow has no husband.
The arts student gets a mark for it.
Nationalized wine.. Sounds like the right wing will have some whine too.
There are tumor down the street.
Abandonment. 
Two mothers-in-law.
A pick pocket snatches watches.
Take away their beds...
Because he's always Walken
Of course, there's  , but here goes mine:  ...and that, my liege, is how we know the Earth to be banana shaped.  This new learning amazes me, Sir Bedevere. Explain again how sheep's bladders may be employed to prevent earthquakes.
Wow, what a tewwific audience.
Somebody hid the welfare cheque in a work boot.
an impasta 
BY THE SHOWER OF GREYSKULL!!! I wrote this joke today. Feel free to steal it.
With a spirit level!
Great food, no atmosphere.
He could never get an angle. 
The engine stops whining after the plane lands.
Bukkake.
Abortions.
It's making my dick start to look like a rainbow.
I'm not Willie Nelson.
Because he couldn't mufasa!!!
Her son's dick tastes like blood.
The sex is the same but the dishes pile up.
After you throw a load in a washing machine it doesn't follow you around.
You wipe it off and say sorry.
Will do great in kitchen
Four guys are standing on a street corner. An American, a Russian, a Chinese man and an Israeli.  A reporter comes up and says "Excuse me... What's your opinion on the meat shortage?"  The American says: "What's a shortage?"  The Russian says "What's meat?"  The Chinese man says "What's an opinion?"  The Israeli says "What's excuse me"? (for even worse humor, come to   and mock my terrible art skills!)
They never came in contact.
the Polar Bear
The atmosphere.
So that they can say they liked it before it was cool.
A trampoline doesn't look adorable in a sailor outfit
He came back a husky fucker.
Madagascar, because all their ports are closed.
Christopher Walken
It was FANTASTIC.
Two Chinese men break into a Scottish Distillery.  One turns to the other and says "is it whisky?".  His accomplice turns to him and says "yes!  But not as whisky as wobbing a bank".
Drizzle
The Mediterranean Sea.  
they operate on black time! 2:00 appointment? pfft show up at 3:30 you'll be straight
Some weeeeeeeird shit, man.
WRONG! black people don't work you idiot
I don't have a corvette in my garage.
A rape victim. 
He worked it out with a pencil.
A velcrow Courtesy of Jokels.com: 
Nikki Menage a Troi  Courtesy of Jokels.com: 
Neither have they.
Because they can't elope.
Because if they flew over the bay they would be Bagels
He gets taller
pop culture
He couldn't finish the last movement.
Kitchen
No, they eat the fingers separately.
They eat all the tuna!!!
I only have one under my bed
Yes...yes it would...
Because they are a little meteor!
My butt Hz.
we have the Iron Giant
Carmen Sandy Eggo
Graaaiiins.
Klan Chowder
When I fuck my grandma up the ass she doesn't die.
He gets taller
Because an elephant will screw anything with a trunk in the front.  Thanks to a random guy outside of a 7/11. 
"Whib It" by Devo.
The pilot was a loaf of bread.
Because drawing a perfect circle is impossible. Also, he has Parkinson's disease.
69
He came out of the cupboard.
BBQ sause. 
When you have babies on purpose
The captain's dinghy.
Off-course, we are.
He was singing on the road again.
A chrysler   (Christler)
HIV
Dung!
Syndrome of a Down
"Damn this bitch is nasty!"
They say it's a Communist plot
The wheelchair!
Because everyone who runs, swims, or jump really well is already across the border. 
Diabetes. John has diabetes.
A: Because they held up a pair of pants.
A dumb bass.
It hasn't been tested on mice.
HE LET BISCOTTI HIT THE FLOOR
Because he needed a poo. 
Because of the sand, which is everywhere. 
They both fail big time when they hit the ice..
because they're ugly and they stink.
This was incredibly clever when I first thought of it but then I did some research...the closest they get to being Italian is that George Clooney was a "pioneer" for them: Reading that makes me never want to wear them again.
They are outstanding in their field.
They dry hump.
I was just looking for some good racially insensitive jokes for my friends. Gimme your worst, Reddit. 
A frog in a blender
...he just kept the tips.
Telling your parents that you're gay.
Concentration camp.
Law-suits
A hero
Cantaloupe.
They each got six months.
A liar.  Post your jokes you wouldn't tell your mother. 
3 in 1
They recovered 12,000 bodies.
None. PETA can't change anything.
Can I push your stool in?
Because they have big fingers.
there are some things r.kelly can't piss all over.
You go in as a Tight End and leave as a Wide Receiver.
DUUUUUuU
In case your other agus breaks. 
Yogurt has a live and thriving culture.
Without passion it's only cum!
Kitchen
Drowns.
His condition is stable.
Relative humidity!
Beer nuts are $1.29 a bag. Deer nuts are just under a buck.
They're both a lot of fun until your friends catch you.
Because your body's smokin ;)
I accidentally this joke the other day. Do you think it has potential? 
congrajulations Edit: do those who downvoted  know the real spelling of congratulations ?
There's nothing left
Dip it in ranch.
His surname
Immature ejaculation
Nigga, peas!
With-a matzah holes in it. 
An American plantation.
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . He wanted to reverse cowgirl.
Because there was a face off on the ice.
Seabiscuit could finish a race.
A small medium at large
because the children will be to lazy to steal.
Cancer
Suicide.
He wanted to reverse cowgirl.
Yeah he's all right now
Every time his wife gets hot, he smacks her with a shovel.
There's 20 of them! (I can't believe this isn't a repost.)
Christopher Walken!
Mouthwash
Bison.
If they are under 16 you should just do them in your head.
Wanna come back to my homepage and check out my floor plan?
They're not allowed to run in the halls.  
Satisfying
Because little boys can't get pregnant.
a dictator.
You stay up all night wondering if there is a dog.
I don't care if she has one or not.
Chalk to you later. 
A baby in a trash compactor.
Soulja Boy.
I don't know, but it's damn good at picking cotton.
His jokes weren't dairy funny.
The Iforgotto 
A carrot.
Baby, I'm sorry, but I can't be with someone who's as real as the Moon landing...
Two. One to change the lightbulb, and the other to hold the penis -- LADDER. I meant ladder.
they're pretty strong. You drink just one and you can't see straight.
Meincraft
There's twenty of them!
You make him run across Canada...
One's a leaker, one's a Le Car.
A marxman.
Barbecue sauce.
The wheelchair.
Emilio Incestevez
ba doom doom cha!
Passover.
Two thirty
Women's Sports.
He'd only masturbate before it was hard!
Is that FaceTime for blind people?
it doesn't need cleaned.
Just one, but they have to do it during dinner.
A serial killer.
AN ARITHMESTICK.
The priest caught him by the organ
The muslim sex-doll blows ITSELF up.
haaaayyyyy!
Because they steal all the green cards 
You choke the shit out of him
Never mind. It's too long.
A pit bull.
Because it was... imbalanced.
sea urchingine
A twang-bang
A small medium at large.
German soldiers like to march in the shade.
He was getting ahead of himself.
Me: Dunno Buddy: You ever try to open a grilled cheese sandwich?
Because it's too cold out tide.
"Pretentious? Moi?"
Little Caeser's
You can't gargle sand.
You can't gargle sand.
Princess Diana wouldn't be caught dead in a Volvo
A man....
Ex Lax.
La Cross
Douse it in gasoline and set it alight.
Respectacle
McRIP
He was so proud, he had it bronzed.
At least that dick had a stroke.   Thank you Hard times of RJ Berger
So you're the one.... (only if you answered "i don't know")
crust.
Well, I guess it was Kony a matter of time before he fucked up.
Divs within Divs within Divs ...
How do you make a space party? -You PLANet
doesn't work anymore, now they just yell at me "fuck off you homeless begger".
You can throw your load in a washing machine and it won't follow you around for two weeks afterward
A: Everyone is taking out their Paddy-o furniture.
Patty O'Furniture.
Everybody hates Pilipinos.
He wanders through life wondering if there is a dog
Have you ever tried pulling apart a grilled cheese sandwich?
None of them, they don't exist!
Soulja Boy
You guys are a bunch of assholes. 
Q: What did the samurai do when he was dishonored by his inability to complete the crossword puzzle? A: He committed ritual sudoku. 
A condom wasn't on my dick last night
Matt
A woman in her place...
She loved two Mennonite.
same time next month? (hopefully not a repost)
Because gingers don't have Souls.
Because they aren't PC
Both start out with lots of excitement, but then everyone is just relieved when its over
They both bore the fuck out of you.
You'd be too if you came every 10 minutes.
Because it doesn't take four years to learn how to make a sandwich.
The relationship was alright, but the make-up sex was amazing.
Gang rape.
A Helenkelicopter.
A Roman Catholic
-Parents
Cognac
mountain dew
He kept getting type cast.
He was already very familiar with loggin'  :D
He started to hear invoices in his head.
The Jaundice League
Take the F out of Free, and the F out of way and you'll have your answer.
Right before the tanks were full, he would pull out the nozzle and spray gas all over the car.
the customer wants the most bang for their buck.
one comes when children dream & the other dreams of children coming*.
Ex-stinky
One less drunk person.
He ch-ch-ch-ch-ch-changes.  (Sorry if repost)
Sorry...that was my fault. 
One of his fingers is clean
She couldn't keep her calves together.
When the big hand touches the little hand.
A Doctor you fucking racist.
Nothing. They were both stuck up bitches.
black and yellow
The double slit experiment.
So they have something to play with on christmas. -inappropriate, but i think its funny. 
Damn fuck shit screw you dickhead just one asshole twat cocksucker.
They're both terrible without cream.
Homeless
Inflamed 
Shit in her cunt.
They both leave little boys rooms with empty sacks.
He gets taller.
Getting tired of sandwich jokes before embarrassing oneself on one's first date.
Nah, I'm-a stay. 
A Tibetan monk on fire. 
You pay for the pizza.
I wouldn't shoot heroin.
Make me one with everything.
The pizza can feed a family of 4.
Everyone.
Chestnuts What do you have when there's balls on your chin? A dick in your mouth. 
The sementary.
the Leafs are out!
A Viberator
The can
He was looking for Finger Prince. (Say it out loud if you don't get it.)
What Is Difference Between Bomb And Condom.? In A Bomb Blast Population Decrease.. * But. . * In A Condom Blast Population Increase..!
Hives.
Because they deserve it
Nothing. Someone's losing a trailer either way.
'coz her pussy is hanging in the water!!
A rabbi. 
The wheelchair
The urge to crack open a cold one
The flavor gets stronger the closer you get to the butt.
Watching your parents fuck
A girls I work with claims to know them all and I need to win this :D
I guess she never saw the light. 
their biggest hits were both the wall
He thought breathing was too mainstream
Not march.
Ureapean / Urinepean.
So they can know how it feels to live with an irritating cunt! 
A: Because it was a little chicken on the inside.
A swallow.
Dr. Dre
A paragraph Cause he's to small to be an essé
The punchline is too long.
A tribe of pygmies is a bunch of cunning runts.
Giving the pope an errection
In hareplanes.
Wipe your bloody dick on her teddy bear. 
A PILOT you fucking racist!
He thought it was Coke!
Student: Why do we need to go to college? Teacher: So we can get a high paying job Student: Why do we need a high paying job Teacher: So we can get lots of money Student: Why do we need lots of money Teacher: So we can pay off our college loans
Anyone know of one? TIA
A: Your hair grows out in bangs.
He got hit by a bus!
Challah!
"Make that change" 
He's all right now.
"I shit you not."
You wait all day for one then find out 48 other people in the local area have been riding on her.
Two. One to screw it in and one to film it. One, but it takes him fifty tries.
It's not really work if you love who you do.
My nigger and I can paint him any color I want.
The club sandwich.
I love green 'cos it reminds me of blue.
Eskimo pi.
He found out he was actually 991 feet from the playground. 
She blows him out of the water
A Mack truck, because it already has a little dog on top.
One is a snack cracker and the other is a crack snacker.
The applause was quite raptor-ous!
His other attempts to get his dick wet didn't work.
Red hairing.
"stationary shop moves" - Jimmy Carr  "I keep my porno tapes in my sock drawer, it's all you need in one place" - Jason Manford
I   have a Porsche in my garage.
What kind of file do you need to turn a 8mm hole into a 40mm hole? A pedophile
He was charged with battery.
One causes a lot of pain and makes a constant high pitched whine. The other is a useful piece of medical equipment.
Eventually, you're going to put your tongue on both.
...he threw out the W's
Jews pick it before its ripe.
When we stopped having masturbation races.
After 10 years, the job still sucks. 
A fridge.
He was full of shit
Because it's worth it.
He had his raisins . . .
50 cent featuring Nickleback.
You cant fit a prostitute in a bowling ball
They both have cockpits.
They both spent a fortune making their noses more white.
He hated juice.
He always knew the final solution!
To the dump, to the dump, to the dump, dump, dump!
The.
The taste changes as you get closer to the butt.
It's not right, but it's OK 
Failing to get away.
Don't worry, I pull out.
A! (hands raised up)
Because blonde guys are stupid too! 
They love to watch mistakes being made.
What's the difference between a blonde and a mosquito? When you smack it, the mosquito stops sucking.
Because they all they ever say is Bach! Bach! Bach!
Fucked
About 204 days.
Houston, TX will once again reach 98 degrees. 
Her last one
cuz she couldn't find the door handle
Did you hear about the jewish guy that walked into a wall with a boner? He broke his nose.
100% chance of snow 
An horse.
My car can hit 50.
I can't jelly my dick up your ass.
Whitney Houston's crack pipe
At Winners.
11 years old.
Baby kangaroos.
My car can make it to 50.
They're both fun to watch tumble down stairs.
Say you're sorry, wipe him off, and run.
Sexy children.
A soviet rushin! (wackady shmackady doo)
Hawkward
Control+U
Pi-curious.
Police reports state that it was intense. One of my favorite jokes for a long time; great if asked seriously to people you know. Bonus Balloons! 
One plays hard rock, the other is rock hard.
Whitney Houston's Valentines Day Cards
My car can hit 50
A maid man.
Ring toss.
A gray and red hairy paste.
Or is it kinda like... Clap on, Clap off?
You can negotiate with a terrorist
Just one - you fucking bigot.
The Juan percent.
The orange has handlebars
Scratching at the lid of his coffin.
About 1 in every 500 or 600 million have a chance at becoming human.
she might give you herbees
Because there is no try. 
What does being questioned by interpol have in common with cunnilingus? One slip of the tongue and you're in the shit
It's a pretty obscure number, you've probably never heard of it...
Let's just say I'm buy-curious.
hopscotts.
Eleph-ino
His Condoms fit like a glove.
A Cyborger
One comes from Baghdad and the other ones comes from Dads bag.
Bucaneer
"Bison."
A Pooper Grouper!!!!!
Because whenever they hear the world "launch", they go get something to eat.
A well disguised orange!
Two bee stings What's worse than two bee stings? The Holocaust What's worse than the Holocaust? Three bee stings
in a hambulance.
He's running down the street with the bike under his arm.
Banging your head on the coffin lid.
He was polar.
A: Because it's Syria's business. (cross-post from   by request)
None.
Premature emasculation.
He took a bite before it was cool. 
...when it slips out.
Because it's as hard to get off as Alcatraz.
A bro job.
Because he was gay. 
Natural logs.
Because, I'm stronger then you are.
He worked it out with a pencil.
Tony.
A kidney dialysis machine.
To get to the other wife.
One's a crusty bus station... The other's a busty crustacean. 
Annette.
He went on furlong-er.
I know by times it's difficult to grasp foreign humour but please feel free to ask for clarification what we as French see funny.  To advanced learners it might serve as a confirmation and incite them to improve further.
Crabs on your organ.
"POOF!"
Because if it were invented anywhere else, it'd be called a teethbrush.
you get a handjob at the same time
50cent feat. Nickelback
Because she didn't have arms. 
A box office
Holy Sheet!
The Dear Reader.
...to get to the other side
Just wait and they'll tell you.
Jamaican Bacon...
So she could make money on the side.
Because they're shellfish!!!
A teabag.
She wasn't buckled in.
100. 1 to actually clean the shower, and 99 to stand around and talk about how filthy it is.
Tiger Woods had a better driver! 
Eeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeey, Eh?
You pick it up and suck its dick!
Because of the holes in his hands.
He has no clutch.
Oh, the huge-manatee
He had two acres.
Because they have to
Her teacher told her to do an essay. (ese)
Give him a bloody tampon and ask him what period its from.
GO CEILING!!! WHOOOHOOO!!!! YOUR NUMBER ONE!! YAY, CEILING RULES!!!
Take ze bra off.
I don't know either, I walked out early too.
pennetration.
the extroverted engineer looks at   shoes.
To try and make up for the Holocaust.
and what are the employees names?
There once was a fellow McSweeny  Who spilled some gin on his weenie Just to be couth  He added vermouth  Then slipped his girlfriend a martini 
Le Ouija
because he was outstanding in his field.
I don't know; they were speaking Spanish.
Congress
Stand in the middle of the street. If someone yells, "hey, get out of the street" you're in the US.  If they yell, "get out of the street, eh" you're in Canada
"It's driving me nuts!"
Because there were 6 million Jews waiting for him in hell.
When she pulls out the tampon, the cotton's been picked clean.
The vortex bottle
A Cranky-Doodle-Dandy!
A mouse going on vacation.
They're both filled with white trash. -&y
50 Cent featuring Nickelback.
Manga-nese!
they're both fucking close to water
When was the last time you saw a baseball team penalized for too many men on the field?
The lawyer can't guarantee to get you off. 
Connect the dots.
Because they appreciate the creativity and artistry of Ella Fitzgerald, and enjoy listening to her music..... while pooping on each other.
....because he picked Michael Jackson as his new assistant coach.
Uncle Ben's Perverted Rice
The hockey team showers after three periods.
How do you get an 80 year-old woman to yell "F*ck"? You get another 80 year-old woman next to her to yell "BINGO"
Two. One to screw it in, and one to shoot him if he does it wrong.
In the books and movies, the trolls didn't type.
Camping. Its in tents.
hey, hugh, get off of mccloud.
Because they're racists. (Race-ists)
You take the ' ' out of ' ', and the ' ' out of ' '.
What's 10 inches, has a big red head and makes my girlfriend cry when i put it in her mouth? Her miscarriage 
It's all over town.
It's pitiful.
He was always feeling cocky.
Immaculate Infection
Balzac
Rick O'Shay
...He wore a scarf before it was cool.
akjnveoajknoea
Make it sew number 1!
Great food but half an hour later, you are hungry for power.
Because air is free.
You won't get fucked if you drop SOPA.
Jose and Hose B
Two, One to hold the light and, one to drink until the room starts spinning!
Bait.
To remind black people that they picked cotton before they sold drugs.
Go to the north pole and dig a hole in the ice. Set some peas around the hole and when the polar bear comes to take a pea, you kick it in the  ice-hole.
Neither did he.
Kidnap his princess.
Graham-crackers... "wokka wokka"
a baby in a microwave.
...a Stick!
Coal-Ala
Not on January 18th.
Grass, I lied about the wheels.
Just Ants. Credit: My friend, the PUNisher.
Nail it's other hand to the floor.
Because they are two tired.
Nicosting!
Om and cheese Hamlets.
A pool table.
Just look for the fresh prints.
Don't talk to the guy in the middle, he's a dick
Son: Dad, is God man or a woman? Dad: His both, son. Son: Dad, is God black or white? Dad: His both, son. Son: Dad, is God good or bad? Dad: His both, son. Son: Dad, is God - Michael Jackson?
You take the "I" out of "thimble" and the "F" out of "way."
"GOP" is onomatopoeic: it's the sound of anonymous penetration in public bathrooms late at night. -&y
A ball point banana!
Not Reich now.
Synonym Toast Crunch
What did the Vietnamese architect say to the Chinese post man? CHING CHONG 
Wassabee?!?!
Well, the first one shoots and shoots and never hits... whilst the second one hoots and hoots, and never shits! (aaaaand queue the skyrim references in 3...2...1...)
nothing they just waved. 
It wooden move.
He holds the light-bulb over the socket and waits for the world to revolve around him.
An airplane! haha Wright brothers :-) I made this joke when I was in Junior high
Sleigher
It's   are all red and glossy.
You boil the Hell out of it.
The Captain's Log.
Failure to pull out in time
His parents were in a jam.
A swallow
It only takes one nail to hang an oil painting.
He was up all last night wondering if there is a cunt.
Jimmy Dean is sausage in the skillet, James Dean was hamburger on the road.
Fifty pounds and a flannel shirt.
Eh.
For giving arms to Iraq. 
He's only got those little legs. 
Gee I'm a tree!
A genealogist looks up your family tree. A gynecologist looks up your family bush.
Sure, a long as you don't get in the habit. 
Going inside and asking for a coat hanger.
Fuck you god damn shit cunt just one of us asshole bitch bastard!
Too many thank you notes to write afterwards.
Their wheelchairs
No? I just got it on vinyl
A handgun can't suck a dick.
Wanna race?
I lay down and you blow me to heavens!
The nintendo cartridge has steadily gotten more blowjobs since the 80s. 
It's ionic.
They both squirm when you eat them
They're huge blubbermouths.
A flap in the face. 
A squirrel with a nut having sex. Another squirrel sees her and asks: "Are you fucking crazy?" "No, I'm fucking nuts!"
Anybody Home? Yes, I am alone come in (house wife) Husband: WTF!  (who came early from the office)
Beating LSU once, Geaux Tigers!!!
“Thirty six thousand, twenty four thousand, thirty six thousand, wow!”
19 . Got a problem with that?
“Come behind the pyramid, I'll make you a mummy”
To get to the other side of the story.
For twenty bucks either'll take care of your toddler. -&y (yup, mine)
Because he uses the best ingredients.
A vaccation
When all the hot dogs taste like shit.
They're both usually found with beer and inbred. -&y (written by moi)
Americans don't get them.
Enough to kill two and a half men
I don't know - normally they screw in the casting director's hot tub
Luke warm.
They both smell it but they can't eat it.
Q: Why do little girls carry goldfish in their pockets? A: To smell like big girls.
I don't got shit.
Throw it on the ground and tamp on it.
Mountain Jew!
Redditation. I am so sorry... that was horrible.
They should have acted.
He didn't want to be mainstream.
I hear he got alittle behind in his work
Take away her blanket!
No, but a tin can.
He was too  .
WA-TAHHHHH! Edit:   and   are correct... Ninjas are silent killers. So, it should read: "What is Bruce Lee's favorite beverage."
a liquor closet
I knee'd it.
TREE O'clock!
See you next month.
None, no light bulb dare go out in the presence of Chuck Norris. 
A dumpster. LOLOLOLOL
Cell phones
Reaching around the front and thinking, just for a second, that's it's gone all the way through
Gay Pride.
He got a clit around the ear and a flap on the face.
"Let's do lunch."
He was stalin. 
A porcupine has the pricks on the outside.
"Brace yourself, Linda-Lou"
One is made of plastic and poses a suffocation hazard to small children. The other one contains newspapers.
A: The bucket.
Mine's 1920x1080.
The balls drop.
Second gear.
Nice tits!
Cancer. Happy new years folks!
Because she wasn't wearing her seat-belt.  Stay safe tonight everyone!
Everyone hates the black ones!
It's the only sport where you can shoot, steal and run!
There can only be Juan.
A fucking asshole.
‎"That fat, selfish faggot that chose the pension over saving our lives."
Pat
There is no lunch.
BA NA NA NA. BA NA NA NA.
When you pull out her tampon and all the cotton is picked.
Hee-Haw
Because it's waaay easier to swallow
A. A stick!
One is a bird watcher, and the other is a word botcher. 
It was all over town.
Paul christoforo
0 Hz
Behind the Maple Leafs' net.
The know-kn0thing party.
Paper-view
Four skindivers
Cause it keeps on Dublin and Dublin.
Half a dog!
The truck's fault. What was it doing in the kitchen?
Telling your parents you are gay.
Well I can't peanut butter my dick up ur ass.
About $100,000
Santa stops at 3 Ho's (sorry if it's a re-post)
You do all the work and the fat guy with the suit gets all the credit.
one is a crusty bus station.
The clamshell-shucker shucks between fits...
one has hope in her soul.
one shucks between fits.
It's Christmas, Eve!
"Something to wear would be nice" she said, "but in the colour black." "Why black?" I replied. "Because it makes people looks slimmer" She's going to be pissed off when she finds out I bought her a Darth Vader costume.
Corduroy.
It's not there. 
Snowballs.
Purrrjury
A blonde at a flashing red light.
Fa Drizzle
It has a Dark side, a Light side and it binds the galaxy together.
Kick his sister in the jaw.
The dishes, if she knows what's good for her.
Shelfish
Hi - mind if I push in your stool?
He worked it out with a pencil.
Best part of fucking 21 year olds? Theres 20 of them
Super-callous-fragile-mystic-hexed-with-halitosis 
Doctors Without Boners
Stalking stuffers.
Tell her a joke Wednesday.
A noyd.
Only 25...because there's Noel.
Because they're object oriented. 
A Lamb-orghini!
One is a bar room, and one is a Barooooooooooooom!
Because Rudolph is the only deer leader at Christmas.
_You'd look pretty funny riding a cow...but you'd look much worst milking a bike
Just one, but they get extra credits for it
An exam.
ROR! No one raugh in North Korea!
Guy runs into a bar in a panic. "Does anybody here own a five-foot penguin?" he yells. Everyone looks around and shakes their heads no. "Oh fuck" says the guy, "I think I just ran over a nun."
I guess that's the end of HIS Korea.
Santa must be taking his naughty list a tad seriously this year.
Because it is fiddly!
... because 
Sunday, because it's so holy.
They are basically the same except you do an Australian kiss down under.
A pool table.
Because she will squeal on you. 
Elvis Parsley
Someone who knocks on your door at 6 a.m. for no reason.
Little Johnny asks his mom "Can little girls have babies?" Little Johnny's mom looks puzzled and replies "Of course not." Little Johnny excitedly runs back to the window and yells to little Sally "It's OK! we can play that game again!"
A cock that sticks to roof of your mouth...
Only one more sleep until Christmas!
Because Ken always comes in a different box.
No peer pressure.
One less drunken Irishman 
The sweat that drops off your forehead while you're fucking your sister. What's the definition of endless love? Stevie Wonder and Ray Charles playing tennis.
Bro sure!
Once you’ve heard Juan, you’ve heard Jamal!
Force of Hobbit.
There is 20 of them!!!
Because he comes down the chimney. 
Hiyooooo Miyazaki.
Ellipsis S. Grant.
When you see your mother-in-law backing off a cliff in your brand new car. 
Never leave your buddy's behind.
Finally, an occupy movement that makes cents.
A cock block!
A little drunk.
I don't give a shit.
I don't know but Alaska 
Karate is a method of self defense and judo is what bagels are made of.
They chip their teeth.
-A widow.
Because they were caught mass debating in the bathroom.
a doberman
Out with Xeold, in with Xenu! :P
A turfucken.
I'm an avid racist and like to have plenty of denigrating jokes at the ready for any particular race. Sadly I know very few targeted at Caucasians, and the ones I do know make them look sorta good (rich, stable, part of ruling elite). Anybody know any jokes that poke fun at being white?
yo get off me, homes!
Wubbing one out.
Concentrated Juice.
Hebrews it
They vote.
When the big hand touches the little hand
Because it saw the salad dressing
Nothing... They've never met
An ephebophile
Me: Sorry boss, i can't come in today, i have a wee cough Boss: you have a wee cough? Me:Really?! thanks boss, see you next week!
Right where ya left him.
One makes your day, the other makes your hole weak
The Box Office.
The 7 dwarfs are a bunch of cunning runts...
Who cares?
A mother who has just given birth waits expectantly for the nurse to return so she can hold her baby. A few minutes pass, and the nurse enters with the baby in her hands. The nurse then drops the baby on the ground, stomps on it's head and kicks it out of the window. The mother starts screaming 'My baby, my baby!!' The nurse looks at the lady and says 'April Fools! He was already dead!'
So far, 400 bodies have been recovered.
Kermit's finger.
A vegetarian.
3 women are having a conversation about their sex lives. The first woman has been married 1 year. "My husband and I have 'house sex' because we do it anywhere in the house, any time." The second woman has been married 10 years. "We have 'bedroom sex' which is only in the bedroom after the kids have gone to sleep." The third woman has been married 30 years. "My husband and I have 'hallway sex'... We pass each other in the hallway and say 'screw you!'"
Eventually both will be nailed by a mexican
A creepy crawly!
Fo' Drizzle!
Because he had a javelin through his head.
I threw my old Ironing board out and have started using Katie Price instead. Her legs are easier to open.
Cause I don't wanna be specific
Ineptitut.
Yojimbo Wales! (Joke stolen from co-worker)
I found the rubberband!
0x809ACC0E!
Where ever you left it.
So they could play football on Saturday, go hunting on Sunday, and pick up garbage the rest of the week.
They both paralyze superman
It completely mist!
because he mufasa.
A belly button.
If they flew over the bay, they'd be called Baygulls.
cantaloupe... 
A: the Ben-gals
A Leek!
Because one egg is un oeuf.
The energy bill ...
Last I heard, she was three months stagnant.
"Nigiri, please."
two cannibals in a 69
Patty O'Furniture
never mind its too long
Occupational hazard. 
If they were any bigger their babies would get alcohol poisoning.
A: A hick-UP
A good time ruined by a period. 
He was found dead in the morning, drowned in his tee-pee.
the boomerang came back ='(
I feel so enlightninged!  
A liar. 
Because deep down they're good people.
Santa Claus rolling down a roof!
Because the hardware store clerk was a 300 pound flaming homosexual, and I was afraid to ask him for a screw 
Because they never leave a tip.
Beef Jerky
Jerry's Kids.
A: Russian 
Sprint to your room, grab all the dirty clothes you can, and start saving money on laundry.
It's called Thrown Games.
A: Boxing
One eventually turns white and stops stinking.
The Rolling Stones say "Hey! You! Get off of my cloud!" And a Scottsman says "Hey McLeod, get of me ewe!"
reruns
The German.
"That's sweet, ain't it?"
do you smell carrots?
Most of them don't work out.
2 squared!
"You stay here, I'll go on ahead...."
A maggot, of course!
We're both constantly penetrating your Mom.
I was standing in a bar and this little Chinese guy comes in and stands next to me. I said to him, "Do you know any of those martial arts things, like Kung-Fu, Karate or Ju-Jitsu?" He says "No. Why the fuck you ask me dat, is it coz I Chinees"? "No", I said, "It's because you're drinking my fucking beer you slanty eyed little prick".  
A small medium at-large?
Three sleeps 'till Christmas!
Taco crumbs
They have enough on their plate already.
A Jet-ski.
The codpiece he made out of his girlfriend's face.
It had concavities...
Because if they had 4 doors, they would be called chicken sedans...
It stops on a dime then picks it up.
because he was smoking quack!
A snow tire doesnt sing when you put chains on it.
Mine is, "My dick is so big that, at the movie theater, popcorn comes in small, medium, large and my dick."
there's no snow between the kitchen and the bedroom.
.... Trick question! There's no such thing as Nickelback fans. (I will be hated by few)
A cow to another: "Did you hear about that mad cow disease? Makes cows go completely insane!" The other cow: "Good thing I'm a helicopter!"
In a photo albumen...
He was too far out!
They both tried to run a country and died before finishing.
To get to the Occupy! EDIT: To get to the other side/Occupy?
Nine-Nine-Nine
It was rated PG-13, and he was only 11. Plus, he had no money, and his mother didn't want him watching movies like that. 
Noble rocks
everyone threw their hands in
rabbit farts
What do you say to piss off a redditor?
We saw that same joke two days ago
fünf (it helps if you say it out loud, and understand German) :-)
Chemistry teacher drew this during class.   Don't know how to type spoilers, but maybe rot13 will do. Vg'f n cnenqbk.
Because there's a perfectly good clock on the stove
Two wives.
So they won't whistle on the way down.
Warm milk before bed... Get your mind out of the gutter!
Om-bre
None, let the bitch do the ironing in the dark.
It was done in A minor.
So the attendees could get some face-time.
A lesbian with a hard on.
Give her a shovel.
Hit an Ethiopian in the head with a frying pan.
Having to sit in the back of the oven. (these do not reflect my personal views)
Why not Trape oidberg
Pizzas don't scream in the oven.
Having to go inside and ask for a coathanger.
100. One to actually clean it, and 99 to talk about how dirty it is.
They're both afraid of showers
Self-employed
Chee-zits I made this up.    Thank you, thank you...thank you so much.
National Stutterers Association. 
Philip Glass. (fill up glass)
me neither.
He types, "HALOL"
Reddit snow, reddit snow, reddit snow!
I hit that.
As long as i'm welcomed. Oh, that's too bad, you should at least stay for a cup of coffee
The refrigerator doesn't fart when you pull your meat out of it. 
Ones a cunning runt the other is a running cunt. 
You know, it's down by the Burger King... yeah yeah, right down there. I drove past earlier and there was a bunch of Native Americans all standing out front. Yeah I know right, there was a huge crowd of 'em out front, they wouldn't let them in. Turns out, they didn't have reservations.
...they've both had a Downey Jr. inside them.
A pilot , you racist dumbass...
She wanted to wash up on shore
The sign said "No Trespassing" (TRES-Passing)
Borders
It was bacon.
Knock knock Who's there? Daisy. Daisy who? DAISY ME ROLLIN, THEY HATIN
Two, but I don't know how they'll fit inside the bulb
You could always see him coming.
A man and a woman end up on a deserted island. He is desperate and cries:" oh, honey we're gonna die so young. Nobody will ever find us here!!!" She is very calm and relaxed. "Don't panic , dear, we'll be OK in few hours, I forgot to pay our VISA bill, the'll find us, don't worry"
John's dad is a Jew and his mom is a Gipsy. one day john asks his dad: what am I , a Jew or a Gipsy ?" dad: "why is that important to you?" John: "It's very important because Bob has a new bike and I don't know what to do: steal it or negotiate with him..."
They come from rape seed.
Well-hung.
His dick tastes like shit.
They always finish last.
Because no one man should have all that flour.
He was a vegetaryan.
It might take me awhile to get hard, I just got laid last night.
One woman brings you into this world crying and the other ensures you continue to do so.
Making them!!!
Cause she doesn't want a Dog thats more intelligent than her!
Herpeas.
an Entre"manure"   
I don't know, just some dude.
He gets there before the hair...
Why on earth would you do that?
A: Nothing - he'll just return it!
He knows where all the bad girls live
start with a big one
Phil
They've both got a dog fighting crime.
They can't find the right key and don't know when to come in.
... I don't have a new BMW in my garage.
Decaffeinated
A finite number! One member to perform the task, and the rest to behave in a manner stereotypical to the ethnicity in question.
Giffy Lube.
a quarter pounder with cheese.
A bakery.
The tea towel
I don't see the point
二
Telling your parents you're gay.
Pontius Pilates
'Collared Greens' 
A Hairy Reasoner. (Andy Rooney used to enjoy this one)
Nittany Lions
sorry this is only a four star hotel.
DENIM DENIM DENIM
The Army.
Zero. You can't fit a hairless ten-year-old inside a light bulb. 
Not enough minerals.
Swedish meatballs
They both circle Uranus searching for Klingons.
They both get stuck in camel toe.
kicked out of the petting zoo...
Horse.
He is first Barack president.
There's twenty of them!
The cold shoulder.
Tennish.
blipster
Reddish.
They were afraid of Stalin.
A: A reproductive organ. 
Metastasized.
for sour puss(ys)
At Sloan-Kettering the Mets always win.
One's fucking shit, and the other is a scat fetish. Just made it up, wondered how you guys thought it would be.
They both can't get to first base!
Because they're all tongue in cheek.
Ring her up and let her listen
El Paso
Gingerbread. Edit: This is more of an out-loud joke. So, maybe it'll help if it read: "Ginger-bred" instead.
They have to use TWO hands.
The ultrasound man.
Air bubbles.
The Hip Replacement Guy.
You see food and you eat it.
Congress
When a midget walks past and says your hair smells nice!
Boobies!
Because it was dead.
You root it ooot!
Give her a basketball and tell her to read it.
A: Lettuce pray
Wanna go ride bikes?
The Right Hand Rule.
Freak..
Donation. What's the best city in the world? Generosity.
Black people. (Slightly Racist I know)
It was in tents.
Only one... but it takes a shitload of light bulbs.
Because he can't curve his paw into a little fist
A finite number: one to perform the task and the remainder to act in a manner stereotypical of the group in question.
Salt.
A submarine filled with cum.
Reload and shoot again!
because they pump-kin
Because they have Hollow-Weinies
Because demons are a ghoul's best friend.
99 the rest were deaf.      Don't down vote me because it's bad, it was told to me by a girl in college. Edit, she was hot and deaf.
I mean he is a mouse himself, but maybe they like the concept?
It's based on darth vadar's holistic brother, Ayur Veder.
"Okay, but just the tip."
It was his significant udder
Because he was drinking it before it was cool
I don't cry when I chop up a Whore.
"You are my significant otter."
Because it's faster then C
Capricorn?  
two cannibals in a 69
...because 5 8 13!
He was buried (|Dead> + |Alive>) / sqrt(2)
Michael LumberJackson
Your granny
A crap happy chappy with a slap happy pappy.
Hush Puppies.
If I had as much dough as you, I wouldn't be hanging around this hole!
...and you should have seen the look on those little orphans' faces when they heard korn was coming!
because 2Y-14/3X=0
When you start them, they made the sound "runnnniganiganiganiga" Sorry for the racism, but had to share this. 
Muammar Gaddafi's sunglasses
So the theme for my   was "Puns" and everyone came dressed as a pun.  I sewed boxes of smarties to my pants (hardy har har).    arguably had the hardest one to guess.  Those are sprigs of thyme.  They're in white coats which have stethoscopes and an RX logo on them.  Can you guess what he was?   Two bonus pics in that album of my 'fancy party'...  the girl is my sister.  She was drinkin' Stella.  What was she?
Führenating.
The porbeagle. ¬_¬
A: Because it is 'scrum'-ptious. 
Someone whose career is in ruins.
..... When you don't use a condom.
So the one on the right could drive for a change.
Apparently they're to die for.
Zero to zero. Lobsters can't kick soccer balls.
Because they always want to be right.
Legolas
The second m is silent.
He really made a spectacle of himself
cancer got jobs. (too soon.)
A twix bar
It gives them an opportunity to  .
Because his mother was in a jam. 
Not much, but you can't help but crack a smile when see some tumbling down the stairs.
I cant jelly my dick in your mouth
I got no-eye deer !
Trying to look upset.
... Pack up and get the fuck out.
Better Blow-Job than No-Job !
A shh-kebab
Juan on Juan
Eric Clapton would   let a bag of cocaine fall out the window.
a slipper! I've been telling this corny ass joke around campus and everyone seems to like it haha. 
They don't believe in godmode
Why does beer go faster through you than milk? Unlike milk it doesn't have to change color. Why does Budweiser go faster through you than beer? Unlike beer it doesn't have to change taste.
They turned the economy into shit.
Because they are ugly and they stink !
Because it was a heavy sweater! 
"Spraint your ankle!" Just in case: 
They both fill little kids' cavities. Original by me.
'Cuz they're ugly and they stink!
Because royal jelly comes in handy... you know, for lowering cholesterol.  
FIND OUT NEXT TIME ON DRAGON BALL Z
... Stealing candy from a dead baby.  
Albert Einsteins cock
Take the "S" out of sub and the "F" out of way.
A: party poopers
He stays up all night, every night, wondering if there truly is a dog.
Denim Denim Denim.
It couldn't contain itself.
They're used to dealing with ripostes.
I didn't expose myself inside a guitar this morning.
They give him the willies.
weeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee,                                            I enjoy shouting this at work because I can use it to speed up production without having to sound like a total dick all the time.
One was planned.
He wanted to go down on history.
Chemo-flage
... Because it's not PC
TRICK QUESTION! Cars can't fit in the kitchen!
Pimples wait until you're thirteen before they come all over your face.
Everytime someone screams "get down! " they stand up and start dancing!
You shoot the guys pushing it.
I knew the market for Jobs was killing but.....
He went to the iCloud. (RIP Steve. You may disagree with him, but the fact the man died is tragic considering his contributions to computing.)
Both had blue periods.
You can't take a joke.
Spectral emissions.
Get thee to a nyanery!
Mary Clancy goes up to Father O'Grady after his Sunday morning service, and she's in tears. He says, 'So what's bothering you, Mary my dear?' She says, 'Oh, Father, I've got terrible news. My husband passed away last night.' The priest says, 'Oh, Mary, that's terrible. Tell me, Mary, did he have any last requests?' She says, 'That he did, Father.' The priest says, 'What did he ask, Mary?' She says, 'He said, Please Mary, put down that damn gun.....'
TicTac
Scrambled eggs =p
A brothel sprout
They take the psycho path.
Unimaize
He was down in the dumps.
A: Cancer.
With a shat nav.
Pumpkin
Pay for the pizza.
Because they were trespassing!
Kermit's finger
Because they are really good at it.
32
The correct answer is "Africa". You have a very dirty mind!
His shavings account.
Whoa.
It's two cubed! :) 
A. Nobody knows, there's no light.
an average of 22 jokes a day. this is a fucking joke
You put the female in first, and the male will walk in and close the door. (As told by my Materials Science professor)
The ocean.
To study a broad
There's no 'f' in way
It's Naan of your business.
Pier pressure
Space heater.
You Barium.
She wasn't wearing her seat belt.
I dunno, I was too busy masturbating...
Leave my provolone!
A 6-pack and a potato.
Patio Furniture.
Because "pot holder" was already taken.  
One that kant be repeated. 
He had a ruff week.. His life wasn't purrfect. His brother was a shellout. His mother's been a real crab lately. His family was really shellfish. He had no porpoise in life.
Poo
One guy threw down his hand and another laughed his head off. This was my best friend's favorite joke when she was little apparently.
A Smokealottapottapus.
You enjoy both more as an adult if they aren't forced on you as a child.
Fucking morons; they could have stolen two motocycles!
Told him to kill his neighbor's dog, in Spanish. 
 = "ARRGGHH"   (R) Your response =  (in a pirate voice of course) "You'd think it'd be the ARRGGHH but it actually be the SEA!!! (C)
the 5k fun run, or the 100 meter dash?
because it is two-tyred.
PG-13!
Beatrix
Circuit training.
Slap a nipple on it.
L'oueftwaffe.
A punchline.
A BooBee.
To see what was on the other side.
How many libertarians does it take to screw in a light-bulb? None. The market will take care of it.
Because he's always getting hung up on the boards.
Diabetes. Jimmy has diabetes.
He vanished with a puff!
Ma Caroni! (my crony)
YEP! Chuck Testa!
Nope. Chuck Testa.
Ragtime
Sparkie.
I don't have sex with the sandwich before I eat it !
Contraception.
Keep the tip.
The Nobel Prize in Genetics.
So that it can be used as an   
He pulled his hamstring!
Get in the Karma. 
The Financial Times crossword puzzle
Yeah - sometimes I can have sex without promising to do the dishes afterwards.
"Peephole salesman!"
Gary Glitters boots.
I'm talking the jokes that you find insanely hilarious, and everyone else just either groans or stares blankly when you tell it. I'll start.  'Been teaching hobbits how to play cricket. Bilbo's good at catching, but he can't really Frodo.' Every. Fucking. Time. 
Sit down and beg There are a million answers to this. Come on reddit, make my day better.
.....Add your laundry.
it was intense
He touched the stove before it was cool...
Heard she was a real hooker.
My hairline!
A husband in a book store. Do You have a book called, "Husband, the master of Wife ?"  Sales Girl : Sir, Fantasy and Comic section is on the 1st floor:D :D
A Bipolar Bear
because he likes his buns fresh from the oven.
a poop
Damm, we do taste like chicken!
They were both catchers for the Padres.
This guy goes to his doctor for a full physical.. He takes his pants off and the doctor notices he has 5 dicks, the doc yells "holy shit! you have 5 dicks! that's incredible! how do your pants fit!?" and the dude says "like a glove."
That's what its like to fuck a 90 year old
Ha-lol.
'Cause mad cow was taken
It's all ovum now
So he has a hot one instead.
... being awake.
It was intense.
You stop milking the cow after ten years.
Bach!
Because he had a wee cough
¿Como se llama?
Doctor: I'm trying to examine you.
Grass, I lied about the wheels...
A penis.
Not everyone has been in an Airbus A380.
He was into lightbulbs before they were cool.
The man I really need a counter joke for that one 
Two. 1 to screw it in, and one to suck my cock.
Churchitoes
One slip of the tongue and you're in deep shit.
25 letters after a, brah.
In golf one bad hole won't kill you.
1, but it takes 6 episodes.
I'm sorry.
A: All of them! ARRRRGHHHH FUCK YOU POPSICLE STICK JOKE
Na.
One's really fun to smash with a sledge-hammer and the other is just a watermelon
DAM!!!
Because they were both stuck-up cunts.
Getting out of the bed!
An addadicktome.
a BA-BOOM!
the taste
Gang rape.
dinosore  
Because it scares the shit out of the dog.
Fission chips.
FRIEND TE IK punjabi FRIEND mein kya farak hai ? Frnd--- i m sorry.. Punjabi frnd-- Teri galti aa salya. Frnd- i missed u punjabifrnd- kithe mar gaya c Frnd- i m happy 4 ur success punjabi frnd- chal party de hotel ch nai ta daroo challo Frnd- plzzzz drive slowly&safely punjabi frnd- gaddi bhja salya agge swift ch kida sohna purja baitha hai.. Frnd- i love dat girl... punjabi frnd- izzat nal dekho kutteyo oho tuhadi bhabhi hai :D :D
she wasnt wearing her seatbelt....
It's such an ovary action.
They both come in little white crackers
They can smell it but they can't eat it.
Every time the hear the word hoedown they think their sister's been shot.
A pocket full of shells.
Unfortunate. 
Nice belt.
Come on Eileen.
She had no periods!
No Jobs
They're a-Brew'in!
They blow the whole east coast and there's videos online. 
A HERPA filter
Until it croaks...
BA-NA-NA-NAAA!!!!! (to the tune of Beethoven's 5th symphony)
Can I push your stool in? I just wanted to note that my ten year old brother told me this joke.ಠ_ಠ
NdubZ
Because of his stable condition.
They've got no sole. 
Procrastination!
Napoleon BonaPARTAY!!!
A spelling bee. Credit goes to a cheesestick wrapper!
A few strokes and there's no going back. 
Probably not. He's pretty underground.
Tsunami Warning
They were too far out.
Because they don't understand how to use Logic or Reason.
Just Cause
In a circle.
There was a fault in Washington. It was Obama's!
Yarrrrrsync!
Lean Beef
Over-dressed!
Haydn seek.
Because it's always Jalopeño business.
He's all right!
You fuck her.
Cum in her shoes and let the flies do the rest. 
Ya gotta hand it to her...
All of your rice is gone, your computer is fixed, and the mother fucker is  still trying to back out of the driveway.
Cancer.
"Nice pits."
Ground beef.
Subordinate Clauses
He was undercover.
Jews.
He was changing the lightbulb before it was cool. [rimshot]
He gave her arse a nick. Probably doesn't translate well into American English but there you go. My dad told me this joke over twenty years ago. He said he'd heard Peter Sellers tell it on a street corner. Don't ask me why Peter Sellers was telling jokes on a street corner. Must have been bored or something.
A: God gave him his gas bill.
A pool table.
A crime fighter.
Eh never mind, it'll go over your head.
A pilot, you racist.
A Union Jack.
Patio Furniture! I got this joke from a great collection of cheezy jokes 
Because the jungle is massive!
Batman can go to the store with out robin.
A bucket.
Your head.
There's forty of them.
Cancer.
A: Oranges.
Birds of Pray
The Islands
Three... The one on the left The one on the right  And of course, the Final Front Ear
A computer only has to have information punched into it once.
A: Change?
Sneakers.
They're both purple except the elephant.
Pu
Lack-toes Intolerance.
I'll be dammed.
The five year old boy in my basement. 
The unemployment line.
A short woman trying like hell.
A stick!
Crib death.
Only one retarded thing has come out of her vagina
Your last blowjob. 
A: YOU DON'T KNOW, MAN, YOU WEREN'T THERE!!! YOU DON'T KNOW!!!
Steal a chicken
A Tribble with troubles.
What does Batman say when he goes down on a woman? To the bat cave!
From what I hear, she mostly plays Nintendo games. So, would you call this proper use of the royal Wii?
Spic-spic-spic-CHINK-nigga-nigga-nigga-spic-spic-spic-CHINK-nigga-nigga-nigga (say out loud at your own risk)
Because mr mantis ate my skunk food.
She was a business anal-ist.
Use LED based paint.
You just did!
Seven years old.
It was missing a tire. 
A barbie queue.
he already had super-vision.
Sweethaert. (an old one but still very very good)
From the looks of it, your dad won
Guilty.
All she came back with was a red snapper.
I forgot how it goes, can someone please tell me???  It was about 3 doctors, a German, Russia (?), and American. They were all bragging about who is more advance. I'm pretty sure it was a racist joke. (fairly certain it was)  Anyone heard it? It's killing me that I can't remember it D:
Overcome
To the Eagles, they can get corner-backs.
HADOUKEN!!!
Neither, they're both stuck up cunts!
NaBrO
Brenda.
They needed a developer.
You would think its R, but but it's really the C!
A bulldozer.
The browneye. You'll have to guess why its bleeding.
A Solliloqueef
At least if you leave yogurt alone for a while it develops a culture.
My ass.
A wish Liszt.
there's a perfectly good one on the stove
An irrelephant.
Get off me dad your crushing my smokes!
Before 1928, neither could vote.
It was intense.
She was a right Jack off all trades.
A: A back-handed compliment.
a towel
One. She just holds it up there and waits for the world to revolve around her.
Because he ate pizza before it was cool.
His hands were tied.
He will be singing "Candle Under the Spoon".
Its to far to walk.
Are you Chris Chen?  No, I'm Daniel Hsu.  Do you think all Asians look alike or something?  No, I mean, do you believe in Jesus?
Too many cheetahs!!!!
Damn, I'm gonna go bankrupt.
Person 2: No? Person 1: Me Neither. Person 1: You didnt get it? Person 2: No Person 1: Me neither
Two hydrogen atoms walk into a bar. One turns to the other and says, "I think I've lost my electron." The other asks, "Are you sure?" "Yes," the first says, "I'm positive."
It looks like a colon!
No, seriously. How could they tell?
Larkspur has a ferry terminal, San Francisco has terminal fairies.
Facebook invited Google+ to his wedding.  Google+ asked 'do you mind if i bring a +1?'  Facebook said 'If you Like.'      Then Twitter flew by, said a bunch of shit nobody cared about, and shit all over my TV screen.
Grass, I lied about the wheels.
There's Norway i would sink Oslo as to think of a joke for that.
He was a brave fucker.
Because their hips stir.
Parcel-tongue
It's called "Sweet Emulsion"
Muzzles off!
AUDI ADUI ADUI!
They aren't attracted to moth balls.
Its pretty gay, just Saiyan.
A cock that doesn't come.
After that, he was a real tan gent.
"I'm not Willie Nelson."                                        — David Sadaris
They were unaware the lightbulb was an issue & regret unknowingly paying to change it
One dead baby nailed to ten trees.
LeBron James
July
Cancer.
A baby in a trash compactor.
Parlia-mints
By the "M" on his pajamas.
Because he wanted to get a-po-ta-to clock.  to make joke more apparent
Depends....
Banging your head on the coffin lid. 
A brunette with bad breath
Thank you, Mr. and Mrs. Ball!
Cuz if it were lying down it wouldnt make any sense. (first post to reddit, made up this joke today .. be kind)
Na
Because he has nothing to look forward to 
Because all the good ones Argon.
Put it in the oven till it's Bill Withers.
Because she Gives you a blowjobs even when she's dead.
St. Petri Dish.
Faebook.
They're robots in da skies.
Not Yeti
Dont worry, they'll tell you.
Would you like to buy some candy?
Where to sir?
You turn off your playstation.
It'd be a waste of time.
Kitchen Stadium
Because he's a fun guy.
I do queries. 
Because they never get out of their shell 
Because he'll peek-at-chu!
But I don't have a .........oooooh.
An ethiopian's asshole.
He broke his ankle when he fell into the sink.
She danced on one leg and then the other, but she made her living between the two of them.
The Queen Bean.   *Blatantly stolen from Ren & Stimpy
He disappeared with a poof. 
They both live underground. Except for the eagle.
Tweet!
They're both cheesy.
What time does a duck wake up in the morning? -At the quack of dawn!!! A duck walks into a bar and orders a drink. then tells the bartender: -just put it on my bill!!!! What's a duck's favorite snack? -Cheese and quackers!!! What did the duck say after hearing one of my hilarious jokes? -HAHAHAHA you quack me up!!!! What do you call a crazy duck? -a quackpot!!! And one to go on... What does a duck by at the DVD store? -DVDs!!!!
"Man this music sucks..."
brass.
Sharp pounding sensation in your ass. 
The punchline is more of a visual joke, based upon where the reader places the "s."  To my knowledge, this is an original joke.
There are too many Links.
News report I saw this morning describing horrible injuries to Dr. Stephen Hawking like a broken jaw, damaged collarbone, smashed kneecaps... Apparently his date last night stood him up.
Mascarpone!
Justin, I'm a big fan.  wheyyyyyyyyyyyy
Because it had postage dew.
Camembert!
Bingo.
Two test tickles.
Because he stopped cheating 
A-Flat-Minor
Facial muscles.
A Jew-niper
Because they fight knights!
They are WAY better than The Cure.
The harder you hit 'em, the more english they pick up.
No. You are exactly right.
A woman.
Angry heifers.
The one where I had my meat all up on your grill?!?!?!
A: Enough to reinforce my negative stereotype about them.
A dry martinez.
They have to smell it but they can't taste it!
ME-OW! I am very sorry. Just thought of it and felt like everyone should hear it. Maybe some jokes are better left untold...
Kindling. 
"F", for Fonzi. Duh.
He got the cold shoulder
homo-goblin
Derpentine.
Cus it was being stalked! 
A flea's blanket.
I work with a guy who moved to Vermont from Hawaii. He likes to start with people but also has people who like him. Those people always ask about him..."How is he?", "Does he still work here?" My joke is in response to those two questions. (His name) is the reason Japan attacked Pearl Harbor. Evidently they missed. Yeah, he likes to create things like world wars. I'm not racist, I just don't like him. 
Because he has Ayyyds.
Bye Son (Bison)
They both have gold teeth and say "yo ho!"
he didn't want to show up for the finals
put a steering wheel in front of them
The taste.
It runs on ARM.
Nothing it just waved
It only vibrates, it doesn't have a ring.
A pool table
Cats.
I asked Dirk for change for a dollar; he gave me 4 quarters and a dime.   He always gives any extra 10%.
Some obscure number... you've probably never heard of it.....
He said "Sure!  I could loan some Dove".
...iRacky.
... and I'm fucking him, and I'm fucking him ... ... and I'm fucking him ... ... and then I reach around, and he's  . And I'm like  I like to tell that one whenever the conversation stops at a party.
None.  Obama voters are obviously too lazy to work at anything, so they just HOPE for the lightbulb to CHANGE.
A pontificrater.
The best ones squirt when you eat them!
Lebron James doesnt give you 4 quarters.
Kurds in the way
With a tuba glue!
Piña Colada!
He wanted to get a long little doggy!
Son: Daddy, what does a vagina look like? Dad: Before or after sex son? Son: Before, I guess... Dad: It looks like a beautiful tulip. Son: Well what does it look like after sex? Dad: Ever seen a bulldog try to eat mayonnaise?
It doesn't matter, they will never change a thing.
Whale-done :)
Two. One to change the light bulb and another to hold the penis...I mean ladder.
He built his empire from the ground up. Ground up meat. 
My friend and I had a habit of mum jokes duelling and putting standard 'yo mumma' to shame. All to the spirit of pushing the boundary. One point I came up with this: 'Your mum so loose, when you were born, it felt so good that she used you as a dildo and pushed you right back in.' Anyone else has other gems of properly offensive mum jokes?
Dan Quayle wrote this joke.
Africa.
Legolass
What's a pirate's favorite letter? the C!
Big fingers!!!
Cause if you take one, he'll drink all your beer
He made Jews.
Delta blues.
Because nothing is greater than chesse.
Discus
aaaarrrrrrrr/jokes
It goes well aslong as you don't look down.
They'll freak out when they hear a helicopter
Still counting.  Those darned birds can't seem to cross the road to get over here to screw in the light bulb.
Dogwood. Don't you dare judge me, it was on my popsicle stick.  :P
Babies, because you can use a pitchfork.
Creddit!!!!
Someone didn't pull it out in time.
I'm not allowed to tell you
Peacunts
Cancer
The punchline is too long.
Drop your catheter bag.
neither one can get you off
AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE AMELIE 
It's an Allegory.
He was out standing in his field. 
If you slap a mosquito it will stop sucking! 
Half of them don't work and the ones that do aren't that bright
It's impossible to reach the pedals whilst sitting Indian style
Telling your parents you're gay.
... they blow themselves up.
Cottage chi
Because he always felt defeat.
A roll model.
Because he kept running out of the pen...
What's the difference between oranges?
Apricots. I used to love this joke when I was a little kid and told it over and over.  I'm still a little in love with it for that reason.  What are some of your favorite jokes from when you were a little kid?
-Palm sunday
Because there's Targets around every corner.
Because it's in-bread. 
In Romania we had something similar, our girls on their undies had January, February....
Because they're all tied up, but coming soon.
You gotta stand at the back of the oven! Edit: I was at an [7] when typing this and fucked it up. It is better now. oven was bus. Changed bus to oven. 
Because there's pubes on their heads.
Christopher Walken.
I always enjoy jokes that have gone out of date, either because their subject has passed out of the public consciousness or because they reference things that are no longer accurate.   I'll get you started: What's got three legs and lives on a farm? The Mccartneys
An elephant! edit: maybe I should say what is gray and cums in pints?
Just enough to hold it's pecker up...
O(b-s)ma
They could easily fit another set of tits in there.
Hey I didn't know we were pouring concrete today.
they are both fucking immature assholes...
We're not sandwiches.
i don't really have any favorites, just looking to hear some... like what do you call a guy with a shovel?  doug.
I need a good joke for my T shirt design for my Anatomy class. Anyone have any good jokes. thanks (school apprpriate please)
Because he was looking for a tight seal!
Me: "Hey, how much does a polar bear weights?" Her: o.O "Wut...idk" Me: "Enough to break the ice, I'm NuComer, how you doing?"
I have crabs.
Sony Playstation 3
I heard that he was fully re-covered.
A: May I push in your stool?
"Wanna hear a pizza joke?" "Nevermind, it's too cheesy."
I hear he's all right now.
Their middle name.
They wanted to beat the crowd.
No? In that case, do you want to go camping this weekend?
They're really making headlines.
Because they're raster graphic images.
Making them!
his wife died.
He worked it out with a pencil. 
They don't remember when you smack the ever living shit out of them.
the unemployment line.
See you next period.
Dam!
get off the merry-go-round! :)
Baked beans.
My sister's birthday is today, and I'm looking for a good one to call her with.
Which bird symbolizes great wisdom? The owl, of course. Which bird symbolizes bravery and freedom? Most of us know it's the eagle. What type of bird symbolizes love? That would be a dove. Now, what kind bird symbolizes absolute, true love? The Swallow!
At the end, they get a bag of chips and a Coke. -My dad told me this joke when we went to a race-
Stroke Victims.
Nah, I'm a stay. (namaste)
...an embroyo! heyooooooooo
It ran out of cache.
You have to get ahead of lettuce! Ahahahahaha!
Dress her up as an Altar Boy
For Drizzle.
cuntaminated 
If you could stay up for 24 hours straight :3
Womb tempertaure
Meeeeeeeeeeeeeee!
1) The check's in the mail 2) I won't cum in your mouth
A BIG YELLOW ROCK-EATER!!
the Chau-fuhrer
51, one to change the bulb and 50 more to stand in a circle chanting "Death To (insert name of your local electricity provider)". When I lived in Nashville it was NES, in Louisville it was LG&E, now it is Austin Energy. But you get the idea, if not the joke. 
Four.  O, double-u and e. 
a washing machine doesn't follow you around for a week after you put a load in it..
I don't know how, but it must happen!  Edit: I actually want a joke that includes Liz   the Pop King. My use of ' / ' may have been misleading. Thank you. 
I do.
They're of the proper minimum age of sexual consent in 100% of the world and you are both mature adults enjoying a socially accepted bond together. Now quit telling this fucking joke.
Pink.
They only change their pads after the third period.
None, we just swap out your whole house
"ggggkkk" huh...kinda hard to tell this joke in text.
A real mess on your hands.
A Sioux Flay
A tsunami doesn't care that you are faster than your buddy.
Like Napoleon Bonerparte and Eat. Pray. Boner.... Even Barack Oboner and Alec Baldboner and Teenage Mutant Ninja Boners and iBoner and Its a Wonderful Boner and Casaboner South Boner The Boner Runs Wild A Thousand Tiny Boners Wet Hot American Boner...  check 
Nothing.
Because if you don't, Chernobyl fall out!
An x-man.
The big hand touches the little hand.
Sir Cumference. Why was he so fat?  He ate too much pie. 
Parabolems?
Nothing, penguins live in the south pole and polar bears live in the north pole. TROLOLOLOL
so he could flip the bird
Because of all the metal in their brains.
A three-year-old boy was examining his testicles while taking a bath. 'Mom', he asked, 'Are these my brains?' 'Not yet!' she replied!
Because they're shellfish.
Eggcalibur. 
We've had Bad Joke threads, Offensive Joke threads, Blonde Joke threads, etc.   What's a good joke I can tell an 8-year-old boy that he can tell at school, and not get sent to the office?   And please, can we leave off the "Nacho Cheese", and the "Bear wiped his bum with the rabbit" ones?
Give her a shovel.
His personality.
Enough to kill two and a half men.
I don't know, by then I ran.
The drummer is drooling out of   sides of his mouth.
Enough to kill two and a half men.
Take off the pizza delivery sign. 
wanna go to lunch?
so your asshole doesn't slam shut
Pay him for the pizza.
Homeless.
A: The defendant.
We call them to take us in. (From The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Handbook of Conundrums, by Edith B. Ordway. So this is a century old joke.)
Concentration camp.
Tell him that Asylum Seekers are the natural predators of Paedophiles.
I'll give you two fives for a ten.
Big shoes.
Trees don't bleed when you cut their limbs off. 
Civil Rights. For Anyone.
A hot air baboon!
You can't beat bacon....!
30 IQ points.  This, as any carpenter will tell you, isn't a joke.  
Open sores.
Nothing.
 posted this 6 months ago, but I just watched that episode of Party Down where Ron says it. I googled the joke but   was the first on the list and no one had a decent answer. Come on, punchlines!!!
A dumb terminal
Blackmail. 
you'd have to sit in your own pew.
A fridge doesn't fart when you take out the meat.
A baby with slashed floaties.  What's red and yellow and floats on top of the pool? Floaties with a slashed baby.
Pick him up and suck his dick. 
an addadicktomy.
(if you thought because you can't drop it, guess again) Because it takes longer to pick up. 
"Men, get on the boat."
If a Rottweiler starts humping your leg you let it finish.
a woman kneeling in prayer has hope in her soul.
Pygmies are cunning runts.
Kermit's undivided
none, PETA can't change anything.
The ultra-sound guy.  Who takes over when hes on holiday?  The hip-replacement guy
Tulips on an organ.
A rooster says cock-a-doodle-do and a whore says any-cock'll-do
you barium
A dead epileptic.  
Well, nothing yet.
MOO-barak!
Either way someone's going to lose a trailer.
denim denim denim (pronounced with the Mario underground theme)
Tooth-hurty.
He lost the huile d'olive.
Ventriloquists have to be able to speak with their mouths closed.  Politicians speak out of both sides of their mouths simultaneously.
Non-Friction
Doesn't really matter it won't come anyway
They advance to the finals against Tunisia.
"YOU get a father, and YOU get a father, and YOU get a father!  Everybody gets a father!!!
You: What is the secret... Timing
Would be nice if you guys could help out: Here's something to warm you up: Yo mama so ugly she looked out the window and got arrested for mooning.
The Rolling Stones song says "Hey you, get off of my cloud".  A Scotsman says "Hey McCloud, get off of my Ewe".
Having to tell your friend his kids should get tested.
If you don't nail her good she'll be at the neighbors.
E=MCHammer... you know what just down vote I don't care any more.   I'm fed up being gay!
I have some clients in real estate that I'll be seeing soon.  Can you give me a list of jokes I could use on them?  Something like, "What did one home for sale say to the other?"
I don't know but she'll never make as much as a man AND SHE KNOWS IT!
...The Judge threw out the case because she didn't have a leg to stand on.
If you slick her hair back, she looks like an 8 year old boy.
I'm not cumming in this morning!
You can't Peanut Butter a dick up your ass. 
4 out of 3 people have trouble with fractions. There are 3 kinds of people. Those who can count and those who can't. There are 10 types of people who understand binary. Those who do and those who don't. There are (undefined) number of people who understand dividing by zero. More?
A moose knuckle
Take it out of the freezer and run it through a bandsaw.
Just Juan. 
Inspection.
Because:      25 DEC == 31 OCT Merry Christmas Fellow Nerds! :)
(shrugs shoulders) Depends.
Osteoporosis
It lacked porpoise.
she have an answer for everything
It's all about fitting the long piece in just right...
A fly's teeny weenie.
Reddit is slow as fuck
A compooter. 8D
Because it was charged with battery. Thank you, I'll be here all night... Finals week needs to end.
Little Seizures
But our friends -  creative designers and developers - know what to do! You just need to press RED button and voice form Abyss of Internet will ask the most popular question in such situations…And you will feel better…for sure… check for: whyyyyyyyyyyyyyy com
In the olfactory.
Because cheetahs are faster.
"HOW ARE WE SUPPOSED TO FIND OUR WAY THROUGH THIS SHIT?"
It was sweepy. ಠ_ಠ
Because it is two tired.
He heard the place was crawling with pussy.
Stephen Talking.
An iPad.
One, but it will take 13 attempts.
I FOUND MY MICROSCOPE, now all I need is my lotion and tweezers
None.  Punks never changed anything.
They don't bother, you can find lutfisk in the dark.
A McRib
Why do turkeys always gobble? They haven’t been taught good table manners!
Because then Dallas would want one too.
God really liked it so he put rings on it.
So blind people can hate them, too.
The Marin-era
When pink is blocked by red, you hit the brown.
Fo' Drizzle!
Two. One to change the bulb and one to sing about how grand the old bulb was.
He's alright, though. 
He got chirpes, and the bad news is...it's untweetable.
A girl who can run faster than her brothers.
Fo Drizzle.
B 52.
Anyone else got some fun jokes your kids have told you?
Turn off the Playstation.
right where you left it.
Neither of them are gonna choke.
No? That's what she said.
You get your palm red.
Because they're white.
Because gunpowder is black.
Teacher's aides
Because ah, the egg roll.
No? Remind me not to give you a letter to mail.
Because they can Pump-Kin
Sock puppets.
Because you can't make an omelette without killing a few chicks.
The big hand touches the little hand.
The elephant of surprise. :)
One's a plucked pheasant, and I don't remember how it ends, but your mother's a whore.
A: She fits into your wife's clothes.
Patty O'Furniture !
It made sense.
His actions are incendiary.
Because they led to stronger and addictive computers.
because she is moaning with the other.
Babies, because you can use a pitchfork.
Names
Three degrees, four tops
'What's up my ass, Batman?'
A large cheese pizza can feed a family of four.
A drummer.
They both get to smell it, but they can't eat it.
He was looking for Pooh.
They're two-tired.
He works in a manhole. 
He asked if he could buy an I.
they get all over the sheets.
The Republican party.
I've created a muenster. I know, I know, it was cheesy joke.
Just one.  She holds it while the world revolves around her.
A: You probably wouldn't know, it's some really obscure number...
Mrs. Pacman. For 25 cents she'll swallow balls until she dies.
Because they don't like Dicks.
A: Fish.
It doesn't come out for awhile... What are some other good jokes that start off as stories? Ex: You hear about that actress that stabbed that guy recently. Reese something, ummmm. your friend: Witherspoon? you: No, with her knife ZINNNNG!
because she had Supercalifrajilistic Osteoporosis
They says that they don't give cows a square meal.
Spiiting and swallowing.
foot gagnant, gagner argent, gagner cadeaux, instant gagnant, gagner cadeaux foot, football, instant foot, jeu gratuit, nouveau design, instants gagnants, cash, audiotel, gagner euros, appel gagnant, gagner du cash
A wet nose.
Bacon
It's a pretty obscure number. You probably haven't heard of it.
a BROFL
my pen is
Shoot the first one.
The one with the wee calf.
A good start.
I recently found this sub reddit and thought it would be a great place to come and find some funny jokes( yep no joke). I noticed however that most of the front page is this newdailyjoke.com website and 9/10 of them are god awful. Does anyone else feel this way or is it just me? How have so many of these made the front page? 
Dennays
Your Mums a slut!
A lunatic! (luna-tick)
 He did it for the 
A: Because that would be racist. 
Because there are too many cheetahs.
A self-cleaning coven.
An egg timer